BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington voting rights act of 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "At-large method of election" means any of the following
methods of electing members of the governing body of a political
subdivision:
(a) One in which the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the
members to the governing body;
(b) One in which the candidates are required to reside within given
areas of the jurisdiction and the voters of the entire jurisdiction
elect the members to the governing body; or
(c) One which combines the criteria in (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
(2) "District-based elections" means a method of electing members
to the governing body of a political subdivision in which the candidate
must reside within an election district that is a divisible part of the
political subdivision and is elected only by voters residing within
that election district.
(3) "Polarized voting" means voting in which there is a difference
in the choice of candidates or other electoral choices that are
preferred by voters in a protected class, and in the choice of
candidates and electoral choices that are preferred by voters in the
rest of the electorate. A plaintiff may establish and a court may find
that elections are characterized by polarized voting based on relevant
and admissible evidence.
(4) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, town, school
district, or other district, municipal, or quasi-municipal corporation
organized pursuant to state, county, or local law.
(5) "Protected class" means a class of voters who are members of a
race, color, or language minority group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) At-large elections and district-based
elections may not be imposed or applied in a manner that denies a
protected class an equal opportunity to elect candidates of its choice
or an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election.
(2) An at-large election district or a district-based election
district is in violation of this section, when it is shown that:
(a) The elections in the political subdivision exhibit polarized
voting; and
(b) Members of a protected class do not have an equal opportunity
to elect candidates of their choice or an equal opportunity to
influence the outcome of an election.
(3) The fact that members of a protected class are not
geographically compact or concentrated to constitute a majority in a
proposed or existing district-based election district shall not
preclude a finding of polarized voting that results in an unequal
opportunity for a protected class to elect candidates of their choice
or influence the outcome of an election.
(4) In determining whether there is polarized voting under this
section, the court shall analyze elections for members of the governing
body of the political subdivision or elections incorporating other
electoral choices by the voters of the political subdivision.
(5) The court shall determine whether polarized voting has occurred
by examining results of elections in which at least one candidate is a
member of a protected class or elections involving ballot measures, or
other electoral choices that affect the rights and privileges of
members of a protected class who are voters of the political
subdivision that is the subject of an action filed pursuant to this
chapter. Only elections conducted prior to the filing of an action
pursuant to this chapter shall be used to establish or rebut the
existence of polarized voting that results in an unequal opportunity
for a protected class to elect candidates of their choice or influence
the outcome of an election.
(6) The election of candidates who are members of a protected class
and who are preferred by voters of the protected class and who were
elected prior to the filing of this action pursuant to this chapter, as
determined by an analysis of voting behavior, shall not preclude a
finding of polarized voting that results in an unequal opportunity for
a protected class to elect candidates of their choice or influence the
outcome of an election.
(7) Members of different protected classes may file an action
jointly pursuant to this chapter if they demonstrate that their
combined voting preferences as a group are different from the rest of
the electorate and demonstrate that there is polarized voting that
results in an unequal opportunity for these protected classes to elect
candidates of their choice or influence the outcome of an election.
(8) In an action filed pursuant to this section, the trial court
shall set a trial to be held no later than one hundred eighty days
after the filing of a complaint, and shall set a discovery and motions
calendar accordingly.
(9) Proof of intent on the part of the voters or elected officials
to discriminate against a protected class is not required.
(10) For purposes of any applicable statute of limitations, a cause
of action under this section arises every time there is an election
pursuant to an at-large method of election or a district-based election
district that is the subject of an action pursuant to this section.
(11) The plaintiff's constitutional right to the secrecy of the
plaintiff's vote is preserved and is not waived by the filing of an
action pursuant to this section, and is not subject to discovery.
(12) In seeking a temporary restraining order or a preliminary
injunction, a plaintiff shall not be required to post a bond or any
other security in order to secure such equitable relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A political subdivision that conducts an at-large method of election pursuant to state, county, or local law, is
hereby empowered to change its electoral system to a district-based
method of election. The districts shall be drawn in a manner
consistent with section 5 of this act.
(1) It is the responsibility of each political subdivision to
district its governmental unit forty-five days after invoking its
authority under this section. Thereafter, it is the responsibility of
each political subdivision with a governing body comprised of single-member districts to periodically redistrict its governmental unit,
based on population information from the most recent federal decennial
census.
(2) Within forty-five days after receipt of federal decennial
census information applicable to a specific local area, the commission
established in RCW 44.05.030 shall forward the census information to
each political subdivision charged with redistricting under this act.
(3) No later than eight months after its receipt of federal
decennial census data, the governing body of the political subdivision
shall prepare a plan for redistricting its districts.
(4) The plan shall be consistent with the following criteria:
(a) Each district shall be as nearly equal in population as
possible to each and every other such district comprising the political
subdivision.
(b) Each district shall be as compact as possible.
(c) Each district shall consist of geographically contiguous area.
(d) To the extent feasible, the district boundaries shall coincide
with existing recognized natural boundaries and shall, to the extent
possible, preserve existing communities of related and mutual interest.
(e) During the adoption of its plan, the political subdivision
shall ensure that full and reasonable public notice of its actions is
provided. The political subdivision shall hold at least one public
hearing on the redistricting plan at least one week before adoption of
the plan.
(f) District boundaries may not be drawn or maintained in a manner
that denies an equal opportunity of a protected class to elect
candidates of its choice or an equal opportunity to influence the
outcome of an election.
(5) After invoking its authority under this section, the political
subdivision shall order new elections to be scheduled at the next date
authorized by state law for conducting elections. All of the positions
that were elected pursuant to the previous electoral system and have at
least two years remaining in their terms of office shall be subject to
new elections in order to continue their term of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon a finding of a violation of section
3 of this act, the court shall implement appropriate remedies,
including the imposition of a district-based election district that is
tailored to remedy the violation. The court may direct the affected
jurisdiction to draw or redraw district boundaries or appoint an
individual or panel to draw or redraw district lines. The proposed
districts must be approved by the court prior to their implementation.
(2) In tailoring a remedy consisting of district-based elections,
the court shall implement a district-based election district that is
geographically compact. The fact that members of a protected class do
not constitute a numerical majority within a proposed district-based
election district shall not preclude the implementation of such a
district-based election district. If, in tailoring a remedy, the court
orders the implementation of a district-based election district where
the members of the protected class are not a numerical majority, the
court shall do so in a manner that provides the protected class an
equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or an equal
opportunity to influence the outcome of an election.
(3) In tailoring a remedy after a finding of a violation of section
3 of this act:
(a) If the next date authorized by state law for conducting
elections occurs ninety days or more after the court's ruling, the
court shall order new elections, conducted pursuant to the remedy, to
be scheduled at the next date authorized by state law for conducting
elections. If a special filing period is required, the county auditor
shall establish a five-day filing period at the earliest possible date.
(b) If the next election date occurs less than ninety days after
the court's ruling, the next election will occur as scheduled and
organized.
(c) All of the positions that were elected pursuant to the at-large
or district-based election district that was the subject of the action
filed pursuant to this chapter and have at least two years remaining in
their terms of office, including those elected pursuant to (b) of this
subsection, shall be subject to new elections, pursuant to the remedy
implemented under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) State laws or local ordinances requiring cities, towns,
counties, school districts, and other jurisdictions to conduct
district-based elections in a primary and at-large elections in the
general election do not apply in jurisdictions that implement district-based elections pursuant to Section 4 of this act, or are required to
implement district-based elections, pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, where district-based elections is defined in section 2(2) of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In any action to enforce this chapter,
the court shall allow the prevailing plaintiff or plaintiffs, other
than the state or political subdivision thereof, reasonable attorneys'
fees, all nonattorney fee costs as defined by RCW 4.84.010, and all
reasonable expert witness fees.
(2) Prevailing defendants shall not recover an award of fees or
costs except pursuant to RCW 4.84.185.
(3) A plaintiff shall be deemed to be a prevailing party for
purposes of this section if the political subdivision that is the
subject of an action filed pursuant to this chapter adopts or
implements a district-based election system after the action is filed
that is different from the at-large or district-based election system
that is the subject of the action filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any voter who is a member of a protected
class and who resides in a political subdivision where a violation of
section 3 of this act is alleged may file an action in the superior
court of the county in which the political subdivision is located. If
the action is against a county, the action may be filed in the superior
court of such county, or in the superior court of either of the two
nearest judicial districts as determined pursuant to RCW 36.01.050(2).
There is no requirement that an action filed pursuant to this chapter
be filed as a class action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Prior to filing an action pursuant to this
act, a plaintiff shall first notify the political subdivision that the
plaintiff intends to challenge the political subdivision's electoral
system under this act. If the political subdivision does not invoke
its authority under section 4 of this act within forty-five days after
receiving notice, a plaintiff may file an action under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The provisions of this act are not
applicable to cities and towns with populations under one thousand or
to school districts with K-12 full-time equivalent enrollments of less
than two hundred fifty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.343
RCW to read as follows:
The school board of directors may authorize a change to a district-based election as defined in section 2(2) of this act, such districts
to be drawn in a manner consistent with section 5 of this act. The
school board of directors shall order new elections to be scheduled at
the next date authorized by state law for conducting elections. All of
the positions that were elected pursuant to the previous method of
election and have at least two years remaining in their terms of office
shall be subject to new elections in order to continue their terms of
office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The county commissioner may authorize a change to a district-based
election as defined in section 2(2) of this act, such districts to be
drawn in a manner consistent with section 5 of this act. The county
commissioner shall order new elections to be scheduled at the next date
authorized by state law for conducting elections. All of the positions
that were elected pursuant to the previous method of election and have
at least two years remaining in their terms of office shall be subject
to new elections in order to continue their terms of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a city or town may authorize a change
to a district-based election as defined in section 2(2) of this act,
such districts to be drawn in a manner consistent with section 5 of
this act. The legislative authority of a city or town shall order new
elections to be scheduled at the next date authorized by state law for
conducting elections. All of the positions that were elected pursuant
to the previous method of election and have at least two years
remaining in their terms of office shall be subject to new elections in
order to continue their terms of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21
RCW to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a code city or town may authorize a
change to a district-based election as defined in section 2(2) of this
act, such districts to be drawn in a manner consistent with section 5
of this act. The legislative authority of a code city or town shall
order new elections to be scheduled at the next date authorized by
state law for conducting elections. All of the positions that were
elected pursuant to the previous method of election and have at least
two years remaining in their terms of office shall be subject to new
elections in order to continue their terms of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

--- END ---