BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Employee health and productivity is
critical to the success and efficiency of any business, including the
business functions in state agencies. Businesses that invest in the
health and wellness of their employees see returns on their investment
with savings in health care costs, employee productivity, a reduction
of absenteeism, and increases in the average number of healthy hours
worked per employee.
(2) Successful employee wellness programs are built with a
multipronged strategy that link the benefit plan design, and work place
supports that include health promotion, education, and on-site access
to supportive services.
(3) The health care authority is the agency responsible for
employee health across all state agencies and higher education
institutions, and is the ideal agency to build a broad strategy to
support employee health and wellness and support participating agencies
in assisting employee wellness and business productivity, with
expansion of the employee health and wellness program through
thoughtful modification of the benefit design and expansion of on-site
wellness supports.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.540 and 2007 c 259 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health care authority, in coordination with the
((department of health,)) health plans participating in public
employees' benefits board programs((,)) and the ((University of
Washington's center for health promotion, shall establish)) state
agencies shall expand and maintain a state employee health and wellness
program focused on reducing the health risks and improving the health
status of state employees((,)) and dependents((, and retirees))
enrolled in the public employees' benefits board. The program shall
use public and private sector best practices to achieve goals of
measurable health outcomes, measurable productivity improvements,
positive impact on the cost of medical care, and positive return on
investment. The program shall establish standards for health promotion
and disease prevention activities, and develop a mechanism to update
standards as evidence-based research brings new information and best
practices forward.
(2) The state employee health and wellness program shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance and other services as needed to
wellness staff in all state agencies and institutions of higher
education by; building on the success with the worksite wellness
demonstrations and expanding the Washington worksite wellness program;
(b) Develop effective communication tools and ongoing training for
wellness staff;
(c) ((Contract)) Complete consolidated contracting with outside
vendors for ((evaluation of program goals;
(d) Strongly encourage the widespread completion of online health
assessment tools for all state employees, dependents, and retirees.
The health assessment tool must be voluntary and confidential. Health
assessment data and claims data shall be used to:
(i) Engage state agencies and institutions of higher education in
providing evidence-based programs targeted at reducing identified
health risks;
(ii) Guide contracting with third-party vendors to implement
behavior change tools for targeted high-risk populations; and
(iii) Guide the benefit structure for state employees, dependents,
and retirees to include covered services and medications known to
manage and reduce health risks)) worksite wellness activities such as,
but not limited to, on-site flu vaccination clinics, mobile
mammography, healthy weight control programs, chronic disease
management courses, and other evidence-based programs that support
employee health and wellness;
(d) Develop and refine common core data elements for health plans
and agency worksites to assist with comparable measurement and
assessment of outcomes;
(e) Gather and monitor data from agencies on the worksite wellness
activities and outcomes including impacts on productivity and employee
wellness, and complete an analysis and summary of the outcomes
annually;
(f) Coordinate with the public employees benefits board to design
a benefit package that more strongly encourages the use of high-value
services and member engagement in health assessment and wellness
programs. A benefit design must incorporate a financial incentive for
completing a health assessment and participating in health activities
as an integral structural component in the benefit design rather than
as a freestanding assessment tool;
(g) Ensure the design of the health and wellness program and
benefit structure complement the development of chronic care management
and medical home models consistent with the requirements of RCW
41.05.023 and 41.05.670.
(3) ((The health care authority shall report to the legislature in
December 2008 and December 2010 on outcome goals for the employee
health program.)) To expand the employee health and wellness program
and build a strategic link with the benefit design and worksite
supports, the health care authority must engage in collaborative
discussions with enrollees in the public employees benefits board
program, the various employee unions representing employees, and state
agencies. Consolidated recommendations from all participants on the
benefit design and incentive structure must be shared with the board
for consideration.

--- END ---