BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 462 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Director" means the director of labor and industries;
(2) "Employ" includes to permit to work;
(3) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but
shall not include:
(a) Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid
on a piece rate basis in an operation which has been, and is generally
and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis
in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her
permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and
(iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks
during the preceding calendar year;
(b) Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private
home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business,
or profession;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside
salesperson as those terms are defined and delimited by rules of the
director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the
human resources director pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees
employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;
(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such
organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement
in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or
receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service
rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government, or publicly supported
retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(e) Any individual employed full time by any state or local
governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only
with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary
services and any compensation therefor shall not affect or add to
qualification, entitlement, or benefit rights under any state, local
government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that
provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(f) Any newspaper vendor ((or)), carrier, or delivery person
selling or distributing newspapers on the street, to offices, to
businesses, or from house to house and any freelance news correspondent
or "stringer" who, using his or her own equipment, chooses to submit
material for publication for free or a fee when such material is
published;
(g) Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate
Commerce Act;
(h) Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention
activities;
(i) Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged
with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development
of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or
providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for
young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;
(j) Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or
sleep at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a
substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not
engaged in the performance of active duties;
(k) Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or
municipal correctional, detention, treatment or rehabilitative
institution;
(l) Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office
of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality
thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;
(m) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries
operated by the department of transportation;
(n) Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an
American vessel;
(4) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting
directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an
employee;
(5) "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of
employment in which employees are gainfully employed;
(6) "Retail or service establishment" means an establishment
seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or
services, or both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales
or services in the particular industry;
(7) "Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of
employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on
banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to
such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by rules of
the director.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.04.240 and 2007 c 218 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "employment" shall not include services ((as)) performed
by a newspaper vendor, carrier, or delivery person selling or
distributing newspapers on the street, to offices, to businesses, or
from house to house and any freelance news correspondent or "stringer"
who, using his or her own equipment, chooses to submit material for
publication for free or a fee when such material is published.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.12.020 and 2009 c 162 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are the only employments which shall not be included
within the mandatory coverage of this title:
(1) Any person employed as a domestic servant in a private home by
an employer who has less than two employees regularly employed forty or
more hours a week in such employment.
(2) Any person employed to do gardening, maintenance, or repair, in
or about the private home of the employer. For the purposes of this
subsection, "maintenance" means the work of keeping in proper
condition, "repair" means to restore to sound condition after damage,
and "private home" means a person's place of residence.
(3) A person whose employment is not in the course of the trade,
business, or profession of his or her employer and is not in or about
the private home of the employer.
(4) Any person performing services in return for aid or sustenance
only, received from any religious or charitable organization.
(5) Sole proprietors or partners.
(6) Any child under eighteen years of age employed by his or her
parent or parents in agricultural activities on the family farm.
(7) Jockeys while participating in or preparing horses for race
meets licensed by the Washington horse racing commission pursuant to
chapter 67.16 RCW.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, any
bona fide officer of a corporation voluntarily elected or voluntarily
appointed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of
the corporation, who at all times during the period involved is also a
bona fide director, and who is also a shareholder of the corporation.
Only such officers who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation and whose primary responsibilities do not
include the performance of manual labor are included within this
subsection.
(b) Alternatively, a corporation that is not a "public company" as
defined in RCW 23B.01.400(((24))) may exempt eight or fewer bona fide
officers, who are voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in
accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the
corporation and who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation, from coverage under this title without
regard to the officers' performance of manual labor if the exempted
officer is a shareholder of the corporation, or may exempt any number
of officers if all the exempted officers are related by blood within
the third degree or marriage. If a corporation that is not a "public
company" elects to be covered under subsection (8)(a) of this section,
the corporation's election must be made on a form prescribed by the
department and under such reasonable rules as the department may adopt.
(c) Determinations respecting the status of persons performing
services for a corporation shall be made, in part, by reference to
Title 23B RCW and to compliance by the corporation with its own
articles of incorporation and bylaws. For the purpose of determining
coverage under this title, substance shall control over form, and
mandatory coverage under this title shall extend to all workers of this
state, regardless of honorary titles conferred upon those actually
serving as workers.
(d) A corporation may elect to cover officers who are exempted by
this subsection in the manner provided by RCW 51.12.110.
(9) Services rendered by a musician or entertainer under a contract
with a purchaser of the services, for a specific engagement or
engagements when such musician or entertainer performs no other duties
for the purchaser and is not regularly and continuously employed by the
purchaser. A purchaser does not include the leader of a group or
recognized entity who employs other than on a casual basis musicians or
entertainers.
(10) Services performed by a newspaper vendor, carrier, or delivery
person selling or distributing newspapers on the street, to offices, to
businesses, or from house to house and any freelance news correspondent
or "stringer" who, using his or her own equipment, chooses to submit
material for publication for free or a fee when such material is
published.
(11) Services performed by an insurance producer, as defined in RCW
48.17.010(((5))), or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15
RCW.
(12) Services performed by a booth renter. However, a person
exempted under this subsection may elect coverage under RCW 51.32.030.
(13) Members of a limited liability company, if either:
(a) Management of the company is vested in its members, and the
members for whom exemption is sought would qualify for exemption under
subsection (5) of this section were the company a sole proprietorship
or partnership; or
(b) Management of the company is vested in one or more managers,
and the members for whom the exemption is sought are managers who would
qualify for exemption under subsection (8) of this section were the
company a corporation.

--- END ---