BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a
student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a
lifelong learner. The state board of education shall establish at
least two high school diplomas: A standard diploma and an applied
diploma.
(2) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in (c) of this subsection and RCW 28A.230.122, and except
those equivalencies established by local high schools or school
districts under RCW 28A.230.097. ((The purpose of a high school
diploma is to declare that a student is ready for success in
postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship, and is
equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.))
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are only required for graduation from a public
high school with a standard diploma but are not the only requirements
for graduation with a standard diploma. A student seeking an applied
diploma is not required to take or meet the state standard on the high
school statewide student assessment to graduate from high school.
(c) In order to earn an applied diploma a student must meet all the
requirements of the standard diploma, except for the certificate of
academic achievement and the certificate of individual achievement
requirements; and except that a student may choose to earn four credits
of technology, arts, or an apprenticeship instead of meeting the credit
requirements for English and mathematics. The arts credits may include
industrial arts, agricultural arts, or fine arts courses.
Additionally, a student must demonstrate minimum competency in English
and mathematics by meeting the state standard on the eighth grade
statewide student assessment in reading, writing, and mathematics and
must pass at least two high school courses in English and mathematics,
although the two mathematics courses are not required to be algebra I,
geometry, integrated mathematics I, or integrated mathematics.
(d) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(((2))) (3)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the
state board of education to establish and enforce minimum high school
graduation requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate
the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement if earning a standard diploma, complete the
program and earn the program's certificate or credential, and complete
other state and local graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(((3))) (4) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in
languages other than English established by the state board of
education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of high
school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign
language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered
to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation
requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than
English.
(((4))) (5) If requested by the student and his or her family, a
student who has completed high school courses before attending high
school shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to
fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(((5))) (6) Students who have taken and successfully completed high
school courses under the circumstances in subsection (((4))) (5) of
this section shall not be required to take an additional competency
examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive
credit.
(((6))) (7) At the college or university level, five quarter or
three semester hours equals one high school credit.

--- END ---