BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county are authorized to receive and take into custody, for the
purposes of temporary safekeeping, any firearm of a person who
voluntarily requests to surrender a firearm, if the person appears in
person to surrender the firearm and provides written attestation of the
voluntary surrender.
(b) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county are authorized to receive and take into custody for the purposes
of temporary safekeeping any firearm of a person whose family member,
friend, or mental health professional appears in person and provides
written attestation, that the owner of the firearm voluntarily
surrenders his or her firearm for temporary safekeeping. The family
member, friend, or mental health professional must sign under penalty
of perjury that the owner of the firearm has voluntarily surrendered
the firearm. A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
the voluntariness of the firearm surrender is guilty of false swearing
under RCW 9A.72.040.
(c) A law enforcement agency may inquire into and require the
provision of identifying information regarding the owner of the firearm
before taking the firearm into custody including, but not limited to,
the owner's name, driver's license or state identicard information,
residential address, and phone number.
(2) Any firearm surrendered under this section may be held by the
law enforcement agency for a period of up to and including thirty days.
It is in the discretion of the law enforcement agency whether and when
to return a firearm surrendered under this section sooner than thirty
days.
(3) A law enforcement agency must provide notice to any person
surrendering their firearm that the firearm may be held for up to
thirty days, after which a person must retrieve the firearm or make a
new attestation of surrender for temporary safekeeping. If a person
other than the owner of the firearm surrenders the firearm pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the law enforcement agency must make
a good faith effort to send written notice to the legal owner.
(4) A firearm may only be reclaimed by the legal owner of the
firearm. A firearm not claimed within sixty days after the completion
of the last thirty-day safekeeping period may be disposed of in
accordance with agency policy for disposition of firearms.
(5) Before returning any firearm surrendered under this section,
the chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county must
conduct a criminal history background check in accordance with agency
policy regarding return and transfer of firearms, to determine whether
the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess
a firearm, or is prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal
law. The issuing authority must not return a firearm to anyone who is
found to be prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal or state
law.
(6) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county has the authority to collect a nonrefundable fee of up to fifty
dollars for the background check, which must be paid upon return of the
firearm. Payment must be made by cash, check, or money order, or other
methods of payment at the discretion of the agency.
(7) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county, their employees, or units of local government and its
employees, are immune from civil liability for damages for any
discretionary decision to take or refuse to take into custody any
firearm, or to return or refuse to return any firearm as provided in
this section.

--- END ---