BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many
residents in supported living facilities are vulnerable and their
health and well-being are dependent on their caregivers.
(2) The legislature finds that the state of Washington has a
compelling interest in developing and enforcing standards that promote
the health, welfare, and safety of persons with developmental
disabilities who reside in supported living facilities. The health,
safety, and well-being of these people must be the paramount concern in
determining whether to contract with a supported living provider or to
suspend or debar a supported living contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Employee" means any person employed by a supported living
provider or contractor.
(2) "Whistleblower" means an employee who:
(a) In good faith reports practices that may violate the provisions
of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Is believed to have reported practices that may violate the
provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter but
who, in fact, has not reported such practices; or
(c) Has assisted in the reporting of practices that may violate the
provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter or
has provided testimony or information in connection with the reporting
of such practices.
(3) "Workplace reprisal or retaliatory action" includes actions
such as discharge or in any manner discrimination against any employee
who has reported or filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be
instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or has
testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding or because of
the exercise by such employee on behalf of himself or herself or others
of any right or responsibility afforded by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department must collect information
on the salaries of administrators and owners of supported living
contractors. This information must include the percentage of these
salaries paid with client care funds and the percentage paid with
administrative funds.
(2) The department must collect information on each business
vehicle owned by supported living contactors, including make, model,
year, and total mileage used to transport clients.
(3) The department must collect names, training, and criminal
background check history of all employees working for supported living
contractors. Contractors must update this information with the
department as new employees are hired.
(4) The department must make available online a list of the safety
history of supported living contractors. The safety history must
include inspection results and citation history.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Supported living contractors may not use
client care funds to pay for legal fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department must use performance-based contracting standards when contracting with supported living
contractors.
(2) The department must adopt a process to debar supported living
contractors. The debarment process must include the following:
(a) Notice to the contractor of the intent to debar, including the
specific reason for debarment. After reasonable notice to the
contractor and reasonable opportunity for that contractor to be heard,
the director has the authority to debar a contractor for cause from
consideration for award of contracts. The debarment must be for a
period of not more than three years.
(b) The reasons for debarment based on a finding of one or more of
the following:
(i) Conviction for commission of a criminal offense as an incident
to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public or private contract or
subcontract, or in the performance of such contract or subcontract;
(ii) Conviction under state or federal statutes of embezzlement,
theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destruction of records,
receiving stolen property, or any other offense indicating a lack of
business integrity or business honesty that currently, seriously, and
directly affect responsibility as a contractor;
(iii) Conviction under state or federal antitrust statutes arising
out of the submission of bids or proposals;
(iv) Two or more violations within the previous five years of the
federal labor relations act or the national labor relations act as
determined by the national labor relations board or court of competent
jurisdiction;
(v) Violations of contract provisions, of a character that is
regarded by the department to be so serious as to justify debarment
action, including:
(A) Deliberate failure to perform support living services as
detailed in the contract;
(B) A recent record of failure to perform or of unsatisfactory
performance in accordance with the terms of one or more contracts,
however the failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance caused by
acts beyond the control of the contractor may not be considered to be
a basis for debarment;
(vi) Violation of ethical standards as adopted by the department;
(vii) A finding of abandonment, abuse, or neglect of a client;
(viii) Any other cause the department determines to be so serious
and compelling as to affect responsibility as a contractor, including
debarment by another governmental entity;
(c) The department must issue a written decision to debar. The
decision must:
(i) State the reason for the action taken; and
(ii) Inform the debarred contractor of the contractor's rights to
judicial or administrative review.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "debar" or "debarment" means
to prohibit a contractor from submitting a bid, having a bid
considered, or entering into a contract with the department during a
specified period of time as set forth in a debarment order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department may take one or more of
the actions listed in subsection (2) of this section if the department
finds that a supported living contractor has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated a supported living facility without a contract with
the department, after the contract has been suspended, or if the
contractor has been debarred;
(c) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact on his or her contract application or any data attached
thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Impose reasonable conditions in the contract, such as
correction within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of
clients the contractor may admit or serve;
(b) Impose civil penalties of at least one hundred dollars per day
per violation;
(c) Impose civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars for a
current or former supported living provider who is providing supported
living services without contracting with the department;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to contract with a provider; or
(e) Suspend admissions to the supported living facility by imposing
stop placement. The department must institute a stop placement for new
clients when a supported living contractor has more than five open
complaints being investigated by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 In the event of serious noncompliance in a
home operated by a contractor with multiple supported living
facilities, leading to the imposition of one or more actions listed in
section 6(2) of this act, the department shall inspect the other homes
operated by the contractor to determine whether the same or related
deficiencies are present in those homes. The cost of these additional
inspections may be imposed on the contractor as a civil penalty up to
a maximum of three hundred dollars per additional inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Supported living facilities must be
inspected at least every eighteen months, with an annual average of
fifteen months. However, a supported living facility may be allowed to
continue without inspection for two years if the facility had no
inspection citations for the past three consecutive inspections and has
received no written notice of violations resulting from complaint
investigations during that same time period.
(2) The department may make an unannounced inspection of a
supported living facility at any time to assure that the home and
provider are in compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Supported living facilities must be
maintained internally and externally in good repair and condition.
Such homes must have safe and functioning systems for heating, cooling,
hot and cold water, electricity, plumbing, garbage disposal, sewage,
cooking, laundry, artificial and natural light, ventilation, and any
other feature of the home.
(2) Supported living facilities must develop a fire drill plan for
emergency evacuation of residents, must have working smoke detectors in
each bedroom where a resident is located, must have working fire
extinguishers on each floor of the home, and may not keep nonambulatory
patients above the first floor of the home.
(3) Supported living facilities must be financially solvent, and
upon request for good cause, must provide the department with detailed
information about the home's finances. Financial records of the adult
family home may be examined when the department has good cause to
believe that a financial obligation related to resident care or
services will not be met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department may deny, suspend,
modify, revoke, or refuse to contract with a supported living provider
when the department finds that the provider or any partner, officer,
director, managerial employee, or majority owner of the provider:
(a) Operated a supported living facility without a contract with
the department or under a revoked or suspended contract;
(b) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of a
material fact: (i) In a contract application or any data attached to
the application; or (ii) in any matter under investigation by the
department;
(c) Refused to allow representatives or agents of the department to
inspect: (i) The books, records, and files necessary to gather the
data required by section 3 of this act; or (ii) any portion of the
premises of the supported living facility;
(d) Willfully prevented, interfered with, or attempted to impede in
any way: (i) The work of any authorized representative of the
department; or (ii) the lawful enforcement of any provision of this
chapter; or
(e) Has a history of significant noncompliance with federal or
state regulations in providing care or services to vulnerable adults or
children. In deciding whether to deny, suspend, modify, revoke, or
refuse to contract with a supported living provider under this section,
the factors the department considers must include the gravity and
frequency of the noncompliance.
(2) The department must serve upon the applicant a copy of the
decision granting or denying a contract application. An applicant
shall have the right to contest denial of his or her contract
application as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by requesting a hearing in
writing within twenty-eight days after receipt of the notice of denial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) It is an unfair practice under chapter
49.60 RCW for a supported living provider or contractor to subject an
employee who is a whistleblower to workplace reprisal or retaliatory
action as a result of the employee being a whistleblower.
(2) The identity of a whistleblower who reports, in good faith, to
the department practices that may violate the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted hereunder must remain confidential. The
provisions of RCW 4.24.500 through 4.24.520, providing certain
protections to persons who communicate to government agencies, apply to
such reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The department may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 71A RCW.

--- END ---