BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The federal patient protection and
affordable care act creates an array of coverage options to ensure
residents have access to insurance. Section 1331 provides state
flexibility to establish a federal basic health program option for
individuals with family income up to two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level, who are not otherwise eligible for medicaid. The
federal basic health option is an alternative to the health benefit
exchange for certain eligible individuals and offers an opportunity to
demonstrate effective and efficient purchasing of coverage, with the
potential for lower out-of-pocket expenses for low-income enrollees.
It is the intent of the legislature that the federal basic health
option remain a viable alternative for implementation in Washington.
Accordingly, the legislature intends there to be active monitoring of
enrollment in the health benefit exchange and to establish a trigger
for the creation of the federal basic health option if enrollment in
the health benefit exchange is not successfully reaching uninsured,
low-income individuals with income up to two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.71.030 and 2012 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The exchange may, consistent with the purposes of this chapter:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name; (b) make and execute agreements,
contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or
entity; (c) employ, contract with, or engage personnel; (d) pay
administrative costs; (e) accept grants, donations, loans of funds, and
contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise, from the
United States or any of its agencies, from the state of Washington and
its agencies or from any other source, and use or expend those moneys,
services, materials, or other contributions; (f) aggregate or delegate
the aggregation of funds that comprise the premium for a health plan;
and (g) complete other duties necessary to begin open enrollment in
qualified health plans through the exchange beginning October 1, 2013.
(2) The board shall develop a methodology to ensure the exchange is
self-sustaining after December 31, 2014. The board shall seek input
from health carriers to develop funding mechanisms that fairly and
equitably apportion among carriers the reasonable administrative costs
and expenses incurred to implement the provisions of this chapter. The
board shall submit its recommendations to the legislature by December
1, 2012. If the legislature does not enact legislation during the 2013
regular session to modify or reject the board's recommendations, the
board may proceed with implementation of the recommendations.
(3) The board shall establish policies that permit city and county
governments, Indian tribes, tribal organizations, urban Indian
organizations, private foundations, and other entities to pay premiums
on behalf of qualified individuals.
(4) The employees of the exchange may participate in the public
employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and the public
employees' benefits board under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(5) Qualified employers may access coverage for their employees
through the exchange for small groups under section 1311 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended. The exchange shall enable any qualified
employer to specify a level of coverage so that any of its employees
may enroll in any qualified health plan offered through the small group
exchange at the specified level of coverage.
(6) The exchange shall report its activities and status to the
governor and the legislature as requested, and no less often than
annually.
(7)(a) The exchange shall monitor enrollment, by income and
uninsured status, and share enrollment reports with the health care
authority and the health care committees of the legislature. The first
report must be completed by January 30, 2015, and must be published
annually thereafter. At a minimum, the annual enrollment reports must
reflect the end of year enrollment, monthly lives covered, enrollment
by the following income brackets: Zero to one hundred thirty-eight
percent, one hundred thirty-nine to two hundred percent, two hundred
one to three hundred percent, three hundred one to four hundred
percent, and four hundred one percent above the federal poverty level;
plan choices in the individual and small group products, application
inquiries and percent of enrollment captured, and the success reaching
the uninsured populations. To the degree possible, the exchange shall
also monitor enrollee success accessing care once enrolled.
(b) The office of the insurance commissioner shall report the rate
of uninsured among the state population under sixty-five years of age,
beginning January 30, 2014, and annually thereafter.
(c) If the population with income between one hundred thirty-nine
percent and two hundred percent of the federal poverty level is
uninsured at a rate more than ten percent the development of the
federal basic health option, consistent with section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, will be triggered, and the agency must
implement the basic health option no later than twelve months from the
trigger finding.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.250 and 2012 c 87 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((On or before December 1, 2012, the director of the health
care authority shall submit a report to the legislature on whether to
proceed with implementation of a federal basic health option, under
section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended. The report shall
address whether:
(a) Sufficient funding is available to support the design and
development work necessary for the program to provide health coverage
to enrollees beginning January 1, 2014;
(b) Anticipated federal funding under section 1331 will be
sufficient, absent any additional state funding, to cover the provision
of essential health benefits and costs for administering the basic
health plan. Enrollee premium levels will be below the levels that
would apply to persons with income between one hundred thirty-four and
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level through the exchange;
and
(c) Health plan payment rates will be sufficient to ensure enrollee
access to a robust provider network and health homes, as described
under RCW 70.47.100.
(2) If the legislature determines to proceed with implementation of
a federal basic health option, the director shall provide the necessary
certifications to the secretary of the federal department of health and
human services under section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended,
to proceed with adoption of the federal basic health program option.
(3) Prior to making this finding, the director shall:
(a) Actively consult with the board of the Washington health
benefit exchange, the office of the insurance commissioner, consumer
advocates, provider organizations, carriers, and other interested
organizations;
(b) Consider any available objective analysis specific to
Washington state, by an independent nationally recognized consultant
that has been actively engaged in analysis and economic modeling of the
federal basic health program option for multiple states.
(4) The director shall report any findings and supporting analysis
made under this section to the governor and relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature.
(5) To the extent funding is available specifically for this
purpose in the operating budget, the health care authority shall assume
the federal basic health plan option will be implemented in Washington
state, and initiate the necessary design and development work. If the
legislature determines under subsection (1) of this section not to
proceed with implementation, the authority may cease activities related
to basic health program implementation.
(6))) The director of the health care authority shall monitor
enrollment reports provided by the commissioner. If the population
with income between one hundred thirty-nine percent and two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level is uninsured at a rate more than
ten percent the development of the federal basic health option,
consistent with section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, will
be triggered, and the agency must implement the basic health option no
later than twelve months from the trigger finding.
(2) The director shall seek clarification to demonstrate the
federal funding under section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended
will be sufficient to cover the provision of essential health benefits
and costs for administering the basic health plan; submit a detailed
development plan to the legislature with any necessary statutory
changes to reflect the federal requirements; and submit detailed
development plans to the health benefit exchange for coordination of
enrollment and programming changes.
(3) If implemented, the federal basic health program must be guided
by the following principles:
(a) Meeting the minimum state certification standards in section
1331 of the federal patient protection and affordable care act;
(b) To the extent allowed by the federal department of health and
human services, twelve-month continuous eligibility for the basic
health program, and corresponding twelve-month continuous enrollment in
standard health plans by enrollees; or, in lieu of twelve-month
continuous eligibility, financing mechanisms that enable enrollees to
remain with a plan for the entire plan year;
(c) Achieving an appropriate balance between:
(i) Premiums and cost-sharing minimized to increase the
affordability of insurance coverage;
(ii) Standard health plan contracting requirements that minimize
plan and provider administrative costs, while incentivizing
improvements in quality and enrollee health outcomes; and
(iii) Health plan payment rates and provider payment rates that
are sufficient to ensure enrollee access to a robust provider network
and health homes, as described under RCW 70.47.100; and
(d) Transparency in program administration, including active and
ongoing consultation with basic health program enrollees and interested
organizations, and ensuring adequate enrollee notice and appeal rights.

--- END ---