BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.450 and 2011 c 262 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A financial education public-private partnership is
established, composed of the following members:
(a) Four members of the legislature, with one member from each
caucus of the house of representatives appointed for a two-year term of
service by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one member
from each caucus of the senate appointed for a two-year term of service
by the president of the senate;
(b) Four representatives from the private for-profit and nonprofit
financial services sector, including at least one representative from
the jumpstart coalition, to be appointed for a staggered two-year term
of service by the governor;
(c) Four teachers to be appointed for a staggered two-year term of
service by the superintendent of public instruction, with one each
representing the elementary, middle, secondary, and postsecondary
education sectors;
(d) A representative from the department of financial institutions
to be appointed for a two-year term of service by the director;
(e) Two representatives from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, with one involved in curriculum development and one
involved in teacher professional development, to be appointed for a
staggered two-year term of service by the superintendent; and
(f) The state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee.
(2) The chair of the partnership shall be selected by the members
of the partnership from among the legislative members.
(3) One-half of the members appointed under subsection (1)(b), (c),
and (e) of this section shall be appointed for a one-year term
beginning August 1, 2011, and a two-year term thereafter.
(4) To the extent funds are appropriated or are available for this
purpose, the partnership may hire a staff person who shall reside in
the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Additional technical and logistical support
may be provided by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the department of financial institutions, the
organizations composing the partnership, and other participants in the
financial education public-private partnership.
(5) The members of the partnership shall be appointed by August 1,
2011.
(6) Legislative members of the partnership shall receive per diem
and travel under RCW 44.04.120.
(7) Travel and other expenses of members of the partnership shall
be provided by the agency, association, or organization that member
represents. Teachers appointed as members by the superintendent of
public instruction may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 from funds available in the Washington
financial education public-private partnership account. If the
attendance of a teacher member at an official meeting of the
partnership results in a need for a school district to employ a
substitute, payment for such a substitute may be made by the
superintendent of public instruction from funds available in the
Washington financial education public-private partnership account. A
school district must release a teacher member to attend an official
meeting of the partnership if the partnership pays the district for a
substitute or pays the travel expenses of the teacher member.
(8) This section shall be implemented to the extent funds are
available.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.460 and 2009 c 443 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The task of the financial education public-private partnership
is to seek out and determine the best methods of equipping students
with the knowledge and skills they need, before they become self-supporting, in order for them to make critical decisions regarding
their personal finances. The components of personal financial
education shall include the achievement of skills and knowledge
necessary to make informed judgments and effective decisions regarding
earning, spending, and the management of money and credit.
(2) In carrying out its task, and to the extent funds are
available, the partnership shall:
(a) Communicate to school districts the financial education
standards adopted under RCW 28A.300.462, other important financial
education skills and content knowledge, and strategies for expanding
the provision and increasing the quality of financial education
instruction;
(b) Review on an ongoing basis financial education curriculum that
is available to school districts, including instructional materials and
programs, online instructional materials and resources, and schoolwide
programs that include the important financial skills and content
knowledge;
(c) Develop evaluation standards and a procedure for endorsing
financial education curriculum that the partnership determines should
be recommended for use in school districts;
(d) ((Identify assessments and outcome measures that schools and
communities may use to determine whether students have met the
financial education standards adopted under RCW 28A.300.462)) Work with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to integrate
financial education skills and content knowledge into the common core
state standards for English language arts and mathematics and into
state standards for other subject matter areas;
(e) Monitor and provide guidance for professional development for
educators regarding financial education, including ways that teachers
at different grade levels may integrate financial skills and content
knowledge into mathematics, social studies, and other course content
areas;
(f) Work with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the professional educator standards board to create
professional development ((that could lead to a certificate endorsement
or other certification of competency)) in financial education;
(g) Develop academic guidelines and standards-based protocols for
use by classroom volunteers who participate in delivering financial
education to students in the public schools; ((and))
(h) Provide an annual report beginning December 1, 2009, as
provided in RCW 28A.300.464, to the governor, the superintendent of
public instruction, and the committees of the legislature with
oversight over K-12 education and higher education; and
(i) Work with the state board of education to incorporate financial
education into definitions and standards for career and college
readiness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
make available to all school districts the curriculum for a course or
courses in financial education with sufficient content to be equivalent
to one-half of one high school credit.
(b) The office shall select the courses with input from the
financial education public-private partnership established in RCW
28A.300.450 to ensure that the courses meet financial education
learning standards endorsed by the partnership.
(c) The office shall seek federal and private funds to support the
financial education courses.
(2) School districts shall provide all students in grades nine
through twelve the opportunity to complete a financial education course
or courses, whether through a regularly scheduled class period; before
or after school; during class period breaks, lunch periods, or library
and study time; at home; or other opportunities. School districts
shall publicize the availability of financial education courses to
students and their families. School districts are encouraged to grant
credit toward high school graduation to students who successfully
complete financial education courses.

--- END ---