BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2012 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as
part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by
the department.
(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person
who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or
misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is
committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual
abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); or promoting pornography (chapter
9.68 RCW).
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number
of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or
terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender
through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate
sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and 26.50.010.
(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(22) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(23) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(24) "Electronic monitoring" means the monitoring of an offender
using an electronic offender tracking system including, but not limited
to, a system using radio frequency or active or passive global
positioning system technology.
(25) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (26) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((26))) (27) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((27))) (28) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((28))) (29) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is subject to
electronic monitoring and confined in a private residence ((subject to
electronic surveillance)) or other facility utilized under contract by
the state.
(((29))) (30) "Homelessness" or "homeless" means a condition where
an individual lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence
and who has a primary nighttime residence that is:
(a) A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed
to provide temporary living accommodations;
(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used
as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or
(c) A private residence where the individual stays as a transient
invitee.
(((30))) (31) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((31))) (32) "Minor child" means a biological or adopted child of
the offender who is under age eighteen at the time of the offender's
current offense.
(((32))) (33) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.825;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997;
(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding
of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or
more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable
to a felony offense under this title and Title 9A RCW and the out-of-state definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the
definition of sexual motivation contained in this section.
(((33))) (34) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((34))) (35) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody
requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanant
or gross misdemeanant probationer ordered by a superior court to
probation pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210 and
supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011.
Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and "defendant" are used
interchangeably.
(((35))) (36) "Partial confinement" means confinement for ((no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if)) a
substantial portion of each day in an approved residence, institution,
or facility utilized under contract by the state with the balance of
the day spent in the community. Partial confinement may include:
(a) Home detention or work crew ((has been)) ordered by the court
((or));
(b) Home detention ((has been)) ordered by the department as part
of the parenting program((, in an approved residence, for a substantial
portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in the community.
Partial confinement includes)); and
(c) Work release, ((home detention,)) work crew, ((and a)) home
detention, or any combination ((of work crew and home detention))
thereof, ordered by the department and consistent with the provisions
of this chapter and chapter 72.65 RCW.
(((36))) (37) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this
section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a
Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under RCW 9.94A.833;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(((37))) (38) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((37))) (38)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((38))) (39) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority providing home-based
instruction and the victim was a student receiving home-based
instruction while under his or her authority or supervision. For
purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based instruction" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and (B) "teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority" does not include the parent or
legal guardian of the victim.
(((39))) (40) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((40))) (41) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((41))) (42) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:
(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under
RCW 9A.36.041;
(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under
chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under
chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that
is not a felony offense; or
(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is
not a felony offense; or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or
municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((42))) (43) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered
by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((43))) (44) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk
instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state
institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive
accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.
(((44))) (45) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((45))) (46) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((46))) (47) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.132;
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080;
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or
(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) if
the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to
register) on at least one prior occasion;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((47))) (48) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((48))) (49) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((49))) (50) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((50))) (51) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((51))) (52) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((52))) (53) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((53))) (54) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((54))) (55) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((55))) (56) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((56))) (57) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((57))) (58) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.190 and 2010 c 224 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentence that includes a term or terms of confinement
totaling more than one year shall be served in a facility or
institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state, or in
home detention pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6551. Except as provided in
subsection (3) or (((5))) (6) of this section, a sentence of not more
than one year of confinement shall be served in a facility operated,
licensed, or utilized under contract, by the county, or if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in the residence
of either the offender or a member of the offender's immediate family.
(2) If a county uses a state partial confinement facility for the
partial confinement of a person sentenced to confinement for not more
than one year, the county shall reimburse the state for the use of the
facility as provided in this subsection. The office of financial
management shall set the rate of reimbursement based upon the average
per diem cost per offender in the facility. The office of financial
management shall determine to what extent, if any, reimbursement shall
be reduced or eliminated because of funds provided by the legislature
to the department for the purpose of covering the cost of county use of
state partial confinement facilities. The office of financial
management shall reestablish reimbursement rates each even-numbered
year.
(3) A person who is sentenced for a felony to a term of not more
than one year, and who is committed or returned to incarceration in a
state facility on another felony conviction, either under the
indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter 9.95 RCW, or under this chapter
shall serve all terms of confinement, including a sentence of not more
than one year, in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state, consistent with the provisions of RCW
9.94A.589.
(4) If an offender has less than one hundred twenty days to serve
of his or her sentence at the time when the offender would otherwise be
transferred to a state correctional facility, the offender shall serve
the remainder of his or her sentence in the local correctional
facility.
(a) The department may make an exception if the offender has a
medical condition that would best be served in a state correctional
facility.
(b) The department shall compensate the local jurisdiction at the
office of financial management's adjudicated rate in accordance with
RCW 70.48.440 for the time period the offender would have served in a
state correctional facility.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a sentence
imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660 which has a standard sentence range
of over one year, regardless of length, shall be served in a facility
or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.
(((5))) (6) Sentences imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507 shall be
served in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.704 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 6 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every person who is sentenced to a period of community custody
shall report to and be placed under the supervision of the department,
subject to RCW 9.94A.501.
(2)(a) The department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense
and may establish and modify additional conditions of community custody
based upon the risk to community safety.
(b) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions on the basis of risk to community
safety, and shall supervise offenders during community custody on the
basis of risk to community safety and conditions imposed by the court.
The secretary shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
subsection (2)(b).
(3) If the offender is supervised by the department, the department
shall at a minimum instruct the offender to:
(a) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;
(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;
(c) Notify the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(d) Pay the supervision fee assessment; and
(e) Disclose the fact of supervision to any mental health or
chemical dependency treatment provider, as required by RCW 9.94A.722.
(4) The department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws.
(5) If the offender was sentenced pursuant to a conviction for a
sex offense, the department may impose electronic monitoring. Within
the resources made available by the department for this purpose, the
department shall carry out any electronic monitoring using the most
appropriate technology given the individual circumstances of the
offender. ((As used in this section, "electronic monitoring" means the
monitoring of an offender using an electronic offender tracking system
including, but not limited to, a system using radio frequency or active
or passive global positioning system technology.))
(6) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court-imposed conditions.
(7)(a) The department shall notify the offender in writing of any
additional conditions or modifications.
(b) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to the crime of conviction, the
offender's risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community.
(8) The department shall notify the offender in writing upon
community custody intake of the department's violation process.
(9) The department may require offenders to pay for special
services rendered including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent on the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to
pay.
(10)(a) When a sex offender has been sentenced pursuant to RCW
9.94A.507, the department shall assess the offender's risk of
recidivism and shall recommend to the board any additional or modified
conditions based upon the offender's risk to community safety and may
recommend affirmative conduct or electronic monitoring consistent with
subsections (4) through (6) of this section.
(b) The board may impose conditions in addition to court-ordered
conditions. The board must consider and may impose department-recommended conditions.
(c) By the close of the next business day, after receiving notice
of a condition imposed by the board or the department, an offender may
request an administrative hearing under rules adopted by the board.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the hearing examiner finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following:
(i) The crime of conviction;
(ii) The offender's risk of reoffending;
(iii) The safety of the community.
(d) If the department finds that an emergency exists requiring the
immediate imposition of additional conditions in order to prevent the
offender from committing a crime, the department may impose such
conditions. The department may not impose conditions that are contrary
to those set by the board or the court and may not contravene or
decrease court-imposed or board-imposed conditions. Conditions imposed
under this subsection shall take effect immediately after notice to the
offender by personal service, but shall not remain in effect longer
than seven working days unless approved by the board.
(11) In setting, modifying, and enforcing conditions of community
custody, the department shall be deemed to be performing a
quasi-judicial function.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2010 c 224 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) An offender may earn early release time as authorized by RCW
9.94A.729;
(2) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(3)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious and is
expected to require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is currently physically incapacitated due to age or the medical
condition or is expected to be so at the time of release; and
(iii) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical
placement will result in a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be
utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring
services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time.
(e) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical
placement;
(4) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(5) No more than the final ((six)) twelve months of the offender's
term of confinement may be served in partial confinement ((designed to
aid the offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself
in the community or no more than the final twelve months of the
offender's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as
part of the parenting program in RCW 9.94A.6551. This is in addition
to that period of earned early release time that may be exchanged for
partial confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d)));
(6) The governor may pardon any offender;
(7) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section;
(8) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870; and
(9) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an
offender sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as
subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not
be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed
mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless
allowed under RCW 9.94A.540.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.731 and 2009 c 28 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender ((sentenced to)) serving a term of partial
confinement shall be confined in ((the)) a facility, institution, or
residence for at least eight hours per day ((or, if serving a work crew
sentence shall comply with the conditions of that sentence as set forth
in RCW 9.94A.030 and 9.94A.725)). The offender shall be required as a
condition of partial confinement to report to the facility,
institution, or residence at designated times. During the period of
partial confinement, an offender may be required to comply with crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions imposed by the court or
the department pursuant to this chapter.
(2) ((An offender in a county jail ordered to serve all or part of
a term of less than one year in work release, work crew, or a program
of home detention who violates the rules of the work release facility,
work crew, or program of home detention or fails to remain employed or
enrolled in school may be transferred to the appropriate county
detention facility without further court order but shall, upon request,
be notified of the right to request an administrative hearing on the
issue of whether or not the offender failed to comply with the order
and relevant conditions. Pending such hearing, or in the absence of a
request for the hearing, the offender shall serve the remainder of the
term of confinement as total confinement. This subsection shall not
affect transfer or placement of offenders committed to the department.
(3))) Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and
abiding by the rules of the work release facility.
(3) An offender on home detention shall be placed on electronic
monitoring and must participate in programming and treatment that the
department determines is needed. The department shall assign a
community corrections officer who will monitor the offender's
compliance with conditions of partial confinement and programming
requirements.
(4) The department has the authority to return any offender serving
partial confinement to total confinement if the offender is not
complying with sentence requirements.
(5) An offender in a county jail ordered to serve all or part of a
term of less than one year in work release, work crew, or a program of
home detention who violates the rules of the work release facility,
work crew, or program of home detention or fails to remain employed or
enrolled in school may be transferred to the appropriate county
detention facility without further court order but shall, upon request,
be notified of the right to request an administrative hearing on the
issue of whether or not the offender failed to comply with the order
and relevant conditions. Pending the hearing, or in the absence of a
request for the hearing, the offender shall serve the remainder of the
term of confinement as total confinement. This subsection does not
affect transfer or placement of offenders committed to the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.65.010 and 1992 c 7 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Department" shall mean the department of corrections.
(2) "Secretary" shall mean the secretary of corrections.
(3) "State correctional institutions" shall mean and include all
state adult correctional facilities established pursuant to law under
the jurisdiction of the department for the treatment of convicted
felons sentenced to a term of confinement.
(4) "Prisoner" shall mean a person either male or female, convicted
of a felony and sentenced by the superior court to a term of
confinement and treatment in a state correctional institution under the
jurisdiction of the department.
(5) "Superintendent" shall mean the superintendent of a state
correctional institution, camp or other facility now or hereafter
established under the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to law.
(6) "Partial confinement" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
9.94A.030.
(7) "Transitional housing facility" means a facility utilized under
contract by the department to provide housing exclusively to offenders
on partial confinement under the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 72.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within amounts appropriated for this purpose, the department is
authorized to enter into contracts with private or public entities to
provide transitional housing facilities for offenders who may be
transferred to partial confinement.
(2) The entity must be able to provide transition support that
enables an offender to participate in evidence-based programming or
services including, but not limited to, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, sex offender treatment, educational
programming, or employment programming.
(3) Contracts for transitional housing facilities shall provide
for:
(a) Physical housing standards to ensure safe and quality housing;
(b) Procedures for facilitated communication between the entity and
the assigned community corrections officer for offenders housed in the
facility; and
(c) Annual examinations to be conducted by the department to ensure
compliance with contractual standards.
(4) The secretary may contract for the payment of the cost of
feeding and other expenses of participants in the transitional housing
program.
(5) Contracts may include any other terms and conditions as may be
appropriate for the implementation of the transitional housing program.
(6) An entity that provides a transitional housing facility is not
liable for civil damages arising from the criminal conduct of an
offender to any greater extent than a regular tenant, and no special
duties are created under this section.
(7) The location of transitional housing facilities is subject to
the zoning laws of the city or county in which they may be situated and
the siting provisions under this chapter.
(8) All state agencies shall cooperate with the department in the
administration of the transitional housing program as provided by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 72.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, by rule, inmate eligibility
standards for participation in the transitional housing program.
(2) In addition, the department shall: (a) Supervise and consult
with transitional housing program participants;
(b) Establish a written treatment plan best suited to the
participant's needs, cost, and the relationship of community
corrections officers to a system of case management;
(c) Place each participant on electronic monitoring; and
(d) Assist participants in locating available employment or
vocational training opportunities and require participants to attend
work or school at regularly defined hours.
(3) The department may:
(a) Provide participants, as necessary, with transportation,
suitable clothing and supplies, and a periodic stipend for the cost of
food and other incidentals;
(b) Advance costs for an offender's participation in vocational
training.
(4) Participants of the transitional housing program are required
to reimburse the department the per capita cost of subsistence and
lodging, and expenditures pursuant to subsection (3) of this section in
accordance with the provisions and in the priority established by
section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 72.65 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A participant of the transitional housing program who is
employed shall surrender to the secretary, or to the superintendent of
such state correctional institution as shall be designated by the
secretary, his or her total earnings, less payroll deductions required
by law, or such payroll deductions as may reasonably be required by the
nature of the employment and less such amount the department determines
is needed to help meet his or her personal needs, including costs
necessary for travel, meals, clothing, tools, and other incidentals.
The secretary or the superintendent of the state correctional
institution shall deduct from the earnings, and make payments from the
participant's earnings in the following order of priority:
(a) Reimbursement to the department for any expenses advanced for
participation in the transitional housing program pursuant to section
7 of this act;
(b) Payment of board and room charges for the participant;
(c) Payments for the necessary support of the participant's
dependents, if any;
(d) Ten percent for payment of legal financial obligations for all
participants who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court;
(e) Payments to creditors of the participant, which may be made at
his or her discretion and request, upon proper proof of personal
indebtedness; and
(f) Payments to the participant himself or herself upon discharge,
or for deposit in his or her personal account if returned to a state
correctional institution for confinement and treatment.
(2) The earnings of a transitional housing program participant are
not subject to garnishment, attachment, or execution while such
earnings are either in the possession of the employer or any state
officer authorized to hold such funds, except for payment of a court-ordered legal financial obligation as that term is defined in RCW
72.11.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The legislature finds that some
offenders benefit from a structured reentry into the community. The
department of corrections currently utilizes mechanisms such as work
release, community custody, and housing vouchers to ease an offender's
transition. However, these mechanisms are typically used when an
offender has less than four months to serve on his or her sentence or
after the offender has already been released. The legislature intends
to provide the department of corrections with the tools to start an
offender's transition earlier in the process by expanding the
department's authority to utilize partial confinement options in
combination with evidence-based programs and treatment.
(2) By July 1, 2014, the department of corrections shall have
contracts in place under chapter 72.65 RCW for no less than an
additional two hundred fifty-six beds in the work release program and
transitional housing program to facilitate the structured reentry of
offenders.
(3) By July 1, 2015, the department of corrections shall have
contracts in place under chapter 72.65 RCW for no less than an
additional five hundred twelve beds in the work release program and
transitional housing program to facilitate the structured reentry of
offenders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 9.94A.734 (Home detention -- Conditions)
and 2010 c 224 s 9, 2007 c 199 s 9, 2003 c 53 s 62, 2000 c 28 s 30, &
1995 c 108 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---