BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other penalties under this chapter, a person
convicted of an offense under RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102
shall be assessed an additional fee of five thousand dollars per
offense when the court finds that an internet advertisement in which
the victim of the crime was described or depicted was instrumental in
facilitating the commission of the crime.
(2) For purposes of this section, an "internet advertisement" means
a statement in electronic media that would be understood by a
reasonable person to be an implicit or explicit offer for sexual
contact or sexual intercourse, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW, in
exchange for something of value.
(3) Amounts collected as penalties under this section shall be
deposited in the account established under RCW 43.63A.740.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 9.68A.104 (Advertising commercial sexual abuse of a minor--Penalty) and 2012 c 138 s 2;
(2) 2012 c 138 s 1 (uncodified); and
(3) 2012 c 138 s 3 (uncodified).

--- END ---