BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
monitor the progress of the state in meeting its obligations to provide
a quality education to all students. The state acknowledges that
multiple entities, including the state board of education, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the quality education council, and the
newly created student achievement council, are actively working on
their own efforts to identify measurable goals and priorities, road
maps, and strategic plans for the entire educational system. It is not
the legislature's intent to undermine or curtail the ongoing work of
these groups. However, the legislature believes that a coordinated
single set of statewide goals would help focus these efforts. It is,
therefore, the intent of the legislature to establish a discrete set of
statewide data points that will serve as snapshots of the overall
health of the educational system as the program of basic education is
phased in and as a means for evaluating the state's progress in
achieving the outcomes set for the system and the students it serves.
By monitoring these statewide indicators over time, it is the intent of
the legislature to understand whether reform efforts and investments
are making positive progress in the overall education of students and
whether adjustments are necessary. By establishing a single set of
statewide indicators for the system, it is the intent of the
legislature to align the education reform efforts of each agency in
order to hold each part of the system – statewide leaders, schools
personnel, and students – accountable to the same definitions of
success.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The following statewide indicators of educational system health
are established:
(a) The percentage of students demonstrating the characteristics of
entering kindergartners in all six areas identified by the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills administered in accordance
with RCW 28A.655.080;
(b) The percentage of students meeting the standard on the fourth
grade statewide reading assessment administered in accordance with RCW
28A.655.070;
(c) The percentage of students meeting the standard on the eighth
grade statewide mathematics assessment administered in accordance with
RCW 28A.655.070;
(d) The four-year cohort high school graduation rate;
(e) The percentage of high school graduates who during the second
quarter after graduation are either enrolled in postsecondary education
or training or are employed, and the percentage during the fourth
quarter after graduation who are either enrolled in postsecondary
education or training or are employed; and
(f) The percentage of students enrolled in precollege or remedial
courses in college.
(2) The statewide indicators established in subsection (1) of this
section shall be disaggregated by at least the following subgroups of
students: Caucasian, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native,
Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low income, transitional
bilingual, migrant, special education, and students covered by section
504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C.
Sec. 794).
(3) The state board of education, with assistance from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, and the student achievement council,
shall establish a process for identifying realistic but challenging
system-wide performance goals and measurements, if necessary, for each
of the indicators established in subsection (1) of this section,
including for each subcategory as required by subsection (2) of this
section. The performance goal for each indicator must be set on a
biennium basis, and may only be adjusted upward.
(4) The state board of education, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, and the student achievement council shall align
their own strategic planning and education reform efforts with the
statewide indicators and performance goals established under the
authority of this section.
(5)(a) The state board of education, with assistance from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, and the student achievement
council, shall submit a report on the status of each indicator in
subsection (1) of this section and recommend performance goals and
measurements, if necessary, by December 1st of each even-numbered year,
except that the initial report establishing baseline values and initial
goals shall be delivered to the legislature December 1, 2013.
(b) If the state is not on target to meet the performance goals on
any individual indicator, recommendations must be made as to whether
adjustments within the program of basic education should be made to
improve student achievement in that area.
(c) To the extent data is available, the performance goals for each
state indicator must be compared with national data in order to
identify whether Washington student achievement results are within the
top ten percent nationally. If comparison data shows that Washington
students are falling behind national peers on any indicator, the report
must identify recommended evidence-based reforms targeted at addressing
the indicator in question.

--- END ---