BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The exclusive use of the term "doctor" by a
health care professional fails to fully inform patients of the training
and qualifications of the health care professional. There is a
compelling state interest in the public being protected from
potentially misleading and deceptive advertising which might cause
patients to have undue expectations regarding treatments and outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout section 3 of this
act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advertisement" denotes any communication or statement that
names the health care professional in relation to his or her practice
or profession. This includes, but is not limited to, business cards,
letterhead, patient brochures, e-mail, internet, audio or video
presentations, billboards, signs, professional notices, and any other
communication used in the course of business.
(2) "Deceptive or misleading information" includes, but is not
limited to, any advertisement or communication or representation that
misstates, falsely describes, holds out or falsely details the health
care professional's skills, training, expertise, education, board
certification, licensure, certification, registration, or professional
degrees.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Health care professional" means any individual who is
specifically referred to as a doctor, a surgeon, or a physician,
including any individual who has a doctorate degree in any health care
profession regulated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An advertisement that names a health care professional,
regardless of whether the title "doctor" appears, must identify the
type of license, registration, or certification held by the health care
professional by clearly stating either:
(a) The health care professional's full title indicating the type
of license, registration, or certification held by the health care
professional; or
(b) Use of a suffix after the name of the health care professional,
as approved in statute for the type of license, registration, or
certification held by the professional.
(2) All advertisements must be free from any and all deceptive or
misleading information.
(3) All health care professionals referenced in section 2 of this
act and who provide health care services are responsible for ensuring
that the manner in which they refer to themselves is consistent with
their training and qualifications so as to avoid any potential
confusion by patients as to their level of training and qualifications
or scope of practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---