BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.070 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 244 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby established a state building code council, to be
appointed by the governor.
(1) The state building code council shall consist of ((fifteen))
seventeen members:
(a) Two members must be county elected legislative body members or
elected executives;
(b) Two members must be city elected legislative body members or
mayors;
(c) One member must be a local government building code enforcement
official;
(d) One member must be a local government fire service official;
(e) One member shall represent general construction, specializing
in commercial and industrial building construction;
(f) One member shall represent general construction, specializing
in residential and multifamily building construction;
(g) One member shall represent the architectural design profession;
(h) One member shall represent the structural engineering
profession;
(i) One member shall represent the mechanical engineering
profession;
(j) One member shall represent the construction building trades;
(k) One member shall represent manufacturers, installers, or
suppliers of building materials and components;
(l) One member must be a person with a physical disability and
shall represent the disability community; ((and))
(m) One member shall represent the general public;
(n) One member shall represent owners and managers of existing
rental properties with one to four units; and
(o) One member shall represent owners and managers of existing
rental properties with five or more units.
(2) At least ((six)) seven of these ((fifteen)) seventeen members
shall reside east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(3) The council shall include: Two members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one from each
caucus; two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, one from each caucus; and an employee of the electrical
division of the department of labor and industries, as ex officio,
nonvoting members with all other privileges and rights of membership.
(4)(a) Terms of office shall be for three years, or for so long as
the member remains qualified for the appointment.
(b) The council shall elect a member to serve as chair of the
council for one-year terms of office.
(c) Any member who is appointed by virtue of being an elected
official or holding public employment shall be removed from the council
if he or she ceases being such an elected official or holding such
public employment.
(d) Any member who is appointed to represent a specific private
sector industry must maintain sufficiently similar employment or
circumstances throughout the term of office to remain qualified to
represent the specified industry. Retirement or unemployment is not
cause for termination. However, if a councilmember enters into
employment outside of the industry he or she has been appointed to
represent, then he or she shall be removed from the council.
(e) Any member who no longer qualifies for appointment under this
section may not vote on council actions, but may participate as an ex
officio, nonvoting member until a replacement member is appointed. A
member must notify the council staff and the governor's office within
thirty days of the date the member no longer qualifies for appointment
under this section. The governor shall appoint a qualified replacement
for the member within sixty days of notice.
(5) Before making any appointments to the building code council,
the governor shall seek nominations from recognized organizations which
represent the entities or interests identified in this section.
(6) Members shall not be compensated but shall receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(7) The department of enterprise services shall provide
administrative and clerical assistance to the building code council.

--- END ---