BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to grant counties
the option of establishing polling place voting and provide standards
for conducting polling place voting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Polling place voting" means voting conducted at polling places for
precincts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A county may establish polling place
voting in all or part of the county.
(2) Registered voters in the county may submit a petition to the
county legislative authority proposing to establish polling place
voting in the county. The petition must include signatures of
registered voters in the county equal to at least eight percent of the
voters in the county who voted in the last gubernatorial election.
(3) The county legislative authority may adopt a resolution
proposing to establish polling place voting in the county.
(4) The county legislative authority must conduct a public hearing
on a petition or resolution proposing to establish polling place
voting. Notice of the public hearing must be provided on the county's
web site and published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county.
(5) After receiving public testimony, the county legislative
authority may adopt an ordinance establishing polling place voting in
the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If a county legislative authority
establishes polling place voting pursuant to section 3 of this act, the
county elections officer must provide pertinent information regarding
polling place voting procedure to county voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Polling places must be accessible to
elderly and disabled persons.
(2) At any special election or primary, the county elections
officer may combine, unite, or divide precincts when conducting the
election. At any general election, the county elections officer must
report all election returns by individual precinct.
(3) A polling place for a voting precinct may be located outside
the boundaries of the precinct when the county elections officer deems
it feasible. However, the polling place must be located within a
reasonable distance of the voting precinct.
(4) At the request of the county elections officer, the county and
cities, towns, and special purpose districts must make their facilities
available for use as polling places. Payment for polling places and
any other conditions or obligations may be provided by contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A person may not interfere with a voter
attempting to vote at a polling place. Interfering with a voter
attempting to vote is a violation of RCW 29A.84.510.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any voter may take into the voting booth or
voting device any printed or written material to assist in casting his
or her vote. A voter must not use this material to electioneer and
must remove the material when he or she leaves the polling place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 At any election or primary, a political
party may designate a person, other than a precinct election officer,
for each polling place to check a list of registered voters of the
precinct to determine who has and who has not voted. The county
central committee chair of a political party may appoint election
observers to observe elections at polling places.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Ballots may not be used in any polling place
other than those prepared by the county elections officer. A voter is
not entitled to vote more than once at a primary or election, except
that if a voter incorrectly marks a ballot, he or she may return it and
be issued a new ballot. Precinct election officers shall void
incorrectly marked ballots and return them to the county elections
officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Paper records produced by electronic voting
devices are subject to all the requirements of this chapter and chapter
29A.60 RCW for ballot handling, preservation, reconciliation, transit
to the counting center, and storage. Paper records must be preserved
in the same manner and for the same period as ballots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) At the direction of the county
elections officer, designated election officers must stop at designated
polling places and pick up sealed containers of voted, untallied
ballots for delivery to the counting center. Two precinct election
officials must seal the voted ballots in containers furnished by the
county elections officer and properly identified with uniquely
prenumbered seals.
(2) At the counting center where sealed ballot containers are
delivered, the county elections officer or a designated representative
must receive the sealed ballot containers, record the time, date
precinct name or number, and seal number of each ballot container.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The county elections officer must provide
in each polling place a sufficient number of voting booths or voting
devices along with any supplies necessary to enable voters to mark or
register their choices on ballots and cast their votes in secrecy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) At all primaries and elections in
counties that have adopted polling place voting, polling places must be
kept open continuously from seven o'clock a.m. to eight o'clock p.m.
(2) All qualified electors who are at polling places at eight
o'clock p.m. shall be allowed to cast their votes.
(3) The precinct election officers, immediately before they start
to issue ballots or permit a voter to vote, shall announce that the
polling place for that precinct is open. At eight o'clock p.m., or at
the time when all qualified electors at the polling place pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section have voted, the precinct election
officers shall announce that the polling place for that precinct is
closed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A registered voter may not be allowed to
vote in the precinct in which he or she is registered at any election
or primary for which that voter has cast a mail ballot. A registered
voter who has requested a mail ballot for a primary or election, but
chooses to vote at the voter's precinct polling place in that primary
or election, must cast a provisional ballot. The canvassing board must
not count a provisional ballot if it finds that the voter has also
voted by mail in that primary or election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 No later than the day before a primary or
election, the county elections officer must provide to precinct
election officials at each polling place the following materials:
(1) Ballots;
(2) Precinct list of registered voters;
(3) Voting and registration instructions, printed in large type, to
be conspicuously displayed at each polling place; and
(4) Accessible voting equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Precinct election officers for each
precinct must meet at designated polling places at the time set by the
county elections officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Before opening the polling place for a
precinct, the voting equipment must be inspected to determine if it has
been properly prepared for voting. If the voting equipment is capable
of direct tabulation of each voter's choices, the precinct election
officers shall verify that no votes have been registered for any issue
or office to be voted on at that primary or election. The precinct
election officers must periodically examine the voting devices to
determine that no one has tampered with the devices.
(2) Any ballot box must be carefully examined by election officers
to determine that it is empty. The ballot box must then be sealed or
locked. The ballot box must not be opened before the polling place is
closed on the day of the primary or election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) A voter desiring to vote at a polling
place shall give his or her name to a precinct election officer and
provide identification. The identification may be a valid photo
identification, such as a driver's license or state identification
card, student identification card, or tribal identification card, a
voter's voter identification issued by a county elections officer, or
a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
government check or other government document. A voter desiring to
vote who cannot provide identification as required by this subsection
shall be issued a provisional ballot.
(2) If the right of a voter to vote is not challenged, the voter
must sign the precinct list of registered voters, and then be issued a
ballot. The voter must then proceed, without leaving the polling
place, to one of the voting booths or voting devices to cast his or her
vote.
(3) As each voter casts his or her vote, the precinct election
officer must insert in the precinct list of registered voters opposite
that voter's name, a notation to credit the voter with having
participated in that primary or election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 At all primaries and elections the flag of
the United States must be conspicuously displayed in front of each
polling place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Provisional ballots must be issued, along
with a provisional ballot outer envelope and a security envelope, to
voters as appropriate under RCW 29A.04.008. The provisional ballot
outer envelope must include a place for the voter's name; registered
address, both present and former if applicable; date of birth; reason
for the provisional ballot; the precinct number and the precinct
polling place at which the voter has voted; and a space for the county
elections officer to list the disposition of the provisional ballot.
The provisional ballot outer envelope must also contain a declaration
as required for mail ballots under RCW 29A.40.091; a place for the
voter to sign the oath; and a summary of the applicable penalty
provisions of this chapter. The voter must vote the provisional ballot
in secrecy and, when done, place the provisional ballot in the security
envelope, place the security envelope into the outer envelope, and
return it to the precinct election official. The election official
shall ensure that the required information is completed on the outer
envelope, have the voter sign it in the appropriate space, and place
the envelope in a secure container. The official must give the voter
written information advising him or her how to ascertain whether the
vote was counted and, if applicable, the reason why the vote was not
counted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) A person who votes in an election for
federal office as a result of a federal or state court order or any
other order extending the time for closing polling places may vote in
that election only by casting a provisional ballot. As to court orders
extending the time for closing polling places, this section does not
apply to any voters who were present in the polling place at the
statutory closing time and as a result are permitted to vote under
section 13 of this act. This section does not, by itself, authorize
any court to order that any individual be permitted to vote or to
extend the time for closing polling places, but this section is
intended to comply with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 15482(c) with regard to federal
elections.
(2) Any ballot cast under subsection (1) of this section must be
separated and held apart from other provisional ballots cast by those
not affected by the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) At each precinct immediately after the
last qualified voter has cast his or her vote, the precinct election
officers shall render unusable and secure in a container all unused
ballots for that precinct and return them to the county elections
officer.
(2) Immediately after the unused ballots are secure, the precinct
election officers shall count the number of voted ballots and make a
record, including any discrepancy, between this number and the number
of voters who signed the precinct list of registered voters for that
precinct or polling place, complete the certifications in the precinct
list of registered voters, prepare the ballots for transfer to the
counting center, and seal the voting devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The precinct list of registered voters for
each precinct or group of precincts delivered to the precinct election
officers for use on the day of a primary or election held in that
precinct shall be returned to the county elections officer upon the
completion of the count of votes cast in the precinct at that primary
or election. While in possession of the county elections officer, the
precinct lists are open to public inspection as prescribed in
regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 In precincts where polling place counting
devices are used, the election officers, before initializing the device
for voting, must proceed as follows:
(1) They shall see that the device is placed where it can be
conveniently attended by the election officers and operated by voters;
(2) They shall see whether the number or other designating mark on
the device's seal agrees with the control number provided by the
elections department. If they do not agree they shall at once notify
the elections department and delay initializing the device. A polling
place may be opened pending reexamination of the device;
(3) If the numbers do agree, they shall proceed to initialize the
device and see whether the public counter register "000." If the
counter is found to register a number other than "000," one of the
election officers must at once set the counter at "000" and confirm
that the ballot box is empty;
(4) Before processing any ballots through a polling place ballot
counting device, a zero report must be produced. Election officials
must verify that no ballots have been run through the counting device
and that all vote totals for each office are zero. If the totals are
not zero, election officials must either reset the device to zero or
contact the elections department to reset the device and allow voting
to continue using the auxiliary or emergency device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Whenever polling place ballot counting
devices are used, the devices may either be delivered with the supplies
required in section 13 of this act, or be delivered separately to the
polling place. All polling place ballot counting devices must be
sealed with a unique numbered seal at the time of final preparation and
logic and accuracy testing. A log must be made of all seal numbers and
device numbers used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The programmed memory pack for each polling
place ballot counting device must be sealed into the device during
final preparation and logic and accuracy testing. Except in the case
of a device breakdown, the memory pack must remain sealed in the device
until after polling places have closed and all reports and telephonic
or electronic transfer of results are completed. After all reporting
is complete, the precinct election officers responsible for
transferring the sealed voted ballots under RCW 29A.60.110 shall ensure
that the memory pack is returned to the elections department. If the
entire polling place ballot counting device is returned, the memory
pack must remain sealed in the device. If the polling place ballot
counting device is to remain at the polling place, the precinct
election officer shall break the seal on the device and remove the
memory pack and seal and return it along with the irregularly voted
ballots and special ballots to the elections department on election
day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Each polling place ballot counting device
must be programmed to return all blank ballots and overvoted ballots to
the voter for private reexamination. The election officer shall take
whatever steps are necessary to ensure that the secrecy of the ballot
is maintained. The precinct election officer must provide information
and instruction on how to properly mark the ballot. The voter may
remark the original ballot, may request a new ballot, or may choose to
complete a special ballot envelope and return the ballot as a special
ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 If a polling place ballot counting device
fails to operate at any time during polling hours voting must continue
and the ballots must be deposited for later tabulation in a secure
ballot compartment separate from the tabulated ballots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A county may adopt regulations to implement
this chapter.

Sec. 30 RCW 29A.32.241 and 2011 c 10 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be limited to the
following:
(1) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters'
pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the
date of the election or primary;
(2) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the
pamphlet;
(3) Information on how a person may register to vote and obtain a
ballot or, if applicable, vote at polling places, pursuant to this act;
(4) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory
statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure
or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other
than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or
district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction
submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county
prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before
inclusion in the pamphlet;
(5) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by
committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280; and
(6) For partisan primary elections, information on how to vote the
applicable ballot format and an explanation that minor political party
candidates and independent candidates will appear only on the general
election ballot.

Sec. 31 RCW 29A.40.010 and 2011 c 10 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each registered voter of the state, overseas voter, and service
voter ((shall)) must automatically be issued a mail ballot for each
general election, special election, or primary, unless the county in
which the voter resides has established polling place voting and the
voter has indicated that he or she will vote at a polling place.
Overseas voters and service voters are authorized to cast the same
ballots, including those for special elections, as a registered voter
of the state would receive under this chapter. Each registered voter
shall continue to receive a ballot by mail until the death or
disqualification of the voter, cancellation of the voter's
registration, or placing the voter on inactive status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 Sections 1 and 3 through 29 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

--- END ---