BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.070 and 2011 c 349 s 16 and 2011 c 10 s 38 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except where a recount or litigation is pending, the county
auditor must mail ballots to each voter at least eighteen days before
each primary or election, and as soon as possible for all subsequent
registration changes.
(2) Except where a recount or litigation is pending, the county
auditor must mail ballots to each service and overseas voter at least
thirty days before each ((primary election or)) special election, and
at least forty-five days before each primary or general election, or
any special election that involves federal office. A request for a
ballot made by an overseas or service voter after that day must be
processed immediately.
(3) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, mail, or in person.
The county auditor shall keep a record of each request for a
replacement ballot.
(4) A registered service or overseas voter may obtain a replacement
ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by
the voter. The voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by
mail, electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a
record of each request for a replacement ballot.
(((4))) (5) Each county auditor shall certify to the office of the
secretary of state the dates the ballots were mailed, or the reason and
date the ballots will be mailed if the ballots were not mailed timely.
(((5))) (6) Failure to mail ballots as prescribed in this section
does not by itself provide a basis for an election contest or other
legal challenge to the results of a primary, general election, or
special election.

--- END ---