BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.892 and 2012 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) For the Columbia river crossing project, the tolling
authority may enter into agreements with the Oregon state
transportation commission regarding the mutual or joint setting,
adjustment, and review of toll rates as the tolling authority may find
necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. Any agreement
reached pursuant to this section, prior to or after the effective date
of this section, must contain the following:
(i) A provision ensuring that the tolls will be set at a rate that
will financially impact both Washington and Oregon residents equitably;
(ii) A provision reflecting that only emergency response vehicles
will be given authority to cross the bridge without paying the toll.
All other vehicles crossing the bridge must pay the full toll;
(iii) A provision creating a bistate citizen tolling advisory
committee that complies with RCW 47.56.840; and
(iv) A provision that clearly sets the process by which the tolling
authorities will reach an agreement and set a toll rate in the event
that the tolling authorities are unable to agree upon a toll rate.
(b) Any agreement that does not contain the provisions required in
(a) of this subsection is neither binding nor enforceable.
(2) Any agreement between the tolling authority and the Oregon
state transportation commission made pursuant to this section takes
effect, and is not binding and enforceable until, thirty days after
adjournment of the next ensuing regular legislative session. If the
tolling authority has not entered into an agreement with the Oregon
state transportation commission by December 31, 2015, this section
expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to any agreement reached
pursuant to RCW 47.56.892 regardless of when the agreement was
initially signed by both parties. To this extent, this act applies
retroactively, but in all other respects it applies prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---