BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many taxpayers
face difficulties paying property taxes on due dates, particularly
during economic downturns. The legislature intends to authorize
counties to establish programs enabling taxpayers to make partial
payments of delinquent property taxes on a monthly or quarterly basis.
These programs can provide relief for struggling taxpayers and afford
local governments a more stable source of revenue.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.56.020 and 2010 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer must be the receiver and collector of all
taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for
state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and
also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or
officer for the use of his or her county. No treasurer may accept tax
payments or issue receipts for the same until the treasurer has
completed the tax roll for the current year's collection and provided
notification of the completion of the roll. Notification may be
accomplished electronically, by posting a notice in the office, or
through other written communication as determined by the treasurer.
All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the
provisions of this title are due and payable to the treasurer on or
before the thirtieth day of April and, except as provided in this
section, shall be delinquent after that date.
(2) Each tax statement must include a notice that checks for
payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . .
County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements may not include
any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of the
individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other individual.
(3) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on personal
property or on any lot, block or tract of real property payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid on
or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of such tax is due
and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following and
shall be delinquent after that date.
(4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on any lot,
block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid
after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of
October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the full
amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax is due
and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following and
is delinquent after that date.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the
full year amount of tax unpaid from the date of delinquency until paid.
Interest must be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of
payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent.
In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to
penalties as follows:
(a) A penalty of three percent of the full year amount of tax
unpaid is assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year in
which the tax is due.
(b) An additional penalty of eight percent is assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax
is due.
(6)(a) A county treasurer may establish a program enabling
taxpayers to make partial payments of delinquent property taxes on a
monthly or quarterly basis, consistent with this subsection (6).
(b) Partial payments of delinquent property taxes:
(i) Must, within a twelve-month period, equal or exceed one year's
delinquent taxes, interest, and penalties;
(ii) May be collected by electronic bill presentment and payment,
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section; and
(iii) May not be made after proceedings have been initiated for
collection of delinquent taxes through foreclosure and sale of real
property or distraint and sale of personal property.
(7) Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest or
penalties may be assessed during any period of armed conflict on
delinquent taxes imposed on the personal residences owned by active
duty military personnel who are participating as part of one of the
branches of the military involved in the conflict and assigned to a
duty station outside the territorial boundaries of the United States.
(((7))) (8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW
43.06.010(12), the county treasurer, on his or her own motion or at the
request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may grant extensions
of the due date of any taxes payable under this section as the
treasurer deems proper.
(((8))) (9) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both
interest and penalties.
(((9))) (10) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes must
be credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of
foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of
distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, must,
when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of
the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale;
and must be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray
the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent
taxes without regard to budget limitations.
(((10))) (11)(a) For purposes of this chapter, and in accordance
with this section and RCW 36.29.190, the treasurer may collect taxes,
assessments, fees, rates, and charges by electronic bill presentment
and payment. Electronic bill presentment and payment may be utilized
as an option by the taxpayer, but the treasurer may not require the use
of electronic bill presentment and payment. Electronic bill
presentment and payment may be on a monthly or other periodic basis as
the treasurer deems proper for prepayments. All prepayments must be
paid in full by the due date specified in (c) of this subsection.
(b) The treasurer must provide, by electronic means, a payment
agreement that may include prepayment collection charges. The payment
agreement must be signed by the taxpayer and treasurer prior to the
sending of an electronic bill.
(c) All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the
provisions of this title are due and payable to the treasurer on or
before the thirtieth day of April and are delinquent after that date.
The remainder of the tax is due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following and is delinquent after that date. All
other assessments, fees, rates, and charges are delinquent after the
due date.
(d) The treasurer must pay any collection costs, investment
earnings, or both on prepayments to the credit of a county treasurer
service fund account to be created and used only for the payment of
expenses incurred by the treasurer, without limitation, in
administering the system for collecting prepayments.
(e) The treasurer may provide for electronic payment of delinquent
property taxes, interest, and penalties, pursuant to subsection (5) of
this section.
(((11))) (12) For purposes of this section, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Electronic bill presentment and payment" means statements,
invoices, or bills that are created, delivered, and paid using the
internet. The term includes an automatic electronic payment from a
person's checking account, debit account, or credit card.
(b) "Internet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.270.010.

--- END ---