BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State employees shall be truthful and forthright when providing
information or answering questions related to the scope of their
employment, the performance of their duties, and the operations of the
agency at which the state employee is employed.
(2) State employees shall be truthful when providing information of
any kind.
(3) A violation of this section is subject to disciplinary action
under RCW 42.52.520.

--- END ---