BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics,
upon all public works and under all public building service maintenance
contracts of the state or any county, municipality or political
subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the prevailing
rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the
locality within the state where such labor is performed. For a
contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to
pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily
visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road
construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley
improvement projects for which no field office is needed or
established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage
statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete,
or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the
wage statement to any employee on request:
(1) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(2) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician
of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry
concerning prevailing wages may be made.
This chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly
employed by the state, or any county, municipality, or political
subdivision created by its laws. This chapter does not apply to public
works and public building service maintenance contracts of a rural
school district. For the purposes of this chapter, rural school
districts are those districts that are located in a county with a
population less than fifty thousand and that have a total enrollment of
less than four hundred students, excluding students receiving
instruction through alternative learning experience online programs as
defined in RCW 28A.150.262, as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the academic year immediately
preceding the date the school district opens the public bidding process
for the public works project or public building service maintenance
contract.

--- END ---