BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.325 and 2009 c 571 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department shall not pay a home
care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW for in-home personal care
or respite services provided under this chapter, Title 71A RCW, or
chapter 74.39 RCW if the home care agency does not verify agency
employee hours by electronic timekeeping.
(2) For purposes of this section, "electronic timekeeping" means an
electronic, verifiable method of recording an employee's presence in
the client's home at the beginning and end of the employee's client
visit workday.
(3) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption
criteria in rule to address subsections (1) and (2) of this section
when a landline phone is not available to the employee.

--- END ---