BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.23.535 and 1995 c 301 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
No taxes shall be imposed for maintenance and operating charges of
city owned water, light, power, or heating works or systems.
Rates shall be fixed by ordinance for supplying water, light,
power, or heat for commercial, domestic, or irrigation purposes
sufficient to pay for all operating and maintenance charges. No rates,
charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be charged for any vacant
lot in a manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030,
while the lot is vacant unless the lot is receiving individually water,
light, power, or heat services or the landlord voluntarily elects to
continue the rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs during the
period the lot is vacant. If the rates in force produce a greater
amount than is necessary to meet operating and maintenance charges, the
rates may be reduced or the excess income may be transferred to the
city's current expense fund.
Complete separate accounts for municipal utilities must be kept
under the system and on forms prescribed by the state auditor.
The term "maintenance and operating charges," as used in this
section includes all necessary repairs, replacement, interest on any
debts incurred in acquiring, constructing, repairing and operating
plants and departments and all depreciation charges. This term shall
also include an annual charge equal to four percent on the cost of the
plant or system, as determined by the state auditor to be paid into the
current expense fund, except that where utility bonds have been or may
hereafter be issued and are unpaid no payment shall be required into
the current expense fund until such bonds are paid.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.58.220 and 1999 c 153 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to
perform the function of metropolitan water supply, it shall have the
following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this
chapter:
(((1))) (a) To prepare a comprehensive plan for the development of
sources of water supply, trunk supply mains and water treatment and
storage facilities for the metropolitan area.
(((2))) (b) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant and
to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain,
operate and regulate the use of metropolitan facilities for water
supply within or without the metropolitan area, including buildings,
structures, water sheds, wells, springs, dams, settling basins,
intakes, treatment plants, trunk supply mains and pumping stations,
together with all lands, property, equipment and accessories necessary
to enable the metropolitan municipal corporation to obtain and develop
sources of water supply, treat and store water and deliver water
through trunk supply mains. Water supply facilities which are owned by
a city or special district may be acquired or used by the metropolitan
municipal corporation only with the consent of the legislative body of
the city or special district owning such facilities. Cities and
special districts are hereby authorized to convey or lease such
facilities to metropolitan municipal corporations or to contract for
their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the
legislative body of such city or special district and the metropolitan
council, without submitting the matter to the voters of such city or
special district.
(((3))) (c) To fix rates and charges for water supplied by the
metropolitan municipal corporation.
(((4))) (d) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant and
to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain,
operate and regulate the use of facilities for the local distribution
of water in portions of the metropolitan area not contained within any
city, or water-sewer district that operates a water system, and, with
the consent of the legislative body of any city or the water-sewer
district, to exercise such powers within such city or water-sewer
district and for such purpose to have all the powers conferred by law
upon such city or water-sewer district with respect to such local
distribution facilities. All costs of such local distribution
facilities shall be paid for by the area served thereby.
(2) No rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be
charged for any vacant lot in a manufactured housing community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, while the lot is vacant unless the lot is
receiving individually water services or the landlord voluntarily
elects to continue the rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs
during the period the lot is vacant.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.67.020 and 2003 c 394 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every city and town may construct, condemn and purchase,
acquire, add to, maintain, conduct, and operate systems of sewerage and
systems and plants for refuse collection and disposal together with
additions, extensions, and betterments thereto, within and without its
limits. Every city and town has full jurisdiction and authority to
manage, regulate, and control them and, except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, to fix, alter, regulate, and control
the rates and charges for their use.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the rates charged
under this section must be uniform for the same class of customers or
service and facilities furnished. In classifying customers served or
service and facilities furnished by such system of sewerage, the city
or town legislative body may in its discretion consider any or all of
the following factors:
(a) The difference in cost of service and facilities to the various
customers;
(b) The location of the various customers within and without the
city or town;
(c) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the various parts of the system;
(d) The different character of the service and facilities furnished
various customers;
(e) The quantity and quality of the sewage delivered and the time
of its delivery;
(f) The achievement of water conservation goals and the
discouragement of wasteful water use practices;
(g) Capital contributions made to the system, including but not
limited to, assessments;
(h) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(i) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(3)(a) The rate a city or town may charge under this section for
storm or surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate
allocable to the storm or surface water sewer system of combined
sanitary sewage and storm or surface water sewer systems shall be
reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial
building that utilizes a permissive rainwater harvesting system.
Rainwater harvesting systems shall be properly sized to utilize the
available roof surface of the building. The jurisdiction shall
consider rate reductions in excess of ten percent dependent upon the
amount of rainwater harvested.
(b) No rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be
charged for any vacant lot in a manufactured housing community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, while the lot is vacant unless the lot is
receiving individually storm or surface water sewer system or sanitary
sewage system services or the landlord voluntarily elects to continue
the rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs during the period
the lot is vacant.
(4) Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
(5) A city or town may provide assistance to aid low-income persons
in connection with services provided under this chapter.
(6) Under this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for
pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based,
among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of sludge and
scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained owner.
Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer.
(7) Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
(8) A city or town shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using city or town employees unless the on-site
system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the city
or town's sewerage system, and the on-site system represents the first
step in the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section shall
affect the authority of state or local health officers to carry out
their responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.92.010 and 2002 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A city or town may construct, condemn and purchase, purchase,
acquire, add to, alter, maintain and operate waterworks, including fire
hydrants as an integral utility service incorporated within general
rates, within or without its limits, for the purpose of furnishing the
city and its inhabitants, and any other persons, with an ample supply
of water for all purposes, public and private, including water power
and other power derived therefrom, with full power to regulate and
control the use, distribution, and price thereof: PROVIDED, That the
rates charged must be uniform for the same class of customers or
service. Such waterworks may include facilities for the generation of
electricity as a by-product and such electricity may be used by the
city or town or sold to an entity authorized by law to distribute
electricity. Such electricity is a by-product when the electrical
generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of water supply.
In classifying customers served or service furnished, the city or
town governing body may in its discretion consider any or all of the
following factors: The difference in cost of service to the various
customers; location of the various customers within and without the
city or town; the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair,
and replacement of the various parts of the system; the different
character of the service furnished various customers; the quantity and
quality of the water furnished; the time of its use; the achievement of
water conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful water use
practices; capital contributions made to the system including, but not
limited to, assessments; and any other matters which present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. No rate shall be
charged that is less than the cost of the water and service to the
class of customers served. No rates, charges, noncapital fees, or
other costs may be charged for any vacant lot in a manufactured housing
community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, while the lot is vacant unless
the lot is receiving individually water services or the landlord
voluntarily elects to continue the rates, charges, noncapital fees, or
other costs during the period the lot is vacant.
For such purposes any city or town may take, condemn and purchase,
purchase, acquire, and retain water from any public or navigable lake
or watercourse, surface or ground, and, by means of aqueducts or pipe
lines, conduct it to the city or town; and it may erect and build dams
or other works across or at the outlet of any lake or watercourse in
this state for the purpose of storing and retaining water therein up to
and above high water mark; and for all the purposes of erecting such
aqueducts, pipe lines, dams, or waterworks or other necessary
structures in storing and retaining water, or for any of the purposes
provided for by this chapter, the city or town may occupy and use the
beds and shores up to the high water mark of any such watercourse or
lake, and acquire the right by purchase, or by condemnation and
purchase, or otherwise, to any water, water rights, easements or
privileges named in this chapter, or necessary for any of said
purposes, and the city or town may acquire by purchase or condemnation
and purchase any properties or privileges necessary to be had to
protect its water supply from pollution. Should private property be
necessary for any such purposes or for storing water above high water
mark, the city or town may condemn and purchase, or purchase and
acquire such private property. For the purposes of waterworks which
include facilities for the generation of electricity as a by-product,
nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a city or town
that does not own or operate an electric utility system to condemn
electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire
such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.92.020 and 2003 c 394 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may construct, condemn and purchase, purchase,
acquire, add to, alter, maintain, and operate systems, plants, sites,
or other facilities of sewerage as defined in RCW 35.67.010, or solid
waste handling as defined by RCW 70.95.030. A city or town shall have
full authority to manage, regulate, operate, control, and, except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, to fix the price of service
and facilities of those systems, plants, sites, or other facilities
within and without the limits of the city or town.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the rates charged
shall be uniform for the same class of customers or service and
facilities. In classifying customers served or service and facilities
furnished by a system or systems of sewerage, the legislative authority
of the city or town may in its discretion consider any or all of the
following factors:
(a) The difference in cost of service and facilities to customers;
(b) The location of customers within and without the city or town;
(c) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the parts of the system;
(d) The different character of the service and facilities furnished
to customers;
(e) The quantity and quality of the sewage delivered and the time
of its delivery;
(f) Capital contributions made to the systems, plants, sites, or
other facilities, including but not limited to, assessments;
(g) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(h) Any other factors that present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(3)(a) The rate a city or town may charge under this section for
storm or surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate
allocable to the storm or surface water sewer system of combined
sanitary sewage and storm or surface water sewer systems shall be
reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial
building that utilizes a permissive rainwater harvesting system.
Rainwater harvesting systems shall be properly sized to utilize the
available roof surface of the building. The jurisdiction shall
consider rate reductions in excess of ten percent dependent upon the
amount of rainwater harvested.
(b) No rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be
charged for any vacant lot in a manufactured housing community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, while the lot is vacant unless the lot is
receiving individually storm or surface water sewer system or sanitary
sewage system services or the landlord voluntarily elects to continue
the rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs during the period
the lot is vacant.
(4) Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
(5) A city or town may provide assistance to aid low-income persons
in connection with services provided under this chapter.
(6) Under this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for
pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based,
among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of sludge and
scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained owner.
Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer.
(7) Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
(8) A city or town shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using city or town employees unless the on-site
system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the city
or town's sewerage system, and the on-site system represents the first
step in the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section shall
affect the authority of state or local health officers to carry out
their responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.89.080 and 2003 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any county
legislative authority may provide by resolution for revenues by fixing
rates and charges for the furnishing of service to those served or
receiving benefits or to be served or to receive benefits from any
storm water control facility or contributing to an increase of surface
water runoff. In fixing rates and charges, the county legislative
authority may in its discretion consider:
(a) Services furnished or to be furnished;
(b) Benefits received or to be received;
(c) The character and use of land or its water runoff
characteristics;
(d) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user;
(e) Income level of persons served or provided benefits under this
chapter, including senior citizens and ((disabled)) persons with
disabilities; or
(f) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(2) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm water
control facilities shall be reduced by a minimum of ten percent for any
new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes a permissive
rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems shall be
properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the building.
The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of ten
percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(3) Rates and charges authorized under this section may not be
imposed on lands taxed as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW or as
timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW.
(4) No rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be
charged for any vacant lot in a manufactured housing community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, while the lot is vacant unless the lot is
receiving individually storm water control facility services or the
landlord voluntarily elects to continue the rates, charges, noncapital
fees, or other costs during the period the lot is vacant.
(5) The service charges and rates collected shall be deposited in
a special fund or funds in the county treasury to be used only for the
purpose of paying all or any part of the cost and expense of
maintaining and operating storm water control facilities, all or any
part of the cost and expense of planning, designing, establishing,
acquiring, developing, constructing and improving any of such
facilities, or to pay or secure the payment of all or any portion of
any issue of general obligation or revenue bonds issued for such
purpose.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.94.140 and 2005 c 324 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every county, in the operation of a system of sewerage and/or
water, shall have full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate,
and control it. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
every county shall have full jurisdiction and authority to fix, alter,
regulate, and control the rates and charges for the service and
facilities to those to whom such service and facilities are available,
and to levy charges for connection to the system.
(2) The rates for availability of service and facilities, and
connection charges so charged must be uniform for the same class of
customers or service and facility. In classifying customers served,
service furnished or made available by such system of sewerage and/or
water, or the connection charges, the county legislative authority may
consider any or all of the following factors:
(a) The difference in cost of service to the various customers
within or without the area;
(b) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair and
replacement of the various parts of the systems;
(c) The different character of the service and facilities furnished
various customers;
(d) The quantity and quality of the sewage and/or water delivered
and the time of its delivery;
(e) Capital contributions made to the system or systems, including,
but not limited to, assessments;
(f) The cost of acquiring the system or portions of the system in
making system improvements necessary for the public health and safety;
(g) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(h) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(3)(a) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(b) No rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be
charged for any vacant lot in a manufactured housing community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, while the lot is vacant unless the lot is
receiving individually storm or surface water sewer system or sanitary
sewage system services or the landlord voluntarily elects to continue
the rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs during the period
the lot is vacant.
(4) A county may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in
connection with services provided under this chapter.
(5) The service charges and rates shall produce revenues sufficient
to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond
and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all
other charges necessary for the efficient and proper operation of the
system.
(6) A connection charge under this section for service to a
manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, applies to
an individual lot within that community only if the system of water or
sewerage provides and maintains the connection.

Sec. 8 RCW 54.24.080 and 1995 c 140 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission of each district which shall have revenue
obligations outstanding shall have the power and shall be required to
establish, maintain, and collect rates or charges for electric energy
and water and other services, facilities, and commodities sold,
furnished, or supplied by the district. The rates and charges shall be
fair and, except as authorized by RCW 74.38.070 and by subsections (2)
and (3) of this section, nondiscriminatory, and shall be adequate to
provide revenues sufficient for the payment of the principal of and
interest on such revenue obligations for which the payment has not
otherwise been provided and all payments which the district is
obligated to set aside in any special fund or funds created for such
purpose, and for the proper operation and maintenance of the public
utility and all necessary repairs, replacements, and renewals thereof.
(2) The commission of a district may waive connection charges for
properties purchased by low-income persons from organizations exempt
from tax under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code
as amended prior to the July 23, 1995. Waivers of connection charges
for the same class of electric or gas utility service must be uniformly
applied to all qualified property. Nothing in this subsection (2)
authorizes the impairment of a contract.
(3) In establishing rates or charges for water service,
commissioners may in their discretion consider the achievement of water
conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful water use
practices.
(4) No rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be
charged for any vacant lot in a manufactured housing community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, while the lot is vacant unless the lot is
receiving individually electric energy or water services or the
landlord voluntarily elects to continue the rates, charges, noncapital
fees, or other costs during the period the lot is vacant.

Sec. 9 RCW 57.08.081 and 2003 c 394 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 57.08.005(((6)))(7), the commissioners of any
district shall provide for revenues by fixing rates and charges for
furnishing sewer and drainage service and facilities to those to whom
service is available or for providing water, such rates and charges to
be fixed as deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform
charges will be made for the same class of customer or service and
facility. Rates and charges may be combined for the furnishing of more
than one type of sewer or drainage service and facilities.
(2) In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage
system, the board of commissioners may in its discretion consider any
or all of the following factors: The difference in cost to various
customers; the location of the various customers within and without the
district; the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the various parts of the system; the different character
of the service furnished various customers; the quantity and quality of
the service and facility furnished; the time of its use; the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including
but not limited to assessments; and any other matters which present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be
established as deemed proper by the commissioners and as fixed by
resolution and shall produce revenues sufficient to take care of the
costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond and warrant interest
and principal amortization requirements, and all other charges
necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system. No rates,
charges, noncapital fees, or other costs may be charged for any vacant
lot in a manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030,
while the lot is vacant unless the lot is receiving individually water,
sewer, or drainage system services or the landlord voluntarily elects
to continue the rates, charges, noncapital fees, or other costs during
the period the lot is vacant. Prior to furnishing services, a district
may require a deposit to guarantee payment for services. However,
failure to require a deposit does not affect the validity of any lien
authorized by this section.
(3) The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection
charges, and rates and charges for water supplied against property
owners connecting with the system or receiving such water, and for
sewer and drainage services charged against property to which and its
owners to whom the service is available, such charges being deemed
charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of not
more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution
that where either connection charges or rates and charges for services
supplied are delinquent for any specified period of time, the district
shall certify the delinquencies to the auditor of the county in which
the real property is located, and the charges and any penalties added
thereto and interest thereon at the rate of not more than the prime
lending rate of the district's bank plus four percentage points per
year shall be a lien against the property upon which the service was
received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.
(4) The district may, at any time after the connection charges or
rates and charges for services supplied or available and penalties are
delinquent for a period of sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by
civil action in the superior court of the county in which the real
property is located. The court may allow, in addition to the costs and
disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees, title search and
report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The action shall
be in rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against an
individual or against all of those who are delinquent in one action.
The laws and rules of the court shall control as in other civil
actions.
(5) In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section,
the district may also cut off all or part of the service after charges
for water or sewer service supplied or available are delinquent for a
period of thirty days.
(6) A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past
due accounts.
(7) A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an
owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's service account is
delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies the
district in writing that a property served by the district is a rental
property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has
provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the
district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's
delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a
district provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with
duplicates of tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's
utility account is delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant
that it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the
owner or the owner's designee. After January 1, 1999, if a district
fails to notify the owner of a tenant's delinquency after receiving a
written request to do so and after receiving the other information
required by this subsection (7), the district shall have no lien
against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

--- END ---