BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.17.040 and 2011 c 171 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
((A)) (1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section,
the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by
the director shall collect a service fee of:
(((1))) (a) Twelve dollars for changes in a certificate of title,
with or without registration renewal, or for verification of record and
preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the
certificate of title application or transfer; and
(((2))) (b) Five dollars for a registration renewal, issuing a
transit permit, or any other service under this section.
(2) A county may by majority vote of its governing board disapprove
collection of the service fee by its county auditor or other agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The service fee collected under RCW 46.17.040 must be distributed
as follows:
(1) If paid to the department, the fee must be deposited into the
department of licensing services account under RCW 46.68.220.
(2) If paid to the county auditor or other agent, the fee must be
deposited into that county's general fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.17.050 and 2010 c 161 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting a report of sale filed under RCW 46.12.650(2), the
county auditor or other agent or subagent appointed by the director
shall require the applicant to pay:
(1) The filing fee under RCW 46.17.005(1), the license plate
technology fee under RCW 46.17.015, and the license service fee under
RCW 46.17.025 to the county auditor or other agent; ((and))
(2) The ((subagent)) service fee under RCW 46.17.040(((2))) (1)(b)
to the subagent; and
(3) An additional fee of one dollar and twenty-five cents to the
county auditor or other agent. A county may by majority vote of its
governing board disapprove collection of the fee under this subsection
(3) by its county auditor or other agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The fee established in RCW 46.17.050(3) must be distributed to the
county treasurer and credited to the county current expense fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.17.060 and 2010 c 161 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting a transitional ownership record filed under RCW
46.12.660, the county auditor or other agent or subagent appointed by
the director shall require the applicant to pay:
(1) The filing fee under RCW 46.17.005(1), the license plate
technology fee under RCW 46.17.015, and the license service fee under
RCW 46.17.025 to the county auditor or other agent; and
(2) The ((subagent)) service fee under RCW 46.17.040(((2))) (1)(b)
to the subagent.

--- END ---