BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.363 and 2010 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360 may apply for an
endorsement to offer beer and wine tasting under this section.
(2) To be issued an endorsement, a licensee must meet the following
criteria:
(a) ((The licensee has retail sales of grocery products for off-premises consumption that are more than fifty percent of the licensee's
gross sales or the licensee is a membership organization that requires
members to be at least eighteen years of age;
(b))) The licensee operates a fully enclosed retail area
encompassing at least ((nine)) ten thousand square feet of fully
enclosed retail space within a single structure, including storerooms
and other interior auxiliary areas but excluding covered or fenced
exterior areas, whether or not attached to the structure, except that
the board may issue an endorsement to a licensee with a retail area
encompassing less than ((nine)) ten thousand square feet if the board
determines that no licensee in the community the licensee serves meets
the square footage requirement and the licensee meets operational
requirements established by the board by rule; and
(((c))) (b) The licensee has not had more than one public safety
violation within the past two years.
(3) A tasting must be conducted under the following conditions:
(a) Each sample must be two ounces or less, up to a total of four
ounces, per customer during any one visit to the premises;
(b) No more than one sample of the same product offering of beer or
wine may be provided to a customer during any one visit to the
premises;
(c) The licensee must have food available for the tasting
participants;
(d) Customers must remain in the service area while consuming
samples; and
(e) The service area and facilities must be located within the
licensee's fully enclosed retail area and must be of a size and design
such that the licensee can observe and control persons in the area to
ensure that persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently
intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.
(4) Employees of licensees whose duties include serving during
tasting activities under this section must hold a class 12 alcohol
server permit.
(5) Tasting activities under this section are subject to RCW
66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling may not be borne,
directly or indirectly, by any liquor manufacturer, importer, or
distributor.
(6) A licensee may advertise a tasting event only within the store,
on a store web site, in store newsletters and flyers, and via e-mail
and mail to customers who have requested notice of events. Advertising
under this subsection may not be targeted to or appeal principally to
youth.
(7)(a) If a licensee is found to have committed a public safety
violation in conjunction with tasting activities, the board may suspend
the licensee's tasting endorsement and not reissue the endorsement for
up to two years from the date of the violation. If mitigating
circumstances exist, the board may offer a monetary penalty in lieu of
suspension during a settlement conference.
(b) The board may revoke an endorsement granted to a licensee that
is located within the boundaries of an alcohol impact area recognized
by resolution of the board if the board finds that the tasting
activities by the licensee are having an adverse effect on the
reduction of chronic public inebriation in the area.
(c) RCW 66.08.150 applies to the suspension or revocation of an
endorsement.
(8) The board may establish additional requirements under this
section to assure that persons under twenty-one years of age and
apparently intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.
(9) The annual fee for the endorsement is two hundred dollars. The
board shall review the fee annually and may increase the fee by rule to
a level sufficient to defray the cost of administration and enforcement
of the endorsement, except that the board may not increase the fee by
more than ten percent annually.
(10) The board must adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---