BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) By 2030 nearly twenty percent or one out of every five people
in our state will be age sixty-five or older and by 2060 the population
of people who are age eighty-five or older in our state will more than
triple. This will affect every area of state government;
(2) There is a need for increased focus and a planning to support
the growing number of seniors and people with disabilities with
Washington state. Planning is necessary across a broad range of policy
areas including health, long-term services and supports, housing,
transportation, financial security, and protections for vulnerable
adults;
(3) To address the growing demand for long-term services and
supports, Washington state must do more to leverage private resources,
support families so they can take care of their loved ones without
having to resort to medicaid and help people plan for potential future
costs;
(4) In the past few decades, a number of initiatives have been
undertaken to reform Washington's system of supports for seniors to
emphasize home and community based options. These efforts have saved
millions of dollars by preventing expensive institutional placements;
(5) Washington must begin planning for the future long-term
services and supports needs of its residents by taking steps to grow
its workforce, resources, and quality long-term services and supports,
and identify alternative long-term care financing options to help
families and reduce the rate of growth in medicaid;
(6) It is necessary to explore public and private sector approaches
to support payment for long-term services and supports to support full
integration of people with disabilities and assist elders to age in
place; and
(7) The family caregiver support program and the four existing
aging and disability resource centers have proven potential in delaying
medicaid utilization and helping families manage and plan for the cost
of long-term services and support.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.41.050 and 2008 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall contract with area agencies on aging or
other appropriate agencies to conduct family caregiver long-term care
information and support services to the extent of available funding.
The responsibilities of the agencies shall include but not be limited
to: (((1))) (a) Administering a program of family caregiver long-term
care information and support services; (((2))) (b) negotiating rates of
payment, administering sliding-fee scales to enable eligible
participants to participate in paying for respite care, and arranging
for respite care information, training, and other support services;
((and (3))) (c) developing an evidence-based tailored caregiver
assessment and referral tool; and (d) conducting outreach activities in
order to reach people in the community who would benefit from family
caregiver long-term care information and support services. In
evaluating the need for respite services, consideration shall be given
to the mental and physical ability of the caregiver to perform
necessary caregiver functions.
(2) By July 1, 2014, the aging and disability services
administration of the department of social and health services must
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on a phased
expansion plan to meet the demands of an aging society and extend
caregiver support to a greater percentage of caregivers in need. The
report should include evaluation of the program's potential to: (a)
Delay or divert medicaid utilization rates; and (b) improve the health
and well-being of family caregivers including, but not limited to,
reducing rates of depression and other health or mental health issues.
In developing the plan, the aging and disability services
administration must consult with stakeholders, including individuals
with developmental disabilities, physical disabilities, behavioral
health needs, and long-term care needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By July 1, 2014, the aging and disability
services administration of the department of social and health
services, in consultation with stakeholders, including individuals with
developmental disabilities, physical disabilities, behavioral health
needs, and long-term care needs, must report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on:
(1) The existing funding of the following aging and disability
resource centers: (a) The northwest regional council in Skagit and
Whatcom counties; (b) Pierce county community connections; (c)
southeast Washington aging and disability resource centers in Asotin,
Benton, Columbia, Franklin, Garfield, Kittitas, Yakima, and Walla Walla
counties; and (d) aging and long-term care of eastern Washington in
Ferry, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties;
(2) The level of funding necessary to achieve the full complement
of aging and disability resource center functions statewide by December
1, 2017. The full complement of services includes five core functions:
(a) Information and assistance; (b) options counseling; (c) streamlines
access; (d) person-centered care transitions; (e) quality assurance and
evaluation; and (f) care coordination. This proposal must include ways
to maximize opportunities to leverage federal dollars and requirements
to establish local partnerships to draw in additional funding;
(3) Preliminary results of evaluations underway on the aging and
disability resource centers as of the effective date of this section
and a proposal for ongoing evaluations and assessments; and
(4) The roles and responsibilities of the aging and disability
resource centers, how they serve different populations including
individuals with developmental disabilities, individuals with physical
disabilities, and individuals with behavioral health needs, and how
they interact with existing information and assistance programs such as
211, parent to parent, centers for independent living, and regional
support networks.
This section expires December 15, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The office of financial management must
evaluate the following options to support families as they prepare for
the cost of long-term services and supports needs:
(a) Tax incentives or other measures to encourage individuals to
purchase private long-term care insurance and to encourage employers to
offer private long-term care insurance to their employees;
(b) Options to incentivize state workers to participate in employer
offered private long-term care insurance;
(c) Options to increase take-up rate of long-term care partnership
policies, including a public option;
(d) Regulatory changes necessary to encourage the use of life
insurance to finance long-term services and supports;
(e) A public insurance option financed through voluntary
contributions; and
(f) A public insurance option financed through mandatory
contributions.
(2) Each of the options listed in subsection (1) of this section
should be evaluated based on how it meets the following goals:
(a) Delay or divert medicaid long-term care utilization and provide
relief for family caregivers;
(b) Support individuals with functional or cognitive limitations or
both so that they are able to remain in the community by purchasing
nonmedical services and supports such as home care and adult day health
services and avoid institutional care;
(c) Expand long-term coverage and supports for the greatest number
of people;
(d) Address direct care workforce recruitment and retention issues
to ensure access to long-term services and supports;
(e) Be affordable for families and include comprehensive benefits;
(f) Reduce inequality and promote economic security for middle
class families; and
(g) Include a minimal impact on the state general fund and bring
additional funds into the long-term care system.
(3) The office of financial management must select one or more of
the options in subsection (1) of this section and provide a proposal
and implementation plan for the preferred option to start in 2015.
(4) The office of financial management must consult with the joint
legislative executive committee on aging and disability issues created
in section 5 of this act on the study design as well as on the draft
and final report.
(5) The office of financial management must also consult with
stakeholders, including advocates for people with disabilities or area
aging, labor representatives, area agencies on aging, long-term
services and supports providers, and the office of the insurance
commissioner on the study design as well as on the draft and final
report.
(6) The office of financial management must provide a draft report
to the joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability
issues for review and feedback by October 15, 2014. The office of
financial management must deliver a final report to the legislature by
December 10, 2014, that includes an implementation plan to the ways and
means committees of the senate and the house of representatives.
(7) This section expires December 15, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A joint legislative executive committee
on aging and disability issues is established, with members as provided
in this subsection.
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint the chair of the
senate committee with jurisdiction over long-term care policy as well
as one additional member from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate;
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the
chair of the house committee with jurisdiction over long-term care
policy as well as one additional member from each of the two largest
caucuses of the house of representatives;
(c) The governor shall appoint one member to service as a liaison
to the committee;
(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or his or her designee; and
(e) The director of the health care authority or his or her
designee.
(2) The joint committee must be convened by September 1, 2013. At
the first meeting, the members of the joint committee shall select
cochairs from among the committee members. The joint committee shall
establish advisory committees, consisting of at least three
stakeholders and chaired by a member of the joint committee, to focus
on specific topic areas. All meetings of the joint committee and the
advisory committees are open to the public.
(3) The joint committee shall consult with the office of the
insurance commissioner, the caseload forecast council, and other
appropriate entities with specialized knowledge of the growing needs of
the aging population and population with disabilities.
(4) The joint committee shall conduct the following activities:
(a)(i) Establish a profile of Washington's current elderly
population and population with disabilities and their needs;
(ii) Establish an inventory of the services and supports currently
available to the elderly population and population with disabilities,
including health care providers and facilities, long-term care
providers and facilities, caregiver supports, public and private
financing, transportation services, and housing;
(iii) Assess the areas of the current system where the additional
support is needed for Washington's current elderly population;
(b)(i) Establish a profile of Washington's expected elderly
population and population with disabilities in 2025 and evaluate their
anticipated needs;
(ii) Establish an anticipated inventory of future services and
supports that will be required to meet the needs of the elderly
population and population with disabilities in 2025;
(c) Develop a strategy of actions that the state may take to
prepare for the future demographic trends in the elderly population and
population with disabilities and build the necessary capacity to meet
these demands, including the identification of:
(i) Statutory and regulatory changes to promote the most efficient
use of resources, such as simplifying administrative procedures,
facilitating points of entry into the long-term care services and
supports system, and improving transitions between care settings;
(ii) Practices for promoting the use of technology, chronic care
management, and disability prevention programs to maintain the
independence of the elderly population and population with
disabilities;
(iii) Caregiver supports;
(iv) Specialized resources for populations with special needs, such
as chronic conditions and dementia; and
(v) Housing and transportation programs to help individuals who are
elderly or individuals with disabilities to maintain their
independence;
(d) Consult with and provide direction to the office of financial
management in completing the study under section 4 of this act.
(5) Staff support for the joint committee must be provided by the
senate committee services and the office of program research. The
office of financial management shall designate staff of the department
of social and health services to provide additional support to the
joint committee.
(6) The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel
expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter
44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive
compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.
(7) The expenses of the joint committee must be paid jointly by the
senate, the house of representatives, and the office of financial
management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to approval by
the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of
representatives executive rules committee, or their successor
committees.
(8) The joint committee shall report its findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 10, 2014.
(9) This section expires December 15, 2014.

--- END ---