BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.20.090 and 2010 c 8 s 19034 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise agreed, rental agreements ((shall)) must be
for a term of one year. Any subsequent rental agreement ((of whatever
duration shall be automatically renewed for the term of the original
rental agreement)) offered for renewal must specify a minimum term of
one year, unless a different specified term is agreed upon.
(2) A landlord seeking to increase the rent upon expiration of the
term of a rental agreement of any duration shall notify the tenant in
writing three months prior to the effective date of any increase in
rent.
(3) A tenant shall notify the landlord in writing one month prior
to the expiration of a rental agreement of an intention not to renew.
(4)(a) The tenant may terminate the rental agreement upon thirty
days written notice whenever a change in the location of the tenant's
employment requires a change in his or her residence, and shall not be
liable for rental following such termination unless after due diligence
and reasonable effort the landlord is not able to rent the mobile home
lot at a fair rental. If the landlord is not able to rent the lot, the
tenant shall remain liable for the rental specified in the rental
agreement until the lot is rented or the original term ends.
(b) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, or that tenant's spouse or
dependent, may terminate a rental agreement with less than thirty days
notice if the tenant receives reassignment or deployment orders which
do not allow greater notice. The tenant shall provide notice of the
reassignment or deployment order to the landlord no later than seven
days after receipt.

--- END ---