BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if the
landlord of a mobile home park takes ownership of a mobile home or park
model trailer with the intent to resell or rent the same after (a) the
mobile home or park model trailer has been abandoned; or (b) a final
judgment for restitution of the premises under RCW 59.18.410 has been
executed in favor of the landlord with regard to the mobile home or
park model trailer and title has been lawfully transferred to the
landlord, the outstanding taxes become the responsibility of the
landlord.
(2) Upon notification by the assessor, the county treasurer must
remove from the tax rolls any outstanding taxes, as well as interest
and penalties, on a mobile home or park model trailer if the landlord
of a mobile home park:
(a) Submits a signed affidavit to the assessor indicating that the
landlord has taken ownership of the mobile home or park model trailer
with the intent to resell or rent after: (i) The mobile home or park
model trailer has been abandoned; or (ii) a final judgment for
restitution of the premises under RCW 59.18.410 has been executed in
favor of the landlord with regard to the mobile home or park model
trailer and title has been lawfully transferred to the landlord; and
(b) The most current assessed value of the mobile home or park
model trailer is less than eight thousand dollars.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "abandoned," "mobile home,"
and "park model" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 59.20.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.44.170 and 2010 c 161 s 1118 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person moving a mobile home as defined in RCW 46.04.302 or
a park model trailer as defined in RCW 46.04.622 upon public highways
of the state must obtain:
(a) A special permit from the department of transportation and
local authorities pursuant to RCW 46.44.090 and 46.44.093 and ((shall))
must pay the proper fee as prescribed by RCW 46.44.0941 and 46.44.096;
and
(b) For mobile homes constructed before June 15, 1976, and already
situated in the state: (i) A certification from the department of
labor and industries that the mobile home was inspected for fire
safety; or (ii) an affidavit in the form prescribed by the department
of commerce signed by the owner at the county treasurer's office at the
time of the application for the movement permit stating that the mobile
home is being moved by the owner for his or her continued occupation or
use; or (iii) a copy of the certificate of title together with an
affidavit signed under penalty of perjury by the certified owner
stating that the mobile home is being transferred to a wrecking yard or
similar facility for disposal. In addition, the destroyed mobile home
must be removed from the assessment rolls of the county and any
outstanding taxes on the destroyed mobile home must be removed by the
county treasurer.
(2) A special permit issued as provided in subsection (1) of this
section for the movement of any mobile home or a park model trailer
that is assessed for purposes of property taxes ((shall)) is not ((be))
valid until the county treasurer of the county in which the mobile home
or park model trailer is located ((shall)) must endorse or attach his
or her certificate that all property taxes which are a lien or which
are delinquent, or both, upon the mobile home or park model trailer
being moved have been satisfied. Further, any mobile home or park
model trailer required to have a special movement permit under this
section shall display an easily recognizable decal. However,
endorsement or certification by the county treasurer and the display of
the decal is not required:
(a) When a mobile home or park model trailer is to enter the state
or is being moved from a manufacturer or distributor to a retail sales
outlet or directly to the purchaser's designated location or between
retail and sales outlets;
(b) When a signed affidavit of destruction is filed with the county
assessor and the mobile home or park model trailer is being moved to a
disposal site by a landlord as defined in RCW 59.20.030 after (i) the
mobile home or park model trailer has been abandoned as defined in RCW
59.20.030; or (ii) a final judgment for restitution of the premises
under RCW 59.18.410 has been executed in favor of the landlord with
regard to the mobile home or park model trailer and title has been
lawfully transferred to the landlord. The mobile home or park model
trailer will be removed from the tax rolls and, upon notification by
the assessor, any outstanding taxes on the destroyed mobile home or
park model trailer will be removed by the county treasurer; or
(c) When a signed affidavit of destruction is filed with the county
assessor by any mobile home or park model trailer owner or any property
owner with an abandoned mobile home or park model trailer, the same
shall be removed from the tax rolls and upon notification by the
assessor, any outstanding taxes on the destroyed mobile home or park
model trailer ((shall)) must be removed by the county treasurer.
(3) Except as provided in section 1(1) of this act, if the landlord
of a mobile home park takes ownership of a mobile home or park model
trailer with the intent to resell or rent the same under RCW 59.20.030
after (a) the mobile home or park model trailer has been abandoned as
defined in RCW 59.20.030; or (b) a final judgment for restitution of
the premises under RCW 59.18.410 has been executed in favor of the
landlord with regard to the mobile home or park model trailer and title
has been lawfully transferred to the landlord, the outstanding taxes
become the responsibility of the landlord.
(4) It is the responsibility of the owner of the mobile home or
park model trailer subject to property taxes or the agent to obtain the
endorsement and decal from the county treasurer before a mobile home or
park model trailer is moved.
(5) This section does not prohibit the issuance of vehicle license
plates for a mobile home or park model trailer subject to property
taxes, but plates ((shall)) may not be issued unless the mobile home or
park model trailer subject to property taxes for which plates are
sought has been listed for property tax purposes in the county in which
it is principally located and the appropriate fee for the license has
been paid.
(6) The department of transportation, the department of labor and
industries, and local authorities are authorized to adopt reasonable
rules for implementing the provisions of this section. The department
of transportation ((shall)) must adopt rules specifying the design,
reflective characteristics, annual coloration, and for the uniform
implementation of the decal required by this section. The department
of labor and industries ((shall)) must adopt procedures for notifying
destination local jurisdictions concerning the arrival of mobile homes
that failed safety inspections.

--- END ---