BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that medical specialty
technicians are health professionals specifically trained to assist
physicians specialized in various areas of medicine in medical offices,
clinics, group practices, and hospitals. These personnel are trained
in various ways to perform patient care functions that are often unique
to the specialty of the supervising physician and often do not fit
within the scope of practice of other certified or registered medical
assistive personnel. Medical specialty technicians play a vital role
in the delivery of safe, efficient, and cost-effective health care in
Washington. Health care in Washington will be improved by recognizing
the valuable contribution of medical specialty technicians and
providing statutory support for medical specialty technicians in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed
health care provider to a medical specialty technician to perform
functions that the medical specialty technician has been trained to
perform and is competent to perform, and that fall within the scope of
practice of the health care provider.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Health care provider" means:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; or
(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter
18.57 RCW.
(4) "Medical specialty technician" means an unlicensed person: Who
has been trained to perform specific patient care functions in a course
of training or by a health care provider in a medical specialty
including, but not limited to, ophthalmology, urology, and
anesthesiology; whose competence to perform those functions has been
endorsed by a health care provider in an attestation to the secretary;
and who is under the supervision of a health care provider.
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(6) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted
pursuant to this chapter by a health care provider who is physically
present and immediately available in the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No person may practice as a medical
specialty technician unless he or she is registered under section 6 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A medical specialty technician may only
perform duties:
(a) Under the supervision of a health care provider;
(b) That are within the competence and training of the medical
specialty technician; and
(c) That are within the supervising health care provider's scope of
practice.
(2) Prior to delegation of any functions to a medical specialty
technician, the health care provider must determine to the best of his
or her ability each of the following:
(a) That the task is within that health care provider's authority;
(b) That the task is indicated for the patient;
(c) The appropriate level of supervision;
(d) That no law prohibits the delegation;
(e) That the medical specialty technician to whom the task will be
delegated is competent to perform that task; and
(f) That the task itself is one that is appropriately delegated
when considering the following factors:
(i) The task can be performed without requiring the exercise of
judgment based on medical knowledge;
(ii) Results of the task are reasonably predictable;
(iii) The task can be performed without a need for complex
observations or critical decisions;
(iv) The task can be performed without repeated medical
assessments; and
(v) The task, if performed improperly, would not present life-threatening consequences or the danger of immediate and serious harm to
the patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The health care provider must endorse a
medical specialty technician working under his or her supervision by
filing an attestation which:
(1) Lists the specific tasks that the medical specialty technician
may perform under the supervision of the health care provider; and
(2) Endorses that the medical specialty technician has sufficient
competence and training to safely and effectively perform those
specific tasks under the supervision of the health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The secretary must issue a registration
as a medical specialty technician to any person who has a current
endorsement from a health care provider.
(2) In order to be registered under this section, a person must:
(a) Be endorsed by a health care provider under section 5 of this
act; and
(b) Have a current attestation of his or her endorsement to perform
specific medical tasks signed by the supervising health care provider
filed with the department.
(3) A registration based on an endorsement by a health care
provider is not transferrable to another health care provider, clinic,
or group practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(c) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health
professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;
(d) Issue a registration to any applicant who has met the
requirements for registration and deny a registration to applicants who
do not meet the minimum qualifications for registration. However,
denial of a registration based on unprofessional conduct or impaired
practice is governed by chapter 18.130 RCW;
(e) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement and administer this chapter;
(f) Maintain the official department of health record of all
applicants and registrants; and
(g) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive
registration.
(2) Chapter 18.130 RCW governs unregistered practice, the issuance
and denial of a registration, and the discipline of persons registered
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this chapter affects health care
assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW, except that persons
currently certified as health care assistants are eligible to become
medical specialty technicians if they meet the requirements set forth
in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---