BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
goals of the child welfare system are to protect the safety,
permanence, and well-being of the children it serves. The legislature
further recognizes the importance of maintaining publicly accessible
data that tracks the performance of the child welfare system, leading
to transparency and public understanding of the system.
(2) The legislature believes it is important to measure safety,
permanence, and well-being such that the public and the legislature
understand how the child welfare system is performing. This
information will also serve the legislature in determining priorities
for investment of public dollars as well as need for substantive
legislative changes to facilitate improvement.
The agencies will not disclose individually identifiable private
information except as allowable under federal and state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A university-based child welfare research entity and the
department, in collaboration with other stakeholders, shall develop
measurements in the areas of safety, permanence, and well-being using
existing and available data. Measurements must be calculated from data
used in the routine work of the state agencies' data and information
technology departments. Any new record linkage or data-matching
activities required in fulfillment of this section may be performed by
the research entity pursuant to agreements developed under subsection
(6) of this section. The state agencies include any agency or
subagency providing data used in the integrated client database
maintained by the research and data analysis division of the
department. Data must be shared subject to applicable federal and
state law.
(2) All measurements must use a methodology accepted by the
scientific community. Wherever possible, all measurements must address
any disproportionate racial and ethnic inequality.
(3) The initial measurements must be developed by October 31, 2013.
(4) The measurements may not require the state agencies to revise
their data collection systems, nor to provide individually identifiable
information.
(5) The state agencies shall provide the research entity with all
measurement data related to the measures developed under this section
at least quarterly, consistent with subsection (3) of this section,
beginning January 1, 2014. The research entity shall make data
publicly available. The research entity shall report on the data to
the legislature and the governor annually starting December 31, 2014.
(6) By July 1, 2014, the state agencies shall execute agreements
with the research entity to enable sharing of data sufficient to comply
with this section.
(7) The fact that the research entity has chosen to:
(a) Use a specific measure;
(b) Use a specific baseline; or
(c) Compare any measure to a baseline
is not admissible as evidence of negligence by the department in a
civil action.

--- END ---