BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to appropriation, the commission shall provide crisis
intervention training to every new full-time law enforcement officer
employed after July 1, 2015, by a state, county, or municipal law
enforcement agency. The training shall consist of not less than eight
hours and shall be incorporated into the basic training academy as
provided in RCW 43.101.200.
(2) Subject to appropriation, the commission must ensure that:
(a) Each full-time law enforcement officer certified before July 1,
2015, and employed by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement
agency is provided with the opportunity for crisis intervention
training by July 1, 2017. The training shall consist of not less than
eight hours and shall be substantially similar in hours and content to
the training offered through the basic training academy. Each attendee
of the program shall be required to obtain written proof of completion
of the program as provided by rules of the commission;
(b) All full-time law enforcement officers who are certified after
July 1, 2015, complete two hours of annual crisis intervention
retraining that shall be incorporated into the annual training required
by the commission for all certified officers.
(3) The commission shall establish by rule:
(a) A program and standards to certify organizations, other than
the commission, that may provide crisis intervention training as
required under this section. The commission shall consider geographic
training needs when considering programs and standards. The commission
shall consider providing grants to law enforcement agencies with fewer
than three hundred commissioned officers to assist with costs of
sending officers to crisis intervention training;
(b) Standards for successful completion of the annual two hours of
crisis intervention training as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this
section. The standards shall include, at a minimum, the requirement of
successful completion of a written exam.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "crisis intervention
training" means training designed to provide tools and resources to law
enforcement officers in order to respond effectively to individuals who
may be experiencing an emotional, mental, physical, behavioral, or
chemical dependency crisis, distress, or problem and that are designed
to increase the safety of both law enforcement and individuals in
crisis.
(5) Subject to appropriation, the commission shall develop a
program to make available crisis intervention training to twenty-five
percent of currently certified law enforcement officers, assigned to
patrol duties no later than December 1, 2017. The training shall be
comprised of forty hours of commission-certified training. Any
appropriated funds shall be used to train personnel who will implement
the training on a geographically diverse basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2014, from the general fund to the criminal
justice training commission for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---