BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that traffic
deaths and serious injuries related to impaired driving and speeding
are preventable and cause a public safety problem in Washington state.
Such crashes have a significant bearing on overall law enforcement and
court caseloads. The legislature further recognizes the growing costs
associated with traffic safety education, enforcement, and advocacy
programs established by local governments and community-based
organizations.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to establish a penalty that will
hold convicted motor vehicle offenders accountable and help to offset
the costs of effective city, county, or community programs created to
reduce traffic deaths and serious injuries consistent with the
priorities set in the Washington state strategic highway safety plan:
Target Zero.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All superior courts, and courts organized under Title 3 or 35
RCW, must impose a penalty assessment of one hundred dollars on any
person who is convicted for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, 46.20.750,
46.52.010, 46.52.020, 46.61.024, 46.61.500, 46.61.502, 46.61.503,
46.61.520, 46.61.522, 46.61.5249, or 46.61.530. The penalty assessment
is in addition to, and does not supersede, any other penalty,
restitution, fines, or costs provided by law. The court may not
reduce, waive, or suspend the penalty assessment unless the court finds
the offender to be indigent.
(2) The penalty assessment must be forwarded to the state treasurer
and deposited into the target zero account created under section 3 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW
to read as follows:
The target zero account is created in the state treasury. All
penalty assessments collected under section 2 of this act must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used by the
Washington traffic safety commission to fund effective strategies and
programs consistent with the priorities specified in the Washington
state strategic highway safety plan: Target Zero.

--- END ---