BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 65.08.070 and 2012 c 117 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A conveyance of real property, when acknowledged by the person
executing the same (the acknowledgment being certified as required by
law), may be recorded in the office of the recording officer of the
county where the property is situated. Every such conveyance not so
recorded is void as against any subsequent purchaser or mortgagee in
good faith and for a valuable consideration from the same vendor, his
or her heirs or devisees, of the same real property or any portion
thereof whose conveyance is first duly recorded.
(2) Every transfer and assignment of a real property encumbrance
must be recorded in the office of the recording officer of the county
where the property is situated. The recording must include:
(a) A full legal description of the property encumbered, the
assessor parcel number, and, if relevant, the reference number of the
documents evidencing the original encumbrance; and
(b) The full legal name and telephone number of the owner of the
beneficial interest, including the physical and electronic address for
service of process purposes.
(3)(a) The owner of a beneficial interest in real property has:
(i) Twenty calendar days to record the transfer or assignment of a
real property encumbrance and the information required under subsection
(2)(b) of this section; and
(ii) Ten business days to provide the purchaser or mortgagee with
a copy of the recording at the purchaser's or mortgagee's last known
address by both first-class and registered or certified mail, return
receipt requested.
(b) Failure to record within twenty days under (a)(i) of this
subsection results in a fine of ten dollars per day, commencing on the
twenty-first day, with a maximum fine of one thousand dollars. The
owner of a beneficial interest who fails to record within twenty days
may not commence a foreclosure for six months after a recording is
perfected.
(4) An instrument under this section is deemed recorded the minute
it is filed for record.

--- END ---