BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.280 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 20 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The marine employees' commission, created in RCW 41.58.065,
shall adjust all complaints, grievances, and disputes between labor and
management arising out of the operation of the ferry system as provided
in RCW 47.64.150.
(2) All unfair labor practice complaints, questions concerning
representation, and unit clarifications must be filed with the public
employment relations commission and processed in accordance with the
commission's rules adopted under RCW 41.58.050, except that the marine
employees' commission shall act in place of the public employment
relations commission only for appeals.
(((3) This section expires June 30, 2013.))

Sec. 2 RCW 41.58.065 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created the marine employees' commission within the
public employment relations commission. The governor shall appoint the
marine employees' commission with the consent of the senate. The
marine employees' commission shall consist of three members: One
member to be appointed from labor; one member from industry; and one
member from the public who has significant knowledge of maritime
affairs. The public member is chair of the marine employees'
commission. Any member of the marine employees' commission may be
removed by the governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty
or malfeasance in office, but for no other cause. Marine employees'
commission members are not eligible for state retirement under chapter
41.40 RCW by virtue of their service on the marine employees'
commission. Members of the marine employees' commission must be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and must receive
reimbursement for official travel and other expenses at the same rate
and on the same terms as provided for the transportation commission
under RCW 47.01.061.
(2) The rules of procedure adopted by the public employment
relations commission under RCW 41.58.050 apply to state ferry system
employees, except that the marine employees' commission shall act in
place of the public employment relations commission only for appeals of
unfair labor practice complaints, questions concerning representation,
and unit clarifications.
(3) In addition to subsection (2) of this section, the marine
employees' commission shall perform the duties as provided in RCW
47.64.280.
(((4) This section expires June 30, 2013.))

Sec. 3 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 28 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
((The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:
(1))) RCW 47.64.080 (Employee seniority rights) and 1984 c 7 s 341
& 1961 c 13 s 47.64.080((; and
(2) RCW 47.64.150 (Grievance procedures) and 1983 c 15 s 6)) are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---