BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds there is significant
variation in health care with regard to price, quality, and value.
Large purchasers, major companies purchasing health care including
large public purchasers, are demanding more tools that will assist them
in controlling costs and increasing quality. Additional price
transparency from health care providers and insurance carriers can
assist purchasers in identifying variation in price and quality, and
purchasing for value.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Health insuring entity" or "insuring entity" means any party
that is by law, rule, policy, contract, or agreement legally
responsible for payment of a claim for a health care service including,
but not limited to:
(a) An insurance company providing disability insurance under
chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW;
(b) A health care service contractor providing health care coverage
under chapter 48.44 RCW;
(c) A health maintenance organization providing comprehensive
health care services under chapter 48.46 RCW;
(d) An employer or union self-insured plan;
(e) Any private insurer, a group health plan, or a service benefit
plan;
(f) A managed care organization;
(g) A pharmacy benefit manager; and
(h) A third-party administrator.
(2) "Health plan" or "plan" means any policy, contract, or
agreement offered by an insuring entity to provide, arrange, reimburse,
or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 or 48.83
RCW;
(b) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under 10 U.S.C.
chapter 55;
(c) Disability income;
(d) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(e) Workers' compensation coverage;
(f) Accident only coverage;
(g) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance,
hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment
insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit; and
(h) Plans certified by the insurance commissioner in writing to:
(i) Have a short-term limited purpose or duration; or
(ii) Be a guaranteed renewable student-only plan available to a
covered person while the covered person is enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution.
(3) "Health plan statistical agent" or "statistical agent" means an
entity the commissioner has designated to collect health care-related
statistical data from insuring entities and report the data to the
commissioner on behalf of those insuring entities.
(4) "Statistical plan" means a system for collecting information
from insuring entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All health insuring entities must submit
price and quality data to the commissioner and to large group
purchasers that includes the information for each provider and
facility. Contracts with providers and facilities must include a
requirement that allows the release of price and quality information to
the commissioner and to the purchasers of the group coverage.
(2) The commissioner must adopt rules to clarify the required data
and format for submission. The types of data must include at a
minimum: Health care claims and enrollment data; paid health care
claims data; and data related to costs, prices, quality, and
utilization.
(3) The rules must establish criteria and procedures for the
development of limited use data sets, and criteria and procedures to
ensure that limited use data sets are accessible and compliant with
federal and state privacy laws.
(4) The rules must ensure that data reported to the commissioner
may only be disclosed in a form and manner that ensures the privacy and
security of personal health information as required by state and
federal laws. The collection, storage, and release of health care data
and other information under this section is subject to the requirements
of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act.
(5) The commissioner may choose to designate a health plan
statistical agent responsible for collection, auditing, preparation,
and reporting of the health care-related data and information.
(a) If the commissioner chooses to designate a statistical agent to
be responsible for the data, the commissioner must adopt rules for the
statistical agent to use when collecting and reporting health plan
statistical data.
(b) Rules adopted under this chapter must be consistent with
standards adopted by the accredited standards committee X12 of the
American national standards institute, the centers for medicare and
medicaid services, and the national council for prescription drug
programs. At a minimum, these rules must establish the time, place,
form, and manner of reporting data under this chapter, including:
(i) Requiring the use of unique patient and provider identifiers;
(ii) Specifying a uniform coding system that reflects all health
care utilization and costs for health care services provided to
Washington residents;
(iii) Establishing enrollment thresholds below which reporting will
be voluntary; and
(iv) Establishing the types of data insuring entities must report
under this chapter, including:
(A) Health care claims and enrollment data;
(B) Paid health care claims data;
(C) Data related to race, ethnicity, and primary language collected
in a manner consistent with established national standards; and
(D) Any other data or statistics related to health care costs,
prices, quality, utilization, or resources that the commissioner needs
to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Health insuring entities must report data
identified by this chapter and by the commissioner by rule under
section 3 of this act. Each insuring entity insurer must:
(1) Report its insurance statistical data to the commissioner or
the statistical agent designated by the commissioner;
(2) Comply with the reporting requirements and data quality
procedures published in rule; and
(3) Adopt edit and audit procedures to screen and check data for
reasonableness and accuracy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any insuring entity that fails to report
as required in this chapter or rules adopted by the commissioner may be
subject to a civil penalty.
(2) The commissioner must adopt a schedule of penalties not to
exceed five hundred dollars per day per violation, as determined by the
severity of the violation.
(3) Civil penalties imposed under this section may be remitted or
mitigated by the commissioner if the terms and conditions are
consistent with the public health and safety.
(4) Civil penalties incurred under any law of this state are not
allowable as costs for the purpose of rate determination or for
reimbursement by a third-party payer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---