BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that when consumers and purchasers have
quality information that is easily accessible, they are better able to
weigh their health care choices and make sound purchasing and usage
decisions. The legislature further finds there is significant variance
in whether consumers and purchasers have access to information
regarding the cost, quality, and overall value of treatment options.
The legislature finds that with the implementation of the federal
affordable care act, the health care marketplace will be expanding on
multiple levels, bringing the emergence of additional health plans into
the state. The legislature intends to be proactive in promoting
greater levels of transparency, accountability, and affordability for
consumers when implementing health care reform.
(2) The office of the insurance commissioner and the department of
health shall communicate with health plans, health care facilities,
providers, and other entities as appropriate to identify, and brief the
legislature regarding, current and emerging practices in the health
care industry that show promise in advancing one or more of the
following goals:
(a) Promoting transparency for consumers and purchasers about cost-efficient and efficacious health care services;
(b) Improving accountability in the provision of health care
coverage relative to health promotion, disease prevention, and the
amelioration or cure of illness; and
(c) Advancing the affordability of comprehensive, integrated, and
community-based health care delivery systems supported by cooperative
activities among health care providers and facilities.
(3) The briefing required under this section shall be provided by
January 15, 2014, and each year thereafter. The briefing may include
recommendations for statutory changes that would support implementation
of promising practices aimed at achieving the goals.

--- END ---