BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Qualifying reciprocal insurer" means a foreign insurer that:
(a) Meets the definition of "issuer" pursuant to P.L. 111-148 of
2010, as amended;
(b) Is authorized in a state that is a member of the consortium
authorized in section 4 of this act;
(c) Proposes to sell in Washington only a qualifying reciprocal
plan;
(d) Has and maintains total adjusted capital that is greater than
three times its authorized control level risk-based capital; and
(e) To the extent required by the reciprocity agreement between the
primary state of issue and the commissioner, complies with state laws
applicable to issuers in the state of Washington.
(2) "Qualifying reciprocal plan" means a plan that:
(a) Contains an essential health benefits package that is
substantially equal to the essential health benefit benchmark plan
designated pursuant to RCW 48.43.715 and provides minimum essential
coverage as required by P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended;
(b) Has been approved by a state regulator for a state with which
the commissioner has a reciprocity agreement;
(c) Is not a health savings account or qualified high deductible
health plan; and
(d) Complies with the market rules established in RCW 48.43.700 and
48.43.705.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Each qualifying reciprocal plan issued
or renewed must contain the following declaration in bold face type at
the beginning of the document:
"The benefits in this policy may not include each of the benefits
required by the state of Washington. (Name of state) initially
approved this policy for sale, and the benefit requirements of that
state are reflected in the policy. The rates applied to calculate
premium were not approved by the state of Washington, but by (Name of
state). Those requirements may be different from the requirements for
policies approved by Washington. Please consult your insurance agent
or insurer to determine which health benefits are covered under the
policy."
(2) Each qualifying reciprocal insurer offering a qualifying
reciprocal plan must provide applicants with a written side by side
comparison of health benefits under the plan, including differences in
definition of each benefit between Washington law and the law of the
approving state, whether the benefit is required under Washington law,
and the difference in the premium rate due to the difference in state
laws. Where a producer is offering the plan to an applicant, the
producer must provide the written comparison.
(3) A qualifying reciprocal insurer offering qualifying reciprocal
plans must offer the plan through producers licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW. Electronic marketing and sales of out-of-state policies are
permitted under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A qualifying reciprocal plan must use a
premium rate schedule approved by its state of issue for the plan, and
apply the standards for calculating the premium required by the United
States department of health and human services for out-of-state
coverage.
(2) The premium rate schedule for a qualifying reciprocal plan may
not be adjusted more frequently than once a year.
(3) A qualifying reciprocal plan may only be offered in the small
group market in Washington.
(4) A qualifying reciprocal plan is not required to include health
benefit mandates required under this title that are not included in the
qualifying reciprocal plan.
(5) A qualifying reciprocal plan must be filed with the
commissioner for approval prior to use pursuant to RCW 48.18.100. The
commissioner shall approve the plan for use in Washington state if the
plan meets the requirements of this chapter and shall disapprove it if
it does not. When determining whether the qualifying reciprocal plan
contains an essential health benefits package that is substantially
equal to the essential health benefit benchmark plan designated
pursuant to RCW 48.43.715, the commissioner shall utilize the same
standards and procedures applicable to carriers licensed in Washington.
The commissioner may not rely upon the determination of a member
consortium state as to whether the qualifying reciprocal plan contains
an essential health benefits package substantially equal to the
essential health benefit benchmark plan designated pursuant to RCW
48.43.715.
(6) Except as provided in this section, RCW 48.18.110 may not be
grounds for disapproval of a qualifying reciprocal plan.
(7) To the extent consistent with federal law, and except as
provided in this chapter, the requirements of chapter 48.43 RCW do not
apply to a qualifying reciprocal plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Beginning July 1, 2015, the commissioner
is authorized to contract with other states to establish and operate a
consortium formed through written agreement governing the sale to small
groups of a qualifying reciprocal plan, by qualifying reciprocal
insurers admitted in one of the states in the consortium. A
reciprocity agreement must be executed between the commissioner and the
appropriate entity in a participating state prior to the offer and
issue of a qualifying reciprocal plan under this chapter. The
consortium is not intended to operate as a compact.
(2) The commissioner may not enter into a reciprocity agreement
until the commissioner has identified a minimum of five states whose
regulatory requirements for the offer and issue of health benefit plans
meets or exceeds those of Washington in the areas of network adequacy,
consumer protection, marketing requirements, and claims adjudication
and processing. The consortium may commence with a reciprocity
agreement with just one of the states.
(3) A state may not join the consortium if it has admitted two or
more issuers domiciled in Washington that offer health benefit plans,
unless five or more other states have joined the consortium.
(4) The commissioner may enter into separate reciprocity
agreements, or one uniform agreement. Each reciprocity agreement must
establish rules for the management of consumer questions and complaints
related to health benefit plans approved by one member state but sold
in another. The commissioner may adopt rules to implement consortium
rules as necessary to comply with the consortium agreement.
(5) Consortium member states must agree to provide the commissioner
with a list of approved qualifying reciprocal plans that meet the
standards under this chapter, and their premium rate schedules as they
are approved. If a qualifying reciprocity plan is disapproved or
otherwise removed from the market pursuant to regulatory action or
order, the primary state of issue must notify the commissioner of this
action.
(6) The reciprocity agreement must establish a mechanism for
payment of premium tax pursuant to chapter 48.14 RCW, payment of
regulatory surcharge pursuant to RCW 48.02.190, and collection of any
reinsurance or risk adjustment assessments that would otherwise be
applicable but for the domicile of the selling insurer.
(7) Qualifying reciprocal insurers must inform each consortium
state in writing of the intent to offer a qualifying reciprocal policy
in a state not less than sixty days prior to the first date of offer.
Reciprocity consortium member states may establish additional
requirements for notification and offer applicable to that state.
(8) The commissioner may enter into one or more personal services
contracts with third-party contractors to provide services necessary to
accomplish the commissioner's responsibilities under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A qualifying reciprocal plan may be
certified as a qualified health plan through the exchange only if it,
and its qualifying reciprocal insurer, meet the requirements of the
exchange for certification as a qualified health plan, and if the plan
follows the market rules established in RCW 48.43.700.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By January 1, 2015, the commissioner
must report to the legislature which states have been identified under
section 4(2) of this act, and include a plan for seeking a reciprocity
agreement with at least one state.
(2) The commissioner must report to the legislature by December 1,
2016, and December 1st of each year following, the status of the
reciprocity consortium's formation, membership, the number of
qualifying reciprocal plans offered in Washington through the
consortium, the effect on the marketplace in Washington, including the
health benefits exchange, and must recommend whether continuing
reciprocity sales serves the public health and welfare.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.05.070 and 1947 c 79 s .05.07 are each amended to
read as follows:
To apply for an original certificate of authority an insurer shall:
(1) File with the commissioner its request therefor showing:
(a) Its name, home office location, type of insurer, organization
date, and state or country of its domicile.
(b) The kinds of insurance it proposes to transact.
(c) Additional information as the commissioner may reasonably
require.
(2) File with the commissioner:
(a) A copy of its charter as amended, certified, if a foreign or
alien insurer, by the proper public officer of the state or country of
domicile.
(b) A copy of its bylaws, certified by its proper officer.
(c) A statement of its financial condition, management, and affairs
on a form satisfactory to or furnished by the commissioner.
(d) If a foreign or alien insurer, or a domestic reciprocal
insurer, an appointment of the commissioner as its attorney to receive
service of legal process.
(e) If an alien insurer, a copy of the appointment and authority of
its United States manager, certified by its proper officer.
(f) If a foreign or alien insurer, a certificate from the proper
public official of its state or country of domicile showing that it is
duly organized and is authorized to transact the kinds of insurance
proposed to be transacted.
(g) If a domestic reciprocal insurer, the declaration required by
RCW 48.10.090 of this code.
(h) Other documents or stipulations as the commissioner may
reasonably require to evidence compliance with the provisions of this
code.
(3) A qualifying reciprocal insurer, as defined in section 1 of
this act, is not required to comply with subsection (2)(a), (b), (c),
(e), or (g) of this section.
(4) Deposit with the commissioner the fees required by this code to
be paid for filing the accompanying documents, and for the certificate
of authority, if granted.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.21.047 and 2010 c 292 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An insurer may not offer any health benefit plan to any small
employer without complying with RCW 48.21.045(3).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and the plans are not
subject to RCW 48.21.045(3).
(3) A qualifying reciprocal plan as defined in section 1 of this
act, is not subject to RCW 48.21.045.
(4) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this section, "census date" has the
same meaning as defined in RCW 48.44.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 6 of this act, referencing section 6 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2014, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 6 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---