BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.23.010 and 1987 c 442 s 701 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Real property sold subject to redemption, as provided in RCW
6.21.080, or any part thereof separately sold, may be redeemed by the
following persons, or their successors in interest:
(a) The judgment debtor, in the whole or any part of the property
separately sold.
(b) A creditor having a lien by judgment, decree, deed of trust, or
mortgage, on any portion of the property, or any portion of any part
thereof, separately sold, subsequent in ((time)) priority to that on
which the property was sold. The persons mentioned in this subsection
are termed redemptioners.
(2) As used in this chapter, the terms "judgment debtor,"
"redemptioner," and "purchaser((,))" refer also to their respective
successors in interest.

--- END ---