BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2014, the council, in conjunction with the
state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the four-year institutions
of higher education, nonprofit institutions of higher education, and
for-profit institutions of higher education shall establish and
maintain a statewide online transfer and student advising system that
integrates information related to programs, advising, registration,
admissions, and transfer. The system must be easily accessible to all
Washington high school students and their parents or guardians, higher
education students, faculty, counselors, advisors, and other
professional staff. The purpose of the system is to:
(a) Assist students to access higher education program information
easily and speed completion of their education programs by clarifying
and simplifying the process for researching programs, resources, and
transferability of courses; and
(b) Improve efficiency of service delivery to students for
institutions of higher education.
(2) The online transfer and student advising system must:
(a) Integrate with web sites maintained by the council, the state
board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, institutions of higher education, and
other web sites to provide an inventory of postsecondary degrees and
certificates available in the state, including online options; and
outline educational requirements for various occupations, including
labor market information;
(b) Specify educational requirements, admissions requirements, and
prerequisites for all postsecondary programs;
(c) Specify course options or pathways that meet the requirements
of a degree or certificate;
(d) Provide registration and admissions information for
institutions of higher education;
(e)(i) Provide a method for students to assess which courses and
programs are transferrable from one institution of higher education to
another, and which programs will transfer with credit towards
completion of their chosen degree or certificate; and
(ii) Make specific accommodations to address the unique transfer
opportunities for students transferring both to and from The Evergreen
State College, which may include providing transfer policy information
specific to the college;
(f) Provide information regarding student financial aid and other
services that assist students to research, access, and complete degrees
and certificates; and
(g) Build on and use data gathered from existing institutional data
systems, such as the degree audit reporting system and institutional
web sites, to minimize new technical requirements, costs, and staffing
impacts at institutions of higher education.
(3) The council, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the
four-year institutions of higher education, nonprofit institutions of
higher education, and for-profit institutions of higher education shall
sign a memorandum of understanding that specifies roles and
responsibilities regarding the design, implementation, promotion,
development, maintenance, and analysis of the effectiveness of the
online transfer and student advising system.

--- END ---