BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
marine shorelines are a cornerstone of the state's wealth in both
environmental and economic values. The state's extensive coastal and
Puget Sound shorelines were the reason that the state has a rich
tradition of marine-related occupations and many communities today
still depend upon marine-related commerce and jobs for their economic
vitality.
The legislature further finds that shoreline ecological functions
have been degraded on many lands on which industrial and commercial
facilities have been operated, and that there exists many opportunities
for new or expanded commercial or industrial activities that offer both
new, economically beneficial reuse of the property, while also
restoring some of the lost ecological functions.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to provide a voluntary
alternative procedure for satisfying some of the state and local
regulatory approvals for job-creating projects involving redevelopment
on lands zoned for commercial and industrial uses and incorporating
within the project design elements that will provide a net benefit for
ecological functions on those lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To be eligible for the permit review and
approval process created in this section, a marine areas redevelopment
and restoration project must:
(a) Be located on a site adjacent to or including marine shorelands
in which commercial and industrial uses are allowable uses under the
applicable city or county shoreline master program;
(b) Generate at least ten jobs on an ongoing basis;
(c) Involve the redevelopment and reuse of lands on which previous
uses have substantially degraded shoreline ecological functions;
(d) Include elements that, when fully implemented, will lead to a
net contribution to shoreline ecological functions on a substantial
portion of the project site;
(e) Provide for protection of fish life consistent with the
substantive requirements of chapter 77.55 RCW;
(f) Be consistent with and further the goals and objectives of the
local government shoreline master program and any applicable
development regulations;
(g) Be determined appropriate for review under this section under
the criteria adopted under subsection (6) of this section; and
(h) Not require a detailed statement under RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) nor
has such a statement been initiated for the project.
(2) No local government may require a substantial development
permit under chapter 90.58 RCW or require a permit or other approval
upon the project under chapter 36.70A RCW for projects that meet the
criteria of subsection (1) of this section and that are reviewed and
approved according to the provisions of this section.
(3) An applicant seeking review and approval under this section
shall file with the department an application using the joint aquatic
resource permit application form, together with additional information
as the department may require to determine the project's eligibility
for review under this section and to determine whether a permit should
be issued. On the same day, the applicant shall provide copies of the
completed application form to the department of natural resources, the
department of ecology, the department of health, and to the appropriate
city or county administering the applicable shoreline master program
covering the project site.
(4) The department shall provide a thirty day period in which
public comments are solicited, as well as comments from the department
of ecology, the department of natural resources, the department of
health, the city or county, and appropriate tribes. The department may
grant an extension of not more than an additional twenty-one days for
the receipt of comments, but may not thereafter delay review of the
application under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) The department shall approve the application, approve the
application with mitigation conditions, deny approval of the
application, or determine that the review and approval process created
by this section is not appropriate for the proposed project, within
forty-five days from the end of the comment period as determined by the
department under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) The department shall approve the application when it determines
that the project meets the criteria provided under subsection (1) of
this section.
(6) The department shall determine that the review and approval
process created by this section is not appropriate for the proposed
project: If the department, upon consideration of the comments
submitted, identifies public health and safety concerns or
environmental impacts that cannot be mitigated; or a local government
provides written notice to the department during the thirty day review
period under subsection (4) of this section that it finds the project
is inconsistent with subsection (1)(f) of this section.
(7) If the department determines that the review and approval
process created by this section is not appropriate for the proposed
project, the department shall notify the applicant.
(8) The department's denial of a permit application or
determination that the application is not appropriate for review under
this section does not prevent the applicant from seeking approval of
the permits that would otherwise have not been required if the project
had been permitted under this section.
(9) Any person aggrieved by the approval, approval with conditions,
denial, or the modification of a permit under this section may appeal
the decision as provided in RCW 43.21B.110.
(10) For the purposes of this section, "marine permit" or "permit"
means the permit authorized to be issued to qualifying marine areas
redevelopment and restoration projects under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.021 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 102 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.55.031, 77.55.051, 77.55.041,
((and)) 77.55.361, and section 2 of this act, in the event that any
person or government agency desires to undertake a hydraulic project,
the person or government agency shall, before commencing work thereon,
secure the approval of the department in the form of a permit as to the
adequacy of the means proposed for the protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit may be submitted in
person or by registered mail and must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life;
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter; and
(e) Payment of all applicable application fees charged by the
department under RCW 77.55.321.
(3) The department may establish direct billing accounts or other
funds transfer methods with permit applicants to satisfy the fee
payment requirements of RCW 77.55.321.
(4) The department may accept complete, written applications as
provided in this section for multiple site permits and may issue these
permits. For multiple site permits, each specific location must be
identified.
(5) With the exception of emergency permits as provided in
subsection (12) of this section, applications for permits must be
submitted to the department's headquarters office in Olympia. Requests
for emergency permits as provided in subsection (12) of this section
may be made to the permitting biologist assigned to the location in
which the emergency occurs, to the department's regional office in
which the emergency occurs, or to the department's headquarters office.
(6) Except as provided for emergency permits in subsection (12) of
this section, the department may not proceed with permit review until
all fees are paid in full as required in RCW 77.55.321.
(7)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
(b) Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (12)
through (14) and (16) of this section, the department has forty-five
calendar days upon receipt of a complete application to grant or deny
approval of a permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.161(3)(b).
(c) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended under (b) of this subsection, the department shall notify
the applicant in writing of the reasons for the delay.
(d) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(8) If the department denies approval of a permit, the department
shall provide the applicant a written statement of the specific reasons
why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, issuance, denial,
conditioning, or modification of a permit shall be appealable to the
board within thirty days from the date of receipt of the decision as
provided in RCW 43.21B.230.
(b) Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit may
be informally appealed to the department within thirty days from the
date of receipt of the decision. Requests for informal appeals must be
filed in the form and manner prescribed by the department by rule. A
permit decision that has been informally appealed to the department is
appealable to the board within thirty days from the date of receipt of
the department's decision on the informal appeal.
(9)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for up to five years from the
date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection and in
RCW 77.55.151.
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(10) The department may, after consultation with the permittee,
modify a permit due to changed conditions. A modification under this
subsection is not subject to the fees provided under RCW 77.55.321.
The modification is appealable as provided in subsection (8) of this
section. For a hydraulic project that diverts water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes, when the hydraulic project or
other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
department to show that changed conditions warrant the modification in
order to protect fish life.
(11) A permittee may request modification of a permit due to
changed conditions. The request must be processed within forty-five
calendar days of receipt of the written request and payment of
applicable fees under RCW 77.55.321. A decision by the department is
appealable as provided in subsection (8) of this section. For a
hydraulic project that diverts water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes, when the hydraulic project or other work is
associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm and
agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the burden is on the
permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the requested
modification and that such a modification will not impair fish life.
(12)(a) The department, the county legislative authority, or the
governor may declare and continue an emergency. If the county
legislative authority declares an emergency under this subsection, it
shall immediately notify the department. A declared state of emergency
by the governor under RCW 43.06.010 shall constitute a declaration
under this subsection.
(b) The department, through its authorized representatives, shall
issue immediately, upon request, verbal approval for a stream crossing,
or work to remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore
streambanks, protect fish life, or protect property threatened by the
stream or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of
obtaining a written permit prior to commencing work. Conditions of the
emergency verbal permit must be reduced to writing within thirty days
and complied with as provided for in this chapter.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(d) The department may not charge a person requesting an emergency
permit any of the fees authorized by RCW 77.55.321 until after the
emergency permit is issued and reduced to writing.
(13) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(14) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative authority
shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines that an
imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore banks,
protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit requests
require a complete written application as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and must be issued within fifteen calendar days of the
receipt of a complete written application. Approval of an expedited
permit is valid for up to sixty days from the date of issuance. The
department may not require the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a
permit under this subsection.
(15)(a) For any property, except for property located on a marine
shoreline, that has experienced at least two consecutive years of
flooding or erosion that has damaged or has threatened to damage a
major structure, water supply system, septic system, or access to any
road or highway, the county legislative authority may determine that a
chronic danger exists. The county legislative authority shall notify
the department, in writing, when it determines that a chronic danger
exists. In cases of chronic danger, the department shall issue a
permit, upon request, for work necessary to abate the chronic danger by
removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring
banks, restoring road or highway access, protecting fish resources, or
protecting property. Permit requests must be made and processed in
accordance with subsections (2) and (7) of this section.
(b) Any projects proposed to address a chronic danger identified
under (a) of this subsection that satisfies the project description
identified in RCW 77.55.181(1)(a)(ii) are not subject to the provisions
of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. However,
the project is subject to the review process established in RCW
77.55.181(3) as if it were a fish habitat improvement project.
(16) The department may issue an expedited written permit in those
instances where normal permit processing would result in significant
hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the environment.
Expedited permit requests require a complete written application as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within
fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(17) A marine areas redevelopment and restoration project issued a
marine permit under section 2 of this act is exempt from the permit
required by this section, but the department shall ensure compliance
with the substantive requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.147 and 2003 c 39 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public or private project that is designed to improve fish or
wildlife habitat or fish passage shall be exempt from the substantial
development permit requirements of this chapter when all of the
following apply:
(a) The project has been approved by the department of fish and
wildlife;
(b) The project has received hydraulic project approval by the
department of fish and wildlife pursuant to chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(c) The local government has determined that the project is
substantially consistent with the local shoreline master program. The
local government shall make such determination in a timely manner and
provide it by letter to the project proponent.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects that conform to the
provisions of RCW ((77.55.290)) 77.55.181 are determined to be
consistent with local shoreline master programs.
(3) A marine areas redevelopment and restoration project issued a
marine permit under section 2 of this act is exempt from obtaining any
permits and other approvals required by this chapter or the local
shoreline master program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide a priority in processing requests for
the use or lease of state-owned aquatic lands for projects permitted or
under review pursuant to section 2 of this act. Upon receipt of an
application for an aquatic use authorization or a lease, the department
shall process the request within sixty days, unless the department
notifies the applicant of the reasons for which additional time will be
required to process the application.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a marine areas redevelopment and restoration
permit under section 2 of this act.
(n) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(((n))) (o) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized
public entity under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or
custody of a vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that
are reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a marine areas redevelopment and restoration
permit under section 2 of this act.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(((m))) (n) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized
public entity under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or
custody of a vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that
are reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department shall solicit comments from
and coordinate with state agencies and local governments with expertise
relevant to a marine areas redevelopment and restoration project
application during the comment and review period provided in section 2
(4) and (5) of this act in order to inform the determinations required
under section 2 (5) and (6) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the
department of fish and wildlife must submit a report to the appropriate
standing committees of the senate and house of representatives by
September 1, 2015, that includes an update on the implementation of the
marine areas redevelopment and restoration project permitting process
established under section 2 of this act, including: A summary of
projects permitted under that authority; the disposition of
applications conditioned, denied, or deemed inappropriate for review
under the process; and any legislative recommendations.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 6 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 7 of this act takes effect June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 2 and 8 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "working waterfront redevelopment jobs act."

--- END ---