BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The lightweight structure and floatation capacity of
polystyrene foam, sometimes referred to as "styrofoam," has made it a
popular material choice for dock construction, buoys, and other
floatation devices in the marine environment.
(2) Polystyrene foam does not break down easily and never fully
biodegrades. Instead, the foam fragments into smaller pieces, leaching
toxins in the water and producing unsightly debris fields.
(3) Foam particles can be mistaken for food by fish and other
wildlife, which may cause them to die from malnutrition and suffocation
or may enter the human food chain when fish are caught and consumed.
(4) These problems can be avoided by ensuring that polystyrene foam
used in the marine environment is encapsulated by a protective covering
or is designed to prevent the polystyrene from disintegrating into the
waters of this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.020 and 2002 c 161 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Whenever the word)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Person" ((is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to))
includes any political subdivision, government agency, municipality,
industry, public or private corporation, copartnership, association,
firm, individual, or any other entity whatsoever.
((Wherever the words)) (2) "Waters of the state" ((shall be used in
this chapter, they shall be construed to)) includes lakes, rivers,
ponds, streams, inland waters, underground waters, salt waters and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.
((Whenever the word)) (3) "Pollution" ((is used in this chapter, it
shall be construed to)) means such contamination, or other alteration
of the physical, chemical, or biological properties, of any waters of
the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid,
radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or
to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or
other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds,
fish or other aquatic life.
((Wherever the word)) (4) "Department" ((is used in this chapter it
shall)) means the department of ecology.
((Whenever the word)) (5) "Director" ((is used in this chapter it
shall)) means the director of ecology.
((Whenever the words)) (6) "Aquatic noxious weed" ((are used in
this chapter, they have)) has the same meaning as prescribed under RCW
17.26.020.
((Whenever the words)) (7) "General sewer plan" ((are used in this
chapter they shall be construed to)) includes all sewerage general
plans, sewer general comprehensive plans, plans for a system of
sewerage, and other plans for sewer systems adopted by a local
government entity including but not limited to cities, towns, public
utility districts, and water-sewer districts.
(8) "Encapsulated" means a protective covering or physical barrier
between the polystyrene foam and the water.
(9) "Polystyrene foam" means any molded or expanded type of
polystyrene foam used for floatation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not install polystyrene foam on a dock, buoy,
float, or other floatation device unless the foam is encapsulated by a
protective covering or is designed to prevent the polystyrene from
disintegrating into the waters of the state.
(2) All existing installations of nonencapsulated polystyrene foam
in the waters of the state must be removed or replaced by January 1,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The use of polystyrene foam for any new uses on state-owned aquatic
lands including docks, floatation devices, or other structures or
devices authorized by a lease, easement, right-of-way, or other
authorizations is prohibited unless the foam is encapsulated as
provided in section 3 of this act. For existing uses, the condition of
any exposed or uncontained foam must be assessed by the department and
removed by the tenant as soon as possible based on its condition. The
department must determine the time frame for removal in consultation
with the tenant, but in no event may removal occur later than January
1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall condition each permit issued after the
effective date of this section to prohibit the use of polystyrene foam
in the structures of devices to be constructed or operated pursuant to
the permit unless the foam is encapsulated as provided in section 3 of
this act.

--- END ---