BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the levels of
acidification in ocean waters, including Washington's coastal and Puget
Sound waters, are increasing at an alarming rate, and that the increase
in acidity in ocean waters is primarily human caused. Ocean
acidification is caused both by increased absorption by seawater of
carbon dioxide from the atmosphere and coastal and estuarine waters may
be additionally affected by pollutants in runoff from land-based
activities. Ocean acidification harms a broad spectrum of the marine
ecosystem and is particularly harmful to organisms such as shellfish
that are "calcifiers" and unable to form durable shells and other hard
body parts in corrosive acidic water conditions. Mitigating ocean
acidification is vital to maintaining the state's strong shellfish
industry, which generates an estimated three thousand direct and
indirect jobs and two hundred seventy million dollars annually to the
state's economy.
The legislature finds that the blue ribbon panel on ocean
acidification, convened by governor Gregoire in 2012, has issued a
report entitled "Ocean Acidification: From Knowledge to Action," which
outlines several recommendations for strengthening the scientific
monitoring, research, and analysis regarding the causes and trends in
ocean acidification, and for taking action to confront this challenge.
The purpose of this act is to ensure effective coordination of the
programs and scientific research regarding ocean acidification and to
provide policies and response tools to respond to the adverse impacts
to the state's waters from localized sources of pollutant discharges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Council" means the Washington marine resources protection
council created in section 3 of this act.
(2) "Ocean and Puget Sound" means all salt waters lying within the
state to the ordinary high water mark. For the purposes of
consultation and to the extent permissible under federal law, the term
also includes those marine waters adjacent to the state and within the
exclusive economic zone under the jurisdiction of the United States
government.
(3) "Panel" and "ocean acidification panel" means the ocean
acidification blue ribbon panel commissioned by the governor, whose
report and recommendations were provided to the governor in November
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington marine resources
protection council is created within the office of the governor.
(2) The council shall be composed of:
(a) The governor, or the governor's designee, who shall serve as
the chair of the council;
(b) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's
designee;
(c) Two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(e) One representative of federally recognized Indian tribes with
reservations lying within or partially within counties bordering the
outer coast, if selected by action of all of the governing bodies of
all federally recognized Indian tribes in such an area;
(f) One representative of federally recognized Indian tribes with
reservations lying within or partially within counties bordering Puget
Sound, if selected by action of all of the governing bodies of all
federally recognized Indian tribes in such an area;
(g) One representative of ports marine navigation and
transportation interests, appointed by the governor upon consultation
with the Washington public ports association;
(h) One representative of coastal counties and one representative
of Puget Sound counties, appointed by the governor upon consultation
with the Washington state association of counties;
(i) One representative of coastal cities and one representative of
Puget Sound cities, appointed by the governor upon consultation with
the association of Washington cities;
(j) One representative of marine commerce, appointed by the
governor;
(k) One representative of commercial fishing, appointed by the
governor;
(l) One representative of recreational fishing, appointed by the
governor;
(m) One representative of marine recreation and tourism, other than
fishing, appointed by the governor;
(n) The chair of the Washington coastal marine advisory committee
established by the department of ecology;
(o) The chair of the leadership council of the Puget Sound
partnership;
(p) The director of the department of ecology;
(q) The director of the department of fish and wildlife; and
(r) The chair of the Northwest Straits commission.
(3) The governor shall make the initial appointments of the members
under subsection (2)(g) through (m) of this section by September 1,
2013. The initial members appointed under subsection (2)(g) through
(m) of this section must be appointed as follows:
(a) Two of the members must be appointed for a term of two years;
(b) Two of the members must be appointed for a term of three years;
and
(c) Three of the members must be appointed for a term of four
years.
(4) With the exception of the terms of the initial members, each
member must be appointed for terms of four years, except that a person
chosen to fill a vacancy must be appointed only for the unexpired term
of the vacant position.
(5) Any member appointed by the governor may be removed by the
governor for cause.
(6) Members whose terms expire continue to serve until reappointed
or replaced by a new member.
(7) A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business.
(8) Council decisions and actions require majority vote approval of
all public members appointed under subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The council may enter interagency
agreements with any state agency for the assignment of state employees
on a temporary basis to assist the council in the performance of its
functions.
(2) The members of the council appointed pursuant to section 3(3)
of this act may be reimbursed for expenses as a class one group
pursuant to RCW 43.03.220.
(3) The chair of the council shall schedule meetings and establish
the agenda. The first meeting of the council must be scheduled by
November 1, 2013. The council shall meet at least twice per calendar
year. At each meeting the council shall afford an opportunity to the
public to comment upon agenda items and other matters relating to the
protection and conservation of the state's ocean resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The council shall have the following powers
and duties:
(1) To advise the governor on the adoption, implementation, and
revision of policies relating to the protection and conservation of
ocean resources;
(2) To coordinate the implementation of measures to mitigate the
impacts of ocean acidification pursuant to this act;
(3) To advance the state's ocean and Puget Sound resources policies
in national, regional, and west coast multistate forums;
(4) To provide a forum for the public discussion of ocean and Puget
Sound resources policies and programs; and
(5) To perform other functions relating to the protection of ocean
and Puget Sound resources as the governor or legislature may assign to
the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The council may form such technical or
scientific committees as it finds appropriate to aid the council in the
performance of its powers and duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The council shall coordinate actions
among state agencies and local governments to implement the
recommendations of the ocean acidification panel and other actions
necessary to mitigate the impacts of increasing acidification in the
state's ocean and Puget Sound waters.
(2) Each state agency shall use its existing authorities to
implement the panel's recommendations to the maximum extent
practicable.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.70A.110 and 2010 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas within which
urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of which growth can occur
only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is located in such
a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An urban
growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area
may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such
territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the
urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained
community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.
(2) Based upon the growth management population projection made for
the county by the office of financial management, the county and each
city within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to
permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or
city for the succeeding twenty-year period, except for those urban
growth areas contained totally within a national historical reserve.
As part of this planning process, each city within the county must
include areas sufficient to accommodate the broad range of needs and
uses that will accompany the projected urban growth including, as
appropriate, medical, governmental, institutional, commercial, service,
retail, and other nonresidential uses.
Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall
include greenbelt and open space areas. In the case of urban growth
areas contained totally within a national historical reserve, the city
may restrict densities, intensities, and forms of urban growth as
determined to be necessary and appropriate to protect the physical,
cultural, or historic integrity of the reserve. An urban growth area
determination may include a reasonable land market supply factor and
shall permit a range of urban densities and uses. In determining this
market factor, cities and counties may consider local circumstances.
Cities and counties have discretion in their comprehensive plans to
make many choices about accommodating growth.
Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1,
1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin
consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each city
shall propose the location of an urban growth area. Within sixty days
of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial
management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city
located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach
agreement with each city on the location of an urban growth area within
which the city is located. If such an agreement is not reached with
each city located within the urban growth area, the county shall
justify in writing why it so designated the area an urban growth area.
A city may object formally with the department over the designation of
the urban growth area within which it is located. Where appropriate,
the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the
use of mediation services.
(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already
characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public
facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in
areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served
adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that
are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the
remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.
(4) In general, cities are the units of local government most
appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is
not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or
expanded in rural areas except in those limited circumstances:
(a) Shown to be necessary to protect basic public health and safety
and the environment, including the reduction of acidifying runoff to
marine waters when recommended by the department of ecology in
consultation with the Washington marine resources protection council as
a measure necessary to address the localized impacts to marine waters
of ocean acidification; and
(b) When such services are financially supportable at rural
densities and do not permit urban development.
(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially
required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development
regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter.
Within three years and three months of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of
certification by the office of financial management, all other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under
this chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only
occur after public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and under this
section. Such action may be appealed to the growth management hearings
board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be adopted
at the time of comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.
(6) Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in
its comprehensive plan.
(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section
may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential
annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the
county.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the expansion
of an urban growth area is prohibited into the one hundred year
floodplain of any river or river segment that: (i) Is located west of
the crest of the Cascade mountains; and (ii) has a mean annual flow of
one thousand or more cubic feet per second as determined by the
department of ecology.
(b) Subsection (8)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(i) Urban growth areas that are fully contained within a floodplain
and lack adjacent buildable areas outside the floodplain;
(ii) Urban growth areas where expansions are precluded outside
floodplains because:
(A) Urban governmental services cannot be physically provided to
serve areas outside the floodplain; or
(B) Expansions outside the floodplain would require a river or
estuary crossing to access the expansion; or
(iii) Urban growth area expansions where:
(A) Public facilities already exist within the floodplain and the
expansion of an existing public facility is only possible on the land
to be included in the urban growth area and located within the
floodplain; or
(B) Urban development already exists within a floodplain as of July
26, 2009, and is adjacent to, but outside of, the urban growth area,
and the expansion of the urban growth area is necessary to include such
urban development within the urban growth area; or
(C) The land is owned by a jurisdiction planning under this chapter
or the rights to the development of the land have been permanently
extinguished, and the following criteria are met:
(I) The permissible use of the land is limited to one of the
following: Outdoor recreation; environmentally beneficial projects,
including but not limited to habitat enhancement or environmental
restoration; storm water facilities; flood control facilities; or
underground conveyances; and
(II) The development and use of such facilities or projects will
not decrease flood storage, increase storm water runoff, discharge
pollutants to fresh or salt waters during normal operations or floods,
or increase hazards to people and property.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (8), "one hundred year
floodplain" means the same as "special flood hazard area" as set forth
in WAC 173-158-040 as it exists on July 26, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The council shall collaborate with the
department of ecology in reviewing whether the state's surface water
quality standards should be revised to include numeric standards for
pollutants or parameters associated with ocean acidification. The
council and the department of ecology may invite appropriate federal
agencies, tribes and academic institutions to form a scientific work
group to conduct the review and to pilot test the applicability of
proposed standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 43.143.005, 43.143.010, 43.143.020,
43.143.030, 43.143.900, 43.143.901, and 43.143.902 are each recodified
as sections in the new chapter created in section 10 of this act.

--- END ---