BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.215.005 and 1999 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The registration, competency, and professional education of
surgical technologists is in the interest of the public health, safety,
and welfare.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.215.010 and 1999 c 335 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(3) "Surgical technologist" means ((a person, regardless of title,
who is supervised in the surgical setting under the delegation of
authority of a health care practitioner acting within the scope of his
or her license and under the laws of this state)) an individual who
under the supervision of a licensed health care practitioner in a
hospital as defined by RCW 70.41.020 or an ambulatory surgical facility
as defined by RCW 70.230.010 is authorized to: (a) Maintain surgical
instrument integrity from within the surgical field during surgical
procedures; (b) perform surgical support tasks, including instrument
and equipment transfers and counts, and managing fluids, specimens, and
supplies; (c) identify and correct breaks in asepsis; and (d) perform
other surgical tasks as directed.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.215.020 and 1999 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may represent oneself as a surgical technologist by use
of any title or description or perform the functions of a surgical
technologist without being registered by the department under the
provisions of this chapter. No individual may hold himself or herself
out to be a surgical technologist or perform the functions of a
surgical technologist unless the secretary or the secretary's designee
certifies the individual as a surgical technologist under the
provisions of this chapter. Unless exempted by RCW 18.215.030,
applicants for registration as a surgical technologist must submit
evidence of: (1) Successful completion of a nationally and
programmatically accredited surgical technology program or a surgical
technology program offered by the United States armed forces and a
current credential as a certified surgical technologist from the
national board of surgical technology and surgical assisting or its
successor; or (2) employment or contract as a surgical technologist in
a hospital or ambulatory surgical facility for a period of one year in
the five years immediately preceding January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of health must recommend
adoption, amendment, and repeal of rules it deems necessary to
administer and enforce this act. The rules must be in accordance, and
not inconsistent, with the provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2014.

--- END ---