BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.71.030 and 2012 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the limitation on damages under RCW 7.71.020 and P.L. 99-660
Sec. 411(1) does not apply, this section shall provide the exclusive
((remedy)) remedies in any lawsuit by a health care provider for any
action taken by a professional peer review body of health care
providers as defined in RCW 7.70.020((, that is found to be based on
matters not related to the competence or professional conduct of a
health care provider)).
(2) ((Actions)) Remedies shall be limited to appropriate injunctive
relief, and damages shall be allowed only for lost earnings directly
attributable to the action taken by the professional peer review body,
incurred between the date of such action and the date the action is
functionally reversed by the professional peer review body.
(3) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs shall be awarded if
approved by the court under RCW 7.71.035.
(4) The statute of limitations for actions under this section shall
be one year from the date of the action of the professional peer review
body.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.41.200 and 2007 c 273 s 22 and 2007 c 261 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the
responsibility to review the services rendered in the hospital, both
retrospectively and prospectively, in order to improve the quality of
medical care of patients and to prevent medical malpractice. The
committee shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise hospital policies and procedures;
(b) A process, including a medical staff privileges sanction
procedure which must be conducted substantially in accordance with
medical staff bylaws and applicable rules, regulations, or policies of
the medical staff through which credentials, physical and mental
capacity, professional conduct including disruptive behavior, and
competence in delivering health care services initially and are
periodically thereafter reviewed as part of an evaluation of staff
privileges;
(c) ((The)) A process for the initial and periodic review of the
credentials, physical and mental capacity, professional conduct
including disruptive behavior, and competence in delivering health care
services of all ((persons)) other health care providers who are
employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients including health care-associated
infections as defined in RCW 43.70.056, patient grievances,
professional liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by
the hospital for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement
activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, infection control, staff
responsibility to report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of
patient care, improved communication with patients, and causes of
malpractice claims for staff personnel engaged in patient care
activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the
purposes of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in
substantial good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon
a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the
information shared was knowingly false or deliberately misleading.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a
quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure,
except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into
evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a
meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation,
collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for
the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil
action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and
information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection
does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the
identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of
the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality
improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any
person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of
such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired
independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health
care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that
individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence
information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees
regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action,
disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care
and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission or the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit
the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges
are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make
accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be
respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality
improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250
with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs
maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510, a
coordinated quality improvement committee maintained by an ambulatory
surgical facility under RCW 70.230.070, a quality assurance committee
maintained in accordance with RCW 18.20.390 or 74.42.640, or a peer
review committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality
of health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter
70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to
the sharing of individually identifiable patient information held by a
coordinated quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to
implement this section shall meet the requirements of applicable
federal and state privacy laws. Information and documents disclosed by
one coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated
quality improvement program or a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250 and any information and documents created or maintained as a
result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject
to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (3) of this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8),
74.42.640 (7) and (9), and 4.24.250.
(9) A hospital that operates a nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010 may conduct quality improvement activities for both the
hospital and the nursing home through a quality improvement committee
under this section, and such activities shall be subject to the
provisions of subsections (2) through (8) of this section.
(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

--- END ---