BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If, at the time of a referral for an evaluation of competency
to stand trial in a jail for an in-custody defendant, the department
has not met its performance target for timely completion of competency
evaluations under RCW 10.77.068(1)(a)(ii) during the most recent
quarter in fifty percent of cases submitted by the referring county, as
documented in the most recent quarterly report under RCW 10.77.068(3)
or confirmed by records maintained by the department, the state shall
reimburse the county for the cost of appointing a qualified expert or
professional person under RCW 10.77.060(1)(a) as provided in this
section.
(2) Appointment of a qualified expert or professional person under
this section must be from a list of qualified experts or professional
persons assembled with participation by representatives of the
prosecuting attorney and the defense bar of the county.
(3) A qualified expert or professional person appointed by a court
for an indigent person under this section must be compensated for
competency evaluations in an amount that will encourage in-depth
evaluation reports. The department must reimburse the county in an
amount determined by the department to be fair and reasonable with the
county paying any excess costs. The amount of reimbursement
established by the department must at least meet the equivalent amount
for evaluations conducted by the department.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes either party from objecting
to the appointment of an evaluator on the basis that an inpatient
evaluation is appropriate under RCW 10.77.060(1)(d).
(5) This section expires June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Within current resources, the office of the
state human resources director shall gather market salary data related
to psychologists and psychiatrists employed by the department of social
and health services and department of corrections and report to the
governor and relevant committees of the legislature by June 30, 2013.

--- END ---