BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state
has an interest in ensuring that children are supported by their
parents. It benefits the children and the state for the state to have
an effective child support enforcement program. Therefore, the
legislature intends to create new tools to increase the collection of
child support obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a gambling payment intercept
program to require licensees to withhold payments from winning players
who owe past due child support.
(2)(a) The department shall develop and maintain a gambling payment
intercept registry to allow licensees to determine if a winning player
owes past due child support.
(b) Information accessed through the registry is confidential.
Licensees shall not use information obtained from the registry except
as needed for the gambling payment intercept program and are subject to
criminal penalties for the misuse of information as provided in RCW
26.23.120.
(3) If a licensee is required to file Form W-2G or a substantially
equivalent form with the internal revenue service for a winning player
who owes past due child support, before the payment of winnings from
any gambling activity, the licensee:
(a) May deduct and retain an administrative fee in the amount of
the lesser of three percent of the amount of past due child support
withheld under (b) of this subsection; or one hundred dollars. If
funds are available, the administrative fee shall be in addition to the
amounts withheld in (b) of this subsection;
(b) Shall withhold the amount of past due child support owed from
the winnings and within twenty-four hours, transmit the amount
withheld; the full name, address, and social security number of the
obligor parent; and the date, amount of payment, and location of the
licensee to the department;
(c) Shall issue the obligor parent a receipt in a form prescribed
by the department with the total amount withheld for past due child
support and any administrative fee.
(4) Within two business days of receiving the withheld funds from
the licensee, the department shall notify the obligor parent at the
address provided by the licensee that the department intends to offset
the obligor parent's past due child support with the winnings and
provide the obligor parent with an opportunity to object.
(5) A licensee that makes payment under this section is not liable
to the person to whom the winner owes an outstanding debt.
(6) As used in this section, "licensee" means a licensee under
chapter 9.46 RCW, a class 1 association licensed to conduct parimutuel
wagering under RCW 67.16.105(2), or an operator of an advance deposit
wagering system licensed under RCW 67.16.260.
(7) The department shall work with the Washington state gambling
commission to include participation in the gambling payment intercept
program when the commission is negotiating tribal gaming compacts with
the tribes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any licensee authorized to conduct a gambling activity under
this chapter shall participate in the gambling payment intercept
program as required by section 2 of this act.
(b) Any licensee who fails to comply with section 2 of this act may
be subject to suspension of its license or monetary penalties under
this chapter.
(2) The commission shall consider the gambling payment intercept
program as provided in section 2 of this act as an element to be
negotiated with federally recognized Indian tribes as provided in RCW
9.46.360.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any class 1 association licensed to conduct parimutuel wagering
under RCW 67.16.105(2) and any operator of an advance deposit wagering
system licensed under RCW 67.16.260 shall participate in the gambling
payment intercept program as required by section 2 of this act.
(2) A licensee who fails to comply with section 2 of this act may
be subject to penalties as provided in RCW 67.16.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---