BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall complete a study of the potential to
divert ambulances to urgent care facilities when appropriate. The
department may convene a stakeholder group including the ambulance
service providers, emergency department providers, urgent care
facilities, and insurance carriers. The study must be provided to the
health committees of the legislature by October 1, 2013, and must
include recommendations on any statutory changes needed.
(2) This section expires August 1, 2014.

--- END ---