BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
prescription monitoring program was created in 2007 to improve patient
care and stop prescription drug misuse by collecting records for
Schedule II, III, IV, and V drugs prescribed in this state.
Information on these controlled substances is made available to medical
providers and pharmacists as a patient safety tool. Under the
prescription monitoring program, practitioners have access to the
controlled substance history of the patient before a prescription is
issued or dispensed. This helps to prevent overdoses and misuse, and
promotes referrals for pain management and for treatment of addiction.
(2) The legislature further finds that emergency departments across
the nation are facing increases in utilization from a variety of
pressures. Much of this increased utilization stems from the inability
to appropriately care for a growing population of disenfranchised,
repeat, or treatment-reluctant patients. This trend demands that
emergency departments adapt with better and more coordinated care
strategies.
(3) The legislature intends to address the needs of emergency
departments by exploring ways the prescription monitoring program may
be used to connect emergency departments and provide real-time
information to health care professionals in those facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health must by
December 1, 2013:
(a) Integrate the prescription monitoring program into the
coordinated care electronic tracking program developed in response to
section 213, chapter 7, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. commonly referred to
as the seven best practices in emergency medicine. This integration
must be done in real time and be pushed to the provider when a patient
registers in an emergency department.
(b) This integration must be done annually with the system that is
in place for the previously required information exchange mandated to
coordinate emergency department use, such exchange may be a private or
public joint venture.
(2) All insurers and third-party administrators that provide
coverage to residents of Washington state shall:
(a) Provide information regarding the assigned primary care
provider, their telephone number, and fax number to the coordinated
care electronic tracking program for real-time communication to an
emergency department provider when caring for a patient.
(b) Provide information regarding any available care plans or
treatment plans for patients with higher utilization of services on a
regular basis to the coordinated care electronic tracking program for
dissemination to the treating provider.
(3) Any provider of the coordinated care electronic tracking
program previously implemented as part of the seven best practices in
emergency medicine program shall by December 1, 2013:
(a) Integrate prescription monitoring program information into the
reports provided to medical providers in real-time in a format that is
identified collaboratively with the health care authority, Washington
state hospital association, Washington state medical association, the
Washington chapter of the American college of emergency physicians, and
other interested provider representatives.
(b) Develop a system for real-time notification of previously
identified primary care providers when a patient arrives in an
emergency department for care that includes:
(i) Provide contact phone number and information regarding the
location at which the patient is receiving care;
(ii) Provide status as a patient review and coordination program or
similar private plan designation as available to the system;
(iii) Provide any available care plans or treatment plans available
in the system;
(iv) Provide a summary of emergency department utilization as
provided to the emergency department in their communication; and
(v) Provide a summary of the prescription of controlled substances
as provided to the treating provider in the emergency department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 1, 2014.

--- END ---