BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state energy policy is to reduce the need to import oil from foreign
countries to meet the energy needs of Washington citizens and to
protect the environment from the release of excessive carbon monoxide
and ozone depleting compounds. Pellets made from wood shavings and
sawdust offer an outstanding opportunity to reduce the need to import
oil from foreign countries and also provide significant environmental
improvements over traditional fuels such as heating oil and natural
gas. Wood pellets produce a smaller volume of hydrocarbons, methane,
and carbon dioxide when burned in approved pellet heating devices. The
carbon dioxide that is released when densified wood pellets are burned
is considered to be carbon neutral. This fuel does not add to carbon
in the atmosphere. When natural gas or fuel oil is burned, carbon
dioxide that has been out of circulation for thousands of years is
released, which is perceived as a net increase in the atmospheric
carbon dioxide concentration. The legislature further finds that
densified wood biomass pellets are a very cost effective fuel source
for efficient space heating in homes and buildings and for heating
water. The legislature further finds that Washington state has a very
large supply of raw materials that are highly suitable for the
manufacturing of densified biomass wood pellets. The legislature
further finds that prudently managed public lands and forests are an
outstanding source of material needed to produce densified biomass wood
pellets and will reduce the release of ozone depleting methane from
decaying wood debris. The legislature further finds that the
Washington State University extension energy program recommended in
2012 that existing tax incentives for biomass fuels be extended to
support the development of the densified biomass wood pellet industry.
The legislature declares that densified biomass wood pellets are a
renewable energy fuel and enacts the Washington state renewable energy
space heating act to encourage the increased use, and increased
production, of densified biomass wood pellets and the development and
installation of densified biomass wood pellet space heating and water
heating devices.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.325.010 and 2009 c 565 s 41 and 2009 c 451 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative fuel" means all products or energy sources used to
propel motor vehicles, other than conventional gasoline, diesel, or
reformulated gasoline. "Alternative fuel" includes, but is not limited
to, cellulose, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas,
compressed natural gas, biofuels, biodiesel fuel, E85 motor fuel, fuels
containing seventy percent or more by volume of alcohol fuel, fuels
that are derived from biomass, hydrogen fuel, anhydrous ammonia fuel,
nonhazardous motor fuel, or electricity, excluding onboard electric
generation.
(2) "Applicant" means the state and any political subdivision of
the state, including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special
purpose districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations. "Applicant" may also include federally recognized
tribes, state institutions of higher education with appropriate
research capabilities, any organization described in section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code, and private entities that are eligible to
receive federal funds.
(3) "Assistance" includes loans, leases, product purchases, or
other forms of financial or technical assistance.
(4) "Biofuel" includes, but is not limited to, biodiesel, ethanol,
and ethanol blend fuels and renewable liquid natural gas or liquid
compressed natural gas made from biogas.
(5) "Biogas" includes waste gases derived from landfills and
wastewater treatment plants and dairy and farm wastes.
(6) "Cellulose" means lignocellulosic, hemicellulosic, or other
cellulosic matter that is available on a renewable or recurring basis,
including dedicated energy crops and trees, wood and wood residues,
plants, grasses, agricultural residues, fibers, animal wastes and other
waste materials, and municipal solid waste.
(7) "Coordinator" means the person appointed by the director of the
department of commerce.
(8) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.
(10) "Energy efficiency improvement" means an installation or
modification that is designed to reduce energy consumption. The term
includes, but is not limited to: Insulation; storm windows and doors;
automatic energy control systems; energy efficiency audits; heating,
ventilating, or air conditioning and distribution system modifications
or replacements in buildings or central plants; caulking and weather
stripping; energy recovery systems; geothermal heat pumps; and day
lighting systems.
(11) "Green highway zone" means an area in the state designated by
the department that is within reasonable proximity of state route
number 5, state route number 90, and state route number 82.
(12) "Innovative energy technology" means, but is not limited to,
the following: Smart grid or smart metering; biogas from landfills,
wastewater treatment plants, anaerobic digesters, or other processes;
wave or tidal power; fuel cells; high efficiency cogeneration; the use
of renewable energy improvements to heat buildings; and energy storage
systems.
(13) "Peer review committee" means a board, appointed by the
director, that includes bioenergy specialists, energy conservation
specialists, scientists, and individuals with specific recognized
expertise.
(14) "Project" includes: (a) The construction of facilities,
including the purchase of equipment, to convert farm products or wastes
into electricity or gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts
associated with such conversion; (b) clean energy projects identified
by the clean energy leadership council, created in section 2, chapter
318, Laws of 2009; and (c) energy efficiency improvements, renewable
energy improvements, or innovative energy technologies. These
specifically include fixed or mobile facilities to generate electricity
or methane from the anaerobic digestion of organic matter, and fixed or
mobile facilities for extracting oils from canola, rape, mustard, and
other oilseeds. "Project" may also include the construction of
facilities associated with such conversion for the distribution and
storage of such feedstocks and fuels. The definition of project does
not apply to projects as described in RCW 43.325.020(5).
(15) "Renewable energy improvements" means a fixture, product,
system, device, or interacting group of devices that produces energy
from renewable resources. The term includes, but is not limited to:
Photovoltaic systems; solar thermal systems; small wind systems;
biomass systems; densified biomass wood fuel and associated heating
appliances for the thermal heating of buildings; and geothermal
systems.
(16) "Refueling project" means the construction of new alternative
fuel refueling facilities, as well as upgrades and expansion of
existing refueling facilities, that will enable these facilities to
offer alternative fuels to the public.
(17) "Research and development project" means research and
development, by an institution of higher education as defined in
subsection (2) of this section, relating to:
(a) Bioenergy sources including but not limited to biomass and
associated gases; or
(b) The development of markets for bioenergy coproducts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director shall prepare a report to
the legislature by December 1, 2013, on recommendations to expand the
use of densified biomass wood pellets and associated heating appliances
for the thermal heating of buildings and heating water. The department
shall consult with individuals actively working in the densified
biomass wood pellet industry and individuals actively working in the
industry that develops and produces heating appliances for thermal
heating of buildings and heating water. The department shall also
consult with the Washington State University extension energy program,
as well as other resources as determined by the department, in
preparing the report and the department's recommendations.
(2) The definitions in RCW 43.325.010 apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act expires June 30, 2014.

--- END ---