BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.35.202 and 2012 c 229 s 810 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of trustees of Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, and Western Washington University may offer
educational specialist degrees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The board of trustees of The Evergreen State College may offer
educational specialist degrees.

--- END ---