BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.04.420 and 2009 c 554 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The college board may, subject to appropriation from the
legislature or from funds made available from any other public or
private source and pursuant to rules adopted by the college board with
the advice of the workforce training customer advisory committee
established in RCW 28C.04.390, provide job skills grants to educational
institutions. The job skills grants shall be used exclusively for
programs which are consistent with the job skills program. The college
board shall work in collaboration with the workforce training customer
advisory committee established in RCW 28C.04.390 to assure that:
(1) The program is within the scope of the job skills program under
this chapter and may reasonably be expected to succeed and thereby
increase employment within the state;
(2) Provision has been made to use any available alternative
funding from local, state, and federal sources;
(3) The job skills grant will only be used to cover the costs
associated with the program;
(4) The program will not unnecessarily duplicate existing programs
and could not be provided by another educational institution more
effectively or efficiently;
(5) The program involves an area of skills training and education
for which there is a demonstrable need;
(6) The applicant has made provisions for the use of existing
federal and state resources for student financial assistance;
(7) The job skills grant is essential to the success of the program
as the resources of the applicant are inadequate to attract the
technical assistance and financial support necessary for the program
from business and industry;
(8) The program represents a collaborative partnership between
business, industry, labor, educational institutions, and other
partners, as appropriate;
(9)(a) The commitment of financial support from businesses ((and
industry)) with an annual gross business income of five hundred
thousand dollars or more shall be equal to or greater than the amount
of the requested job skills grant;
(b) The commitment of financial support from businesses with an
annual gross business income of less than five hundred thousand dollars
shall be equal to the trainees' salaries and benefits while in
training;
(c) The annual gross business income shall be the income reported
to the department of revenue for the previous fiscal year;
(10) The job skills program gives priority to applications:
(a) Proposing training that ((leads to transferable skills that are
interchangeable among different jobs, employers, or workplaces))
provides college credit or leads to a recognized industry credential;
(b) From firms in strategic industry clusters as identified by the
state or local areas;
(c) Proposing coordination with other cluster-based programs or
initiatives including, but not limited to, industry skill panels,
centers of excellence, innovation partnership zones, state-supported
cluster growth grants, and local cluster-based economic development
initiatives;
(d) ((Proposing industry-based credentialing)) From consortia of
colleges;
(e) From consortia of firms; and
(((e))) (f) Proposing increased capacity for educational
institutions that can be made available to industry and students beyond
the grant recipients;
(11) Binding commitments have been made to the college board by the
applicant for adequate reporting of information and data regarding the
program to the college board, particularly information concerning the
recruitment and employment of trainees and students, and including a
requirement for an annual or other periodic audit of the books of the
applicant directly related to the program, and for such control on the
part of the college board as it considers prudent over the management
of the program, so as to protect the use of public funds, including, in
the discretion of the ((commission)) college board and without
limitation, right of access to financial and other records of the
applicant directly related to the programs; and
(12) A provision has been made by the applicant to work, in
cooperation with the employment security department, to identify and
screen potential trainees, and that provision has been made by the
applicant for the participation as trainees of low-income persons
including temporary assistance for needy families recipients,
dislocated workers, and persons from minority and economically
disadvantaged groups to participate in the program.
Beginning ((October 1, 1999)) January 1, 2014, and every ((two))
year((s)) thereafter, the college board shall provide the legislature
and the governor with a report describing the activities and outcomes
of the state job skills program.

--- END ---