BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the goals of
the child welfare system are the safety, permanence, and well-being of
the children it serves. The legislature further recognizes the
importance of background checks conducted by the department of social
and health services to assess an individual's character, suitability,
and competence to determine whether an individual is appropriate to be
provided a license under chapter 74.13 RCW or have unsupervised access
to children. The legislature does not intend to change the current
secretary of social and health services' list of crimes and negative
actions. However, the legislature believes that either an unreasonable
delay in a determination of whether to approve or deny a license under
chapter 74.13 RCW or unsupervised access to children, when such
unreasonable delay or denial is based solely on a crime or civil
infraction not directly related to child safety, is not appropriate and
is not in the best interest of the children being served by the child
welfare system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In determining the character, suitability, and competence of an
individual, the department may not:
(a) Deny or delay a license or approval of unsupervised access to
children to an individual solely because of a crime or civil infraction
involving the individual or entity revealed in the background check
process that is not on the secretary's list of crimes and negative
actions and is not related directly to child safety; or
(b) Delay the issuance of a license or approval of unsupervised
access to children by requiring the individual to obtain records
relating to a crime or civil infraction revealed in the background
check process that is not on the secretary's list of crimes and
negative actions and is not related directly to child safety and is not
a permanent disqualifier pursuant to department rule.
(2) If the department determines that an individual does not
possess the character, suitability, or competence to provide care or
have unsupervised access to a child, it must provide the reasons for
its decision in writing with copies of the records or documents related
to its decision to the individual within ten days of making the
decision.
(3) For purposes of this section, "individual" means a relative as
defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), an "other suitable person" under
chapter 13.34 RCW, a person pursuing licensing as a foster parent, or
a person employed or seeking employment by a business or organization
licensed by the department or with whom the department has a contract
to provide care, supervision, case management, or treatment of children
in the care of the department. "Individual" does not include long-term
care workers defined in RCW 74.39A.009(17)(a) whose background checks
are conducted as provided in RCW 74.39A.056.
(4) The department may not be held civilly liable based upon its
decision to grant unsupervised access to children if the background
information it relied upon at the time the decision was made did not
indicate that child safety would be a concern.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall charge a fee to process a request made by an
out-of-state jurisdiction for an individual's child abuse or neglect
history in this state or other background history on the individual
possessed by the department. All proceeds from the fees collected must
go directly to aiding the cost associated with the department
conducting background checks.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.020 and 2012 c 205 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Case management" means convening family meetings, developing,
revising, and monitoring implementation of any case plan or individual
service and safety plan, coordinating and monitoring services needed by
the child and family, caseworker-child visits, family visits, and the
assumption of court-related duties, excluding legal representation,
including preparing court reports, attending judicial hearings and
permanency hearings, and ensuring that the child is progressing toward
permanency within state and federal mandates, including the Indian
child welfare act.
(2) "Child" means:
(a) A person less than eighteen years of age; or
(b) A person age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to
receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW
74.13.031.
(3) "Child protective services" has the same meaning as in RCW
26.44.020.
(4) "Child welfare services" means social services including
voluntary and in-home services, out-of-home care, case management, and
adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or substitute for,
parental care and supervision for the purpose of:
(a) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of
problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect,
abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;
(b) Protecting and caring for dependent, abused, or neglected
children;
(c) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and
assisting parents who are in conflict with their children, with
services designed to resolve such conflicts;
(d) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the
strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;
(e) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in
foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or
facilities.
"Child welfare services" does not include child protection
services.
(5) "Committee" means the child welfare transformation design
committee.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other
support services the department is authorized to provide to foster
children. These services include, but are not limited to, placement in
licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised
independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs;
independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or
treatment.
(8) "Measurable effects" means a statistically significant change
which occurs as a result of the service or services a supervising
agency is assigned in a performance-based contract, in time periods
established in the contract.
(9) "Out-of-home care services" means services provided after the
shelter care hearing to or for children in out-of-home care, as that
term is defined in RCW 13.34.030, and their families, including the
recruitment, training, and management of foster parents, the
recruitment of adoptive families, and the facilitation of the adoption
process, family reunification, independent living, emergency shelter,
residential group care, and foster care, including relative placement.
(10) "Performance-based contracting" means the structuring of all
aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work
to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements
set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable
outcomes. Contracts shall also include provisions that link the
performance of the contractor to the level and timing of reimbursement.
(11) "Permanency services" means long-term services provided to
secure a child's safety, permanency, and well-being, including foster
care services, family reunification services, adoption services, and
preparation for independent living services.
(12) "Primary prevention services" means services which are
designed and delivered for the primary purpose of enhancing child and
family well-being and are shown, by analysis of outcomes, to reduce the
risk to the likelihood of the initial need for child welfare services.
(13) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state
under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe
located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a
performance-based contract with the department to provide case
management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare
services, as defined in this section. This definition is applicable on
or after December 30, 2015.
(14) "Unsupervised" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.43.830.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.020 and 2012 c 259 s 7 and 2012 c 205 s 12 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Case management" means convening family meetings, developing,
revising, and monitoring implementation of any case plan or individual
service and safety plan, coordinating and monitoring services needed by
the child and family, caseworker-child visits, family visits, and the
assumption of court-related duties, excluding legal representation,
including preparing court reports, attending judicial hearings and
permanency hearings, and ensuring that the child is progressing toward
permanency within state and federal mandates, including the Indian
child welfare act.
(2) "Child" means:
(a) A person less than eighteen years of age; or
(b) A person age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to
receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW
74.13.031.
(3) "Child protective services" has the same meaning as in RCW
26.44.020.
(4) "Child welfare services" means social services including
voluntary and in-home services, out-of-home care, case management, and
adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or substitute for,
parental care and supervision for the purpose of:
(a) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of
problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect,
abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;
(b) Protecting and caring for dependent, abused, or neglected
children;
(c) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and
assisting parents who are in conflict with their children, with
services designed to resolve such conflicts;
(d) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the
strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;
(e) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in
foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or
facilities.
"Child welfare services" does not include child protection
services.
(5) "Committee" means the child welfare transformation design
committee.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other
support services the department is authorized to provide to foster
children. These services include, but are not limited to, placement in
licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised
independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs;
independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or
treatment.
(8) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child
safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths
and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family
assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse
or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to
address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent
maltreatment.
(9) "Measurable effects" means a statistically significant change
which occurs as a result of the service or services a supervising
agency is assigned in a performance-based contract, in time periods
established in the contract.
(10) "Out-of-home care services" means services provided after the
shelter care hearing to or for children in out-of-home care, as that
term is defined in RCW 13.34.030, and their families, including the
recruitment, training, and management of foster parents, the
recruitment of adoptive families, and the facilitation of the adoption
process, family reunification, independent living, emergency shelter,
residential group care, and foster care, including relative placement.
(11) "Performance-based contracting" means the structuring of all
aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work
to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements
set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable
outcomes. Contracts shall also include provisions that link the
performance of the contractor to the level and timing of reimbursement.
(12) "Permanency services" means long-term services provided to
secure a child's safety, permanency, and well-being, including foster
care services, family reunification services, adoption services, and
preparation for independent living services.
(13) "Primary prevention services" means services which are
designed and delivered for the primary purpose of enhancing child and
family well-being and are shown, by analysis of outcomes, to reduce the
risk to the likelihood of the initial need for child welfare services.
(14) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state
under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe
located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a
performance-based contract with the department to provide case
management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare
services, as defined in this section. This definition is applicable on
or after December 30, 2015.
(15) "Unsupervised" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.43.830.

Sec. 6 RCW 13.34.065 and 2011 c 309 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When a child is taken into custody, the court shall hold a
shelter care hearing within seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays. The primary purpose of the shelter care hearing
is to determine whether the child can be immediately and safely
returned home while the adjudication of the dependency is pending.
(b) Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is
unable to attend the shelter care hearing may request that a subsequent
shelter care hearing be scheduled. The request shall be made to the
clerk of the court where the petition is filed prior to the initial
shelter care hearing. Upon the request of the parent, the court shall
schedule the hearing within seventy-two hours of the request, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall notify all other
parties of the hearing by any reasonable means.
(2)(a) If it is likely that the child will remain in shelter care
longer than seventy-two hours, in those areas in which child welfare
services are being provided by a supervising agency, the supervising
agency shall assume case management responsibilities of the case. The
department or supervising agency shall submit a recommendation to the
court as to the further need for shelter care in all cases in which the
child will remain in shelter care longer than the seventy-two hour
period. In all other cases, the recommendation shall be submitted by
the juvenile court probation counselor.
(b) All parties have the right to present testimony to the court
regarding the need or lack of need for shelter care.
(c) Hearsay evidence before the court regarding the need or lack of
need for shelter care must be supported by sworn testimony, affidavit,
or declaration of the person offering such evidence.
(3)(a) At the commencement of the hearing, the court shall notify
the parent, guardian, or custodian of the following:
(i) The parent, guardian, or custodian has the right to a shelter
care hearing;
(ii) The nature of the shelter care hearing, the rights of the
parents, and the proceedings that will follow; and
(iii) If the parent, guardian, or custodian is not represented by
counsel, the right to be represented. If the parent, guardian, or
custodian is indigent, the court shall appoint counsel as provided in
RCW 13.34.090; and
(b) If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian desires to waive the
shelter care hearing, the court shall determine, on the record and with
the parties present, whether such waiver is knowing and voluntary. A
parent may not waive his or her right to the shelter care hearing
unless he or she appears in court and the court determines that the
waiver is knowing and voluntary. Regardless of whether the court
accepts the parental waiver of the shelter care hearing, the court must
provide notice to the parents of their rights required under (a) of
this subsection and make the finding required under subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) At the shelter care hearing the court shall examine the need
for shelter care and inquire into the status of the case. The
paramount consideration for the court shall be the health, welfare, and
safety of the child. At a minimum, the court shall inquire into the
following:
(a) Whether the notice required under RCW 13.34.062 was given to
all known parents, guardians, or legal custodians of the child. The
court shall make an express finding as to whether the notice required
under RCW 13.34.062 was given to the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian. If actual notice was not given to the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian and the whereabouts of such person is known or can be
ascertained, the court shall order the department to make reasonable
efforts to advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the
status of the case, including the date and time of any subsequent
hearings, and their rights under RCW 13.34.090;
(b) Whether the child can be safely returned home while the
adjudication of the dependency is pending;
(c) What efforts have been made to place the child with a relative.
The court shall ask the parents whether the department discussed with
them the placement of the child with a relative or other suitable
person described in RCW 13.34.130(1)(b) and shall determine what
efforts have been made toward such a placement;
(d) What services were provided to the family to prevent or
eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home. If
the dependency petition or other information before the court alleges
that homelessness or the lack of suitable housing was a significant
factor contributing to the removal of the child, the court shall
inquire as to whether housing assistance was provided to the family to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child or children;
(e) Is the placement proposed by the department or supervising
agency the least disruptive and most family-like setting that meets the
needs of the child;
(f) Whether it is in the best interest of the child to remain
enrolled in the school, developmental program, or child care the child
was in prior to placement and what efforts have been made to maintain
the child in the school, program, or child care if it would be in the
best interest of the child to remain in the same school, program, or
child care;
(g) Appointment of a guardian ad litem or attorney;
(h) Whether the child is or may be an Indian child as defined in
RCW 13.38.040, whether the provisions of the federal Indian child
welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW apply, and whether there is compliance
with the federal Indian child welfare act and chapter 13.38 RCW,
including notice to the child's tribe;
(i) Whether, as provided in RCW 26.44.063, restraining orders, or
orders expelling an allegedly abusive household member from the home of
a nonabusive parent, guardian, or legal custodian, will allow the child
to safely remain in the home;
(j) Whether any orders for examinations, evaluations, or immediate
services are needed. The court may not order a parent to undergo
examinations, evaluation, or services at the shelter care hearing
unless the parent agrees to the examination, evaluation, or service;
(k) The terms and conditions for parental, sibling, and family
visitation.
(5)(a) The court shall release a child alleged to be dependent to
the care, custody, and control of the child's parent, guardian, or
legal custodian unless the court finds there is reasonable cause to
believe that:
(i) After consideration of the specific services that have been
provided, reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the
need for removal of the child from the child's home and to make it
possible for the child to return home; and
(ii)(A) The child has no parent, guardian, or legal custodian to
provide supervision and care for such child; or
(B) The release of such child would present a serious threat of
substantial harm to such child, notwithstanding an order entered
pursuant to RCW 26.44.063; or
(C) The parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the child could be
released has been charged with violating RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.
(b) If the court does not release the child to his or her parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, the court shall order placement with a
relative or other suitable person as described in RCW 13.34.130(1)(b),
unless there is reasonable cause to believe the health, safety, or
welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that the efforts to
reunite the parent and child will be hindered. If such relative or
other suitable person appears otherwise suitable and competent to
provide care and treatment, the criminal history background check need
not be completed before placement, but as soon as possible after
placement. The court must also determine whether placement with the
relative or other suitable person is in the child's best interests.
The relative or other suitable person must be willing and available to:
(i) Care for the child and be able to meet any special needs of the
child;
(ii) Facilitate the child's visitation with siblings, if such
visitation is part of the supervising agency's plan or is ordered by
the court; and
(iii) Cooperate with the department or supervising agency in
providing necessary background checks and home studies.
(c) If the child was not initially placed with a relative or other
suitable person, and the court does not release the child to his or her
parent, guardian, or legal custodian, the supervising agency shall make
reasonable efforts to locate a relative or other suitable person
pursuant to RCW 13.34.060(1). In determining placement, the court
shall weigh the child's length of stay and attachment to the current
provider in determining what is in the best interest of the child.
(d) If a relative or other suitable person is not available, the
court shall order continued shelter care and shall set forth its
reasons for the order. If the court orders placement of the child with
a person not related to the child and not licensed to provide foster
care, the placement is subject to all terms and conditions of this
section that apply to relative placements.
(e) Any placement with a relative, or other suitable person
approved by the court pursuant to this section, shall be contingent
upon cooperation with the department's or supervising agency's case
plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders
regarding parent-child contacts, sibling contacts, and any other
conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance with the case plan or
court order is grounds for removal of the child from the home of the
relative or other suitable person, subject to review by the court.
(f) Uncertainty by a parent, guardian, legal custodian, relative,
or other suitable person that the alleged abuser has in fact abused the
child shall not, alone, be the basis upon which a child is removed from
the care of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian under (a) of this
subsection, nor shall it be a basis, alone, to preclude placement with
a relative or other suitable person under (b) of this subsection.
(6)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section shall
include the requirement for a case conference as provided in RCW
13.34.067. However, if the parent is not present at the shelter care
hearing, or does not agree to the case conference, the court shall not
include the requirement for the case conference in the shelter care
order.
(b) If the court orders a case conference, the shelter care order
shall include notice to all parties and establish the date, time, and
location of the case conference which shall be no later than thirty
days before the fact-finding hearing.
(c) The court may order another conference, case staffing, or
hearing as an alternative to the case conference required under RCW
13.34.067 so long as the conference, case staffing, or hearing ordered
by the court meets all requirements under RCW 13.34.067, including the
requirement of a written agreement specifying the services to be
provided to the parent.
(7)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section may be
amended at any time with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care
decision of placement shall be modified only upon a showing of change
in circumstances. No child may be placed in shelter care for longer
than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge, authorizing
continued shelter care.
(b)(i) An order releasing the child on any conditions specified in
this section may at any time be amended, with notice and hearing
thereon, so as to return the child to shelter care for failure of the
parties to conform to the conditions originally imposed.
(ii) The court shall consider whether nonconformance with any
conditions resulted from circumstances beyond the control of the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian and give weight to that fact
before ordering return of the child to shelter care.
(8)(a) If a child is returned home from shelter care a second time
in the case, or if the supervisor of the caseworker deems it necessary,
the multidisciplinary team may be reconvened.
(b) If a child is returned home from shelter care a second time in
the case a law enforcement officer must be present and file a report to
the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The legislature finds that any person
who has had a founded finding of child abuse or neglect or has been
involved in a dependency action involving one or more of his or her
children is able to turn his or her life around and establish good
parenting relationships with his or her children. Unfortunately, his
or her prior involvement with child protective services or the
dependency court can hamper such a person's ability to find future
employment, especially if the employment involves unsupervised access
to children or other vulnerable populations.
(2) The legislature further finds that a number of states permit
convicted offenders to seek a certificate of rehabilitation in certain
situations. Generally, the certificate declares that a convicted
individual is rehabilitated after completing a prison sentence or being
released on parole or supervision. Usually, the applicant for a
certificate must prove that he or she has met certain criteria before
a certificate will be awarded. Such a certificate often restores
certain rights to the applicant and makes him or her eligible for
certain employment for which he or she would not be eligible without
the certificate.
(3) The department of social and health services shall convene a
work group to explore the possibility of creating a certificate of
suitability for any person who has turned his or her life around after
having been involved with child protective services or the dependency
system. The work group must contain, but not be limited to, persons
representing the following: The courts, veteran parents, parent
attorneys, foster parents, relative caregivers, kinship caregivers,
child-placing agencies, the attorney general's office, the governor's
policy office, the office of public defense parent representation
program, and the legislature. The work group shall explore the
following issues:
(a) The factors to consider in granting a certificate;
(b) The entity with the authority to grant the certificate;
(c) The process to be used to obtain such a certificate; and
(d) The effect such a certificate will have on employment or
volunteer work with vulnerable populations.
(4) The department of social and health services shall report the
work group's recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than December 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of social and health services
shall adopt all necessary rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 4 of this act expires December 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 5 of this act takes effect December
1, 2013.

--- END ---