BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.580 and 2004 c 17 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A tenant screening service provider may not (a) disclose a
tenant's, applicant's, or household member's status as a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or (b) knowingly
disclose that a tenant, applicant, or household member has previously
terminated a rental agreement under RCW 59.18.575.
(2) A landlord may not terminate a tenancy, fail to renew a
tenancy, or refuse to enter into a rental agreement based on the
tenant's or applicant's or a household member's status as a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or based on the tenant
or applicant having terminated a rental agreement under RCW 59.18.575.
(((2))) (3) A landlord who refuses to enter into a rental agreement
in violation of subsection (2) of this section may be liable to the
tenant or applicant in a civil action for damages sustained by the
tenant or applicant. The prevailing party may also recover court costs
and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(((3))) (4) It is a defense to an unlawful detainer action under
chapter 59.12 RCW that the action to remove the tenant and recover
possession of the premises is in violation of subsection (((1))) (2) of
this section.
(((4))) (5) This section does not prohibit adverse housing
decisions based upon other lawful factors within the landlord's
knowledge or prohibit volunteer disclosure by an applicant of any
victim circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---