BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that preserving a safe
and beneficial learning environment for all students requires the
establishment and enforcement of appropriate student discipline
policies. The legislature further finds that although physical
restraint and isolation of a student should be avoided, there may be
circumstances where school district boards of directors have authorized
these actions to preserve the safety of other students and school
staff. Nevertheless, if an incident of student restraint or isolation
occurs, school personnel should be held accountable for providing a
thorough explanation of the circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Isolation" means excluding a student from his or her regular
instructional area and restricting the student alone within a room or
any other form of enclosure.
(b) "Restraint" means physical intervention or force used to
control a student, including the use of a restraint device.
(c) "Restraint device" means a device used to assist in controlling
a student, including but not limited to metal handcuffs, plastic ties,
ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, pepper
spray, tasers, or batons.
(2) The provisions of this section apply to any restraint of a
student that results in a physical injury to a student or a staff
member, any restraint of a duration longer than two minutes, and any
isolation of a student. The provisions of this section apply to such
incidents of restraint or isolation that occur while the student is
participating in school-sponsored instruction or activities.
(3) The staff member who administered the restraint or isolation
must verbally inform the school principal or his or her designee as
soon as possible on the school day that the restraint or isolation
occurred and must file a written report with the principal or his or
her designee no later than the next school day. If the principal
administered the restraint or isolation, the principal must prepare and
file the written report. If a school resource officer or other law
enforcement official who is not an employee of the school district
administered the restraint or isolation, the principal or his or her
designee must prepare and file the written report.
(4) All written reports filed under this section must be maintained
by the school as an ongoing record. All written reports filed under
this section must be available for review on request, subject to
removal of information that would compromise the confidentiality and
privacy of any students involved in the incident.
(5) The principal or his or her designee must verbally inform the
student's parent or guardian of the restraint or isolation as soon as
possible, preferably on the school day that the restraint or isolation
occurred, and must send the written report to the parent or guardian,
postmarked no later than two school days following the restraint or
isolation. If the school or school district customarily provides the
parent or guardian with school-related information in a language other
than English, the written report under this section must be provided to
the parent or guardian in that language.
(6) All written reports of incidents of restraint or isolation
under this section must include the following:
(a) The date of the incident and the time the restraint or
isolation began and ended;
(b) The name and job title of the individual who administered the
restraint or isolation and any staff members who observed the incident;
the name of the principal or designee who was verbally informed of the
incident; and the time that he or she was so informed;
(c) A description of the activity in which the restrained or
isolated student and other students and staff members in the same room
or vicinity were engaged immediately before the incident occurred; the
behavior that prompted the restraint or isolation; the efforts made to
de-escalate the situation to avoid the restraint or isolation;
alternatives to restraint or isolation that were attempted; and the
justification for initiating a restraint or isolation; and
(d) In the case of a restraint, a description of the administration
of the restraint including the manner of restraint and the reason such
manner of restraint was necessary; the student's behavior and reactions
during the restraint; how the restraint ended; the type of injury to
the student or staff, if any, during the restraint; and any medical
care provided.
(7) In addition to the information required under subsection (6) of
this section, the written report of a restraint or isolation that is
sent to the student's parent or guardian must also include the
following:
(a) Information regarding any further action that the school has
taken or may take as a result of the incident that led to the restraint
or isolation, including any disciplinary sanctions that may be imposed
on the student; and
(b) Information regarding opportunities for the student's parents
or guardians to discuss with school officials the administration of the
restraint or isolation, any disciplinary sanctions that may be imposed
on the student, or any other related matter.
(8) If a restraint results in a physical injury to a student or a
staff member that requires medical attention, the school district must
file a copy of the written report under subsection (6) of this section
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction within five
working days of the administration of the restraint, as well as a copy
of the written reports for any other restraints under this section that
occurred during the previous thirty days.

--- END ---