BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public awareness
and understanding of mental health and mental illnesses is often
inaccurate or underdeveloped. Too often, families with children and
adults in need of assistance or treatment do not know where to go for
help or how to access mental health services. Teachers, coaches, and
others who come into regular contact with children often observe
concerning behavior but do not know whether or how to connect them with
appropriate interventions. To increase the well-being of people with
mental health issues, as well as increase the safety of the general
public, it is the legislature's intent to establish a comprehensive and
effective public awareness campaign to reduce the stigma of mental
illness, to aid in the early identification of those with mental health
issues, and to improve the prevention and intervention of serious
mental illnesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to funds appropriated for this
purpose, the department of social and health services, in collaboration
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
department of health, and the regional support networks, must develop
and conduct an ongoing public awareness and education campaign
regarding mental health and mental illness in both adults and children.
(2) The purpose of the campaign is to raise awareness and educate
families and the general public about the benefits of early
identification, appropriate referral, and appropriate treatment of
those with mental health issues.
(3) The department of social and health services must provide
information about the following:
(a) Mental health stigma and how it affects a person's ability to
achieve wellness and full social integration;
(b) Efficacy of mental health treatment and the importance of early
identification;
(c) Prevalence of mental health issues in adolescents and children;
(d) Factors that may cause or contribute to mental health issues;
and
(e) Recommendations for how to recognize mental illness and respond
appropriately.
(4) The department of social and health services must use multiple
communication strategies in the campaign depending on available funds,
including developing or using an existing interactive web site,
conducting community training, and disseminating informative print
materials.
(5) In addition to the collaboration described in subsection (1) of
this section, the department of social and health services must also
seek participation and input from mental health advocacy groups,
children and family nonprofit organizations, violence prevention
associations, and Washington's tribes or tribal organizations.
(6) The campaign must be proportional across the state and targeted
to reach persons from culturally and economically diverse backgrounds
who live in geographically isolated areas, who have low literacy skills
or limited ability in the English language, and who are part of special
populations, including the homeless and gay, lesbian, bisexual, and
transgender youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 71 RCW.

--- END ---