BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington supreme court order from
December 2012 directed the 2013 legislature to establish a phase-in
plan that addresses "all areas of K-12 education identified in ESHB
2261." While Substitute House Bill No. 2776 established the end goal
enhancements for portions of the new basic education obligations under
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2261, that legislation did not
establish the plan in which those enhancements would be phased-in over
time. The legislature intends to establish a linear phase-in plan for
funding the enhancements identified in Substitute House Bill No. 2776
but acknowledges that future legislatures may consider alternate
phase-in schedules to reflect legislative priorities and emerging
research. The legislature also recognizes that Substitute House Bill
No. 2776 did not establish 2018 enhancement values for the many other
components of the new prototypical funding formula and did not address
how funding for the increased instructional hours and credit hours
would be phased-in. It is the intent of the legislature to have
end-goal values and a complete phase-in plan for all the 2018 basic
education enhancements by the end of the 2013-2015 biennium after
reviewing the relevant work and recommendations of the quality
education council, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the compensation technical working group, and the
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee. As
a first step, additional initial enhancements are included that are
beyond those identified in Substitute House Bill No. 2776 and that are
targeted to those areas that support legislative reforms to provide
students the opportunity to be career and college ready. It is the
legislature's intent that the final 2018 values for the additional
enhancements also be adopted by the legislature by the end of the
2013-2015 biennium.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature((, but not before the 2014-15 school year)). Beginning in
the 2013-2015 biennium, the legislature shall begin a linear phase-in
of the funding enhancements necessary to accomplish the district-wide
eighty hour increase in instructional hours for students in grades
seven through twelve by 2018; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, subject to a phased-in
implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature. Beginning in the 2013-2015 biennium, the legislature
shall begin a linear phase-in of the funding enhancements necessary to
allow students the opportunity to graduate with twenty-four credits by
2018. Course distribution requirements may be established by the state
board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, effective May
1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of
the one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) ((During)) Beginning with the ((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 biennium
and beginning with schools with the highest percentage of students
eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, the
general education average class size for grades K-3 shall be reduced
((until the)) in a linear fashion each biennium in order to achieve an
average class size funded under this subsection (4) ((is)) of no more
than 17.0 full-time equivalent students per teacher ((beginning in)) by
the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
((1.116))
1.216
((1.909))
2.009

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family and community engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.00)) 0.10 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) ((During)) Beginning with the ((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 biennium,
the minimum allocation for maintenance, supplies, and operating costs
shall be increased ((as specified in the omnibus appropriations act))
in a linear fashion each biennium in order to achieve the 2015-16
allocation values by the 2015-16 school year. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, ((1.5156)) two
hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen
learning assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher in elementary school, six hours per week
in extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher in middle school, and eight hours per week
in extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher in high school. An additional three hours
per week of transition support shall be provided for each student for
two years after exiting the transitional bilingual instructional
program. Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection (10), the
actual per-student allocation may be scaled to provide a larger
allocation for students needing more intensive intervention and a
commensurate reduced allocation for students needing less intensive
intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(d) To provide additional allocations to support the increased
instructional hours requirements established under RCW
28A.150.220(2)(a), allocations must be based on the full-time
equivalent student enrollment in grades seven through twelve. The
minimum allocation for the programs must provide resources to provide,
on a statewide average, 2.220 hours per week in extra instruction with
fifteen eligible students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2012 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. ((During)) Beginning with the
((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 biennium, funding enhancements shall ((continue
to)) be phased-in each year ((until)) in a linear fashion each biennium
in order to achieve full statewide implementation of all-day
kindergarten is achieved in the 2017-18 school year. Once a school
receives funding for the all-day kindergarten program, that school
shall remain eligible for funding in subsequent school years regardless
of changes in the school's percentage of students eligible for free and
reduced-price lunches as long as other program requirements are
fulfilled. Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten
program support shall agree to the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2)(a) It is the intent of the legislature that administration of
the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills as required
in this subsection (2) and RCW 28A.655.080 replace administration of
other assessments being required by school districts or that other
assessments only be administered if they seek to obtain information not
covered by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(b) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section and to the extent funds are available, beginning with the 2011-12 school year on a voluntary basis, schools must identify the skills,
knowledge, and characteristics of kindergarten students at the
beginning of the school year in order to support social-emotional,
physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children;
support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform
instruction. Kindergarten teachers shall administer the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills, as directed by the
superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the
department of early learning and in collaboration with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership designated in RCW
43.215.070, and report the results to the superintendent. The
superintendent shall share the results with the director of the
department of early learning.
(c) School districts shall provide an opportunity for parents and
guardians to excuse their children from participation in the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.160.192 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall phase-in the
implementation of the distribution formula under this chapter for
allocating state funds to school districts for the transportation of
students to and from school. The phase-in shall ((begin no later than
the 2011-2013 biennium and)) be fully implemented by the end of the
2013-2015 biennium.
(a) The formula must be developed and revised on an ongoing basis
using the major cost factors in student transportation, including basic
and special student loads, school district land area, average distance
to school, roadway miles, and number of locations served. Factors must
include all those site characteristics that are statistically
significant after analysis of the data required by the revised
reporting process.
(b) The formula must allocate funds to school districts based on
the average predicted costs of transporting students to and from
school, using a regression analysis. Only factors that are
statistically significant shall be used in the regression analysis.
Employee compensation costs included in the allowable transportation
expenditures used for the purpose of establishing each school
district's independent variable in the regression analysis shall be
limited to the base salary or hourly wage rates, fringe benefit rates,
and applicable health care rates provided in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(2) During the phase-in period, funding provided to school
districts for student transportation operations shall be distributed on
the following basis:
(a) Annually, each school district shall receive the lesser of the
previous school year's pupil transportation operations allocation, or
the total of allowable pupil transportation expenditures identified on
the previous school year's final expenditure report to the state plus
district indirect expenses using the federal restricted indirect rate
as calculated in the district annual financial report;
(b) Annually, the amount identified in (a) of this subsection shall
be adjusted for any budgeted increases provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for salaries or fringe benefits;
(c) Annually, any funds appropriated by the legislature in excess
of the maintenance level funding amount for student transportation
shall be distributed among school districts on a prorated basis using
the difference between the amount identified in (a) adjusted by (b) of
this subsection and the amount determined under the formula in RCW
28A.160.180; and
(d) Allocations provided to recognize the cost of depreciation to
districts contracting with private carriers for student transportation
shall be deducted from the allowable transportation expenditures in (a)
of this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.405.106 and 2012 c 35 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose,)) The office
of the superintendent of public instruction must develop and make
available a professional development program to support the
implementation of the evaluation systems required by RCW 28A.405.100.
The program components may be organized into professional development
modules for principals, administrators, and teachers. The professional
development program shall include a comprehensive online training
package.
(2) The training program must include, but not be limited to, the
following topics:
(a) Introduction of the evaluation criteria for teachers and
principals and the four-level rating system;
(b) Orientation to and use of instructional frameworks;
(c) Orientation to and use of the leadership frameworks;
(d) Best practices in developing and using data in the evaluation
systems, including multiple measures, student growth data, classroom
observations, and other measures and evidence;
(e) Strategies for achieving maximum rater agreement;
(f) Evaluator feedback protocols in the evaluation systems;
(g) Examples of high quality teaching and leadership; and
(h) Methods to link the evaluation process to ongoing educator
professional development.
(3) To the maximum extent feasible, the professional development
program must incorporate or adapt existing online training or
curriculum, including securing materials or curriculum under contract
or purchase agreements within available funds. Multiple modes of
instruction should be incorporated including videos of classroom
teaching, participatory exercises, and other engaging combinations of
online audio, video, and print presentation.
(4) The professional development program must be developed in
modules that allow:
(a) Access to material over a reasonable number of training
sessions;
(b) Delivery in person or online; and
(c) Use in a self-directed manner.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
maintain a web site that includes the online professional development
materials along with sample evaluation forms and templates, links to
relevant research on evaluation and on high quality teaching and
leadership, samples of contract and collective bargaining language on
key topics, examples of multiple measures of teacher and principal
performance, suggestions for data to measure student growth, and other
tools that will assist school districts in implementing the revised
evaluation systems.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
identify the number of in-service training hours associated with each
professional development module and develop a way for users to document
their completion of the training. Documented completion of the
training under this section is considered approved in-service training
for the purposes of RCW 28A.415.020.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
periodically update the modules to reflect new topics and research on
performance evaluation so that the training serves as an ongoing source
of continuing education and professional development.
(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
work with the educational service districts to provide clearinghouse
services for the identification and publication of professional
development opportunities for teachers and principals that align with
performance evaluation criteria.
(9) The training program must be funded at a level that allows for
training of both principals and teachers on both an initial and ongoing
basis and provides for the development of a small team of staff from
each district on the appropriate use of student growth measures. The
training program must provide eight hours of training for every teacher
in the state.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.657.020 and 2010 c 235 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2010, and each year thereafter, by December 1st,
the superintendent of public instruction shall annually identify
schools as one of the state's persistently lowest-achieving schools if
the school is a Title I school, or a school that is eligible for but
does not receive Title I funds, that is among the lowest-achieving five
percent of Title I or Title I eligible schools in the state.
(2) The criteria for determining whether a school is among the
persistently lowest-achieving five percent of Title I schools, or Title
I eligible schools, under subsection (1) of this section shall be
established by the superintendent of public instruction. The criteria
must meet all applicable requirements for the receipt of a federal
school improvement grant under the American recovery and reinvestment
act of 2009 and Title I of the elementary and secondary education act
of 1965, and take into account both:
(a) The academic achievement of the "all students" group in a
school in terms of proficiency on the state's assessment, and any
alternative assessments, in reading and mathematics combined; and
(b) The school's lack of progress on the mathematics and reading
assessments over a number of years in the "all students" group.
(3) Beginning in 2013, and each year thereafter, as part of phase
II of the accountability system, schools that are not Title I schools
may be identified as one of the state's persistently lowest-achieving
schools by the superintendent of public instruction under the same
criteria established under the authority of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section and shall be eligible for state funding as provided in
this chapter. Non-Title I schools identified under this section are
subject to the same requirements under this chapter as Title I schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An English language arts instructional coach program is
authorized, which shall consist of an English language arts
instructional coach at each educational service district. The purpose
of the English language arts instructional coach program is to build
statewide capacity at the regional levels for implementing the new
common core standards in English language arts and enable all educators
within all programs to successfully support strong teaching and
learning in English language arts.
(2) Educational service districts shall carefully select the
individuals to perform the role of English language arts instructional
coach. Characteristics to be considered for a successful coach
include:
(a) Expertise in content area;
(b) Expertise in various instructional methodologies and
personalizing learning;
(c) Personal skills that include skilled listening, questioning,
trust building, and problem solving;
(d) Understanding and appreciation for the differences in adult
learners and student learners; and
(e) Capacity for strategic planning and quality program
implementation.
(3) The role of the English language arts instructional coach is
focused on supporting teachers as they apply knowledge, develop skills,
polish techniques, and deepen their understanding of content and
instructional practices. This work takes a number of forms including:
Individualized professional development, department-wide and school-wide professional development, guidance in student data interpretation,
and using assessments to guide instruction.
(4) The English language arts instructional coach program in this
section shall be implemented to the extent funds are available for that
purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Beginning in the 2013-14 school year,
the legislature shall provide the following average state salary
allocations for one full-time equivalent certificated administrative
staff and classified staff recognized in the prototypical school model
in RCW 28A.150.260 or the certificated administrative and classified
salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2 for the 2010-11
school year, whichever is higher:

2013-14
School
Year
Certificated administrative staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,261
Classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,847

2014-15
School
Year
Certificated administrative staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,536
Classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,830

(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 2" means the
school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff
and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for
certificated instructional staff as developed by the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee on May 23, 2011, at
16:10 hours.
(3) The allocations established in subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted for Initiative 732 cost-of-living increases as
provided in the omnibus appropriations act.
(4) The allocations established in subsection (1) of this section
are intended to be only the initial step in enhancing salary
allocations.
(5) This section expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The sum of fifteen million dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2014, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of section 8 of
this act.
(2) The sum of fifteen million dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015,
from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction for the purposes of section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The sum of one million two hundred
eighty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014, from the
general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to be distributed to the educational service districts for the purposes
of section 8 of this act.
(2) The sum of one million two hundred eighty-five thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015, from the general fund to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to be distributed to
the educational service districts for the purposes of section 8 of this
act.

--- END ---