BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.19.040 and 2001 c 118 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent applicable, all of the definitions of chapter
82.04 RCW and all of the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the
tax imposed in this chapter.
(2) Taxes collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
((waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account under RCW
70.93.180)) state parks renewal and stewardship account under RCW
79A.05.215.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.93.180 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 963 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to
be known as the "waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account". Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account shall be used as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the
departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and
corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter
collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount
to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central
coordination function for litter control efforts statewide, for the
biennial litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7). The amount to the
department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the
funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for
waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local
governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving
program goals((. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used
to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19
RCW));
(b) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding
programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities
by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the
department of ecology; and
(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction
and recycling efforts.
(2) All ((taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and)) fines and bail
forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the
amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs,
including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for
collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed
among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so
that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling
programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to
provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the
department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of
reaching a zero litter goal.
(((4) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is suspended.
(5) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is
suspended.))

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.15.050 and 2007 c 241 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the outdoor recreation
account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than thirty percent to the state parks and recreation
commission for the ((acquisition and development)) renovation and
repair of state parks((, with at least fifty percent of the money for
acquisition costs)) facilities;
(b) Not less than thirty percent for the acquisition, development,
and renovation of local parks, with at least fifty percent of this
money for acquisition costs;
(c) Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition, renovation,
or development of trails;
(d) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition, renovation,
or development of water access sites, with at least seventy-five
percent of this money for acquisition costs; and
(e) Not less than five percent for development and renovation
projects on state recreation lands. Only the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife may apply for these
funds to be used on their existing recreation lands.
(2)(a) In distributing these funds, the board retains discretion to
meet the most pressing needs for state and local parks, trails, and
water access sites, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(b) If not enough project applications are submitted in a category
within the outdoor recreation account to meet the percentages described
in subsection (1) of this section in any biennium, the board retains
discretion to distribute any remaining funds to the other categories
within the account.
(3) Only local agencies may apply for acquisition, development, or
renovation funds for local parks under subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(4) Only state and local agencies may apply for funds for trails
under subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(5) Only state and local agencies may apply for funds for water
access sites under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.05.215 and 2011 c 320 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under
RCW 46.16A.090(3), and other state park-based activities shall be
deposited into the account. The proceeds from the recreation access
pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be used for the purpose of
operating and maintaining state parks. Amounts received under RCW
82.19.040 may be used only for operating, maintaining, repairing, and
renovating state parks. Expenditures from the account may be used for
operating state parks, developing and renovating park facilities,
undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park stewardship, and other
state park purposes. Expenditures from the account may be made only
after appropriation by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1, 3, and 4 of this act expire June
30, 2017.

--- END ---