BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.40.010 and 1982 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms in this section shall have the
meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means the state of Washington, any of its political
subdivisions, including any city, town, or county, and any other public
body exercising regulatory authority or control over the use of real
property in the state.
(2) "Permit" means any governmental approval required by law before
an owner of a property interest may improve, sell, transfer, or
otherwise put real property to use.
(3) "Property interest" means any interest or right in real
property in the state.
(4) "Damages" means reasonable expenses and losses, other than
speculative losses or profits, incurred between the time a cause of
action arises and the time a holder of an interest in real property is
granted relief as provided in RCW 64.40.020. Damages must be caused by
an act, necessarily incurred, and actually suffered, realized, or
expended, but are not based upon diminution in value of or damage to
real property, or litigation expenses.
(5) "Regulation" means any ordinance, resolution, or other rule or
regulation adopted pursuant to the authority provided by state law,
which imposes or alters restrictions, limitations, or conditions on the
use of real property.
(6) "Act" means (a) a ((final)) land use decision by an agency
which places requirements, limitations, or conditions upon the use of
real property in excess of those allowed by applicable regulations in
effect on the date an application for a permit is filed((. "Act" also
means the failure of an agency to act within time limits established by
law in response to a property owner's application for a permit:
PROVIDED, That)); (b) an agency's arbitrary, capricious, or unlawful
request for additional information prior to a land use decision; or (c)
the failure of an agency to act within time limits established by law
in response to a property owner's application for a permit. There is
no "act" within the meaning of (c) of this ((section)) subsection when
the owner of a property interest agrees in writing to extensions of
time, or to the conditions or limitations imposed upon an application
for a permit. "Act" shall not include lawful decisions of an agency
which are designed to prevent a condition which would constitute a
threat to the health, safety, welfare, or morals of residents in the
area.
(7) "Land use decision" has the same meaning as used in RCW
36.70C.020(2).
In any action brought pursuant to this chapter, a defense is
available to a political subdivision of this state that its act was
mandated by a change in statute or state rule or regulation and that
such a change became effective subsequent to the filing of an
application for a permit.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.40.020 and 1982 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Owners of a property interest who have filed an application for
a permit have an action for damages to obtain relief from acts of an
agency which are arbitrary, capricious, unlawful, or exceed lawful
authority, or relief from a failure to act within time limits
established by law: PROVIDED, That the action is unlawful or in excess
of lawful authority only if the ((final)) land use decision of the
agency was made with knowledge of its unlawfulness or that it was in
excess of lawful authority, or it should reasonably have been known to
have been unlawful or in excess of lawful authority.
(2) The prevailing party in an action brought pursuant to this
chapter may be entitled to reasonable costs and attorney's fees.
(3) No cause of action is created for relief from unintentional
procedural or ministerial errors of an agency.
(4) Invalidation of any regulation in effect prior to the date an
application for a permit is filed with the agency shall not constitute
a cause of action under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.40.030 and 1982 c 232 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any action to assert claims under the provisions of this chapter
shall be commenced only within thirty days after ((all administrative
remedies have been exhausted)) issuance of a land use decision pursuant
to RCW 36.70C.040(4).

--- END ---