BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.60.160 and 2011 c 10 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing
board, shall process ballots and canvass the votes cast at that primary
or election on a daily basis in counties with a population of seventy-five thousand or more, or at least every third day for counties with a
population of less than seventy-five thousand, if the county auditor is
in possession of more than five hundred ballots that have yet to be
canvassed.
(2) On the day of the primary or general election, ballots must be
processed and counted until midnight or until all ballots received up
to and on that day have been processed and counted, whichever occurs
first.
(3) Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted for
purposes of this section.
(((3))) (4) In order to protect the secrecy of a ballot, the county
auditor may use discretion to decide when to process absentee ballots
and canvass the votes.
(((4))) (5) Tabulation results must be made available to the public
immediately upon completion of the canvass.

--- END ---