BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.335.210 and 2006 c 263 s 327 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate, as a
nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for state assistance
to school districts for the original construction of any school plant
facility the amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation
((to be expended by)) as follows:
(a) The board of directors of a school district may, by properly
executed resolution, request that the superintendent of public
instruction allocate the state construction funds for the acquisition
of instruction-related equipment and technology systems in the school
plant facility; or
(b) The Washington state arts commission may expend such funds for
the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed in
accordance with Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of the state Constitution
on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or
structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure,
part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary
exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities. The
Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, determine the amount to be made
available for the purchase of works of art under this section, and
payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The
designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase,
commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement,
acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of
art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards of directors. The
superintendent of public instruction and the school district board of
directors of the districts where the sites are selected shall have the
right to:
(((1))) (i) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection
process by the Washington state arts commission;
(((2))) (ii) Appoint a representative to the body established by
the Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection
process with full voting rights;
(((3))) (iii) Reject the results of the selection process;
(((4))) (iv) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of
art on school district premises if such works are portable.
(2) Rejection at any point before or after the selection process
shall not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction
funds available to the local school district. Any works of art
rejected under this section shall be applied to the provision of works
of art under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state
arts commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the
cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation as provided in this section shall be used to provide for
the administration, including conservation of the state art collection,
by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation
of the work of art. For the purpose of this section, "building" shall
not include sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary
nature.
((The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent
of public instruction, and the Washington state school directors'
association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the
one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---