BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes,
and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax
levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in
RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either
of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may
not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120,
84.52.125, 84.52.135, 84.52.140, and the protected portion of the levy
under RCW 86.15.160 by flood control zone districts in a county with a
population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more that are
coextensive with a county, the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies
must be reduced as follows:
(i) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district ((that
has a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand and is located
in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
more)) that is protected under RCW 84.52.120(2) must be reduced until
the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair
value of any property or must be eliminated;
(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the protected portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 86.15.160 by a flood control zone district in a
county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more
that is coextensive with a county must be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated;
(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120(1) must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated; and
(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated.
(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW
84.52.815 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis
or eliminated.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.120 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 28 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred
fifty thousand or more((, or any metropolitan park district located in
a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
more,)) may submit a ballot proposition to voters of the district
authorizing the protection of the district's tax levy from prorationing
under RCW 84.52.010(3)(b) by imposing all or any portion of the
district's twenty-five cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
tax levy outside of the five dollar and ninety cent per thousand dollar
of assessed valuation limitation established under RCW 84.52.043(2), if
those taxes otherwise would be prorated under RCW 84.52.010(3)(b)(iii),
for taxes imposed in any year on or before the first day of January six
years after the ballot proposition is approved. A simple majority vote
of voters voting on the proposition is required for approval.
(2) A metropolitan park district not described under subsection (1)
of this section may submit a ballot proposition to voters of the
district authorizing the protection of the district's tax levy from
prorationing under RCW 84.52.010(3)(b) by imposing all or any portion
of the district's twenty-five cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation tax levy outside of the five dollar and ninety cent per
thousand dollar of assessed valuation limitation established under RCW
84.52.043(2), if those taxes otherwise would be prorated under RCW
84.52.010(3)(a)(i), for taxes imposed in any year on or before the
first day of January six years after the ballot proposition is
approved. A simple majority vote of voters voting on the proposition
is required for approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply to taxes
levied for collection in 2014 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 2011 1st sp.s c 28 s 7 (uncodified) is
hereby repealed.

--- END ---