BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that our state's
transportation system forms the backbone of Washington's economy. The
legislature further finds that declining transportation revenue has
left the state unable to preserve the integrity of Washington's
transportation facilities. Since 2001, revenues that support
operations and maintenance of the system have declined by ten percent,
while construction costs have risen seventy-seven percent. Decreasing
revenue and increasing costs have forced the state to rely on toll
revenue to fund large projects, placing a substantial burden on the
residents who must use tolled facilities. These residents are facing
large toll increases to meet the state's funding obligations on those
large projects. As a result, the legislature intends to authorize the
sale of naming rights of the state's transportation facilities to pay
for the ongoing operations and maintenance of these facilities and,
when appropriate, to fund future capital needs of these facilities.
The legislature further finds that the sale of naming rights is a
policy supported by the federal highway administration which recently
published a directive indicating that, "sponsorship opportunities
benefit the traveling public with an improved transportation system by
providing flexibility for public agencies to pursue innovative sources
of financing for maintenance and construction activities and other
highway-related services. With this additional revenue, public
agencies have the means to provide services critical to enhancing
safety and efficiency of the nation's highways."

Sec. 2 RCW 47.01.420 and 2007 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may name or rename state transportation
facilities including, but not limited to: State highways; state
highway bridges, structures, and facilities; state rest areas; and
state roadside facilities, such as viewpoints. ((The commission must
consult with the department before taking final action to name or
rename a state transportation facility.))
(2)(a) The department, state and local governmental entities,
citizen organizations, and any person may initiate the process to name
or rename a state transportation facility.
(b) For the commission to consider a naming or renaming proposal,
the requesting entity or person must provide sufficient evidence, as
determined by the commission, indicating community support and
acceptance of the proposal. Evidence may include the following:
(i) Letters of support from state and federal legislators
representing the impacted area encompassing the state transportation
facility;
(ii) Resolutions passed by local, publicly elected bodies in the
impacted area encompassing the state transportation facility;
(iii) Department support; or
(iv) Supportive actions by or letters from local organizations
including, but not limited to, local chambers of commerce and service
clubs.
(3) The commission must consult with the department before taking
final action to name or rename a state transportation facility. After
the commission takes final action in naming or renaming a state
transportation facility, the department shall design and install the
appropriate signs in accordance with state and federal standards.
(4)(a) As an alternative to the naming or renaming process under
subsections (1) through (3) of this section and for requesting entities
or persons willing to pay for such naming or renaming rights, the
commission shall develop, set, and approve by rule the applicable fees
and guidelines governing the naming and renaming of state
transportation facilities as listed in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The fees for naming or renaming any state transportation
facility must exceed the costs associated with the naming or renaming
of the state transportation facility.
(c)(i) Any fees collected for naming or renaming a tolled facility
must be deposited into the toll facility account for that facility
being named or renamed, and must only be used for the operations,
maintenance, preservation, improvement, or future capital needs of that
facility.
(ii) Any fees collected for naming or renaming any nontolled
facility must be deposited into the motor vehicle account and be used
only for highway purposes.
(d) The following content is not permitted when naming or renaming
state transportation facilities under this subsection:
(i) Names that are obscene or indecent;
(ii) Names that are discriminatory;
(iii) Names that are religious;
(iv) Names that are political; and
(v) Names that describe or promote the following products,
services, or other material:
(A) Tobacco, marijuana, and any illegal narcotic;
(B) Films rated "X" or "NC-17" and video games rated "A" or "M", or
a similar rating under comparable industry standards;
(C) Adult content, including adult books, adult stores, adult
internet web sites, adult telephone services, escort services, or any
other adult entertainment establishment;
(D) Material that is false, fraudulent, deceptive, or is otherwise
misleading to the average person; and
(E) Any material that is so objectionable under contemporary
community standards as to be reasonably foreseeable that it will incite
or produce imminent lawless action in the form of retaliation,
vandalism, or other breach of public safety, peace, and order.
(e) The guidelines established under (a) of this subsection must
determine the entity responsible for the installation and maintenance
of signage resulting from the naming or renaming of a facility under
this subsection.
(f) The commission must hold at least one public hearing and enable
citizens to participate in the hearing or hearings remotely. After one
or more public hearings, the commission must engage in formal rule
making.
(g) By January 1, 2014, the commission must provide a report to the
legislature regarding the guidelines developed under (a) of this
subsection, the terms of any agreements entered into or contemplated
that would authorize the sale of naming or renaming rights, and any
other relevant issues.

--- END ---