BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Public assistance may be awarded to any applicant:
(a) Who is in need and otherwise meets the eligibility requirements
of department assistance programs; and
(b) Who has not made a voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for an assistance grant; and
(c) Who is not an inmate of a public institution except as a
patient in a medical institution or except as an inmate in a public
institution who could qualify for federal aid assistance: PROVIDED,
That the assistance paid by the department to recipients in nursing
homes, or receiving nursing home care, may cover the cost of clothing
and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of medical care and
health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the cost of
clothing and personal incidentals in public or private medical
institutions and institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall
allow recipients in nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant
to cover the cost of clothing and incidentals, wages received for work
as a part of a training or rehabilitative program designed to prepare
the recipient for less restrictive placement to the extent permitted
under Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(2) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families under this title who has resided in the state of
Washington for fewer than twelve consecutive months immediately
preceding application for assistance is limited to the benefit level in
the state in which the person resided immediately before Washington,
using the eligibility rules and other definitions established under
this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of application in
Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is lower than
the level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington
state. The benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for
the first twelve months a recipient is on temporary assistance for
needy families in Washington state.
(3) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families who is assessed through the state alcohol and substance
abuse program as drug or alcohol-dependent and requiring treatment to
become employable shall be required by the department to undergo drug
testing pursuant to section 3 of this act and to participate in a drug
or alcohol treatment program as a condition of benefit receipt.
(4) The department may implement a permanent disqualification for
adults who have been terminated due to WorkFirst noncompliance sanction
three or more times since March 1, 2007. A household that includes an
adult who has been permanently disqualified from receiving temporary
assistance for needy families shall be ineligible for further temporary
assistance for needy families assistance.
(5) Pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 862a(d)(1), the department shall exempt
individuals from the eligibility restrictions of 21 U.S.C. 862a(a)(1)
and (2) to ensure eligibility for temporary assistance for needy
families benefits and federal food assistance.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
(2) Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan
shall be prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan
for maximizing the recipient's success at meeting the employment goal;
(b) considers WorkFirst educational and training programs from which
the recipient could benefit; (c) contains the obligation of the
recipient to participate in the program by complying with the plan; (d)
moves the recipient into full-time WorkFirst activities as quickly as
possible; and (e) describes the services available to the recipient
either during or after WorkFirst to enable the recipient to obtain and
keep employment and to advance in the workplace and increase the
recipient's wage earning potential over time.
(3) If the assessment conducted under this section indicates a
reasonable likelihood that the recipient has a substance use disorder
involving the misuse of a controlled substance, the recipient may only
continue to receive benefits under the temporary assistance for needy
families program in accordance with the requirements of section 3 of
this act.
(4) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(((4))) (5) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work
activities required by the department, the family's grant shall be
reduced by the recipient's share, and may, if the department determines
it appropriate, be terminated.
(((5))) (6) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section, subject to a finding that the
recipient refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW
74.08A.270.
(((6))) (7) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.
(((7))) (8) Assessments conducted under this section shall include
a consideration of the potential benefit to the recipient of engaging
in financial literacy activities. The department shall consider the
options for financial literacy activities available in the community,
including information and resources available through the financial
education public-private partnership created under RCW 28A.300.450.
The department may authorize up to ten hours of financial literacy
activities as a core activity or an optional activity under WorkFirst.
(((8))) (9)(a) From July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2012,
subsections (2) and (4) through (((6))) (7) of this section are
suspended for a recipient who is a parent or other relative personally
providing care for one child under the age of two years, or two or more
children under the age of six years. This suspension applies to both
one and two parent families. However, both parents in a two-parent
family cannot use the suspension during the same month. Beginning July
1, 2012, the department shall phase in the work activity requirements
that were suspended, beginning with those recipients closest to
reaching the sixty-month limit of receiving temporary assistance for
needy families under RCW 74.08A.010(1). The phase in shall be
accomplished so that a fairly equal number of recipients required to
participate in work activities are returned to those activities each
month until the total number required to participate is participating
by June 30, 2013. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a recipient
from participating in the WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis.
Recipients who participate in the WorkFirst program on a voluntary
basis shall be provided an option to participate in the program on a
part-time basis, consisting of sixteen or fewer hours of activities per
week. Recipients also may participate voluntarily on a full-time
basis.
(b)(i) The period of suspension of work activities under this
subsection provides an opportunity for the legislative and executive
branches to oversee redesign of the WorkFirst program. To realize this
opportunity, both during the period of suspension and following
reinstatement of work activity requirements as redesign is being
implemented, a legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force is
established, with members as provided in this subsection (((8)))
(9)(b).
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(iii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iv) The governor shall appoint members representing the department
of social and health services, the department of early learning, the
department of commerce, the employment security department, the office
of financial management, and the state board for community and
technical colleges.
(v) The task force shall choose cochairs, one from among the
legislative members and one from among the executive branch members.
The legislative members shall convene the initial meeting of the task
force.
(c) The task force shall:
(i) Oversee the partner agencies' implementation of the redesign of
the WorkFirst program and operation of the temporary assistance for
needy families program to ensure that the programs are achieving
desired outcomes for their clients;
(ii) Determine evidence-based outcome measures for the WorkFirst
program, including measures related to equitably serving the needs of
historically underrepresented populations, such as English language
learners, immigrants, refugees, and other diverse communities;
(iii) Develop accountability measures for WorkFirst recipients and
the state agencies responsible for their progress toward self-sufficiency;
(iv) Make recommendations to the governor and the legislature
regarding:
(A) Policies to improve the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program
over time;
(B) Early identification of those recipients most likely to
experience long stays on the program and strategies to improve their
ability to achieve progress toward self-sufficiency; and
(C) Necessary changes to the program, including taking into account
federal changes to the temporary assistance for needy families program.
(d) The partner agencies must provide the task force with regular
reports on:
(i) The partner agencies' progress toward meeting the outcome and
performance measures established under (c) of this subsection;
(ii) Caseload trends and program expenditures, and the impact of
those trends and expenditures on client services, including services to
historically underrepresented populations; and
(iii) The characteristics of families who have been unsuccessful on
the program and have lost their benefits either through sanction or the
sixty-month time limit.
(e) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services, the house of representatives office of program
research, and the state agency members of the task force.
(f) The task force shall meet on a quarterly basis beginning
September 2011, or as determined necessary by the task force cochairs.
(g) During its tenure, the state agency members of the task force
shall respond in a timely manner to data requests from the cochairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the results of an assessment conducted under RCW
74.08A.260(1) indicate a reasonable likelihood that a recipient may
have a substance use disorder involving the misuse of a controlled
substance, the department must require the recipient to take a drug
test at the department's expense.
(2) If a recipient, without good cause, refuses to take a drug test
as required under subsection (1) of this section, the department must
place the recipient's case in sanction status for noncompliance with
the individual responsibility plan and reduce the family's grant by the
recipient's share or by forty percent of the grant amount, whichever is
greater. If the recipient remains in noncompliance sanction status for
more than four months for failure to take a drug test pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the department must terminate the
recipient's case. If the department terminates the recipient's case
under this subsection, the recipient may not reapply to receive
temporary assistance for needy families benefits until twenty-eight
days after the date of termination.
(3) A drug test given under this section must be administered with
due regard to the privacy and dignity of the person being tested.
(4) Before taking a drug test under this section, a recipient may
advise the person administering the test regarding any prescription or
over-the-counter medication the recipient is taking.
(5) If a recipient tests negative for the unlawful use of a
controlled substance after taking a drug test pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, the recipient remains in compliance with the
temporary assistance for needy families program, subject to the other
program requirements of this chapter.
(6) If a recipient tests positive for the unlawful use of a
controlled substance after taking a drug test pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) The department must provide the recipient with a list of
approved substance use disorder treatment providers that are available
in the area in which the individual resides; and
(b) The recipient may continue to receive benefits under the
temporary assistance for needy families program if the recipient enters
into and follows the requirements of an individual responsibility plan
which may include any of the following:
(i) Receiving treatment, at the department's expense, from an
approved substance use disorder treatment provider for at least sixty
days;
(ii) Testing negative for the unlawful use of a controlled
substance:
(A) In each subsequent drug test required by the department during
treatment; and
(B) In an additional drug test given at the conclusion of
treatment; and
(iii) Meeting the other requirements for receiving benefits under
the temporary assistance for needy families program under this chapter.
(7) If a recipient fails to meet the requirements of subsection (6)
of this section, the department must place the recipient's case in
sanction status for noncompliance with the individual responsibility
plan. If the recipient remains in noncompliance sanction status for
more than four months, the department must terminate the recipient's
case. Upon termination pursuant to this subsection, the recipient may
not reapply to receive temporary assistance for needy families benefits
until twenty-eight days after the date of termination.

--- END ---