BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct an analysis of how school districts use school
days. The analysis must include:
(a) How school districts define classroom time, nonclassroom time,
instructional time, noninstructional time, and any other definitions of
how the school day is divided or used;
(b) Estimates of time in each category;
(c) When noninstructional hours occur;
(d) How noninstructional hours are used including how much of the
noninstructional time is devoted to professional development for the
purposes of teacher and principal evaluation training or common core
state standards training; and
(e) The extent to which the use of each category of time is
identified or defined in collective bargaining agreements.
(2) To the extent data is not available at the statewide level, the
joint legislative audit and review committee may use case studies or
other methods to conduct the analysis.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
a report of its findings to the education committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2014.

--- END ---