BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.010 and 2011 c 295 s 3 and 2011 c 78 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and
services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit
preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral;
parental education and support; and training and professional
development for early learning professionals;
(c) "Family day care provider" means a child day care provider who
regularly provides child day care and early learning services for not
more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living
quarters;
(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity
registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a
primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental
support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in
contributions;
(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (((2)(a))), even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools or kindergartens that are engaged primarily in
educational work with preschool children and in which no child is
enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing child care for periods of less than
twenty-four hours when a parent or legal guardian of the child remains
on the premises of the facility for the purpose of participating in:
(i) Activities other than employment; or
(ii) Employment of up to two hours per day when the facility is
operated by a nonprofit entity that also operates a licensed child care
program at the same facility in another location or at another
facility;
(i) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(j) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a federally
recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(k) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter;
(l) An agency that offers early learning and support services, such
as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a
regular basis.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in
an agency.
(4) "Conviction information" means criminal history record
information relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or
other disposition adverse to the applicant.
(5) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department.
(7) "Early achievers" means a program designed to accomplish the
following goals:
(a) Provide parents clear and easily accessible information about
quality child care and early education programs;
(b) Improve early learning programs throughout Washington state;
(c) Increase school readiness for children;
(d) Close the disparity between segments of the population with
regard to access to quality child care; and
(e) Establish a uniform set of expectations and standards that
define, measure, and improve the quality of the early learning
environments.
(8) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the services
of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work in an
agency.
(((8))) (9) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension,
revocation, modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(1) or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(3).
(((9))) (10) "Negative action" means a court order, court judgment,
or an adverse action taken by an agency, in any state, federal, tribal,
or foreign jurisdiction, which results in a finding against the
applicant reasonably related to the individual's character,
suitability, and competence to care for or have unsupervised access to
children in child care. This may include, but is not limited to:
(a) A decision issued by an administrative law judge;
(b) A final determination, decision, or finding made by an agency
following an investigation;
(c) An adverse agency action, including termination, revocation, or
denial of a license or certification, or if pending adverse agency
action, the voluntary surrender of a license, certification, or
contract in lieu of the adverse action;
(d) A revocation, denial, or restriction placed on any professional
license; or
(e) A final decision of a disciplinary board.
(((10))) (11) "Nonconviction information" means arrest, founded
allegations of child abuse, or neglect pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW,
or other negative action adverse to the applicant.
(((11))) (12) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a
disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a
full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(((12))) (13) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard
of care to be maintained by an agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All licensed and certified child care programs may enroll in
the early achievers program. Child care programs may voluntarily
decide whether to participate.
(2) There are five quality levels to the early achievers program:
(a) Level one is licensing or certification that includes all
licensed child care centers and family child care, military, tribal
head start and early childhood education and assistance programs, and
other state funded programs.
(b) Level two focuses on ensuring that program leaders understand
the quality rating and improvement system, the program standards and
requirements and the child outcome and readiness goals of the system.
To attain level two, programs must complete a self-assessment and
attend trainings that support program improvements and policy
development. Programs must also participate in the department's
statewide professional development registry by creating program
profiles and ensuring all employees have an active record of their
educational achievements.
(c) Levels three through five are points-based ratings based on
four program standards:
(i) Child outcomes;
(ii) Curriculum, learning, environments, and training;
(iii) Professional development and training; and
(iv) Family engagement and partnership.
(3) The department shall develop rules consistent with this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section may be known as the "child care consumer and
provider bill of rights."
(a) The department shall return all calls from consumers within
two business days of receiving them.
(b) Departmental employees working with child care consumers shall
receive training on professionalism.
(c) As soon as practicable, the department shall develop a process
by which consumers can submit required forms and information
electronically.
(d) The department shall provide consumers with a document that
explains in detail and in easily understood language what services they
are eligible for, how they can appeal an adverse decision, the
consumers' responsibilities in obtaining and maintaining eligibility
for working connections child care, and their rights as a consumer.
The department shall work collaboratively with the parent and provider
oversight board to develop the document required by this subsection.
(2)(a) The department shall convene a parent and provider oversight
board.
(b) The board must consist of ten members from across the state,
five representing consumers and five representing providers. There
must be geographic representation.
(c) The board shall meet at least three times a year.
(d) The purpose of the board is to listen to issues raised by
consumers and providers and provide feedback to the department on
recommended policy changes to address the issues raised.
(e) The department is not responsible for any of the expenses
incurred by the board members.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "department" means both the
department of early learning and the department of social and health
services.
(4) Nothing in this section is intended to create any right or
benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law. Nothing in
this section creates any defense on the part of any consumer or
provider in any prosecution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) A legislative task force on child
care improvements for the future is established with members as
provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of
representatives.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall appoint thirteen members representing the
following interests:
(A) The department of early learning;
(B) The department of social and health services;
(C) The early learning advisory committee;
(D) Thrive by five;
(E) Private pay child care consumers;
(F) Child care consumers receiving a subsidy;
(G) Family child care providers;
(H) Child care center providers;
(I) Exempt child care providers;
(J) The collective bargaining unit representing child care
providers;
(K) School-age child care providers;
(L) Child care aware; and
(M) The Washington state association of head start and the early
childhood education and assistance program.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative leadership. The members of the majority party in each
house shall convene the first meeting.
(2) The task force shall address the following issues:
(a) The creation of a tiered reimbursement model that works for
both consumers and providers and provides incentives for quality child
care across communities;
(b) The long-term administrative changes that will help consumers
enroll their children in child care accurately and efficiently;
(c) The expansion of outreach to consumers of child care;
(d) Administrative improvements and structural changes to the
payment system;
(e) Increased and stable child care funding as a pivotal early
learning tool;
(f) An increase in reimbursement rates to increase low-income
families' access to high-quality providers;
(g) An increase in the eligibility threshold to achieve cross-subsidies and allow parents to grow professionally without losing
affordable child care; and
(h) A further graduation of the copay scale to eliminate the cliff
that occurs at subsidy cut off.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than December 31, 2013.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislature finds that the Aclara
group report on the eligibility requirements for working connections
child care which came from the pedagogy of lean management and focused
on identifying and eliminating nonvalue added work should be followed.
The legislature further finds that, following some of the
recommendations in the report, would result in simplifying and
streamlining the child care system to improve access and customer
service without decreasing the program's integrity.
(2) By December 1, 2013, the department and the department of
social and health services shall accomplish the following:
(a) Eliminate the current custody/visitation policy and design a
subsidy system that is flexible and accounts for small fluctuations in
family circumstances;
(b) Create broad authorization categories so that relatively minor
changes in parents' work schedule does not require changes in
authorization;
(c) Eliminate the activity schedule and reduce the number of minor
changes that families are required to report; and
(d) Clarify and simplify the requirement to count child support as
income.

--- END ---