BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as a result of
excessive internal (sediments) and external loading of nutrients,
persistent toxic algae have developed in certain lakes. The
legislature further finds that an effort should be made to prevent
toxic algae blooms and restore lakes to a healthful condition that is
suitable for human recreational use and aquatic wildlife habitat.
Restoring lakes to a healthy condition is of paramount importance to
the health and safety of fish, waterfowl, and terrestrial mammals,
including humans. It is the legislature's intent to restore all such
lakes to safe and healthy conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A code city authorized under this title may take action to
address toxic algae blooms for any lake located within the boundaries
of the code city and entirely on lands belonging to the state of
Washington.
(2) This section applies only to lakes with less than thirty-four
acres surface area and a mean depth of ten feet or less. A code city
may only take action as authorized under this section consistent with
applicable environmental and permitting requirements.

--- END ---