BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Local telephone directory" means a publication listing
telephone numbers for various businesses in a certain geographic area
and distributed free of charge to some or all telephone subscribers in
that area.
(2) "Local telephone number" means a telephone number that can be
dialed without incurring long distance charges from telephones located
within the area covered by the local telephone directory in which the
number is listed. The term does not include long distance numbers,
toll-free numbers, or nine-hundred exchange numbers listed in a local
telephone directory.
(3) "Locksmith services" means:
(a) Selling, installing, servicing, repairing, repining,
recombinating, and adjusting locks, safes, vaults, or safe deposit
boxes;
(b) Originating keys;
(c) Operating, bypassing, or neutralizing locks, safes, vaults, or
safe deposit boxes;
(d) Creating, documenting, selling, installing, managing, and
servicing master-key systems;
(e) Unlocking, bypassing, or neutralizing locks for motor vehicles;
(f) Originating keys for motor vehicles, which can include the
programming, reprogramming, or bypassing of any security transponder,
immobilizer system, or subsequent technology built by the manufacturer;
and
(g) Keying or recombinating motor vehicle locks.
(4) "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability
partnership, corporation, or limited liability corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 No person engaged in locksmith services may
misrepresent his, her, or its geographic location by:
(1) Listing a local telephone number in a local telephone directory
if:
(a) Calls to the telephone number are routinely forwarded or
otherwise transferred to a business location that is outside the
calling area covered by the local telephone directory; and
(b) The listing fails to conspicuously disclose the locality and
state in which the business is located; or
(2) Listing a business name in a local telephone directory if:
(a) The name misrepresents the business's geographic location; and
(b) The listing fails to disclose the locality and state in which
the business is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of
this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---