BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.510 and 1993 c 461 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) may work with ((the departments of
natural resources, transportation, social and health services,
corrections, and general administration to identify and catalog under-utilized, state-owned land and property)) state and local governmental
entities that choose to utilize real property, including air rights,
owned by these governmental entities suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, federally
qualified low-income, or low-income ((or moderate-income)) households.
The state and local governmental entities subject to the requirements
of this section are the departments of natural resources,
transportation, social and health services, corrections, and ((general
administration shall provide an inventory of real property that is
owned or administered by each agency and is available for lease or
sale. The inventories shall be provided to the department by November
1, 1993, with inventory revisions provided each November 1 thereafter.
(2) Upon written request, the department shall provide a copy of
the inventory of state-owned and publicly owned lands and buildings to
parties interested in developing the sites for affordable housing.
(3))) enterprise services, public lands except for state forest
lands, the state parks and recreation commission, counties, cities,
towns, and regional transit authorities.
(2) A governmental entity that sells or leases real property,
including air rights, to an eligible organization under this section
may do so at a price that is less than fair market value, provided that
the housing developed on the property will be occupied primarily by
households who are extremely low-income, very low-income, federally
qualified low-income, or low-income.
(3) A governmental entity that sells or leases real property,
including air rights, to an eligible organization under this section
may create beneficial sales terms including, but not limited to,
extended closings, provided that the housing developed on the property
will be occupied primarily by households who are extremely low-income,
very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income.
(4) An eligible organization may obtain these surplus properties
through purchase, lease, exchange, or donation, under reasonable option
and conveyance conditions, in return for (a) a recorded covenant to
provide rental housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, or
federally qualified low-income households for at least forty years; or
(b) a loan note in the name of a governmental entity for homeownership
programs in which the homeowners are extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income.
(5) Each governmental entity must (a) enter into a recorded
covenant with the purchaser of the surplus property or a loan note in
the name of the governmental entity, to ensure that the property will
meet the required income, rent, and sales price restrictions; and (b)
monitor compliance with the covenant or loan note.
(6) As an alternative to the requirements of this section,
counties, cities, and towns may sell surplus property at a discount for
affordable housing that may be part of mixed-income or mixed-use
developments, provided that the affordable housing complies with the
guidelines for affordable housing, income levels, affordable rents,
affordable sales prices, and minimum terms of affordability under RCW
36.70A.540 for affordable housing incentive programs. The authority
granted to counties, cities, and towns in this subsection is in
addition to, and must not be construed to limit, any existing
authority.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
or owned by a person who qualifies as ((a)) an extremely low-income,
very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income((, or
moderate-income)) household or who is from a special needs population,
and ((whose)) for which monthly housing costs, including utilities
other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the
((household's)) maximum allowed monthly income for the housing unit.
(b) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below fifty
percent of the county area median income((, adjusted for household
size,)) for the county where the affordable housing is located,
adjusted for household size.
(c) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than ((fifty))
sixty percent but is at or below eighty percent of the county area
median income where the affordable housing is located, adjusted for
household size.
(d) (("Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than eighty
percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the median
income where the affordable housing is located)) "Eligible
organization" means any city, town, or county government, local housing
authority, public development authority, community renewal agency,
regional support network established under chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit
community or neighborhood-based organization, federally recognized
Indian tribe in the state of Washington, entity that develops or is
seeking to develop farmworker housing in compliance with chapter
70.114A RCW, or nonprofit housing assistance organization, including
such entities materially participating as a general partner or managing
members of a partnership, limited liability company, or equivalent
organization.
(e) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person, family,
or unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below thirty
percent of the county area median income where the affordable housing
is located, adjusted for household size.
(f) "Federally qualified low-income household" means a single
person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose income is
more than fifty percent but is at or below sixty percent of the county
area median income where the affordable housing is located, adjusted
for household size.
(g) "Primarily" means fifty-one percent or more.
(h) "Real property" means land, buildings, or buildings and land.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20A.037 and 1995 c 399 s 65 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that
is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall
include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of community, trade, and economic
development by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.))
The department may sell, lease, or exchange real property for less
than fair market value to an eligible organization as defined in RCW
43.63A.510, or may create beneficial sales terms including, but not
limited to, extended closings, if the affordable housing to be
developed on the property will be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.055 and 1995 c 399 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that
is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of community, trade, and economic
development by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.))
The department may sell, lease, or exchange real property for less
than fair market value to an eligible organization as defined in RCW
43.63A.510, or may create beneficial sales terms including, but not
limited to, extended closings, if the affordable housing to be
developed on the property will be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.19201 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 218 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that
is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of commerce by November 1, 1993, and
every November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.))
The department may sell, lease, or exchange real property for less
than fair market value to an eligible organization as defined in RCW
43.63A.510, or may create beneficial sales terms including, but not
limited to, extended closings, if the affordable housing to be
developed on the property will be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.05.170 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may sell, lease, or exchange real property for
less than fair market value to an eligible organization as defined in
RCW 43.63A.510, or may create beneficial sales terms including, but not
limited to, extended closings, if the affordable housing to be
developed on the property will be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(2) Except for those lands subject to RCW 43.63A.510, any lands
owned by the ((state parks and recreation)) commission, which are
determined to be surplus to the needs of the state for development for
state park purposes and which the commission proposes to deed to a
local government or other entity, shall be accompanied by a clause
requiring that if the land is not used for outdoor recreation purposes,
ownership of the land shall revert to the ((state parks and
recreation)) commission.
(((2) The state parks and recreation commission,)) (a) In cases
where land subject to such a reversionary clause is proposed for use or
disposal for purposes other than recreation, the commission shall
require that, if the land is surplus to the needs of the commission for
park purposes at the time the commission becomes aware of its proposed
use for nonrecreation purposes, the holder of the land or property
shall reimburse the commission for the release of the reversionary
interest in the land. The reimbursement shall be in the amount of the
fair market value of the reversionary interest as determined by a
qualified appraiser agreeable to the commission. Appraisal costs shall
be borne by the local entity which holds title to the land.
(((3))) (b) Any funds generated under a reimbursement under this
section shall be deposited in the parkland acquisition account which is
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are to be
used solely for the purchase or acquisition of property for use as
state park property by the commission, as directed by the legislature;
all such funds shall be subject to legislative appropriation.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.05.175 and 2007 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for those lands subject to RCW 43.63A.510 and 79A.05.170(1),
whenever the commission finds that any land under its control cannot
advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized to dispose
of such land by the method provided in this section or by the method
provided in RCW 79A.05.170. If such lands are school or other grant
lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by resolution of the
commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were acquired
under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the
donor or grantors by the commission. All other such lands may be
either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or exchanged for
other lands of equal value by the commission, and all conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor. All such exchanges shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set by the commission and paid
by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall be paid into the
parkland acquisition account established under RCW 79A.05.170. The
commission may accept sealed bids, electronic bids, or oral bids at
auction. Bids on all sales shall be solicited at least twenty days in
advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing at least once a
week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the land to be sold is located. If the commission
feels that no bid received adequately reflects the fair value of the
land to be sold, it may reject all bids, and may call for new bids.
All proceeds derived from the sale of such park property shall be paid
into the park land acquisition account. All land considered for
exchange shall be evaluated by the commission to determine its
adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all lands exchanged
shall first be determined by the appraisals to the satisfaction of the
commission. No sale or exchange of state park lands shall be made
without the unanimous consent of the commission.

Sec. 7 RCW 79.11.005 and 2003 c 334 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 43.63A.510, the department is authorized to sell
any real property not designated or acquired as state forest lands, but
acquired by the state, either in the name of the forest board, the
forestry board, or the division of forestry, for administrative sites,
lien foreclosures, or other purposes whenever it shall determine that
the lands are no longer or not necessary for public use.
(2) The department may sell, lease, or exchange real property for
less than fair market value to an eligible organization as defined in
RCW 43.63A.510, or may create beneficial sales terms including, but not
limited to, extended closings, if the affordable housing to be
developed on the property will be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(3) Except as otherwise provided under RCW 43.63A.510, the sale may
be made after public notice to the highest bidder for such a price as
approved by the governor, but not less than the fair market value of
the real property, plus the value of improvements thereon. Any
instruments necessary to convey title must be executed by the governor
in a form approved by the attorney general.
(((3))) (4) All amounts received from the sale must be credited to
the fund of the department of government that is responsible for the
acquisition and maintenance of the property sold.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.12.064 and 1995 c 399 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that
is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of community, trade, and economic
development by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.))
The department may sell, lease, or exchange real property for less
than fair market value to an eligible organization as defined in RCW
43.63A.510, or may create beneficial sales terms including, but not
limited to, extended closings, if the affordable housing to be
developed on the property will be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 9 RCW 81.112.080 and 1992 c 101 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
An authority shall have the following powers in addition to the
general powers granted by this chapter:
(1) To carry out the planning processes set forth in RCW
81.104.100;
(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of high capacity transportation facilities and
properties within authority boundaries including surface, underground,
or overhead railways, tramways, busways, buses, bus sets, entrained and
linked buses, ferries, or other means of local transportation except
taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks, personal rapid
transit systems or other people-moving systems, passenger terminal and
parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and
properties as may be necessary for passenger, vehicular, and vessel
access to and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking
facilities and properties, together with all lands, rights-of-way,
property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such high capacity
transportation systems. When developing specifications for high
capacity transportation system operating equipment, an authority shall
take into account efforts to establish or sustain a domestic
manufacturing capacity for such equipment. The right of eminent domain
shall be exercised by an authority in the same manner and by the same
procedure as or may be provided by law for cities of the first class,
except insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter. Public transportation facilities and properties which
are owned by any city, county, county transportation authority, public
transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation may
be acquired or used by an authority only with the consent of the agency
owning such facilities. Such agencies are hereby authorized to convey
or lease such facilities to an authority or to contract for their joint
use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the agency and
the authority.
The facilities and properties of an authority whose vehicles will
operate primarily within the rights-of-way of public streets, roads, or
highways, may be acquired, developed, and operated without the corridor
and design hearings that are required by RCW 35.58.273 for mass transit
facilities operating on a separate right-of-way;
(3) To dispose of any real or personal property acquired in
connection with any authority function and that is no longer required
for the purposes of the authority, in the same manner as provided for
cities of the first class. When an authority determines that a
facility or any part thereof that has been acquired from any public
agency without compensation is no longer required for authority
purposes, but is required by the agency from which it was acquired, the
authority shall by resolution transfer it to such agency;
(4) An authority may sell, lease, or exchange real property for
less than fair market value to an eligible organization as defined in
RCW 43.63A.510, or may create beneficial sales terms including, but not
limited to, extended closings, if the affordable housing to be
developed on the property will be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, federally qualified low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510;
(5) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such
facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service.
Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable
class of users.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 36.34 RCW
to read as follows:
As an alternative to the powers provided in RCW 43.63A.510, a
county may sell surplus property at a discount for affordable housing
that may be part of mixed-income or mixed-use developments, provided
that the affordable housing complies with the guidelines for affordable
housing, income levels, affordable rents, affordable sales prices, and
minimum terms of affordability under RCW 36.70A.540 for affordable
housing incentive programs. The authority granted to counties in this
section is in addition to, and must not be construed to limit, any
existing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
As an alternative to the powers provided in RCW 43.63A.510, every
city and town, including every code city operating under Title 35A RCW,
may sell surplus property at a discount for affordable housing that may
be part of mixed-income or mixed-use developments, provided that the
affordable housing complies with the guidelines for affordable housing,
income levels, affordable rents, affordable sales prices, and minimum
terms of affordability under RCW 36.70A.540 for affordable housing
incentive programs. The authority granted to cities and towns in this
section is in addition to, and must not be construed to limit, any
existing authority.

--- END ---