BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.250 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:
(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;
(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector,
including employment through the state or federal work-study program
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;
(3) Work experience, including:
(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a
license or certificate in a high-demand occupation, as determined by
the employment security department. No internship or practicum shall
exceed twelve months; or
(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;
(4) On-the-job training;
(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;
(6) Community service programs, including a recipient's voluntary
service at a child care or preschool facility licensed under chapter
43.215 RCW or an elementary school in which his or her child is
enrolled;
(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed ((twelve))
twenty-four months with respect to any individual;
(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a
recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;
(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of
study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not
completed secondary school or received such a certificate;
(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program;
(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience
performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or
nongovernmental agency setting;
(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a
student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an
agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of
advancing their skills and knowledge;
(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(4) to become employable;
(15) Financial literacy activities designed to be effective in
assisting a recipient in becoming self-sufficient and financially
stable; and
(16) Parent education services or programs that support development
of appropriate parenting skills, life skills, and employment-related
competencies.

--- END ---