BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington
state's elderly population is growing and the number of individuals
with dementia is increasing. The legislature further finds that
approximately sixty percent of individuals with dementia will wander at
least once and that if not found within twenty-four hours, up to half
of wandering seniors with dementia will suffer serious injury or death.
The legislature further finds that the state of Washington has a
compelling interest in protecting the safety of vulnerable citizens
with cognitive impairments. The legislature further finds that while
the Washington state patrol does maintain an "endangered missing person
advisory plan" which creates a public notification system to locate
missing persons with developmental disabilities and vulnerable adults,
the public may not fully understand that this program is primarily
designed to locate adults with special needs. The legislature further
finds that renaming this important public notification system will help
the public to understand they are looking for a person with a
developmental disability or a vulnerable adult. This will help to
locate missing persons with Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or other
mental disabilities aid in their safe return, and will help prevent
unnecessary suffering and death.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.60.010 and 2013 c 285 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall establish a missing children
and endangered person clearinghouse which shall include the maintenance
and operation of a toll-free telephone hotline. The clearinghouse
shall distribute information to local law enforcement agencies, school
districts, the department of social and health services, and the
general public regarding missing children and endangered persons. The
information shall include pictures, bulletins, training sessions,
reports, and biographical materials that will assist in local law
enforcement efforts to locate missing children and endangered persons.
The state patrol shall also maintain a regularly updated computerized
link with national and other statewide missing person systems or
clearinghouses, and within existing resources, shall develop and
implement a plan, commonly known as an "amber alert plan" or ((an
"endangered missing person advisory)) a "silver alert plan," for
voluntary cooperation between local, state, tribal, and other law
enforcement agencies, state government agencies, radio and television
stations, cable and satellite systems, and social media pages and sites
to enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering abducted
children and missing endangered persons consistent with the state
endangered missing person advisory plan.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Child" or "children" means an individual under eighteen years
of age.
(b) "Missing endangered person" means a person ((with a
developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020(4) or a
vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020(17),)) believed to be in
danger because of age, health, mental or physical disability, in
combination with environmental or weather conditions, or is believed to
be unable to return to safety without assistance and who is:
(i) A person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020(4);
(ii) A vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020(17); or
(iii) A person who has been diagnosed as having Alzheimer's
disease, dementia, or other mental disability.
(c) "Silver alert" means a quick response system designed to issue
and coordinate alerts following the disappearance of a missing
endangered person.

--- END ---