BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.143 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington coastal marine advisory council is established
in the executive office of the governor to fulfill the duties outlined
in section 2 of this act.
(2)(a) Voting members of the Washington coastal marine advisory
council shall be appointed by the governor or the governor's designee.
The council consists of the following voting members:
(i) The governor or the governor's designee;
(ii) The director or commissioner, or the director's or
commissioner's designee, of the following agencies:
(A) The department of ecology;
(B) The department of natural resources;
(C) The department of fish and wildlife;
(D) The state parks and recreation commission;
(E) The department of commerce; and
(F) Washington sea grant;
(iii) The following members of the Washington coastal marine
advisory council established by the department of ecology and as
existing on January 15, 2013:
(A) One citizen from a coastal community;
(B) Two persons representing coastal commercial fishing;
(C) One representative from a coastal conservation group;
(D) One representative from a coastal economic development group;
(E) One representative from an educational institution;
(F) Two representatives from energy industries or organizations,
one of which must be from the coast;
(G) One person representing coastal recreation;
(H) One person representing coastal recreational fishing;
(I) One person representing coastal shellfish aquaculture;
(J) One representative from the coastal shipping industry;
(K) One representative from a science organization;
(L) One representative from the coastal Washington sustainable
salmon partnership;
(M) One representative from a coastal port; and
(N) One representative from each outer coast marine resources
committee, to be selected by the marine resources committee.
(b) The Washington coastal marine advisory council shall adopt
bylaws and operating procedures that may be modified from time to time
by the council.
(3) The Washington coastal marine advisory council may invite
state, tribal, local governments, federal agencies, scientific experts,
and others with responsibility for the study and management of coastal
and ocean resources or regulation of coastal and ocean activities to
designate a liaison to the council to attend council meetings, respond
to council requests for technical and policy information, perform
collaborative research, and review any draft materials prepared by the
council. The council may also invite representatives from other
coastal states or Canadian provinces to participate, when appropriate,
as nonvoting members.
(4) The chair of the Washington coastal marine advisory council
must be nominated and elected by a majority of councilmembers. The
term of the chair is one year, and the position is eligible for
reelection. The agenda for each meeting must be developed as a
collaborative process by councilmembers.
(5) The term of office of each member appointed by the governor is
four years. Members are eligible for reappointment.
(6) The Washington coastal marine advisory council shall utilize a
consensus approach to decision making. The council may put a decision
to a vote among councilmembers, in the event that consensus cannot be
reached. The council must include in its bylaws guidelines describing
how consensus works and when a lack of consensus among councilmembers
will trigger a vote.
(7) Consistent with available resources, the Washington coastal
marine advisory council may hire a neutral convener to assist in the
performance of the council's duties, including but not limited to the
dissemination of information to all parties, facilitating selected
tasks as requested by the councilmembers, and facilitation of setting
meeting agendas.
(8) The department of ecology shall provide administrative and
primary staff support for the Washington coastal marine advisory
council.
(9) The Washington coastal marine advisory council must meet at
least twice each year or as needed.
(10) A majority of the members of the Washington coastal marine
advisory council constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.143 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The duties of the Washington coastal marine advisory council
established in section 1 of this act are to:
(a) Serve as a forum for communication concerning coastal waters
issues, including issues related to: Resource management; shellfish
aquaculture; marine and coastal hazards; ocean energy; open ocean
aquaculture; coastal waters research; education; and other coastal
marine-related issues.
(b) Serve as a point of contact for, and collaborate with, the
federal government, regional entities, and other state governments
regarding coastal waters issues.
(c) Provide a forum to discuss coastal waters resource policy,
planning, and management issues; provide either recommendations or
modifications, or both, of principles, and, when appropriate, mediate
disagreements.
(d) Serve as an interagency resource to respond to issues facing
coastal communities and coastal waters resources in a collaborative
manner.
(e) Identify and pursue public and private funding opportunities
for the programs and activities of the council and for relevant
programs and activities of member entities.
(f) Provide recommendations to the governor, the legislature, and
state and local agencies on specific coastal waters resource management
issues, including:
(i) Annual recommendations regarding coastal marine spatial
planning expenditures and projects, including uses of the marine
resources stewardship trust account created in RCW 43.372.070;
(ii) Principles and standards required for emerging new coastal
uses;
(iii) Data gaps and opportunities for scientific research
addressing coastal waters resource management issues;
(iv) Implementation of Washington's ocean action plan 2006;
(v) Development and implementation of coast-wide goals and
strategies, including marine spatial planning; and
(vi) A coastal perspective regarding cross-boundary coastal issues.
(2) In making recommendations under this section, the Washington
coastal marine advisory council shall consider:
(a) The principles and policies articulated in Washington's ocean
action plan; and
(b) The protection and preservation of existing sustainable uses
for current and future generations, including economic stakeholders
reliant on marine waters to stabilize the vitality of the coastal
economy.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.372.070 and 2012 c 252 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The marine resources stewardship trust account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from income derived from the
investment of amounts credited to the account, any grants, gifts, or
donations to the state for the purposes of marine management planning,
marine spatial planning, data compilation, research, or monitoring, and
any appropriations made to the account must be deposited in the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for the purposes
of marine management planning, marine spatial planning, research,
monitoring, and implementation of the marine management plan.
(3) Until July 1, 2016, expenditures from the account may only be
used for the purposes of:
(a) Conducting ecosystem assessment and mapping activities in
marine waters consistent with RCW 43.372.040(6) (a) and (c), with a
focus on assessment and mapping activities related to marine resource
uses and developing potential economic opportunities;
(b) Developing a marine management plan for the state's coastal
waters as that term is defined in RCW 43.143.020; and
(c) Coordination under the west coast governors' agreement on ocean
health, entered into on September 18, 2006, and other regional planning
efforts consistent with RCW 43.372.030.
(4) Expenditures from the account on projects and activities
relating to the state's coastal waters, as defined in RCW 43.143.020,
must be made, to the maximum extent possible, consistent with the
recommendations of the Washington coastal marine advisory council as
provided in section 2 of this act. If expenditures relating to coastal
waters are made in a manner that differs substantially from the
Washington coastal marine advisory council's recommendations, the
responsible agency receiving the appropriation shall provide the
council and appropriate committees of the legislature with a written
explanation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The Washington marine resources advisory
council is created within the office of the governor.
(2) The Washington marine resources advisory council is composed
of:
(a) The governor, or the governor's designee, who shall serve as
the chair of the council;
(b) The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's
designee;
(c) Two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate, one from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one from each of the two
largest caucuses in the house of representatives;
(e) One representative of federally recognized Indian tribes with
reservations lying within or partially within counties bordering the
outer coast, if selected by action of all of the governing bodies of
all federally recognized Indian tribes in such an area;
(f) One representative of federally recognized Indian tribes with
reservations lying within or partially within counties bordering Puget
Sound, if selected by action of all of the governing bodies of all
federally recognized Indian tribes in such an area;
(g) One representative of each of the following sectors, appointed
by the governor:
(i) Commercial fishing;
(ii) Recreational fishing;
(iii) Marine recreation and tourism, other than fishing;
(iv) Coastal shellfish growers;
(v) Puget Sound shellfish growers;
(vi) Marine businesses; and
(vii) Conservation organizations;
(h) The chair of the Washington state conservation commission, or
the chair's designee;
(i) One representative appointed by the largest statewide general
agricultural association;
(j) One representative appointed by the largest statewide business
association;
(k) The chair of the Washington coastal marine advisory council;
(l) The chair of the leadership council of the Puget Sound
partnership;
(m) The director of the department of ecology;
(n) The director of the department of fish and wildlife; and
(o) The chair of the Northwest Straits commission.
(3) The governor shall invite the participation of the following
entities as nonvoting members:
(a) The national oceanic and atmospheric administration; and
(b) Academic institutions conducting scientific research on ocean
acidification.
(4) The governor shall make the appointments of the members under
subsection (2)(g) of this section by September 1, 2013.
(5) Any member appointed by the governor may be removed by the
governor for cause.
(6) A majority of the voting members of the Washington marine
resources advisory council constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(7) The chair of the Washington marine resources advisory council
shall schedule meetings and establish the agenda. The first meeting of
the council must be scheduled by November 1, 2013. The council shall
meet at least twice per calendar year. At each meeting the council
shall afford an opportunity to the public to comment upon agenda items
and other matters relating to the protection and conservation of the
state's ocean resources.
(8) The Washington marine resources advisory council shall have the
following powers and duties:
(a) To maintain a sustainable coordinated focus, including the
involvement of and the collaboration among all levels of government and
nongovernmental entities, the private sector, and citizens by
increasing the state's ability to work to address impacts of ocean
acidification;
(b) To advise and work with the University of Washington and others
to conduct ongoing technical analysis on the effects and sources of
ocean acidification. The recommendations must identify a range of
actions necessary to implement the recommendations and take into
consideration the differences between instate impacts and sources and
out-of-state impacts and sources;
(c) To deliver recommendations to the governor and appropriate
committees in the Washington state senate and house of representatives
that must include, as necessary, any minority reports requested by a
councilmember;
(d) To seek public and private funding resources necessary, and the
commitment of other resources, for ongoing technical analysis to
support the council's recommendations; and
(e) To assist in conducting public education activities regarding
the impacts of and contributions to ocean acidification and regarding
implementation strategies to support the actions adopted by the
legislature.
(9) This section expires June 30, 2017.

--- END ---