BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the offering of
affordable health care to Washington residents is a critical public
policy objective. The legislature further finds that as the affordable
care act is fully implemented, it is critical that quality health care
coverage continue to be available to residents of the state. The
legislature further finds that association health care plans are an
important means of delivering quality and affordable health care
coverage and that continuation of such plans will help mitigate the
costs of implementing the affordable care act. Therefore, the
legislature declares that association health care plans meeting certain
standards should be continued as a means of providing health care as
the affordable care act is implemented.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.010 and 2011 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Group disability insurance is that form of disability
insurance, including stop loss insurance as defined in RCW 48.11.030,
provided by a master policy issued to an employer, to a trustee
appointed by an employer or employers, or to an association of
employers formed for purposes other than obtaining such insurance,
covering, with or without their dependents, the employees, or specified
categories of the employees, of such employers or their subsidiaries or
affiliates, or issued to a labor union, or to an association of
employees formed for purposes other than obtaining such insurance,
covering, with or without their dependents, the members, or specified
categories of the members, of the labor union or association, or issued
pursuant to RCW 48.21.030. Group disability insurance includes the
following groups that qualify for group life insurance:
RCW 48.24.020, 48.24.035, 48.24.040, 48.24.045, 48.24.050,
48.24.060, 48.24.070, 48.24.080, 48.24.090, and 48.24.095. A group
under RCW 48.24.027 does not qualify as a group for the purposes of
this chapter.
(2) Group disability insurance for lines of coverage identified in
RCW 48.43.005(((19))) (26) (e), (h), and (k) offered to a resident of
this state under a group disability insurance policy may be issued to
a group other than the groups described in subsection (1) of this
section subject to the requirements in this subsection.
(a) A group disability insurance policy offered under this
subsection may not be delivered in this state unless the commissioner
finds that:
(i) The issuance of the group policy is not contrary to the best
interest of the public;
(ii) The issuance of the group policy would result in economies of
acquisition or administration; and
(iii) The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premium
charged.
(b) A group disability insurance coverage may not be offered under
this subsection in this state by an insurer under a policy issued in
another state unless the commissioner or the insurance commissioner of
another state having requirements substantially similar to those
contained in this subsection has made a determination that the
requirements have been met.
(3) Until or unless the United States department of labor prohibits
the treatment of a health plan issued to an association or member-governed group as a large group plan, any rate or form filed by any
life and disability carrier for health benefit coverage to employers
purchasing health plans through that association and member-governed
group shall be deemed and may only be reviewed as a negotiated large
group filing by the insurance commissioner if the carrier in good faith
certifies that:
(a) The association or member-governed group operates solely within
the borders of a single state and only includes member employers having
registered Washington state unified business identifiers;
(b) The association or member-governed group has minimum enrollment
of one hundred participants;
(c) Any filed health plan includes all benefit mandates applicable
to fully insured large group health plans;
(d) A filed health plan will not underwrite individuals based upon
health conditions of the individual;
(e) A filed health plan will not be issued to any association that
conditions membership based on age, health status, or medical claims
experience; and
(f) A filed health plan will be offered to all eligible association
members, regardless of their age, health status, or medical claims
experience.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.070 and 1990 c 120 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Forms of contracts between health care service contractors and
participating providers shall be filed with the insurance commissioner
prior to use.
(2) Any contract form not affirmatively disapproved within fifteen
days of filing shall be deemed approved, except that the commissioner
may extend the approval period an additional fifteen days upon giving
notice before the expiration of the initial fifteen-day period. The
commissioner may approve such a contract form for immediate use at any
time. Approval may be subsequently withdrawn for cause.
(3) Until or unless the United States department of labor prohibits
the treatment of a health plan issued to an association or member-governed group as a large group plan, any rate or form filed by any
health care service contractor for health benefit coverage to employers
purchasing health plans through that association and member-governed
group shall be deemed and may only be reviewed as a negotiated large
group filing by the insurance commissioner if the carrier in good faith
certifies that:
(a) The association or member-governed group operates solely within
the borders of a single state and only includes member employers having
registered Washington state unified business identifiers;
(b) The association or member-governed group has minimum enrollment
of one hundred participants;
(c) Any filed health plan includes all benefit mandates applicable
to fully insured large group health plans;
(d) A filed health plan will not underwrite individuals based upon
health conditions of the individual;
(e) A filed health plan will not be issued to any association that
conditions membership based on age, health status, or medical claims
experience; and
(f) A filed health plan will be offered to all eligible association
members, regardless of their age, health status, or medical claims
experience.
(4) Subject to the right of the health care service contractor to
demand and receive a hearing and an automatic stay under chapters 48.04
and 34.05 RCW, the commissioner may disapprove such a contract form if
it is in any respect in violation of this chapter or if it fails to
conform to minimum provisions or standards required by the commissioner
by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.060 and 2008 c 303 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health maintenance organization may enter into agreements
with or for the benefit of persons or groups of persons, which require
prepayment for health care services by or for such persons in
consideration of the health maintenance organization providing health
care services to such persons. Such activity is not subject to the
laws relating to insurance if the health care services are rendered
directly by the health maintenance organization or by any provider
which has a contract or other arrangement with the health maintenance
organization to render health services to enrolled participants.
(2) All forms of health maintenance agreements issued by the
organization to enrolled participants or other marketing documents
purporting to describe the organization's comprehensive health care
services shall comply with such minimum standards as the commissioner
deems reasonable and necessary in order to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, and which fully inform enrolled
participants of the health care services to which they are entitled,
including any limitations or exclusions thereof, and such other rights,
responsibilities and duties required of the contracting health
maintenance organization.
(3) Until or unless the United States department of labor prohibits
the treatment of a health plan issued to an association or member-governed group as a large group plan, any rate or form filed by any
health maintenance organization for health benefit coverage to
employers purchasing health plans through that association and member-governed group shall be deemed and may only be reviewed as a negotiated
large group filing by the insurance commissioner if the carrier in good
faith certifies that:
(a) The association or member-governed group operates solely within
the borders of a single state and only includes member employers having
registered Washington state unified business identifiers;
(b) The association or member-governed group has minimum enrollment
of one hundred participants;
(c) Any filed health plan includes all benefit mandates applicable
to fully insured large group health plans;
(d) A filed health plan will not underwrite individuals based upon
health conditions of the individual;
(e) A filed health plan will not be issued to any association that
conditions membership based on age, health status, or medical claims
experience; and
(f) A filed health plan will be offered to all eligible association
members, regardless of their age, health status, or medical claims
experience.
(4) Subject to the right of the health maintenance organization to
demand and receive a hearing and an automatic stay under chapters 48.04
and 34.05 RCW, the commissioner may disapprove an individual or group
agreement form for any of the following grounds:
(a) If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent,
ambiguous, or misleading clauses, or exceptions or conditions which
unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in
the general coverage of the agreement;
(b) If it has any title, heading, or other indication which is
misleading;
(c) If purchase of health care services thereunder is being
solicited by deceptive advertising;
(d) If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of
patients;
(e) If it is in any respect in violation of this chapter or if it
fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards required by the
commissioner by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW; or
(f) If any agreement for health care services with any state
agency, division, subdivision, board, or commission or with any
political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation fails to comply with state law.
(((4))) (5) In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (2) of
this section, the commissioner may disapprove any agreement if the
benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the amount
charged for the agreement. Rates, or any modification of rates
effective on or after July 1, 2008, for individual health benefit plans
may not be used until sixty days after they are filed with the
commissioner. If the commissioner does not disapprove a rate filing
within sixty days after the health maintenance organization has filed
the documents required in RCW 48.46.062(2) and any rules adopted
pursuant thereto, the filing shall be deemed approved.
(((5))) (6) No health maintenance organization authorized under
this chapter shall cancel or fail to renew the enrollment on any basis
of an enrolled participant or refuse to transfer an enrolled
participant from a group to an individual basis for reasons relating
solely to age, sex, race, or health status. Nothing contained herein
shall prevent cancellation of an agreement with enrolled participants
(a) who violate any published policies of the organization which have
been approved by the commissioner, or (b) who are entitled to become
eligible for medicare benefits and fail to enroll for a medicare
supplement plan offered by the health maintenance organization and
approved by the commissioner, or (c) for failure of such enrolled
participant to pay the approved charge, including cost-sharing,
required under such contract, or (d) for a material breach of the
health maintenance agreement.
(((6))) (7) No agreement form or amendment to an approved agreement
form shall be used unless it is first filed with the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The commissioner shall take the necessary
steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

--- END ---