BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is a theater license to sell beer, including strong beer,
wine, spirits, or all, at retail, for consumption on theater premises,
which contain no more than one hundred twenty seats per screen. Such
license may be issued only to theaters also maintained in a substantial
manner as a place for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals
and provide tabletop accommodations for in-theater dining.
Requirements for complete meals shall be the same as those adopted by
the board in rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for a spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant license authorized by RCW 66.24.400. The annual
fee is four hundred dollars for a beer, wine, and spirits theater
license.
(2) If the theater premises is to be frequented by minors, an
alcohol control plan must be submitted to the board at the time of
application. The alcohol control plan must be approved by the board,
and be prominently posted on the premises, prior to minors being
allowed.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol control plan" means a written, dated, and signed plan
submitted to the board by an applicant or licensee for the entire
theater premises, or rooms or areas therein, that shows where and when
alcohol is permitted, where and when minors are permitted, and the
control measures used to ensure that minors are not able to obtain
alcohol or be exposed to environments where drinking alcohol
predominates.
(b) "Theater" means a place of business where motion pictures or
other primarily nonparticipatory entertainment are shown.
(4) The board must adopt rules regarding alcohol control plans and
necessary control measures to ensure that minors are not able to obtain
alcohol or be exposed to areas where drinking alcohol predominates.
All alcohol control plans must include a requirement that any person
involved in the serving of beer, wine, and/or spirits must have
completed a mandatory alcohol server training program.
(5)(a) A licensee that is an entity that is exempt from taxation
under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended as of January 1, 2013, may enter into
arrangements with a beer, wine, or spirits manufacturer, importer, or
distributor for brand advertising at the theater or promotion of events
held at the theater. The financial arrangements providing for the
brand advertising or promotion of events may not be used as an
inducement to purchase the products of the manufacturer, importer, or
distributor entering into the arrangement and such arrangements may not
result in the exclusion of brands or products of other companies.
(b) The arrangements allowed under this subsection (5) are an
exception to arrangements prohibited under RCW 66.28.305. The board
must monitor the impacts of these arrangements. The board may conduct
audits of a licensee and the affiliated business to determine
compliance with this subsection (5). Audits may include, but are not
limited to: Product selection at the facility; purchase patterns of
the licensee; contracts with the beer, wine, or spirits manufacturer,
importer, or distributor; and the amount allocated or used for beer,
wine, or spirits advertising by the licensee, affiliated business,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor under the arrangements.
(6) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020
relating to fines and suspensions are double for violations involving
minors or the failure to follow the alcohol control plan with respect
to theaters licensed under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.20.300 and 2011 c 325 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout RCW 66.20.310 through 66.20.350 unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alcohol" has the same meaning as "liquor" in RCW 66.04.010.
(2) "Alcohol server" means any person who as part of his or her
employment participates in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages
for on-premise consumption at a retail licensed premise as a regular
requirement of his or her employment, and includes those persons
eighteen years of age or older permitted by the liquor laws of this
state to serve alcoholic beverages with meals.
(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.
(4) "Training entity" means any liquor licensee associations,
independent contractors, private persons, and private or public
schools, that have been certified by the board.
(5) "Retail licensed premises" means any:
(a) Premises licensed to sell alcohol by the glass or by the drink,
or in original containers primarily for consumption on the premises as
authorized by this section and RCW 66.20.310, 66.24.320, 66.24.330,
66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, ((and))
66.24.610, and section 1 of this act;
(b) Distillery licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.140 that is
authorized to serve samples of its own production;
(c) Facility established by a domestic winery for serving and
selling wine pursuant to RCW 66.24.170(4); and
(d) Grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360, but only with
respect to employees whose duties include serving during tasting
activities under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.20.310 and 2011 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) There ((shall be)) is an alcohol server permit, known as a
class 12 permit, for a manager or bartender selling or mixing alcohol,
spirits, wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed
facility.
(b) There ((shall be)) is an alcohol server permit, known as a
class 13 permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines,
or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(c) As provided by rule by the board, a class 13 permit holder may
be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12 permit.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection, every alcohol server employed, under contract or otherwise,
at a retail licensed premise ((shall)) must be issued a class 12 or
class 13 permit.
(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued ((shall)) must be
issued in the name of the applicant and no other person may use the
permit of another permit holder. The holder ((shall)) must present the
permit upon request to inspection by a representative of the board or
a peace officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit ((shall be)) is valid
for employment at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this
subsection.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, no licensee
holding a license as authorized by this section and RCW 66.20.300,
66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450,
66.24.570, 66.24.600, ((and)) 66.24.610, and section 1 of this act may
employ or accept the services of any person without the person first
having a valid class 12 or class 13 permit.
(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose
duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor
((shall)) must have a class 12 or class 13 permit.
(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service
of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing
a valid alcohol server permit.
(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is
valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless
suspended by the board.
(4) The board may suspend or revoke an existing permit if any of
the following occur:
(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any
of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state or has
been convicted at any time of a felony; or
(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that
constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the board.
(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section
does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the
employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises.
The board may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the permit of
the employee who committed the violation or the license of the licensee
upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the
license.
(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for
any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol
server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.
(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol
server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept
employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.
(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary
commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for
which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption
with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such
establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350, except
for employees whose duties include serving during tasting activities
under RCW 66.24.363.

--- END ---