BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.051 and 2006 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created a transportation commission, which shall
consist of seven voting members appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the senate. The present five members of the highway
commission shall serve as five initial members of the transportation
commission until their terms of office as highway commission members
would have expired. The additional two members provided herein for the
transportation commission shall be appointed for initial terms to
expire on June 30, 1982, and June 30, 1983. Thereafter all terms shall
be for six years. No elective state official, state officer, or state
employee shall be a member of the commission. At the time of
appointment or thereafter during their respective terms of office, four
members of the commission shall reside in the western part of the state
and three members shall reside in the eastern part of the state as
divided north and south by the summit of the Cascade mountains. Of the
four members representing the western part of the state, members must
be appointed as follows: (1) One member from northwest Washington; (2)
two members from the central Puget Sound area; and (3) one member from
southwest Washington. In making appointments, the governor must take
into consideration persons representing those areas with a toll
facility. By July 1, 2018, the commission must not have more than four
members identifying a preference for the same major political party.
No more than two members of the commission shall reside in the same
county; however, the governor, or his or her designee, shall serve as
a nonvoting member of the commission. Commission appointments should
reflect both a wide range of transportation interests and a balanced
statewide geographic representation. Commissioners may be removed from
office by the governor before the expiration of their terms for cause.
No member shall be appointed for more than two consecutive terms.

--- END ---