BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.090 and 2012 c 229 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of student financial assistance is created within
and under the direction of the student achievement council.
(2) The purpose of the office is to administer state and federal
financial aid and other education services programs, including the
advanced college tuition payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW, in a
cost-effective manner.
(3) The office shall also solicit and accept grants and donations
from public and private sources for the health professional loan
repayment and scholarship program as required under RCW 28B.115.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.115.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 205 are each
amended to read as follows:
The health professional loan repayment and scholarship program is
established for credentialed health professionals and residents serving
in health professional shortage areas. The program shall be
administered by the office. In administering this program, the office
shall:
(1) Select credentialed health care professionals and residents to
participate in the loan repayment portion of the loan repayment and
scholarship program and select eligible students to participate in the
scholarship portion of the loan repayment and scholarship program;
(2) Adopt rules and develop guidelines to administer the program;
(3) Collect and manage repayments from participants who do not meet
their service obligations under this chapter;
(4) Publicize the program, particularly to maximize participation
among individuals in shortage areas and among populations expected to
experience the greatest growth in the workforce;
(5) Contract with a fund-raiser to solicit and accept grants and
donations from public and private sources for the program. The fund-raiser must be paid on a contingency fee basis, which shall be based on
the total funds raised by the fund-raiser for the program each year.
The amount the fund-raiser is paid must not exceed fifteen percent of
the total amount raised for the program each year; and
(6) Develop criteria for a contract for service in lieu of the
service obligation where appropriate, that may be a combination of
service and payment.

--- END ---