BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.200 and 2010 c 263 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon application by the committed or conditionally released
person, the secretary shall determine whether or not reasonable grounds
exist for release. In making this determination, the secretary may
consider the reports filed under RCW 10.77.060, 10.77.110, 10.77.140,
and 10.77.160, and other reports and evaluations provided by
professionals familiar with the case. If the secretary approves the
release he or she then shall authorize the person to petition the
court.
(2) In instances in which persons have not made application for
release, but the secretary believes, after consideration of the reports
filed under RCW 10.77.060, 10.77.110, 10.77.140, and 10.77.160, and
other reports and evaluations provided by professionals familiar with
the case, that reasonable grounds exist for release, the secretary may
petition the court. If the secretary petitions the court for release
under this subsection, notice of the petition must be provided to the
person who is the subject of the petition and to his or her attorney.
(3) The petition shall be served upon the court and the prosecuting
attorney. The court, upon receipt of the petition for release, shall
within forty-five days order a hearing. Continuance of the hearing
date shall only be allowed for good cause shown. The prosecuting
attorney shall represent the state, and shall have the right to have
the petitioner examined by an expert or professional person of the
prosecuting attorney's choice. If the petitioner is indigent, and the
person so requests, the court shall appoint a qualified expert or
professional person to examine him or her. If the petitioner has a
developmental disability, the examination shall be performed by a
developmental disabilities professional. The hearing shall be before
a jury if demanded by either the petitioner or the prosecuting
attorney. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner to show by
a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner no longer presents,
as a result of a mental disease or defect, a substantial danger to
other persons, or a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts
jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under further
control by the court or other persons or institutions.
(4) For purposes of this section, a person affected by a mental
disease or defect in a state of remission is considered to have a
mental disease or defect requiring supervision when the disease may,
with reasonable medical probability, occasionally become active and,
when active, render the person a danger to others. Upon a finding that
the petitioner has a mental disease or defect in a state of remission
under this subsection, the court may deny release, or place or continue
such a person on conditional release.
(5) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient
from petitioning the court for release or conditional release from the
institution in which he or she is committed. The petition shall be
served upon the court, the prosecuting attorney, and the secretary.
Upon receipt of such petition, the secretary shall develop a
recommendation as provided in subsection (1) of this section and
provide the secretary's recommendation to all parties and the court.
The issue to be determined on such proceeding is whether the
petitioner, as a result of a mental disease or defect, is a substantial
danger to other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of
committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless
kept under further control by the court or other persons or
institutions.
(6) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the committed
person from petitioning for release by writ of habeas corpus.

--- END ---