BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to a public works project that is
undertaken to repair damage caused by a wildfire that: (a) Exceeds
twenty thousand acres in size; and (b) originates in a county east of
the summit of the Cascade mountains.
(2) For purposes of this section, "wildfire" means a fire that
results in a mobilization by the department of natural resources.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---