BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.040 and 2012 c 129 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum
or sums due on account of a public works contract, it shall be the duty
of the officer or person charged with the custody and disbursement of
public funds to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor
from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer a
"Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a contract in
excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages shall include:
(a) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(b) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers
entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated
number of workers in each classification.
Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved
by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to the disbursing officer. Unless
otherwise authorized by the department of labor and industries, each
voucher claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a project
estimate shall state that the prevailing wages have been paid in
accordance with the prefiled statement or statements of intent to pay
prevailing wages on file with the public agency. Following the final
acceptance of a public works project, it shall be the duty of the
officer charged with the disbursement of public funds, to require the
contractor and each and every subcontractor from the contractor or a
subcontractor to submit to such officer an "Affidavit of Wages Paid"
before the funds retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011
are released to the contractor. If a subcontractor performing work on
a public works project fails to submit an "affidavit of wages paid"
form, the contractor or subcontractor with whom the subcontractor had
a contractual relationship for the project may file the forms on behalf
of the nonresponsive subcontractor. Affidavit forms may only be filed
on behalf of a nonresponsive subcontractor who has ceased operations or
failed to file as required by this section. Filings made on behalf of
a subcontractor may not be accepted sooner than thirty-one days after
the acceptance date of the public works project and the contractor
filing the affidavit must accept responsibility for payment of
prevailing wages unpaid by the subcontractor on the project pursuant to
RCW 39.12.020 and 39.12.065. Intentionally filing a false affidavit on
behalf of a subcontractor subjects the filer to the same penalties as
are provided in RCW 39.12.050. Each affidavit of wages paid must be
certified by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to the disbursing officer.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five
hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works
process under RCW 39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency shall retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency shall require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an
affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid,
the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full,
including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.011. Within thirty days of receipt of the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency shall submit the affidavit
of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of labor
and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid shall be on forms approved by the department of labor and
industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in this subsection (2) ((of
this section)), the awarding agency shall pay the wages due directly to
the claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages
stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take
action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor or
subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract
of the awarding agency for up to one year.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow an
awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than two
thousand five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the
procedures required by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Before payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any
county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, it
is the duty of the officer or person charged with the custody and
disbursement of public funds to require the contractor and each and
every subcontractor to submit to the officer current, complete, and
accurate certified payroll records. Following the final acceptance of
a public works project, it is the duty of the officer charged with the
disbursement of public funds to require the contractor and each and
every subcontractor to submit current, complete, and accurate certified
payroll records before final payment is made and funds retained
according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011 are released to the
contractor.
(4) Certified payroll records provided to the officer or person
charged with the custody and disbursement of public funds under this
section must be submitted on forms approved by the industrial
statistician.

--- END ---