BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote the
economic development of our state's aerospace cluster and increase the
tax revenues collected by the state through promoting a competitive
marketplace for storing and modifying unfurnished, noncommercial
aircraft. The legislature finds that Washington is currently losing
these types of jobs to other states, resulting in the loss of high-wage
jobs and new tax revenue. Further, the legislature finds that the
current tax statutes are an impediment to encouraging the development
of aerospace clusters in our state. Therefore, the legislature intends
to modify our state's tax policy to encourage aerospace cluster
development within the state and increase tax revenues.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.68.250 and 2003 c 375 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every aircraft ((shall)) must be registered with the department
for each calendar year in which the aircraft is operated or is based
within this state. A fee of fifteen dollars ((shall be)) is charged
for each such registration and each annual renewal thereof.
(2) Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate,
permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of
the aircraft, and payment of the excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for
the privilege of using the aircraft within this state during the year
for which the registration is sought, and payment of the registration
fee required by this section ((shall be)) are the only requisites for
registration of an aircraft under this section.
(3) The registration fee imposed by this section ((shall be)) is
payable to and collected by the secretary. The fee for any calendar
year must be paid during the month of January, and ((shall)) must be
collected by the secretary at the time of the collection by him or her
of the ((said)) excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the
requirements for registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she
((shall thereupon)) must issue to the owner of the aircraft a
certificate of registration therefor. The secretary ((shall)) must pay
to the state treasurer the registration fees collected under this
section, which registration fees ((shall)) must be credited to the
aeronautics account in the transportation fund.
(4) It ((shall)) is not ((be)) necessary for the registrant to
provide the secretary with originals or copies of federal certificates,
permits, ratings, or licenses. The secretary ((shall)) must issue
certificates of registration, or such other evidences of registration
or payment of fees as he or she may deem proper; and in connection
therewith may prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition
of such certificates or other evidences.
(5) The provisions of this section ((shall)) do not apply to:
(((1))) (a) An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the
service of any government or any political subdivision thereof,
including the government of the United States, any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, which is
not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;
(((2))) (b) An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign
country;
(((3))) (c) An aircraft ((which)) that is owned by a nonresident
and registered in another state((: PROVIDED, That if said aircraft
shall remain in and/or be based in this state for a period of ninety
days or longer it shall not be exempt under this section)) if:
(i) The aircraft remains in this state or is based in this state,
or both, for a period less than ninety days; or
(ii) The aircraft is a large private airplane as defined in section
3 of this act and remains in this state for a period of ninety days or
longer, but only when:
(A) The airplane is in this state exclusively for the purpose of
repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, including any flight testing
related to the repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, or for the
purpose of continual storage of not less than one full calendar year;
(B) An employee of the facility providing these services is on
board the airplane during any flight testing; and
(C) Within ninety days of the date the airplane first arrived in
this state during the calendar year, the nonresident files a written
statement with the department indicating that the airplane is exempt
from registration under this subsection (5)(c)(ii). The written
statement must be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and must include such information as the department
requires. The department may require additional periodic verification
that the airplane remains exempt from registration under this
subsection (5)(c)(ii) and that written statements conform with the
provisions of RCW 9A.72.085;
(((4))) (d) An aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying
constituting an act of interstate or foreign commerce;
(((5))) (e) An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer
thereof while being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for
the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the aircraft;
(((6))) (f) An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery,
test, or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft
dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW; and
(((7))) (g) An aircraft based within the state that is in an
unairworthy condition, is not operated within the registration period,
and has obtained a written exemption issued by the secretary.
(6) The secretary ((shall)) must be notified within thirty days of
any change in ownership of a registered aircraft. The notification
((shall)) must contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX number of the aircraft,
the full name and address of the former owner, and the full name and
address of the new owner. For failure to so notify the secretary, the
registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary, subject
to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of
ten dollars by the new owner.
(7) A municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases
an airport, as defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate,
((shall)) must require from an aircraft owner proof of aircraft
registration as a condition of leasing or selling tiedown or hanger
space for an aircraft. It is the responsibility of the lessee or
purchaser to register the aircraft. The airport ((shall)) must work
with the aviation division to assist in its efforts to register
aircraft by providing information about based aircraft on an annual
basis as requested by the division.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(i) Sales of large private airplanes to nonresidents of this state;
and
(ii) Sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving large private
airplanes owned by nonresidents of this state.
(b) The exemption provided by this section applies only when the
large private airplane is not required to be registered with the
department of transportation, or its successor, under chapter 47.68
RCW. The airplane owner or lessee claiming an exemption under this
section must provide the department, upon request, a copy of the
written statement required under RCW 47.68.250(5)(c)(ii) documenting
the airplane's registration exemption and any additional information
the department may require.
(2) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption
certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption
certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed
under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(3) Upon request, the department of transportation must provide to
the department of revenue information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.
(4) For purposes of this section "large private airplane" means an
airplane not used in interstate commerce, not owned or leased by a
government entity, weighing more than forty-one thousand pounds, and
assigned a category A, B, C, or D test flow management system aircraft
weight class by the federal aviation administration's office of
aviation policy and plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use
of:
(i) Large private airplanes owned by nonresidents of this state;
and
(ii) Labor and services rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving large private airplanes owned by nonresidents of
this state.
(b) The exemption provided by this section applies only when the
large private airplane is not required to be registered with the
department of transportation, or its successor, under chapter 47.68
RCW. The airplane owner or lessee claiming an exemption under this
section must provide the department, upon request, a copy of the
written statement required under RCW 47.68.250(5)(c)(ii) documenting
the airplane's registration exemption and any additional information
the department may require.
(2) Upon request, the department of transportation must provide to
the department of revenue information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.
(3) For purposes of this section, "large private airplane" has the
same meaning as in section 3 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.48.100 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 12 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any
government or any political subdivision thereof, including the
government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or the District of Columbia, which are not engaged
in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;
(2) Aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;
(3) Aircraft ((which)) that are owned by a nonresident and
registered in another state((. However, if any such aircraft remains
in and/or is based in this state for a period of ninety days or longer
it is not exempt under this section)), if the aircraft remains in this
state or is based in this state, or both, for a period less than ninety
days;
(4)(a) Aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying ((which))
that constitutes interstate or foreign commerce, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) The exemption provided by (a) of this subsection does not apply
to aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying that constitutes
interstate or foreign commerce when such aircraft will be in this state
exclusively for the purpose of continual storage of not less than one
full calendar year; ((and))
(5) Aircraft owned by the manufacturer thereof while being operated
for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews
for purchasers of the aircraft;
(((5))) (6) Aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test,
or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft
dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW;
(((6))) (7) Aircraft owned by a nonresident of this state if the
aircraft is kept at an airport in this state and that airport is
jointly owned or operated by a municipal corporation or other
governmental entity of this state and a municipal corporation or other
governmental entity of another state, and the owner or operator of the
aircraft provides the department with proof that the owner or operator
has paid all taxes, license fees, and registration fees required by the
state in which the owner or operator resides; and
(((7))) (8) Aircraft that are: (a) Owned by a nonprofit
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code; and (b)
exclusively used to provide emergency medical transportation services.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.48.100 and 1999 c 302 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to:
(1) Aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any
government or any political subdivision thereof, including the
government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or the District of Columbia, which are not engaged
in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;
(2) Aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;
(3) Aircraft ((which)) that are owned by a nonresident and
registered in another state((: PROVIDED, That if any such aircraft
shall remain in and/or be based in this state for a period of ninety
days or longer it shall not be exempt under this section)), if the
aircraft remains in this state or is based in this state, or both, for
a period less than ninety days;
(4)(a) Aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying ((which))
that constitutes interstate or foreign commerce, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) The exemption provided by (a) of this subsection does not apply
to aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying that constitutes
interstate or foreign commerce when such aircraft will be in this state
exclusively for the purpose of continual storage of not less than one
full calendar year; ((and))
(5) Aircraft owned by the manufacturer thereof while being operated
for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews
for purchasers of the aircraft;
(6) Aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or
demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer
licensed under Title 14 RCW; and
(7) Aircraft owned by a nonresident of this state if the aircraft
is kept at an airport in this state and that airport is jointly owned
or operated by a municipal corporation or other governmental entity of
this state and a municipal corporation or other governmental entity of
another state, and the owner or operator of the aircraft provides the
department with proof that the owner or operator has paid all taxes,
license fees, and registration fees required by the state in which the
owner or operator resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Except for section 6 of this act, this act
takes effect January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 5 of this act expires January 1,
2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 6 of this act takes effect January
1, 2020.

--- END ---