BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.515 and 2007 c 396 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall provide support for
statewide coordination for math, science, and technology, including
employing a statewide director for math, science, and technology. The
duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, obtain a
statewide license, or otherwise obtain and disseminate, an interactive,
project-based high school and middle school technology curriculum that
includes a comprehensive professional development component for
teachers and, if possible, counselors, and also includes a systematic
program evaluation. The curriculum must be distributed to all school
districts, or as many as feasible, by the 2007-08 school year;
(2) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to assist school districts with implementing
an ongoing, inquiry-based science program that is based on a research-based model of systemic reform and aligned with the Washington state
science grade level expectations;
(3) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to provide enriching opportunities in
mathematics, engineering, and science for underrepresented students in
grades kindergarten through twelve using exemplary materials and
instructional approaches;
(4) In an effort to increase precollege and prework interest in
math, science, and technology fields, in collaboration with the
community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher
education, and the workforce training and education coordinating board,
conducting outreach efforts to attract middle and high school students
to careers in math, science, and technology and to educate students
about the coursework that is necessary to be adequately prepared to
succeed in these fields;
(5) Coordinating youth opportunities in math, science, and
technology, including facilitating student participation in school
clubs, state-level fairs, national competitions, and encouraging
partnerships between students and university faculty or industry to
facilitate such student participation;
(6) Developing and maintaining public-private partnerships to
generate business and industry assistance to accomplish the following:
(a) Increasing student engagement and career awareness, including
increasing student participation in the youth opportunities in
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) Creation and promotion of student scholarships, internships,
and apprenticeships;
(c) Provision of relevant teacher experience and training,
including on-the-job professional development opportunities;
(d) Upgrading kindergarten through twelfth grade school equipment
and facilities to support high quality math, science, and technology
programs;
(7) Assembling a cadre of inspiring speakers employed or
experienced in the relevant fields to speak to kindergarten through
twelfth grade students to demonstrate the breadth of the opportunities
in the relevant fields as well as share the types of coursework that
((is [are])) are necessary for someone to be successful in the relevant
field;
(8) Providing technical assistance to schools and school districts,
including working with counselors in support of the math, science, and
technology programs; ((and))
(9) Subject to available funding, working with the state board for
community and technical colleges to develop high-demand applied
baccalaureate programs that align with high quality secondary science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics programs and career and
technical education programs; and
(10) Reporting annually to the legislature about the actions taken
to provide statewide coordination for math, science, and technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose and in addition to other applied baccalaureate degree
programs and pursuant to the criteria in RCW 28B.50.810, the college
board shall select community or technical colleges to develop and offer
two programs that support the continuation of high quality science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics programs or career and
technical education programs offered to students in kindergarten
through twelfth grade who are prepared and aspire to continue in these
high-demand areas in college and the workforce. Subject to available
funding, a college selected under this section may develop the
curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to a high-demand
applied baccalaureate degree.

--- END ---