BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.50.010 and 1991 c 3 s 103 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person shall be regarded as practicing midwifery within the
meaning of this chapter who shall render medical aid for a fee or
compensation to a woman during prenatal, intrapartum, and postpartum
stages or to her infant up to two weeks of age or who shall advertise
as a midwife by signs, printed cards, or otherwise. Nothing shall be
construed in this chapter to prohibit gratuitous services. It shall be
the duty of a midwife to consult with a physician whenever there are
significant deviations from normal in either the mother or the infant.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.50.065 and 1991 c 332 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant holding a credential in another state may be
credentialed to practice in this state without examination if the
secretary determines that the other state's credentialing standards are
substantially equivalent to the standards in this state.
(2) The secretary shall write rules to bridge the gap between
requirements of national certification of certified professional
midwives and state requirements for licensure for licensed midwives.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.50.102 and 1996 c 191 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Every person licensed to practice midwifery shall register with
the secretary and pay a renewal fee)) (1) A licensed midwife must renew
his or her license according to the following requirements:
(a) Completion of a minimum of thirty hours of continuing
education, approved by the secretary, every three years;
(b) Proof of participation in a Washington state coordinated
quality improvement program as detailed in rule;
(c) Proof of participation in data submission on perinatal outcomes
to a national or state research organization, as detailed in rule; and
(d) Fees determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280.
(2) The secretary shall write rules regarding the renewal
requirements and the department's process for verification of the
third-party data submission.

--- END ---