BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a licensee complies with the provisions of RCW 66.28.280,
66.28.285, 66.28.290, 66.28.295, 66.28.300, 66.28.305, 66.28.310, and
66.28.315, nothing in this title prohibits any number or combination of
licenses or approvals from being issued or approved for the same
premises, overlapping premises, adjacent premises, or separate premises
to the same licensee or to different licensees under common ownership.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits different licensees from
allocating distinct parts of a single business location to their
separate licenses.

--- END ---