BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Given the multiple complex forces that lead
to boarding and overcrowding in emergency departments, the legislature
intends to not prescribe a solution, but to provide incentives for each
individual institution to find its own solution to emergency department
overcrowding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health must convene a
stakeholders meeting to include, but not be limited to, the following:
The Washington state medical association, the Washington state hospital
association, the Washington chapter of the American college of
emergency physicians, and other interested parties. At a minimum, the
stakeholder group must review the following recommendations and
determine which methods are in use now in the state of Washington, and
which will best reduce boarding practices in hospitals, taking into
account the varying patient needs and hospital resources in hospitals
throughout the state:
(a) Moving patients out of emergency departments as soon as they
are admitted by requiring other hospital departments to care for
additional emergency department patients;
(b) Using industrial production models to move patients through the
emergency department more efficiently;
(c) Eliminating delays in registration and laboratory tests for
emergency department patients;
(d) Providing patients with home care aides to avoid admission of
emergency department patients;
(e) Coordinating the discharge of hospital patients before noon to
improve the flow of patients through emergency departments by making
more inpatient beds available to emergency patients; and
(f) Coordinating the scheduling of elective patients and surgical
patients to avoid high use of inpatient beds during the week and
exploring scheduling some procedures to use beds on weekends.
(2) To assist the department in developing recommendations under
subsection (1) of this section, all hospitals subject to chapter 70.41
RCW must provide the department of health with data on their emergency
department boarding rates and current activities aimed at reducing
boarding at their facilities.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "boarding" has the same
meaning as in section 3 of this act.
(4) The health care authority must report the results of the
stakeholder group's activities to the health care committees of the
senate and the house of representatives by December 31, 2013.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, beginning
January 1, 2015, hospitals that experience boarding and overcrowding
are subject to a fine of five hundred dollars per patient held per day,
determined at six o'clock in the morning daily.
(2) Fines collected under this section must be used to fund the
prescription monitoring program and to assist in the coordination of
care efforts identified by the stakeholder group under section 2 of
this act. If fines exceed the amount needed to fund the prescription
monitoring program, excess funds must be used to fund access to care
for uninsured patients programs.
(3) The penalty under subsection (1) of this section does not apply
during recognized epidemic periods and other unforeseen events to be
determined by the stakeholder group in section 2 of this act.
(4) The department of health must adopt rules establishing what
constitutes a recognized epidemic period and other unforeseen events
for the purposes of enforcing this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "boarding" means the practice
of holding patients in a hospital emergency department after the
decision to admit them to the hospital has been made and who do not
require emergency care.

--- END ---