BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The protection of vulnerable residents living in adult family
homes and other long-term care facilities in the state is a matter of
ongoing concern and grave importance. In 2011, the legislature
examined problems with the quality of care and oversight of adult
family homes in Washington. The 2011 legislature passed Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1277 to address some of these issues, and in
addition, created an adult family home quality assurance panel, chaired
by the state long-term care ombudsman, to meet and make recommendations
to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2012, for further
improvements in adult family home care and the oversight of the homes
by the department of social and health services.
(2) The legislature recognizes that significant progress has been
made over the years in adult family home care, and that many adult
family homes provide high quality care and are the preferred
alternative for many residents in contrast to a larger care facility
setting. The legislature finds however that the quality of care in
some adult family homes would be improved, and abuse and neglect would
decline, if these homes' caregivers and providers received better
training and mentoring, residents and their families were more informed
and able to select an appropriate home, and oversight by the department
of social and health services was more vigorous and prompt against
poorly performing homes. It is therefore the intent of the legislature
to enact the recommendations included in the adult family home quality
assurance panel report in order to improve the quality of care of
vulnerable residents and the department's oversight of adult family
homes.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.128.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 403 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An application for license shall be made to the department upon
forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the
department reasonably requires.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, the department shall
issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that
the applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the
rules adopted under this chapter. The department may not issue a
license if (a) the applicant or a person affiliated with the applicant
has prior violations of this chapter relating to the adult family home
subject to the application or any other adult family home, or of any
other law regulating residential care facilities within the past ten
years that resulted in revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of a
license or contract with the department; or (b) the applicant or a
person affiliated with the applicant has a history of significant
noncompliance with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations
relating to the provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or
to children. A person is considered affiliated with an applicant if
the person is listed on the license application as a partner, officer,
director, resident manager, or majority owner of the applying entity,
or is the spouse of the applicant.
(3) The license fee shall be submitted with the application.
(4) Proof of financial solvency must be submitted when requested by
the department.
(5) The department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the
decision granting or denying an application for a license. An
applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or her
application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt
of the notice of denial.
(6) The department shall not issue a license to a provider if the
department finds that the provider or spouse of the provider or any
partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or majority owner has
a history of significant noncompliance with federal or state
regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services to vulnerable
adults or to children.
(7) The department shall license an adult family home for the
maximum level of care that the adult family home may provide. The
department shall define, in rule, license levels based upon the
education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed provider
or staff.
(8) For adult family homes that serve residents with special needs
such as dementia, developmental disabilities, or mental illness,
specialty training is required of providers and resident managers
consistent with RCW 70.128.230, and also is required for caregivers,
with standardized competency testing for caregivers hired after the
effective date of this section, as set forth by the department in rule.
The department shall examine, with input from experts, providers,
consumers, and advocates, whether the existing specialty training
courses are adequate for providers, resident managers, and caregivers
to meet these residents' special needs, are sufficiently standardized
in curricula and instructional techniques, and are accompanied by
effective tools to fairly evaluate successful student completion. The
department may enhance the existing specialty training requirements by
rule, and may update curricula, instructional techniques, and
competency testing based upon its review and stakeholder input. In
addition, the department shall examine, with input from experts,
providers, consumers, and advocates, whether additional specialty
training categories should be created for adult family homes serving
residents with other special needs, such as traumatic brain injury,
skilled nursing, or bariatric care. The department may establish, by
rule, additional specialty training categories and requirements for
providers, resident managers, and caregivers, if needed to better serve
residents with such special needs.
(9) The department shall establish, by rule, standards used to
license nonresident providers and multiple facility operators.
(((9))) (10) The department shall establish, by rule, for multiple
facility operators educational standards substantially equivalent to
recognized national certification standards for residential care
administrators.
(((10))) (11) At the time of an application for an adult family
home license and upon the annual fee renewal date set by the
department, the licensee shall pay a license fee. Beginning July 1,
2011, the per bed license fee and any processing fees, including the
initial license fee, must be established in the omnibus appropriations
act and any amendment or additions made to that act. The license fees
established in the omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or
additions made to that act may not exceed the department's annual
licensing and oversight activity costs and must include the
department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee
attributed to medicaid clients.
(((11))) (12) A provider who receives notification of the
department's initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or
revocation of an adult family home license may, in lieu of appealing
the department's action, surrender or relinquish the license. The
department shall not issue a new license to or contract with the
provider, for the purposes of providing care to vulnerable adults or
children, for a period of twenty years following the surrendering or
relinquishment of the former license. The licensing record shall
indicate that the provider relinquished or surrendered the license,
without admitting the violations, after receiving notice of the
department's initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or
revocation of a license.
(((12))) (13) The department shall establish, by rule, the
circumstances requiring a change in the licensed provider, which
include, but are not limited to, a change in ownership or control of
the adult family home or provider, a change in the provider's form of
legal organization, such as from sole proprietorship to partnership or
corporation, and a dissolution or merger of the licensed entity with
another legal organization. The new provider is subject to the
provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and
other applicable law. In order to ensure that the safety of residents
is not compromised by a change in provider, the new provider is
responsible for correction of all violations that may exist at the time
of the new license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to enhance the selection of an appropriate adult
family home, all adult family homes licensed under this chapter shall
disclose the scope of, and charges for, the care, services, and
activities provided by the home or customarily arranged for by the
home. The disclosure must be provided to the home's residents and the
residents' representatives, if any, prior to admission, and to
interested prospective residents and their representatives upon
request, using standardized disclosure forms developed by the
department with stakeholders' input. The home may also disclose
supplemental information to prospective residents and other interested
persons.
(2)(a) The disclosure forms that the department develops must be
standardized, reasonable in length, and easy to read. The form setting
forth the scope of an adult family home's care, services, and
activities must be available from the adult family home and through a
link from the department's web site as provided in this section. This
form must indicate, among other categories, the scope of personal care
and medication service provided, the scope of skilled nursing services
or nursing delegation provided or available, any specialty care
designations held by the home, the customary number of caregivers
present during the day and whether the home has awake staff at night,
any particular cultural or language access available, and clearly state
whether the home admits medicaid clients or retains residents who later
become eligible for medicaid. The adult family home shall provide or
arrange for the care, services, and activities disclosed in its form.
(b) The department must, with stakeholder input, develop a second
standardized disclosure form for use by adult family homes to set forth
an adult family home's charges for its care, services, items, and
activities, including the charges not covered by the home's daily or
monthly rate, or by medicaid, medicare, or other programs. This form
must be available from the adult family home and disclosed to residents
and their representatives, if any, prior to admission, and to
interested prospective residents and their representatives upon
request.
(3)(a) If the adult family home decreases the scope of care,
services, or activities it provides, due to circumstances beyond the
home's control, the home shall provide a minimum of thirty days'
written notice to the residents, and the residents' representative if
any, before the effective date of the decrease in the scope of care,
services, or activities provided.
(b) If the adult family home voluntarily decreases the scope of
care, services, or activities it provides, and any such decrease will
result in the discharge of one or more residents, then ninety days'
written notice must be provided prior to the effective date of the
decrease. Notice must be given to the residents and the residents'
representative, if any.
(c) If the adult family home increases the scope of care, services,
or activities it provides, the home shall promptly provide written
notice to the residents, and the residents' representative if any, and
shall indicate the date on which the increase is effective.
(4) When the care needs of a resident exceed the disclosed scope of
care or services that the adult family home provides, the home may
exceed the care or services previously disclosed, provided that the
additional care or services are permitted by the adult family home's
license, and the home can safely and appropriately serve the resident
with available staff or through the provision of reasonable
accommodations required by state or federal law. The provision of care
or services to a resident that exceed those previously disclosed by the
home does not mean that the home is capable of or required to provide
the same care or services to other residents, unless required as a
reasonable accommodation under state or federal law.
(5) An adult family home may deny admission to a prospective
resident if the home determines that the needs of the prospective
resident cannot be met, so long as the adult family home operates in
compliance with state and federal law, including RCW 70.129.030(3) and
the reasonable accommodation requirements of state and federal
antidiscrimination laws.
(6) The department shall work with consumers, advocates, and other
stakeholders to combine and improve existing web resources to create a
more robust, comprehensive, and user-friendly web site for family
members, residents, and prospective residents of adult family homes and
other licensed long-term care facilities in Washington. The department
may contract with outside vendors and experts to assist in the
development of the web site. The web site should be easy to navigate
and have links to information important for residents, prospective
residents, and their family members or representatives including, but
not limited to: (a) Explanations of the types of licensed long-term
care facilities, levels of care, and specialty designations; (b) lists
of suggested questions when looking for a care facility; (c) warning
signs of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation; and (d) contact
information for the department and the long-term care ombudsman. In
addition, the consumer oriented web site should include a searchable
list of all licensed long-term care facilities in Washington, with
links to recent inspection and investigation reports and any
enforcement actions by the department. To facilitate the comparison of
homes and facilities, the web site should also include a link to each
licensed adult family home's disclosure form required by subsection
(2)(a) of this section, and to each licensed assisted living facility's
disclosure form required by RCW 18.20.300. The department must study
the feasibility of its web site, including periodically updated
information about whether a home or facility has a current vacancy, if
the home or facility provides such information to the department, or
including links to other consumer-oriented web sites with vacancy
information.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.128.160 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 208 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the actions
listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the
department finds that an adult family home provider has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated an adult family home without a license or under a
revoked license;
(c) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of at least one hundred dollars per day
per violation;
(d) Impose civil penalties of up to three thousand dollars for each
incident that violates adult family home licensing laws and rules,
including, but not limited to, chapters 70.128, 70.129, 74.34, and
74.39A RCW and related rules. Each day upon which the same or
substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to
the assessment of a separate penalty;
(e) Impose civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars for a
current or former licensed provider who is operating an unlicensed
home;
(f) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; or
(g) Suspend admissions to the adult family home by imposing stop
placement.
(3) When the department orders stop placement, the facility shall
not admit any person until the stop placement order is terminated. The
department may approve readmission of a resident to the facility from
a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement. The department
shall terminate the stop placement ((when)) only after: (a) The
violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and
(b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the
violations previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit
the department finds new violations that the department reasonably
believes will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop
placement shall remain in effect until the new stop placement is
imposed. In order to protect the home's existing residents from
potential ongoing neglect, when the provider has been cited for a
violation that is repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or presents a
threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents, and
the department has imposed a stop placement, the department shall also
impose a condition on license or other remedy to facilitate or spur
prompter compliance if the violation has not been corrected, and the
provider has not exhibited the capacity to maintain correction, within
forty-five days of the stop placement.
(4) Nothing in subsection (3) of this section is intended to apply
to stop placement imposed in conjunction with a license revocation or
summary suspension or to prevent the department from imposing a
condition on license or other remedy prior to forty-five days after a
stop placement, if the department considers it necessary to protect one
or more residents' well-being. After a department finding of a
violation for which a stop placement has been imposed, the department
shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working
days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the
violation. For violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected
following a previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to
one or more residents' well-being, including violations of residents'
rights, the department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as
appropriate to ensure correction of the violation. Verification of
correction of all other violations may be made by either a department
on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation found by
the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the
department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing
in this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's
authority and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for
residents, including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to
ensure that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance
with this chapter.
(5) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this
section, except that orders of the department imposing license
suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a license
are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue in effect
pending any hearing.
(6) A separate adult family home account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from civil penalties imposed
under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Only the
director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The
department shall use the special account only for promoting the quality
of life and care of residents living in adult family homes.
(7) The department shall by rule specify criteria as to when and
how the sanctions specified in this section must be applied. The
criteria must provide for the imposition of incrementally more severe
penalties for deficiencies that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive,
or present a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more
residents. The criteria shall be tiered such that those homes
consistently found to have deficiencies will be subjected to
increasingly severe penalties. The department shall implement prompt
and specific enforcement remedies without delay for providers found to
have delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in problems
that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or present a threat to the
health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents. In the selection
of remedies, the health, safety, and well-being of residents must be of
paramount importance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If during an inspection, reinspection, or complaint
investigation by the department, an adult family home corrects a
violation or deficiency that the department discovers, the department
shall record and consider such violation or deficiency for purposes of
the home's compliance history; however, the licensor or complaint
investigator may not include in the home's report the violation or
deficiency if the violation or deficiency:
(a) Is corrected to the satisfaction of the department prior to the
exit conference;
(b) Is not recurring; and
(c) Did not pose a significant risk of harm or actual harm to a
resident.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "recurring" means that the
violation or deficiency was found under the same regulation or statute
in one of the two most recent preceding inspections, reinspections, or
complaint investigations.

--- END ---