BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.522 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 29, 2011 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 2, and 2011 c 316 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Managed health care system" means any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring
organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by
contract health care services covered under this chapter and rendered
by licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated basis and that meets the
requirements of section 1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under
section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(b) "Nonparticipating provider" means a person, health care
provider, practitioner, facility, or entity, acting within their scope
of practice, that does not have a written contract to participate in a
managed health care system's provider network, but provides health care
services to enrollees of programs authorized under this chapter whose
health care services are provided by the managed health care system.
(2) The authority shall enter into agreements with managed health
care systems to provide health care services to recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families under the following conditions:
(a) Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand
recipients statewide;
(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of
all recipients of temporary assistance for needy families;
(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the
federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems
in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their
enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the authority may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of
a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the authority shall not restrict a
recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as
established by the authority by rule;
(d) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating
managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number
of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons
served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the
authority under federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(e)(i) In negotiating with managed health care systems the
authority shall adopt a uniform procedure to enter into contractual
arrangements, to be included in contracts issued or renewed on or after
January 1, 2012, including:
(A) Standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;
(B) The financial integrity of the responding system;
(C) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care
management within health homes;
(D) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that,
by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and
inpatient use; and
(E) Promoting provider participation in the program of training and
technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions
described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocation of funds to support
provider participation in the training, unless the managed care system
is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in place for
chronic care management.
(ii)(A) Health home services contracted for under this subsection
may be prioritized to enrollees with complex, high cost, or multiple
chronic conditions.
(B) Contracts that include the items in (e)(i)(C) through (E) of
this subsection must not exceed the rates that would be paid in the
absence of these provisions;
(f) The authority shall seek waivers from federal requirements as
necessary to implement this chapter;
(g) The authority shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if this is
not possible or feasible, the authority may enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;
(h) The authority shall define those circumstances under which a
managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan services and
assure that recipients shall not be charged for such services;
(i) Nothing in this section prevents the authority from entering
into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to receive
services under this chapter; and
(j) The ((department)) health care authority must consult with the
federal center for medicare and medicaid innovation and seek funding
opportunities to support health homes.
(3) The authority shall ensure that publicly supported community
health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent
and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems
are seriously considered as contractors. The authority shall
coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter
70.47 RCW.
(4) The authority shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and
other states in this geographical region in order to develop
recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and
the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while
controlling related costs.
(5) The legislature finds that competition in the managed health
care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence of a
large number of managed health care system options for medicaid
clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on
prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and
disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized.
To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall
guide the authority in its healthy options managed health care
purchasing efforts:
(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to
contract with the authority to the extent that minimum contracting
requirements defined by the authority are met, at payment rates that
enable the authority to operate as far below appropriated spending
levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this
section.
(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of
contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not
voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:
(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income
populations;
(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;
(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services
offered to enrollees;
(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services,
including ability to supply an adequate provider network;
(v) Payment rates; and
(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract
requirements established by the authority, including consideration of
past and current performance and participation in other state or
federal health programs as a contractor.
(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year
contracting periods.
(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving
low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the
contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.
(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet
state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state
laws. The authority shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net
worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health
carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the
Washington state health care authority to take action under a contract
upon finding that a contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes
the contractor's ability to meet its contract obligations.
(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the authority and
contract bidders or the authority and contracting carriers related to
the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be
clearly set out in the procurement document.
(6) The authority may apply the principles set forth in subsection
(5) of this section to its managed health care purchasing efforts on
behalf of clients receiving supplemental security income benefits to
the extent appropriate.
(7) A managed health care system shall pay a nonparticipating
provider that provides a service covered under this chapter to the
system's enrollee no more than the lowest amount paid for that service
under the managed health care system's contracts with similar providers
in the state.
(8) For services covered under this chapter to medical assistance
or medical care services enrollees and provided on or after August 24,
2011, nonparticipating providers must accept as payment in full the
amount paid by the managed health care system under subsection (7) of
this section in addition to any deductible, coinsurance, or copayment
that is due from the enrollee for the service provided. An enrollee is
not liable to any nonparticipating provider for covered services,
except for amounts due for any deductible, coinsurance, or copayment
under the terms and conditions set forth in the managed health care
system contract to provide services under this section.
(9) Pursuant to federal managed care access standards, 42 C.F.R.
Sec. 438, managed health care systems must maintain a network of
appropriate providers that is supported by written agreements
sufficient to provide adequate access to all services covered under the
contract with the ((department)) health care authority, including
hospital-based physician services. The ((department)) health care
authority will monitor and periodically report on the proportion of
services provided by contracted providers and nonparticipating
providers, by county, for each managed health care system to ensure
that managed health care systems are meeting network adequacy
requirements. No later than January 1st of each year, the
((department)) health care authority will review and report its
findings to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature for the preceding state fiscal year.
(10) Subsections (7) through (9) of this section expire July 1,
((2016)) 2014.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 9 s 4 and 2011 c 316 s
5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A managed health care system participating in the plan shall do
so by contract with the ((administrator)) director and shall provide,
directly or by contract with other health care providers, covered basic
health care services to each enrollee covered by its contract with the
((administrator)) director as long as payments from the
((administrator)) director on behalf of the enrollee are current. A
participating managed health care system may offer, without additional
cost, health care benefits or services not included in the schedule of
covered services under the plan. A participating managed health care
system shall not give preference in enrollment to enrollees who accept
such additional health care benefits or services. Managed health care
systems participating in the plan shall not discriminate against any
potential or current enrollee based upon health status, sex, race,
ethnicity, or religion. The ((administrator)) director may receive and
act upon complaints from enrollees regarding failure to provide covered
services or efforts to obtain payment, other than authorized
copayments, for covered services directly from enrollees, but nothing
in this chapter empowers the ((administrator)) director to impose any
sanctions under Title 18 RCW or any other professional or facility
licensing statute.
(2) A managed health care system shall pay a nonparticipating
provider that provides a service covered under this chapter to the
system's enrollee no more than the lowest amount paid for that service
under the managed health care system's contracts with similar providers
in the state.
(3) Pursuant to federal managed care access standards, 42 C.F.R.
Sec. 438, managed health care systems must maintain a network of
appropriate providers that is supported by written agreements
sufficient to provide adequate access to all services covered under the
contract with the authority, including hospital-based physician
services. The authority will monitor and periodically report on the
proportion of services provided by contracted providers and
nonparticipating providers, by county, for each managed health care
system to ensure that managed health care systems are meeting network
adequacy requirements. No later than January 1st of each year, the
authority will review and report its findings to the appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature for the preceding state fiscal
year.
(4) The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for
enrollees to transfer their enrollments among participating managed
health care systems serving their respective areas. The
((administrator)) director shall establish a period of at least twenty
days in a given year when this opportunity is afforded enrollees, and
in those areas served by more than one participating managed health
care system the ((administrator)) director shall endeavor to establish
a uniform period for such opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees
to transfer their enrollment to another participating managed health
care system at any time upon a showing of good cause for the transfer.
(5) Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the
((administrator)) director shall determine, on an actuarially sound
basis, the reasonable cost of providing the schedule of basic health
care services, expressed in terms of upper and lower limits, and
recognizing variations in the cost of providing the services through
the various systems and in different areas of the state.
(6) In negotiating with managed health care systems for
participation in the plan, the ((administrator)) director shall adopt
a uniform procedure that includes at least the following:
(a) The ((administrator)) director shall issue a request for
proposals, including standards regarding the quality of services to be
provided; financial integrity of the responding systems; and
responsiveness to the unmet health care needs of the local communities
or populations that may be served;
(b) The ((administrator)) director shall then review responsive
proposals and may negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to
refine any proposals;
(c) The ((administrator)) director may then select one or more
systems to provide the covered services within a local area; and
(d) The ((administrator)) director may adopt a policy that gives
preference to respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics,
that have a history of providing quality health care services to low-income persons.
(7)(a) The ((administrator)) director may contract with a managed
health care system to provide covered basic health care services to
subsidized enrollees, nonsubsidized enrollees, health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees, or any combination thereof. At a minimum,
such contracts issued on or after January 1, 2012, must include:
(i) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care
management within health homes;
(ii) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that,
by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and
inpatient use; and
(iii) Promoting provider participation in the program of training
and technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic
conditions described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocation of funds to
support provider participation in the training unless the managed care
system is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in
place for chronic care management.
(b) Health home services contracted for under this subsection may
be prioritized to enrollees with complex, high cost, or multiple
chronic conditions.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "chronic care management,"
"chronic condition," and "health home" have the same meaning as in RCW
74.09.010.
(d) Contracts that include the items in (a)(i) through (iii) of
this subsection must not exceed the rates that would be paid in the
absence of these provisions.
(8) The ((administrator)) director may establish procedures and
policies to further negotiate and contract with managed health care
systems following completion of the request for proposal process in
subsection (6) of this section, upon a determination by the
((administrator)) director that it is necessary to provide access, as
defined in the request for proposal documents, to covered basic health
care services for enrollees.
(9) The ((administrator)) director may implement a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees, as provided under RCW 41.05.140. Prior to implementing a
self-funded or self-insured method, the ((administrator)) director
shall ensure that funding available in the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account is sufficient for the self-funded or self-insured risk assumed, or expected to be assumed, by the
((administrator)) director. If implementing a self-funded or self-insured method, the ((administrator)) director may request funds to be
moved from the basic health plan trust account or the basic health plan
subscription account to the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account established in RCW 41.05.140.
(10) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section expire July 1,
((2016)) 2014.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.230 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 9 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) For services provided to plan enrollees on or after August 24,
2011, nonparticipating providers must accept as payment in full the
amount paid by the managed health care system under RCW 70.47.100(2) in
addition to any deductible, coinsurance, or copayment that is due from
the enrollee under the terms and conditions set forth in the managed
health care system contract with the ((administrator)) director. A
plan enrollee is not liable to any nonparticipating provider for
covered services, except for amounts due for any deductible,
coinsurance, or copayment under the terms and conditions set forth in
the managed health care system contract with the ((administrator))
director.
(2) This section expires July 1, ((2016)) 2014.

--- END ---