BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.10.130 and 2003 c 334 s 540 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is hereby authorized to carry out all activities
necessary to achieve the purposes of RCW 79.10.060, 79.10.070,
79.10.100 through 79.10.120, 79.10.130, 79.10.200 through 79.10.330,
79.44.003, and ((79.90.456,)) 79.105.050 including, but not limited to:
(((1))) (a) Planning, construction, and operation of conservation,
recreational sites, areas, roads, and trails, by itself or in
conjunction with any public agency, nonprofit organization, volunteer,
or volunteer organization, including entering cooperative agreements
for these purposes;
(((2))) (b) Planning, construction, and operation of special
facilities for educational, scientific, conservation, or experimental
purposes by itself or in conjunction with any other public or private
agency, including entering cooperative agreements for these purposes;
(((3))) (c) Improvement of any lands to achieve the purposes of RCW
79.10.060, 79.10.070, 79.10.100 through 79.10.120, 79.10.130, 79.10.200
through 79.10.330, 79.44.003, and ((79.90.456)) 79.105.050, including
entering cooperative agreements with public agencies, nonprofit
organizations, volunteers, and volunteer organizations for these
purposes;
(((4) Cooperation with public and private agencies in the
utilization of such lands for watershed purposes;
(5))) (d) Entering cooperative agreements with public agencies,
nonprofit organizations, volunteers, and volunteer organizations
regarding the use of lands managed by the department for the purpose of
providing a benefit to lands managed by the department, including but
not limited to the following benefits: The utilization of such lands
for watershed purposes; carrying out restoration and enhancement
projects on such lands, such as improving, restoring, or enhancing
habitat that provides for plant or animal species protection;
improving, restoring, or enhancing watershed conditions; removing
nonnative vegetation and providing vegetation management to restore,
enhance, or maintain properly functioning conditions of the local
ecosystem; and other similar projects on these lands that provide long-term environmental and other land management benefits, provided that
the cooperative agreements are consistent with land management
obligations;
(e) Authorizing individual volunteers and volunteer organizations
to conduct restoration and enhancement projects on lands managed by the
department through cooperative agreements authorized in this section or
other arrangements that are consistent with land management obligations
and that do not require the volunteers to pay a fee for the cooperative
agreement purpose;
(f) Authorizing the receipt of gifts of personal property,
services, and other items of value for the purposes of this section, as
well as the exchange of consideration in cooperative agreements
authorized under this section;
(g) The authority to make such leases, contracts, agreements, or
other arrangements as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of RCW
79.10.060, 79.10.070, 79.10.100 through 79.10.120, 79.10.130, 79.10.200
through 79.10.330, 79.44.003, and ((79.90.456)) 79.105.050. However,
nothing in this section shall affect any existing requirements for
public bidding or auction with private agencies or parties, except that
agreements or other arrangements may be made with public schools,
colleges, universities, governmental agencies, ((and)) nonprofit
((scientific and educational associations)) organizations, volunteers,
and volunteer organizations. In addition, nothing in this section is
intended to conflict with the department's trust obligations.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Nonprofit organization" means: (i) Any organization described
in section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3)) and exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the
internal revenue code; or (ii) any not-for-profit organization that is
organized and conducted for public benefit and operated primarily for
charitable, civic, educational, religious, welfare, or health purposes.
(b) "Volunteer" or "volunteer organization" means an individual or
entity performing services for a nonprofit organization or a
governmental entity who does not receive compensation, other than
reasonable reimbursement or allowances for expenses actually incurred,
or any other thing of value, in excess of five hundred dollars per
year. "Volunteer" includes a volunteer serving as a director, officer,
trustee, or direct service volunteer.

--- END ---