BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.047 and 2011 c 193 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to
possess a firearm, or at the time a person is committed by court order
under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77
RCW for mental health treatment, the convicting or committing court
shall notify the person, orally and in writing, that the person must
immediately surrender any concealed pistol license and that the person
may not possess a firearm unless his or her right to do so is restored
by a court of record. For purposes of this section a convicting court
includes a court in which a person has been found not guilty by reason
of insanity.
(b) The convicting or committing court shall forward within three
judicial days after conviction or entry of the commitment order a copy
of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable
information, along with the date of conviction or commitment, to the
department of licensing. When a person is committed by court order
under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77
RCW, for mental health treatment, the committing court also shall
forward, within three judicial days after entry of the commitment
order, a copy of the person's driver's license, or comparable
information, along with the date of commitment, to the national instant
criminal background check system index, denied persons file, created by
the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (P.L. 103-159).
(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1)
of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the
convicted or committed person has a concealed pistol license. If the
person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of
licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which,
upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the
license.
(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by
reason of having been involuntarily committed for mental health
treatment under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, chapter
10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon
discharge, petition the superior court to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored.
(b) The petition must be brought in the superior court that ordered
the involuntary commitment or the superior court of the county in which
the petitioner resides.
(c) ((Except as provided)) Subject to the limitations in (d) of
this subsection, the court ((shall)) may restore the petitioner's right
to possess a firearm if the petitioner proves the following by a
preponderance of the evidence ((that)):
(i) The petitioner is no longer required to participate in court-ordered inpatient or outpatient treatment;
(ii) The petitioner has successfully managed the condition related
to the commitment;
(iii) The petitioner no longer presents a substantial danger to
himself or herself, or the public; and
(iv) The symptoms related to the commitment are not reasonably
likely to recur.
(d) Notwithstanding the factors described in (c) of this
subsection, if a preponderance of the evidence in the record supports
a finding that the person petitioning the court has engaged in violence
or unsafe behavior and the court finds that it is ((more)) likely
((than not that the person will engage in violence after his or her
right to possess a firearm is restored,)) that similar episodes of
violence or unsafe behavior may recur, the court may deny the petition
or require the person ((shall)) to bear the burden of proving by clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a
substantial danger to the safety of himself or herself or others.
(e) When a person's right to possess a firearm has been restored
under this subsection, the court shall forward, within three judicial
days after entry of the restoration order, notification that the
person's right to possess a firearm has been restored to the department
of licensing, the department of social and health services, and the
national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons
file.
(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm
unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the
right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040(4).

--- END ---