BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.010 and 2003 c 111 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall((, whenever at least one statewide
measure or office is scheduled to appear on the general election
ballot,)) print and distribute a voters' pamphlet for the general
election every year. Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the secretary of state shall
print and distribute a voters' pamphlet for the primary in each even-numbered year.
The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to
each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other
locations he or she deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall
also produce taped or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet,
publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any
person who requests one.
The secretary of state may make the material required to be
distributed by this chapter available to the public in electronic form.
The secretary of state may provide the material in electronic form to
computer bulletin boards, print and broadcast news media, community
computer networks, and similar services at the cost of reproduction or
transmission of the data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 29A.32.036 (Even year primary contents)
and 2004 c 271 s 122 are each repealed.

--- END ---