BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88A.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes the necessity of developing a
uniform and coordinated procedure for determining the expected fiscal
impact of bills and resolutions on state government and of placing that
information before the legislature before those bills and resolutions
are heard and voted upon. The legislature also recognizes that
developing such statements of fiscal impact, which shall be known as
fiscal notes, requires the designation of a state agency to be
principally responsible therefor.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88A.030 and 2008 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a fiscal note is prepared and approved as to form, accuracy,
and completeness by the office of financial management, which depicts
the expected fiscal impact of a bill or resolution, copies shall be
filed immediately with:
(1) The chairperson of the committee to which the bill or
resolution was referred upon introduction in the house of origin;
(2) The senate committee on ways and means, or its successor; and
(3) The house committees on revenue and appropriations, or their
successors.
((Whenever possible, such)) Fiscal notes and, in the case of a bill
increasing taxes or fees, the cost projection and other information
required under RCW 43.135.031 shall be provided prior to or at the time
the bill or resolution is first heard by the committee of reference in
the house of origin.
When a fiscal note has been prepared for a bill or resolution, a
copy of the fiscal note shall be placed in the bill books or otherwise
attached to the bill or resolution and shall remain with the bill or
resolution throughout the legislative process ((insofar as possible)).
For bills increasing taxes or fees, the cost projection and other
information required by RCW 43.135.031 shall be placed in the bill
books or otherwise attached to the bill or resolution and shall remain
with the bill or resolution throughout the legislative process insofar
as possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.88A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before either house of the legislature may vote on final
passage on a bill that if enacted into law would increase state
government expenditures or would increase or decrease state government
revenues, a fiscal note prepared pursuant to RCW 43.88A.020 must be
available on the most recent version of the bill that applies to the
bill as it is to be voted upon. In no case shall the fiscal note be
made available more than seventy-two hours after the bill is placed on
final passage.
(2) The requirement in subsection (1) of this section may be
suspended by the applicable house of the legislature with a vote of
sixty percent of the members elected to that house.
(3) In no case may the lack of any fiscal note as provided in this
chapter or any error in the accuracy of such a fiscal note affect the
validity of any measure otherwise duly passed by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.132 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before either house of the legislature may vote on final
passage on a bill that if enacted into law would increase local
government expenditures or would increase or decrease local government
revenues, a fiscal note prepared pursuant to RCW 43.132.020 must be
available that applies to the bill as it is to be voted upon.
(2) The requirement in subsection (1) of this section may be
suspended by the applicable house of the legislature with a vote of
sixty percent of the members elected to that house.
(3) In no case shall the fiscal note be made available more than
seventy-two hours after the bill is placed on final passage.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.132.060 and 2000 c 182 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Nothing in this chapter shall prevent either house of the
legislature from acting on any bill or resolution before it as
otherwise provided by the state Constitution, by law, and by the rules
of the senate and house of representatives, nor shall)) In no case may
the lack of any fiscal note as provided in this chapter or any error in
the accuracy ((thereof)) of such a fiscal note affect the validity of
any measure otherwise duly passed by the legislature.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not alter the
responsibilities of RCW 43.135.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 43.88A.900 (Construction of chapter) and
1977 ex.s. c 25 s 5 are each repealed.

--- END ---