BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.525.166 and 2012 c 244 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Allocations to school districts of state funds provided by RCW
28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall be made by the superintendent of
public instruction and the amount of state funding assistance to a
school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined
in the following manner:
(1) The boards of directors of the districts shall determine the
total cost of the proposed project, which cost may include the cost of
acquiring and preparing the site, the cost of constructing the building
or of acquiring a building and preparing the same for school use, the
cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to the project, necessary
architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for contingencies and for
other necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the total cost of
the project shall be subject to review and approval by the
superintendent.
(2) The state funding assistance percentage for a school district
shall be computed by the following formula:
The ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil
divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil
shall be subtracted from three, and then the result of the foregoing
shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school district's
adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil).

District adjusted Total state

3-valuation ÷ adjusted valuation State

Computed per pupil per pupil Funding

State
- % Assistance

Ratio District adjusted Total state

3+valuation ÷ adjusted valuation

per pupil per pupil

PROVIDED, That in the event the state funding assistance percentage to
any school district based on the above formula is less than ((twenty))
thirty percent and such school district is otherwise eligible for state
funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180, the
superintendent ((may)) must establish for such district a state funding
assistance percentage not in excess of ((twenty)) thirty percent of the
approved cost of the project, if the superintendent finds that such
additional assistance is necessary to provide minimum facilities for
housing the pupils of the district.
(3) In addition to the computed state funding assistance percentage
developed in subsection (2) of this section, a school district shall be
entitled to additional percentage points determined by the average
percentage of growth for the past three years. One percent shall be
added to the computed state funding assistance percentage for each
percent of growth, with a maximum of twenty percent.
(4) In computing the state funding assistance percentage in
subsection (2) of this section and adjusting the percentage under
subsection (3) of this section, students residing outside the school
district who are enrolled in alternative learning experience programs
under RCW 28A.150.325 shall be excluded from the count of total pupils.
In lieu of the exclusion in this subsection, a district may submit an
alternative calculation for excluding students enrolled in alternative
learning experience programs. The alternative calculation must show
the student headcount use of district classroom facilities on a regular
basis for a reasonable duration by out-of-district alternative learning
experience program students subtracted by the headcount of in-district
alternative learning experience program students not using district
classroom facilities on a regular basis for a reasonable duration. The
alternative calculation must be submitted in a form approved by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction must develop rules to define
"regular basis" and "reasonable duration."
(5) The approved cost of the project determined in the manner
prescribed in this section multiplied by the state funding assistance
percentage derived as provided for in this section shall be the amount
of state funding assistance to the district for the financing of the
project: PROVIDED, That need therefor has been established to the
satisfaction of the superintendent: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That additional
state funding assistance may be allowed if it is found by the
superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school
facilities citizen advisory panel that such assistance is necessary in
order to meet (a) a school housing emergency resulting from the
destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation of a school
building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden excessive and
clearly foreseeable future increase in school population, or other
conditions similarly emergent in nature; or (b) a special school
housing burden resulting from projects of statewide significance or
imposed by virtue of the admission of nonresident students into
educational programs established, maintained and operated in conformity
with the requirements of law; or (c) a deficiency in the capital funds
of the district resulting from financing, subsequent to April 1, 1969,
and without benefit of the state funding assistance provided by prior
state assistance programs, the construction of a needed school building
project or projects approved in conformity with the requirements of
such programs, after having first applied for and been denied state
funding assistance because of the inadequacy of state funds available
for the purpose((,)); or (d) a condition created by the fact that an
excessive number of students live in state owned housing((,)); or (e)
a need for the construction of a school building to provide for
improved school district organization or racial balance((,)); or (f)
conditions similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e)
of this subsection, creating a like emergency.

--- END ---