BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A family that includes an adult who has received temporary
assistance for needy families for sixty months after July 27, 1997,
shall be ineligible for further temporary assistance for needy families
assistance.
(2) For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the
department shall count any month in which an adult family member
received a temporary assistance for needy families cash assistance
grant unless the assistance was provided when the adult family member
was a minor child and not the head of the household or married to the
head of the household.
(3) The department shall adopt regulations to apply the sixty-month
time limit to households in which a parent is in the home and
ineligible for temporary assistance for needy families. Any
regulations shall be consistent with federal funding requirements.
(4) The department shall refer recipients who require specialized
assistance to appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs
through the department of commerce, or the crime victims' compensation
program of the department of labor and industries.
(5)(a) The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section by reason
of hardship or if the recipient meets the family violence options of
section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal social security act as
amended by P.L. 104-193.
(b) Exemptions under the family violence options must include
situations where imposing the sixty-month limit on a recipient or his
or her family members would unfairly penalize an individual who has
experienced past family violence which disrupted the recipient's
ability to obtain and keep employment or increase the recipient's wage
earning potential over time.
(c) Hardship exemptions must include, but not be limited to, the
following in order of priority:
(i) The recipient receives supplemental security income or social
security disability, the recipient has an open child welfare case and
it is the recipient's first child welfare case, the recipient meets the
family violence criteria, or the recipient is a caretaker relative and
is over fifty-five years of age;
(ii) The family is residing in a county with an unemployment rate
of six percent or more;
(iii) A parent has a temporary mental or physical incapacity;
(iv) A parent is working in unsubsidized employment for more than
twenty hours per week; or
(v) A parent is functionally illiterate.
(6) Policies related to circumstances under which a recipient will
be exempted from the application of subsection (1) or (3) of this
section shall treat adults receiving benefits on their own behalf, and
parents receiving benefits on behalf of their child similarly, unless
required otherwise under federal law.
(((6))) (7) The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or
her family from the application of subsection (1) or (3) of this
section until after the recipient has received fifty-two months of
assistance under this chapter.
(((7))) (8) Beginning on October 31, 2005, the department shall
provide transitional food stamp assistance for a period of five months
to a household that ceases to receive temporary assistance for needy
families assistance and is not in sanction status. If necessary, the
department shall extend the household's food stamp certification until
the end of the transition period.

--- END ---