BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.410 and 2005 c 274 s 362 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The director may designate certain written determinations as
precedents.
(a) By rule adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the director
shall adopt criteria which he or she shall use to decide whether a
determination is precedential. These criteria shall include, but not
be limited to, whether the determination clarifies an unsettled
interpretation of Title 82 RCW or where the determination modifies or
clarifies an earlier interpretation.
(b) Written determinations designated as precedents by the director
shall be made available for public inspection and shall be published by
the department.
(c))) To provide transparency, ensure consistent treatment, and
assist taxpayers in understanding department rules and interpretations,
the director must publish all determinations in a timely manner.
(a) Written determinations must be made available for public
inspection and must be published by the department within no more than
ninety days after the matter is finalized.
(b) The department ((shall)) must disclose any written
determination upon which it relies to support any assessment of tax,
interest, or penalty against such taxpayer, after making the deletions
provided by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Before making a written determination available for public
inspection under subsection (1) of this section, the department
((shall)) must delete:
(a) The names, addresses, and other identifying details of the
person to whom the written determination pertains and of another person
identified in the written determination; and
(b) Information the disclosure of which is specifically prohibited
by any statute applicable to the department of revenue, and the
department may also delete other information exempted from disclosure
by chapter 42.56 RCW or any other statute applicable to the department
of revenue.
(3) The department must establish a stakeholder process to review
determinations and make recommendations if changes to a law or rule
would provide greater technical clarity to assist taxpayers. The
recommendations developed in a stakeholder review process created under
this subsection must also include recommendations for improving the
redaction process in a manner that ensures taxpayer confidentiality and
is efficient for the department to implement.

--- END ---