BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.630.101 and 2012 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) There are more low-achieving schools in the state seeking
assistance in improving the academic outcomes of students than are
being assisted using current school improvement initiatives;
(b) Promising educator development programs provide intensive
school-based, residency, and mentor experiences for those preparing for
careers in teaching and educational leadership; and
(c) Collaboration among colleges of education, schools, and
communities offers unique opportunities to leverage resources, foster
innovation, disseminate best practices in educator preparation and
professional development, and close the educational opportunity gap for
students in low-achieving schools.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to authorize a pilot project
where colleges of education collaborate with school districts to
establish collaborative schools for innovation and success serving
particularly at-risk and low-achieving students and schools that are
persistently low-achieving even after receiving state intervention
services through the required action process established in chapter
28A.657 RCW. Each collaboration is intended both to accelerate student
achievement and deepen the knowledge and skills of current and future
educators. ((The legislature intends that the initial collaborations
occur in elementary schools. Pending the evaluation results of the
initial pilot project, the legislature may expand the collaborations to
include middle and high schools.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.630.103 and 2012 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot
project is created.
(b) Any school district in the state may enter an agreement with a
college of education and submit an application to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the professional educator
standards board as provided in RCW 28A.630.104 to participate in the
pilot project.
(c) School districts that have participated in the required action
district process as established in chapter 28A.657 RCW are required to
participate in the collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project if recommended by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction under the authority of RCW 28A.657.100 if the state
board of education approves that recommendation.
(2) The purpose of the pilot project is for colleges of education
and school districts to collaborate to improve student and educator
success by:
(a) Developing and implementing research-based models of
instruction and services that have proven to be successful in closing
the educational opportunity gap and improving student learning in
low-performing schools; and
(b) Developing and implementing research-based models of educator
preparation and professional development programs that have proven to
be successful in building an educator workforce with the knowledge,
skills, and background that aligns with the characteristics and needs
of students in low-performing schools.
(3) For ((each proposed pilot project)) school districts
voluntarily participating in the pilot project under the authority of
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the college of education and the
school district shall collaborate to select an elementary school in the
district to be the collaborative school for innovation and success.
The school must be among the lowest-achieving schools in the district
as measured by district, state, or federal criteria, including criteria
that measure the educational opportunity gap in the school, and the
school must not have received state, federal, or private funds for the
purpose of implementing a school improvement plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.630.104 and 2012 c 53 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each school district and college of education seeking approval
to participate in the collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project under the authority of RCW 28A.630.103(1)(b) must submit
a joint application of intent to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and the professional educator standards board by
July 1, 2012. Those school districts that are required to participate
in the pilot project under the authority of RCW 28A.630.103(1)(c) and
28A.657.100 are not required to submit a joint application of intent.
(2) An application of intent must contain:
(a) The school selected for inclusion in the pilot project and the
rationale for its selection;
(b) The research basis and theory of action proposed to close the
educational opportunity gap and improve student achievement in the
selected school;
(c) The research basis and theory of action proposed to improve
educator preparation and professional development in the selected
school;
(d) A preliminary plan for involving parents, community members,
and school staff in the development of the innovation and success plan
under RCW 28A.630.105;
(e) The proposed roles and responsibilities of the college of
education and school district in the pilot project; and
(f) A preliminary plan for using the results of the pilot project
to improve educational programs throughout the school district and
throughout the college of education.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board shall jointly review the
applications submitted under the authority of RCW 28A.630.103(1)(b) and
select up to six applications for participation in the pilot project no
later than August 1, 2012. One of the selected applications must be
from the largest school district in western Washington that submitted
an application, and one must be from the largest school district in
eastern Washington that submitted an application.
(4) The selection criteria shall include, but are not limited to,
the quality of the research basis for the proposed collaboration; the
efficacy of the proposed strategies for closing the educational
opportunity gap, improving student achievement, and improving educator
preparation in low-performing schools; and the degree of commitment
displayed by the college of education and the school district to
collaborate throughout the pilot project.
(5) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate
grants to three of the selected applications under subsection (3) of
this section, to be used for development and implementation of an
innovation and success plan under RCW 28A.630.105. The colleges of
education and school districts from the remaining selected applications
under subsection (3) of this section may participate in the
collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project by
complying with the provisions of RCW 28A.630.105 through 28A.630.107,
but without state funding support.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate grants to support the development and implementation of an
innovation and success plan under RCW 28A.630.105 for all school
districts required to participate in the pilot project under RCW
28A.657.100.
(7) The college of education shall serve as the fiscal agent for
the pilot project, unless the college is an independent institution of
higher education, in which case the school district shall serve as the
fiscal agent. Each college of education and school district must seek
private, foundation, community, or other grant funds to leverage any
supplemental state funds that may be appropriated for the purposes of
the pilot project.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.630.105 and 2012 c 53 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After receiving approval of an application of intent, each
college of education and school district must conduct a comprehensive
needs assessment of the students to be served by a collaborative school
for innovation and success. The needs assessment must use
disaggregated student data and include a thorough evaluation of student
needs as identified by the parents of the students served by the
school, as well as the levels of support within the school community
and in the external community at-large for students' academic and
social emotional needs. The needs assessment must also examine
elements included in an academic performance audit under RCW
28A.657.040.
(2) The college of education and the school district must develop
an innovation and success plan for the school in collaboration with
school staff, parents, and community members. For school districts
required to participate in the pilot project under RCW 28A.657.100, the
school district shall work in collaboration with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the college of education in
developing the innovation and success plan.
(3) The innovation and success plan must include:
(a) The proposed program for instruction, wraparound support
services, resource deployment, and professional development that has
been developed based on the comprehensive needs assessment;
(b) A family and community engagement strategy that builds support
among students and parents for high achievement for all students in
culturally appropriate ways;
(c) Professional learning communities among school staff and higher
education faculty that are focused on identifying and responding to
emergent student learning needs;
(d) Intensive preparation of teacher and principal candidates using
research-based practices and a particular focus on cultural competency
and skill development to improve learning for English language
learners, highly mobile and homeless students, students with
disabilities, and other students with special learning needs;
(e) Identification of the metrics that will be used to assess
student achievement and skill development, both while the students are
enrolled in elementary school and after they continue into middle
school, and specific goals for improvement of these outcomes over the
term of the pilot project, including but not limited to such metrics as
attendance, grade-level retention, student growth, disciplinary
incidents, course completion and grades, and performance on
classroom-based assessments;
(f) Identification of the metrics that will be used to assess
educator skill development, both for preservice and certificated
educators, and specific goals for improvement of these outcomes over
the term of the pilot project;
(g) Identification of private and community partners to provide
wraparound services, technology, mentoring, or other enhancements for
the students in the school;
(h) Identification of waivers to be requested from the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.140 or from the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.655.180;
(i) Identification of any modifications to approved educator
preparation programs or other waivers to be requested from the
professional educator standards board;
(j) Identification and completion of any modifications to school
district collective bargaining agreements necessary to implement the
innovation and success plan, using the procedures under RCW
28A.657.050(3); and
(k) A proposed budget based on funding and resources available to
the pilot project.
(4) Each college of education and school district participating in
the pilot project voluntarily must submit a completed innovation and
success plan to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
and the professional educator standards board by March 15, 2013. Each
college of education and school district participating in the pilot
project under the requirements of RCW 28A.657.100 shall submit a
completed innovation and success plan to the professional educator
standards board and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction within six months of the state board of education's
approval required under section 10 of this act.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board must notify each college of
education and school district ((by May 1, 2013,)) within two months of
the innovation and success plan being submitted or by May 1st of the
year in which the plan is submitted, whichever is first, of whether the
innovation and success plan has been approved. If the plan is not
approved, the reasons must be specified in writing and the college of
education and school district must be provided an opportunity to revise
and resubmit the plan within thirty days. The office and the board may
provide technical assistance in revising a plan.
(6) School districts are encouraged to assign teachers, principals,
and other staff to a collaborative school for innovation and success
who express an interest, commitment, and qualifications to participate
in the pilot project. School districts are also encouraged to permit
the transfer of existing school staff to another school in the district
if the staff do not wish to participate in the pilot project.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.630.107 and 2012 c 53 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract
with a northwest educational research organization to conduct an
evaluation of the collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project using quantitative and qualitative analysis to identify
successful practices in improving student and educator outcomes. The
organization shall submit a preliminary evaluation by December 1, 2015,
and a final evaluation by September 1, 2018, to the superintendent of
public instruction and the professional educator standards board.
(2) Based on the experience of the participants and the evaluation
results, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board shall recommend whether the
voluntary pilot project should be modified, continued, and expanded to
include other elementary schools in the state, or expanded to include
middle and high schools. The office and the board shall submit their
recommendations and the final report of the pilot project to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2018.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.657.020 and 2010 c 235 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2010, and each year thereafter, by December 1st,
the superintendent of public instruction shall annually identify
schools as one of the state's persistently lowest-achieving schools if
the school is a Title I school, or a school that is eligible for but
does not receive Title I funds, that is among the lowest-achieving five
percent of Title I or Title I eligible schools in the state.
(2) The criteria for determining whether a school is among the
persistently lowest-achieving five percent of Title I schools, or Title
I eligible schools, under subsection (1) of this section shall be
established by the superintendent of public instruction. The criteria
must meet all applicable requirements for the receipt of a federal
school improvement grant under the American recovery and reinvestment
act of 2009 and Title I of the elementary and secondary education act
of 1965, and take into account both:
(a) The academic achievement of the "all students" group in a
school in terms of proficiency on the state's assessment, and any
alternative assessments, in reading and mathematics combined; and
(b) The school's lack of progress on the mathematics and reading
assessments over a number of years in the "all students" group.
(3) Beginning in 2013, and each year thereafter, as part of the
second phase of the accountability system, schools that are not Title
I schools may be identified as one of the state's persistently lowest-achieving schools by the superintendent of public instruction under the
same criteria established in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
and shall be eligible for state funding as provided in this chapter.
Non-Title I schools identified under this section are subject to the
same requirements under this chapter as are Title I schools.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.657.090 and 2010 c 235 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
A school district must implement a required action plan upon
approval by the state board of education. The office of (([the])) the
superintendent of public instruction must provide the required action
district with technical assistance and federal school improvement grant
funds ((or)), other federal funds for school improvement, if available,
or state funds to implement an approved plan. The district must submit
a report to the superintendent of public instruction that provides the
progress the district is making in meeting the student achievement
goals based on the state's assessments, identifying strategies and
assets used to solve audit findings, and establishing evidence of
meeting plan implementation benchmarks as set forth in the required
action plan.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.657.100 and 2010 c 235 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction must provide a report
twice per year to the state board of education regarding the progress
made by all school districts designated as required action districts.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must recommend to the
state board of education that a school district be released from the
designation as a required action district after the district implements
a required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress,
as defined by the superintendent of public instruction, in reading and
mathematics on the state's assessment over the past three consecutive
years; and no longer has a school within the district identified as
persistently lowest-achieving. The state board shall release a school
district from the designation as a required action district upon
confirmation that the district has met the requirements for a release.
(3) If a required action district has not met the criteria
established in subsection (2) of this section requiring release from
designation as a required action district, the superintendent of public
instruction may:
(a) Recommend to the state board of education that the district
remain a required action district for an additional three years; or
(b) Recommend to the state board of education that some or all of
schools designated as persistently lowest-achieving schools in the
district be required to enter into an agreement with a college of
education under the provisions established in chapter 28A.630 RCW. If
there are multiple schools within the required action district that are
recommended to enter into agreements, the same college of education
must be used for all the schools.
(4) If the state board of education determines that the required
action district has not met the requirements for release((,)) and the
district is to remain((s)) in required action ((and)), the district
must submit a new or revised plan under the process in RCW 28A.657.050.
(5) If the state board of education determines that the required
action district has not met the requirements for release but determines
that a lowest-achieving school is to be required to enter into an
agreement with a college of education under the requirements of chapter
28A.630 RCW, it shall provide the original school district with written
notice of the recommendation and shall release the school district from
the designation of a required action district only if all of the
lowest-achieving schools in the district are required to enter into
agreements with a college of education.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.657.125 and 2010 c 235 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a unified and equitable system of
education accountability must include expectations and benchmarks for
improvement, along with support for schools and districts to make the
necessary changes that will lead to success for all students. Such a
system must also clearly address the consequences for persistent lack
of improvement. Establishing a process for school districts to prepare
and implement a required action plan is one such consequence. However,
to be truly accountable to students, parents, the community, and
taxpayers, the legislature must also consider what should happen if a
required action district continues not to make improvement after an
extended period of time. Without an answer to this significant
question, the state's system of education accountability is incomplete.
Furthermore, accountability must be appropriately shared among various
levels of decision makers, including in the building, in the district,
and at the state.
(2)(a) A joint select committee on education accountability is
established beginning no earlier than May 1, 2012, with the following
members:
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(b) The committee shall choose its cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The committee shall:
(a) Identify and analyze options for a complete system of education
accountability, particularly consequences in the case of persistent
lack of improvement by a required action district;
(b) Identify and analyze appropriate decision-making
responsibilities and accompanying consequences at the building,
district, and state level within such an accountability system;
(c) Examine models and experiences in other states;
(d) Identify the circumstances under which significant state action
may be required; ((and))
(e) Analyze the financial, legal, and practical considerations that
would accompany significant state action;
(f) Examine whether the use of the collaborative schools pilot
project as the second phase for addressing persistent lack of
improvement by a required action district is appropriate; and
(g) Make recommendations as to whether additional actions or
monitoring should be implemented for required action districts that are
released from the designation of a required action district in order to
ensure that the changes instituted at the school are ongoing and that
continuity of services and high academic achievement are maintained
after the designation is removed.
(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(5) The committee shall submit an interim report to the education
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2012, and a final report
with recommendations by September 1, 2013.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.657
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If a required action district fails to be released from the
designation of a required action district under the provisions of RCW
28A.657.100, each school within that district that is designated as a
persistently lowest-achieving school may be required to enter into an
agreement with a college of education in accordance with chapter
28A.630 RCW at the recommendation of the superintendent of public
instruction and with the approval of the state board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall make a
recommendation to the state board of education. The state board of
education shall develop criteria for determining whether to approve or
deny the recommendation, including a process for identifying which
college of education would be the partner entity.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the
required action school district superintendent with written notice of
the recommendation by certified mail or personal service.
(4) The state board of education must consider the recommendations
of the superintendent of public instruction under subsection (2) of
this section at a public meeting and must provide an opportunity for
comment on the proposal.
(5) If the state board of education approves the recommendation,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
technical assistance to the school district and the college of
education identified by the state board of education in developing an
innovation and success plan as established in RCW 28A.630.105.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire
June 30, 2019.

--- END ---