BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.335 and 1991 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the lands owned and managed by the
((state parks and recreation)) commission are a significant collection
of valuable natural, cultural, and historical((, and cultural))
resources for the citizens of Washington state. The legislature
further finds that if citizens understand and appreciate the ((state
park ecological resources, they will come to appreciate and understand
the ecosystems and natural resources throughout the state)) natural,
cultural, and historical resources present in Washington's state parks,
they will be inspired to conserve this important legacy for future
generations. Therefore, the ((state parks and recreation)) commission
may ((increase the)) use ((of)) its facilities and resources to provide
((environmental)) natural, cultural, or historical resource
interpretation throughout the state parks system.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.340 and 1991 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state parks and recreation)) commission may provide
((environmental interpretative)) natural, cultural, or historical
resource interpretive activities for visitors to state parks that:
(1) Explain the functions, history, significance, and cultural
aspects of ecosystems;
(2) Explain the relationship between human needs, human behaviors
and attitudes, and the environment; ((and))
(3) Explain the diverse human heritage and cultural changes over
time in Washington state;
(4) Offer experiences and information to increase citizen
understanding, appreciation, and stewardship of ((the environment and
its multiple uses)) their natural and cultural heritage; and
(5) Explain the need for natural, cultural, and historical resource
protection and preservation as well as the methods by which these goals
can be achieved.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.345 and 1991 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state parks and recreation)) commission may consult and enter
into agreements with and solicit assistance from ((private sector
organizations and other governmental agencies that are interested in
conserving and interpreting Washington's environment. The commission
shall not permit commercial advertising in state park lands or
interpretive centers as a condition of such agreements. Logos or
credit lines for sponsoring organizations may be permitted. The
commission shall maintain an accounting of all monetary gifts provided,
and expenditures of monetary gifts shall not be used to increase
personnel)) the state parks foundation, private sector individuals,
organizations, businesses, employee business units, other public
agencies, and tribes that are interested in stewarding and interpreting
state parks natural, cultural, scenic, and recreational resources.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.70.005 and 2000 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) State parks are a valuable asset to the people of the state of
Washington, contributing to their health, education, and well-being;
(2) Well maintained state parks are an attraction and contribute
significantly to the economic well-being of the state of Washington;
(3) Well maintained state parks encourage the appreciation of the
natural resources and natural beauty of the state of Washington;
(4) There is an increasing demand for more state parks and more
state parks services;
(5) There are individuals and groups who desire to contribute to
the continued vitality of the state parks system;
(6) Providing a tax-deductible method for individuals and groups to
contribute is an effective way of increasing available funds to improve
the state parks system; and
(7) It is in the public interest to create a nonprofit foundation
to provide such a method for individuals and groups to contribute to
the preservation, restoration, ((and)) enhancement, and operation of
the state parks system.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.70.010 and 2000 c 25 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of the Washington state parks ((gift)) foundation is to
solicit support ((for the state parks system, cooperate with other
organizations, and to encourage gifts to support and improve the state
parks)), build constituencies, engage in public outreach, cooperate
with other organizations, and encourage gifts and private sponsorship
activities to support operation, acquisition, and improvement of state
parks. The foundation shall take the lead role in soliciting,
recognizing, and cultivating enduring relationships with private donors
and sponsors.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.70.020 and 2000 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Foundation" means the Washington state parks ((gift))
foundation((,)) created in RCW 79A.70.030.
(2) "State parks" means that system of parks administered by the
commission under this title.
(3) "Eligible grant recipients" includes any and all of the
activities of the commission in carrying out the provisions of this
title and friends groups or other cooperating associations established
solely for the benefit of state parks.
(4) "Eligible projects" means any project, action, program, or part
of any project ((or)), action, or program that serves to preserve,
restore, improve, ((or)) enhance ((the)), or otherwise contribute to
the operation of state parks.

Sec. 7 RCW 79A.70.030 and 2000 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2000, the commission shall file articles of
incorporation in accordance with the Washington nonprofit corporation
act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to establish the Washington state parks
((gift)) foundation. The foundation shall not be an agency,
instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state and shall not
disburse public funds.
(2) The foundation shall have a board of directors consisting of up
to fifteen members((. Initial members of the board shall be appointed
by the governor and collectively have experience in business,
charitable giving, outdoor recreation, and parks administration.
Initial appointments shall be made by September 30, 2000. Subsequent
board members shall be elected by the general membership of the
foundation.
(3) Members of the board shall serve three-year terms, except for
the initial terms, which shall be staggered by the governor to achieve
a balanced mix of terms on the board. Members of the board may serve
up to a maximum of three terms. At the end of a term, a member may
continue to serve until a successor has been elected)), whose terms,
method of appointment, and authority must be in accordance with the
Washington nonprofit corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 79A.70.040 and 2000 c 25 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As soon as practicable, the board of directors shall organize
themselves and the foundation suitably to carry out the duties of the
foundation, including achieving federal tax-exempt status.
(2))) The foundation shall actively solicit contributions from
individuals and groups for the benefit of the state parks. The
foundation shall coordinate with the commission and take the lead role
in appropriately thanking, recognizing, and inviting donors to further
support operation, acquisition, and improvement of state parks and
other purposes of this chapter.
(((3))) (2) The foundation shall develop criteria jointly with the
agency director for guiding ((themselves)) the foundation in either the
creation of an endowment, or the making of grants to eligible grant
recipients and eligible projects in the state parks, or both.
(((4))) (3) A competitive grant process shall be conducted at least
annually by the foundation to award funds ((to the)) for the benefit of
state parks. Competitive grant applications shall only be submitted to
the foundation by the commission, friends groups, or other cooperating
associations established for the benefit of state parks. ((The process
shall be started as soon as practicable.)) Grants shall be awarded to
eligible projects consistent with the criteria developed jointly by the
foundation and ((shall be available only for state parks use on
eligible projects)) the agency director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 79A.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By mutual agreement, the agencies may sell discounted discover
passes at a rate below that established under RCW 79A.80.020 or
discounted day-use permits at a rate below that established under RCW
79A.80.030 for purposes of bulk sales to retailers, agency license and
permit product bundling, and partnership opportunities to expand
accessibility and visibility of the discover pass and recreational
opportunities on agency-managed lands.
(2) In exercising this authority, the agencies must prioritize
opportunities for discounted sales that result in a net revenue gain.

Sec. 10 RCW 79A.05.025 and 1999 c 249 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall elect one of its members as chair. The
commission may be convened at such times as the chair deems necessary,
and a majority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business. The votes of a majority of the commissioners present are
required to approve a measure or decision brought to a vote.

Sec. 11 RCW 79A.05.030 and 2005 c 373 s 1 and 2005 c 360 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That ((leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) if, during the term of any concession or
lease, it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights-of-way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.
(9) Within allowable resources, maintain policies that increase the
number of people who have access to free or low-cost recreational
opportunities for physical activity, including noncompetitive physical
activity.
(10) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal
history record information search for the following: Job applicants,
volunteers, and independent contractors who have unsupervised access to
children or vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for
collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card
transactions. These background checks will be done through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include
a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall
be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the
commission, employed as of July 24, 2005, is exempt from the provisions
of this subsection.

Sec. 12 RCW 79A.05.175 and 2007 c 145 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the commission finds that any land under its control
cannot advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized to
dispose of such land by the method provided in this section or by the
method provided in RCW 79A.05.170. If such lands are school or other
grant lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by resolution of the
commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were acquired
under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the
donor or grantors by the commission. All other such lands may be
either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or exchanged for
other lands of equal value by the commission, and all conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor. All such exchanges shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set by the commission and paid
by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall be paid into the
parkland acquisition account established under RCW 79A.05.170. The
commission may accept sealed bids, electronic bids, or oral bids at
auction. Bids on all sales shall be solicited at least twenty days in
advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing at least once a
week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the land to be sold is located. If the commission
feels that no bid received adequately reflects the fair value of the
land to be sold, it may reject all bids, and may call for new bids.
All proceeds derived from the sale of such park property shall be paid
into the park land acquisition account. All land considered for
exchange shall be evaluated by the commission to determine its
adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all lands exchanged
shall first be determined by the appraisals to the satisfaction of the
commission. ((No sale or exchange of state park lands shall be made
without the unanimous consent of the commission.))

Sec. 13 RCW 79A.05.178 and 2000 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the
commission may directly dispose of up to ten contiguous acres of real
property, without public auction, to resolve trespass, property
ownership disputes, and boundary adjustments with adjacent private
property owners. Real property to be disposed of under this section
may be disposed of only after appraisal and for at least fair market
value, and only if the transaction is in the best interest of the
state. The commission shall cooperate with potential purchasers to
arrive at a mutually agreeable sales price. If necessary,
determination of fair market value may include the use of separate
independent appraisals by each party and the review of the appraisals,
as agreed upon by the parties. All conveyance documents shall be
executed by the governor. All proceeds from the disposal of the
property shall be paid into the park land acquisition account. ((No
disposal of real property may be made without the unanimous consent of
the commission.))
(2) Prior to the disposal of any real property under subsection (1)
of this section, the commission shall hold a public hearing on the
proposal in the county where the real property, or the greatest portion
of the real property, is located. At least ten days, but not more than
twenty-five days, prior to the hearing, the commission shall publish a
paid public notice of reasonable size in display advertising form,
setting forth the date, time, and place of the hearing, at least once
in one or more daily newspapers of general circulation in the county
and at least once in one or more weekly newspapers circulated in the
area where the real property is located. A news release concerning the
public hearing must be disseminated among print and electronic media in
the area where the real property is located. The public notice and
news release shall also identify the real property involved in the
proposed disposal and describe the purpose of the proposed disposal.
A summary of the testimony presented at the public hearing shall be
prepared for the commission's consideration when reviewing the proposed
disposal of real property.
(3) If there is a failure to substantially comply with the
procedures set out under this section, then the agreement to dispose of
the real property is subject to being declared invalid by a court of
competent jurisdiction. Such a suit must be brought within one year of
the date of the real property disposal agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The sum of thirteen million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014, from the general
fund to the state parks and recreation commission for the maintenance
and operation of the state parks system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The sum of thirteen million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015, from the general
fund to the state parks and recreation commission for the maintenance
and operation of the state parks system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 RCW 79A.70.050 (Foundation moneys not to
supplant preexisting funding) and 2000 c 25 s 6 are each repealed.

--- END ---