BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.205 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 41.04.180, the employees,
with their dependents, of any county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of this state shall be eligible to participate in any
insurance or self-insurance program for employees administered under
chapter 41.05 RCW if the legislative authority of any such county,
municipality, or other political subdivisions of this state determines,
subject to collective bargaining under applicable statutes, a transfer
to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under chapter
41.05 RCW should be made. In the event of a special district employee
transfer pursuant to this section, members of the governing authority
shall be eligible to be included in such transfer if such members are
authorized by law as of June 25, 1976 to participate in the insurance
program being transferred from and subject to payment by such members
of all costs of insurance for members. In the event a retiree of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state
requests to participate in any insurance or self-insurance program
administered under chapter 41.05 RCW, the county, municipality, or
political subdivision shall make an application on behalf of the
retiree.
(2) When the legislative authority of a county, municipality, or
other political subdivision determines to so transfer, the state health
care authority shall:
(a) Establish the conditions for participation; and
(b) Have the sole right to reject the application.
Approval of the application by the state health care authority
shall effect a transfer of the employees involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program applied for.
(3) Any application of this section to members of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under chapter
41.26 RCW is subject to chapter 41.56 RCW.
(4) School districts may voluntarily transfer, except that all
eligible employees in a bargaining unit of a school district may
transfer only as a unit and all nonrepresented employees in a district
may transfer only as a unit.

--- END ---