BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to make
the state need grant and the college bound scholarship available to
resident students who have received a diploma, or its equivalent, in
Washington state and have lived in Washington state for many years.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need grant program, thus assisting
financially needy or disadvantaged students domiciled in Washington to
obtain the opportunity of attending an accredited institution of higher
education. State need grants under this chapter are available only to
students who are resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (((d))) (e).

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.118.010 and 2012 c 229 s 402 and 2012 c 163 s 8
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The office of student financial assistance shall design the
Washington college bound scholarship program in accordance with this
section and in alignment with the state need grant program in chapter
28B.92 RCW unless otherwise provided in this section.
(1) "Eligible students" are those students who:
(a) Qualify for free or reduced-price lunches. If a student
qualifies in the seventh grade, the student remains eligible even if
the student does not receive free or reduced-price lunches thereafter;
or
(b) Are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW and:
(i) In grade seven through twelve; or
(ii) Are between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one and have not
graduated from high school.
(2) Eligible students shall be notified of their eligibility for
the Washington college bound scholarship program beginning in their
seventh grade year. Students shall also be notified of the
requirements for award of the scholarship.
(3)(a) To be eligible for a Washington college bound scholarship,
a student eligible under subsection (1)(a) of this section must sign a
pledge during seventh or eighth grade that includes a commitment to
graduate from high school with at least a C average and with no felony
convictions. The pledge must be witnessed by a parent or guardian and
forwarded to the office of student financial assistance by mail or
electronically, as indicated on the pledge form.
(b) A student eligible under subsection (1)(b) of this section
shall be automatically enrolled, with no action necessary by the
student or the student's family, and the enrollment form must be
forwarded by the department of social and health services to the
((higher education coordinating board or its successor)) office of
student financial assistance by mail or electronically, as indicated on
the form.
(4)(a) Scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students
graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or who received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW.
(b) To receive the Washington college bound scholarship, a student
must graduate with at least a "C" average from a public high school or
an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in Washington
or have received home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, must
have no felony convictions, and must be a resident student as defined
in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (((d))) (e).
(5) A student's family income will be assessed upon graduation
before awarding the scholarship.
(6) If at graduation from high school the student's family income
does not exceed sixty-five percent of the state median family income,
scholarship award amounts shall be as provided in this section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award shall be
(i) the difference between the student's tuition and required fees,
less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver
assistance the student receives; (ii) plus five hundred dollars for
books and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the award amount shall be the representative
average of awards granted to students in public research universities
in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the award amount shall be the representative average of
awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges
in Washington.
(7) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of scholarship awards.
(8) Institutions of higher education shall award the student all
need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would
otherwise qualify. The Washington college bound scholarship is
intended to replace unmet need, loans, and, at the student's option,
work-study award before any other grants or scholarships are reduced.
(9) The first scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating
in 2012.
(10) The state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition
units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition
units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held
from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a Washington
college bound scholarship recipient.
(11) The scholarship award must be used within five years of
receipt. Any unused scholarship tuition units revert to the Washington
college bound scholarship account.
(12) Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any
reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship
tuition units shall revert to the Washington college bound scholarship
account.

--- END ---