BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all
cities that impose a business and occupation tax under this chapter
must have by July 1, 2016, their general business licenses issued and
renewed, if the license is required to be renewed, through the business
licensing system in accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW or through a
city-developed portal.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, by
January 1, 2019, all cities that require general business licenses and
that do not impose a business and occupation tax must have such
licenses issued and renewed, if the license is required to be renewed,
through the business licensing system in accordance with chapter 19.02
RCW or through a city-developed portal.
(3) The department may delay or phase-in the issuance and renewal
of general business licenses beyond the dates provided in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section if funding or other resources are
insufficient to enable the department to meet the deadlines in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section or as necessary to ensure the
business licensing system is adequately prepared to handle all general
business licenses and that the transition to mandatory department
issuance and renewal of general business licenses is as seamless as
possible. To that end, the department, working with affected cities,
is authorized to establish a schedule for assuming the issuance and
renewal of general business licenses as required by this section.
Cities may continue to issue and renew their general business licenses
until those licenses have been incorporated into the business licensing
system. A city whose general business license has been incorporated
into the business licensing system may no longer issue and renew those
licenses.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Business and occupation tax" has the same meaning as in RCW
35.102.030.
(b) "City-developed portal" means a single portal with at least
five participating cities that allows for the issuance or renewal of
general business licenses for all participating cities.

--- END ---