BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, within existing
resources, shall develop a program of instruction for firearms accident
prevention for students in kindergarten through grade twelve.
(a) The program of instruction developed under this subsection
shall include the safety message, "Stop! Don't Touch. Leave the Area.
Tell an Adult."
(b) The program of instruction may include instructional materials
from the Eddie Eagle GunSafe Program developed by the national rifle
association.
(2) Beginning with the 2014-15 school year, all common school
districts may adopt the firearms accident prevention program developed
by the superintendent of public instruction under this section to
instruct students in kindergarten and through grade twelve in the
content area addressed by the curriculum. A school district may
provide additional instruction that supplements the program established
by the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) A school district shall excuse a student from instruction
regarding firearms accident prevention if the student's parent or
guardian provides the district, the student's teacher, or the
administrator of the student's school with written notice that the
parent or guardian wants the student to be excused from the instruction
provided under this section. If a student is excused from
participating in the instruction, the student shall not be academically
penalized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---