BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.40 RCW
to read as follows:
If an owner or person responsible for payment of taxes on any
property that has been valued in excess of five hundred thousand
dollars seeks to appeal the valuation pursuant to RCW 84.40.038, the
owner or person responsible for payment of taxes must be provided with
a notice of valuation signed by a licensed certified appraiser. The
notice must include the contact information for the appraiser who
signed the notice of valuation and a description of the process for
appealing the valuation.

--- END ---