BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Zoning, building, and fire regulations must be enforced on
unlicensed and improperly located storage facilities when the existence
of the facility becomes known and not just when a complaint is made.
(2) The counties must use money collected from fines for
noncompliance with county zoning, building, and fire regulations to
investigate instances of violations by self-storage facilities. These
inspections must be performed during regular, ongoing zoning, building,
and fire regulation inspections.

--- END ---