BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.640 and 2012 c 74 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE AMOUNT AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit $5.00 RCW 88.02.800(2) General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and
invasive species
removal Subsection (3) of this
section Subsection (3) of this
section Subsection (3) of this
section

(c) Derelict vessel removal
surcharge $1.00 Subsection (4) of this
section Subsection (4) of this
section

(d) Duplicate certificate of
title $1.25 RCW 88.02.530(1)(c) General fund

(e) Duplicate registration $1.25 RCW 88.02.590(1)(c) General fund

(f) Filing RCW 46.17.005 RCW 88.02.560(2) RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate
technology RCW 46.17.015 RCW 88.02.560(2) RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service RCW 46.17.025 RCW 88.02.560(2) RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel
permit $25.00 RCW 88.02.620(3) Subsection (5) of this
section

(j) Quick title service $50.00 RCW 88.02.540(3) Subsection (7) of this
section

(k) Registration $10.50 RCW 88.02.560(2) RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal $1.25 RCW 88.02.595(1)(c) General fund

(m) Title application $5.00 RCW 88.02.515 General fund

(n) Transfer $1.00 RCW 88.02.560(7) General fund

(o) Vessel visitor permit $30.00 RCW 88.02.610(3) Subsection (6) of this
section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in
subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of
registration fees at the time application for registration is made.
(3)(((a))) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee
required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be
distributed as follows:
(((i))) (a) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the
aquatic invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;
(((ii))) (b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667;
(((iii))) (c) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic
invasive species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and
(((iv))) (d) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel
removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.
(((b) If the department of natural resources indicates that the
balance of the derelict vessel removal account, not including any
transfer or appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited
into the account collected under subsection (5) of this section reaches
one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the
two dollars of the derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee
that is deposited into the derelict vessel removal account as
authorized in (a)(iv) of this subsection must be suspended for the
following fiscal year.))
(4) ((Until January 1, 2014)) In addition to other fees required in
this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar
must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge((:
(a))) is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels
accumulated in Washington ((state)) waters that pose a threat to the
health and safety of the people and to the environment((;
(b) Is to be used only for the removal of vessels that are less
than seventy-five feet in length;)) and
(((c))) must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account
created in RCW 79.100.100.
(5) The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be
paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing
the identification document by the department. Any moneys remaining
from the fee after the payment of costs must be allocated to counties
by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW
88.02.650.
(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed
as follows:
(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100;
(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing
the vessel visitor permit;
(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state
treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and
(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are
in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and
registration of vessels.
(7)(a) The fifty dollar quick title service fee must be distributed
as follows:
(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the general fund.
(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or
other agent or subagent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars
must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained
by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by
the county auditor.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same
meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.100.100 and 2010 c 161 s 1161 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The derelict vessel removal account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 79.100.050 and 79.100.060 and those
moneys specified in RCW 88.02.640 must be deposited into the account.
The account is authorized to receive fund transfers and appropriations
from the general fund, deposits from the derelict vessel removal
surcharge under RCW 88.02.640(4), as well as gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of
this chapter and expend the same or any income according to the terms
of the gifts, grants, or endowments provided those terms do not
conflict with any provisions of this section or any guidelines
developed to prioritize reimbursement of removal projects associated
with this chapter.
(b) Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account ((must)) may only be used by the
department for developing and administering the vessel turn-in program
created in section 40 of this act and to reimburse authorized public
entities for up to ninety percent of the total reasonable and auditable
administrative, removal, disposal, and environmental damage costs of
abandoned or derelict vessels when the previous owner is either unknown
after a reasonable search effort or insolvent. Reimbursement may not
be made unless the department determines that the public entity has
made reasonable efforts to identify and locate the party responsible
for the vessel, or any other person or entity that has incurred
secondary liability under section 36 of this act, regardless of the
title of owner of the vessel.
(c) Funds in the account resulting from transfers from the general
fund or from the deposit of funds from the watercraft excise tax as
provided for under RCW 82.49.030 must be used to reimburse one hundred
percent of ((these)) costs and should be prioritized for the removal of
large vessels.
(d) Costs associated with the removal and disposal of an abandoned
or derelict vessel under the authority granted in RCW 53.08.320 also
qualify for reimbursement from the derelict vessel removal account.
(e) In each biennium, up to twenty percent of the expenditures from
the derelict vessel removal account may be used for administrative
expenses of the department of licensing and department of natural
resources in implementing this chapter.
(2) ((If the balance of the account reaches one million dollars as
of March 1st of any year, exclusive of any transfer or appropriation of
funds into the account or funds deposited into the account collected
under RCW 88.02.640(5), the department must notify the department of
licensing and the collection of any fees associated with this account
must be suspended for the following fiscal year.
(3))) Priority for use of this account is for the removal of
derelict and abandoned vessels that are in danger of sinking, breaking
up, or blocking navigation channels, or that present environmental
risks such as leaking fuel or other hazardous substances. The
department must develop criteria, in the form of informal guidelines,
to prioritize removal projects associated with this chapter, but may
not consider whether the applicant is a state or local entity when
prioritizing. The guidelines must also include guidance to the
authorized public entities as to what removal activities and associated
costs are reasonable and eligible for reimbursement.
(((4))) (3) The department must keep all authorized public entities
((apprized)) apprised of the balance of the derelict vessel removal
account and the funds available for reimbursement. The guidelines
developed by the department must also be made available to the other
authorized public entities. This subsection (((4))) (3) must be
satisfied by utilizing the least costly method, including maintaining
the information on the department's internet web site, or any other
cost-effective method.
(((5))) (4) An authorized public entity may contribute its ten
percent of costs that are not eligible for reimbursement by using in-kind services, including the use of existing staff, equipment, and
volunteers.
(((6))) (5) This chapter does not guarantee reimbursement for an
authorized public entity. Authorized public entities seeking certainty
in reimbursement prior to taking action under this chapter may first
notify the department of their proposed action and the estimated total
costs. Upon notification by an authorized public entity, the
department must make the authorized public entity aware of the status
of the fund and the likelihood of reimbursement being available. The
department may offer technical assistance and assure reimbursement for
up to two years following the removal action if an assurance is
appropriate given the balance of the fund and the details of the
proposed action.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.65.020 and 2002 c 286 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission may take reasonable measures, including but not
limited to the use of anchors, chains, ropes, and locks, or removal
from the water, to secure unauthorized vessels located at or on a
commission facility so that the unauthorized vessels are in the
possession and control of the commission. At least ten days before
securing any unauthorized registered vessel, the commission shall send
notification by registered mail to the last registered owner or
registered owners of the vessel at their last known address or
addresses.
(2) The commission may take reasonable measures, including but not
limited to the use of anchors, chains, ropes, locks, or removal from
the water, to secure any vessel if the vessel, in the opinion of the
commission, is a nuisance, is in danger of sinking or creating other
damage to a commission facility, or is otherwise a threat to the
health, safety, or welfare of the public or environment at a commission
facility. The costs of any such procedure shall be paid by the
vessel's owner.
(3) At the time of securing any vessel under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section, the commission shall attach to the vessel a readily
visible notice or, when practicable, shall post such notice in a
conspicuous location at the commission facility in the event the vessel
is removed from the premises. The notice shall be of a reasonable size
and shall contain the following information:
(a) The date and time the notice was attached or posted;
(b) A statement that the vessel has been secured by the commission
and that if the commission's charges, if any, are not paid and the
vessel is not removed by . . . . . . (the thirty-fifth consecutive day
following the date of attachment or posting of the notice), the vessel
will be considered abandoned and will be sold at public auction to
satisfy the charges;
(c) The address and telephone number where additional information
may be obtained concerning the securing of the vessel and conditions
for its release; and
(d) A description of the owner's or secured party's rights under
this chapter.
(4) With respect to registered vessels: Within five days of the
date that notice is attached or posted under subsection (3) of this
section, the commission shall send such notice, by registered mail, to
each registered owner.
(5) If a vessel is secured under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the owner, or any person with a legal right to possess the
vessel, may claim the vessel by:
(a) Making arrangements satisfactory to the commission for the
immediate removal of the vessel from the commission's control or for
authorized storage or moorage; and
(b) Making payment to the commission of all reasonable charges
incurred by the commission in securing the vessel under subsections (1)
and (2) of this section and of all moorage fees owed to the commission.
(6) A vessel is considered abandoned if, within the thirty-five day
period following the date of attachment or posting of notice in
subsection (3) of this section, the vessel has not been claimed under
subsection (5) of this section.
(7) If the owner or owners of a vessel are unable to reimburse the
commission for all reasonable charges under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section within a reasonable time, the commission may seek
reimbursement of ((seventy-five)) ninety percent of all reasonable and
auditable costs from the derelict vessel removal account established in
RCW 79.100.100.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.100.130 and 2011 c 247 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((marina)) private moorage facility owner, as those terms are
defined in RCW 88.26.010, may contract with a local government for the
purpose of participating in the derelict vessel removal program.
(2) If a contract is completed under this section, the local
government shall serve as the authorized public entity for the removal
of ((the)) a derelict or abandoned vessel from the ((marina owner's))
property of the private moorage facility owner. The contract must
provide for the ((marina owner)) private moorage facility owner to be
financially responsible for the removal and disposal costs that are not
reimbursed by the department as provided under RCW 79.100.100, and any
additional reasonable administrative costs incurred by the local
government during the removal of the derelict or abandoned vessel.
(3) Prior to the commencement of any removal which will seek
reimbursement from the derelict vessel removal program, the contract
and the proposed vessel removal shall be submitted to the department
for review and approval. The local government shall use the procedure
specified under RCW 79.100.100(6).
(4) If the private moorage facility owner has already seized the
vessel under chapter 88.26 RCW and title has reverted to the moorage
facility, the moorage facility is not considered the owner under this
chapter for purposes of cost recovery for actions taken under this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.19.1919 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 215 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall sell or exchange personal property
belonging to the state for which the agency, office, department, or
educational institution having custody thereof has no further use, at
public or private sale, and cause the moneys realized from the sale of
any such property to be paid into the fund from which such property was
purchased or, if such fund no longer exists, into the state general
fund. This requirement is subject to the following exceptions and
limitations:
(((1))) (a) This section does not apply to property under RCW
27.53.045, 28A.335.180, or 43.19.1920;
(((2))) (b) Sales of capital assets may be made by the department
and a credit established for future purchases of capital items as
provided for in RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939;
(((3))) (c) Personal property, excess to a state agency, including
educational institutions, shall not be sold or disposed of prior to
reasonable efforts by the department to determine if other state
agencies have a requirement for such personal property. Such
determination shall follow sufficient notice to all state agencies to
allow adequate time for them to make their needs known. Surplus items
may be disposed of without prior notification to state agencies if it
is determined by the director to be in the best interest of the state.
The department shall maintain a record of disposed surplus property,
including date and method of disposal, identity of any recipient, and
approximate value of the property;
(((4))) (d) This section does not apply to personal property
acquired by a state organization under federal grants and contracts if
in conflict with special title provisions contained in such grants or
contracts;
(((5))) (e) A state agency having a surplus personal property asset
with a fair market value of less than five hundred dollars may transfer
the asset to another state agency without charging fair market value.
A state agency conducting this action must maintain adequate records to
comply with agency inventory procedures and state audit requirements.
(2)(a) Prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned
vessel, the department shall conduct a thorough review of the physical
condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any
containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(b) If the department determines that the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the department may: (i) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (ii)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 5 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel, the
department shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the department.
(2)(a) The department shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the department may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the department's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the department,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The department may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection (2).
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the department is required to apply for a certificate
of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel
under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel,
the department shall conduct a thorough review of the physical
condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any
containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the department determines that the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the department may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.
(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not
subject to this section or section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 7 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel, the
department shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the department.
(2)(a) The department shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the department may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the department's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the department,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The department may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the department is required to apply for a certificate
of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel
under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel,
the department shall conduct a thorough review of the physical
condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any
containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the department determines that the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the department may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.
(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not
subject to this section or section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 9 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel, the
department shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the department.
(2)(a) The department shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the department may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the department's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the department,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The department may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the department is required to apply for a certificate
of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel
under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a commission-owned vessel,
the commission shall conduct a thorough review of the physical
condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any
containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the commission determines the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
that the commission may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the
conditions identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.
(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not
subject to this section or section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 11 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a commission-owned vessel, the
commission shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the commission.
(2)(a) The commission shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the commission may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the commission's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the commission,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The commission may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the commission is required to apply for a certificate
of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel
under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel,
the department shall conduct a thorough review of the physical
condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any
containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the department determines that the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the department may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 13 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel, the
department shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the department.
(2)(a) The department shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the department may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the department's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the department,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The department may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the department is required to apply for a certificate
of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel
under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a city or town-owned vessel,
the city or town shall conduct a thorough review of the physical
condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any
containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the city or town determines the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the city or town may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.
(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not
subject to this section or section 16 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 15 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a city or town-owned vessel, a
city or town shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the city or town.
(2)(a) The city or town shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the city or town may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the city or town's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the city or town,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The city or town may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the city or town is required to apply for a
certificate of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register
the vessel under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a code city-owned vessel,
the code city shall conduct a thorough review of the physical condition
of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any containers
and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the code city determines that the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the code city may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.
(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not
subject to this section or section 18 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 17 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a code city-owned vessel, a code
city shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the code city.
(2)(a) The code city shall remove any containers or other materials
that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous substances, as
defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the code city may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the code city's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the code city,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The code city may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the code city is required to apply for a certificate
of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel
under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a county-owned vessel, the
county shall conduct a thorough review of the physical condition of the
vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any containers and other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the county determines that the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the county may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.
(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not
subject to this section or section 20 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 19 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a county-owned vessel, a county
shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the county.
(2)(a) The county shall remove any containers or other materials
that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous substances, as
defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the county may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the county's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the county, based
on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and anticipated use
of the vessel including initial destination following transfer.
(c) The county may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the county is required to apply for a certificate of
title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel under
RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a vessel owned by a port
district and used primarily to conduct port business, the port district
shall conduct a thorough review of the physical condition of the
vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any containers and other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the port district determines that the vessel is in a state
of advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to
human health or safety, including a threat of environmental
contamination, the port district may: (a) Not transfer the vessel
until the conditions identified under this subsection have been
corrected; or (b) permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill,
deconstruction, or other related method.
(3) Vessels taken into custody under chapter 79.100 RCW are not
subject to this section or section 22 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 21 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a port district-owned vessel, a
port district shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the port district.
(2)(a) The port district shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the port district may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the port district's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the port
district, based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel including initial destination following
transfer.
(c) The port district may consult with the department of ecology in
carrying out the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the port district is required to apply for a
certificate of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register
the vessel under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel,
the department shall conduct a thorough review of the physical
condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any
containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.
(2) If the department determines that the vessel is in a state of
advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human
health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination,
the department may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions
identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b)
permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other
related method.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 23 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of a department-owned vessel, the
department shall obtain the following from the transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the department.
(2)(a) The department shall remove any containers or other
materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous
substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the department may transfer a vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the department's
satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent
with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the department,
based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and
anticipated use of the vessel including initial destination following
transfer.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a valid marine
document, the department is required to apply for a title or
certificate of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register
the vessel under RCW 88.02.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Prior to transferring ownership of an institution-owned vessel,
an institution of higher education shall conduct a thorough review of
the physical condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating
capability, and any containers and other materials that are not fixed
to the vessel.
(2) If the institution of higher education determines that the
vessel is in a state of advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably
imminent threat to human health or safety, including a threat of
environmental contamination, the institution of higher education may:
(a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions identified under this
subsection have been corrected; or (b) permanently dispose of the
vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other related method.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Following the inspection required under section 25 of this act
and prior to transferring ownership of an institution-owned vessel, the
institution of higher education shall obtain the following from the
transferee:
(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the
vessel; and
(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to
obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined
by the institution of higher education.
(2)(a) The institution of higher education shall remove any
containers or other materials that are not fixed to the vessel and
contain hazardous substances, as defined under RCW 70.105D.020.
(b) However, the institution of higher education may transfer a
vessel with:
(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this
subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the institution of
higher education's satisfaction that the container's or material's
presence is consistent with the anticipated use of the vessel; and
(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the institution
of higher education, based on factors including the vessel's size,
condition, and anticipated use of the vessel including initial
destination following transfer.
(c) The institution of higher education may consult with the
department of ecology in carrying out the requirements of this
subsection.
(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid
marine document, the institution of higher education is required to
apply for a certificate of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and
register the vessel under RCW 88.02.550.

Sec. 27 RCW 28B.10.029 and 2012 c 230 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) An institution of higher education may, consistent with
sections 25 and 26 of this act, exercise independently those powers
otherwise granted to the director of enterprise services in chapter
43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and disposition of all
material, supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support,
maintenance, and use of the respective institution of higher education.
(b) Property disposition policies followed by institutions of
higher education shall be consistent with policies followed by the
department of enterprise services.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection,
purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and 43.03
RCW, and RCW ((43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911,)) 43.19.1917,
((43.19.1937,)) 43.19.685, ((43.19.700 through 43.19.704)) 39.26.260
through 39.26.271, and 43.19.560 through 43.19.637.
(ii) Institutions of higher education may use all appropriate means
for making and paying for travel arrangements including, but not
limited to, electronic booking and reservations, advance payment and
deposits for tours, lodging, and other necessary expenses, and other
travel transactions based on standard industry practices and federal
accountable plan requirements. Such arrangements shall support
student, faculty, staff, and other participants' travel, by groups and
individuals, both domestic and international, in the most cost-effective and efficient manner possible, regardless of the source of
funds.
(iii) Formal sealed, electronic, or web-based competitive bidding
is not necessary for purchases or personal services contracts by
institutions of higher education for less than one hundred thousand
dollars. However, for purchases and personal services contracts of ten
thousand dollars or more and less than one hundred thousand dollars,
quotations must be secured from at least three vendors to assure
establishment of a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone,
electronic, or written quotations, or any combination thereof. As part
of securing the three vendor quotations, institutions of higher
education must invite at least one quotation each from a certified
minority and a certified woman-owned vendor that otherwise qualifies to
perform the work. A record of competition for all such purchases and
personal services contracts of ten thousand dollars or more and less
than one hundred thousand dollars must be documented for audit
purposes.
(d) Purchases under chapter 39.29, 43.19, or 43.105 RCW by
institutions of higher education may be made by using contracts for
materials, supplies, services, or equipment negotiated or entered into
by, for, or through group purchasing organizations.
(e) The community and technical colleges shall comply with RCW
43.19.450.
(f) Except for the University of Washington, institutions of higher
education shall comply with RCW 43.19.769, 43.19.763, and 43.19.781.
(g) If an institution of higher education can satisfactorily
demonstrate to the director of the office of financial management that
the cost of compliance is greater than the value of benefits from any
of the following statutes, then it shall be exempt from them: RCW
43.19.685 and 43.19.637.
(h) Any institution of higher education that chooses to exercise
independent purchasing authority for a commodity or group of
commodities shall notify the director of enterprise services.
Thereafter the director of enterprise services shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution for the duration of the
enterprise services contract term for that commodity or group of
commodities.
(2) The council of presidents and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene its correctional industries business
development advisory committee, and work collaboratively with
correctional industries, to:
(a) Reaffirm purchasing criteria and ensure that quality, service,
and timely delivery result in the best value for expenditure of state
dollars;
(b) Update the approved list of correctional industries products
from which higher education shall purchase; and
(c) Develop recommendations on ways to continue to build
correctional industries' business with institutions of higher
education.
(3) Higher education and correctional industries shall develop a
plan to build higher education business with correctional industries to
increase higher education purchases of correctional industries
products, based upon the criteria established in subsection (2) of this
section. The plan shall include the correctional industries'
production and sales goals for higher education and an approved list of
products from which higher education institutions shall purchase, based
on the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. Higher
education and correctional industries shall report to the legislature
regarding the plan and its implementation no later than January 30,
2005.
(4)(a) Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to
contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2006, to purchase one
percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions
each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate
work programs operated by the department of corrections. Institutions
of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not
later than June 30, 2008, to purchase two percent of the total goods
and services required by the institutions each year produced or
provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs
operated by the department of corrections.
(b) Institutions of higher education shall endeavor to assure the
department of corrections has notifications of bid opportunities with
the goal of meeting or exceeding the purchasing target in (a) of this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) The department of natural resource must
reevaluate the criteria developed under RCW 79.100.100 regarding the
prioritization of vessel removals funded by the derelict vessel removal
account. This reprioritization process must occur by January 30, 2014,
and consider how vessels located in the vicinity of aquaculture
operations and other sensitive areas should be prioritized.
(2) This section expires July 31, 2015.

Sec. 29 RCW 88.02.380 and 2010 c 161 s 1006 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, and, in part, in
order to prevent the future potential dereliction or abandonment of a
vessel, a violation of this chapter and the rules adopted by the
department is a ((misdemeanor punishable only by a fine not to exceed
one hundred dollars per vessel for the first violation. Subsequent
violations in the same year are subject to the following fines:
(a) For the second violation, a fine of two hundred dollars per
vessel;
(b) For the third and successive violations, a fine of four hundred
dollars per vessel)) class 2 civil infraction.
(2) A ((violation designated in this chapter as a)) civil
infraction issued under this chapter must be ((punished accordingly
pursuant to)) processed under chapter 7.80 RCW.
(3) After the subtraction of court costs and administrative
collection fees, moneys collected under this section must be credited
to the ((current expense fund of the arresting jurisdiction)) ticketing
jurisdiction and used only for the support of the enforcement agency,
department, division, or program that issued the violation.
(4) All law enforcement officers may enforce this chapter and the
rules adopted by the department within their respective jurisdictions.
A city, town, or county may contract with a fire protection district
for enforcement of this chapter, and fire protection districts may
engage in enforcement activities.

Sec. 30 RCW 88.02.340 and 2010 c 161 s 1004 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person charged with the enforcement of this chapter may
inspect the registration certificate of a vessel to ascertain the legal
and registered ownership of the vessel. A vessel owner or operator who
fails to provide the registration certificate for inspection upon the
request of any person charged with enforcement of this chapter ((is a
class 2 civil infraction)) may be found to be in violation of this
chapter.
(2) The department may require the inspection of vessels that are
brought into this state from another state and for which a certificate
of title has not been issued and for any other vessel if the department
determines that inspection of the vessel will help to verify the
accuracy of the information set forth on the application.

Sec. 31 RCW 88.02.550 and 2010 c 161 s 1017 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this chapter, a person may not own or
operate any vessel, including a rented vessel, on the waters of this
state unless the vessel has been registered and displays a registration
number and a valid decal in accordance with this chapter. A vessel
that has or is required to have a valid marine document as a vessel of
the United States is only required to display a valid decal. ((A
violation of this section is a class 2 civil infraction.))
(2) A vessel numbered in this state under the federal boat safety
act of 1971 (85 Stat. 213, 46 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.) is not required to
be registered under this chapter until the certificate of number issued
for the vessel under the federal boat safety act expires. When
registering under this chapter, this type of vessel is subject to the
amount of excise tax due under chapter 82.49 RCW that would have been
due under chapter 82.49 RCW if the vessel had been registered at the
time otherwise required under this chapter.

Sec. 32 RCW 79.100.120 and 2010 c 210 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person seeking to contest an authorized public entity's
decision to take temporary possession or custody of a vessel under this
chapter, or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed to an
authorized public entity under this chapter, may request a hearing in
accordance with this section.
(2)(a) If the contested decision or action was undertaken by a
state agency, a written request for a hearing related to the decision
or action must be filed with the pollution control hearings board and
served on the state agency in accordance with RCW 43.21B.230 (2) and
(3) within thirty days of the date the authorized public entity
acquires custody of the vessel under RCW 79.100.040, or if the vessel
is redeemed before the authorized public entity acquires custody, the
date of redemption, or the right to a hearing is deemed waived and the
vessel's owner is liable for any costs owed the authorized public
entity. In the event of litigation, the prevailing party is entitled
to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(b) Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the pollution control
hearings board shall proceed to hear and determine the validity of the
decision to take the vessel into temporary possession or custody and
the reasonableness of any towing, storage, or other charges permitted
under this chapter. Within five business days after the request for a
hearing is filed, the pollution control hearings board shall notify the
vessel owner requesting the hearing and the authorized public entity of
the date, time, and location for the hearing. Unless the vessel is
redeemed before the request for hearing is filed, the pollution control
hearings board shall set the hearing on a date that is within ten
business days of the filing of the request for hearing. If the vessel
is redeemed before the request for a hearing is filed, the pollution
control hearings board shall set the hearing on a date that is within
sixty days of the filing of the request for hearing.
(c) Consistent with RCW 43.21B.305, a proceeding brought under this
subsection may be heard by one member of the pollution control hearings
board, whose decision is the final decision of the board.
(3)(a) If the contested decision or action was undertaken by a
metropolitan park district, port district, city, town, or county, which
has adopted rules or procedures for contesting decisions or actions
pertaining to derelict or abandoned vessels, those rules or procedures
must be followed in order to contest a decision to take temporary
possession or custody of a vessel, or to contest the amount of
reimbursement owed.
(b) If the metropolitan park district, port district, city, town,
or county has not adopted rules or procedures for contesting decisions
or actions pertaining to derelict or abandoned vessels, then a person
requesting a hearing under this section must follow the procedure
established in ((RCW 53.08.320(5) for contesting the decisions or
actions of moorage facility operators)) subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 33 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, ((and)) the parks and recreation
commission, and authorized public entities described in chapter 79.100
RCW:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(n) Decisions of ((a state agency that is)) an authorized public
entity under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of
a vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable by the hearings board under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 34 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, ((and)) the parks and recreation
commission, and authorized public entities described in chapter 79.100
RCW:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(m) Decisions of ((a state agency that is)) an authorized public
entity under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of
a vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable by the hearings board under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 35 RCW 79.100.040 and 2007 c 342 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to exercising the authority granted in RCW 79.100.030,
the authorized public entity must first obtain custody of the vessel.
To do so, the authorized public entity must:
(a) Mail notice of its intent to obtain custody, at least twenty
days prior to taking custody, to the last known address of the previous
owner to register the vessel in any state or with the federal
government and to any lien holders or secured interests on record. A
notice need not be sent to the purported owner or any other person
whose interest in the vessel is not recorded with a state or federal
agency;
(b) Post notice of its intent clearly on the vessel for thirty days
and publish its intent at least once, more than ten days but less than
twenty days prior to taking custody, in a newspaper of general
circulation for the county in which the vessel is located; and
(c) Post notice of its intent on the department's internet web site
on a page specifically designated for such notices. If the authorized
public entity is not the department, the department must facilitate the
internet posting.
(2) All notices sent, posted, or published in accordance with this
section must, at a minimum, explain the intent of the authorized public
entity to take custody of the vessel, the rights of the authorized
public entity after taking custody of the vessel as provided in RCW
79.100.030, the procedures the owner must follow in order to avoid
custody being taken by the authorized public entity, the procedures the
owner must follow in order to reclaim possession after custody is taken
by the authorized public entity, and the financial liabilities that the
owner may incur as provided for in RCW 79.100.060.
(3)(a) ((If a)) Any authorized public entity may tow, beach, or
otherwise take temporary possession of a vessel if the owner of the
vessel cannot be located or is unwilling or unable to assume immediate
responsibility for the vessel and if the vessel ((is)):
(i) Is in immediate danger of sinking, breaking up, or blocking
navigational channels; or
(ii) Poses a reasonably imminent threat to human health or safety,
including a threat of environmental contamination((; and (iii) the
owner of the vessel cannot be located or is unwilling or unable to
assume immediate responsibility for the vessel, any authorized public
entity may tow, beach, or otherwise take temporary possession of the
vessel)).
(b) Before taking temporary possession of the vessel, the
authorized public entity must make reasonable attempts to consult with
the department or the United States coast guard to ensure that other
remedies are not available. The basis for taking temporary possession
of the vessel must be set out in writing by the authorized public
entity within seven days of taking action and be submitted to the
owner, if known, as soon thereafter as is reasonable. If the
authorized public entity has not already provided the required notice,
immediately after taking possession of the vessel, the authorized
public entity must initiate the notice provisions in subsection (1) of
this section. The authorized public entity must complete the notice
requirements of subsection (1) of this section before using or
disposing of the vessel as authorized in RCW 79.100.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 79.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A vessel owner must obtain a vessel inspection under this
section prior to transferring a vessel that is:
(a) More than sixty-five feet in length and more than forty years
old; and
(b) Either:
(i) Is registered or required to be registered under chapter 88.02
RCW; or
(ii) Is listed or required to be listed under chapter 84.40 RCW.
(2) Where required under subsection (1) of this section, a vessel
owner must provide a copy of the vessel inspection documentation to the
transferee and, if the department did not conduct the inspection, to
the department prior to the transfer.
(3) Failure to comply with the requirements of subsections (1) and
(2) of this section will result in the transferor having secondary
liability under RCW 79.100.060 if the vessel is later abandoned by the
transferee or becomes derelict prior to a subsequent ownership
transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 (1) By December 31, 2013, the department
shall adopt by rule procedures and standards for the vessel inspections
required under section 36 of this act. The procedures and standards
must identify the public or private entities authorized to conduct
inspections, the required elements of an inspection, and the manner in
which inspection results must be documented. The vessel inspection
required under this section must be designed to:
(a) Provide the transferee with current information about the
condition of the vessel, including the condition of its hull and key
operating systems, prior to the transfer;
(b) Provide the department with information under (a) of this
subsection for each applicable vessel and, more broadly, to improve the
department's understanding of the condition of the larger, older boats
in the state's waters;
(c) Discourage the future abandonment or dereliction of the vessel;
and
(d) Maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of the inspection
process, including with respect to the time and resources of the
transferor, transferee, and the state.
(2) The department shall work with appropriate government agencies
and stakeholders in designing the inspection process and standards
under this section.
(3) This section expires July 31, 2014.

Sec. 38 RCW 79.100.060 and 2006 c 153 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The owner of an abandoned or derelict vessel, or any person or
entity that has incurred secondary liability under section 36 of this
act, is responsible for reimbursing an authorized public entity for all
reasonable and auditable costs associated with the removal or disposal
of the owner's vessel under this chapter. These costs include, but are
not limited to, costs incurred exercising the authority granted in RCW
79.100.030, all administrative costs incurred by the authorized public
entity during the procedure set forth in RCW 79.100.040, removal and
disposal costs, and costs associated with environmental damages
directly or indirectly caused by the vessel. An authorized public
entity that has taken temporary possession of a vessel may require that
all reasonable and auditable costs associated with the removal of the
vessel be paid before the vessel is released to the owner.
(2) Reimbursement for costs may be sought from an owner, or any
person or entity that has incurred secondary liability under section 36
of this act, who is identified subsequent to the vessel's removal and
disposal.
(3) If the full amount of all costs due to the authorized public
entity under this chapter is not paid to the authorized public entity
within thirty days after first notifying the responsible parties of the
amounts owed, the authorized public entity or the department may bring
an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the costs,
plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred by the authorized
public entity.

Sec. 39 RCW 88.26.020 and 1993 c 474 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any private moorage facility operator may take reasonable
measures, including the use of chains, ropes, and locks, or removal
from the water, to secure vessels within the private moorage facility
so that the vessels are in the possession and control of the operator
and cannot be removed from the facility. These procedures may be used
if an owner mooring or storing a vessel at the facility fails, after
being notified that charges are owing and of the owner's right to
commence legal proceedings to contest that such charges are owing, to
pay charges owed or to commence legal proceedings. Notification shall
be by two separate letters, one sent by first-class mail and one sent
by registered mail to the owner and any lienholder of record at the
last known address. In the case of a transient vessel, or where no
address was furnished by the owner, the operator need not give notice
prior to securing the vessel. At the time of securing the vessel, an
operator shall attach to the vessel a readily visible notice. The
notice shall be of a reasonable size and shall contain the following
information:
(a) The date and time the notice was attached;
(b) A statement that if the account is not paid in full within
ninety days from the time the notice is attached the vessel may be sold
at public auction to satisfy the charges; and
(c) The address and telephone number where additional information
may be obtained concerning release of the vessel.
After a vessel is secured, the operator shall make a reasonable
effort to notify the owner and any lienholder of record by registered
mail in order to give the owner the information contained in the
notice.
(2) A private moorage facility operator, at his or her discretion,
may move moored vessels ashore for storage within properties under the
operator's control or for storage with a private person under their
control as bailees of the private moorage facility, if the vessel is,
in the opinion of the operator, a nuisance, in danger of sinking or
creating other damage, or is owing charges. The costs of any such
procedure shall be paid by the vessel's owner.
(3) If a vessel is secured under subsection (1) of this section or
moved ashore under subsection (2) of this section, the owner who is
obligated to the private operator for charges may regain possession of
the vessel by:
(a) Making arrangements satisfactory with the operator for the
immediate removal of the vessel from the facility or for authorized
moorage; and
(b) Making payment to the operator of all charges, or by posting
with the operator a sufficient cash bond or other acceptable security,
to be held in trust by the operator pending written agreement of the
parties with respect to payment by the vessel owner of the amount
owing, or pending resolution of the matter of the charges in a civil
action in a court of competent jurisdiction. After entry of judgment,
including any appeals, in a court of competent jurisdiction, or after
the parties reach agreement with respect to payment, the trust shall
terminate and the operator shall receive so much of the bond or other
security as agreed, or as is necessary, to satisfy any judgment, costs,
and interest as may be awarded to the operator. The balance shall be
refunded immediately to the owner at the last known address.
(4) If a vessel has been secured by the operator under subsection
(1) of this section and is not released to the owner under the bonding
provisions of this section within ninety days after notifying or
attempting to notify the owner under subsection (1) of this section,
the vessel is conclusively presumed to have been abandoned by the
owner.
(5) If a vessel moored or stored at a private moorage facility is
abandoned, the operator may authorize the public sale of the vessel by
authorized personnel, consistent with this section, to the highest and
best bidder for cash as follows:
(a) Before the vessel is sold, the vessel owner and any lienholder
of record shall be given at least twenty days' notice of the sale in
the manner set forth in subsection (1) of this section if the name and
address of the owner is known. The notice shall contain the time and
place of the sale, a reasonable description of the vessel to be sold,
and the amount of charges owed with respect to the vessel. The notice
of sale shall be published at least once, more than ten but not more
than twenty days before the sale, in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county in which the facility is located. This notice shall
include the name of the vessel, if any, the last known owner and
address, and a reasonable description of the vessel to be sold. The
operator may bid all or part of its charges at the sale and may become
a purchaser at the sale.
(b) Before the vessel is sold, any person seeking to redeem an
impounded vessel under this section may commence a lawsuit in the
superior court for the county in which the vessel was impounded to
contest the validity of the impoundment or the amount of charges owing.
This lawsuit must be commenced within sixty days of the date the
notification was provided under subsection (1) of this section, or the
right to a hearing is deemed waived and the owner is liable for any
charges owing the operator. In the event of litigation, the prevailing
party is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(c) The proceeds of a sale under this section shall be applied
first to the payment of any liens superior to the claim for charges,
then to payment of the charges, then to satisfy any other liens on the
vessel in the order of their priority. The balance, if any, shall be
paid to the owner. If the owner cannot in the exercise of due
diligence be located by the operator within one year of the date of the
sale, the excess funds from the sale shall revert to the department of
revenue under chapter 63.29 RCW. If the sale is for a sum less than
the applicable charges, the operator is entitled to assert a claim for
deficiency, however, the deficiency judgment shall not exceed the
moorage fees owed for the previous six-month period.
(d) In the event no one purchases the vessel at a sale, or a vessel
is not removed from the premises or other arrangements are not made
within ten days of sale, title to the vessel will revert to the
operator.
(e) Either a minimum bid may be established or a letter of credit
may be required from the buyer, or both, to discourage the future
abandonment of the vessel.
(6) The rights granted to a private moorage facility operator under
this section are in addition to any other legal rights an operator may
have to hold and sell a vessel and in no manner does this section alter
those rights, or affect the priority of other liens on a vessel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 A new section is added to chapter 79.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department may develop and administer a voluntary vessel
turn-in program.
(2) The purpose of the voluntary vessel turn-in program is to allow
the department to dismantle and dispose of vessels that pose a high
risk of becoming a derelict vessel or abandoned vessel, but that do not
yet meet the definition of those terms. The department shall design
the program with the goal of dismantling and disposing of as many
vessels as available resources allow, particularly those vessels posing
the greatest risk of becoming abandoned or derelict in the future.
(3) The department shall disseminate information about the vessel
turn-in program, including information about the application process,
on its internet site and through appropriate agency publications and
information sources as determined by the department. The department
shall disseminate this information for a reasonable time as determined
by the department prior to accepting applications.
(4) The department shall accept and review vessel turn-in program
applications from eligible vessel owners, including private marinas
that have gained legal title to a vessel in an advanced state of
disrepair, during the time period or periods identified by the
department. In order to be eligible for the vessel turn-in program, an
applicant must demonstrate to the department's satisfaction that the
applicant:
(a) Is a Washington resident or business;
(b) Owns a vessel that is in an advanced state of disrepair, has
minimal or no value, and has a high likelihood of becoming an abandoned
or derelict vessel; and
(c) Has insufficient resources to properly dispose of the vessel
outside of the vessel turn-in program.
(5) Decisions regarding program eligibility and whether to accept
a vessel for dismantling and disposal under the turn-in program are
within the sole discretion of the department.
(6) The department may take other actions not inconsistent with
this section in order to develop and administer the vessel turn-in
program.
(7) The department may not spend more than two hundred thousand
dollars in any one biennium on the program established in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 (1) In compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
department of natural resources must provide a brief summary of the
vessel turn-in program authorized under section 40 of this act to the
legislature by September 1, 2014, including information about
applications for the program, the vessels disposed of, and any
recommendations for modification of the program.
(2) This section expires July 31, 2015.

Sec. 42 RCW 43.21B.305 and 2005 c 34 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In an appeal that involves a penalty of fifteen thousand
dollars or less or that involves a derelict or abandoned vessel under
RCW 79.100.120, the appeal may be heard by one member of the board,
whose decision shall be the final decision of the board. The board
shall define by rule alternative procedures to expedite appeals
involving penalties of fifteen thousand dollars or less or involving a
derelict or abandoned vessel. These alternatives may include:
Mediation, upon agreement of all parties; submission of testimony by
affidavit; or other forms that may lead to less formal and faster
resolution of appeals.
(2) For appeals that involve a derelict or abandoned vessel under
RCW 79.100.120 only, an administrative law judge employed by the board
may be substituted for a board member under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 A new section is added to chapter 79.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An officer or employee of an authorized public entity, or the
department of ecology at the request of an authorized public entity,
may, consistent with subsection (2) of this section, board any vessel
at any reasonable time for the purpose of administering this chapter
including identifying ownership of a vessel, assessing the structural
integrity of a vessel, and assessing whether a vessel meets the
criteria described under RCW 79.100.040(3).
(2)(a) Prior to boarding any vessel under the authority of this
section, an officer or employee of an authorized public entity, or the
department of ecology at the request of an authorized public entity,
must apply for and obtain an administrative search warrant in either
Thurston county superior court or the superior court in the county
where the vessel is located, unless a warrant is not otherwise required
by law. The court may issue an administrative search warrant for
purposes consistent with subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Prior to requesting an administrative search warrant under this
subsection, the officer or employee must make a reasonable effort to
contact the owner or the owner's designee and obtain consent to board
the vessel.
(3) Nothing in this section affects actions taken by an authorized
public entity under RCW 79.100.040 or by an authorized public entity or
other agency under a separate statutory authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 (1) The department of natural resources
must, in consultation with the department of ecology and appropriate
stakeholders, evaluate potential changes to laws and rules related to
abandoned and derelict vessels that increase vessel owner
responsibility and address challenges associated with the economics of
removing vessels from the water. This evaluation must include the
development and analysis of:
(a) Administrative and legislative vessel owner responsibility
options that seek to ensure the prevention and cleanup of derelict and
abandoned vessels, including through the development of requirements
applicable to the transfer of vessels at high risk of becoming
abandoned or derelict by public and private moorage facility operators;
and
(b) The identification of challenges and roadblocks to
deconstructing derelict vessels and transforming them into a viable
scrap metal product.
(2) The department of natural resources may choose which
appropriate stakeholders are consulted in the implementation of this
section. However, persons with relevant expertise on financial
responsibility mechanisms, such as insurance and surety bonds and
letters of credit, must be included. The department of natural
resources must also seek to ensure opportunities for interested members
of the senate and house of representatives to provide input into the
work group process and conclusions.
(3) The department of natural resources must provide a summary of
the options developed by the work group, or a draft of proposed
legislation, to the legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by
December 15, 2013.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 Section 33 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 Section 34 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 Section 36 of this act takes effect July 1,
2014.

--- END ---