BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.410 and 1993 c 340 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every diver engaged in the commercial harvest of subtidal
geoduck clams ((shall obtain a nontransferable geoduck diver license))
in the state shall obtain a geoduck diver license. An individual may
only own one license.
(2) After July 1, 2013, the director may not issue new geoduck
diver licenses. A person may renew an existing license only if the
person held a geoduck diver license in 2011 or 2012. The license
holder must also have been listed on a department of natural resources'
geoduck harvest agreement plan of operation during this period.
(3) Any license issued after January 1, 2013, that does not meet
the requirements of this section must be revoked.
(4) The annual license fee is two hundred thirty dollars for
residents and two hundred eighty-five dollars for nonresidents.
(5) Geoduck diver licenses held by persons who were listed on a
department of natural resources' geoduck harvest agreement plan of
operation during 2011 or 2012 are transferable after July 1, 2013, and
are subject to a transfer of ownership fee payable by the acquiring
person in the amount of two thousand three hundred dollars for a
resident and two thousand eight hundred fifty dollars for a
nonresident. The transfer fee must be paid to the department. Geoduck
diver licenses held by persons not listed on a department of natural
resources' geoduck harvest agreement plan of operation during 2011 or
2012 are nontransferable.
(6) The license holder must perform all geoduck harvesting
personally.
(7) The department shall revoke a geoduck diver license not renewed
each year by December 31st. However, the director may reissue the
geoduck diver license, subject to a reissue fee of two thousand three
hundred dollars for a resident and two thousand eight hundred fifty
dollars for a nonresident, in addition to the annual license fee.
(8) Beginning January 1, 2015, each person applying for a geoduck
diver license under this section must complete the safety program
established in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies retroactively to geoduck
diver licenses issued on or after January 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.65 RCW
to read as follows:
A holder of a geoduck diver license issued under RCW 77.65.410
found in violation of a department of natural resources' geoduck
harvest agreement two or more times must have the license revoked and
surrender the license. The person surrendering the geoduck diver
license may not hold another geoduck diver license for a period of one
calendar year from the date the license is surrendered. The department
may reissue the geoduck diver license to a different person, subject to
the payment of the required fees in RCW 77.65.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a geoduck safety advisory
committee. The geoduck safety advisory committee consists of one
member from the department, one member from the department of fish and
wildlife, one member from the Washington harvesters association, and
one member from the harvest divers union.
(2) The geoduck safety advisory committee must meet at least
quarterly. By December 1, 2014, the committee must establish a safety
program for geoduck divers license holders.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2015, each person applying for a geoduck
diver license under RCW 77.65.410 must complete the safety program
established by the geoduck safety advisory committee created in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---