BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.71.030 and 2012 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the limitation on damages under RCW 7.71.020 and P.L. 99-660
Sec. 411(1) does not apply, this section shall provide the exclusive
((remedy)) remedies in any lawsuit by a health care provider for any
action taken by a professional peer review body of health care
providers as defined in RCW 7.70.020((, that is found to be based on
matters not related to the competence or professional conduct of a
health care provider)).
(2) ((Actions)) Remedies shall be limited to appropriate injunctive
relief, and damages shall be allowed only for lost earnings directly
attributable to the action taken by the professional peer review body,
incurred between the date of such action and the date the action is
functionally reversed by the professional peer review body.
(3) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs shall be awarded if
approved by the court under RCW 7.71.035.
(4) The statute of limitations for actions under this section shall
be one year from the date of the action of the professional peer review
body.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.41.200 and 2007 c 273 s 22 and 2007 c 261 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement
program for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The program shall include at least the following:
(a) The establishment of ((a)) one or more quality improvement
committees with the responsibility to review the services rendered in
the hospital, both retrospectively and prospectively, in order to
improve the quality of medical care of patients and to prevent medical
malpractice. ((The)) Different quality improvement committees may be
established as a part of a quality improvement program to review
different health care services. Such committees shall oversee and
coordinate the quality improvement and medical malpractice prevention
program and shall ensure that information gathered pursuant to the
program is used to review and to revise hospital policies and
procedures;
(b) A process, including a medical staff privileges sanction
procedure which must be conducted substantially in accordance with
medical staff bylaws and applicable rules, regulations, or policies of
the medical staff through which credentials, physical and mental
capacity, professional conduct including disruptive behavior, and
competence in delivering health care services initially and are
periodically thereafter reviewed as part of an evaluation of staff
privileges. For the purposes of this subsection, disruptive behavior
is limited to quality improvement review of professional activities and
not employment matters that are normally retained in an employee file;
(c) ((The)) A process for the initial and periodic review of the
credentials, physical and mental capacity, professional conduct
including disruptive behavior, and competence in delivering health care
services of all ((persons)) other health care providers who are
employed or associated with the hospital;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes
and incidents injurious to patients including health care-associated
infections as defined in RCW 43.70.056, patient grievances,
professional liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs incurred by
the hospital for patient injury prevention, and safety improvement
activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual physicians within the physician's personnel or credential
file maintained by the hospital;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, infection control, staff
responsibility to report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of
patient care, improved communication with patients, and causes of
malpractice claims for staff personnel engaged in patient care
activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the
purposes of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in
substantial good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon
a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the
information shared was knowingly false or deliberately misleading.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a
quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure,
except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into
evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a
meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation,
collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for
the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil
action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and
information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection
does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the
identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of
the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality
improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any
person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of
such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired
independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health
care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that
individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence
information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees
regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action,
disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care
and treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the governing board of the hospital in
which the committee is located. The report shall review the quality
improvement activities conducted by the committee, and any actions
taken as a result of those activities.
(5) The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed
appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission or the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit
the records of committee decisions in which a physician's privileges
are terminated or restricted. Each hospital shall produce and make
accessible to the commission or board the appropriate records and
otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information so gained shall
not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be
respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health
care organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review
and audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of hospitals.
Information so obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process,
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section. Each hospital shall produce and make accessible to the
department the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review
and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality
improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250
with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs
maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510, a
coordinated quality improvement committee maintained by an ambulatory
surgical facility under RCW 70.230.070, a quality assurance committee
maintained in accordance with RCW 18.20.390 or 74.42.640, or a peer
review committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality
of health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter
70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to
the sharing of individually identifiable patient information held by a
coordinated quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to
implement this section shall meet the requirements of applicable
federal and state privacy laws. Information and documents disclosed by
one coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated
quality improvement program or a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250 and any information and documents created or maintained as a
result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject
to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (3) of this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8),
74.42.640 (7) and (9), and 4.24.250.
(9) A hospital that operates a nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010 may conduct quality improvement activities for both the
hospital and the nursing home through a quality improvement committee
under this section, and such activities shall be subject to the
provisions of subsections (2) through (8) of this section.
(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.41.230 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 744 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to granting or renewing clinical privileges or
association of any physician or hiring a physician, a hospital or
facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from the
physician and the physician shall provide the following information:
(a) The name of any hospital or facility with or at which the
physician had or has any association, employment, privileges, or
practice during the prior five years: PROVIDED, That the hospital may
request additional information going back further than five years, and
the physician shall use his or her best efforts to comply with such a
request for additional information;
(b) ((If such association, employment, privilege, or practice was
discontinued, the reasons for its discontinuation)) Whether the
physician has ever been or is in the process of being denied, revoked,
terminated, suspended, restricted, reduced, limited, sanctioned, placed
on probation, monitored, or not renewed for any professional activity
as reported in the Washington practitioner application or successor
application or form, or has ever voluntarily or involuntarily
relinquished, withdrawn, or failed to proceed with an application for
any professional activity as reported in the Washington practitioner
application or successor application or form in order to avoid an
adverse action or to preclude an investigation or while under
investigation relating to professional competence or conduct;
(c) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions in this state or another state, the
substance of the allegations in the proceedings or actions, and any
additional information concerning the proceedings or actions as the
physician deems appropriate;
(d) The substance of the findings in the actions or proceedings and
any additional information concerning the actions or proceedings as the
physician deems appropriate;
(e) A waiver by the physician of any confidentiality provisions
concerning the information required to be provided to hospitals
pursuant to this subsection; and
(f) A verification by the physician that the information provided
by the physician is accurate and complete.
(2) Prior to granting privileges or association to any physician or
hiring a physician, a hospital or facility approved pursuant to this
chapter shall request from any hospital with or at which the physician
had or has privileges, was associated, or was employed, during the
preceding five years, the following information concerning the
physician:
(a) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions, in this state or another state;
(b) Any judgment or settlement of a medical malpractice action and
any finding of professional misconduct in this state or another state
by a licensing or disciplinary board; and
(c) Any information required to be reported by hospitals pursuant
to RCW 18.71.0195.
(3) The medical quality assurance commission shall be advised
within thirty days of the name of any physician denied staff
privileges, association, or employment on the basis of adverse findings
under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A hospital or facility that receives a request for information
from another hospital or facility pursuant to subsections (1) and (2)
of this section shall provide such information concerning the physician
in question to the extent such information is known to the hospital or
facility receiving such a request, including the reasons for
suspension, termination, or curtailment of employment or privileges at
the hospital or facility. A hospital, facility, or other person
providing such information in good faith is not liable in any civil
action for the release of such information.
(5) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were
terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed,
if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil
action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's
medical records required by regulation of the department of health to
be made regarding the care and treatment received.
(6) Hospitals shall be granted access to information held by the
medical quality assurance commission and the board of osteopathic
medicine and surgery pertinent to decisions of the hospital regarding
credentialing and recredentialing of practitioners.
(7) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.230.080 and 2007 c 273 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every ambulatory surgical facility shall maintain a coordinated
quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice. The program shall include at least
the following:
(a) The establishment of ((a)) one or more quality improvement
committees with the responsibility to review the services rendered in
the ambulatory surgical facility, both retrospectively and
prospectively, in order to improve the quality of medical care of
patients and to prevent medical malpractice. ((The)) Different quality
improvement committees may be established as a part of the quality
improvement program to review different health care services. Such
committees shall oversee and coordinate the quality improvement and
medical malpractice prevention program and shall ensure that
information gathered pursuant to the program is used to review and to
revise the policies and procedures of the ambulatory surgical facility;
(b) A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which
credentials, physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering
health care services are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation
of staff privileges;
(c) The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental
capacity, and competence in delivering health care services of all
persons who are employed or associated with the ambulatory surgical
facility;
(d) A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients
or their representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and
other events that may result in claims of medical malpractice;
(e) The maintenance and continuous collection of information
concerning the ambulatory surgical facility's experience with negative
health care outcomes and incidents injurious to patients, patient
grievances, professional liability premiums, settlements, awards, costs
incurred by the ambulatory surgical facility for patient injury
prevention, and safety improvement activities;
(f) The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information
gathered pursuant to (a) through (e) of this subsection concerning
individual practitioners within the practitioner's personnel or
credential file maintained by the ambulatory surgical facility;
(g) Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient
safety, medication errors, injury prevention, staff responsibility to
report professional misconduct, the legal aspects of patient care,
improved communication with patients, and causes of malpractice claims
for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and
(h) Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements
of this section.
(2) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee is not subject to an
action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such activity.
Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality improvement
program that, in substantial good faith, shares information or
documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards under
subsection (8) of this section is not subject to an action for civil
damages or other relief as a result of the activity. For the purposes
of this section, sharing information is presumed to be in substantial
good faith. However, the presumption may be rebutted upon a showing of
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the information shared was
knowingly false or deliberately misleading.
(3) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a
quality improvement committee are not subject to review or disclosure,
except as provided in this section, or discovery or introduction into
evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a
meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation,
collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for
the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil
action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and
information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection
does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the
identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of
the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality
improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any
person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of
such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired
independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health
care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that
individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence
of information collected and maintained by quality improvement
committees regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil
action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any, and
the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery
and introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records
required by rule of the department to be made regarding the care and
treatment received.
(4) Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a
semiannual basis, report to the management of the ambulatory surgical
facility, as identified in the facility's application, in which the
committee is located. The report shall review the quality improvement
activities conducted by the committee, and any actions taken as a
result of those activities.
(5) The department shall adopt such rules as are deemed appropriate
to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(6) The medical quality assurance commission, the board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, or the podiatric medical board, as
appropriate, may review and audit the records of committee decisions in
which a practitioner's privileges are terminated or restricted. Each
ambulatory surgical facility shall produce and make accessible to the
commission or board the appropriate records and otherwise facilitate
the review and audit. Information so gained is not subject to the
discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as required by
subsection (3) of this section. Failure of an ambulatory surgical
facility to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(7) The department and any accrediting organization may review and
audit the records of a quality improvement committee or peer review
committee in connection with their inspection and review of the
ambulatory surgical facility. Information so obtained is not subject
to the discovery process, and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (3) of this section. Each ambulatory surgical
facility shall produce and make accessible to the department the
appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit.
(8) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a quality
improvement committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250
with one or more other coordinated quality improvement programs
maintained in accordance with this section or RCW 43.70.510 or
70.41.200, a quality assurance committee maintained in accordance with
RCW 18.20.390 or 74.42.640, or a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality of health care services
rendered to patients and the identification and prevention of medical
malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the
federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and
its implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section
shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy
laws. Information and documents disclosed by one coordinated quality
improvement program to another coordinated quality improvement program
or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents are not subject to the discovery process and
confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of
this section, RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 70.41.200(3), 74.42.640 (7)
and (9), and 4.24.250.
(9) An ambulatory surgical facility that participates in a
coordinated quality improvement program under RCW 43.70.510 shall be
deemed to have met the requirements of this section.
(10) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.230.140 and 2007 c 273 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to granting or renewing clinical privileges or
association of any practitioner or hiring a practitioner, an ambulatory
surgical facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from
the practitioner and the practitioner shall provide the following
information:
(a) The name of any hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or
other facility with or at which the practitioner had or has any
association, employment, privileges, or practice during the prior five
years: PROVIDED, That the ambulatory surgical facility may request
additional information going back further than five years, and the
physician shall use his or her best efforts to comply with such a
request for additional information;
(b) ((If such association, employment, privilege, or practice was
discontinued, the reasons for its discontinuation)) Whether the
physician has ever been or is in the process of being denied, revoked,
terminated, suspended, restricted, reduced, limited, sanctioned, placed
on probation, monitored, or not renewed for any professional activity
as reported in the Washington practitioner application or successor
application or form, or has ever voluntarily or involuntarily
relinquished, withdrawn, or failed to proceed with an application for
any professional activity as reported in the Washington practitioner
application or successor application or form in order to avoid an
adverse action or to preclude an investigation or while under
investigation relating to professional competence or conduct;
(c) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions in this state or another state, the
substance of the allegations in the proceedings or actions, and any
additional information concerning the proceedings or actions as the
practitioner deems appropriate;
(d) The substance of the findings in the actions or proceedings and
any additional information concerning the actions or proceedings as the
practitioner deems appropriate;
(e) A waiver by the practitioner of any confidentiality provisions
concerning the information required to be provided to ambulatory
surgical facilities pursuant to this subsection; and
(f) A verification by the practitioner that the information
provided by the practitioner is accurate and complete.
(2) Prior to granting privileges or association to any practitioner
or hiring a practitioner, an ambulatory surgical facility approved
under this chapter shall request from any hospital or ambulatory
surgical facility with or at which the practitioner had or has
privileges, was associated, or was employed, during the preceding five
years, the following information concerning the practitioner:
(a) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any
pending medical malpractice actions, in this state or another state;
(b) Any judgment or settlement of a medical malpractice action and
any finding of professional misconduct in this state or another state
by a licensing or disciplinary board; and
(c) Any information required to be reported by hospitals or
ambulatory surgical facilities pursuant to RCW 18.130.070.
(3) The medical quality assurance commission, board of osteopathic
medicine and surgery, podiatric medical board, or dental quality
assurance commission, as appropriate, shall be advised within thirty
days of the name of any practitioner denied staff privileges,
association, or employment on the basis of adverse findings under
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or other facility
that receives a request for information from another hospital,
ambulatory surgical facility, or other facility pursuant to subsections
(1) and (2) of this section shall provide such information concerning
the physician in question to the extent such information is known to
the hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or other facility receiving
such a request, including the reasons for suspension, termination, or
curtailment of employment or privileges at the hospital, ambulatory
surgical facility, or facility. A hospital, ambulatory surgical
facility, other facility, or other person providing such information in
good faith is not liable in any civil action for the release of such
information.
(5) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected and maintained by, a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were
terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed,
if any, and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil
action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's
medical records required by rule of the department to be made regarding
the care and treatment received.
(6) Ambulatory surgical facilities shall be granted access to
information held by the medical quality assurance commission, board of
osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medical board pertinent
to decisions of the ambulatory surgical facility regarding
credentialing and recredentialing of practitioners.
(7) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence
per se.

--- END ---