BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that online learning
is subject to two forms of state oversight in addition to the standard
oversight of public schools: The state approval process established in
2009 through the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and also the regulations and stipulations directed at alternative
learning experience programs. The legislature finds that such
duplicative regulation is unnecessary and confusing for schools and
school districts seeking to offer online learning for students. A
single, consistent set of laws, rules, and procedures should suffice to
assure accountability while encouraging innovation and opportunities.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.325 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, "alternative learning experience
program" means a course or set of courses that is:
(a) Provided in whole or in part independently from a regular
classroom setting or schedule, but may include some components of
direct instruction;
(b) Supervised, monitored, assessed, evaluated, and documented by
a certificated teacher employed by the school district or under
contract as permitted by applicable rules; and
(c) Provided in accordance with a written student learning plan
that is implemented pursuant to the school district's policy and rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction for alternative
learning experiences.
(2) The broad categories of alternative learning experience
programs include, but are not limited to((:
(a) Online programs as defined in RCW 28A.150.262;
(b))), parent partnership programs that include significant
participation and partnership by parents and families in the design and
implementation of a student's learning experience((;)) and
(((c))) contract-based learning programs. Online courses and
online school programs as defined in RCW 28A.250.010 that are delivered
by an online provider approved under RCW 28A.250.020 are not considered
alternative learning experience programs.
(3) School districts that offer alternative learning experience
programs may not provide any compensation, reimbursement, gift, reward,
or gratuity to any parents, guardians, or students for participation.
School district employees are prohibited from receiving any
compensation or payment as an incentive to increase student enrollment
of out-of-district students in an alternative learning experience
program. This prohibition includes, but is not limited to, providing
funds to parents, guardians, or students for the purchase of
educational materials, supplies, experiences, services, or
technological equipment. A district may purchase educational
materials, equipment, or other nonconsumable supplies for students' use
in alternative learning experience programs if the purchase is
consistent with the district's approved curriculum, conforms to
applicable laws and rules, and is made in the same manner as such
purchases are made for students in the district's regular instructional
program. Items so purchased remain the property of the school district
upon program completion. School districts may not purchase or contract
for instructional or cocurricular experiences and services that are
included in an alternative learning experience written student learning
plan, including but not limited to lessons, trips, and other
activities, unless substantially similar experiences and services are
available to students enrolled in the district's regular instructional
program. School districts that purchase or contract for such
experiences and services for students enrolled in an alternative
learning experience program must submit an annual report to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction detailing the costs and
purposes of the expenditures. These requirements extend to contracted
providers of alternative learning experience programs, and each
district shall be responsible for monitoring the compliance of its
providers with these requirements. ((However, nothing in this section
shall prohibit school districts from contracting with online providers
approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
pursuant to chapter 28A.250 RCW.))
(4) Part-time enrollment in alternative learning experiences is
subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.150.350.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
defining minimum requirements and accountability for alternative
learning experience programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.262 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
((Under RCW 28A.150.260,)) The superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the definition of a full-time equivalent student to
include students who receive instruction through ((alternative learning
experience)) online courses or online school programs. ((As used in
this section and RCW 28A.150.325, an "alternative learning experience
online program" is a set of online courses or an online school program
as defined in RCW 28A.250.010 that is delivered to students in whole or
in part independently from a regular classroom schedule.)) Beginning
in the 2013-14 school year, ((alternative learning experience)) online
courses and online school programs must be offered by an online
provider approved by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW
28A.250.020 to meet the definition in this section. The rules shall
include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Defining a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260
or part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours of learning activity as identified in
the student's learning plan, as long as the student is found, through
monthly evaluation, to be making satisfactory progress((;)). The
monthly progress evaluation must be conducted as provided under section
4 of this act. The rules shall require districts providing programs
under this section to nonresident students to establish procedures that
address, at a minimum, the coordination of student counting for state
funding so that no student is counted for more than one full-time
equivalent in the aggregate;
(2) Requiring the board of directors of a school district offering,
or contracting under RCW 28A.150.305 to offer, an ((alternative
learning experience)) online course or online school program to adopt
and annually review written policies for each ((program and program))
course, program, and online provider and to receive an annual report on
its ((digital alternative learning experience online)) courses and
programs from its staff;
(3) Requiring each school district offering or contracting to offer
an ((alternative learning experience)) online course or online school
program to report annually to the superintendent of public instruction
on the types of programs and course offerings, and number of students
participating;
(4) Requiring completion of a program self-evaluation;
(5) Requiring documentation of the district of the student's
physical residence;
(6) Requiring that supervision, monitoring, assessment, and
evaluation of the ((alternative learning experience)) online course or
online school program be provided by a certificated teacher;
(7) Requiring each school district offering online courses or
online school programs to identify the ratio of certificated
instructional staff to full-time equivalent students enrolled in such
courses or programs, and to include a description of their ratio as
part of the reports required under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section;
(8) Requiring reliable methods to verify a student is doing his or
her own work; the methods may include proctored examinations or
projects, including the use of web cams or other technologies.
"Proctored" means directly monitored by an adult authorized by the
school district;
(9) Requiring, for each student receiving instruction in an
((alternative learning experience)) online course or online school
program, a learning plan that includes a description of course
objectives and information on the requirements a student must meet to
successfully complete the program or courses. The rules shall allow
course syllabi and other additional information to be used to meet the
requirement for a learning plan;
(10) Requiring that the district assess the educational progress of
enrolled students at least annually, using, for full-time students, the
state assessment for the student's grade level and using any other
annual assessments required by the school district. Part-time students
shall also be assessed at least annually. However, part-time students
who are either receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200
RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the assessments required
under chapter 28A.655 RCW. The rules shall address how students who
reside outside the geographic service area of the school district are
to be assessed;
(11) Requiring that each student enrolled in the program have
direct personal contact with a certificated teacher at least weekly
until the student completes the course objectives or the requirements
in the learning plan. Direct personal contact is for the purposes of
instruction, review of assignments, testing, evaluation of student
progress, or other learning activities. Direct personal contact may
include the use of telephone, e-mail, instant messaging, interactive
video communication, or other means of digital communication;
(12) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide ((alternative learning
experience online learning)) online courses or online school programs
to receive accreditation through the Northwest accreditation commission
or another national, regional, or state accreditation program listed by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction after
consultation with the Washington coalition for online learning;
(13) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide ((alternative learning
experience online learning)) online courses or online school programs
to provide information to students and parents on whether or not the
courses or programs: Cover one or more of the school district's
learning goals or of the state's essential academic learning
requirements or whether they permit the student to meet one or more of
the state's or district's graduation requirements; and
(14) Requiring that a school district that provides one or more
((alternative learning experience)) online courses to a student provide
the parent or guardian of the student, prior to the student's
enrollment, with a description of any difference between home-based
education as described in chapter 28A.200 RCW and the enrollment option
selected by the student. The parent or guardian shall sign
documentation attesting to his or her understanding of the difference
and the documentation shall be retained by the district and made
available for audit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.250
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For students whose previous monthly evaluation indicated
satisfactory progress and who are meeting the requirement for weekly
personal contact, a progress evaluation may be based only on the
student's performance on the learning goals and performance objectives
defined in the written student learning plan.
(2) For students whose previous monthly evaluation did not indicate
satisfactory progress or who are not meeting the requirement for weekly
personal contact, a progress evaluation must include the student's
performance on the learning goals and performance objectives defined in
the written student learning plan, a documented conference based on
direct personal contact between the teacher and the student about what
action or achievement by the student is needed to demonstrate
satisfactory progress, and at least one of the following items to be
included in an intervention plan:
(a) A plan for increased frequency and duration of communication
between the teacher and the student;
(b) A change in the prescribed manner of direct personal contact;
(c) Modification of the goals and objectives of the student
learning plan;
(d) A requirement that the student engage in synchronous learning;
or
(e) Modification of course work or course content.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.250.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Multidistrict online provider" means:
(i) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into a contract
with a school district to provide online courses or programs to K-12
students from more than one school district;
(ii) A private or nonprofit organization that enters into contracts
with multiple school districts to provide online courses or programs to
K-12 students from those districts; or
(iii) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a school
district that provides online courses or programs to students who
reside outside the geographic boundaries of the school district.
(b) "Multidistrict online provider" does not include a school
district online learning program in which fewer than ten percent of the
students enrolled in the program are from other districts under the
interdistrict student transfer provisions of RCW 28A.225.225.
"Multidistrict online provider" also does not include regional online
learning programs that are jointly developed and implemented by two or
more school districts or an educational service district through an
interdistrict cooperative program agreement that addresses, at minimum,
how the districts share student full-time equivalency for state basic
education funding purposes and how categorical education programs,
including special education, are provided to eligible students.
(2)(a) "Online course" means a course where:
(i) More than half of the course content is delivered
electronically using the internet or other computer-based methods; and
(ii) More than half of the teaching is conducted from a remote
location through an online course learning management system or other
online or electronic tools.
(b) "Online school program" means a school program that:
(i) Offers courses or grade-level coursework that is delivered
primarily electronically using the internet or other computer-based
methods;
(ii) Offers courses or grade-level coursework that is ((taught))
facilitated by a teacher primarily from a remote location using online
or other electronic tools. Students enrolled in an online program may
have access to the teacher synchronously, asynchronously, or both;
(iii) Offers a sequential set of online courses or grade-level
coursework that may be taken in a single school term or throughout the
school year in a manner that could provide a full-time basic education
program if so desired by the student. Students may enroll in the
program as part-time or full-time students; and
(iv) Has an online component of the program with online lessons and
tools for student and data management.
(c) An online course or online school program may be delivered to
students at school as part of the regularly scheduled school day. An
online course or online school program also may be delivered to
students, in whole or in part, independently from a regular classroom
schedule, but such courses or programs must comply with RCW 28A.150.262
(as recodified by this act) to qualify for state basic education
funding.
(3) "Online provider" means any provider of an online course or
program, including multidistrict online providers, all school district
online learning programs, and all regional online learning programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.250
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts that offer or contract to offer online courses
or online school programs may not provide any compensation,
reimbursement, gift, reward, or gratuity to any parents, guardians, or
students for participation. School district employees are prohibited
from receiving any compensation or payment as an incentive to increase
student enrollment of out-of-district students in an online course or
online school program. This prohibition includes, but is not limited
to, providing funds to parents, guardians, or students for the purchase
of educational materials, supplies, experiences, services, or
technological equipment. A district may purchase educational
materials, equipment, or other nonconsumable supplies for students' use
in online courses or online school programs if the purchase is
consistent with the district's approved curriculum, conforms to
applicable laws and rules, and is made in the same manner as such
purchases are made for students in the district's regular instructional
program. Items so purchased remain the property of the school district
upon program completion.
(2) School districts may not purchase or contract for instructional
or cocurricular experiences and services that are included in an online
student's written student learning plan, including but not limited to
lessons, trips, and other activities, unless substantially similar
experiences and services are available to students enrolled in the
district's regular instructional program. School districts that
purchase or contract for such experiences and services for students
enrolled in online courses or online school programs must submit an
annual report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
detailing the costs and purposes of the expenditures. These
requirements extend to contracted providers of online courses and
online school programs, and each district shall be responsible for
monitoring the compliance of its providers with these requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.250
RCW to read as follows:
An online school program may request a waiver from the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to administer one or more
sections of the statewide student assessment for grades three through
eight for some or all students enrolled in the program on alternate
days or on an alternate schedule, as long as the administration is
within the testing period established by the office. The office may
deny a request for a waiver if the online school program's proposal
does not maintain adequate test security or would reduce the
reliability of the assessment results by providing an inequitable
advantage for some students.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.250.070 and 2009 c 542 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter is intended to diminish the rights of
students to attend a nonresident school district in accordance with RCW
28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230 for the purposes of enrolling in online
courses or online school programs. The office of online learning under
RCW 28A.250.030 shall develop a standard form, which must be used by
all school districts, for releasing a student to a nonresident school
district for the purposes of enrolling in an online course or online
school program.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.225.220 and 1995 c 335 s 602 and 1995 c 52 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any board of directors may make agreements with adults choosing
to attend school, and may charge the adults reasonable tuition.
(2) A district is strongly encouraged to honor the request of a
parent or guardian for his or her child to attend a school in another
district or the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to
transfer as a student receiving home-based instruction.
(3) A district shall release a student to a nonresident district
that agrees to accept the student if:
(a) A financial, educational, safety, or health condition affecting
the student would likely be reasonably improved as a result of the
transfer; or
(b) Attendance at the school in the nonresident district is more
accessible to the parent's place of work or to the location of child
care; or
(c) There is a special hardship or detrimental condition; or
(d) The purpose of the transfer is for the student to enroll in an
online course or online school program offered by an online provider
approved under RCW 28A.250.020.
(4) A district may deny the request of a resident student to
transfer to a nonresident district if the release of the student would
adversely affect the district's existing desegregation plan. A school
district may not refuse to establish an interlocal agreement with a
nonresident school district for students to enroll in an online course
or online school program on a part-time basis in the nonresident school
district.
(5) For the purpose of helping a district assess the quality of its
education program, a resident school district may request an optional
exit interview or questionnaire with the parents or guardians of a
child transferring to another district. No parent or guardian may be
forced to attend such an interview or complete the questionnaire.
(6) Beginning with the 1993-94 school year, school districts may
not charge transfer fees or tuition for nonresident students enrolled
under subsection (3) of this section and RCW 28A.225.225.
Reimbursement of a high school district for cost of educating high
school pupils of a nonhigh school district shall not be deemed a
transfer fee as affecting the apportionment of current state school
funds.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.225.225 and 2009 c 380 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for students who reside out-of-state and students under
RCW 28A.225.217, a district shall accept applications from nonresident
students who are the children of full-time certificated and classified
school employees, and those children shall be permitted to enroll:
(a) At the school to which the employee is assigned;
(b) At a school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned; or
(c) At a school in the district that provides early intervention
services pursuant to RCW 28A.155.065 or preschool services pursuant to
RCW 28A.155.070, if the student is eligible for such services.
(2) A district may reject applications under this section if:
(a) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership;
(b) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(2)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants; ((or))
(c) Enrollment of a child under this section would displace a child
who is a resident of the district, except that if a child is admitted
under subsection (1) of this section, that child shall be permitted to
remain enrolled at that school, or in that district's kindergarten
through twelfth grade continuum, until he or she has completed his or
her schooling; or
(d) The student has repeatedly failed to comply with requirements
for participation in an online school program, such as participating in
weekly direct contact with the teacher or monthly progress evaluations.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, all
districts accepting applications from nonresident students or from
students receiving home-based instruction for admission to the
district's schools shall consider equally all applications received.
Each school district shall adopt a policy establishing rational, fair,
and equitable standards for acceptance and rejection of applications by
June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection of a nonresident
student if:
(a) Acceptance of a nonresident student would result in the
district experiencing a financial hardship;
(b) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership; or
(c) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(3)(c) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants.
For purposes of subsections (2)(a) and (3)(b) of this section,
"gang" means a group which: (i) Consists of three or more persons;
(ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing basis,
regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(4) A student who has been accepted to enroll in an online course
or online school program offered by an online provider approved under
RCW 28A.250.020 in a nonresident school district may remain enrolled in
that district in subsequent school years without being required to
reapply, unless the nonresident district determines that the student
has lost eligibility for enrollment due to one of the factors
enumerated in this section.
(5) The district shall provide to applicants written notification
of the approval or denial of the application in a timely manner. If
the application is rejected, the notification shall include the reason
or reasons for denial and the right to appeal under RCW 28A.225.230(3).

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.150.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section and RCW 28A.150.410 and
28A.400.200, "basic education certificated instructional staff" means
all full-time equivalent classroom teachers, teacher librarians,
guidance counselors, certificated student health services staff, and
other certificated instructional staff in the following programs as
defined for statewide school district accounting purposes: Basic
education, secondary vocational education, general instructional
support, and general supportive services.
(2) Each school district shall maintain a ratio of at least forty-six basic education certificated instructional staff to one thousand
annual average full-time equivalent students. This requirement does
not apply to that portion of a district's annual average full-time
equivalent enrollment that is enrolled in alternative learning
experience programs as defined in RCW 28A.150.325 (as recodified by
this act) or in online courses or online school programs as provided in
RCW 28A.150.262 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.520.020 and 2011 c 278 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be a fund known as the federal forest revolving
account. The state treasurer, who shall be custodian of the revolving
account, shall deposit into the revolving account the funds for each
county received by the state in accordance with Title 16, section 500,
United States Code. The state treasurer shall distribute these moneys
to the counties according to the determined proportional area. The
county legislative authority shall expend fifty percent of the money
for the benefit of the public roads and other public purposes as
authorized by federal statute or public schools of such county and not
otherwise. Disbursements by the counties of the remaining fifty
percent of the money shall be as authorized by the superintendent of
public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, and shall occur
in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) No later than thirty days following receipt of the funds from
the federal government, the superintendent of public instruction shall
apportion moneys distributed to counties for schools to public school
districts in the respective counties in proportion to the number of
resident full-time equivalent students enrolled in each public school
district to the number of resident full-time equivalent students
enrolled in public schools in the county. In apportioning these funds,
the superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the October
enrollment count.
(3) If the amount received by any public school district pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section is less than the basic education
allocation to which the district would otherwise be entitled, the
superintendent of public instruction shall apportion to the district,
in the manner provided by RCW 28A.510.250, an amount which shall be the
difference between the amount received pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section and the basic education allocation to which the district
would otherwise be entitled.
(4) All federal forest funds shall be expended in accordance with
the requirements of Title 16, section 500, United States Code, as now
existing or hereafter amended.
(5) The definition of resident student for purposes of this section
shall be based on rules adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction, which shall consider and address the impact of alternative
learning experience students and students enrolled in online courses or
online school programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.262 (as recodified by
this act) on federal forest funds distribution.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.525.162 and 2012 c 244 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Funds appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction
from the common school construction fund shall be allotted by the
superintendent of public instruction in accordance with this chapter.
(2) No allotment shall be made to a school district until such
district has provided local funds equal to or greater than the
difference between the total approved project cost and the amount of
state funding assistance to the district for financing the project
computed pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166, with the following exceptions:
(a) The superintendent of public instruction may waive the local
requirement for state funding assistance for districts which have
provided funds for school building construction purposes through the
authorization of bonds or through the authorization of excess tax
levies or both in an amount equivalent to two and one-half percent of
the value of its taxable property, as defined in RCW 39.36.015.
(b) No such local funds shall be required as a condition to the
allotment of funds from the state for the purpose of making major or
minor structural changes to existing school facilities in order to
bring such facilities into compliance with the barrier free access
requirements of section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973
(29 U.S.C. Sec. 706) and rules implementing the act.
(3) For the purpose of computing the state funding assistance
percentage under RCW 28A.525.166 when a school district is granted
authority to enter into contracts, adjusted valuation per pupil shall
be calculated using headcount student enrollments from the most recent
October enrollment reports submitted by districts to the superintendent
of public instruction, adjusted as follows:
(a) In the case of projects for which local bonds were approved
after May 11, 1989:
(i) For districts which have been designated as serving high school
districts under RCW 28A.540.110, students residing in the nonhigh
district so designating shall be excluded from the enrollment count if
the student is enrolled in any grade level not offered by the nonhigh
district;
(ii) The enrollment of nonhigh school districts shall be increased
by the number of students residing within the district who are enrolled
in a serving high school district so designated by the nonhigh school
district under RCW 28A.540.110, including only students who are
enrolled in grade levels not offered by the nonhigh school district;
and
(iii) The number of preschool students with disabilities included
in the enrollment count shall be multiplied by one-half;
(b) In the case of construction or modernization of high school
facilities in districts serving students from nonhigh school districts,
the adjusted valuation per pupil shall be computed using the combined
adjusted valuations and enrollments of each district, each weighted by
the percentage of the district's resident high school students served
by the high school district;
(c) The number of kindergarten students included in the enrollment
count shall be counted as one headcount student; and
(d) The number of students residing outside the school district who
are enrolled in alternative learning experience programs under RCW
28A.150.325 (as recodified by this act) or are enrolled in online
courses or online school programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.262 (as
recodified by this act) shall be excluded from the total.
(4) In lieu of the exclusion in subsection (3)(d) of this section,
a district may submit an alternative calculation for excluding students
enrolled in alternative learning experience programs. The alternative
calculation must show the student headcount use of district classroom
facilities on a regular basis for a regular duration by out-of-district
alternative learning experience program students subtracted by the
headcount of in-district alternative learning experience program
students not using district classroom facilities on a regular basis for
a reasonable duration. The alternative calculation must be submitted
in a form approved by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
must develop rules to define "regular basis" and "reasonable duration."
(5) The superintendent of public instruction, considering policy
recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel,
shall prescribe such rules as are necessary to equate insofar as
possible the efforts made by school districts to provide capital funds
by the means aforesaid.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "preschool students with
disabilities" means children of preschool age who have developmental
disabilities who are entitled to services under RCW 28A.155.010 through
28A.155.100 and are not included in the kindergarten enrollment count
of the district.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.525.166 and 2012 c 244 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Allocations to school districts of state funds provided by RCW
28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall be made by the superintendent of
public instruction and the amount of state funding assistance to a
school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined
in the following manner:
(1) The boards of directors of the districts shall determine the
total cost of the proposed project, which cost may include the cost of
acquiring and preparing the site, the cost of constructing the building
or of acquiring a building and preparing the same for school use, the
cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to the project, necessary
architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for contingencies and for
other necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the total cost of
the project shall be subject to review and approval by the
superintendent.
(2) The state funding assistance percentage for a school district
shall be computed by the following formula:
The ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil
divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil
shall be subtracted from three, and then the result of the foregoing
shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school district's
adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil).

District adjusted Total state

3-valuation ÷ adjusted valuation

Computed per pupil per pupil State

State
- % Funding

Ratio District adjusted Total state Assistance

3+valuation ÷ adjusted valuation

per pupil per pupil

PROVIDED, That in the event the state funding assistance percentage to
any school district based on the above formula is less than twenty
percent and such school district is otherwise eligible for state
funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180, the
superintendent may establish for such district a state funding
assistance percentage not in excess of twenty percent of the approved
cost of the project, if the superintendent finds that such additional
assistance is necessary to provide minimum facilities for housing the
pupils of the district.
(3) In addition to the computed state funding assistance percentage
developed in subsection (2) of this section, a school district shall be
entitled to additional percentage points determined by the average
percentage of growth for the past three years. One percent shall be
added to the computed state funding assistance percentage for each
percent of growth, with a maximum of twenty percent.
(4) In computing the state funding assistance percentage in
subsection (2) of this section and adjusting the percentage under
subsection (3) of this section, students residing outside the school
district who are enrolled in alternative learning experience programs
under RCW 28A.150.325 (as recodified by this act) or are enrolled in
online courses or online school programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.262
(as recodified by this act) shall be excluded from the count of total
pupils. In lieu of the exclusion in this subsection, a district may
submit an alternative calculation for excluding students enrolled in
alternative learning experience programs. The alternative calculation
must show the student headcount use of district classroom facilities on
a regular basis for a reasonable duration by out-of-district
alternative learning experience program students subtracted by the
headcount of in-district alternative learning experience program
students not using district classroom facilities on a regular basis for
a reasonable duration. The alternative calculation must be submitted
in a form approved by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
must develop rules to define "regular basis" and "reasonable duration."
(5) The approved cost of the project determined in the manner
prescribed in this section multiplied by the state funding assistance
percentage derived as provided for in this section shall be the amount
of state funding assistance to the district for the financing of the
project: PROVIDED, That need therefor has been established to the
satisfaction of the superintendent: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That additional
state funding assistance may be allowed if it is found by the
superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school
facilities citizen advisory panel that such assistance is necessary in
order to meet (a) a school housing emergency resulting from the
destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation of a school
building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden excessive and
clearly foreseeable future increase in school population, or other
conditions similarly emergent in nature; or (b) a special school
housing burden resulting from projects of statewide significance or
imposed by virtue of the admission of nonresident students into
educational programs established, maintained and operated in conformity
with the requirements of law; or (c) a deficiency in the capital funds
of the district resulting from financing, subsequent to April 1, 1969,
and without benefit of the state funding assistance provided by prior
state assistance programs, the construction of a needed school building
project or projects approved in conformity with the requirements of
such programs, after having first applied for and been denied state
funding assistance because of the inadequacy of state funds available
for the purpose, or (d) a condition created by the fact that an
excessive number of students live in state owned housing, or (e) a need
for the construction of a school building to provide for improved
school district organization or racial balance, or (f) conditions
similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this
subsection, creating a like emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 RCW 28A.150.262 and 28A.150.325 are each
recodified as sections in chapter 28A.250 RCW.

--- END ---