BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.12.080 and 2007 c 218 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tenure of everyone holding an office, place, position or
employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during
good behavior, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any such person may be removed or discharged, suspended
without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of vacation
privileges or other special privileges for any of the following
reasons:
(((1))) (a) Incompetency, inefficiency or inattention to or
dereliction of duty;
(((2))) (b) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct,
insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow
employee, or any other act of omission or commission tending to injure
the public service; or any other willful failure on the part of the
employee to properly conduct himself or herself; or any willful
violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulation
to be adopted hereunder;
(((3))) (c) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the
employee holds;
(((4))) (d) Dishonest, disgraceful, immoral or prejudicial conduct;
(((5))) (e) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics,
or any other habit forming drug, liquid or preparation to such extent
that the use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or
physical fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from
properly performing the function and duties of any position under civil
service;
(((6))) (f) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor, involving
moral turpitude;
(((7))) (g) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment
of the civil service commissioners is sufficient to show the offender
to be an unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public
service.
(2) If an employer removes or discharges a person who holds an
office, place, position, or employment under this chapter for
committing an illegal act or an act of dishonesty or untruthfulness,
and an arbitrator finds that the employer established that the person
engaged in the act or acts by clear and convincing evidence, the
employer is deemed to have had just cause for the removal or discharge,
and the arbitrator may not overturn the removal or discharge.
(3) For purposes of this section, "illegal act" and an "act of
dishonesty or untruthfulness" mean the same as defined in section 4 of
this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.14.110 and 2012 c 117 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tenure of every person holding an office, place, position,
or employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during
good behavior, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any such person may be removed or discharged, suspended
without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of vacation
privileges or other special privileges for any of the following
reasons:
(((1))) (a) Incompetency, inefficiency, or inattention to, or
dereliction of duty;
(((2))) (b) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct,
insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow
employee, or any other act of omission or commission tending to injure
the public service; or any other willful failure on the part of the
employee to properly conduct himself or herself; or any willful
violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and
regulations to be adopted hereunder;
(((3))) (c) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the
employee holds;
(((4))) (d) Dishonest, disgraceful, or prejudicial conduct;
(((5))) (e) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics,
or any other habit forming drug, liquid, or preparation to such extent
that the use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or
physical fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from
properly performing the function and duties of any position under civil
service;
(((6))) (f) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor involving
moral turpitude;
(((7))) (g) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment
of the civil service commission is sufficient to show the offender to
be an unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public service.
(2) If an employer removes or discharges a person who holds an
office, place, position, or employment under this chapter for
committing an illegal act or an act of dishonesty or untruthfulness,
and an arbitrator finds that the employer established that the person
engaged in the act or acts by clear and convincing evidence, the
employer is deemed to have had just cause for the removal or discharge,
and the arbitrator may not overturn the removal or discharge.
(3) For purposes of this section, "illegal act" and an "act of
dishonesty or untruthfulness" mean the same as defined in section 4 of
this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.070 and 1984 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Discharge of any officer with probationary status and
discharge, demotion, or suspension of any officer with nonprobationary
status shall be only for cause, which shall be clearly stated in a
written complaint, sworn to by the person preferring the charges, and
served upon the officer complained of.
(2) Removal or discharge of any officer for committing an illegal
act or an act of dishonesty or untruthfulness established by clear and
convincing evidence shall be deemed to satisfy the reasonableness and
lawfulness standard set forth in RCW 43.43.100.
(3) Upon being ((so)) served with a written complaint, any such
officer shall be entitled to a public hearing before a trial board
consisting of two Washington state patrol officers of the rank of
captain, and one officer of equal rank with the officer complained of,
who shall be selected by the chief of the Washington state patrol by
lot from the roster of the patrol. In the case of complaint by an
officer, such officer shall not be a member of the trial board.
(4) For purposes of this section, "illegal act" and an "act of
dishonesty or untruthfulness" mean the same as defined in section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an employer removes or discharges a person who holds an
office, place, position, or employment under this chapter for
committing an illegal act or an act of dishonesty or untruthfulness,
and an arbitrator finds that the employer established that the person
engaged in the act or acts by clear and convincing evidence, the
employer is deemed to have had just cause for the removal or discharge,
and the arbitrator may not overturn the removal or discharge.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Illegal act" means the commission of a crime involving moral
turpitude in the discharge of the person's official duties, including
but not limited to: A violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; a
sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; theft, as defined in RCW
9A.56.030 through 9A.56.050; fraud under chapter 9A.60 RCW; malicious
mischief, as defined in RCW 9A.48.070 through 9A.48.090; and indecent
exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010.
(b) "An act of dishonesty or untruthfulness" means intentionally
making a false statement in response to a direct question in an
official investigation or disciplinary process or intentionally making
a false statement in an official public document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---