BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.090 and 2006 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
who communicates with a minor for immoral purposes, or a person who
communicates with someone the person believes to be a minor for immoral
purposes, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) A person who communicates with a minor for immoral purposes is
guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW if
the person has previously been convicted under this section or of a
felony sexual offense under chapter 9.68A, 9A.44, or 9A.64 RCW or of
any other felony sexual offense in this or any other state or if the
person communicates with a minor or with someone the person believes to
be a minor for immoral purposes, including the purchase or sale of
commercial sex acts and sex trafficking, through the sending of an
electronic communication.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "electronic communication"
has the same meaning as defined in RCW 9.61.260.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.68A.100 and 2010 c 289 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of commercial sexual abuse of a minor if:
(a) He or she pays a fee to a minor or a third person as
compensation for a minor having engaged in sexual conduct with him or
her;
(b) He or she pays or agrees to pay a fee to a minor or a third
person pursuant to an understanding that in return therefore such minor
will engage in sexual conduct with him or her; or
(c) He or she solicits, offers, or requests to engage in sexual
conduct with a minor in return for a fee.
(2) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class B felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) In addition to any other penalty provided under chapter 9A.20
RCW, a person guilty of commercial sexual abuse of a minor is subject
to the provisions under RCW 9A.88.130 and 9A.88.140.
(4) Consent of a minor to the sexual conduct does not constitute a
defense to any offense listed in this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means sexual
intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.68A.101 and 2012 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting commercial sexual abuse of a
minor if he or she knowingly advances commercial sexual abuse or a
sexually explicit act of a minor or profits from a minor engaged in
sexual conduct or a sexually explicit act.
(2) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class A
felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) A person "advances commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor receiving compensation for personally
rendered sexual conduct or as a person engaged in commercial sexual
abuse of a minor, he or she causes or aids a person to commit or engage
in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, procures or solicits customers
for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, provides persons or premises
for the purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a minor,
operates or assists in the operation of a house or enterprise for the
purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or engages
in any other conduct designed to institute, aid, cause, assist, or
facilitate an act or enterprise of commercial sexual abuse of a minor.
(b) A person "profits from commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor receiving compensation for personally
rendered sexual conduct, he or she accepts or receives money or other
property pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person
whereby he or she participates or will participate in the proceeds of
commercial sexual abuse of a minor.
(c) A person "advances a sexually explicit act of a minor" if he or
she causes or aids a sexually explicit act of a minor, procures or
solicits customers for a sexually explicit act of a minor, provides
persons or premises for the purposes of a sexually explicit act of a
minor, or engages in any other conduct designed to institute, aid,
cause, assist, or facilitate a sexually explicit act of a minor.
(d) A "sexually explicit act" is a public, private, or live
photographed, recorded, or videotaped act or show intended to arouse or
satisfy the sexual desires or appeal to the prurient interests of
patrons and for which something of value is given or received.
(e) A "patron" is a person who pays or agrees to pay a fee to
another person as compensation for a sexually explicit act of a minor
or who solicits or requests a sexually explicit act of a minor in
return for a fee.
(4) Consent of a minor to the sexually explicit act or sexual
conduct does not constitute a defense to any offense listed in this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means sexual
intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.68A.102 and 2007 c 368 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person commits the offense of promoting travel for commercial
sexual abuse of a minor if he or she knowingly sells or offers to sell
travel services that include or facilitate travel for the purpose of
engaging in what would be commercial sexual abuse of a minor or
promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, if occurring in this
state.
(2) Promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a
class C felony.
(3) Consent of a minor to the travel for commercial sexual abuse,
or the sexually explicit act or sexual conduct itself, does not
constitute a defense to any offense listed in this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "travel services" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 19.138.021.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.68A.103 and 2007 c 368 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of permitting commercial sexual abuse of a
minor if, having possession or control of premises which he or she
knows are being used for the purpose of commercial sexual abuse of a
minor, he or she fails without lawful excuse to make reasonable effort
to halt or abate such use and to make a reasonable effort to notify law
enforcement of such use.
(2) Permitting commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) Consent of a minor to the sexually explicit act or sexual
conduct does not constitute a defense to any offense listed in this
section.

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.40.100 and 2012 c 144 s 2 and 2012 c 134 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of trafficking in the first degree when:
(i) Such person:
(A) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides, obtains,
buys, purchases, or receives by any means another person knowing, or in
reckless disregard of the fact, that force, fraud, or coercion as
defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the person to engage in
forced labor, involuntary servitude, a sexually explicit act, or a
commercial sex act, or that the person has not attained the age of
eighteen years and is caused to engage in a sexually explicit act or a
commercial sex act; or
(B) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value from
participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in
(a)(i)(A) of this subsection; and
(ii) The acts or venture set forth in (a)(i) of this subsection:
(A) Involve committing or attempting to commit kidnapping;
(B) Involve a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835;
(C) Involve the illegal harvesting or sale of human organs; or
(D) Result in a death.
(b) Trafficking in the first degree is a class A felony.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of trafficking in the second degree when
such person:
(i) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides, obtains,
buys, purchases, or receives by any means another person knowing, or in
reckless disregard of the fact, that force, fraud, or coercion as
defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the person to engage in
forced labor, involuntary servitude, a sexually explicit act, or a
commercial sex act, or that the person has not attained the age of
eighteen years and is caused to engaged in a sexually explicit act or
a commercial sex act; or
(ii) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value from
participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in (a)(i)
of this subsection.
(b) Trafficking in the second degree is a class A felony.
(3)(a) A person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for a
violation of a trafficking crime shall be assessed a ((three)) ten
thousand dollar fee.
(b) The court shall not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or
part of the fee assessed in this section unless it finds, on the
record, that the offender does not have the ability to pay the fee in
which case it may reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the
maximum allowable fee.
(c) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where
the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in
cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for
its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted
to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of
the city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts
to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to,
increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(i) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services, such
as mental health and substance abuse counseling, parenting skills,
training, housing relief, education, vocational training, drop-in
centers, and employment counseling.
(ii) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.
(4) If the victim of any offense identified in this section is a
minor, force, fraud, or coercion are not necessary elements of an
offense and consent to the sexually explicit act or commercial sex act
does not constitute a defense.
(5) For purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Commercial sex act" means any act of sexual contact or sexual
intercourse, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW, for which something
of value is given or received by any person; and
(b) "Sexually explicit act" means a public, private, or live
photographed, recorded, or videotaped act or show intended to arouse or
satisfy the sexual desires or appeal to the prurient interests of
patrons for which something of value is given or received.

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.44.020 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 14 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In order to convict a person of any crime defined in this
chapter it shall not be necessary that the testimony of the alleged
victim be corroborated.
(2) Evidence of the victim's past sexual behavior including but not
limited to the victim's marital history, divorce history, or general
reputation for promiscuity, nonchastity, or sexual mores contrary to
community standards is inadmissible on the issue of credibility and is
inadmissible to prove the victim's consent except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, but when the perpetrator and the victim
have engaged in sexual intercourse with each other in the past, and
when the past behavior is material to the issue of consent, evidence
concerning the past behavior between the perpetrator and the victim may
be admissible on the issue of consent to the offense.
(3) In any prosecution for the crime of rape, trafficking pursuant
to RCW 9A.40.100, or any of the offenses in chapter 9.68A RCW, or for
an attempt to commit, or an assault with an intent to commit any such
crime evidence of the victim's past sexual behavior including but not
limited to the victim's marital behavior, divorce history, or general
reputation for promiscuity, nonchastity, or sexual mores contrary to
community standards is not admissible if offered to attack the
credibility of the victim and is admissible on the issue of consent,
except where prohibited in the underlying criminal offense, only
pursuant to the following procedure:
(a) A written pretrial motion shall be made by the defendant to the
court and prosecutor stating that the defense has an offer of proof of
the relevancy of evidence of the past sexual behavior of the victim
proposed to be presented and its relevancy on the issue of the consent
of the victim.
(b) The written motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit or
affidavits in which the offer of proof shall be stated.
(c) If the court finds that the offer of proof is sufficient, the
court shall order a hearing out of the presence of the jury, if any,
and the hearing shall be closed except to the necessary witnesses, the
defendant, counsel, and those who have a direct interest in the case or
in the work of the court.
(d) At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court finds that the
evidence proposed to be offered by the defendant regarding the past
sexual behavior of the victim is relevant to the issue of the victim's
consent; is not inadmissible because its probative value is
substantially outweighed by the probability that its admission will
create a substantial danger of undue prejudice; and that its exclusion
would result in denial of substantial justice to the defendant; the
court shall make an order stating what evidence may be introduced by
the defendant, which order may include the nature of the questions to
be permitted. The defendant may then offer evidence pursuant to the
order of the court.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit cross-examination of the victim on the issue of past sexual behavior when the
prosecution presents evidence in its case in chief tending to prove the
nature of the victim's past sexual behavior, but the court may require
a hearing pursuant to subsection (3) of this section concerning such
evidence.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.44.128 and 2012 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130 through 9A.44.145, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a
legal local, state, or federal holiday.
(2) "Conviction" means any adult conviction or juvenile
adjudication for a sex offense or kidnapping offense.
(3) "Disqualifying offense" means a conviction for: Any offense
that is a felony; a sex offense as defined in this section; a crime
against children or persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830(((5))) (7) and
9.94A.411(2)(a); an offense with a domestic violence designation as
provided in RCW 10.99.020; permitting the commercial sexual abuse of a
minor as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; or any violation of chapter 9A.88
RCW.
(4) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full time or part time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(5) "Fixed residence" means a building that a person lawfully and
habitually uses as living quarters a majority of the week. Uses as
living quarters means to conduct activities consistent with the common
understanding of residing, such as sleeping; eating; keeping personal
belongings; receiving mail; and paying utilities, rent, or mortgage.
A nonpermanent structure including, but not limited to, a motor home,
travel trailer, camper, or boat may qualify as a residence provided it
is lawfully and habitually used as living quarters a majority of the
week, primarily kept at one location with a physical address, and the
location it is kept at is either owned or rented by the person or used
by the person with the permission of the owner or renter. A shelter
program may qualify as a residence provided it is a shelter program
designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless,
provides an offender with a personally assigned living space, and the
offender is permitted to store belongings in the living space.
(6) "In the community" means residing outside of confinement or
incarceration for a disqualifying offense.
(7) "Institution of higher education" means any public or private
institution dedicated to postsecondary education, including any
college, university, community college, trade, or professional school.
(8) "Kidnapping offense" means:
(a) The crimes of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, and unlawful imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40
RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's
parent;
(b) Any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an
offense that is classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for: An offense for
which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender
if residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register
in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this
state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection.
(9) "Lacks a fixed residence" means the person does not have a
living situation that meets the definition of a fixed residence and
includes, but is not limited to, a shelter program designed to provide
temporary living accommodations for the homeless, an outdoor sleeping
location, or locations where the person does not have permission to
stay.
(10) "Sex offense" means:
(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(c) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(a)(ii)(B) (trafficking);
(d) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(((d))) (e) A violation under RCW 9A.88.070 (promoting prostitution
in the first degree) or RCW 9A.88.080 (promoting prostitution in the
second degree) if the person has a prior conviction for one of these
offenses;
(((e))) (f) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW,
a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection;
(((f))) (g) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense for which
the person would be required to register as a sex offender while
residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register in
the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection;
(((g))) (h) Any federal conviction classified as a sex offense
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16911 (SORNA);
(((h))) (i) Any military conviction for a sex offense. This
includes sex offenses under the uniform code of military justice, as
specified by the United States secretary of defense;
(((i))) (j) Any conviction in a foreign country for a sex offense
if it was obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness
and due process for the accused under guidelines or regulations
established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16912.
(11) "School" means a public or private school regulated under
Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW.
(12) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any school or institution of higher education.

Sec. 9 RCW 9A.44.150 and 2005 c 455 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On motion of the prosecuting attorney in a criminal proceeding,
the court may order that a child under the age of ((ten)) fourteen may
testify in a room outside the presence of the defendant and the jury
while one-way closed-circuit television equipment simultaneously
projects the child's testimony into another room so the defendant and
the jury can watch and hear the child testify if:
(a) The testimony will:
(i) Describe an act or attempted act of sexual contact performed
with or on the child witness by another person or with or on a child
other than the child witness by another person;
(ii) Describe an act or attempted act of physical abuse against the
child witness by another person or against a child other than the child
witness by another person; ((or))
(iii) Describe a violation of RCW 9A.40.100 (trafficking) or any
offense identified in chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of
children); or
(iv) Describe a violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030
committed against a person known by or familiar to the child witness or
by a person known by or familiar to the child witness;
(b) The testimony is taken during the criminal proceeding;
(c) The court finds by substantial evidence, in a hearing conducted
outside the presence of the jury, that requiring the child witness to
testify in the presence of the defendant will cause the child to suffer
serious emotional or mental distress that will prevent the child from
reasonably communicating at the trial. If the defendant is excluded
from the presence of the child, the jury must also be excluded;
(d) As provided in ((subsection (1)))(a) and (b) of this
subsection, the court may allow a child witness to testify in the
presence of the defendant but outside the presence of the jury, via
closed-circuit television, if the court finds, upon motion and hearing
outside the presence of the jury, that the child will suffer serious
emotional distress that will prevent the child from reasonably
communicating at the trial in front of the jury, or, that although the
child may be able to reasonably communicate at trial in front of the
jury, the child will suffer serious emotional or mental distress from
testifying in front of the jury. If the child is able to communicate
in front of the defendant but not the jury the defendant will remain in
the room with the child while the jury is excluded from the room;
(e) The court finds that the prosecutor has made all reasonable
efforts to prepare the child witness for testifying, including
informing the child or the child's parent or guardian about community
counseling services, giving court tours, and explaining the trial
process. If the prosecutor fails to demonstrate that preparations were
implemented or the prosecutor in good faith attempted to implement
them, the court shall deny the motion;
(f) The court balances the strength of the state's case without the
testimony of the child witness against the defendant's constitutional
rights and the degree of infringement of the closed-circuit television
procedure on those rights;
(g) The court finds that no less restrictive method of obtaining
the testimony exists that can adequately protect the child witness from
the serious emotional or mental distress;
(h) When the court allows the child witness to testify outside the
presence of the defendant, the defendant can communicate constantly
with the defense attorney by electronic transmission and be granted
reasonable court recesses during the child's testimony for person-to-person consultation with the defense attorney;
(i) The court can communicate with the attorneys by an audio system
so that the court can rule on objections and otherwise control the
proceedings;
(j) All parties in the room with the child witness are on camera
and can be viewed by all other parties. If viewing all participants is
not possible, the court shall describe for the viewers the location of
the prosecutor, defense attorney, and other participants in relation to
the child;
(k) The court finds that the television equipment is capable of
making an accurate reproduction and the operator of the equipment is
competent to operate the equipment; and
(l) The court imposes reasonable guidelines upon the parties for
conducting the filming to avoid trauma to the child witness or abuse of
the procedure for tactical advantage.
The prosecutor, defense attorney, and a neutral and trained
victim's advocate, if any, shall always be in the room where the child
witness is testifying. The court in the court's discretion depending
on the circumstances and whether the jury or defendant or both are
excluded from the room where the child is testifying, may remain or may
not remain in the room with the child.
(2) During the hearing conducted under subsection (1) of this
section to determine whether the child witness may testify outside the
presence of the defendant and/or the jury, the court may conduct the
observation and examination of the child outside the presence of the
defendant if:
(a) The prosecutor alleges and the court concurs that the child
witness will be unable to testify in front of the defendant or will
suffer severe emotional or mental distress if forced to testify in
front of the defendant;
(b) The defendant can observe and hear the child witness by closed-circuit television;
(c) The defendant can communicate constantly with the defense
attorney during the examination of the child witness by electronic
transmission and be granted reasonable court recesses during the
child's examination for person-to-person consultation with the defense
attorney; and
(d) The court finds the closed-circuit television is capable of
making an accurate reproduction and the operator of the equipment is
competent to operate the equipment. Whenever possible, all the parties
in the room with the child witness shall be on camera so that the
viewers can see all the parties. If viewing all participants is not
possible, then the court shall describe for the viewers the location of
the prosecutor, defense attorney, and other participants in relation to
the child.
(3) The court shall make particularized findings on the record
articulating the factors upon which the court based its decision to
allow the child witness to testify via closed-circuit television
pursuant to this section. The factors the court may consider include,
but are not limited to, a consideration of the child's age, physical
health, emotional stability, expressions by the child of fear of
testifying in open court or in front of the defendant, the relationship
of the defendant to the child, and the court's observations of the
child's inability to reasonably communicate in front of the defendant
or in open court. The court's findings shall identify the impact the
factors have upon the child's ability to testify in front of the jury
or the defendant or both and the specific nature of the emotional or
mental trauma the child would suffer. The court shall determine
whether the source of the trauma is the presence of the defendant, the
jury, or both, and shall limit the use of the closed-circuit television
accordingly.
(4) This section does not apply if the defendant is an attorney pro
se unless the defendant has a court-appointed attorney assisting the
defendant in the defense.
(5) This section may not preclude the presence of both the child
witness and the defendant in the courtroom together for purposes of
establishing or challenging the identification of the defendant when
identification is a legitimate issue in the proceeding.
(6) The Washington supreme court may adopt rules of procedure
regarding closed-circuit television procedures.
(7) All recorded tapes of testimony produced by closed-circuit
television equipment shall be subject to any protective order of the
court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the child witness.
(8) Nothing in this section creates a right of the child witness to
a closed-circuit television procedure in lieu of testifying in open
court.
(9) The state shall bear the costs of the closed-circuit television
procedure.
(10) A child witness may or may not be a victim in the proceeding.
(11) Nothing in this section precludes the court, under other
circumstances arising under subsection (1)(a) of this section, from
allowing a child to testify outside the presence of the defendant and
the jury so long as the testimony is presented in accordance with the
standards and procedures required in this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 9A.82.010 and 2012 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context requires the contrary, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1)(a) "Beneficial interest" means:
(i) The interest of a person as a beneficiary under a trust
established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee for the trust holds
legal or record title to real property;
(ii) The interest of a person as a beneficiary under any other
trust arrangement under which a trustee holds legal or record title to
real property for the benefit of the beneficiary; or
(iii) The interest of a person under any other form of express
fiduciary arrangement under which one person holds legal or record
title to real property for the benefit of the other person.
(b) "Beneficial interest" does not include the interest of a
stockholder in a corporation or the interest of a partner in a general
partnership or limited partnership.
(c) A beneficial interest is considered to be located where the
real property owned by the trustee is located.
(2) "Control" means the possession of a sufficient interest to
permit substantial direction over the affairs of an enterprise.
(3) "Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a
person claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of
credit.
(4) "Criminal profiteering" means any act, including any
anticipatory or completed offense, committed for financial gain, that
is chargeable or indictable under the laws of the state in which the
act occurred and, if the act occurred in a state other than this state,
would be chargeable or indictable under the laws of this state had the
act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and by
imprisonment for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is
charged or indicted, as any of the following:
(a) Murder, as defined in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;
(b) Robbery, as defined in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;
(c) Kidnapping, as defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;
(d) Forgery, as defined in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;
(e) Theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060,
9A.56.080, and 9A.56.083;
(f) Unlawful sale of subscription television services, as defined
in RCW 9A.56.230;
(g) Theft of telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of
a telecommunication device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;
(h) Child selling or child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;
(i) Bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and
9A.68.050;
(j) Gambling, as defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;
(k) Extortion, as defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;
(l) Unlawful production of payment instruments, unlawful possession
of payment instruments, unlawful possession of a personal
identification device, unlawful possession of fictitious
identification, or unlawful possession of instruments of financial
fraud, as defined in RCW 9A.56.320;
(m) Extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;
(n) Advancing money for use in an extortionate extension of credit,
as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;
(o) Collection of an extortionate extension of credit, as defined
in RCW 9A.82.040;
(p) Collection of an unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;
(q) Delivery or manufacture of controlled substances or possession
with intent to deliver or manufacture controlled substances under
chapter 69.50 RCW;
(r) Trafficking in stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;
(s) Leading organized crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;
(t) Money laundering, as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;
(u) Obstructing criminal investigations or prosecutions in
violation of RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130,
9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;
(v) Fraud in the purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW
21.20.010;
(w) Promoting pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;
(x) Sexual exploitation of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040,
9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;
(y) Promoting prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and
9A.88.080;
(z) Arson, as defined in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;
(aa) Assault, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;
(bb) Assault of a child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;
(cc) A pattern of equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;
(dd) Commercial telephone solicitation in violation of RCW
19.158.040(1);
(ee) Trafficking in insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;
(ff) Unlawful practice of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;
(gg) Commercial bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;
(hh) Health care false claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030;
(ii) Unlicensed practice of a profession or business, as defined in
RCW 18.130.190(7);
(jj) Improperly obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW
9.35.010;
(kk) Identity theft, as defined in RCW 9.35.020;
(ll) Unlawful shipment of cigarettes in violation of RCW
70.155.105(6) (a) or (b);
(mm) Unlawful shipment of cigarettes in violation of RCW
82.24.110(2);
(nn) Unauthorized sale or procurement of telephone records in
violation of RCW 9.26A.140;
(oo) Theft with the intent to resell, as defined in RCW 9A.56.340;
(pp) Organized retail theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.350;
(qq) Mortgage fraud, as defined in RCW 19.144.080;
(rr) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW
9.68A.100; ((or))
(ss) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in
RCW 9.68A.101; or
(tt) Trafficking, as defined in RCW 9A.40.100, promoting travel for
commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.102, and
permitting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW
9.68A.103.
(5) "Dealer in property" means a person who buys and sells property
as a business.
(6) "Debtor" means a person to whom an extension of credit is made
or a person who guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or
in any manner undertakes to indemnify the creditor against loss
resulting from the failure of a person to whom an extension is made to
repay the same.
(7) "Documentary material" means any book, paper, document,
writing, drawing, graph, chart, photograph, phonograph record, magnetic
tape, computer printout, other data compilation from which information
can be obtained or from which information can be translated into usable
form, or other tangible item.
(8) "Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit
legal entity, and includes any union, association, or group of
individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity, and both
illicit and licit enterprises and governmental and nongovernmental
entities.
(9) "Extortionate extension of credit" means an extension of credit
with respect to which it is the understanding of the creditor and the
debtor at the time the extension is made that delay in making repayment
or failure to make repayment could result in the use of violence or
other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or
property of any person.
(10) "Extortionate means" means the use, or an express or implicit
threat of use, of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the
person, reputation, or property of any person.
(11) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, savings
and loan association, savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union,
or loan company under the jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the
United States.
(12) "Pattern of criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in
at least three acts of criminal profiteering, one of which occurred
after July 1, 1985, and the last of which occurred within five years,
excluding any period of imprisonment, after the commission of the
earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to constitute a
pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent, results,
accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be
otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a
nexus to the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events.
However, in any civil proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by
any person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting
attorney in which one or more acts of fraud in the purchase or sale of
securities are asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity, it
is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100 that the
defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the
purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of
another state or of the United States requiring the same elements of
proof, but such conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted
as acts of criminal profiteering activity in such civil action under
RCW 9A.82.100.
(13) "Real property" means any real property or interest in real
property, including but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or
mortgage of real property.
(14) "Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer
program, or other material.
(15) "Repayment of an extension of credit" means the repayment,
satisfaction, or discharge in whole or in part of a debt or claim,
acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, resulting from or in
connection with that extension of credit.
(16) "Stolen property" means property that has been obtained by
theft, robbery, or extortion.
(17) "To collect an extension of credit" means to induce in any way
a person to make repayment thereof.
(18) "To extend credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter
into an agreement, tacit or express, whereby the repayment or
satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether acknowledged or disputed,
valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall be deferred.
(19) "Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or
otherwise dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy,
receive, possess, or obtain control of stolen property, with intent to
sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of the
property to another person.
(20)(a) "Trustee" means:
(i) A person acting as a trustee under a trust established under
Title 11 RCW in which the trustee holds legal or record title to real
property;
(ii) A person who holds legal or record title to real property in
which another person has a beneficial interest; or
(iii) A successor trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i)
or (ii) of this subsection.
(b) "Trustee" does not mean a person appointed or acting as:
(i) A personal representative under Title 11 RCW;
(ii) A trustee of any testamentary trust;
(iii) A trustee of any indenture of trust under which a bond is
issued; or
(iv) A trustee under a deed of trust.
(21) "Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of value
constituting principal or interest of a debt that is legally
unenforceable in the state in full or in part because the debt was
incurred or contracted:
(a) In violation of any one of the following:
(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW relating to horse racing;
(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW relating to gambling;
(b) In a gambling activity in violation of federal law; or
(c) In connection with the business of lending money or a thing of
value at a rate that is at least twice the permitted rate under the
applicable state or federal law relating to usury.

Sec. 11 RCW 13.34.132 and 2011 c 309 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
A court may order that a petition seeking termination of the parent
and child relationship be filed if the following requirements are met:
(1) The court has removed the child from his or her home pursuant
to RCW 13.34.130;
(2) Termination is recommended by the department or the supervising
agency;
(3) Termination is in the best interests of the child; and
(4) Because of the existence of aggravated circumstances,
reasonable efforts to unify the family are not required.
Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated circumstances, reasonable
efforts may be required if the court or department determines it is in
the best interests of the child. In determining whether aggravated
circumstances exist by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, the
court shall consider one or more of the following:
(a) Conviction of the parent of rape of the child in the first,
second, or third degree as defined in RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and
9A.44.079;
(b) Conviction of the parent of criminal mistreatment of the child
in the first or second degree as defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and
9A.42.030;
(c) Conviction of the parent of one of the following assault
crimes, when the child is the victim: Assault in the first or second
degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021 or assault of a child
in the first or second degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 or 9A.36.130;
(d) Conviction of the parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide
by abuse of the child's other parent, sibling, or another child;
(e) Conviction of the parent of trafficking, or promoting
commercial sexual abuse of a minor when the victim of the crime is the
child, the child's other parent, a sibling of the child, or another
child.
(f) Conviction of the parent of attempting, soliciting, or
conspiring to commit a crime listed in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this
subsection;
(((f))) (g) A finding by a court that a parent is a sexually
violent predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020;
(((g))) (h) Failure of the parent to complete available treatment
ordered under this chapter or the equivalent laws of another state,
where such failure has resulted in a prior termination of parental
rights to another child and the parent has failed to effect significant
change in the interim. In the case of a parent of an Indian child, as
defined in RCW 13.38.040, the court shall also consider tribal efforts
to assist the parent in completing treatment and make it possible for
the child to return home;
(((h))) (i) An infant under three years of age has been abandoned;
(((i))) (j) Conviction of the parent, when a child has been born of
the offense, of: (A) A sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW; or (B)
incest under RCW 9A.64.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---