BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 While the legislature finds that, in most
circumstances, need grant eligibility should not extend beyond five
years or one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of the
program in which the student is enrolled, the legislature also finds
that students should not lose need grant eligibility for taking more
than five years to graduate when they were unable to enroll in the
classes they needed to complete their program as a result of waitlists
and course closures.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2012 c 229 s 558 are each amended to
read as follows:
In awarding need grants, the office shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the office, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The office shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured
receipt of a grant. The office, in consultation with four-year
institutions of higher education, the council, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall develop award criteria and
methods of disbursement based on level of need, and not solely rely on
a first-come, first-served basis.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years,
or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of
time of the student's program, except as provided in subsection (4) of
this section. A student may not start a new associate degree program
as a state need grant recipient until at least five years have elapsed
since earning an associate degree as a need grant recipient, except
that a student may earn two associate degrees concurrently.
Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining satisfactory
academic progress toward completion of an eligible program as
determined by the office. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(4) When determining whether an individual student has met one
hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of time of his or
her program, at least one month before the start of a semester or
quarter, an institutional aid administrator must exempt the following:
(a) Courses that were taken to replace waitlisted or closed courses
necessary for the student's program over fifteen semester hours or
fifteen credit hours;
(b) Remedial coursework up to thirty semester hours or forty-five
quarter hours;
(c) Courses for English language learners;
(d) Courses taken before a one-time change in programs; and
(e) Other exceptional circumstances as documented by the student.
(5) In computing financial need, the office shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions. Any child support payments
received by students who are parents attending less than half-time
shall not be used in computing financial need.
(((5))) (6)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may
receive a grant for up to one academic year before beginning a program
that leads to a degree or certificate.
(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis
shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant for any
academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time
basis, as long as funds are available.
(c) An institution of higher education may award a state need grant
to an eligible student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter
credits, or the semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:
(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant from
that institution;
(ii) The student completes the required free application for
federal student aid;
(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial
condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the
student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is
likely eligible for a state need grant; and
(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that
the financial information provided on the free application for federal
student aid and any additional financial information provided directly
to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student
agrees to repay the institution for the grant amount if the student
submitted false or incomplete information.
(((6))) (7) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a
person who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

--- END ---