BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
establish interagency agreements with the department of social and
health services, the department of services for the blind, and any
other state agency that provides high school transition services for
students with disabilities or students covered by section 504 of the
federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).
The purpose of the interagency agreements is to foster effective
multiagency collaboration to provide transition services for students
with disabilities and students with a section 504 plan age fourteen
through twenty-one, or through high school graduation, whichever occurs
first. Interagency agreements are also intended to streamline services
and programs, promote efficiencies, and establish a uniform focus on
improved outcomes related to self-sufficiency.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
ensure that special education teachers and school psychologists receive
training to be appropriately prepared to address the transition needs
of students with disabilities and students with a section 504 plan.
(3) To the extent that data is available through data-sharing
agreements established by the education data center under RCW
43.41.400, the education data center must monitor the following
outcomes for students with disabilities and students with a section 504
plan after high school graduation:
(a) The number of students who, within one year of high school
graduation:
(i) Enter integrated employment paid at the greater of minimum wage
or competitive wage for the type of employment, with access to related
employment and health benefits; or
(ii) Enter a postsecondary education or training program focused on
leading to integrated employment;
(b) The wages and number of hours worked per pay period;
(c) The impact of employment on any state and federal benefits for
individuals with disabilities;
(d) Indicators of the types of settings in which students who
previously received transition services primarily reside;
(e) Indicators of improved economic status and self-sufficiency;
(f) Data on those students for whom a postsecondary or integrated
employment outcome does not occur within one year of high school
graduation, including:
(i) Information on the reasons that the desired outcome has not
occurred;
(ii) The number of months the student has not achieved the desired
outcome; and
(iii) The efforts made to ensure the student achieves the desired
outcome.
(4) To the extent that the data elements in subsection (3) of this
section are not available to the education data center through data-sharing agreements, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction must collect the data.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
prepare an annual report on the data and outcomes in subsection (3) of
this section and submit the report to the legislature.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "integrated employment" means
a job where the individual with disabilities is employed in a type of
job available to the general public; interacts with other workers
rather than being segregated; has the same working conditions as
individuals who do not have disabilities; has the same terms of
employment, supervision, and promotion; and has comparable wages and
benefits to other workers.

--- END ---