BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.76.100 and 2012 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is hereby declared that it is in the public interest to hold
agricultural fairs, including the exhibition of livestock and
agricultural produce of all kinds, as well as related arts and
manufactures; including products of the farm home and educational
contest, displays, and demonstrations designed to train youth and to
promote the welfare of farm people and rural living. The legislature
further finds that providing a dedicated source of revenues for state
allocations to the fair fund supports these important training
opportunities for youth. Fairs qualifying ((hereunder shall be)) under
this section are eligible for allocations from the state fair fund and
for capital funding when appropriated to the department of agriculture,
as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.240 and 2011 c 352 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(((1))) (a) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning
lottery tickets or shares;
(((2))) (b) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve
account created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative
account created by RCW 67.70.260;
(((3))) (c) For purposes of making deposits into the education
construction fund created in RCW 43.135.045 and the Washington
opportunity pathways account created in RCW 28B.76.526. On and after
July 1, 2010, all deposits not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the Washington opportunity pathways account. Moneys
in the state lottery account deposited in the Washington opportunity
pathways account are included in "general state revenues" under RCW
39.42.070;
(((4))) (d) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying
the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(((5))) (e) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center
account, created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(((6))) (f) For transfer to the veterans innovations program
account. The net revenues received from the sale of the annual
Veteran's Day lottery raffle conducted under RCW 67.70.500 must be
deposited into the veterans innovations program account created in RCW
43.60A.185 for purposes of serving veterans and their families. For
purposes under this subsection, "net revenues" means all revenues
received from the sale of veteran lottery raffle tickets less the sum
of the amount paid out in prizes and the actual administration expenses
of the lottery solely related to the veteran lottery raffle;
(((7))) (g) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and
game-related services; ((and
(8))) (h) For the payment of agent compensation; and
(i) For distribution to the state fair fund created in RCW
15.76.115 and the horse racing commission operating account created in
RCW 67.16.280. Five million dollars must be distributed under this
subsection during calendar year 2013, as follows: (A) Two million five
hundred thousand dollars to the state fair fund established under RCW
15.76.115; and (B) two million five hundred thousand dollars to the
horse racing commission operating account established under RCW
67.16.280. During subsequent years, such distributions must equal the
prior year's distributions increased by two percent. No distribution
may be made under this subsection (1)(i) after June 30, 2023.
(2) The office of financial management shall require the allotment
of all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.76.115 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 926 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The fair fund is created in the custody of the state treasury.
(2) As of the effective date of this section until July 30, 2023,
all moneys received by the department of agriculture for the purposes
of this fund ((and from RCW 67.16.105(7))) shall be deposited into the
fair fund. ((At the beginning of fiscal year 2002))
(3) As of June 30, 2023, and each fiscal year thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer into the fair fund from the general fund the
sum of two million dollars((, except for fiscal year 2011 the state
treasurer shall transfer into the fair fund from the general fund the
sum of one million one hundred three thousand dollars, and except
during fiscal year 2012 and fiscal year 2013 the state treasurer shall
transfer into the fair fund from the general fund the sum of one
million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars each fiscal year)).
(4) Expenditures from the fund may be used only for assisting fairs
in the manner provided in this chapter. Only the director of
agriculture or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.16.280 and 2011 c 12 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington horse racing commission operating account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected
by the commission under RCW 67.16.105(2) must be deposited into the
account. The commission has the authority to receive such gifts,
grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made
from time to time in trust or otherwise for the use and purpose of
regulating or supporting nonprofit race meets as set forth in RCW
67.16.130 and 67.16.105(1); such gifts, grants, and endowments must
also be deposited into the account and expended according to the terms
of such gift, grant, or endowment. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, expenditures from the account may be used ((only)) for
operating expenses of the commission including increasing the size of
purses for horse racing events, providing educational opportunities at
horse racing facilities for children involved in 4-H and other horse
owners involved in training, providing jockey insurance mitigation and
suppression at class C tracks, and marketing activities related to the
horse racing industry. Investment earnings from the account will be
retained in the Washington horse racing commission operating account,
pursuant to RCW 43.79A.040.
(2) In order to provide funding in support of the legislative
findings in RCW 67.16.101 (1) through (3), and to provide additional
necessary support to the nonprofit race meets beyond the funding
provided by RCW 67.16.101(4) and 67.16.102(2), the commission is
authorized to spend up to three hundred thousand dollars per fiscal
year from its operating account for the purpose of developing the
equine industry, maintaining and upgrading racing facilities, and
assisting equine health research. When determining how to allocate the
funds available for these purposes, the commission must give first
consideration to uses that regulate and assist the nonprofit race meets
and equine health research. These expenditures may occur only when
sufficient funds remain for the continued operations of the horse
racing commission.

--- END ---