BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that
Washington's public community and technical college system was founded
with a strong public mission of offering an open door to every
Washingtonian, regardless of his or her academic background or
experiences, at a cost normally within his or her economic means. The
legislature also finds that the thirty-four community and technical
colleges located across the state of Washington serve a critical role
in maintaining broad access to career training opportunities, academic
coursework to prepare students for college transfer, and basic skills
education for individuals who need extra assistance in preparing for
the workforce or college-level coursework.
(b) The legislature finds that the state's declining investment in
its public community and technical colleges has increasingly shifted
the burden of the costs of college attendance to Washington students
and families. The legislature recognizes that in 1991, when the
current community and technical college system was established, the
state's share of the two-year college system's budget averaged eighty-seven percent. Today, the state's share has dropped to sixty-five
percent.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to preserve broad access to
high quality postsecondary education opportunities throughout the state
of Washington and to begin to restore the funding balance between
students and the state.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to freeze
tuition increases for students attending Washington's thirty-four
public community and technical colleges for the 2013-2015 biennium,
provided that no less than one hundred eighty-eight million dollars be
appropriated to the state board for community and technical colleges,
for the purpose of off-setting revenue that would otherwise be obtained
by scheduled tuition increases.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914 and 2012 c 228
s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and
technical colleges and for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years, if
after accounting for maintenance-level appropriations the sum of one
hundred eighty-eight million dollars is appropriated to the state board
for community and technical colleges from the general fund in the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduates shall not exceed its 2012-13 academic year resident
undergraduate tuition levels. The governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College;
and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident
undergraduates, including nonresident students, summer school students,
and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage
increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor.
Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state board for
community and technical colleges may pilot or institute differential
tuition models. The board may define scale, scope, and rationale for
the models.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end
of the 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students; however, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, reductions or
increases in tuition must be uniform among resident undergraduate
students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Each governing board shall make public
its proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the
governing board of the institution considers adoption and allow
opportunity for public comment. However, the requirement to make
public a proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before
the governing board considers adoption shall not apply if the omnibus
appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th.
Governing boards shall be required to provide data regarding the
percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and
the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the state board for community and technical college system shall
consult with existing student associations or organizations with
undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential
tuition increases. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students
receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of
total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(4) Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19
academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for
resident undergraduates as follows:
(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the
level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year
2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in
(d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the
actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments
as required in the omnibus appropriations act;
(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident
undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student
funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the
global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing
board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068;
and
(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an
institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth
percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year
institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(9) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on advanced
tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:
(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded
status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program; and
(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding
how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the
ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program.

--- END ---