BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A qualifying farmers market authorized to allow wineries to
sell bottled wine at retail under RCW 66.24.170 or microbreweries to
sell bottled beer at retail under RCW 66.24.244, or both, may apply to
the liquor control board for an endorsement to allow sampling of wine
or beer or both. A winery or microbrewery offering samples under this
section must have an endorsement from the board to sell wine or beer,
as the case may be, of its own production at a qualifying farmers
market under RCW 66.24.170 or 66.24.244, respectively.
(2) Samples may be offered only under the following conditions:
(a) No more than three wineries or microbreweries combined may
offer samples at a qualifying farmers market per day.
(b) Samples must be two ounces or less. A winery or microbrewery
may provide a maximum of two ounces of wine or beer to a customer per
day.
(c) A winery or microbrewery may advertise that it offers samples
only at its designated booth, stall, or other designated location at
the farmers market.
(d) Customers must remain at the designated booth, stall, or other
designated location while sampling beer or wine.
(e) Winery and microbrewery licensees and employees who are
involved in sampling activities under this section must hold a class 12
or class 13 alcohol server permit.
(f) A winery or microbrewery must have food available for customers
to consume while sampling beer or wine, or must be adjacent to a vendor
offering prepared food.
(3) The board may establish additional requirements to ensure that
persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently intoxicated
persons may not possess or consume alcohol under the authority granted
in this section.
(4) The board may prohibit sampling at a farmers market that is
within the boundaries of an alcohol impact area recognized by
resolution of the board if the board finds that the sampling activities
at the farmers market have an adverse effect on the reduction of
chronic public inebriation in the area.
(5) If a winery or microbrewery is found to have committed a public
safety violation in conjunction with tasting activities, the board may
suspend the licensee's farmers market endorsement and not reissue the
endorsement for up to two years from the date of the violation. If
mitigating circumstances exist, the board may offer a monetary penalty
in lieu of suspension during a settlement conference.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.170 and 2009 c 373 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington
state from grapes or other agricultural products.
(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as
a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed
under this section may act as a distributor of its own production.
Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic
winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of
its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington
retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common
carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own
production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating
as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply
with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or
retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain
a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine
of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been
approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the number of
warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed one.
(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations
separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve
samples of its own products, with or without charge, and sell wine of
its own production at retail, provided that: (a) Each additional
location has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the
total number of additional locations does not exceed two; (c) a winery
may not act as a distributor at any such additional location; and (d)
any person selling or serving wine at an additional location for on-premise consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server
permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery
license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations
operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot
connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee,
the board may hold all licensees operating the additional location
jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery
licenses.
(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward
the two additional retail locations limit specified in this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its
designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection
((do not)) include ((the)) tasting or sampling privileges ((of a
winery)) subject to the conditions pursuant to section 1 of this act.
The winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that
the winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a
distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization
for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to
sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application
shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing
all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved
winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information
for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or
its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold.
Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved
winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location,
the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for
any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee
may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling
wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be
deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of
RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.244 and 2011 c 195 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under
any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at
farmers markets. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a
microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off
the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided
that (a) the warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW
66.24.010 and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the
microbrewery does not exceed one. A microbrewery holding a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production
for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in
a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or
furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the
time of sale.
(3) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also sell beer
produced by another microbrewery or a domestic brewery for on and off-premises consumption from its premises as long as the other breweries'
brands do not exceed twenty-five percent of the microbrewery's on-tap
offering of its own brands.
(4) The board may issue up to two retail licenses allowing a
microbrewery to operate an on or off-premise tavern, beer and/or wine
restaurant, or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant.
(5) A microbrewery that holds a tavern license, spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license shall
hold the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW
66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.
(6)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) Any person selling or serving beer must obtain a class 12 or
class 13 alcohol server permit.
(d) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(((d))) (e) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market
is deemed to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of
this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under
this subsection (6) ((do not constitute the)) include tasting or
sampling privileges ((of a microbrewery)) subject to the conditions
pursuant to section 1 of this act. The microbrewery may not store beer
at a farmers market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers
bottled beer for sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor
from a farmers market location.
(((e))) (f) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board
for authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection (6) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and
(ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers
who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the
locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (6)(((e))) (f) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(((f))) (g) The board may adopt rules establishing the application
and approval process under this section and any additional rules
necessary to implement this section.
(((g))) (h) For the purposes of this subsection (6):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(7) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may
contract-produce beer for another microbrewer. This contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and
66.28.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 2011 c 62 s 1 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---