BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the vast majority
of states use competition to maximize efficiency in their workers'
compensation programs. Private sector competition in providing
workers' compensation insurance has been effective in reducing premium
costs, maximizing program efficiency, and creating innovative safety
programs to protect all employees. Therefore, the purposes of this act
are to:
(1) Create an efficient and cost-effective industrial insurance
system for the benefit of both employers and employees by introducing
competition into the system through a choice of insurance carriers from
whom employers may purchase industrial insurance;
(2) Provide workers the benefits of safety systems developed by
both private enterprise and by government;
(3) Improve the state's economic climate by providing the private
sector with the opportunity to engage in the industrial insurance
business with appropriate standards and oversight;
(4) Eliminate a government monopoly with respect to industrial
insurance choices for small employers and provide private sector
insurance choices for all employers; and
(5) By July 1, 2015, make Washington a state in which employers may
choose to self-insure, obtain private sector industrial insurance, or
purchase industrial insurance from the Washington state industrial
insurance fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative task force on
private competition for industrial insurance is established. The task
force consists of the following members:
(a) One member from each major caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) One member from each major caucus of the senate, appointed by
the president of the senate; and
(c) The following members, appointed jointly by the president of
the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives:
(i) Four members representing employers, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide business organizations. At least one of the
members must represent small business, at least one of the members must
represent an association with a retrospective rating program, and at
least one of the members must be a self-insured employer under Title 51
RCW;
(ii) Two members representing insurers, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide insurance organizations; and
(iii) Three members representing workers. One member shall be an
employee of a self-insured employer, and at least one member must be
employed by an employer with fewer than twenty employees.
(2) The task force shall develop proposed legislation to eliminate
Washington's monopoly of the industrial insurance fund by conforming
current statutes to make them consistent with the provisions contained
in this act, including the transfer of funds under section 9 of this
act. The task force must provide its recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Insurer" means:
(1) The state fund established in section 6 of this act;
(2) Any private company, corporation, mutual association, or
reciprocal or interinsurance exchange that meets the requirement of
section 13 of this act; or
(3) Any employer to whom a certificate of qualification to self-insure has been issued under RCW 51.14.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"State fund" means the Washington state industrial insurance fund
as established in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW
to read as follows:
"Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner as defined in RCW
48.02.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The Washington state industrial
insurance fund is established for the purpose of insuring employers for
their liability arising out of this title beginning July 1, 2015.
(2) The functions of the state fund are:
(a) To confer with and solicit employers and to handle, audit, and
enforce collection of premiums, assessments, and fees of employers
insured with it;
(b) To receive, handle, and process the claims of workers and
beneficiaries of workers injured in the employ of employers insured
with the state fund and to issue warrants for the payment of its
obligations; and
(c) To perform all other functions that the laws of this state
authorize an industrial insurance insurer to perform and that are
necessary or appropriate to carry out the functions authorized,
including securing reinsurance for any risk insured by the state fund.
(3) The state fund in its own name may sue and be sued in all
actions arising out of any act or omission in connection with its
business affairs, and is entitled to appear as a party in any
proceedings involving claims payable by the state fund under this
title.
(4) The state fund shall allocate revenues received from its
investments, other than revenues allocated for the payment of pensions,
to reduce the premiums for employers insured by the state fund and
shall apply, whenever possible, for a deviation as provided in section
12 of this act from manual rates filed by the licensed rating
organization so that its charges for industrial insurance are the
lowest possible rates necessary to maintain the actuarial solvency of
the state fund.
(5) The state fund shall participate in the Washington insurance
guaranty association under chapter 48.32 RCW in the same manner as any
other industrial insurance insurer.
(6) The state fund shall charge premiums in accordance with this
title and based on the rates filed by the licensed rating organization
and approved by the commissioner.
(7) The state fund shall participate in the assigned risk plan
under section 12 of this act.
(8) The state fund may acquire, lease, rent, own, and manage real
property. It may purchase, rent, lease, or otherwise acquire for its
use all supplies, materials, equipment, and services necessary to carry
out its functions. It may sell or otherwise dispose of any property
acquired under this subsection.
(9) The state fund shall pay all taxes and fees as any other
insurer meeting the requirements of section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The state fund created in section 6 of
this act is governed by policies established by a board of five
directors appointed by the governor and approved by the senate. Each
member must be a policyholder of the state fund. Two of the members
must represent a business with twenty or fewer employees at the time of
appointment.
The initial terms of the board members are: One member serves for
two years, two members serve for four years, and two members serve for
six years. Thereafter, each member serves a term of six years. A
member may not serve more than two consecutive terms. A director holds
office until the appointment and qualification of a successor.
(2) The board of directors shall:
(a) Elect a chair from among its members to serve for the following
calendar year;
(b) Meet not less than monthly to consider and act on the affairs
of the state fund;
(c) Establish the policies for the operation of the state fund
consistent with all applicable provisions of law; and
(d) Employ a manager to manage the daily operations of the state
fund.
(3) The manager is not a voting member of the board of directors
but shall act at the will of and in support of the board of directors
and provide staff support as required by the board of directors to
carry out its activities.
(4) A member of the board of directors may not have any pecuniary
interest, other than an incidental interest which is disclosed and made
a matter of public record at the time of appointment to the board, in
any corporation or other business entity doing business as an
industrial insurance insurer.
(5) A majority of the members of the board constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The state fund must be under the direct
supervision of a manager who is selected and employed at the discretion
of the board of directors. The salary of the manager is fixed by the
board of directors. The manager shall report at least annually to the
board of directors, the governor, and the legislature on the state of
the state fund and shall include in the report a review of its
operations for the previous twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The treasurer shall transfer to the state
fund the assets and liabilities of the following funds on July 1, 2015:
(1) The accident fund under RCW 51.44.010;
(2) The medical aid fund under RCW 51.44.020;
(3) The reserve fund under RCW 51.44.030; and
(4) All other assets and liabilities held by the industrial
insurance division of the department of labor and industries under this
title on July 1, 2015, except the supplemental pension fund and any
other funds pertaining to the regulatory functions of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Beginning July 1, 2015, all employers
required to pay industrial insurance benefits, medical aid, and
supplemental pension fees to the industrial insurance division of the
department under this title must become insureds of the state fund
until: (a) The employer elects to secure otherwise the payment of
industrial insurance benefits under this title; or (b) the employer
receives notice from the state fund of the termination or nonrenewal of
insurance.
(2) All liability accruing under the law in effect until July 1,
2015, for employers paying premiums to the industrial insurance
division of the department under this title is transferred on July 1,
2015, to the state fund, together with liabilities for all expenses,
claim costs, administrative costs, and all other obligations arising
out of the operations of the division and having accrued until July 1,
2015.
(3) The powers, duties, and functions of the industrial insurance
division relating to insurance coverage, actuarial computations, claims
management, premium collection, accounting, and all other powers
necessary to administer the state fund as an insurer, that are not
otherwise transferred by this chapter, are vested in the state fund as
of July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The state of Washington is not liable
beyond the assets of the state fund for any obligations of the state
fund. The state fund shall operate on a parity with other insurers,
other than self-insurers, and must be self-supporting and without
subsidy of any kind. The state fund has the authority to acquire any
equipment, supplies, or other personal or real property, and employ
personnel as may be reasonably necessary to solicit and provide
industrial insurance, and take all actions to enable it to be fully
competitive in offering industrial insurance. The state fund is
subject to the same regulation, examination, reporting requirements,
and disclosure as all other insurers other than self-insurers providing
insurance under this title.
All moneys received by and under the supervision and control of the
state fund must be deposited and maintained by the state fund.
Disbursements from the state fund for all the operating costs of the
fund and for payment of all claims obligations must be on authorization
of the manager or a duly authorized representative of the manager.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, the term "industrial
insurance insurer" includes an insurer authorized to insure the
liabilities defined by Title 51 RCW and includes the state fund as
established by section 6 of this act, but does not include any
employer, or any other insurer authorized to provide insurance in this
state that insures a portion of the liability arising from this title
for an employer that is self-insured. However, chapter 48.22 RCW does
not apply to industrial insurance unless specified. When provisions of
this section conflict with other provisions of this title, the
provisions of this section control.
(2) The commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to be
an industrial insurance insurer if the insurer meets the requirements
to be licensed to sell insurance in this state and meets the applicable
provisions of this title and Title 51 RCW. The commissioner shall
perform all duties required under this title to ensure that each
insurer continues to meet the requirements of the applicable provisions
of this title and Title 51 RCW.
(3) The commissioner shall designate a licensed rating organization
to file with the commissioner, for approval, a manual of
classifications and rules, rating plans, policy forms and provisions,
a payroll limitation, and a statistical reporting plan which provides
data adequate for rate making. Every insurer must be a member of the
licensed rating organization designated by the commissioner and must
adhere to the approved filings required by this section.
(4) The licensed rating organization on behalf of and in lieu of
filings by its members shall file manual rates with the commissioner
for approval. Any member of the rating organization may make written
application to the commissioner for approval of uniform percentage
deviations from the manual rates filed by the rating organization and
approved by the commissioner.
(5) The state fund is entitled to membership on any committee
established in this state by the rating organization.
(6) All manual rates filed by the rating organization are subject
to a payroll limitation approved by the commissioner which must be
adjusted annually by the percentage change in the state average annual
wage determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(7) The commissioner shall establish an assigned risk plan for all
industrial insurance insurers.
(8) This chapter does not prohibit or regulate the payment of
dividends and savings on unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or
returned by industrial insurance insurers to their policyholders,
members, or subscribers. A plan returned by insurers to their
policyholders, members, or subscribers is not a rating plan or system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Each insurer offering to sell
industrial insurance meeting the requirements of this title, except for
employers that are self-insured, or insurers providing partial
reinsurance for a self-insurer, shall hold a certificate of authority
issued by the commissioner under chapter 48.05 RCW permitting it to
provide industrial insurance. Before issuing the certificate, the
commissioner shall certify that the insurer has the capacity to provide
adequate safety engineering, loss prevention, and claims management
services for all employers the insurer insures. Such a certificate is
not valid if the insurer fails to maintain a location within the state
where applications for industrial insurance benefits may be made and
maintain with the commissioner a list of the locations and telephone
numbers where information may be obtained about all appropriate matters
relating to claims.
(2) Each insurer may refuse to provide industrial insurance for up
to eight percent of employers who apply for insurance with the insurer
except that each insurer shall participate in the assigned risk plan as
provided in section 12 of this act. Any insurer failing to provide
insurance as required by the assigned risk plan is not permitted to
sell industrial insurance in this state.
(3) On the effective date of this section, the state fund must be
issued a certificate of authority from the commissioner. Thereafter,
the state fund is required to maintain the certificate and meet all of
the applicable provisions of Title 48 RCW and this title like any other
insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A revolving fund to be known and designated as the industrial
insurance administrative fund is created in the state treasury. The
commissioner is the administrator of the fund. The industrial
insurance administrative fund is established to provide for the payment
of all expenses of the board of industrial insurance appeals and the
commissioner with respect to the administration of their respective
duties under this title and those sections of Title 48 RCW governing
industrial insurance. There must be separate appropriations approved
by the legislature and the governor for the board and the commissioner.
Any money appropriated from the general fund for the uses and purposes
of the administrative fund must be placed in the administrative fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall periodically calculate and collect from
insurers assessments that, with the interest earned, are sufficient to
cover the administrative costs described in sections 14 and 17 of this
act. The time and manner of collecting assessments must be set forth
in rules adopted by the commissioner under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The commissioner shall prepare, as soon as is practicable after
July 1st each year, a line item budget for the industrial insurance
administrative fund for the succeeding fiscal year. The budget must be
based upon the actual expenditures of the preceding fiscal year and a
reasonable estimate of expenses for the succeeding year. This budget
must be adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) The assessment of each insurer must be an amount bearing the
same ratio to the total administrative costs that each insurer's
adjusted premium bears to the aggregated adjusted premium of all
insurers. As used in this subsection "adjusted premium" means:
(a) For insurers, other than self-insurers, the direct earned
premium for industrial insurance under this title, determined under
uniform rules adopted by the commissioner; and
(b) For self-insurers, the premium that would have been incurred
had it insured its liability under this title with the state fund,
determined under uniform rules adopted by the commissioner.
(4) The assessment for each insurer must be calculated in the
following manner:
(a) The assessment for each insurer must be based on the adjusted
premium for the period immediately preceding the period to which the
assessment will apply;
(b) Until July 1, 2016, the periodic assessment must be adjusted
after each fiscal year to reflect the actual adjusted premium of each
insurer for that fiscal year, as determined by the commissioner;
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, each insurer may
be assessed annually a minimum amount not to exceed five hundred
dollars, as determined by the commissioner; and
(d) Beginning July 1, 2016, assessments must be determined for
insurers on a fiscal year basis and collected annually.
(5) Assessments are payable in full within thirty days of the
notice of assessment. If any insurer fails to pay the assessment by
the date due, interest may be charged on all past due amounts at a
reasonable market rate as may be established from time to time.
(6) In no event may any assessment made under this section exceed
four percent per annum of the total taxable industrial insurance
premiums in this state for the year immediately preceding the
assessment.
(7) Any amount resulting from or anticipated for expenditures from
the industrial insurance administrative fund that arises from the
uncorrected default of a self-insurer must be assessed only upon self-insurers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Insurers other than self-insurers may
insure the industrial insurance obligations of employers as a group if
the following conditions are met:
(1) All the employers in the group are members of a statewide
organization that has been in existence for at least four years;
(2) The organization exists primarily for a purpose other than that
of obtaining or offering industrial insurance coverage or insurance-related services;
(3) The group must be composed of employers who are substantially
similar considering the services or activities performed by the
employees of those employers; and
(4) The formation and operation of the group program in the
organization will improve accident prevention and claims management for
the employers in the group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW
to read as follows:
It is a default whenever industrial insurance benefits due under
this title are not paid as required. Industrial insurance benefits due
must be paid as follows:
(1) When the default results from the failure of an employer to
secure the payment of industrial insurance benefits due under this
title, industrial insurance benefits must be paid by the commissioner
from the industrial insurance administrative fund. In addition to any
penalty imposed under RCW 51.48.010, the defaulting employer is liable
for payment into the industrial insurance administrative fund the
amounts paid from the fund by the commissioner plus market interest on
any outstanding balance. For the purpose of enforcing this liability,
the commissioner, for the benefit of the industrial insurance
administrative fund, is subrogated to all of the rights of the person
receiving the industrial insurance benefits;
(2) When the default results from the failure of a self-insurer to
make industrial insurance payments, industrial insurance benefits must
be paid by the commissioner from the industrial insurance
administrative fund only after the moneys available from the bonds or
other security provided under the requirements of this title have been
exhausted. The defaulting self-insurer is liable for payment into the
industrial insurance administrative fund the amounts paid from the fund
by the commissioner plus market interest on any unpaid balance. For
the purpose of enforcing this liability, the commissioner, for the
benefit of the industrial insurance administrative fund, is subrogated
to all of the rights of the person receiving the industrial insurance
benefits;
(3) When the default results from the failure of an insolvent
insurer as defined in RCW 48.32.030, to make industrial insurance
benefit payments, industrial insurance benefits must be paid by the
commissioner from the industrial insurance administrative fund. The
Washington insurance guaranty association, as defined by chapter 48.32
RCW, is liable for payment into the industrial insurance administrative
fund the amounts paid from the fund by the commissioner in lieu of
paying the amounts of industrial insurance benefits directly to the
claimant;
(4) In cases other than those involving insurer insolvency when
industrial insurance benefits are not timely paid or where the payment
of industrial insurance benefits are delayed as a result of a dispute
as to which insurer is responsible for the payment of industrial
insurance benefits, the payments must be made from the industrial
insurance administrative fund and the commissioner has the right of
recovery from the party or parties ultimately deemed responsible for
the payment of the industrial insurance benefits; and
(5) The commissioner may purchase insurance for the industrial
insurance administrative fund to pay for defaults under this section.
The administrative fund must be used to pay for the insurance, and the
liability of insurers is limited to the liabilities not paid by the
insurance. The commissioner shall actively pursue legal action to
collect payments to the industrial insurance administrative fund as set
forth in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The accident and loss experience records
and related data of the division of industrial insurance, for periods
before the effective date of this section, must be made available to
the licensed rating organization designated by the insurance
commissioner under section 12 of this act to assist in making workers'
compensation rates. The division of industrial insurance must be
reimbursed for the actual reasonable cost of reproduction and delivery
of the records and data.

Sec. 19 RCW 51.16.140 and 1989 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) Every employer who is not a self-insurer shall deduct from
the pay of each of his or her workers one-half of the amount he or she
is required to pay, for medical benefits within each risk
classification. Such amount shall be periodically determined by the
director and reported by him or her to all employers under this title:
PROVIDED, That the state governmental unit shall pay the entire amount
into the medical aid fund for volunteers, as defined in RCW 51.12.035,
and the state apprenticeship council shall pay the entire amount into
the medical aid fund for registered apprentices or trainees, for the
purposes of RCW 51.12.130. The deduction under this section is not
authorized for premiums assessed under RCW 51.16.210.
(2))) It shall be unlawful for the employer, unless specifically
authorized by this title, to deduct or obtain any part of the premium
or other costs required to be by him or her paid from the wages or
earnings of any of his or her workers, and the making of or attempt to
make any such deduction shall be a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 20 RCW 51.32.073 and 1989 c 385 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each
employer shall retain from the earnings of each worker that amount as
shall be fixed from time to time by the director, the basis for
measuring said amount to be determined by the director. The money so
retained shall be matched in an equal amount by each employer, and all
such moneys shall be remitted to the department in such manner and at
such intervals as the department directs and shall be placed in the
supplemental pension fund: PROVIDED, That the state apprenticeship
council shall pay the entire amount into the supplemental pension fund
for registered apprentices or trainees during their participation in
supplemental and related instruction classes.)) Each insurer shall
remit to the commissioner for the supplemental pension fund an amount
to be determined by the commissioner. The moneys so collected shall be
used exclusively for the additional payments from the supplemental
pension fund prescribed in this title and for the amount of any
increase payable under the provisions of RCW 51.32.075((, as now or
hereafter amended,)) and shall be no more than necessary to make such
payments on a current basis. The ((department)) commissioner may
require a self-insurer to make any additional payments which are
payable from the supplemental pension fund and thereafter such self-insurer shall be reimbursed therefrom.
(2) None of the amount assessed for the supplemental pension fund
((under RCW 51.16.210)) may be retained from the earnings of workers
((covered under RCW 51.16.210)).

Sec. 21 RCW 51.44.010 and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2015, there shall be, in the office of the state
treasurer, a fund to be known and designated as the "accident fund."

Sec. 22 RCW 51.44.020 and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2015, there shall be, in the office of the state
treasurer, a fund to be known and designated as the "medical aid fund."

Sec. 23 RCW 51.44.030 and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.030 are each amended
to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2015, there shall be, in the office of the state
treasurer, a fund to be known and designated as the "reserve fund."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 6 through 8, 10, 11, 13, and 16 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 3 through 17, 19, and 20 through
23 of this act take effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---