BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to avoid public access to the personal voter signatures of
those who sign petitions, when petitions are submitted to the secretary
of state for verification, the secretary of state shall produce two
scanned copies: One that contains all the information on the petitions
and that can only be viewed by the secretary of state's team during the
verification process and one for public access that includes only the
front of the petitions containing the signers' names and addresses with
the voters' personal signatures blacked out. Unless ordered by a
court, the secretary of state shall not permit copies to be made of or
allow public access to the verification version of the petitions.
Nothing in this section prohibits a court from reviewing any petition
or petitions in a legal challenge; any petition or petitions reviewed
by the court must remain under seal and be subject to a protective
order. The legislature finds that the secretary of state's policy of
not allowing the personal voter signatures on the voter rolls and
individual ballots to be made public should be extended to the personal
voter signatures on petitions. The legislature cannot find a good
public policy rationale for allowing hundreds of thousands of personal
voter signatures to be publicly available.

--- END ---