BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that regulatory
processes impose significant costs on doing business and significantly
influence investment behavior, location decisions, start-up activity,
expansions, and hiring. The legislature further finds that, for more
than a decade, the executive and legislative branches have called upon
state agencies to review their regulations to achieve meaningful
regulatory reform and improve the regulatory climate for Washington
businesses. However, a 2012 performance audit conducted by the state
auditor's office found that the departments of ecology, health, and
labor and industries have not adopted sufficient streamlining processes
or formally measured the results of their streamlining activities.
Thus, it is the intent of the legislature to formally direct these
three state agencies to achieve the regulatory reform that has been
repeatedly called for by the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
The department of ecology must establish and perform, within
existing funds, a formal review process of its existing rules every
five years. The goal of the review is to decrease the numbers of,
simplify the process, and decrease the time required for obtaining
licenses, permits, and inspections, as applicable, in order to reduce
the regulatory burden on businesses without compromising public health
and safety. Benchmarks must be adopted to assess the effectiveness of
streamlining efforts. The department must establish a process for
effectively applying sunset provisions to rules when applicable. The
department must report back to the applicable committees of the
legislature with its review process and benchmarks by January 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries must establish and perform,
within existing funds, a formal review process of its existing rules
every five years. The goal of the review is to decrease the numbers
of, simplify the process, and decrease the time required for obtaining
licenses, permits, and inspections, as applicable, in order to reduce
the regulatory burden on businesses without compromising public health
and safety. Benchmarks must be adopted to assess the effectiveness of
streamlining efforts. The department must establish a process for
effectively applying sunset provisions to rules when applicable. The
department must report back to the applicable committees of the
legislature with its review process and benchmarks by January 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of health must establish and perform, within
existing funds, a formal review process of its existing rules every
five years. The goal of the review is to decrease the numbers of,
simplify the process, and decrease the time required for obtaining
licenses, permits, and inspections, as applicable, in order to reduce
the regulatory burden on businesses without compromising public health
and safety. Benchmarks must be adopted to assess the effectiveness of
streamlining efforts. The department must establish a process for
effectively applying sunset provisions to rules when applicable. The
department must report back to the applicable committees of the
legislature with its review process and benchmarks by January 2014.

--- END ---