BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any licensed mental health agency which has a waiver from the
department exempting the agency from compliance with chemical
dependency rules for services provided to patients with co-occurring
mental health and chemical dependency disorders as of January 1, 2013,
may request and must receive a three-year renewal of the waiver
exempting the agency from compliance with chemical dependency rules
with respect to such patients if a fully integrated rule is not in
effect by May 1, 2014.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any licensed mental health agency which has a waiver from the
department exempting the agency from compliance with chemical
dependency rules for services provided to patients with co-occurring
mental health and chemical dependency disorders as of January 1, 2013,
may request and must receive a three-year renewal of the waiver
exempting the agency from compliance with chemical dependency rules
with respect to such patients if a fully integrated rule is not in
effect by May 1, 2014.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2014.

--- END ---