BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.090 and 2007 c 436 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) An authorized representative of the United States government,
the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county,
township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal
or political corporation or subdivision of this state;
(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of
their office;
(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the
utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance,
or development work incidental to their own business;
(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the
discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing,
abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any
surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an
owner or lessee;
(5) The sale of any finished products, materials, or articles of
merchandise that are not fabricated into and do not become a part of a
structure under the common law of fixtures;
(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of
personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a
mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under
chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter
46.70 RCW;
(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on
within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the
legal jurisdiction of the federal government;
(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment
without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of,
the work of the contractor;
(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or
more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and
materials and all other items is less than five hundred dollars, such
work or operations being considered as of a casual, minor, or
inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection
does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only
a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same
or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is
made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the
purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption
prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises
or puts out any sign or card or other device which might indicate to
the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he or she is
qualified to engage in the business of contractor;
(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction
and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted
irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying,
agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or
to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire
prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by
a registered contractor;
(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a registered
contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the owner of
the protections of this chapter against registered and unregistered
contractors. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not
apply to a person who performs the activities of a contractor for the
purpose of leasing or selling improved property he or she has owned for
less than twelve months;
(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether
occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her
personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not but this
exemption shall not apply to any person who performs the activities of
a contractor on his or her own property for the purpose of selling,
demolishing, or leasing the property;
(13) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work
in or upon his or her own properties, or who uses his or her own
employees to do such work;
(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting
solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician certified
under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber certified under
the laws of the state of Washington or licensed by a political
subdivision of the state of Washington while operating within the
boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in
this subsection is applicable only when the person certified is
operating within the scope of his or her certification;
(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as
an employee of a registered contractor with wages as his or her sole
compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her sole
compensation;
(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as
required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to
perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;
(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who
subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively
registered contractors. This exemption only applies to the
installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes that
were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer or
manufacturer;
(18) An entity who holds a valid electrical contractor's license
under chapter 19.28 RCW that employs a certified journeyman
electrician, a certified residential specialty electrician, a certified
HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician, or an electrical trainee
meeting the requirements of chapter 19.28 RCW to perform plumbing work
that is incidentally, directly, and immediately appropriate to the
like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or other small
household utilization equipment that requires limited electric power
and limited waste and/or water connections. An electrical trainee must
be supervised by a certified electrician while performing plumbing
work.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.106.150 and 2003 c 399 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that a
person obtain a license or a certified plumber in order to do plumbing
work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other
property owned by him or her.
(2) A current certificate of competency or apprentice permit is not
required for:
(a) Persons performing plumbing work on a farm; or
(b) Certified journeyman electricians, certified residential
specialty electricians, certified HVAC/refrigeration specialty
electricians, or electrical trainees working for an electrical
contractor and performing exempt work under RCW 18.27.090(18).
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be intended to derogate from or
dispense with the requirements of any valid plumbing code enacted by a
political subdivision of the state, except that no code shall require
the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate any additional
proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay any fee in order
to engage in the trade of plumbing.
(4) This chapter shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part
I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.
(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to any
farm, business, industrial plant, or corporation doing plumbing work on
premises it owns or operates.
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the
right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend,
neighbor, relative or other person when none of the individuals doing
such plumbing hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business
of plumbing.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.28.006 and 2003 c 399 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) "Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical
contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance
with the rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) "Basic electrical work" means the work classified in (a) and
(b) of this subsection as class A and class B basic electrical work:
(a) "Class A basic electrical work" means the like-in-kind
replacement of a: Contactor, relay, timer, starter, circuit board, or
similar control component; household appliance; circuit breaker; fuse;
residential luminaire; lamp; snap switch; dimmer; receptacle outlet;
thermostat; heating element; luminaire ballast with an exact same
ballast; ten horsepower or smaller motor; or wiring, appliances,
devices, or equipment as specified by rule.
(b) "Class B basic electrical work" means work other than class A
basic electrical work that requires minimal electrical circuit
modifications and has limited exposure hazards. Class B basic
electrical work includes the following:
(i) Extension of not more than one branch electrical circuit
limited to one hundred twenty volts and twenty amps each where:
(A) No cover inspection is necessary; and
(B) The extension does not supply more than two outlets;
(ii) Like-in-kind replacement of a single luminaire not exceeding
two hundred seventy-seven volts and twenty amps;
(iii) Like-in-kind replacement of a motor larger than ten
horsepower;
(iv) The following low voltage systems:
(A) Repair and replacement of devices not exceeding one hundred
volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low voltage systems
in one and two-family dwellings;
(B) Repair and replacement of the following devices not exceeding
one hundred volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low
voltage systems in other buildings, provided the equipment is not for
fire alarm or nurse call systems and is not located in an area
classified as hazardous by the national electrical code; or
(v) Wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule.
(3) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.
(4) "Chapter" or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter
number is referenced.
(5) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's designee.
(7) "Electrical construction trade" includes but is not limited to
installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are used
for light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining remote
control, signaling, power limited, or communication circuits or
systems.
(8) "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes,
submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining wires
or equipment that convey electrical current.
(9) "Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly
uses, conducts, insulates, or is operated by electricity but does not
mean: Plug-in appliances; or plug-in equipment as determined by the
department by rule.
(10) "Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired
assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers,
switches, relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes,
transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect
means and motor branch circuit protective devices.
(11) "Journeyman electrician" means a person who has been issued a
journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the department.
(12) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as
voltage requirements, current draw, and function, and being in the same
location.
(13) "Master electrician" means either a master journeyman
electrician or master specialty electrician.
(14) "Master journeyman electrician" means a person who has been
issued a master journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(15) "Master specialty electrician" means a person who has been
issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(16) "Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a
specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.
(17) "HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician" means a person who
has been issued an HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician certificate
of competency by the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.28.091 and 2003 c 399 s 301 and 2003 c 242 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No license under the provision of this chapter shall be
required from any utility or any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because of work in
connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a
utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity from
the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or
property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other
apparatus or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of
electricity by the customer.
(2) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any utility because of work in connection with the
installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:
(a) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of
streets, alleys, ways, or public areas or squares;
(b) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial,
industrial, or public institution customer that are an integral part of
a transmission or distribution system, either overhead or underground,
providing service to such customer and located outside the building or
structure: PROVIDED, That a utility does not initiate the sale of
services to perform such work;
(c) Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus, and
equipment, owned by a customer that is an independent power producer
who has entered into an agreement for the sale of electricity to a
utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an
electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to
the point of interconnection with the utility's system.
(3) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
licensed under RCW 19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a utility
for the performance of work under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of the work of installing and repairing ignition or
lighting systems for motor vehicles.
(5) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or
maintenance of wires and equipment, and installations thereof, exempted
in RCW 19.28.010.
(6) The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements
under this chapter work performed on premanufactured electric power
generation equipment assemblies and control gear involving the testing,
repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of components
internal to the power generation equipment, the control gear, or the
transfer switch.
(7) This chapter does not require an electrical contractor license
if: (a) An appropriately certified electrician or a properly
supervised certified electrical trainee is performing the installation,
repair, or maintenance of wires and equipment for a nonprofit
corporation that holds a current tax exempt status as provided under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or a nonprofit religious organization; (b) the
certified electrician or certified electrical trainee is not
compensated for the electrical work; and (c) the value of the
electrical work does not exceed thirty thousand dollars.
(8) An entity that currently holds a valid specialty or general
plumbing contractor's registration under chapter 18.27 RCW may employ
a certified plumber, a certified residential plumber, or a plumber
trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW, or an entity
that currently holds a valid electrical contractor's license under this
chapter may employ a certified HVAC/refrigeration specialty
electrician, to perform electrical work that is incidentally, directly,
and immediately appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a
household appliance or other small household utilization equipment that
requires limited electric power and limited waste and/or water
connections. A plumber trainee must be supervised by a certified
plumber or a certified residential plumber while performing electrical
work. The electrical work is subject to the permitting and inspection
requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---