BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a great
deal of confusion regarding the correct prevailing wage rate to be
applied to various types of construction work due to determinations
issued by the department of labor and industries and the industrial
statistician, and that there is a need to protect both workers and
contractors from the application of unknown determinations issued by
the department or industrial statistician regarding the correct
prevailing wage rate. The legislature further finds that this
confusion harms both contractors and the contractor's employees, and
that greatly improved transparency must be provided by the department
and the industrial statistician so that determinations regarding the
correct prevailing wage for specific types of construction work are
made available to employers and employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the director of the department of labor and industries
or the industrial statistician issues a determination for what
prevailing wages must be paid for specific construction work, the
department or the industrial statistician shall:
(a) Place a notice of that determination in the state register;
(b) Place an informational note on every listed prevailing wage
classification that may be impacted by the determination and how to get
a copy of the determination. Failure by the department to meet this
requirement shall negate the application of that determination on a
public works project otherwise subject to the determination;
(c) Include a statement on every notice of intent to pay prevailing
wages that uses a classification that may be impacted by a
determination of the existence of determinations affecting that
occupational classification and how to get a copy of the determination.
(2) The department shall maintain a list of all determinations
about what prevailing wages must be paid for specific types of
construction work and ensure that list of determinations, and how to
access the list, is made known on all approved statements of intent to
pay prevailing wages issued by the industrial statistician of the
department under RCW 39.12.040. Failing to include this notice on an
approved statement of intent to pay prevailing wages issued by the
industrial statistician shall negate the application of any
determination of the public works otherwise subject to that public
works project.
(3) The department shall make specific determinations issued by the
department and the industrial statistician available in printed paper
format as requested by any contractor or construction worker. The
department may reject any unreasonable request for an excessive number
of printed paper copies of determination.
(4) The department shall, by December 1st of each year, issue a
written report to the senate commerce and labor committee or its
successor, and the house labor and workforce development committee or
its successor, with a copy of all determinations issued by the
department and the industrial statistician since the last report.
Failure by the department to issue this report as required shall negate
all determinations issued by the department since the last report was
issued by the department.

--- END ---