BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries must provide any current
prevailing wage survey to each contractor renewing a contractor
registration pursuant to chapter 18.27 RCW or renewing an electrical
contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW. For specialty and
electrical contractors, the department may provide only those
prevailing wage surveys where the trade or occupation subject to the
survey is customarily associated with the specialty indicated on the
contractor's registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A contractor cannot bid on any public works subject to prevailing
wage requirements unless the contractor has submitted any applicable
prevailing wage survey to the department of labor and industries within
sixty days of renewing a registration pursuant to chapter 18.27 RCW or
an electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW. A
prevailing wage survey is applicable if the contractor employs workers
in the trade or occupation listed on the survey.
If a contractor fails to submit an applicable prevailing wage
survey within sixty days of registration or license renewal, the
contractor cannot bid on a public works project until the applicable
surveys have been submitted to the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.04.350 and 2010 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before award of a public works contract, a bidder must meet the
following responsibility criteria to be considered a responsible bidder
and qualified to be awarded a public works project. The bidder must:
(a) At the time of bid submittal, have a certificate of
registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) Have a current state unified business identifier number;
(c) If applicable, have industrial insurance coverage for the
bidder's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW;
an employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW;
and a state excise tax registration number as required in Title 82 RCW;
(d) Not be disqualified from bidding on any public works contract
under RCW 39.06.010 ((or)), 39.12.065(3), or section 2 of this act;
(e) If bidding on a public works project subject to the
apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320, not have been
found out of compliance by the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council for working apprentices out of ratio, without
appropriate supervision, or outside their approved work processes as
outlined in their standards of apprenticeship under chapter 49.04 RCW
for the one-year period immediately preceding the date of the bid
solicitation; and
(f) Until December 31, 2013, not have violated RCW 39.04.370 more
than one time as determined by the department of labor and industries.
(2) In addition to the bidder responsibility criteria in subsection
(1) of this section, the state or municipality may adopt relevant
supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility applicable
to a particular project which the bidder must meet.
(a) Supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility,
including the basis for evaluation and the deadline for appealing a
determination that a bidder is not responsible, must be provided in the
invitation to bid or bidding documents.
(b) In a timely manner before the bid submittal deadline, a
potential bidder may request that the state or municipality modify the
supplemental criteria. The state or municipality must evaluate the
information submitted by the potential bidder and respond before the
bid submittal deadline. If the evaluation results in a change of the
criteria, the state or municipality must issue an addendum to the
bidding documents identifying the new criteria.
(c) If the bidder fails to supply information requested concerning
responsibility within the time and manner specified in the bid
documents, the state or municipality may base its determination of
responsibility upon any available information related to the
supplemental criteria or may find the bidder not responsible.
(d) If the state or municipality determines a bidder to be not
responsible, the state or municipality must provide, in writing, the
reasons for the determination. The bidder may appeal the determination
within the time period specified in the bidding documents by presenting
additional information to the state or municipality. The state or
municipality must consider the additional information before issuing
its final determination. If the final determination affirms that the
bidder is not responsible, the state or municipality may not execute a
contract with any other bidder until two business days after the bidder
determined to be not responsible has received the final determination.
(3) The capital projects advisory review board created in RCW
39.10.220 shall develop suggested guidelines to assist the state and
municipalities in developing supplemental bidder responsibility
criteria. The guidelines must be posted on the board's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of labor and industries may
adopt rules to implement this act.

--- END ---