BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.125 and 2011 c 329 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The person appointed by the court as either guardian or
limited guardian of the person and/or estate of an incapacitated person
shall file in writing with the court, within ninety days from the date
of appointment, a notice designating a standby limited guardian or
guardian to serve as limited guardian or guardian at the death ((or)),
legal incapacity, or planned absence of the court-appointed guardian or
limited guardian.
(b) The notice shall state the name, address, zip code, and
telephone number of the designated standby or limited guardian.
(c) Notice of the guardian's designation of the standby guardian
shall be given to the standby guardian, the incapacitated person and
his or her spouse or domestic partner and adult children, any facility
in which the incapacitated person resides, and any person entitled to
special notice under RCW 11.92.150 or any person entitled to receive
pleadings pursuant to RCW 11.88.095(2)(j). ((Such))
(2)(a) If the regularly appointed guardian or limited guardian
dies, becomes incapacitated, is out of state, or is otherwise
unavailable to fulfill his or her duties, then the standby guardian or
limited guardian shall have all the powers, duties, and obligations of
the regularly appointed guardian or limited guardian ((and in addition
shall,)).
(b) The regularly appointed guardian or limited guardian may
delegate decision-making authority to the standby guardian or limited
guardian in advance of a planned absence.
(c) Within a period of thirty days from the death or adjudication
of incapacity of the regularly appointed guardian or limited guardian,
the standby guardian or limited guardian must file with the superior
court in the county in which the guardianship or limited guardianship
is then being administered, a petition for appointment of a substitute
guardian or limited guardian. Upon the court's appointment of a new,
substitute guardian or limited guardian, the standby guardian or
limited guardian shall make an accounting and report to be approved by
the court, and upon approval of the court, the standby guardian or
limited guardian shall be released from all duties and obligations
arising from or out of the guardianship or limited guardianship.
(((2))) (d) The standby guardian or limited guardian must receive
notice of all proceedings.
(e) The regularly appointed guardian or limited guardian must
report quarterly to the designated standby guardian or limited
guardian, or when there is a substantial change in circumstances, to
keep the standby guardian or limited guardian adequately informed about
the needs of the incapacitated person. This report may be made by
phone or other reasonable means.
(f) If the standby guardian or limited guardian is required to act
due to the death, incapacity, or absence of the regularly appointed
guardian or limited guardian, then the standby guardian may apply to
the court to be paid for fees and costs.
(3) Letters of guardianship shall be issued to the standby guardian
or limited guardian upon filing an oath and posting a bond as required
by RCW 11.88.100 as now or hereafter amended. The oath may be filed
prior to the appointed guardian or limited guardian's death. Notice of
such appointment shall be provided to the standby guardian, the
incapacitated person, and any facility in which the incapacitated
person resides. The provisions of RCW 11.88.100 through 11.88.110 as
now or hereafter amended shall apply to standby guardians and limited
guardians.
(((3))) (4) In addition to the powers of a standby limited guardian
or guardian as noted in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
standby limited guardian or guardian shall have the authority to
provide timely, informed consent to necessary medical procedures, as
authorized in RCW 11.92.040 as now or hereafter amended, if the
guardian or limited guardian cannot be located within four hours after
the need for such consent arises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect May 1, 2014.

--- END ---