BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the rise of
chronic disease and poor health habits are contributing to rising
healthcare costs. Wellness programs that encourage healthier living or
help individuals to maintain and improve their health can reduce
healthcare costs and improve overall health. Studies also show that
financial incentives encourage greater participation in wellness
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A carrier may offer or sponsor a wellness program that is not
part of the health benefit plan or health benefit contract to a person
or employer, and a carrier may include incentives as part of the
wellness program. Examples of incentives include gift cards for goods
or services, or health-related goods or services.
(2) In order to offer a wellness program, the following must be
met:
(a) The program must be available to individuals under similar
qualifying circumstances;
(b) A detailed description of the program and incentive must be
provided to individuals prior to participation and upon request; and
(c) The health carrier must provide information to individuals that
the wellness program does not constitute a health benefit plan.
(3) Any wellness program and incentives offered under this section
must be available for review upon request by the insurance
commissioner.
(4) For purposes of this section, a "wellness program" is a program
of health promotion or disease prevention designed to promote healthy
behaviors or lifestyles and improve an individual's overall well-being
or awareness. A wellness program may include, but is not limited to:
A biometric screening or an online health assessment; a program
designed to encourage healthy lifestyles, physical activity, or healthy
eating; a coaching program; a smoking cessation program; a program
designed to reduce alcohol misuse; a weight reduction or management
program; and nutrition education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 48.30.140 and 48.30.150 do not apply to section 2 of this act.

--- END ---