BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An apiarist or broker who is registered under RCW 15.60.021,
and who operates his or her apiary or apiaries in a reasonable manner
and in conformance with the department's apiary best management
practices rules, is immune from civil liability for any personal injury
or property damage that occurs in connection with the keeping and
maintaining of bees, bee equipment, queen breeding equipment, apiaries,
and appliances. The limitation on civil liability under this section
does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(2) The director, after consulting with the apiary advisory
committee, shall propose for adoption and maintain rules that establish
best management practices for apiarists and brokers in the operation of
apiaries. The rules shall provide for specific setbacks that must be
made upon the written demand of any person having an allergy to bee
stings who owns property within one-quarter mile of the location of the
hive or hives.
(3) The limitation on civil liability contained in subsection (1)
of this section shall not take effect until rules are adopted under
subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---