BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95N.020 and 2006 c 183 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington materials management and
financing authority created under RCW 70.95N.280.
(2) "Authorized party" means a manufacturer who submits an
individual independent plan or the entity authorized to submit an
independent plan for more than one manufacturer.
(3) "Board" means the board of directors of the Washington
materials management and financing authority created under RCW
70.95N.290.
(4) "Collector" means an entity licensed to do business in the
state that gathers unwanted covered electronic products from
households, small businesses, school districts, small governments, and
charities for the purpose of recycling and meets minimum standards that
may be developed by the department.
(5) "Contract for services" means an instrument executed by the
authority and one or more persons or entities that delineates
collection, transportation, and recycling services, in whole or in
part, that will be provided to the citizens of the state within service
areas as described in the approved standard plan.
(6) "Covered electronic product" includes a cathode ray tube or
flat panel computer monitor having a viewable area greater than four
inches when measured diagonally, a desktop computer, a laptop or a
portable computer, or a cathode ray tube or flat panel television
having a viewable area greater than four inches when measured
diagonally that has been used in the state by any covered entity
regardless of original point of purchase. "Covered electronic product"
does not include: (a) A motor vehicle or replacement parts for use in
motor vehicles or aircraft, or any computer, computer monitor, or
television that is contained within, and is not separate from, the
motor vehicle or aircraft; (b) monitoring and control instruments or
systems; (c) medical devices; (d) products including materials intended
for use as ingredients in those products as defined in the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) or the virus-serum-toxin act of 1913 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), and regulations
issued under those acts; (e) equipment used in the delivery of patient
care in a health care setting; (f) a computer, computer monitor, or
television that is contained within a clothes washer, clothes dryer,
refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional
oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, or air
purifier; or (g) hand-held portable voice or data devices used for
commercial mobile services as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 332 (d)(1).
(7) "Covered entity" means any household, charity, school district,
small business, or small government located in Washington state.
(8) "Curbside service" means a collection service providing
regularly scheduled pickup of covered electronic products from
households or other covered entities in quantities generated from
households.
(9) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(10) "Electronic product" includes a cathode ray tube or flat panel
computer monitor having a viewable area greater than four inches when
measured diagonally; a desktop computer; a laptop or a portable
computer; or a cathode ray tube or flat screen television having a
viewable area greater than four inches when measured diagonally.
(11) "Equivalent share" means the weight in pounds of covered
electronic products identified for an individual manufacturer under
this chapter as determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.200.
(12) "Household" means a single detached dwelling unit or a single
unit of a multiple dwelling unit and appurtenant structures.
(13) "Independent plan" means a plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted covered electronic products
that is developed, implemented, and financed by an individual
manufacturer or by an authorized party.
(14) "Manufacturer" means any person, in business or no longer in
business but having a successor in interest, who, irrespective of the
selling technique used, including by means of distance or remote sale:
(a) Manufactures or has manufactured a covered electronic product
under its own brand names or under a brand it is licensed to use for
sale in or into this state;
(b) Assembles or has assembled a covered electronic product that
uses parts manufactured by others for sale in or into this state under
the assembler's brand names;
(c) Resells or has resold in or into this state under its own brand
names a covered electronic product produced by other suppliers,
including retail establishments that sell covered electronic products
under their own brand names;
(d) Manufactures or manufactured a cobranded product for sale in or
into this state that carries the name of both the manufacturer and a
retailer;
(e) Imports or has imported a covered electronic product into the
United States that is sold in or into this state. However, if the
imported covered electronic product is manufactured by any person with
a presence in the United States meeting the criteria of manufacturer
under (a) through (d) of this subsection, that person is the
manufacturer. For purposes of this subsection, "presence" means any
person that performs activities conducted under the standards
established for interstate commerce under the commerce clause of the
United States Constitution; ((or))
(f) Sells at retail a covered electronic product acquired from an
importer that is the manufacturer as described in (e) of this
subsection, and elects to register in lieu of the importer as the
manufacturer for those products; or
(g) Assumes the responsibilities of a manufacturer under this
section. In the event the entity who assumes responsibility fails to
comply, the manufacturer as defined under (a) through (f) of this
subsection remains fully responsible.
(15) "New entrant" means: (a) A manufacturer of televisions that
have been sold in the state for less than ten years; or (b) a
manufacturer of desktop computers, laptop and portable computers, or
computer monitors that have been sold in the state for less than five
years. However, a manufacturer of both televisions and computers or a
manufacturer of both televisions and computer monitors that is deemed
a new entrant under either only (a) or (b) of this subsection is not
considered a new entrant for purposes of this chapter.
(16) "Orphan product" means a covered electronic product that lacks
a manufacturer's brand or for which the manufacturer is no longer in
business and has no successor in interest.
(17) "Plan's equivalent share" means the weight in pounds of
covered electronic products for which a plan is responsible. A plan's
equivalent share is equal to the sum of the equivalent shares of each
manufacturer participating in that plan.
(18) "Plan's return share" means the sum of the return shares of
each manufacturer participating in that plan.
(19) "Premium service" means services such as at-location system
upgrade services provided to covered entities and at-home pickup
services offered to households. "Premium service" does not include
curbside service.
(20) "Processor" means an entity engaged in disassembling,
dismantling, or shredding electronic products to recover materials
contained in the electronic products and prepare those materials for
reclaiming or reuse in new products in accordance with processing
standards established by this chapter and by the department. A
processor may also salvage parts to be used in new products.
(21) "Product type" means one of the following categories:
Computer monitors; desktop computers; laptop and portable computers;
and televisions.
(22) "Program" means the collection, transportation, and recycling
activities conducted to implement an independent plan or the standard
plan.
(23) "Program year" means each full calendar year after the program
has been initiated.
(24) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing unwanted
electronic products, components, and by-products into usable or
marketable materials for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration. "Recycling" does not include energy recovery or energy
generation by means of combusting unwanted electronic products,
components, and by-products with or without other waste. Smelting of
electronic materials to recover metals for reuse in conformance with
all applicable laws and regulations is not considered disposal or
energy recovery.
(25) "Retailer" means a person who offers covered electronic
products for sale at retail through any means including, but not
limited to, remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the
internet, but does not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction
with a distributor or a retailer.
(26) "Return share" means the percentage of covered electronic
products by weight identified for an individual manufacturer, as
determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.190.
(27) "Reuse" means any operation by which an electronic product or
a component of a covered electronic product changes ownership and is
used for the same purpose for which it was originally purchased.
(28) "Small business" means a business employing less than fifty
people.
(29) "Small government" means a city in the state with a population
less than fifty thousand, a county in the state with a population less
than one hundred twenty-five thousand, and special purpose districts in
the state.
(30) "Standard plan" means the plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted covered electronic products
developed, implemented, and financed by the authority on behalf of
manufacturers participating in the authority.
(31) "Transporter" means an entity that transports covered
electronic products from collection sites or services to processors or
other locations for the purpose of recycling, but does not include any
entity or person that hauls their own unwanted electronic products.
(32) "Unwanted electronic product" means a covered electronic
product that has been discarded or is intended to be discarded by its
owner.
(33) "White box manufacturer" means a person who manufactured
unbranded covered electronic products offered for sale in the state
within ten years prior to a program year for televisions or within five
years prior to a program year for desktop computers, laptop or portable
computers, or computer monitors.
(34) "Market share" means the percentage of covered electronic
products by weight identified for an individual manufacturer, as
determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.190.
(35) "Plan's market share" means the sum of the market shares of
each manufacturer participating in that plan.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95N.040 and 2006 c 183 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2007, and annually thereafter, each manufacturer
must register with the department.
(2) A manufacturer must submit to the department with each
registration or annual renewal a fee to cover the administrative costs
of this chapter as determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.230.
(3) The department shall review the registration or renewal
application and notify the manufacturer if their registration does not
meet the requirements of this section. Within thirty days of receipt
of such a notification from the department, the manufacturer must file
with the department a revised registration addressing the requirements
noted by the department.
(4) The registration must include the following information:
(a) The name and contact information of the manufacturer submitting
the registration;
(b) The manufacturer's brand names of covered electronic products,
including all brand names sold in the state in the past, all brand
names currently being sold in the state, and all brand names for which
the manufacturer has legal responsibility under RCW 70.95N.100;
(c) The method or methods of sale used in the state; and
(d) Whether the registrant will be participating in the standard
plan or submitting an independent plan to the department for approval.
(5) The registrant shall submit any changes to the information
provided in the registration to the department within fourteen days of
such change.
(6) The department shall identify, using all reasonable means,
manufacturers that are in business or that are no longer in business
but that have a successor in interest by examining best available
return share data, product advertisements, and other pertinent data.
The department shall notify manufacturers that have been identified and
for whom an address has been found of the requirements of this chapter,
including registration and plan requirements under this section and RCW
70.95N.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95N.050 and 2006 c 183 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A manufacturer must participate in the standard plan
administered by the authority, unless the manufacturer obtains
department approval for an independent plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted electronic products.
(2) An independent plan may be submitted by an individual
manufacturer or by a group of manufacturers, provided that:
(a) For program years 2009 through 2014, each independent plan
represents at least a five percent return share of covered electronic
products. For program year 2015 and all subsequent program years, each
independent plan represents at least a five percent market share of
covered electronic products; and
(b) No manufacturer may participate in an independent plan if it is
a new entrant or a white box manufacturer.
(3) An individual manufacturer submitting an independent plan to
the department is responsible for collecting, transporting, and
recycling its equivalent share of covered electronic products.
(4)(a) Manufacturers collectively submitting an independent plan
are responsible for collecting, transporting, and recycling the sum of
the equivalent shares of each participating manufacturer.
(b) Each group of manufacturers submitting an independent plan must
designate a party authorized to file the plan with the department on
their behalf. A letter of certification from each of the manufacturers
designating the authorized party must be submitted to the department
together with the plan.
(5) Each manufacturer in the standard plan or in an independent
plan retains responsibility and liability under this chapter in the
event that the plan fails to meet the manufacturer's obligations under
this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95N.090 and 2006 c 183 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A program must provide collection services for covered
electronic products of all product types and produced by any
manufacturer that are reasonably convenient and available to all
citizens of the state residing within its geographic boundaries,
including both rural and urban areas. Each program must provide
collection service in every county of the state. A program may provide
collection services jointly with another plan or plans.
(a) For any city or town with a population of greater than ten
thousand, each program shall provide a minimum of one collection site
or alternate collection service described in subsection (3) of this
section or a combination of sites and alternate service that together
provide at least one collection opportunity for all product types. A
collection site for a county may be the same as a collection site for
a city or town in the county.
(b) Collection sites may include electronics recyclers and repair
shops, recyclers of other commodities, reuse organizations, charities,
retailers, government recycling sites, or other suitable locations.
(c) Collection sites must be staffed, open to the public at a
frequency adequate to meet the needs of the area being served, and on
an on-going basis.
(2) A program may limit the number of covered electronic products
or covered electronic products by product type accepted per customer
per day or per delivery at a collection site or service. All covered
entities may use a collection site as long as the covered entities
adhere to any restrictions established in the plans.
(3) A program may provide collection services in forms different
than collection sites, such as curbside services, if those alternate
services provide equal or better convenience to citizens and equal or
increased recovery of unwanted covered electronic products.
(4) For rural areas without commercial centers or areas with widely
dispersed population, a program may provide collection at the nearest
commercial centers or solid waste sites, collection events, mail-back
systems, or a combination of these options.
(5) For small businesses, small governments, charities, and school
districts that may have large quantities of covered electronic products
that cannot be handled at collection sites or curbside services, a
program may provide alternate services. At a minimum, a program must
provide for processing of these large quantities of covered electronic
products at no charge to the small businesses, small governments,
charities, and school districts.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95N.110 and 2006 c 183 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For program years 2009 through 2014, an independent plan and
the standard plan must implement and finance an auditable,
statistically significant sampling of covered electronic products
entering its program every program year. The information collected
must include a list of the brand names of covered electronic products
by product type, the number of covered electronic products by product
type, the weight of covered electronic products that are identified for
each brand name or that lack a manufacturer's brand, the total weight
of the sample by product type, and any additional information needed to
assign return share.
(2) For program years 2009 through 2014, the sampling must be
conducted in the presence of the department or a third-party
organization approved by the department. The department may, at its
discretion, audit the methodology and the results.
(3) After the fifth program year through the 2014 program year, the
department may reassess the sampling required in this section. The
department may adjust the frequency at which manufacturers must
implement the sampling or may adjust the frequency at which
manufacturers must provide certain information from the sampling.
Prior to making any changes, the department shall notify the public,
including all registered manufacturers, and provide a comment period.
The department shall notify all registered manufacturers of any such
changes.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95N.140 and 2006 c 183 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By March 1st of the second program year and each program year
thereafter, the authority and each authorized party shall file with the
department an annual report for the preceding program year.
(2) The annual report must include the following information:
(a) The total weight in pounds of covered electronic products
collected and recycled, by county, during the preceding program year
including documentation verifying collection and processing of that
material. For program years 2009 through 2014, the report must also
include the total weight in pounds, ((includes)) including orphan
products. The report must also indicate and document the weight in
pounds received from each nonprofit charitable organization primarily
engaged in the business of reuse and resale used by the plan. The
report must document the weight in pounds that were received in large
quantities from small businesses, small governments, charities and
school districts as described in RCW 70.95N.090(5);
(b) The collection services provided in each county and for each
city with a population over ten thousand including a list of all
collection sites and services operating in the state in the prior
program year and the parties who operated them;
(c) A list of processors used, the weight of covered electronic
products processed by each direct processor, and a description of the
processes and methods used to recycle the covered electronic products
including a description of the processing and facility locations. The
report must also include a list of subcontractors who further processed
or recycled unwanted covered electronic products, electronic
components, or electronic scrap ((described in section 26(1) of this
act)), including facility locations;
(d) ((Other documentation as established under section 26(3) of
this act;
(e))) Educational and promotional efforts that were undertaken;
(((f))) (e) For program years 2009 through 2014, the results of
sampling and sorting as required in RCW 70.95N.110, including a list of
the brand names of covered electronic products by product type, the
number of covered electronic products by product type, the weight of
covered electronic products that are identified for each brand name or
that lack a manufacturer's brand, and the total weight of the sample by
product type;
(((g))) (f) The list of manufacturers that are participating in the
standard plan; and
(((h))) (g) Any other information deemed necessary by the
department.
(3) The department shall review each report within ninety days of
its submission and shall notify the authority or authorized party of
any need for additional information or documentation, or any deficiency
in its program.
(4) All reports submitted to the department must be available to
the general public through the internet. Proprietary information
submitted to the department under this chapter is exempt from public
disclosure under RCW 42.56.270.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.95N.180 and 2006 c 183 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain on its web site the following
information:
(a) The names of the manufacturers and the manufacturer's brands
that are registered with the department under RCW 70.95N.040;
(b) The names of the manufacturers and the manufacturer's brands
that are participating in an approved plan under RCW 70.95N.050;
(c) The names and addresses of the collectors and transporters that
are listed in registrations filed with the department under RCW
70.95N.240;
(d) The names and addresses of the processors used to fulfill the
requirements of the plans;
(e) For program years 2009 through 2015, return and equivalent
shares for all manufacturers.
(2) The department shall update this web site information promptly
upon receipt of a registration or a report.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.95N.190 and 2006 c 183 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For program years 2009 through 2014, the department shall
determine the return share for each manufacturer in the standard plan
or an independent plan by dividing the weight of covered electronic
products identified for each manufacturer by the total weight of
covered electronic products identified for all manufacturers in the
standard plan or an independent plan, then multiplying the quotient by
one hundred.
(2) For the first program year, the department shall determine the
return share for such manufacturers using all reasonable means and
based on best available information regarding return share data from
other states and other pertinent data.
(3) For ((the second and each subsequent program year)) 2014, the
department shall determine the return share for such manufacturers
using all reasonable means and based on the most recent sampling of
covered electronic products conducted in the state under RCW
70.95N.110.
(4) For program year 2015 and all subsequent program years, the
department shall determine market share for all manufacturers using
data reported by manufacturers under (a) of this subsection and
publicly available data.
(a) By March 1st of each program year, each manufacturer must
report to the department either:
(i) The total weight of covered electronic products sold by that
manufacturer nationwide in the prior program year; or
(ii) The total weight of covered electronic products sold by that
manufacturer within the state of Washington in the prior program year.
(b) The department shall determine each manufacturer's percentage
of market share as follows:
(i) Multiply the total weight reported by each manufacturer under
(a)(i) of this subsection by the quotient of Washington's population
divided by the total population of the United States;
(ii) Add the result determined in (b)(i) of this subsection plus
the total weight under (a)(ii) of this subsection; and
(iii) Divide both the weight in (a)(ii) of this subsection and the
weight in (b)(i) of this subsection by the number calculated under
(b)(ii) of this subsection.
(5) Data reported by manufacturers under subsection (4) of this
section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.95N.200 and 2006 c 183 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For program years 2009 through 2015, the department shall
determine the total equivalent share for each manufacturer in the
standard plan or an independent plan by dividing the return share
percentage for each manufacturer by one hundred, then multiplying the
quotient by the total weight in pounds of covered electronic products
collected for that program year, allowing as needed for the additional
credit authorized in subsection (3) of this section. For program year
2016 and all subsequent program years, the department shall determine
the total equivalent share for each manufacturer in the standard plan
or an independent plan by dividing the market share percentage for each
manufacturer by one hundred, then multiplying the quotient by the total
weight in pounds of covered electronic products collected for that
program year, allowing as needed for the additional credit authorized
in subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) By June 1st of each program year, the department shall
notify each manufacturer of the manufacturer's equivalent share of
covered electronic products to be applied to the previous program year.
The department shall also notify each manufacturer of how its
equivalent share was determined.
(b) By June 1st of each program year, the department shall bill any
authorized party or authority that has not attained its plan's
equivalent share as determined under RCW 70.95N.220. The authorized
party or authority shall remit payment to the department within sixty
days from the billing date.
(c) By September 1st of each program year, the department shall pay
any authorized party or authority that exceeded its plan's equivalent
share.
(3) Plans that utilize the collection services of nonprofit
charitable organizations that qualify for a taxation exemption under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)) that are primarily engaged in the business of reuse and
resale must be given an additional five percent credit to be applied
toward a plan's equivalent share for pounds that are received for
recycling from those organizations. The department may adjust the
percentage of credit annually.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.95N.210 and 2006 c 183 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2007, the department shall notify each manufacturer
of its preliminary return share of covered electronic products for the
first program year.
(2) For program years 2009 through 2014, preliminary return share
of covered electronic products must be announced annually by June 1st
of each program year for the next program year. For the 2015 program
year and all subsequent program years, preliminary market share of
covered electronic products must be sent out to each individual
manufacturer annually by June 1st of each program year for the next
program year.
(3) Manufacturers may challenge the preliminary return or market
share by written petition to the department. The petition must be
received by the department within thirty days of the date of
publication of the preliminary return or market shares.
(4) The petition must contain a detailed explanation of the grounds
for the challenge, an alternative calculation, and the basis for such
a calculation, documentary evidence supporting the challenge, and
complete contact information for requests for additional information or
clarification.
(5) Sixty days after the publication of the preliminary return or
market share, the department shall make a final decision on return or
market share, having fully taken into consideration any and all
challenges to its preliminary calculations.
(6) A written record of challenges received and a summary of the
bases for the challenges, as well as the department's response, must be
published at the same time as the publication of the final return
share.
(7) By August 1, 2007, the department shall publish the final
return shares for the first program year. For program years 2009
through 2014, by August 1st of each program year, the department shall
publish the final return shares for use in the coming program year.
For the 2015 program year and all subsequent program years, by August
1st of each program year, the department shall notify each manufacturer
of its final market shares for use in the coming program year.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.95N.230 and 2006 c 183 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules to determine the process for
manufacturers to change plans under RCW 70.95N.080.
(2) The department shall establish annual registration and plan
review fees for administering this chapter. An initial fee schedule
must be established by rule and be adjusted no more often than once
every two years. All fees charged must be based on factors relating to
administering this chapter and be based on a sliding scale that is
representative of annual sales of covered electronic products in the
state, either by weight or unit, or by representative market share.
Fees must be established in amounts to fully recover and not to exceed
expenses incurred by the department to implement this chapter.
(3) The department shall establish an annual process for local
governments and local communities to report their satisfaction with the
services provided by plans under this chapter. This information must
be used by the department in reviewing plan updates and revisions.
(4) The department may adopt rules as necessary for the purpose of
implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.95N.290 and 2008 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The authority is governed by a board of directors. The
board of directors is comprised of eleven participating manufacturers,
appointed by the director of the department. For program years 2009
through 2014, five board positions are reserved for representatives of
the top ten brand owners by return share of covered electronic
products, and six board positions are reserved for representatives of
other brands, including at least one board position reserved for a
manufacturer who is also a retailer selling their own private label.
The return share of covered electronic products used to determine the
top ten brand owners for purposes of electing the board must be
determined by the department by January 1, 2007. For program years
2015 and beyond, five board positions are reserved for representatives
of the top ten brand owners by market share of covered electronic
products, and six board positions are reserved for representatives of
other brands, including at least one board position reserved for a
manufacturer who is also a retailer selling its own private label. The
market share of covered electronic products used to determine the top
ten brand owners for purposes of electing the board must be determined
by the department by October 1, 2015.
(b) The board must have representation from both television and
computer manufacturers.
(2) The board shall select from its membership the chair of the
board and such other officers as it deems appropriate.
(3) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(4) The directors of the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce and the department of ecology serve as
ex officio members. The state agency directors serving in ex officio
capacity may each designate an employee of their respective departments
to act on their behalf in all respects with regard to any matter to
come before the authority. Ex officio designations must be made in
writing and communicated to the authority director.
(5) The board shall create its own bylaws in accordance with the
laws of the state of Washington.
(6) Any member of the board may be removed for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public
hearing, unless the notice and hearing are expressly waived in writing
by the affected member.
(7) The members of the board serve without compensation but are
entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for
expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.95N.300 and 2006 c 183 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Manufacturers participating in the standard plan shall pay the
authority to cover all administrative and operational costs associated
with the collection, transportation, and recycling of covered
electronic products within the state of Washington incurred by the
standard program operated by the authority to meet the standard plan's
equivalent share obligation as described in RCW 70.95N.280(5).
(2) The authority shall assess charges on each manufacturer
participating in the standard plan and collect funds from each
participating manufacturer for the manufacturer's portion of the costs
in subsection (1) of this section. For program years 2009 through
2015, such apportionment ((shall)) must be based on return share,
market share, any combination of return share and market share, or any
other equitable method. For the 2016 program year and all subsequent
program years, such apportionment must be based on market share. The
authority's apportionment of costs to manufacturers participating in
the standard plan may not include nor be based on electronic products
imported through the state and subsequently exported outside the state.
Charges assessed under this section must not be formulated in such a
way as to create incentives to divert imported electronic products to
ports or distribution centers in other states. The authority shall
adjust the charges to manufacturers participating in the standard plan
as necessary in order to ensure that all costs associated with the
identified activities are covered.
(3) The authority may require financial assurances or performance
bonds for manufacturers participating in the standard plan, including
but not limited to new entrants and white box manufacturers, when
determining equitable methods for apportioning costs to ensure that the
long-term costs for collecting, transporting, and recycling of a
covered electronic product are borne by the appropriate manufacturer in
the event that the manufacturer ceases to participate in the program.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes the authority to assess fees
or levy taxes directly on the sale or possession of electronic
products.
(5) If a manufacturer has not met its financial obligations as
determined by the authority under this section, the authority shall
notify the department that the manufacturer is no longer participating
in the standard plan.
(6) For program years 2009 through 2015, the authority shall submit
its plan for assessing charges and apportioning cost on manufacturers
participating in the standard plan to the department for review and
approval along with the standard plan as provided in RCW 70.95N.060.
(7)(a) Any manufacturer participating in the standard plan may
appeal an assessment of charges or apportionment of costs levied by the
authority under this section by written petition to the director of the
department. The director of the department or the director's designee
shall review all appeals within timelines established by the department
and shall reverse any assessments of charges or apportionment of costs
if the director finds that the authority's assessments or apportionment
of costs was an arbitrary administrative decision, an abuse of
administrative discretion, or is not an equitable assessment or
apportionment of costs. The director shall make a fair and impartial
decision based on sound data. If the director of the department
reverses an assessment of charges, the authority must redetermine the
assessment or apportionment of costs.
(b) Disputes regarding a final decision made by the director or
director's designee may be challenged through arbitration. The
director shall appoint one member to serve on the arbitration panel and
the challenging party shall appoint one other. These two persons shall
choose a third person to serve. If the two persons cannot agree on a
third person, the presiding judge of the Thurston county superior court
shall choose a third person. The decision of the arbitration panel
shall be final and binding, subject to review by the superior court
solely upon the question of whether the decision of the panel was
arbitrary or capricious.

Sec. 14 RCW 42.56.270 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; ((and))
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---