BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.410.090 and 2009 c 396 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Any certificate or permit authorized under the provisions of
this chapter, chapter 28A.405 RCW, or rules promulgated thereunder may
be revoked or suspended by the authority authorized to grant the same
based upon a criminal records report authorized by law, or upon the
complaint of the professional educator standards board or any school
district superintendent, educational service district superintendent,
or private school administrator for immorality, violation of written
contract, unprofessional conduct, intemperance, or crime against the
law of the state. A reprimand may be issued as an alternative to
suspension or revocation of a certificate or permit. School district
superintendents, educational service district superintendents, the
professional educator standards board, or private school administrators
may file a complaint concerning any certificated employee of a school
district, educational service district, or private school and this
filing authority is not limited to employees of the complaining
superintendent or administrator. Such written complaint shall state
the grounds and summarize the factual basis upon which a determination
has been made that an investigation by the superintendent of public
instruction is warranted.
(b) If the superintendent of public instruction has reasonable
cause to believe that an alleged violation of this chapter or rules
adopted under it has occurred based on a written complaint alleging
physical abuse or sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee
filed by a parent or another person, but no complaint has been
forwarded to the superintendent by a school district superintendent,
educational service district superintendent, or private school
administrator, and that a school district superintendent, educational
service district superintendent, or private school administrator has
sufficient notice of the alleged violation and opportunity to file a
complaint, the superintendent of public instruction may cause an
investigation to be made of the alleged violation, together with such
other matters that may be disclosed in the course of the investigation
related to certificated personnel.
(2) A parent or another person may file a written complaint with
the superintendent of public instruction alleging physical abuse or
sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee if:
(a) The parent or other person has already filed a written
complaint with the educational service district superintendent
concerning that employee;
(b) The educational service district superintendent has not caused
an investigation of the allegations and has not forwarded the complaint
to the superintendent of public instruction for investigation; and
(c) The written complaint states the grounds and factual basis upon
which the parent or other person believes an investigation should be
conducted.
(3) Any certificate or permit authorized under the provisions of
this chapter, chapter 28A.405 RCW, or rules adopted thereunder may be
revoked or suspended by the authority authorized to grant the same upon
complaint from the professional educator standards board alleging
unprofessional conduct in the form of a fraudulent submission of a test
for educators. A reprimand may be issued as an alternative to
suspension or revocation of a certificate or permit. The professional
educator standards board must issue to the superintendent of public
instruction a written complaint stating the grounds and factual basis
upon which the professional educator standards board believes an
investigation should be conducted pursuant to this section. In all
cases under this subsection, the person whose certificate is in
question shall be given an opportunity to be heard and has the right to
appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100.
(4)(a) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter
or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be revoked by the authority authorized to
grant the certificate upon a guilty plea or the conviction of any
felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322, in accordance with this
section. The person whose certificate is in question shall be given an
opportunity to be heard.
(b) Mandatory permanent revocation upon a guilty plea or the
conviction of felony crimes specified under RCW 28A.400.322(1) shall
apply to such convictions or guilty pleas which occur after July 23,
1989, and before July 26, 2009.
(c) Mandatory permanent revocation upon a guilty plea or conviction
of felony crimes specified under RCW 28A.400.322(2) shall apply to such
convictions or guilty pleas that occur on or after July 26, 2009.
(d) Revocation of any certificate or permit authorized under this
chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW for a guilty plea or criminal conviction
of a crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322 occurring prior to July 23,
1989, shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section.
(((4))) (5)(a) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this
chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be suspended or revoked, according
to the provisions of this subsection, by the authority authorized to
grant the certificate upon a finding that an employee has engaged in an
unauthorized use of school equipment to intentionally access material
depicting sexually explicit conduct or has intentionally possessed on
school grounds any material depicting sexually explicit conduct; except
for material used in conjunction with established curriculum. A first
time violation of this subsection shall result in either suspension or
revocation of the employee's certificate or permit as determined by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. A second violation
shall result in a mandatory revocation of the certificate or permit.
(b) In all cases under this subsection (((4))) (5), the person
whose certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be
heard and has the right to appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100.
Certificates or permits shall be suspended or revoked under this
subsection only if findings are made on or after July 24, 2005. For
the purposes of this subsection, "sexually explicit conduct" has the
same definition as provided in RCW 9.68A.011.
(((5))) (6) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this
chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be revoked by the authority
authorized to grant the certificate upon a finding that the certificate
holder obtained the certificate through fraudulent means, including
fraudulent misrepresentation of required academic credentials or prior
criminal record. In all cases under this subsection, the person whose
certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be heard
and has the right to appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100.
Certificates or permits shall be revoked under this subsection only if
findings are made on or after July 26, 2009.

--- END ---