BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.879 and 2011 c 171 s 113 and 2011 c 169 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The aquatic invasive species prevention account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys directed to the account from RCW
88.02.640(3)(a)(i) must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from
the account may only be used as provided in this section. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Funds in the aquatic invasive species prevention account may be
appropriated to the department to develop an aquatic invasive species
prevention program for recreational and commercial watercraft. Funds
must be expended as follows:
(a) To inspect recreational and commercial watercraft;
(b) To educate general law enforcement officers on how to enforce
state laws relating to preventing the spread of aquatic invasive
species;
(c) To evaluate and survey the risk posed by recreational and
commercial watercraft in spreading aquatic invasive species into
Washington state waters;
(d) To evaluate the risk posed by float planes in spreading aquatic
invasive species into Washington state waters; and
(e) To implement an aquatic invasive species early detection and
rapid response plan. The plan must address the treatment and immediate
response to the introduction to Washington waters of aquatic invasive
species. Agency and public review of the plan must be conducted under
chapter 43.21C RCW, the state environmental policy act. If the
implementation measures or actions would have a probable significant
adverse environmental impact, a detailed statement under chapter 43.21C
RCW must be prepared on the plan.
(3) Funds in the aquatic invasive species enforcement account
created in RCW 43.43.400 may be appropriated to the department and
Washington state patrol to develop an aquatic invasive species
enforcement program for recreational and commercial watercraft.
(a) The department shall provide training to Washington state
patrol employees working at port of entry weigh stations, and other
local law enforcement employees, on how to inspect recreational and
commercial watercraft for the presence of aquatic invasive species.
(b) A person who enters Washington by road transporting any
commercial or recreational watercraft that has been used ((in any
designated aquatic invasive species state or foreign country as defined
by rule of the department)) outside of Washington must have in his or
her possession ((valid)) documentation that the watercraft ((has been
inspected and found)) is free of aquatic invasive species. The
department must develop and maintain rules to implement this subsection
(3)(b), including specifying allowable forms of documentation.
(c) The department is authorized to require persons transporting
recreational and commercial watercraft to stop at check stations.
Check stations must be plainly marked by signs, operated by at least
one uniformed fish and wildlife officer, and operated in a safe manner.
(d) Any person stopped at a check station who possesses a
recreational or commercial watercraft that ((has been used in any
designated aquatic invasive species state or foreign country as defined
by rule of the department, or that)) is contaminated with aquatic
invasive species, must bear the expense for any necessary impoundment,
transportation, cleaning, and decontamination of the watercraft.
(e) Any person stopped at a check station who possesses a
recreational or commercial watercraft that ((has been used in any
designated aquatic invasive species state or foreign country as defined
by rule of the department, or that)) is contaminated with aquatic
invasive species, is exempt from the criminal penalties found in RCW
77.15.253 and 77.15.290, and forfeiture under RCW 77.15.070, if that
person complies with all department directives for the proper
decontamination of the watercraft ((and equipment)).
(4) The department shall submit a biennial report to the
appropriate legislative committees describing the actions taken to
implement this section along with suggestions on how to better fulfill
the intent of chapter 464, Laws of 2005.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.160 and 2012 c 176 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts are infractions and must be cited and punished
as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW:
(1) Fishing and shellfishing infractions:
(a) Barbed hooks: Fishing for personal use with barbed hooks in
violation of any department rule.
(b) Catch recording: Failing to immediately record a catch of fish
or shellfish on a catch record card as required by RCW 77.32.430 or
department rule.
(c) Catch reporting: Failing to return a catch record card to the
department for other than Puget Sound Dungeness crab, as required by
department rule.
(d) Recreational fishing: Fishing for fish or shellfish and,
without yet possessing fish or shellfish, the person:
(i) Owns, but fails to have in the person's possession the license
or the catch record card required by chapter 77.32 RCW for such an
activity; or
(ii) Violates any department rule regarding seasons, closed areas,
closed times, or any other rule addressing the manner or method of
fishing for fish or shellfish. This subsection does not apply to use
of a net to take fish under RCW 77.15.580 or the unlawful use of
shellfish gear for personal use under RCW 77.15.382.
(e) Seaweed: Taking, possessing, or harvesting less than two times
the daily possession limit of seaweed:
(i) While owning, but not having in the person's possession, the
license required by chapter 77.32 RCW; or
(ii) In violation of any rule of the department or the department
of natural resources regarding seasons, closed areas, closed times, or
any other rule addressing the manner or method of taking, possessing,
or harvesting of seaweed.
(f) Unclassified fish or shellfish: Taking unclassified fish or
shellfish in violation of any department rule by killing, fishing,
taking, holding, possessing, or maliciously injuring or harming fish or
shellfish that is not classified as game fish, food fish, shellfish,
protected fish, or endangered fish.
(g) Wasting fish or shellfish: Killing, taking, or possessing fish
or shellfish having a value of less than two hundred fifty dollars and
allowing the fish or shellfish to be wasted.
(2) Hunting infractions:
(a) Eggs or nests: Maliciously, and without permit authorization,
destroying, taking, or harming the eggs or active nests of a wild bird
not classified as endangered or protected. For purposes of this
subsection, "active nests" means nests that contain eggs or fledglings.
(b) Unclassified wildlife: Taking unclassified wildlife in
violation of any department rule by killing, hunting, taking, holding,
possessing, or maliciously injuring or harming wildlife that is not
classified as big game, game animals, game birds, protected wildlife,
or endangered wildlife.
(c) Wasting wildlife: Killing, taking, or possessing wildlife that
is not classified as big game and has a value of less than two hundred
fifty dollars, and allowing the wildlife to be wasted.
(d) Wild animals: Hunting for wild animals not classified as big
game and, without yet possessing the wild animals, the person owns, but
fails to have in the person's possession, all licenses, tags, or
permits required by this title.
(e) Wild birds: Hunting for and, without yet possessing a wild
bird or birds, the person:
(i) Owns, but fails to have in the person's possession, all
licenses, tags, stamps, and permits required under this title; or
(ii) Violates any department rule regarding seasons, closed areas,
closed times, or any other rule addressing the manner or method of
hunting wild birds.
(3) Trapping, taxidermy, fur dealing, and wildlife meat cutting
infractions:
(a) Recordkeeping and reporting: If a person is a taxidermist, fur
dealer, or wildlife meat cutter who is processing, holding, or storing
wildlife for commercial purposes, failing to:
(i) Maintain records as required by department rule; or
(ii) Report information from these records as required by
department rule.
(b) Trapper's report: Failing to report trapping activity as
required by department rule.
(4) Aquatic invasive species infraction: Entering Washington by
road and transporting a recreational or commercial watercraft that has
been used outside of Washington without meeting documentation
requirements as provided under RCW 77.12.879.
(5) Other infractions:
(a) Contests: Conducting, holding, or sponsoring a hunting
contest, a fishing contest involving game fish, or a competitive field
trial using live wildlife.
(b) Other rules: Violating any other department rule that is
designated by rule as an infraction.
(c) Posting signs: Posting signs preventing hunting or fishing on
any land not owned or leased by the person doing the posting, or
without the permission of the person who owns, leases, or controls the
land posted.
(d) Scientific permits: Using a scientific permit issued by the
director for fish, shellfish, or wildlife, but not including big game
or big game parts, and the person:
(i) Violates any terms or conditions of the scientific permit; or
(ii) Violates any department rule applicable to the issuance or use
of scientific permits.
(e) Transporting aquatic plants: Transporting aquatic plants on
any state or public road, including forest roads. However:
(i) This subsection does not apply to plants that are:
(A) Being transported to the department or to another destination
designated by the director, in a manner designated by the department,
for purposes of identifying a species or reporting the presence of a
species;
(B) Legally obtained for aquarium use, wetland or lakeshore
restoration, or ornamental purposes;
(C) Located within or on a commercial aquatic plant harvester that
is being transported to a suitable location to remove aquatic plants;
(D) Being transported in a manner that prevents their unintentional
dispersal, to a suitable location for disposal, research, or
educational purposes; or
(E) Being transported in such a way as the commission may otherwise
prescribe; and
(ii) This subsection does not apply to a person who:
(A) Is stopped at an aquatic invasive species check station and
possesses a recreational or commercial watercraft that is contaminated
with an aquatic invasive plant species if that person complies with all
department directives for the proper decontamination of the watercraft
and equipment; or
(B) Has voluntarily submitted a recreational or commercial
watercraft for inspection by the department or its designee and has
received a receipt verifying that the watercraft has not been
contaminated since its last use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 77.60.130 (Aquatic nuisance species
committee) and 2007 c 341 s 59 & 2000 c 149 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---