BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.69.180 and 2009 c 350 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Taxing districts other than the state may levy a tax upon all
the taxable property within the district for the purpose of:
(((1))) (a) Funding refunds paid or to be paid under this chapter,
except for refunds under RCW 84.69.020(1), including interest, as
ordered by the county treasurer or county legislative authority within
the preceding twelve months; and
(((2))) (b) Reimbursing the taxing district for taxes abated
((under RCW 84.70.010)) or cancelled, offset by any supplemental taxes
collected under this title, other than amounts collected under RCW
84.52.018 within the preceding twelve months. This subsection (((2)))
(1)(b) only applies to abatements and cancellations that do not require
a refund under this chapter. Abatements and cancellations that require
a refund are included within the scope of (a) of this subsection (((1)
of this section)).
(2) As provided in RCW 84.55.070, the provisions of chapter 84.55
RCW do not apply to a levy made by or for a taxing district under this
section.

--- END ---