BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall supervise the following offenders who are
sentenced to probation in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060,
9.95.204, or 9.95.210:
(a) Offenders convicted of:
(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;
(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;
(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and
(iv) Violation of RCW 9A.44.132(2) (failure to register); and
(b) Offenders who have:
(i) A current conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense
where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August 1, 2011;
and
(ii) A prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense
or domestic violence felony offense where domestic violence has been
plead and proven after August 1, 2011.
(2) Misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenders supervised by the
department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community
custody.
(3) The department shall supervise every felony offender sentenced
to community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 or 9.94A.702 whose risk
assessment classifies the offender as one who is at a high risk to
reoffend.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody
regardless of risk classification if the offender:
(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent
offense and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.701, 9.94A.702, or 9.94A.507;
(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally
ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;
(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant
to RCW 9.95.017;
(d) Has a current conviction for violating RCW 9A.44.132(1)
(failure to register) and was sentenced to a term of community custody
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701;
(e) Has a current conviction for a domestic violence felony offense
where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August 1, 2011,
and a prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense or
domestic violence felony offense where domestic violence has been plead
and proven after August 1, 2011;
(f) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, or
9.94A.670; ((or))
(g) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745; or
(h) Has been released by the indeterminate sentence review board
pursuant to section 4 of this act.
(5) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer
unless the offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is
required under this section or RCW 9.94A.5011.
(6) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every felony
offender sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to
supervision under this section or RCW 9.94A.5011.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.570 and 2000 c 28 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the statutory maximum sentence or any other
provision of this chapter and except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, a persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death. In addition, no offender subject to
this section may be eligible for community custody, earned release
time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work
release, or any other form of release as defined under RCW 9.94A.728
(((1),)) (2), (3), (((4), (6),)) (5), (7), and (8), ((or (9),)) or any
other form of authorized leave from a correctional facility while not
in the direct custody of a corrections officer or officers, except:
(((1))) (a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical
treatment; ((or (2)))
(b) For the purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment
facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of rape in
the first degree; or
(c) When authorized under sections 3 and 4 of this act and RCW
9.95.435.
(2)(a) A persistent offender shall be sentenced under this
subsection if the persistent offender does not have: (i) A prior or
current conviction for a class A felony, assault in the second degree,
or a sex offense; (ii) a federal or out-of-state conviction for an
offense that under the laws of this state would be considered a class
A felony, assault in the second degree, or a sex offense; (iii) a prior
or current conviction with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825
or 9.95.015; (iv) a federal or out-of-state conviction for which the
offender would be required to register as a sex offender while residing
in the state of conviction; (v) a federal or out-of-state conviction
that included a finding, whether as an element of the offense or for
the purpose of imposing a sentencing enhancement, that offender was
armed with a deadly weapon, with a dangerous weapon, or with a firearm,
as those terms are defined in the jurisdiction of conviction; or (vi)
a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense for which the
sentencing court imposed a sentence of incarceration, supervision, or
probation, or a combination thereof, of ten or more years.
(b) Upon a finding that the persistent offender is subject to
sentencing under (a) of this subsection, the court shall impose a
sentence to a maximum term and a minimum term. The maximum term shall
consist of a maximum sentence of life without the possibility of early
release. The minimum term shall consist of the greater of fifteen
years, the high end of the standard range for the current offense, or
an exceptional sentence above the standard range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535. An offender serving a term of confinement under this
subsection is not eligible for earned early release or any reduction in
the minimum term imposed by the court.
(c) When imposing sentence under (b) of this subsection, the court
shall, in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to community custody under the supervision of the department
and the authority of the board for any period of time the person is
released from total confinement. As part of any sentence, the court
shall also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed
by the board under chapter 9.95 RCW. After the offender has served the
mandatory minimum term in total confinement without reduction, the
board shall have the authority to conditionally release the offender
pursuant to section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall have jurisdiction over any offender in custody who:
(1) Was sentenced as a persistent offender prior to the effective date
of this section; and (2) does not have: (i) A prior or current
conviction for a class A felony, assault in the second degree, or a sex
offense; (ii) a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be considered a class A felony,
assault in the second degree, or a sex offense; (iii) a prior or
current conviction with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825 or
9.95.015; (iv) a federal or out-of-state conviction for which the
offender would be required to register as a sex offender while residing
in the state of conviction; (v) a federal or out-of-state conviction
that included a finding, whether as an element of the offense or for
the purpose of imposing a sentencing enhancement, that offender was
armed with a deadly weapon, with a dangerous weapon, or with a firearm,
as those terms are defined in the jurisdiction of conviction; or (vi)
a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense for which the
sentencing court imposed a sentence of incarceration, supervision, or
probation, or a combination thereof, of ten or more years.
Notwithstanding the terms of the judgment and sentence, after such an
offender has served fifteen years in total confinement without
reduction under sentence as a persistent offender, the board shall have
the authority to grant conditional release pursuant to section 4 of
this act. The board shall impose conditions of community custody
consistent with RCW 9.94A.703. The offender shall be under the
supervision of the department and the authority of the board for any
period of time the person is released from total confinement before the
expiration of the maximum sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall not release a persistent offender pursuant to
section 3 of this act unless in its opinion his or her rehabilitation
has been completed and he or she is a fit subject for release. The
board shall start with the presumption that the offender is to remain
in total confinement for the maximum sentence of life. The offender
may file his or her petition in writing with the board anytime after he
or she has served the minimal sentence as defined in RCW
9.94A.570(2)(b). The offender must prove by clear and convincing
evidence that his or her rehabilitation is complete and that he or she
is fit for release. The board must then find by clear and convincing
evidence that the offender has shown that he or she is completely
rehabilitated and is fit for release. The board must document its
decision in a report to the secretary. Upon denial of an offender's
petition by the board, the offender shall wait a minimum term, as set
by the board, to appear in front of the board for a subsequent release
hearing. The board shall set a minimum term, not to exceed five years
from the date on which the petition was denied, by which the board must
schedule a subsequent release hearing. The offender is not required to
submit a new petition for subsequent release hearings.
(2) Upon receipt of an offender's petition for release under this
section, the board shall make all reasonable efforts to notify by any
reasonable means any of the offender's victims for those offenses that
qualified the offender as a persistent offender. The board shall
provide notification to the victim at least thirty days prior to any
scheduled release hearing in which the offender's petition shall be
heard by the board so that the victim has the opportunity to provide
his or her input to the board on the issue of the offender's release.
The board shall consider any input provided by the victim regarding the
offender's petition.
As part of the board's reasonable efforts to notify the victim in
writing of the offender's pending petition, the board shall provide
notification in writing of the offender's petition to the prosecuting
attorney for the county in which the offender was convicted of his or
her most recent most serious offense. The board shall provide notice
to the prosecuting attorney no later than thirty days prior to any
scheduled release hearing by the board.
(3) Once the initial petition seeking release under this section
has been filed by the offender, the department shall conduct, and the
offender shall participate in, an examination of the offender prior to
each release hearing. The department shall complete an examination
within ninety days of receipt of the offender's petition, or at least
ninety days prior to any subsequently scheduled release hearings, and
provide the evaluation to the board for review. The board may consider
an offender's failure to participate in the examination in its
determination as to whether the offender should be released.
(4) If conditional release is granted, the board shall retain
jurisdiction for the remainder of the offender's life with the power to
revoke the conditional release if the offender violates the imposed
conditions. An offender released by the board shall be monitored by
the department for compliance. The board shall impose the conditions
and instructions provided for in RCW 9.94A.704 should the board decide
to release the offender. The board shall consider the department's
recommendations and may impose conditions in addition to those
recommended by the department. The board may impose or modify
conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.
(5) Whenever the board or a community corrections officer of this
state has reason to believe an offender released under subsection (1)
of this section has violated a condition of community custody or the
laws of this state, any community corrections officer may arrest or
cause the arrest and detention of the offender pending a determination
by the board whether sanctions should be imposed or the offender's
community custody should be revoked. The community corrections officer
shall report all facts and circumstances surrounding the alleged
violation to the board in a written report to the board, with
recommendations.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.95.435 and 2007 c 363 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420
violates any condition or requirement of community custody, the board
may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any
period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation and subject to the limitations of
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) If an offender released by the board under section 4 of this
act is alleged to have violated any condition or requirement of
community custody, the offender shall be transferred to confinement in
a correctional institution owned, operated by, or operated under
contract with the state while awaiting the disposition of the hearing
specified in subsection (3) of this section.
(c) If an offender released by the board under section 4 of this
act is alleged to have violated any three conditions or requirements of
community custody within a six-month period, the offender shall be
transferred to confinement in a correctional institution owned,
operated by, or operated under contract with the state while awaiting
the disposition of the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section.
(d) If an offender released by the board under section 4 of this
act is convicted of any felony offense, that offender shall be
transferred to confinement in a correctional institution owned,
operated by, or operated under contract with the state while awaiting
the disposition of the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section.
(2)(a) Following the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section, the board may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend the release
and sanction up to sixty days' confinement in a local correctional
facility for each violation, or revoke the release to community custody
whenever an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 or
section 4 of this act violates any condition or requirement of
community custody.
(b) If the board finds pursuant to the hearing specified in
subsection (3) of this section, that an offender released by the board
under section 4 of this act violated any condition or requirement of
community custody, the board may revoke the offender's conditional
release and impose the remaining portion of the offender's life
sentence. The offender may repetition the board for conditional
release pursuant to section 4 of this act after the offender has served
at least five years in total confinement, without reduction, from the
date on which the board revoked the offender's conditional release. If
the board finds that a violation of a condition or requirement of
community custody has been proved by a preponderance of the evidence,
but is not sufficient cause for revocation of the offender's release
from community custody, the board may, in its discretion, reinstate the
offender on community custody. If the board reinstates the offender on
community custody, the board may impose upon the offender sanctions
listed under (a) of this subsection as well as additional conditions or
requirements of community custody.
(c) If the board finds pursuant to the hearing specified in
subsection (3) of this section, that an offender released by the board
under section 4 of this act has violated three conditions or
requirements of community custody within a six-month period, the board
shall revoke the offender's conditional release and impose the
remaining portion of the offender's life sentence. The offender may
repetition the board for conditional release pursuant to section 4 of
this act after the offender has served at least five years in total
confinement, without reduction, from the date on which the board
revoked the offender's conditional release.
(d) If the board finds pursuant to the hearing specified in
subsection (3) of this section, that an offender released by the board
under section 4 of this act has been convicted of a most serious
offense under RCW 9.94A.030(32), the board shall revoke the offender's
conditional release and impose the remaining portion of the offender's
life sentence. These offenders shall not be eligible for release. If
the board finds that the offender has been convicted of any felony that
is not a most serious offense under RCW 9.94A.030(32), the board shall
revoke the offender's conditional release and impose the remaining
portion of the offender's life sentence. The offender may repetition
the board for conditional release pursuant to section 4 of this act
after the offender has served at least ten years in total confinement,
without reduction, from the date on which the board revoked the
offender's conditional release.
(3) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 or
section 4 of this act is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the board or a designee of the board prior to the imposition of
sanctions. The hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary
proceedings and shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The board
shall develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions
consistent with the hearing procedures and graduated sanctions
developed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.737. The board may suspend the
offender's release to community custody and confine the offender in a
correctional institution owned, operated by, or operated under contract
with the state prior to the hearing unless the offender has been
arrested and confined for a new criminal offense.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearings shall be conducted by members or designees of the
board unless the board enters into an agreement with the department to
use the hearing officers established under RCW 9.94A.737;
(b) The board shall provide the offender with findings and
conclusions which include the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The board shall notify the offender
of the right to appeal the sanction and the right to file a personal
restraint petition under court rules after the final decision of the
board;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of
notice of the violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after
notice of the violation. For offenders in total confinement, the
hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of notice of the
violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of the
violation. The board or its designee shall make a determination
whether probable cause exists to believe the violation or violations
occurred. The determination shall be made within forty-eight hours of
receipt of the allegation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the presiding hearing officer, if
the offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
(v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) be represented
by counsel if revocation of the release to community custody upon a
finding of violation is a probable sanction for the violation. The
board may not revoke the release to community custody of any offender
who was not represented by counsel at the hearing, unless the offender
has waived the right to counsel; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the presiding
hearing officer.
(5) Within seven days after the presiding hearing officer's
decision, the offender may appeal the decision to the full board or to
a panel of three reviewing examiners designated by the chair of the
board or by the chair's designee. The sanction shall be reversed or
modified if a majority of the panel finds that the sanction was not
reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The crime of
conviction; (b) the violation committed; (c) the offender's risk of
reoffending; or (d) the safety of the community.
(6) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

--- END ---