BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Currently more than a million homes
nationwide and approximately fifty thousand homes in Washington state
are heated with wood pellets, or densified biomass, in modern high-efficiency appliances. This residential use establishes that many
homeowners experience significant cost savings compared to other fossil
fuel-based heating systems and that this technology can have a wide and
varied acceptance. Bulk delivery that can be facilitated by large
volume anchor users such as schools, institutions, and businesses could
provide the next step in making this form of renewable energy
utilization more efficient and convenient for the consumer. The
legislature makes the following findings:
(1) That manufactured and direct thermal conversion of densified
biomass is a renewable energy activity;
(2) That much of western Europe, China, Japan, and other Asian
countries have chosen to use renewable densified biomass as a renewable
energy fuel to heat homes, businesses, and other facilities;
(3) That clean burning, renewable densified biomass will: (a) Lead
our country to energy independence; (b) create jobs; (c) stimulate our
economy by keeping more of our money circulating in the United States;
(d) reduce carbon emissions; (e) improve air quality in noncompliant
air sheds; (f) promote healthy forests; and (g) reduce the volume of
waste in landfills; that the densified biomass industry will be
complimentary to other biofuel industries, providing an outlet and use
for the resultant high lignin by-products and agriculture residuals;
and
(4) That a December 2012 report by the Washington State University
energy program identified opportunities to develop and expand the in-state manufacturing of densified biomass.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to have the
Washington State University energy program conduct a pilot program to
demonstrate the feasibility of using densified biomass as a renewable
energy source to heat schools and other buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to receiving federal and private
funds for this purpose, by December 1, 2013, the Washington State
University energy program must develop and initiate a pilot program to
demonstrate the feasibility of using densified biomass to heat public
schools. One public school must be chosen for the pilot program, using
the following criteria: The school's proximity to a currently
operating densified biomass manufacturing facility, the age and
condition of the school's current heating system, and the school's
design is of a nature that most resembles other schools of its class.
The pilot program must consist of the following: The replacement of
the school's current heating system with one that uses densified
biomass as a fuel; the measurement and evaluation of the heating
system, including a cost comparison with other conventional fuels; and
the measurement of emissions from the heating system. A second public
school must be chosen for the pilot program from a rural county
bordering Hood Canal, the Olympic National Park, and southern Puget
Sound.
(2) By December 31, 2015, the Washington State University energy
program must summarize and report its findings to the legislature. The
report must include an analysis extrapolating the results to other
similarly situated schools in the state.
(3) In designing the pilot program, the Washington State University
energy program must seek to leverage other existing private and federal
funding programs and resources.
(4) The Washington State University energy program may contract
with other entities for assistance in implementing the pilot program.
(5) The pilot program expires December 15, 2015.

--- END ---