BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.050 and 1997 c 338 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of reckless endangerment when he or she
recklessly engages in conduct not amounting to drive-by shooting but
that creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to
another person.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is
guilty of reckless endangerment if the person stores or leaves a loaded
firearm in a location where the person knows, or reasonably should
know, that a child is likely to gain access, and a child obtains
possession of the loaded firearm.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply if:
(a) The firearm is secured in a locked box, gun safe, other secure
locked storage space, or secured with a lock or any device that
prevents the firearm from discharging;
(b) The child's access to the firearm is supervised by an adult;
(c) The child's access to the firearm was obtained as a result of
an unlawful entry; or
(d) The child's access to the firearm was in accordance with RCW
9.41.042.
(4) If a death or serious injury occurs as a result of an alleged
violation of subsection (2) of this section, the prosecuting attorney
may decline to prosecute, even though technically sufficient evidence
to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would serve no
public purpose, would defeat the purpose of the law in question, or
would result in decreased respect for the law.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Child" means a person under the age of twelve years; and
(b) The definitions in RCW 9.41.010 apply throughout this section.
(6) Nothing in this section shall mandate how or where a firearm
must be stored.
(7) Reckless endangerment is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---