BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.090 and 2011 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district, in coordination with colleges,
within a regional area, shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training, and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger
attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include
implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200 based on the community and technical college system's role
and mission. The master plan shall also contain measurable performance
indicators and benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the
goals and priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines and consolidating district structures to form multiple
campus districts consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW
28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make
such changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education;
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW;
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges;
(d) Standard admission policies;
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support; and
(f) Common student identifiers such that once a student has
enrolled at any community or technical college he or she retains the
same student identification upon transfer to any college district;
(8) Encourage colleges to use multiple measures to determine
whether a student must enroll in a precollege course including, but not
limited to, placement tests, the SAT, high school transcripts, college
transcripts, or initial class performance, and require colleges to post
all the available options for course placement on their web site and in
their admissions materials;
(9) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(((9))) (10) Encourage innovation in the development of new
educational and training programs and instructional methods; coordinate
research efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(((10))) (11) Exercise any other powers, duties and
responsibilities necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(((11))) (12) Authorize the various community and technical
colleges to offer programs and courses in other districts when it
determines that such action is consistent with the purposes set forth
in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended;
(((12))) (13) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding
the sale of state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all
interest in any community and technical college real and personal
property, except such property as is received by a college district in
accordance with RCW 28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such
property is surplus or that such a sale or exchange is in the best
interests of the community and technical college system;
(((13))) (14) In order that the treasurer for the state board for
community and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW
28B.50.085 may make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor
warrants drawn by the state board providing for an initial advance on
July 1, 1982, of the current biennium and on July 1st of each
succeeding biennium from the state general fund in an amount equal to
twenty-four percent of the average monthly allotment for such budgeted
biennium expenditures for the state board for community and technical
colleges as certified by the office of financial management; and at the
conclusion of such initial month and for each succeeding month of any
biennium, the state treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and
reported monthly by the state board treasurer in accordance with
chapter 43.88 RCW: PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board
for actual expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium
shall be less the initial advance made in such biennium;
(((14))) (15) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (((12)))
(13) of this section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances,
devises, and bequests of real or personal property from private sources
as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the
terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and
technical college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or
expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof
according to the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to
govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and
income thereof; and
(((15))) (16) The college board shall have the power of eminent
domain.

--- END ---