BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a decision is being considered to change an existing
degree program that is supported by state funding to a program that is
self-supporting and fee-based, the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall:
(a) Notify enrolled undergraduate or graduate student government
associations at least six months before implementation with an estimate
of tuition and fees;
(b) Publicly notify prospective students, including notification in
admissions offers with an estimate of tuition and fees; and
(c) Allow students currently enrolled in the program to continue in
the state-supported program structure for a consecutive amount of time
no greater than four years in length.
(2) The state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College shall each establish or designate a committee
composed of administrators, faculty, and students to create criteria
upon which to evaluate, before a decision is made, the proposed shift
of a degree program from a state-supported degree program to a self-supporting funding basis. Where possible, an existing budget or
advisory committee shall be designated in lieu of establishing a new
committee.
(3) When establishing evaluation criteria, the committee shall
consider including the following:
(a) Financial health and sustainability of the program;
(b) If moving the program to a self-sustaining funding basis alters
the availability of student financial aid;
(c) The audience for the program, the format of the program, and
the institutional priority for state funding of the program;
(d) Demographics of students served and graduates practicing in
typical fields of study; and
(e) Alternatives to shifting to a self-sustaining funding basis,
including raising tuition within the state-funded context or program
elimination.
(4) The committee that creates the criteria for moving a degree
from state-supported to self-supporting, fee-based program may also
establish a process to periodically evaluate programs that have shifted
from a state-supported program to a fee-based funding model for
alignment with the criteria established.

--- END ---