BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For each capital appropriation bill considered by the full body
or fiscal committees of either chamber of the legislature it must be
accompanied by a summary of capital appropriations by legislative
district.
(2) The summary of capital appropriations by legislative district
must include the following categories for each legislative district:
(a) The total level of all appropriations;
(b) The level of appropriations attributable to competitive loan
programs;
(c) The level of appropriations to state agency projects;
(d) The level of appropriations to state institutions of higher
education; and
(e) The level of all other appropriations which are attributable to
an individual district.
(3) The summary of capital appropriations required by this section
must include the percent of total capital appropriations each
legislative district would receive.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a capital appropriation bill
includes the original capital appropriations bill filed by a member of
the house or the senate, any substitute bill, and any striking
amendment.

--- END ---