BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.142 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 408 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may
purchase services, including services that have been customarily and
historically provided by employees in the classified service under this
chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, employee business units, or other entities if the following
criteria are met:
(a) The invitation for bid or request for proposal contains
measurable standards for the performance of the contract;
(b) Employees in the classified service whose positions or work
would be displaced by the contract are provided an opportunity to offer
alternatives to purchasing services by contract and, if these
alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract under
competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The contract with an entity other than an employee business
unit includes a provision requiring the entity to consider employment
of state employees who may be displaced by the contract;
(d) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract
performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other contract
standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet those standards;
and
(e) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
determined that the contract results in savings or efficiency
improvements. The contracting agency must consider the consequences
and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by the
contractor.
(2) Any provision contrary to or in conflict with this section in
any collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 2005, is not
effective beyond the expiration date of the agreement.
(3) Contracting for services that is expressly mandated by the
legislature or was authorized by law prior to July 1, 2005, including
contracts and agreements between public entities, shall not be subject
to the processes set forth in subsections (1), (4), and (5) of this
section.
(4) Competitive contracting shall be implemented as follows:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the date the contracting agency
requests bids from private entities for a contract for services
provided by classified employees, the contracting agency shall notify
the classified employees whose positions or work would be displaced by
the contract. The employees shall have sixty days from the date of
notification to offer alternatives to purchasing services by contract,
and the agency shall consider the alternatives before requesting bids.
(b) If the employees decide to compete for the contract, they shall
notify the contracting agency of their decision. Employees must form
one or more employee business units for the purpose of submitting a bid
or bids to perform the services.
(c) The department of enterprise services, with the advice and
assistance of the office of financial management, shall develop and
make available to employee business units training in the bidding
process and general bid preparation.
(d) The director of enterprise services, with the advice and
assistance of the office of financial management, shall, by rule,
establish procedures to ensure that bids are submitted and evaluated in
a fair and objective manner and that there exists a competitive market
for the service. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
Prohibitions against participation in the bid evaluation process by
employees who prepared the business unit's bid or who perform any of
the services to be contracted; (ii) provisions to ensure no bidder
receives an advantage over other bidders and that bid requirements are
applied equitably to all parties; and (iii) procedures that require the
contracting agency to receive complaints regarding the bidding process
and to consider them before awarding the contract. Appeal of an
agency's actions under this subsection is an adjudicative proceeding
and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, with the final decision to be rendered by
an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.
(e) An employee business unit's bid must include the fully
allocated costs of the service, including the cost of the employees'
salaries and benefits, space, equipment, materials, and other costs
necessary to perform the function. An employee business unit's cost
shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless those
costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and would
not exist if that function were not performed in state service.
(f) A department, agency, or institution of higher education may
contract with the department of enterprise services to conduct the
bidding process.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee business unit" means a group of employees who perform
services to be contracted under this section and who submit a bid for
the performance of those services under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) "Indirect overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing
agency administrative salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs,
utilities, and materials associated with those administrative
functions.
(c) "Competitive contracting" means the process by which classified
employees of a department, agency, or institution of higher education
compete with businesses, individuals, nonprofit organizations, or other
entities for contracts authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The processes set forth in subsections (1), (4), and (5) of
this section do not apply to:
(a) RCW 74.13.031(((5))) (6);
(b) The acquisition of printing services by a state agency; and
(c) Contracting for services or activities by the department of
enterprise services under RCW 43.19.008 and the department may continue
to contract for such services and activities after June 30, 2018.
(7) The processes set forth in subsections (1), (4), and (5) of
this section do not apply to the consolidated technology services
agency and the department of enterprise services when contracting for
services or activities as follows:
(a) Contracting for services and activities that are necessary to
establish, operate, or manage the state data center, including
architecture, design, engineering, installation, and operation of the
facility that are approved by the technology services board created in
RCW 43.41A.070.
(b) Contracting for services and activities recommended by the
chief information officer through a business plan and approved by the
technology services board created in RCW 43.41A.070. For the
department of enterprise services, contracting that may be recommended
by the chief information officer and approved by the technology
services board is limited to services and activities that support
enterprise technology applications.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.41A.075 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 716 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(1) To review and approve standards and procedures, developed by
the office of the chief information officer, governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(2) To review and approve statewide or interagency technical
policies, standards, and procedures developed by the office of the
chief information officer;
(3) To review, approve, and provide oversight of major information
technology projects to ensure that no major information technology
project proposed by a state agency is approved or authorized funding by
the board without consideration of the technical and financial business
case for the project, including a review of:
(a) The total cost of ownership across the life of the project;
(b) All major technical options and alternatives analyzed, and
reviewed, if necessary, by independent technical sources; and
(c) Whether the project is technically and financially justifiable
when compared against the state's enterprise-based strategy, long-term
technology trends, and existing or potential partnerships with private
providers or vendors;
(4) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and
incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications
system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public
through public affairs programming;
(5) To develop a policy to determine whether a proposed project,
product, or service should undergo an independent technical and
financial analysis prior to submitting a request to the office of
financial management for the inclusion in any proposed operating,
capital, or transportation budget;
(6) To approve contracting for services and activities under RCW
41.06.142(7) for the consolidated technology service agency and the
department of enterprise services. To approve any service or activity
to be contracted under RCW 41.06.142(7)(b), the board must also review
the proposed business plan and recommendation submitted by the office;
(7) To consider, on an ongoing basis, ways to promote strategic
investments in enterprise-level information technology projects that
will result in service improvements and cost efficiency;
(8) To provide a forum to solicit external expertise and
perspective on developments in information technology, enterprise
architecture, standards, and policy development; and
(9) To provide a forum where ideas and issues related to
information technology plans, policies, and standards can be reviewed.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.008 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 104 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The executive powers and management of the department shall be
administered as described in this section.
(2) The executive head and appointing authority of the department
is the director. The director is appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate. The director serves at the pleasure of the
governor. The director is paid a salary fixed by the governor in
accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position of
director while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a
temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate at which
time he or she shall present to that body his or her nomination for the
position.
(3) The director may employ staff members, who are exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter, and such other duties as may be authorized by
law. The director may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her
by chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. or other law, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The internal affairs of the department are under the control of
the director in order that the director may manage the department in a
flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary
circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the director has
complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The
director may create the administrative structures as the director deems
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the director may
employ personnel as may be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06
RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.
(5) Until June 30, 2018, at the beginning of each fiscal biennium,
the office of financial management shall conduct a review of the
programs and services that are performed by the department to determine
whether the program or service may be performed by the private sector
in a more cost-efficient ((and)) or effective manner than being
performed by the department. In conducting this review, the office of
financial management shall:
(a) Examine the existing activities currently being performed by
the department, including but not limited to an examination of services
for their performance, staffing, capital requirements, and mission.
Programs may be broken down into discrete services or activities or
reviewed as a whole; and
(b) Examine the activities to determine which specific services are
available in the marketplace and what potential for efficiency gains or
savings exist.
(i) As part of the review in this subsection (5), the office of
financial management shall select up to six activities or services that
have been determined as an activity that may be provided by the private
sector in a cost-effective ((and)) or efficient manner, including for
the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium the bulk printing services and for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium the motor pool vehicle fleet management,
custodial services, and one service for which the department of
enterprise services has previously contracted for a portion of the
service. The office of financial management may consult with affected
industry stakeholders in making its decision on which activities to
contract for services. Priority for selection shall be given to agency
activities or services that are significant, ongoing functions.
(ii) The office of financial management must consider the
consequences and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance
by the contractor.
(iii) For each of the selected activities, the department shall use
a request for information, request for proposal, or other procurement
process to determine if a contract for the activity would result in the
activity being provided at a reduced cost ((and)) or with greater
efficiency.
(iv) The request for information, request for proposal, or other
procurement process must contain measurable standards for the
performance of the contract.
(v) The department may contract with one or more vendors to provide
the service as a result of the procurement process.
(vi) If the office of financial management determines via the
procurement process that the activity cannot be provided by the private
sector at a reduced cost ((and)) or greater efficiency, the department
of enterprise services may cancel the procurement without entering into
a contract and shall promptly notify the legislative fiscal committees
of such a decision.
(vii) The department of enterprise services, in consultation with
the office of financial management, must establish a contract
monitoring process to measure contract performance, costs, service
delivery quality, and other contract standards, and to cancel contracts
that do not meet those standards. No contracts may be renewed without
a review of these measures.
(viii) The office of financial management shall prepare a biennial
report summarizing the results of the examination of the agency's
programs and services. In addition to the programs and services
examined and the result of the examination, the report shall provide
information on any procurement process that does not result in a
contract for the services. During each regular legislative session
held in odd-numbered years, the legislative fiscal committees shall
hold a public hearing on the report and the department's activities
under this section.
(ix) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
an audit of the implementation of this subsection (5), and report to
the legislature by January 1, 2018, on the results of the audit. The
report must include an estimate of additional costs or savings to
taxpayers as a result of the contracting out provisions.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.41A.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 706 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief information officer shall establish standards and
policies to govern information technology in the state of Washington.
(2) The office shall have the following powers and duties related
to information services:
(a) To develop statewide standards and policies governing the
acquisition and disposition of equipment, software, and personal and
purchased services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of
state agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(c) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services;
(d) To develop or approve a detailed business plan for any service
or activity to be contracted under RCW 41.06.142(7)(b) by the
consolidated technology services agency or department of enterprise
services;
(e) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The office shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary; and
(f) To establish policies for the periodic review by the office of
agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management.
(3) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The office shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems; and
(b) Require agencies to include an evaluation of electronic public
access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of
systems.
In developing these standards, the office is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(4) The office shall perform other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---