BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.61.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, ((the term))
"passenger-carrying vehicle," as used in this chapter, means those
cars, vans, minivans, utility vehicles, buses ((and)), trucks, and any
other motorized vehicles that are owned, operated, and maintained by a
railroad company, or any of the company's agents, contractors,
subcontractors, or vendors, which transports railroad employees in
((other than the cab of)) such vehicles and designed primarily for
operation on roads which may or may not be equipped with retractable
flanged wheels for operation on railroad tracks.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.61.020 and 2007 c 234 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The utilities and transportation commission shall adopt rules
and orders necessary to ensure that every passenger-carrying vehicle
provided by a railroad company to transport employees in the course of
their employment is maintained, adequately insured, and operated in a
safe manner when it is used on a public or private road. The rules and
orders must establish minimum standards for:
(((1))) (a) The construction and mechanical equipment of the
passenger-carrying vehicles, including the appropriate makes and models
of vehicles depending upon class of service and use, maximum life span
of vehicles, maintenance, periodic inspections, lighting devices and
reflectors, exhaust system, rear vision mirrors, service and parking
brakes, steering mechanisms, tires, warning and signaling devices,
windshield wipers, and heating equipment capable of maintaining a
reasonable temperature in passenger areas;
(((2))) (b) The operation of passenger-carrying vehicles, including
driving rules, the loading and carrying of passengers, maximum daily
hours of service by drivers, ((minimum age and skill of drivers,
physical condition of drivers,)) refueling, road warning devices,
((and)) the transportation of gasoline and explosives, and the stowage
of personal belongings, luggage, materials, and equipment;
(((3))) (c) The qualification of drivers, including a driver's
minimum age, skill, and physical condition, alcohol and drug testing
standards, minimum qualifications, appropriate class of commercial
driver's license, initial and ongoing training programs that include
regular testing, licensing classification status, and driving history.
A person is immediately and automatically disqualified to work as a
driver if the person's license is suspended or revoked two or more
times within a three-year period. The disqualification must last for
two years from the most recent license suspension or revocation;
(d) The safety of passengers in a passenger-carrying vehicle,
including emergency exits, fire extinguishers, first aid kits,
facilities for communication between cab and rear compartments,
sanitation, means of ingress and egress, side walls, canopy, tail
gates, seating including safety headrests for all passengers, safety
belts, air bags, or other means of retaining passengers within the
passenger-carrying vehicle;
(e) A mandatory notification and corrective action system between
transportation operators, their passengers, and the railroad companies,
which enables passengers to report and document incidents, unsafe
practices, dangerous conditions, and their concerns regarding the
capability, safety, and conduct of drivers. This system must also
require that, upon receipt of such notice, the transportation operator
or railroad company investigate the complaint and take appropriate
corrective action, based upon the seriousness of the misconduct, to
protect the safety of passengers;
(f) The acquisition, maintenance, and reporting of proof to the
commission of an adequate insurance policy held by agents, contractors,
subcontractors, or vendors of the railroad company. The commission
must adopt rules requiring the disclosure of the insurance policy to
drivers, passengers, and any of their labor organizations. The
insurance policy must:
(i) Include liability, property, uninsured, and underinsured
motorist coverage;
(ii) Cover railroad employees' loss of income or career and
employees' personal property, as well as damages or loss to both public
and private property; and
(iii) At a minimum, be in the sum of five million dollars for any
recovery for death or personal injury by one person, ten million
dollars for recovery by all persons injured by a single act of
negligence, and five hundred thousand dollars for damage to property.
(2) A railroad company, as well as its agents, contractors,
subcontractors, or vendors, shall retain for a time period of at least
three years all operational records, including vehicle records
involving accidents, maintenance and service records, drivers' records,
records of passenger complaints, all notification and corrective action
documentation, employment actions, driver logs, and records of
passengers transported.
(3) The commission shall investigate a passenger complaint
submitted under subsection (1)(e) of this section when it is alleged
that the complaint has been inadequately investigated or resolved, or
both, by the transportation operator or railroad company, or both. The
commission may take appropriate corrective action, including sanctions
under subsection (4) of this section, to protect the safety of
passengers.
(4) When a railroad company or its agent, contractor,
subcontractor, or vendor violates this section or rules adopted under
this section, the commission may sanction the violator. When the
commission deems it appropriate, the commission may impose such
sanctions jointly upon the violator and railroad company or upon the
railroad company alone, if the railroad company has been notified of
repeated violations.
(5) The commission may suspend or revoke the business or
operational license of any agent, contractor, subcontractor, or vendor
of a railroad company for serious or repeated violations of this
section or rules adopted under this section.

--- END ---