BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that commercial
transportation upon railroads is a critical aspect of the state's
economic well-being, and that public safety, together with the safety
of workers and passengers, is essential to the railroad system. The
legislature further finds that a patchwork of oversight authority,
split among various regulatory agencies and local governments,
undermines efficiency, oversight, and enforcement of railroad
operations and safety laws. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to direct the utilities and transportation commission to
develop a plan through which the commission will consolidate and assume
authority over all Washington state railroad operations, programs,
regulations, safety, and security to the maximum extent permitted by
federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 81.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission must exercise all powers and duties in relation to
(1) the inspection of tracks, bridges, tunnels, structures, equipment,
apparatus, and appliances of railroads with respect to the safety of
employees and the public and (2) the administration and enforcement of
all laws providing for the protection of the public and employees of
railroads which prior to April 1, 1955, were vested in and required to
be performed by the director of labor and industries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 81.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2013, the commission must develop a plan to
consolidate and assume regulatory authority over railroad operations,
programs, regulations, and safety to the maximum extent permitted by
federal law. The commission must consult with the department of
transportation, the department of labor and industries, local
authorities, federal agencies, and representatives from railroads and
their labor organizations to determine the most comprehensive and
efficient process to develop the plan required under this section.
(2) The department of transportation and the department of labor
and industries must cooperate fully with the commission in the
development of the plan required under this section. The commission
must consult with local authorities and federal agencies to determine
what areas of authority over railroad safety may be completely assumed
by the commission and what areas of safety must be jointly shared under
chapter 49.17 RCW. The commission may not plan to assume authority
over any program where such an assumption disqualifies the state, or
any political subdivision of the state, from receiving federal funds.
(3) The commission's plan must:
(a) Prioritize the safety of railroad workers and the public;
(b) Consolidate within the commission operational and programmatic
authority over all passenger and freight railroad activities currently
existing within the department of transportation;
(c) Consolidate within the commission regulatory authority over all
railroad matters, including safety and operations, to the maximum
extent permitted by federal law;
(d) Facilitate communication between employees and regulatory
agencies to notify the agencies of safety concerns;
(e) Require communication among agencies regarding regulatory
authority that may not be transferred to the commission from another
agency or jurisdiction;
(f) Calculate the expense and any potential savings that will
result from reorganizing and consolidating regulatory and operational
oversight; and
(g) Identify sources of revenue to cover any additional expenses.
(4) In developing the plan required under this section, the
commission may, when appropriate, consult with individuals from the
public or private sector if such consultation is necessary for the
commission to achieve the goals listed in subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) By December 1, 2013, the commission must submit to the
legislature a final report with its findings and recommendations, along
with draft legislation to implement the plan developed by the
commission.
(6) By December 1, 2014, and annually thereafter, the commission
must submit to the legislature an interim report on its progress in
implementing the plan required under this section.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 81.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission must:
(1) Increase the number of qualified, expert, and federalized
railroad safety and operational inspectors to an adequate level
compared to other west coast states based on the railroad volume and
number of railroad employees;
(2) Assume authority for all railroad walkway and footpath safety
issues both inside and outside of railroad yards, as well as for
railroad station platforms;
(3) Review and enhance the current state of railroad walkway
regulations to provide improved safety conditions for railroad workers,
including minimum walkway standards for common and frequent crew
changes and train inspection locations along railroad mainline rights-of-way;
(4) Adopt rules regarding adequate lighting in railroad yards and
at common and frequent crew changes and train inspection locations
along railroad mainline rights-of-way;
(5) Adopt rules regarding the maximum human force required to
utilize hand-operated switches and derails in foot-pounds, as well as
ergonomics, adequate maintenance, and proper lubrication to prevent
injuries to railroad workers who utilize such appliances;
(6) Develop and enforce regulations regarding areas and
obstructions that pose a hazard to the public or railroad workers,
including obstructive vegetation at crossings and fences, as well as
addressing public safety issues regarding railroad trackage in public
parks, on paths, and walkway areas of frequent pedestrian use;
(7) Provide class II and class III shortline railroads and logging
railroads relief from burdensome regulations based on lower freight
volume or revenue, or both, provided that significant employee and
public safety hazards are minimized;
(8) Review, and enhance and strengthen when appropriate, fines and
penalties for violations of laws and regulations by railroad carriers.
The commission may develop a reduced fine schedule for smaller class II
and class III shortline operations with low freight volumes or revenue,
or both, and small logging railroads; and
(9) Develop and enforce safety and operational regulations for
logging railroads operating within the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or repealed or under any rule or order adopted under those sections,
nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---