BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization, as defined in
RCW 9.46.0209, whose primary purpose is serving individuals with
intellectual disabilities may conduct enhanced raffles if licensed by
the commission.
(2) The commission has the authority to approve two enhanced
raffles per calendar year for western Washington and two enhanced
raffles per calendar year for eastern Washington. Whether the enhanced
raffle occurs in western Washington or eastern Washington will be
determined by the location where the grand prize winning ticket is to
be drawn as stated on the organization's application to the commission.
An enhanced raffle is considered approved when voted on by the
commission.
(3) The commission has the authority to approve enhanced raffles
under the following conditions:
(a) The value of the grand prize must not exceed five million
dollars.
(b) Sales may be made in person, by mail, by fax, or by telephone
only.
(c) Tickets purchased as part of a multiple ticket package may be
purchased at a discount.
(d) Multiple smaller prizes are authorized during the course of an
enhanced raffle for a grand prize including, but not limited to, early
bird, refer a friend, and multiple ticket drawings.
(e) A purchase contract is not necessary for smaller noncash
prizes, but the bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization must be
able to demonstrate that such a prize is available and sufficient funds
are held in reserve in the event that the winner chooses a noncash
prize.
(f) All enhanced raffles and associated smaller raffles must be
independently audited, as defined by the commission during rule making.
The audit results must be reported to the commission.
(g) Call centers, when licensed by the commission, are authorized.
The bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization may contract with a
call center vendor to receive enhanced raffle ticket sales. The vendor
may not solicit sales. The vendor may be located outside the state,
but the bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization must have a
contractual relationship with the vendor stating that the vendor must
comply with all applicable Washington state laws and rules.
(h) The bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization must be the
primary recipient of the funds raised.
(i) Sales data may be transmitted electronically from the vendor to
the bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization. Credit cards,
issued by a state regulated or federally regulated financial
institution, may be used for payment to participate in enhanced
raffles.
(j) Receipts including ticket confirmation numbers may be sent to
ticket purchasers either by mail or by e-mail.
(k) In the event the bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization
determines ticket sales are insufficient to qualify for a complete
enhanced raffle to move forward, the enhanced raffle winner must
receive fifty percent of the net proceeds in excess of expenses as the
grand prize. The enhanced raffle winner will receive a choice between
an annuity value equal to fifty percent of the net proceeds in excess
of expenses paid by annuity over twenty years, or a one-time cash
payment of seventy percent of the annuity value.
(l) A bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization is authorized
to hire a consultant licensed by the commission to run an enhanced
raffle; in addition, the bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization
must have a dedicated employee who is responsible for oversight of
enhanced raffle operations. The bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization is ultimately responsible for ensuring that an enhanced
raffle is conducted in accordance with all applicable state laws and
rules.
(4) The commission has the authority to set fees for bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organizations, call center vendors, and
consultants conducting enhanced raffles authorized under this section.
(5) The commission has the authority to adopt rules governing the
licensing and operation of enhanced raffles.
(6) Except as specifically authorized in this section, enhanced
raffles must be held in accordance with all other requirements of this
chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the commission.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Enhanced raffle" means a game in which tickets bearing an
individual number are sold for not more than two hundred fifty dollars
each and in which a grand prize and smaller prizes are awarded on the
basis of drawings from the tickets by the person or persons conducting
the game. An enhanced raffle may include additional related entries
and drawings, such as early bird, refer a friend, and multiple ticket
drawings when the bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization
establishes the eligibility standards for such entries and drawings
before any enhanced raffle tickets are sold. No drawing may occur by
using a random number generator or similar means.
(b) "Early bird drawing" means a separate drawing for a separate
prize held prior to the grand prize drawing. All tickets entered into
the early bird drawing, including all early bird winning tickets, are
entered into subsequent early bird drawings, and also entered into the
drawing for the grand prize.
(c) "Refer a friend drawing" means a completely separate drawing,
using tickets distinct from those for the enhanced raffle, for a
separate prize held at the conclusion of the enhanced raffle for all
enhanced raffle ticket purchasers, known as the referring friend, who
refer other persons to the enhanced raffle when the other person
ultimately purchases an enhanced raffle ticket. The referring friend
will receive one ticket for each friend referred specifically for the
refer a friend drawing. In addition, each friend referred could also
become a referring friend and receive his or her own additional ticket
for the refer a friend drawing.
(d) "Multiple ticket drawing" means a completely separate drawing,
using tickets distinct from those for the enhanced raffle, for a
separate prize held at the conclusion of the enhanced raffle for all
enhanced raffle ticket purchasers who purchase a specified number of
enhanced raffle tickets. For example, a multiple ticket drawing could
include persons who purchase three or more enhanced raffle tickets in
the same order, using the same payment information, with tickets in the
same person's name. For each eligible enhanced raffle ticket purchased,
the purchaser also receives a ticket for the multiple ticket drawing
prize.
(e) "Western Washington" includes those counties west of the
Cascade mountains, including Clallam, Clark, Cowlitz, Grays Harbor,
Island, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Lewis, Mason, Pacific, Pierce, San
Juan, Skagit, Skamania, Snohomish, Thurston, Wahkiakum, and Whatcom.
(f) "Eastern Washington" includes those counties east of the
Cascade mountains that are not listed in (e) of this subsection.
(8) By December 2017, the commission must report back to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on enhanced raffles. The
report must include results of the raffles, revenue generated by the
raffles, and identify any state or federal regulatory actions taken in
relation to enhanced raffles in Washington. The report must also make
recommendations, if any, for policy changes to the enhanced raffle
authority.
(9) This section expires June 30, 2017.

--- END ---