BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics,
upon all public works and under all public building service maintenance
contracts of the state or any county, municipality, or political
subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the prevailing
rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the
locality within the state where such labor is performed. For a
contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to
pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily
visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road
construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley
improvement projects for which no field office is needed or
established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage
statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete,
or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the
wage statement to any employee on request:
(((1))) (a) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(((2))) (b) The address and telephone number of the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries where a
complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.
(2) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Workers or other persons regularly employed by the state, or
any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws;
or
(b) Public works projects located in distressed counties when at
least fifty percent of the funding for the project has come from one or
more private sources. For the purposes of this subsection, distressed
county means any county which has an unemployment rate which is twenty
percent above the state average for the immediately previous three
years, as determined annually by the employment security department.
Public works projects are exempt under this subsection if the county
appears on the annual distressed county list on the date the project
was advertised for bid. If the public works project is not subject to
bidding requirements, the exemption under this subsection will apply if
the county appears on the annual distressed county list on the date the
contract for the project is executed. An exemption under this
subsection shall remain in effect through completion of the project.

--- END ---