BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.190 and 2009 c 564 s 949 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unclaimed prizes ((shall)) must be retained in the state lottery
account for the person entitled thereto for one hundred eighty days
after the drawing in which the prize is won, or after the official end
of the game for instant prizes. If no claim is made for the prize
within this time, all rights to the prize ((shall be)) are
extinguished, and the prize ((shall be)) is retained in the state
lottery fund for further use as prizes, except that one-third of all
unclaimed prize money ((shall)) must be deposited in the economic
development strategic reserve account created in RCW 43.330.250, and
for each of fiscal years 2013-2014 and 2014-2015, two hundred fifty
thousand dollars must be deposited in the student child care in higher
education account created in RCW 28B.135.010 to the extent that these
funds are provided in the omnibus appropriations act and these amounts
must be divided equally between the four-year and two-year programs.
((On July 1, 2009, June 30, 2010, and June 30, 2011, all unclaimed
prize money retained in the state lottery fund [account] in excess of
three million dollars, excluding amounts distributed to the economic
development strategic reserve account, shall be transferred into the
state general fund.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.135.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 239 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((four-year)) student child care in higher education account is
established. The office of student financial assistance ((shall)) must
administer the program for the four-year institutions of higher
education. The state board for community and technical colleges shall
administer the program for the two-year institutions of higher
education. Through this program the office ((shall)) must award either
competitive or matching child care grants to state institutions of
higher education to encourage programs to address the need for high
quality, accessible, and affordable child care for students at higher
education institutions. The grants ((shall)) must be used exclusively
for the provision of quality child care services for students at
institutions of higher education. The university or college
administration and student government association, or its equivalent,
of each institution receiving the award may contribute financial
support in an amount equal to or greater than the child care grant
received by the institution.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.135.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 241 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((four-year)) student child care in higher education account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the
account may be spent only for the purposes of RCW 28B.135.010.
Disbursements from the account ((shall)) must be on the authorization
of the office of student financial assistance or the state board for
community and technical colleges. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for disbursements.

--- END ---