BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.465 and 2007 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, the panel
shall consider the following criteria:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) The budget priorities as determined by the governing body;
(c) Financial and budgetary constraints including but not limited
to the designation of a reasonable operating reserve as established by
the governing body;
(d) Internal equity within the organization;
(e) Stipulations of the parties;
(((c))) (f) The average consumer prices for goods and services,
commonly known as the cost of living;
(((d))) (g) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through
(((c))) (f) of this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings;
and
(((e))) (h) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under
(a) through (((d))) (g) of this subsection, that are normally or
traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of wages,
hours, and conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(((7))) (13)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a
city or town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a
county with a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration
must also be given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7))) (13) (a) through
(d), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours,
and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings
with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel
of like employers ((of similar size)) on the west coast of the United
States. However, when an adequate number of comparable employers
exists within the state of Washington, other west coast employers may
not be considered. Like employers shall be determined by factors
including, but not limited to, population size, financial conditions,
population demographics, workforce size, and assessed valuation.
(3) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7))) (13) (e) through
(h), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours,
and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings
with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel
of public fire departments of similar size on the west coast of the
United States. However, when an adequate number of comparable
employers exists within the state of Washington, other west coast
employers may not be considered. Like public fire departments shall be
determined by factors including, but not limited to, population,
financial conditions, population demographics, workforce size, and
assessed valuation.
(4) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.028:
(a) The panel shall also consider:
(i) A comparison of child care provider subsidy rates and
reimbursement programs by public entities, including counties and
municipalities, along the west coast of the United States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) The public's interest in reducing turnover and increasing
retention of child care providers;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting, through education and
training, a stable child care workforce to provide quality and reliable
child care from all providers throughout the state; and
(iii) In addition, for employees exempt from licensing under
chapter 74.15 RCW, the state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance
upon public benefit programs including but not limited to medical
coupons, food stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical
services.
(5) For employees listed in RCW 74.39A.270:
(a) The panel shall consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly reimbursed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly employed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting a stable long-term care
workforce to provide quality and reliable care to vulnerable elderly
and disabled recipients;
(iii) The state's interest in ensuring access to affordable,
quality health care for all state citizens; and
(iv) The state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public
benefit programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food
stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical services.
(6) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section may not be construed to
authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or
indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter
502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under
chapter 41.26 RCW.

--- END ---