BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.550 and 2011 c 337 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the disclosure under subsection (5) of this
section, public agencies are authorized to release information to the
public regarding sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when the agency
determines that disclosure of the information is relevant and necessary
to protect the public and counteract the danger created by the
particular offender. This authorization applies to information
regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9A.44.128 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW
9A.44.128; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping
offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually violent predator under
chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW;
(d) any person found not guilty of a sex offense or kidnapping offense
by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found
incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and
subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.
(2) Except for the information specifically required under
subsection (5) of this section, the extent of the public disclosure of
relevant and necessary information shall be rationally related to: (a)
The level of risk posed by the offender to the community; (b) the
locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members
for information to enhance their individual and collective safety.
(3) Except for the information specifically required under
subsection (5) of this section, ((local)) law enforcement agencies
shall consider the following guidelines in determining the extent of a
public disclosure made under this section: (a) For offenders
classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with
other appropriate law enforcement agencies and, if the offender is a
student, the public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW or
chapter 72.40 RCW which the offender is attending, or planning to
attend. The agency may disclose, upon request, relevant, necessary,
and accurate information to any victim or witness to the offense ((and
to)), any individual community member who lives near the residence
where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found,
and any individual who requests information regarding a specifically
named offender; (b) for offenders classified as risk level II, the
agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information
to public and private schools, child day care centers, family day care
providers, public libraries, businesses and organizations that serve
primarily children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and
community groups near the residence where the offender resides, expects
to reside, or is regularly found; (c) for offenders classified as risk
level III, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and
accurate information to the public at large; and (d) because more
localized notification is not feasible and homeless and transient
offenders may present unique risks to the community, the agency may
also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the
public at large for offenders registered as homeless or transient.
(4) In addition to publication on the statewide registered sex and
kidnapping offender web site pursuant to subsection (5) of this
section, the county sheriff with whom an offender classified as risk
level III is registered shall ((cause to be published by)) release a
sex offender community notification that conforms to the guidelines
established under RCW 4.24.5501 by means including, but not limited to,
legal notice, advertising, or news release ((a sex offender community
notification that conforms to the guidelines established under RCW
4.24.5501 in at least one legal newspaper with general circulation in
the area of the sex offender's registered address or location. Unless
the information is posted on the web site described in subsection (5)
of this section, this list shall be maintained by the county sheriff on
a publicly accessible web site and shall be updated at least once per
month)).
(5)(a) When funded by federal grants or other sources, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and
maintain a statewide registered kidnapping and sex offender web site,
which shall be available to the public. The web site shall post all
level III and level II registered sex offenders, level I registered sex
offenders only during the time they are out of compliance with
registration requirements under RCW 9A.44.130 or if lacking a fixed
residence as provided in RCW 9A.44.130, and all registered kidnapping
offenders in the state of Washington.
(i) For level III offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not
limited to, the registered sex offender's name, relevant criminal
convictions, address by hundred block, physical description, and
photograph. The web site shall provide mapping capabilities that
display the sex offender's address by hundred block on a map. The web
site shall allow citizens to search for registered sex offenders within
the state of Washington by county, city, zip code, last name, and
address by hundred block.
(ii) For level II offenders, and level I sex offenders during the
time they are out of compliance with registration requirements under
RCW 9A.44.130, the web site shall contain, but is not limited to, the
same information and functionality as described in (a)(i) of this
subsection, provided that it is permissible under state and federal
law. If it is not permissible, the web site shall be limited to the
information and functionality that is permissible under state and
federal law.
(iii) For kidnapping offenders, the web site shall contain, but is
not limited to, the same information and functionality as described in
(a)(i) of this subsection, provided that it is permissible under state
and federal law. If it is not permissible, the web site shall be
limited to the information and functionality that is permissible under
state and federal law.
(b) Until the implementation of (a) of this subsection, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create a web
site available to the public that provides electronic links to county-operated web sites that offer sex offender registration information.
(6) ((Local)) (a) Law enforcement agencies ((that disseminate
information pursuant to this section)) responsible for the registration
and dissemination of information regarding offenders required to
register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall assign a risk level classification
to all offenders after consideration of: (((a) Review)) (i) Any
available risk level classifications ((made)) provided by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health
services, and the indeterminate sentence review board; (((b) assign
risk level classifications to all offenders about whom information will
be disseminated)) (ii) the agency's own application of a sex offender
risk assessment tool; and (iii) other information and aggravating or
mitigating factors known to the agency and deemed rationally related to
the risk posed by the offender to the community at large.
(b) A sex offender shall be classified as a risk level I if his or
her risk assessment and other information or factors deemed relevant by
the law enforcement agency indicate he or she is at a low risk to
sexually reoffend within the community at large. A sex offender shall
be classified as a risk level II if his or her risk assessment and
other information or factors deemed relevant by the law enforcement
agency indicate he or she is at a moderate risk to sexually reoffend
within the community at large. A sex offender shall be classified as
a risk level III if his or her risk assessment and other information or
factors deemed relevant by the law enforcement agency indicate he or
she is at a high risk to sexually reoffend within the community at
large.
(c) The agency shall make a good faith effort to notify the public
and residents within a reasonable period of time after the offender
registers with the agency.
((The juvenile court shall provide local law enforcement officials
with all relevant information on offenders allowed to remain in the
community in a timely manner.)) (d) Agencies may develop a process to
allow an offender to petition for review of the offender's assigned
risk level classification. The timing, frequency, and process for
review are at the sole discretion of the agency.
(7) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government
and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil
liability for damages for any discretionary risk level classification
decisions or release of relevant and necessary information, unless it
is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross
negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this section applies to
risk level classification decisions and the release of relevant and
necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure is
authorized. The decision of a ((local)) law enforcement agency or
official to classify an offender to a risk level other than the one
assigned by the department of corrections, the department of social and
health services, or the indeterminate sentence review board, or the
release of any relevant and necessary information based on that
different classification shall not, by itself, be considered gross
negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided under this section
applies to the release of relevant and necessary information to other
public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.
(8) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this
section shall impose any liability upon a public official, public
employee, or public agency for failing to release information
authorized under this section.
(9) Nothing in this section implies that information regarding
persons designated in subsection (1) of this section is confidential
except as may otherwise be provided by law.
(10) When a ((local)) law enforcement agency or official classifies
an offender differently than the offender is classified by the end of
sentence review committee ((or the department of social and health
services)) at the time of the offender's release from confinement, the
law enforcement agency or official shall notify the end of sentence
review committee ((or the department of social and health services))
and the Washington state patrol and submit its reasons supporting the
change in classification.
(11) As used in this section, "law enforcement agency" means a
general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW
10.93.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.128 and 2013 c 302 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130 through 9A.44.145, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a
legal local, state, or federal holiday.
(2) "Conviction" means any adult conviction or juvenile
adjudication for a sex offense or kidnapping offense.
(3) "Disqualifying offense" means a conviction for: Any offense
that is a felony; a sex offense as defined in this section; a crime
against children or persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830(7) and
9.94A.411(2)(a); an offense with a domestic violence designation as
provided in RCW 10.99.020; permitting the commercial sexual abuse of a
minor as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; or any violation of chapter 9A.88
RCW.
(4) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full time or part time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(5) "Fixed residence" means a building that a person lawfully and
habitually uses as living quarters a majority of the week. Uses as
living quarters means to conduct activities consistent with the common
understanding of residing, such as sleeping; eating; keeping personal
belongings; receiving mail; and paying utilities, rent, or mortgage.
A nonpermanent structure including, but not limited to, a motor home,
travel trailer, camper, or boat may qualify as a residence provided it
is lawfully and habitually used as living quarters a majority of the
week, primarily kept at one location with a physical address, and the
location it is kept at is either owned or rented by the person or used
by the person with the permission of the owner or renter. A shelter
program may qualify as a residence provided it is a shelter program
designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless,
provides an offender with a personally assigned living space, and the
offender is permitted to store belongings in the living space.
(6) "In the community" means residing outside of confinement or
incarceration for a disqualifying offense.
(7) "Institution of higher education" means any public or private
institution dedicated to postsecondary education, including any
college, university, community college, trade, or professional school.
(8) "Kidnapping offense" means:
(a) The crimes of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, and unlawful imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40
RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's
parent;
(b) Any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an
offense that is classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for: An offense for
which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender
if residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register
in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this
state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection.
(9) "Lacks a fixed residence" means the person does not have a
living situation that meets the definition of a fixed residence and
includes, but is not limited to, a shelter program designed to provide
temporary living accommodations for the homeless, an outdoor sleeping
location, or locations where the person does not have permission to
stay.
(10) "Sex offense" means:
(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(c) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(a)(ii)(B) (trafficking);
(d) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(e) A violation under RCW 9A.88.070 (promoting prostitution in the
first degree) or RCW 9A.88.080 (promoting prostitution in the second
degree) if the person has a prior conviction for one of these offenses;
(f) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection;
(g) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense for which the person
would be required to register as a sex offender while residing in the
state of conviction; or, if not required to register in the state of
conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be
classified as a sex offense under this subsection;
(h) Any federal conviction classified as a sex offense under 42
U.S.C. Sec. 16911 (SORNA);
(i) Any military conviction for a sex offense. This includes sex
offenses under the uniform code of military justice, as specified by
the United States secretary of defense;
(j) Any conviction in a foreign country for a sex offense if it was
obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness and due
process for the accused under guidelines or regulations established
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16912;
(k) Any tribal conviction for an offense for which the person would
be required to register as a sex offender while residing in the
reservation of conviction; or, if not required to register in the
reservation of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection.
(11) "School" means a public or private school regulated under
Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW.
(12) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any school or institution of higher education.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.44.130 and 2011 c 337 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has
a fixed residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a
vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been
convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been
found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of
committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register with
the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified
in this section. When a person required to register under this section
is in custody of the state department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, a local division of youth
services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as a result of
a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the person shall also register at
the time of release from custody with an official designated by the
agency that has jurisdiction over the person.
(b) Any adult or juvenile who is required to register under (a) of
this subsection must give notice to the county sheriff of the county
with whom the person is registered within three business days:
(i) Prior to arriving at a school or institution of higher
education to attend classes;
(ii) Prior to starting work at an institution of higher education;
or
(iii) After any termination of enrollment or employment at a school
or institution of higher education.
(2)(a) A person required to register under this section must
provide the following information when registering: (i) Name and any
aliases used; (ii) complete and accurate residential address or, if the
person lacks a fixed residence, where he or she plans to stay; (iii)
date and place of birth; (iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which
convicted; (vi) date and place of conviction; (vii) social security
number; (viii) photograph; and (ix) fingerprints.
(b) A person may be required to update any of the information
required in this subsection in conjunction with any address
verification conducted by the county sheriff or as part of any notice
required by this section.
(c) A photograph or copy of an individual's fingerprints may be
taken at any time to update an individual's file.
(3) Any person required to register under this section who intends
to travel outside the United States must provide, by certified mail,
with return receipt requested, or in person, signed written notice of
the plan to travel outside the country to the county sheriff of the
county with whom the person is registered at least twenty-one days
prior to travel. The notice shall include the following information:
(a) Name; (b) passport number and country; (c) destination; (d)
itinerary details including departure and return dates; (e) means of
travel; and (f) purpose of travel. If the offender does not
subsequently travel outside the United States, the offender must notify
the county sheriff within three days of the departure date provided in
the notification. The county sheriff shall notify the United States
marshals service as soon as practicable after receipt of the
notification.
(4)(a) Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the
following deadlines:
(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders ((who committed a sex
offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after
July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a result of that offense, of the
state department of corrections, the state department of social and
health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or
juvenile detention facility, and (B))) or kidnapping offenders who ((on
or after July 27, 1997,)) are in custody of the state department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, a
local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention
facility, must register at the time of release from custody with an
official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the
offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration
information to the county sheriff for the county of the offender's
anticipated residence. The offender must also register within three
business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the
county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall
provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.
When the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender
with a duty to register under this section, and the agency has
knowledge that the offender is eligible for developmental disability
services from the department of social and health services, the agency
shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of the release.
Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender is to
be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in
meeting the initial registration requirement under this section.
Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for
any violation of this section.
When a person required to register under this section is in the
custody of the state department of corrections and has been approved
for partial confinement as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the person must
register at the time of transfer to partial confinement with the
official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the
offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration
information to the county sheriff for the county in which the offender
is in partial confinement. The offender must also register within
three business days from the time of the termination of partial
confinement or release from confinement with the county sheriff for the
county of the person's residence. The agency that has jurisdiction
over the offender shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to
register.
(ii) ((OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL
JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody
but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review
board or under the department of corrections' active supervision, as
defined by the department of corrections, the state department of
social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for
sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must
register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who,
on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of
the indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of
corrections' active supervision, as defined by the department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, or a
local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses committed
before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of
July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who
was required to register under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) as of July
28, 1991, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27,
1997, shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to
reregister following a change in residence.
(iii))) OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders ((who,
on or after July 23, 1995, and)) or kidnapping offenders who((, on or
after July 27, 1997, as a result of that offense)) are in the custody
of the United States bureau of prisons or other federal or military
correctional agency ((for sex offenses committed before, on, or after
February 28, 1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or
after July 27, 1997,)) must register within three business days from
the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the
person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington,
the county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation.
((Sex offenders who, on July 23, 1995, are not in custody but are under
the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of prisons, United States
courts, United States parole commission, or military parole board for
sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must
register within ten days of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who,
on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of
the United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United
States parole commission, or military parole board for kidnapping
offenses committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register
within ten days of July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a
sex offender who was required to register under this subsection
(3)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a kidnapping offender required to
register as of July 27, 1997 shall not relieve the offender of the duty
to register or to reregister following a change in residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation.
(iv))) (iii) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex
offenders who are convicted of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991,
for a sex offense that was committed on or after February 28, 1990, and
kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or after July 27, 1997, for
a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after July 27, 1997, but
who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon
sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register within three
business days of being sentenced.
(((v))) (iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS, TEMPORARY RESIDENTS,
OR RETURNING WASHINGTON RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders who move to Washington state from another state or a foreign
country ((that are not under the jurisdiction of the state department
of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the state
department of social and health services at the time of moving to
Washington,)) must register within three business days of establishing
residence or reestablishing residence if the person is a former
Washington resident. ((The duty to register under this subsection
applies to sex offenders convicted under the laws of another state or
a foreign country, federal or military statutes for offenses committed
before, on, or after February 28, 1990, or Washington state for
offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, and to
kidnapping offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a
foreign country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for
offenses committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997. Sex offenders
and kidnapping offenders from other states or a foreign country who,
when they move to Washington, are under the jurisdiction of the
department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or
the department of social and health services must register within three
business days of moving to Washington. The agency that has
jurisdiction over the offender shall notify the offender of the
registration requirements before the offender moves to Washington.
(vi))) If the offender is under the jurisdiction of an agency of
this state when the offender moves to Washington, the agency shall
provide notice to the offender of the duty to register.
Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who are visiting Washington
state and intend to reside in the state for ten days or more shall
register his or her temporary address with the county sheriff of the
county where the offender will be staying within three business days of
arrival. Registration for temporary residents shall include the
information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, except the
photograph and fingerprints.
(v) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult or
juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under
chapter 10.77 RCW of (((A))) committing a sex offense ((on, before, or
after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23, 1995, is in
custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social
and health services,)) or (((B) committing)) a kidnapping offense ((on,
before, or after July 27, 1997,)) and who ((on or after July 27,
1997,)) is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state
department of social and health services, must register within three
business days from the time of release with the county sheriff for the
county of the person's residence. The state department of social and
health services shall provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its
custody of the duty to register. Any adult or juvenile who has been
found not guilty by reason of insanity of committing a sex offense
((on, before, or after February 28, 1990)), but who was released before
July 23, 1995, or any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty
by reason of insanity of committing a kidnapping offense but who was
released before July 27, 1997, shall be required to register within
three business days of receiving notice of this registration
requirement.
(((vii))) (vi) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person
who lacks a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is
registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four
hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than
three business days after entering the county and provide the
information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(((viii))) (vii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE
UNDER SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a fixed residence and who are
under the supervision of the department shall register in the county of
their supervision.
(((ix))) (viii) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION,
OR ATTEND SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders required to register in
Washington, who move to another state, or who work, carry on a
vocation, or attend school in another state shall register a new
address, fingerprints, and photograph with the new state within three
business days after establishing residence, or after beginning to work,
carry on a vocation, or attend school in the new state. The person
must also send written notice within three business days of moving to
the new state or to a foreign country to the county sheriff with whom
the person last registered in Washington state. The county sheriff
shall promptly forward this information to the Washington state patrol.
(b) The county sheriff shall not be required to determine whether
the person is living within the county.
(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an
information, or a complaint for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, or
arraignment on charges for a violation of RCW 9A.44.132, constitutes
actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the
crime of failure to register under RCW 9A.44.132 who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
within three business days following actual notice of the duty through
arrest, service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under
this subsection (((3))) (4)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another
charge of failing to register. Registering following arrest, service,
or arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal
liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original
charge.
(d) The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do
not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under this section
as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.
(((4))) (5)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this
section changes his or her residence address within the same county,
the person must provide, by certified mail, with return receipt
requested or in person, signed written notice of the change of address
to the county sheriff within three business days of moving.
(b) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
moves to a new county, within three business days of moving the person
must register with ((that)) the new county sheriff ((within three
business days of moving. Within three business days, the person must
also)) and provide, by certified mail, with return receipt requested or
in person, signed written notice of the change of address ((in the new
county)) to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered.
The county sheriff with whom the person last registered ((shall
promptly forward the information concerning the change of address to
the county sheriff for the county of the person's new residence. Upon
receipt of notice of change of address to a new state, the county
sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the change of
address to the agency designated by the new state as the state's
offender registration agency)) is responsible for address verification
pursuant to RCW 9A.44.135 until the person completes registration of
his or her new residence address.
(((5))) (6)(a) Any person required to register under this section
who lacks a fixed residence shall provide signed written notice to the
sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within three
business days after ceasing to have a fixed residence. The notice
shall include the information required by subsection (2)(a) of this
section, except the photograph and fingerprints. The county sheriff
may, for reasonable cause, require the offender to provide a photograph
and fingerprints. The sheriff shall forward this information to the
sheriff of the county in which the person intends to reside, if the
person intends to reside in another county.
(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in
person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered.
The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's
office, and shall occur during normal business hours. The person must
keep an accurate accounting of where he or she stays during the week
and provide it to the county sheriff upon request. The lack of a fixed
residence is a factor that may be considered in determining an
offender's risk level and shall make the offender subject to disclosure
of information to the public at large pursuant to RCW 4.24.550.
(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the
charge of failure to register, that he or she provided written notice
to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within
three business days of ceasing to have a fixed residence and has
subsequently complied with the requirements of subsections (((3)))
(4)(a)(((vii))) (vi) or (((viii))) (vii) and (((5))) (6) of this
section. To prevail, the person must prove the defense by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(((6))) (7) A sex offender subject to registration requirements
under this section who applies to change his or her name under RCW
4.24.130 or any other law shall submit a copy of the application to the
county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state
patrol not fewer than five days before the entry of an order granting
the name change. No sex offender under the requirement to register
under this section at the time of application shall be granted an order
changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will
interfere with legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no
order shall be denied when the name change is requested for religious
or legitimate cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or
dissolution of marriage. A sex offender under the requirement to
register under this section who receives an order changing his or her
name shall submit a copy of the order to the county sheriff of the
county of the person's residence and to the state patrol within three
business days of the entry of the order.
(((7))) (8) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in
this section shall impose any liability upon a peace officer, including
a county sheriff, or law enforcement agency, for failing to release
information authorized under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.44.132 and 2011 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a sex
offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for
a felony sex offense and knowingly fails to comply with any of the
requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.
(a) The failure to register as a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection is a class C felony if:
(i) It is the person's first conviction for a felony failure to
register; or
(ii) The person has previously been convicted of a felony failure
to register as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of
another state, or pursuant to federal law.
(b) If a person has been convicted of a felony failure to register
as a sex offender in this state or pursuant to the laws of another
state, or pursuant to federal law, on two or more prior occasions, the
failure to register under this subsection is a class B felony.
(2) A person is guilty of failure to register as a sex offender if
the person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense
other than a felony and knowingly fails to comply with any of the
requirements of RCW 9A.44.130. The failure to register as a sex
offender under this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a
kidnapping offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW
9A.44.130 for a kidnapping offense and knowingly fails to comply with
any of the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130.
(a) If the person has a duty to register for a felony kidnapping
offense, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender is a class C
felony.
(b) If the person has a duty to register for a kidnapping offense
other than a felony, the failure to register as a kidnapping offender
is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) A person commits the crime of refusal to provide DNA if the
person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and the person
willfully refuses to comply with a legal request for a DNA sample as
required under RCW 43.43.754(1)(b). The refusal to provide DNA is a
gross misdemeanor.
(5) Unless relieved of the duty to register pursuant to RCW
9A.44.141 and 9A.44.142, a violation of this section is an ongoing
offense for purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.44.140 and 2010 c 267 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall continue for the
duration provided in this section.
(1) For a person convicted in this state of a class A felony ((or
an offense listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5))), or a person convicted ((in
this state)) of any sex offense or kidnapping offense who has one or
more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the
duty to register shall continue indefinitely.
(2) For a person convicted in this state of a class B felony who
does not have one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense ((and whose current offense is not listed in RCW
9A.44.142(5))), the duty to register shall end fifteen years after the
last date of release from confinement, if any, (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the
judgment and sentence, if the person has spent fifteen consecutive
years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying
offense during that time period.
(3) For a person convicted in this state of a class C felony, a
violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or 9A.44.096, or an attempt, solicitation,
or conspiracy to commit a class C felony, and the person does not have
one or more prior convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense
((and the person's current offense is not listed in RCW 9A.44.142(5))),
the duty to register shall end ten years after the last date of release
from confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if
the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community without
being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.
(4) For a person required to register for a federal or out-of-state
conviction, the duty to register shall continue indefinitely.
(5) For a person who has been determined to be a sexually violent
predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020, the duty to register shall
continue for the person's lifetime.
(6) Nothing in this section prevents a person from being relieved
of the duty to register under RCW 9A.44.142 and 9A.44.143.
(((6))) (7) Nothing in RCW 9.94A.637 relating to discharge of an
offender shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his
or her duty to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.
(((7))) (8) For purposes of determining whether a person has been
convicted of more than one sex offense, failure to register as a sex
offender or kidnapping offender is not a sex or kidnapping offense.
(((8))) (9) The provisions of this section and RCW 9A.44.141
through 9A.44.143 apply equally to a person who has been found not
guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of a sex offense
or kidnapping offense.

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.44.141 and 2011 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the request of a person who is listed in the Washington
state patrol central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders, the county sheriff shall investigate whether a person's duty
to register has ended by operation of law pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.
(a) Using available records, the county sheriff shall verify that
the offender has spent the requisite time in the community and has not
been convicted of a disqualifying offense.
(b) If the county sheriff determines the person's duty to register
has ended by operation of law, the county sheriff shall request the
Washington state patrol remove the person's name from the central
registry.
(2) Nothing in this subsection prevents a county sheriff from
investigating, upon his or her own initiative, whether a person's duty
to register has ended by operation of law pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.
(3)(a) A person who is listed in the central registry as the result
of a federal or out-of-state conviction may request the county sheriff
to investigate whether the person should be removed from the registry
if:
(i) A court or other administrative authority in the person's state
of conviction has made an individualized determination that the person
((should)) is not ((be)) required to register; and
(ii) The person provides proof of relief from registration to the
county sheriff.
(b) If the county sheriff determines the person has been relieved
of the duty to register in his or her state of conviction, the county
sheriff shall request the Washington state patrol remove the person's
name from the central registry.
(4) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government
and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil
liability for damages for removing or requesting the removal of a
person from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders or the failure to remove or request removal of a person
within the time frames provided in RCW 9A.44.140.

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.44.142 and 2011 c 337 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may
petition the superior court to be relieved of the duty to register:
(a) If the person has a duty to register for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile,
regardless of whether the conviction was in this state, as provided in
RCW 9A.44.143;
(b) If the person is required to register for a conviction in this
state and is not prohibited from petitioning for relief from
registration under subsection (2) of this section, when the person has
spent ten consecutive years in the community without being convicted of
a disqualifying offense during that time period; or
(c) If the person is required to register for a federal or out-of-state conviction, when the person has spent fifteen consecutive years
in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense
during that time period.
(2)(a) A person may not petition for relief from registration if
the person has been:
(i) Determined to be a sexually violent predator as defined in RCW
71.09.020; or
(ii) Convicted as an adult of a sex offense or kidnapping offense
that is a class A felony and that was committed with forcible
compulsion on or after June 8, 2000((; or
(iii) Until July 1, 2012, convicted of one aggravated offense or
more than one sexually violent offense, as defined in subsection (5) of
this section, and the offense or offenses were committed on or after
March 12, 2002. After July 1, 2012, this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall
have no further force and effect)).
(b) Any person who may not be relieved of the duty to register may
petition the court to be exempted from any community notification
requirements that the person may be subject to fifteen years after the
later of the entry of the judgment and sentence or the last date of
release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment,
pursuant to the conviction, if the person has spent the time in the
community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense.
(3) A petition for relief from registration or exemption from
notification under this section shall be made to the court in which the
petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the
duty to register or, in the case of convictions in other states, a
foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court in the
county where the person is registered at the time the petition is
sought. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and
served as the respondent in any such petition.
(4)(a) The court may relieve a petitioner of the duty to register
only if the petitioner shows by clear and convincing evidence that the
petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the
central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.
(b) In determining whether the petitioner is sufficiently
rehabilitated to warrant removal from the registry, the following
factors are provided as guidance to assist the court in making its
determination:
(i) The nature of the registrable offense committed including the
number of victims and the length of the offense history;
(ii) Any subsequent criminal history;
(iii) The petitioner's compliance with supervision requirements;
(iv) The length of time since the charged incident(s) occurred;
(v) Any input from community corrections officers, law enforcement,
or treatment providers;
(vi) Participation in sex offender treatment;
(vii) Participation in other treatment and rehabilitative programs;
(viii) The offender's stability in employment and housing;
(ix) The offender's community and personal support system;
(x) Any risk assessments or evaluations prepared by a qualified
professional;
(xi) Any updated polygraph examination;
(xii) Any input of the victim;
(xiii) Any other factors the court may consider relevant.
(5)(((a) A person who has been convicted of an aggravated offense,
or has been convicted of one or more prior sexually violent offenses or
criminal offenses against a victim who is a minor, as defined in (b) of
this subsection:
(i) Until July 1, 2012, may not be relieved of the duty to
register;
(ii) After July 1, 2012, may petition the court to be relieved of
the duty to register as provided in this section;
(iii) This provision shall apply to convictions for crimes
committed on or after July 22, 2001.
(b) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply only to the federal lifetime registration
requirements under this subsection:
(i) "Aggravated offense" means an adult conviction that meets the
definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2241, which is limited to the following:
(A) Any sex offense involving sexual intercourse or sexual contact
where the victim is under twelve years of age;
(B) RCW 9A.44.040 (rape in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.073 (rape
of a child in the first degree), or RCW 9A.44.083 (child molestation in
the first degree);
(C) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible
compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or
without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant,
or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of
that person to appraise or control conduct: RCW 9A.44.050 (rape in the
second degree), RCW 9A.44.100 (indecent liberties), RCW 9A.44.160
(custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), or RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor);
(D) Any of the following offenses when committed by forcible
compulsion or by the offender administering, by threat or force or
without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant,
or other similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of
that person to appraise or control conduct, if the victim is twelve
years of age or over but under sixteen years of age and the offender is
eighteen years of age or over and is more than forty-eight months older
than the victim: RCW 9A.44.076 (rape of a child in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.086
(child molestation in the second degree), or RCW 9A.44.089 (child
molestation in the third degree);
(E) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is under twelve years of age or that is
committed by forcible compulsion or by the offender administering, by
threat or force or without the knowledge or permission of that person,
a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance that substantially
impairs the ability of that person to appraise or control conduct;
(F) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(G) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(i)(A) through (F) of
this subsection.
(ii) "Sexually violent offense" means an adult conviction that
meets the definition of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 14071(a)(1)(A), which is limited
to the following:
(A) An aggravated offense;
(B) An offense that is not an aggravated offense but meets the
definition of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2242, which is limited to RCW 9A.44.050(1)
(b) through (f) (rape in the second degree) and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b)
through (f) (indecent liberties);
(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is incapable of appraising the nature of the
conduct or physically incapable of declining participation in, or
communicating unwillingness to engage in, the conduct;
(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(ii)(A) through (D) of
this subsection.
(iii) "Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor" means, in
addition to any aggravated offense or sexually violent offense where
the victim was under eighteen years of age, an adult conviction for the
following offenses where the victim is under eighteen years of age:
(A) RCW 9A.44.060 (rape in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.076 (rape
of a child in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.079 (rape of a child in the
third degree), RCW 9A.44.086 (child molestation in the second degree),
RCW 9A.44.089 (child molestation in the third degree), RCW 9A.44.093
(sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree), RCW 9A.44.096
(sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree), RCW 9A.44.160
(custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree), RCW 9A.64.020
(incest), RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor), RCW 9.68A.090
(communication with a minor for immoral purposes), or RCW 9.68A.100
(commercial sexual abuse of a minor);
(B) RCW 9A.40.020 (kidnapping in the first degree), RCW 9A.40.030
(kidnapping in the second degree), or RCW 9A.40.040 (unlawful
imprisonment), where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the
minor's parent;
(C) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 where the victim is a minor;
(D) An offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, an attempt or
solicitation to commit such an offense; or
(E) An offense defined by federal law or the laws of another state
that is equivalent to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (D) of
this subsection)) If a person is relieved of the duty to register
pursuant to this section, the relief of registration does not
constitute a certificate of rehabilitation, or the equivalent of a
certificate of rehabilitation, for the purposes of restoration of
firearm possession under RCW 9.41.040.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.44.143 and 2011 c 338 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for
a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a
juvenile, and who has not been determined to be a sexually violent
predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020 may petition the superior court to
be relieved of that duty as provided in this section.
(2) For class A sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed when
the petitioner was fifteen years of age or older, the court may relieve
the petitioner of the duty to register if:
(a) At least sixty months have passed since the petitioner's
adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense
giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been
adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping
offenses within the sixty months before the petition;
(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a
violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the sixty
months prior to filing the petition; and
(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that
the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from
the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.
(3) For all other sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed by
a juvenile not included in subsection (2) of this section, the court
may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if:
(a) At least twenty-four months have passed since the petitioner's
adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense
giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been
adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping
offenses within the twenty-four months before the petition;
(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a
violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the twenty-four
months prior to filing the petition; and
(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that
the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from
the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.
(4) A petition for relief from registration under this section
shall be made to the court in which the petitioner was convicted of the
offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register or, in the
case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal or
military court, to the court in ((Thurston)) the county in which the
juvenile is registered at the time a petition is sought. The
prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and served as the
respondent in any such petition.
(5) In determining whether the petitioner is sufficiently
rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex
offenders and kidnapping offenders, the following factors are provided
as guidance to assist the court in making its determination, to the
extent the factors are applicable considering the age and circumstances
of the petitioner:
(a) The nature of the registrable offense committed including the
number of victims and the length of the offense history;
(b) Any subsequent criminal history;
(c) The petitioner's compliance with supervision requirements;
(d) The length of time since the charged incident(s) occurred;
(e) Any input from community corrections officers, juvenile parole
or probation officers, law enforcement, or treatment providers;
(f) Participation in sex offender treatment;
(g) Participation in other treatment and rehabilitative programs;
(h) The offender's stability in employment and housing;
(i) The offender's community and personal support system;
(j) Any risk assessments or evaluations prepared by a qualified
professional;
(k) Any updated polygraph examination;
(l) Any input of the victim;
(m) Any other factors the court may consider relevant.
(6) If a person is relieved of the duty to register pursuant to
this section, the relief of registration does not constitute a
certificate of rehabilitation, or the equivalent of a certificate of
rehabilitation, for the purposes of restoration of firearm possession
under RCW 9.41.040.
(7) A juvenile prosecuted and convicted of a sex offense or
kidnapping offense as an adult pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or 13.04.030
may not petition to the superior court under this section and must
follow the provisions of RCW 9A.44.142.
(8) An adult prosecuted for an offense committed as juvenile once
the juvenile court has lost jurisdiction due to the passage of time
between the date of the offense and the date of filing of charges may
petition the superior court under the provisions of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.43.754 and 2008 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A biological sample must be collected for purposes of DNA
identification analysis from:
(a) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony, or
any of the following crimes (or equivalent juvenile offenses):
Assault in the fourth degree with sexual motivation (RCW 9A.36.041,
9.94A.835)
Communication with a minor for immoral purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)
Custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.170)
Failure to register (RCW 9A.44.130 for persons convicted on or
before June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132 for persons convicted after
June 10, 2010)
Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)
Patronizing a prostitute (RCW 9A.88.110)
Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.096)
Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)
Violation of a sexual assault protection order granted under
chapter 7.90 RCW; and
(b) Every adult or juvenile individual who is required to register
under RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) If the Washington state patrol crime laboratory already has a
DNA sample from an individual for a qualifying offense, a subsequent
submission is not required to be submitted.
(3) Biological samples shall be collected in the following manner:
(a) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection
(1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of
corrections facility, and do serve a term of confinement in a city or
county jail facility, the city or county shall be responsible for
obtaining the biological samples.
(b) The local police department or sheriff's office shall be
responsible for obtaining the biological samples for:
(i) Persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of
this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense
who do not serve a term of confinement in a department of corrections
facility, and do not serve a term of confinement in a city or county
jail facility; and
(ii) Persons who are required to register under RCW ((9A.44.030))
9A.44.130.
(c) For persons convicted of any offense listed in subsection
(1)(a) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense, who are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in
a department of corrections facility or a department of social and
health services facility, the facility holding the person shall be
responsible for obtaining the biological samples. For those persons
incarcerated before June 12, 2008, who have not yet had a biological
sample collected, priority shall be given to those persons who will be
released the soonest.
(4) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau,
and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other
tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense
or for the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing
in this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the
biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA
index system.
(5) The forensic laboratory services bureau of the Washington state
patrol is responsible for testing performed on all biological samples
that are collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent
allowed by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give
priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles
convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW
9.94A.030. Known duplicate samples may be excluded from testing unless
testing is deemed necessary or advisable by the director.
(6) This section applies to:
(a) All adults and juveniles to whom this section applied prior to
June 12, 2008;
(b) All adults and juveniles to whom this section did not apply
prior to June 12, 2008, who:
(i) Are convicted on or after June 12, 2008, of an offense listed
in subsection (1)(a) of this section; or
(ii) Were convicted prior to June 12, 2008, of an offense listed in
subsection (1)(a) of this section and are still incarcerated on or
after June 12, 2008; and
(c) All adults and juveniles who are required to register under RCW
9A.44.130 on or after June 12, 2008, whether convicted before, on, or
after June 12, 2008.
(7) This section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of
action may be brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or
the delayed collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to
be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(8) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a
database match or database information is not invalidated if it is
determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the database by
mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in
the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or
otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to
posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.
(9) A person commits the crime of refusal to provide DNA if the
person has a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and the person
willfully refuses to comply with a legal request for a DNA sample as
required under this section. The refusal to provide DNA is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2013 c 322 s 26, 2013 c 290 s 8, 2013
c 267 s 2, and 2013 c 153 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct 1
(RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct 1 (RCW
9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions
of Minor Engaged in Sexually
Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW
9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or
subsequent offense) (RCW
9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1
(RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Food Fish or
Shellfish 1 (RCW 69.04.938(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish
or Wildlife 1 (RCW
77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish,
or Wildlife 1 (RCW
77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated
Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Commercial Fishing Without a License
1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity
Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10,
2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or
Supplying Without a License
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians
in Indian Fishery (RCW
77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License
(RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish,
or Wildlife 2 (RCW
77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW
77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1
(RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch
Accounting (RCW
77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Release of Deleterious Exotic
Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1
(RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of Prohibited Aquatic
Animal Species (RCW
77.15.253(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or
Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

Sec. 11 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2012 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as
part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by
the department.
(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person
who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or
misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is
committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual
abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); or promoting pornography (chapter
9.68 RCW).
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number
of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or
terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender
through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate
sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and 26.50.010.
(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(22) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(23) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(24) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(25) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(26) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(27) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(28) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(29) "Homelessness" or "homeless" means a condition where an
individual lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and
who has a primary nighttime residence that is:
(a) A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed
to provide temporary living accommodations;
(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used
as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or
(c) A private residence where the individual stays as a transient
invitee.
(30) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(31) "Minor child" means a biological or adopted child of the
offender who is under age eighteen at the time of the offender's
current offense.
(32) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.825;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997;
(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding
of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or
more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable
to a felony offense under this title and Title 9A RCW and the out-of-state definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the
definition of sexual motivation contained in this section.
(33) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(34) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody
requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanant
or gross misdemeanant probationer ordered by a superior court to
probation pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210 and
supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011.
Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and "defendant" are used
interchangeably.
(35) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention has been
ordered by the department as part of the parenting program, in an
approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement
includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of
work crew and home detention.
(36) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this
section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a
Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under RCW 9.94A.833;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(37) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (37)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(38) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a
stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator
established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the
offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason
the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the
perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person
in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a
student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For
purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based
instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity
and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her
authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other
person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the
victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her
authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in
authority providing home-based instruction and the victim was a student
receiving home-based instruction while under his or her authority or
supervision. For purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based
instruction" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and
(B) "teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority" does
not include the parent or legal guardian of the victim.
(39) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter
28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(40) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.
(41) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:
(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under
RCW 9A.36.041;
(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under
chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under
chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that
is not a felony offense; or
(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is
not a felony offense; or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or
municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(42) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(43) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk instrument
recommended to the department by the Washington state institute for
public policy as having the highest degree of predictive accuracy for
assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.
(44) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(45) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(46) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.132;
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080;
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or
(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as
a sex offender) if the person has been convicted of violating RCW
9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) or 9A.44.130 prior
to June 10, 2010, on at least one prior occasion;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(47) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(48) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(49) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(50) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the offender
twenty-four hours before the offense.
(51) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(52) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(53) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(54) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(55) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(56) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(57) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.300.147 and 2011 c 338 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall publish on its web
site, with a link to the safety center web page((,)):
(1) A revised and updated sample policy for schools to follow
regarding students required to register as sex or kidnapping offenders;
and
(2) Educational materials developed pursuant to RCW 28A.300.145.

Sec. 13 RCW 72.09.345 and 2011 c 338 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other information required to be released
under this chapter, the department is authorized, pursuant to RCW
4.24.550, to release relevant information to a law enforcement agency
that is necessary to protect the public concerning offenders convicted
of sex offenses.
(2) In order for ((public)) law enforcement agencies to have the
information necessary to notify the public as authorized in RCW
4.24.550, the secretary shall establish and administer an end-of-sentence review committee for the purposes of assigning risk levels,
reviewing available release plans, and making appropriate referrals for
sex offenders.
(3) The committee shall assess, on a case-by-case basis, the public
risk posed by:
(a) Offenders preparing for release from confinement for a sex
offense or sexually violent offense committed on or after July 1, 1984;
(b) Sex offenders accepted from another state under a reciprocal
agreement under the interstate corrections compact authorized in
chapter 72.74 RCW;
(c) Juveniles preparing for release from confinement for a sex
offense and releasing from the department of social and health services
juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(d) Juveniles, following disposition, under the jurisdiction of a
county juvenile court for a registerable sex offense; and
(e) Juveniles found to have committed a sex offense and accepted
from another state under a reciprocal agreement under the interstate
compact for juveniles authorized in chapter 13.24 RCW.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the committee shall
have access to all relevant records and information in the possession
of public agencies relating to the offenders under review, including
police reports; prosecutors' statements of probable cause; presentence
investigations and reports; complete judgments and sentences; current
classification referrals; criminal history summaries; violation and
disciplinary reports; all psychological evaluations and psychiatric
hospital reports; sex offender treatment program reports; and juvenile
records. Records and information obtained under this subsection shall
not be disclosed outside the committee unless otherwise authorized by
law.
(5) The committee shall review each sex offender under its
authority before the offender's release from confinement or start of
the offender's term of community custody in order to: (a) Classify the
offender into a risk level for the purposes of public notification
under RCW 4.24.550; (b) where available, review the offender's proposed
release plan in accordance with the requirements of RCW 72.09.340; and
(c) make appropriate referrals.
(6) The committee shall classify as risk level I those sex
offenders whose risk assessments indicate ((a)) they are at a low risk
((of reoffense)) to sexually reoffend within the community at large.
The committee shall classify as risk level II those offenders whose
risk assessments indicate ((a)) they are at a moderate risk ((of
reoffense)) to sexually reoffend within the community at large. The
committee shall classify as risk level III those offenders whose risk
assessments indicate ((a)) they are at a high risk ((of reoffense)) to
sexually reoffend within the community at large.
(7) The committee shall issue to appropriate law enforcement
agencies, for their use in making public notifications under RCW
4.24.550, narrative notices regarding the pending release of sex
offenders from the department's facilities. The narrative notices
shall, at a minimum, describe the identity and criminal history
behavior of the offender and shall include the department's risk level
classification for the offender. For sex offenders classified as
either risk level II or III, the narrative notices shall also include
the reasons underlying the classification.

--- END ---