BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) Washington's economy is dependent on
a thriving middle class, and the prosperity of the middle class depends
on our children's access to, and ability to benefit from, high quality
education at all levels. The state must provide funding for education
and it must also ensure that students receive the best possible
education to ensure their personal and economic success.
(2) Therefore, this act implements a capital gains tax to provide
a stable, ongoing source of funding to support educational programs and
the services that make those programs work. This revenue will have a
direct and positive impact on the social and economic success of the
state by supporting a more effective educational system, one that
engages students in the advanced fields and industries critical to the
modern economy.

PART II
MEASURABLE EDUCATIONAL PROGRESS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The indicators of educational progress in this subsection must
be used to assist in evaluating the success of providing the targeted
funding from revenue obtained pursuant to chapter 82.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 601 of this act) from the education legacy
trust account created in RCW 83.100.230:
(a) Whether, by the 2018-19 school year, at least ninety percent of
the third graders are meeting the standard on the third grade reading
assessment administered in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070; and
(b) Whether, by the 2018-19 school year the rate for high school
completion has increased to ninety percent of the four-year cohort.
(2) By December 1st of each year, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction and the state board of education shall jointly
submit a report to the legislature on the progress towards meeting
these goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The appropriations contained in section
203 of this act are intended as the first stage of a linear
implementation of lower class size for kindergarten through third grade
and all-day kindergarten as required for full implementation by the
2017-18 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 This section establishes appropriations
for the biennium ending June 30, 2015, from the additional funds
deposited in the education legacy trust account as a result of Parts
III and IV of this act.
(1) The sum of fifty-five million dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30,
2015, from the education legacy trust account to the department of
early learning to provide additional early childhood education and
assistance program slots to all eligible three and four-year olds.
(2)(a) The sum of two hundred twenty million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2015, from the education legacy trust account to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to phase in, in a linear
fashion reduced class sizes in kindergarten through third grade to
achieve seventeen full-time equivalent students per teacher by the
2017-18 school year as required in RCW 28A.150.260(4)(b).
(b) The sum of six million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2015, from
the education legacy trust account to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to enhance the readiness to learn program.
(c) The sum of eighty-nine million three hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2015, from the education legacy trust account
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to phase in
all-day kindergarten in a linear fashion to achieve full statewide
implementation of all-day kindergarten by the 2017-18 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 The sum of one hundred seventy-five
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, must be
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2015, from the additional
funds deposited in the education legacy trust account as a result of
Parts III and IV of this act to institutions of higher education on a
per enrolled student basis to provide support to the institutions.

PART III
CAPITAL GAINS TAX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
Any term used in this chapter has the same meaning as when used in a
comparable context in the internal revenue code unless provided
otherwise.
(1) "Capital assets" has the same meaning as provided by section
1221 of the internal revenue code.
(2) "Capital gains" means the excess of the gains from sales or
exchanges of capital assets over the losses from such sales or
exchanges received by a person.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal
revenue code of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect
as of the effective date of this section.
(5) "Nonresident" means a person whose domicile is not in this
state and who does not reside in this state for more than one hundred
eighty-three days during the tax year.
(6) "Person" means a natural person.
(7)(a) "Resident" means a person whose domicile is in this state or
whose domicile is not in this state but who resides in this state for
more than one hundred eighty-three days during the tax year.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, once a person is a resident,
residency continues for three years, notwithstanding changes in
domicile.
(8) "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined
under the internal revenue code.
(9) "Taxpayer" means a person receiving capital gains subject to
tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 (1) Beginning January 1, 2014, a tax is
imposed on every person for the privilege of selling or exchanging
capital assets. The tax equals five percent multiplied by a person's
capital gains for each taxable year.
(2) For resident persons, all capital gains must be allocated to
this state.
(3) For nonresident persons, capital gains must be derived from
sources within this state and allocated to this state.
(4) The following threshold exemptions are allowed in determining
the tax under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Ten thousand dollars; or
(b) Twenty thousand dollars for persons filing joint returns under
section 314 of this act.
(5) Capital gains must be reported in the taxable year they are
received. Losses from the sale or exchange of capital assets may only
be used to offset gains from other sales or exchanges of capital assets
in the same taxable year.
(6) Receipts from this tax must be deposited into the education
legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 (1) This chapter does not apply to gain
from the sale of a principal residence if it is excluded from tax under
section 121 of the internal revenue code.
(2) This chapter does not apply to gain from the sale of a
principal residence that would be otherwise excluded from tax under
section 121(2) of the internal revenue code for registered domestic
partners or those married under chapter 26.04 RCW.
(3) This chapter does not apply to gain from the sale of a long-term principal residence if the gain exceeds the exemption allowed in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and it has been used by a person
as the person's principal residence for periods aggregating at least
ten years and owned by the person for at least the twenty-year period
ending on the date of the sale or exchange of the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 This chapter does not apply to capital
gains received by any person from age-qualified distributions from a
retirement savings account under section 401(k) of the internal revenue
code, a tax-sheltered annuity or a custodial account described in
section 403(b) of the internal revenue code, an individual retirement
account or an individual retirement annuity described in section 408 of
the internal revenue code, a Roth individual retirement account
described in section 408A of the internal revenue code, an employee
defined contribution program, an employee benefit plan, or similar
retirement savings vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 This chapter does not apply to amounts
received by any person for the sale or exchange of property as
authorized under the condemnation proceedings as provided by law for
the exercise of the power of eminent domain under Title 8 RCW,
regardless of whether the parties have settled the matter prior to
filing an action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 This chapter does not apply to amounts
received by any person for the sale or exchange of cattle, horses, or
breeding livestock held for more than twelve months by a taxpayer who
received in excess of fifty percent of his or her gross income from
farming or ranching.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 This chapter does not apply to amounts
received by any person from the sale of agricultural land who has
regular, continuous, and substantial involvement in the operation of
the agricultural land that meets the criteria for material
participation in an activity under section 469(h) of the internal
revenue code for the ten years prior to the date of the sale or
exchange of the agricultural land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 This chapter does not apply to amounts
received by any person from the sale of tangible personal property used
in a business and that would qualify for an income tax deduction under
section 167 or 179 of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 (1) The intent of this section is to
prevent the multiple taxation of capital gains in both Washington and
another taxing jurisdiction.
(2) As used in this section, "taxing jurisdiction" means any of the
states, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the
United States; any municipality, city, county, township, parish,
transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction; or other political
subdivision within the territorial limits of the United States with the
authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.
(3) A resident person is allowed a credit against the tax imposed
in section 302 of this act equal to the amount of tax paid to another
taxing jurisdiction on capital gains derived from sources within the
other taxing jurisdiction.
(4) The amount of tax credits received by any resident person under
this section may not exceed the total amount of tax due under this
chapter, and there may be no carryback or carryforward of any unused
credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 This chapter does not apply to the amounts
received for a sale of timber under section 631 (a) and (b) of the
internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 (1) Any person who knowingly attempts to
evade the tax imposed under this title or payment thereof is guilty of
a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, make returns, keep
records, or supply information, as required under this title, is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 (1) All taxpayers must file with the
department, on forms prescribed by the department, a capital gains tax
return for each taxable year. A person owing no tax for a taxable year
is not required to file a return for that year. Each person required
to file a return under this title must, without assessment, notice, or
demand, pay any tax due thereon to the department on or before the date
fixed for the filing of the return.
(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file,
on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 The due date of a return required to be
filed with the department must be the due date of the federal income
tax return or informational return for federal income tax purposes,
except as otherwise required by the department. The department may
grant extensions of times by which returns required to be filed by this
title may be submitted. The department may grant extensions of time to
pay tax with regard to taxes imposed by this title. Interest at the
rate as specified in RCW 82.32.050 must accrue during any extension
period and the interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
apply to late payments and deficiencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 (1) If the federal income tax liabilities
of both spouses are determined on a joint federal return for the
taxable year, they must file a joint return under this title.
(2) If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax
return for the taxable year, a joint return is required to be filed
under this title under the same conditions under which a joint return
may be filed for purposes of the federal income tax.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if the
federal income tax liability of either spouse is determined on a
separate federal return for the taxable year, they must file separate
returns under this title.
(4) In any case in which a joint return is filed under this
section, the liability of the husband and wife or partners is joint and
several, unless the spouse or partner is relieved of liability under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 6013 of the federal internal revenue code.
(5) Partners in a state registered domestic partnership or who have
a marriage licensed under chapter 26.04 RCW may file a joint return
under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 (1) Every person required to pay the tax
imposed under this title must keep records, render statements, make
returns, file reports, and perform other acts as the department
requires by rule. Each return must be made under penalty of perjury
and on forms prescribed by the department. The department may require
other statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on
forms prescribed by the department. The department may require any
taxpayer to furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or
document that the taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service
or received from the internal revenue service.
(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required
to be kept under this title are subject to inspection by the department
at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 (1) To the extent possible without being
inconsistent with this chapter, all of the provisions of the internal
revenue code relating to the time and manner of making returns,
extensions of time for filing returns, verification of returns, and the
time when a return is deemed filed apply to this chapter.
(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions
to requirements of subsection (1) of this section, if reasonably
necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable collection
of tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 (1) The department must refund all taxes
improperly paid or collected.
(2) The following sections apply to the administration of taxes
imposed under this title: RCW 82.32.050, 82.32.055, 82.32.060,
82.32.070, 82.32.080, 82.32.085, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105,
82.32.110, 82.32.117, 82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.135, 82.32.145,
82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, 82.32.200,
82.32.210, 82.32.212, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235, 82.32.237,
82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.300, 82.32.310, 82.32.320,
82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, 82.32.380, and 82.32.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 318 The department may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this
chapter. The rules, to the extent possible without being inconsistent
with this chapter, must follow the internal revenue code and the
regulations and rulings of the United States treasury department with
respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as a part
of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and treasury
department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 319 (1) An authorized agent providing closing
and settlement services in a conveyance is required to withhold from
consideration payable to a transferor an amount equal to the tax due
imposed under section 302 of this act.
(2) An authorized agent is not required to withhold amounts under
this section if:
(a) The conveyance is in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage, trust
deed, or other security instrument or a land sale contract with no
additional monetary consideration;
(b) The transferor is a personal representative, executor,
conservator, bankruptcy trustee, or other person acting under judicial
review;
(c) The transferor delivers to the authorized agent a written
assurance that the sale or exchange qualifies for exclusion of gain
under section 303, 305, or 307 of this act.
(3)(a) An authorized agent must electronically report the tax
withheld on forms prescribed by the department and remit electronic
payment of the tax to the department under the methods provided in RCW
82.32.080. An authorized agent must electronically file and make
payment under this subsection within twenty-five days after the end of
the month in which the conveyance occurred.
(b) The amount of tax due is a specific lien upon each parcel of
real property located in this state that is sold by a transferor. The
lien attached from the time of sale until the tax is withheld and paid
as provided by this section. The lien may be enforced in the manner
prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages.
(c) Amounts withheld pursuant to this section are held in trust for
Washington. If an authorized agent fails to remit an amount withheld
by the agent under this section by the time remittance is required, the
department may recover from the authorized agent the amount withheld,
plus interest and penalties as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW. The tax
collection provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the collection of
amounts withheld pursuant to this section but not remitted to the
department as required under this section.
(4) A transferor may claim the amount withheld by an authorized
agent on the transferor's tax return.
(5) An authorized agent may withhold funds under this section
without written instructions to withhold from the transferor.
(6) A written affidavit must be executed by the transferor or the
transferor's tax advisor under penalty of perjury and must contain the
transferor's taxpayer identification number. The authorized agent must
retain for six years from the date of the closing of the conveyance any
written affirmation obtained by the agent in connection with the
conveyance. The department must prescribe by rule the form and content
of the written affidavit.
(7) It is a defense to any claim by the department or by a
transferor against an agent that the agent has acted in reasonable
reliance upon representations made by the transferor or the
transferor's tax advisor.
(8) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Authorized agent" means an agent who is responsible for
closing and settlement services in a conveyance;
(b) "Closing and settlement services" means services that are
provided by:
(i) A licensed escrow agent in a real estate closing escrow; or
(ii) An attorney for the benefit of a transferor or a transferee in
a conveyance, if, simultaneously with the conveyance, the attorney
deposits the unpaid purchase price into the attorney's client trust
account for disbursal pursuant to the written instructions of, or the
agreement between, the transferor and transferee;
(c) "Consideration" includes the amount of cash paid for a
conveyance and the amount of any lien, mortgage, contract, indebtedness
or other encumbrance existing against the property conveyed to which
the property remains subject or which the purchaser agrees to pay or
assume;
(d) "Conveyance" means a sale or exchange of any real estate
located in Washington;
(e) "Net proceeds" means the net amount to be disbursed to the
transferor, prior to reduction for withholding, as shown on the
transferor's settlement statement for the conveyance; and
(f) "Transferor" means a person, as defined in section 301 of this
act, on the closing date of the conveyance.

Sec. 320 RCW 82.45.090 and 2009 c 350 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
((where)) when no instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the
official real property records of the county in which the property is
located, the tax imposed by this chapter ((shall)) and the tax withheld
under section 319 of this act must be paid to and collected by the
treasurer of the county within which is located the real property which
was sold.
(2) In collecting the tax under this section the treasurer
((shall)) must act as agent for the state.
(a) The county treasurer ((shall)) must cause a verification of
payment evidencing satisfaction of the lien to be affixed to the
instrument of sale or conveyance prior to its recording or to the real
estate excise tax affidavit in the case of used mobile home sales and
used floating home sales.
(i) A receipt issued by the county treasurer for the payment of the
tax imposed under this chapter ((shall be)) is evidence of the
satisfaction of the lien imposed hereunder and may be recorded in the
manner prescribed for recording satisfactions of mortgages.
(ii) No instrument of sale or conveyance evidencing a sale subject
to the tax ((shall)) may be accepted by the county auditor for filing
or recording until the tax ((shall have)) has been paid and the
verification of payment affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due on
the transfer, the instrument ((shall)) may not be so accepted until
suitable notation of such fact has been made on the instrument by the
treasurer.
(iii) Any time there is a sale of a used mobile home, used
manufactured home, used park model, or used floating home that has not
been title eliminated, property taxes must be current in order to
complete the processing of the real estate excise tax affidavit or
other documents transferring title.
(iv) Verification that the property taxes are current must be noted
on the mobile home real estate excise tax affidavit or on a form
approved by the county treasurer.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "mobile home,"
"manufactured home," and "park model" have the same meaning as provided
in RCW 59.20.030.
(((2))) (3) For a sale of a beneficial interest in real property
((where)) when a tax is due under this chapter and ((where)) when no
instrument is recorded in the official real property records of the
county in which the property is located, the sale ((shall)) must be
reported to the department of revenue within five days from the date of
the sale on such returns or forms and according to such procedures as
the department may prescribe. Such forms or returns ((shall)) must be
signed by both the transferor and the transferee and shall be
accompanied by payment of the tax due.
(((3))) (4) Any person who intentionally makes a false statement on
any return or form required to be filed with the department under this
chapter is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 321 RCW 82.45.150 and 1996 c 149 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All of chapter 82.32 RCW, except RCW 82.32.030, 82.32.050,
82.32.140, 82.32.270, and 82.32.090 (1) and (((8))) (10), applies to
the tax imposed by this chapter, in addition to any other provisions of
law for the payment and enforcement of the tax imposed by this chapter.
The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide by rule ((provide))
for the effective administration of this chapter. The rules ((shall))
must prescribe and furnish a real estate excise tax affidavit form
verified by both the seller and the buyer, or agents of each, to be
used by each county, or the department, as the case may be, in the
collection of the tax imposed by this chapter, except that an affidavit
given in connection with grant of an easement or right-of-way to a gas,
electrical, or telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010,
or to a public utility district or cooperative that distributes
electricity, need be verified only on behalf of the company, district,
or cooperative. The department of revenue ((shall)) must annually
conduct audits of transactions and affidavits filed under this chapter.
(2) The department may combine the form required in section 312 of
this act with the real estate excise tax affidavit form required in
this section.

Sec. 322 RCW 83.100.230 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, expenditures from the
account may be used only for support of the common schools, and for
expanding access to higher education through funding for new
enrollments and financial aid, and other educational improvement
efforts. Moneys deposited into this account as required under Parts
III and IV of this act cannot supplant existing state funding and must
be used for expanded funding for kindergarten through third grade class
size reduction, early childhood education and assistance program slots,
all-day kindergarten, the readiness to learn program, enrollment
support for higher education, enhancements to basic education, and
other programs to enhance student preparedness and learning.

PART IV
EXTENSION OF EXISTING TAXES
Sec. 401 RCW 66.24.290 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1301 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board. Any certificate of approval holder authorized to act
as a distributor under RCW 66.24.270 ((shall)) must pay the taxes
imposed by this section.
(a) Every such brewery or beer distributor ((shall)) must report
all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and
((shall)) must pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of
manufacturing and selling the beer and strong beer within the state a
tax of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on
sales to licensees within the state and on sales to licensees within
the state of bottled and canned beer, including strong beer, ((shall))
must pay a tax computed in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty
cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
(b) Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is
not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer and strong beer ((shall)) must be sold by breweries and
distributors in sealed barrels or packages.
(c) The moneys collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be
distributed as follows: (i) Three-tenths of a percent ((shall)) must
be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (ii) of the
remaining moneys: (A) Twenty percent ((shall)) must be distributed to
counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (B) eighty
percent ((shall)) must be distributed to incorporated cities and towns
in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.
(d) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase beer from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
brewery or microbrewery ((shall)) must make monthly reports to the
liquor control board on beer purchased during the preceding calendar
month in the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the
board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax ((shall))
must be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of
the following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on July 1,
1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) ((shall)) must be deposited in the state general
fund.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051 of the
federal internal revenue code, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule consistent with
the purposes of the exemption under subsection (3)(b) of this section.
The additional tax is equal to one dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth day
of the following month, three percent of the revenues collected from
this additional tax ((shall)) must be distributed to border areas under
RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys ((shall)) must be transferred to
the state general fund.
(5)(a) From June 1, 2010, through ((June 30, 2013)) December 31,
2015, an additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject
to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is
equal to fifteen dollars and fifty cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on July 1,
1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the ((state general
fund)) education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.
(6) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(7) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.

Sec. 402 RCW 82.04.29002 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning May 1, 2010, through ((June 30, 2013)) December 31,
2015, an additional rate of tax of 0.30 percent is added to the rate
provided for in RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.285, and 82.04.290(2)(a). All
revenues collected from the additional tax under this section must be
deposited into the education legacy trust account created in RCW
83.100.230.
(2)(a) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to persons engaging within this state in business as a
hospital. "Hospital" has the meaning provided in chapter 70.41 RCW but
also includes any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12
RCW if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(b) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to amounts received from performing scientific research and
development services including but not limited to research and
development in the physical, engineering, and life sciences (such as
agriculture, bacteriological, biotechnology, chemical, life sciences,
and physical science research and development laboratories or
services).

PART V
REFERENDUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) The secretary of state must submit
Part III of this act to the people for their adoption and ratification,
or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in
accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the
laws adopted to facilitate its operation.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 29A.72.050(6), the statement of subject and
concise description for the ballot title must read: "The legislature
has passed . . . Bill No. . . . (this act), concerning creating a
capital gains tax to fund results in education. This measure would
impose a 5.0 percent state excise tax on capital gains above ten
thousand dollars per person, exempt gains on most residences, and
provide that all capital gains tax revenues must be deposited into the
education legacy trust account to fund education."

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Part I of this act and sections 301
through 319 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 This act, being necessary for the welfare
of the state and its inhabitants, must be liberally construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---