BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.005 and 2000 c 81 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agricultural products" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.213.
(2) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(((2))) (3) "Drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use
on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds who enters a port district for the purpose of
transporting containerized cargo other than agricultural products.
(4) "Rural port district" means a port district formed under
chapter 53.04 RCW and located in a county with an average population
density of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile.
(((3))) (5) "Telecommunications" has the same meaning as contained
in RCW 80.04.010.
(((4))) (6) "Telecommunications facilities" means lines, conduits,
ducts, poles, wires, cables, crossarms, receivers, transmitters,
instruments, machines, appliances, instrumentalities and all devices,
real estate, easements, apparatus, property, and routes used, operated,
owned, or controlled by any entity to facilitate the provision of
telecommunications services.
(((5))) (7) "Wholesale telecommunications services" means the
provision of telecommunications services or facilities for resale by an
entity authorized to provide telecommunications services to the general
public and internet service providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A port district shall employ drayage truck operators to
transport containerized cargo other than agricultural products at or
through the port. A port district may enter into contracts with cargo
owners and shippers to provide the services of such drayage truck
operators.
(2) All transporting of containerized cargo other than agricultural
products in a port district must take place pursuant to a contract or
contracts entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section applies only to a port district in a county with
a population of eight hundred thousand or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---