BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.180 and 2011 c 375 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) School districts may install and operate automated school bus
safety cameras on school buses to be used for the detection of
violations of RCW 46.61.370(1) if the use of the cameras is approved by
a vote of the school district board of directors. School districts are
not required to take school buses out of service if the buses are not
equipped with automated school bus safety cameras or functional
automated safety cameras. Further, school districts shall be held
harmless from and not liable for any criminal or civil liability
arising under the provisions of this section.
(a) Automated school bus safety cameras may only take pictures of
the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(b) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter
of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and
address under subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section. The law
enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include a
certificate or facsimile of the notice, based upon inspection of
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an
automated school bus safety camera, stating the facts supporting the
notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie
evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding
charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be
available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to
adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a
notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated school
bus safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.
(c) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(e) unless the registered owner
overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental
car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (2) of this
section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section is responsible for an
infraction.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are
for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties
under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used
in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or
proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph,
microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other
than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer
than necessary to enforce this section.
(e) If a school district installs and operates an automated school
bus safety camera under this section, the compensation paid to the
manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only upon
the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support
of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine or civil
penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment. Further,
any repair, replacement, or administrative work costs related to
installing or repairing automated school bus safety cameras must be
solely paid for by the manufacturer or vender of the cameras. Before
entering into a contract with the manufacturer or vendor of the
equipment used under this subsection (1)(e), the school district must
follow the competitive bid process as outlined in RCW 28A.335.190(1).
(f) Any revenue collected from infractions detected through the use
of automated school bus safety cameras, less the administration and
operating costs of the cameras, must be remitted to school districts
for school zone and school bus safety projects as determined by the
school district using the automated school bus safety cameras. The
administration and operating costs of the cameras includes infraction
enforcement and processing costs that are incurred by local law
enforcement or local courts.
(2)(a) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction is issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(i) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred;
(ii) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the
infraction. A statement provided under this subsection (2)(a)(ii) must
be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle
theft; or
(iii) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable penalty.
(b) Timely mailing of a statement under this subsection to the
issuing law enforcement agency relieves a rental car business of any
liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction.
(3) For purposes of this section, "automated school bus safety
camera" means a device that is affixed to a school bus that is
synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a vehicle at the
time the vehicle is detected for an infraction identified in RCW
46.61.370(1).

--- END ---