BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public hospital district with a population exceeding two
hundred eighty-five thousand persons, as determined by estimates
compiled by the office of financial management, may be dissolved
pursuant to the procedure specified in this section if a majority of
district voters voting on a ballot proposition to dissolve the district
approve the proposition. This section does not preclude dissolution of
a public hospital district by any other authorized procedure.
(2) A ballot proposition to dissolve a public hospital district
must be submitted to district voters if:
(a) The district board of commissioners adopts a resolution
proposing dissolution of the district; or
(b) District voters submit a petition complying with subsection (3)
of this section proposing dissolution of the district.
(3) A petition proposing dissolution of the public hospital
district must be:
(a) Signed by at least ten percent of qualified voters residing in
the district;
(b) Submitted to the auditor of the county in which the district is
located or, if the district is located in more than one county, the
auditor of the county in which the largest portion of the district is
located; and
(c) Reviewed by the auditor to certify that the petition includes
sufficient valid signatures.
(4) A ballot proposition to dissolve a public hospital district may
only be voted upon by district voters at a general election occurring
at least sixty days after adoption of a resolution or submission of a
petition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If a ballot proposition to dissolve a public hospital district
is approved by district voters, the county legislative authority of the
county in which the district is located or, if the district is located
in more than one county, the county legislative authorities of the
counties in which the district is located, must commence winding down
the district's operations, including specifying the manner in which the
district's assets will be liquidated and the district's outstanding
indebtedness will be paid.
(6) If proceeds of the sale of the public hospital district's
assets and funds held by the district are sufficient to pay the
district's outstanding indebtedness and any costs of liquidating
district assets, excess funds must be disbursed to the county or, if
the district is located in more than one county, disbursed to the
counties in which the district is located on a per capita basis.
(7) If proceeds of the sale of the public hospital district's
assets and funds held by the district are insufficient to pay the
district's outstanding indebtedness and any costs of liquidating
district assets, the county legislative authority of the county in
which the public hospital district is located or, if the district is
located in more than one county, the county legislative authorities of
the counties in which the district is located, must levy taxes in the
district in the manner provided by law to pay the district's
outstanding indebtedness and any costs of liquidating district assets.
(8) The public hospital district shall be dissolved after final
payment of the district's outstanding indebtedness and any costs of
liquidating district assets.

--- END ---