BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.37.030 and 2010 c 106 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
Prior to calendar year 2013, a claimant may defer payment of fifty
percent of special assessments or real property taxes, or both, listed
on the annual tax statement in any year in which all of the following
conditions are met:
(1) The special assessments or property taxes must be imposed upon
a residence that was occupied by the claimant as a principal place of
residence as of January 1st of the year in which the assessments and
taxes are due, subject to the exceptions allowed under RCW
84.36.381(1);
(2) The claimant must have combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, of fifty-seven thousand dollars or less in the
calendar year preceding the filing of the declaration;
(3) The claimant must have paid one-half of the total amount of
special assessments and property taxes listed on the annual tax
statement for the year in which the deferral claim is made;
(4) A deferral is not allowed for special assessments, property
taxes, or both, levied for collection in the first five calendar years
in which the person owns the residence;
(5) The claimant who defers payment of special assessments or real
property taxes, or both, listed on the annual tax statement under this
section must also meet the conditions of RCW 84.38.030 (4) and (5);
(6) The total amount deferred by a claimant under this chapter must
not exceed forty percent of the amount of the claimant's equity value
in the claimant's residence; and
(7) The claimant may not defer taxes under both this chapter and
chapter 84.38 RCW in the same tax year.

--- END ---