BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2014, the office of financial management shall
compile, maintain, and periodically update an inventory of all fees
imposed by state agencies and institutions of higher education pursuant
to statute or administrative rule. At a minimum, the inventory shall
identify the agency or institution collecting the fee, the purpose of
the fee, the current amount of the fee, the amount of the fee over the
previous five years, and the statutory authority for the fee. The
office of financial management may aggregate or consolidate fee
information when there is commonality among the fee payers or the
purposes for which the fee is paid.
(2) To facilitate the fee inventory under this section, each state
agency and institution of higher education shall report the information
required under subsection (1) of this section to the office of
financial management and shall update the information at least every
two years.
(3) The fee inventory under this section shall be incorporated into
the state expenditure information web site maintained by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee under RCW
44.48.150.
(4) The office of financial management shall convene a work group
consisting of representatives from the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, the office of regulatory assistance,
the department of licensing, the department of labor and industries,
the department of transportation, and the department of health to
develop a process to facilitate more frequent updates to the inventory
and to recommend changes to increase public accessibility.
(5) For purposes of this section, "fee" means any charge, fixed by
law or administrative rule, for the benefit of a service or to cover
the cost of a regulatory program or the costs of administering a
program for which the fee payer benefits. "Fee" does not include
taxes; penalties or fines; intergovernmental charges; commercial
charges; pension or health care contributions or rates; industrial,
unemployment, or other state-operated insurance programs; or
individualized cost recoveries.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.48.150 and 2008 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2009, in collaboration with the office of
financial management, using existing databases and structures currently
shared, the office of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee shall establish and make available to the public a
searchable state expenditure information web site. The state
expenditure information web site shall provide access to current budget
data, access to current accounting data for budgeted expenditures and
staff, and access to historical data. At a minimum, the web site will
provide access or links to the following information as data are
available:
(a) State expenditures by fund or account;
(b) State expenditures by agency, program, and subprogram;
(c) State revenues by major source;
(d) State expenditures by object and subobject;
(e) State agency workloads, caseloads, and performance measures,
and recent performance audits; ((and))
(f) State agency budget data by activity; and
(g) The inventory of state agency fees required by section 1 of
this act.
(2) "State agency," as used in this section, includes every state
agency, office, board, commission, or institution of the executive,
legislative, or judicial branches, including institutions of higher
education.
(3) The state expenditure information web site shall be updated
periodically as subsequent fiscal year data become available, and the
prior year expenditure data shall be maintained by the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee as part of its ten-year
historical budget data.

--- END ---