BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.520 and 2005 c 12 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
To the extent funds are available, public school districts must
comply with high-performance public ((building[s])) buildings
requirements under RCW 39.35D.010, 39.35D.020, 39.35D.040, 39.35D.060,
and 28A.150.530.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.118 and 2000 c 126 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall notify senior high schools and any other
public school that includes ninth grade of the names and contact
information of public and private entities offering programs leading to
college credit, including information about online advanced placement
classes, if the superintendent has knowledge of such entities and if
the cost of reporting these entities is minimal.
(2) Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, each senior high school
and any other public school that includes ninth grade shall publish
annually and deliver to each parent with children enrolled in ninth
through twelfth grades, information concerning the entrance
requirements and the availability of programs in the local area that
lead to college credit, including classes such as advanced placement,
running start, tech-prep, skill centers, college in the high school,
and international baccalaureate programs. The information may be
included with other information the school regularly mails to parents.
In addition, each senior high school and any other public school that
includes ninth grade shall enclose information of the names and contact
information of other public or private entities offering such programs,
including online advanced placement programs, to its ninth through
twelfth grade students if the school has knowledge of such entities.
(3) This section is suspended until July 1, 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.300.150 and 2006 c 263 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall collect and
disseminate to school districts information on child abuse and neglect
prevention curriculum and shall adopt rules dealing with the prevention
of child abuse for purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.
The superintendent of public instruction and the departments of social
and health services and ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce shall share relevant information. Providing online access to
the information satisfies the requirements of this section unless a
parent or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in
written form.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a
student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the
student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student
assessment for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school statewide student assessment shall
earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a student does not
successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas
required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student
may retake the assessment in the content area up to four times at no
cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state
standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative
assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section,
a student may use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate
that the student successfully meets the state standards for that
content area if the student has taken the statewide student assessment
at least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards
on the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2015, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide
student assessment or the objective alternative assessments in order to
earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a high school completion program at a
community or technical college. The superintendent of public
instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall jointly identify means by which students in these programs can be
assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized
in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the statewide student assessment. A student's score on the science
portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the SAT may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section as soon
as the state board of education determines that sufficient data is
available to identify reliable equivalent scores for the science
content area of the statewide student assessment. After the first
scores are established, the state board may increase but not decrease
the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.
(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be
used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the
statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examinations
in English literature and composition, macroeconomics, microeconomics,
psychology, United States history, world history, United States
government and politics, or comparative government and politics may be
used as an alternative assessment for the reading portion of the
statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examination
in biology, physics, chemistry, or environmental science may be used as
an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide
student assessment.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(((12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for
eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the
content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year
or who may not be on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or
absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the
information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent
conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools
serving English language learner students and their parents shall
translate the plan into the primary language of the family. The plan
shall include the following information as applicable:
(a) The student's results on the state assessment;
(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(c) Any credit deficiencies;
(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(h) The alternative assessment options available to students under
this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(j) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma
options under RCW 28B.50.535.))

Sec. 5 RCW 39.35D.040 and 2011 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public school districts
receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed and
constructed to at least the LEED silver standard or the Washington
sustainable school design protocol. To the extent appropriate LEED
silver or Washington sustainable school design protocol standards exist
for the type of building or facility, this subsection applies to major
facility projects that have not received project approval from the
superintendent of public instruction prior to: (a) July 1, 2006, for
volunteering school districts; (b) July 1, 2007, for class one school
districts; and (c) July 1, 2008, for class two school districts.
(2) Public school districts under this section shall: (a) Monitor
and document appropriate operating benefits and savings resulting from
major facility projects designed and constructed as required under this
section for a minimum of five years following local board acceptance of
a project receiving state funding; and (b) report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction. The form and content of each
report must be mutually developed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction in consultation with school districts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall consolidate the
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into one report and
report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the
superintendent of public instruction shall also report on the
implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard
or Washington sustainable school design protocol was not used as
required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The superintendent of public
instruction shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing
implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives
and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
issue guidelines for administering this chapter for public school
districts. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and
method for employing and verifying compliance with the LEED silver
standard or the Washington sustainable school design protocol.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the
school facilities advisory board as a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of affected public schools, the
superintendent of public instruction, the department, and others at the
superintendent of public instruction's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the
superintendent of public instruction implement this chapter.
(6) For projects that comply with this section by meeting the LEED
silver standard, the superintendent of public instruction must credit
one additional point for a project that uses wood products with a
credible third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests
regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act.
For projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an
additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the
LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(7) School districts are required to comply with this section only
to the extent federal or state funds are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.220.050 (Information on proper use of left-hand lane)
and 1986 c 93 s 4;
(2) RCW 28A.220.080 (Information on motorcycle awareness) and 2007
c 97 s 4 & 2004 c 126 s 1;
(3) RCW 28A.230.150 (Temperance and Good Citizenship Day -- Aids in
programming) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.090; and
(4) RCW 28A.320.185 (School gardens or farms) and 2008 c 215 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---