BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Data provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the 2010-11 school year
indicated twenty-five percent of the state's high school students did
not graduate on time. The Washington state institute for public policy
estimates, based on 2010 data and dollars, that a high school dropout
will lose two hundred twenty-eight thousand dollars in lifetime
earnings. The federal bureau of labor statistics reported that in
2012, Washington residents between the ages of sixteen and nineteen had
an unemployment rate of twenty-eight percent, and that during the same
period, males of that age experienced an unemployment rate of thirty-three percent.
Research on effective dropout prevention and reengagement practices
highlight linking educational programs to career readiness and
improving the transition between school and careers. The legislature
intends to improve outcomes for youth and young adults, specifically
those at risk of not completing high school or those who have already
dropped out of high school, through additional strategies integrating
education with skills training and work experience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "ASSET program" means the alliance for student success in
education and training program.
(b) "Institutions of higher education" or "postsecondary
institutions" has the definition in RCW 28B.10.016.
(c) "Public schools" has the definition in RCW 28A.150.010.
(d) "State education and workforce agencies" means the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the student
achievement council, the Washington state school directors'
association, the workforce training and education coordinating board,
and the employment security department.
(e) "STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.
(f) "Youth" means a person age twenty-four or younger.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the ASSET
program is established to increase connections and access to work-integrated learning opportunities, particularly in STEM fields. The
program is also intended to encourage the development of forums in
local communities through increased public-private partnerships for the
exchange of ideas, innovations, and expertise among local businesses,
local business organizations, labor organizations, public schools,
apprenticeship councils, and institutions of higher education. The
board shall administer the program.
(3) In administering the ASSET program, the board may receive and
expend federal funds and private gifts or grants, which funds must be
expended in accordance with any conditions upon which the funds are
contingent. The board, in collaboration with business and labor
organizations as well as state education and workforce agencies, shall:
(a) Develop technical assistance materials to guide employers in
the design and implementation of work-integrated learning opportunities
and programs;
(b) Develop technical assistance materials to guide schools in the
design and implementation of work-integrated learning opportunities and
programs that assist schools in encouraging students to explore and
select work-integrated opportunities that maximize their educational
experience;
(c) Develop a web-based matching and communications system,
accessible to schools, service providers, and individual students, for
employers to post work-integrated learning opportunities. The system
must also provide access to the technical assistance materials for
employers, schools, and students developed under this section; and
(d) Designate up to eight workforce development councils as pilot
regional coordinators for the ASSET program through a competitive
matching grant application process. The purpose of the designation is
to establish a single point of contact for voluntary local
coordination, reduce duplication of effort, achieve economies of scale,
and create opportunities for successful grant seeking and leveraging of
private and public resources.
(4) Pilot regional program coordinators must, in collaboration with
state education and workforce agencies:
(a) Serve as a clearinghouse for summer and year-round youth
employment and other work-integrated learning opportunities for
students in the region;
(b) In collaboration with business and labor organizations,
actively recruit employers to provide work-integrated learning
opportunities, particularly in STEM fields, for youth and participating
schools;
(c) In collaboration with business and labor organizations,
leverage resources to implement and sustain the ASSET program in the
targeted community;
(d) Disseminate technical assistance materials developed under
subsection (3)(a) of this section to interested employers;
(e) Work with public schools, institutions of higher education,
apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs, and workforce training
programs to develop internship, mentoring, and advising opportunities
for public school students by individuals in the local business and
labor communities;
(f) Encourage the use of the web-based matching and communications
system for work-integrated learning opportunities developed under
subsection (3)(c) of this section; and
(g) Report annually to the board data required to complete
subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The board, in consultation with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall design and implement a
performance monitoring system to track the outcomes of the ASSET
program. As of December 2015, the board shall submit an annual
performance report on the program to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the governor.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "work-integrated learning
opportunities" include but are not limited to:
(a) Paid and unpaid internships that provide sustained work and
learning experiences;
(b) Paid and unpaid work experience;
(c) Youth apprenticeships and preapprenticeships;
(d) Advising from employers and workers related to student projects
or programs of study;
(e) Simulated or virtual workplace experiences and enterprises;
(f) Visits to worksites to learn about employers, occupations, job
skills, or other work-related issues;
(g) Mentoring that provides professional input to a student's
career pathway; and
(h) Job shadowing related to a student's career pathway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2013, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---