BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.41A.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 706 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief information officer shall establish standards and
policies to govern information technology in the state of Washington.
(2) The office shall have the following powers and duties related
to information services:
(a) To develop statewide standards and policies governing the
acquisition and disposition of equipment, software, and personal and
purchased services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of
state agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(c) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services;
(d) To develop a detailed business plan for any service or activity
to be contracted under RCW 41.06.142(7)(b) by the consolidated
technology services agency;
(e) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The office shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary; ((and))
(f) To develop standards based on leading usability practices that
enable agencies to produce clear, consistent, and usable web content.
Standards should include requirements such as:
(i) A prominent, consistently labeled link to business regulations
and information on the agency home page;
(ii) Clear pathways within a minimum number of clicks from the home
page to specific license and permit applications;
(iii) Periodic usability testing by business customers to verify
web sites are complete and easy to use; and
(iv) Measuring the results of web site revisions to ensure they
produce the intended results; and
(g) To establish policies for the periodic review by the office of
agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management.
(3) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The office shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems; and
(b) Require agencies to include an evaluation of electronic public
access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of
systems.
In developing these standards, the office is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(4) The office shall perform other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---