BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.070 and 2009 c 333 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may pay no more than one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per fiscal year from the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170 for claims and assessment costs for damage to commercial
crops caused by wild big horn sheep, deer, or elk submitted under RCW
77.36.100.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.080 and 2009 c 333 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the legislature declares an emergency under this
section, the department may pay no more than thirty thousand dollars
per fiscal year from the general fund for claims and assessment costs
for damage to commercial crops caused by wild big horn sheep, deer, or
elk submitted under RCW 77.36.100.
(2)(a) The legislature may declare an emergency if weather, fire,
or other natural events result in big horn sheep, deer, or elk causing
excessive damage to commercial crops.
(b) After an emergency declaration, the department may pay as much
as may be subsequently appropriated, in addition to the funds
authorized under subsection (1) of this section, for claims and
assessment costs under RCW 77.36.100. Such money shall be used to pay
wildlife interaction claims only if the claim meets the conditions of
RCW 77.36.100 and the department has expended all funds authorized
under RCW 77.36.070 or subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.100 and 2009 c 333 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as limited by RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080, the
department shall offer to distribute money appropriated to pay claims
to the owner of commercial crops for damage caused by wild big horn
sheep, deer, or elk or to the owners of commercial livestock that has
been killed by bears, wolves, or cougars, or injured by bears, wolves,
or cougars to such a degree that the market value of the commercial
livestock has been diminished. Payments for claims for damage to
commercial livestock are not subject to the limitations of RCW
77.36.070 and 77.36.080, but may not exceed the total amount
specifically appropriated therefor.
(b) Owners of commercial crops or commercial livestock are only
eligible for a claim under this subsection if:
(i) The owner satisfies the definition of "eligible farmer" in RCW
82.08.855;
(ii) The conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied; and
(iii) The damage caused to the commercial crop or commercial
livestock satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(c) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria that
clarifies the damage to commercial crops and commercial livestock
qualifying for compensation under this subsection. An owner of a
commercial crop or commercial livestock must satisfy the criteria prior
to receiving compensation under this subsection. The criteria for
damage adopted under this subsection must include, but not be limited
to, a required minimum economic loss to the owner of the commercial
crop or commercial livestock, which may not be set at a value of less
than five hundred dollars.
(d)(i) The department must maintain separate lists of claims for
compensation for damage to commercial crops and damage to commercial
livestock submitted under this section that have been approved for
payment but not yet fully paid. The lists must each be organized
chronologically based on the date the claim was received. As funding
becomes available under this chapter or from any other source, the
department must pay claims for which the funds are available in the
chronological order they appear on the appropriate list. The
department must retain and pay claims on the lists across fiscal years
and biennia.
(ii) The payment of a claim included on the lists maintained by the
department under this section is conditional on the availability of
specific funding for that purpose and is not a guarantee of
reimbursement.
(2)(a) The department may offer to provide noncash compensation
only to offset wildlife interactions to a person who applies to the
department for compensation for damage to property other than
commercial crops or commercial livestock that is the result of a
mammalian or avian species of wildlife on a case-specific basis if the
conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied and if the damage
satisfies the criteria for damage established by the commission under
this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
damage to property other than a commercial crop or commercial livestock
that is damaged by wildlife and may be eligible for compensation under
this subsection, including criteria for filing a claim for compensation
under this subsection.
(3)(a) To prevent or offset wildlife interactions, the department
may offer materials or services to a person who applies to the
department for assistance in providing mitigating actions designed to
reduce wildlife interactions if the actions are designed to address
damage that satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
mitigating actions designed to address wildlife interactions that may
be eligible for materials and services under this section, including
criteria for submitting an application under this section.
(4) An owner who files a claim under this section may appeal the
decision of the department pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
if the claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the owner and the owner disagrees with the
amount of compensation determined by the department.

--- END ---