BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.42.120 and 2010 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no sign
except a sign of type 1 or 2 or those type 3 signs that advertise
activities conducted upon the properties where the signs are located,
may be erected or maintained without a permit issued by the department.
Application for a permit shall be made to the department on forms
furnished by it. The forms shall contain a statement that the owner or
lessee of the land in question has consented thereto. For type 8 signs
(temporary agricultural directional signs), when the land in question
is owned by the department, the consent statement must be reviewed and,
if the sign does not create a safety concern, be approved within ten
days of application by the department. The application shall be
accompanied by a fee established by department rule to be deposited
with the state treasurer to the credit of the motor vehicle fund.
Permits shall be for the remainder of the calendar year in which they
are issued, and accompanying fees shall not be prorated for fractions
of the year. Permits must be renewed annually through a certification
process established by department rule. Advertising copy may be
changed at any time without the payment of an additional fee.
Assignment of permits in good standing is effective only upon receipt
of written notice of assignment by the department. A permit may be
revoked after hearing if the department finds that any statement made
in the application or annual certification process was false or
misleading, or that the sign covered is not in good general condition
and in a reasonable state of repair, or is otherwise in violation of
this chapter, if the false or misleading information has not been
corrected and the sign has not been brought into compliance with this
chapter or rules adopted under it within thirty days after written
notification. Beginning July 1, 2014, the department shall establish
and charge by rule an annual fee for type 4 and 5 sign permits. The
fee must reasonably recover costs for outdoor advertising control
program administration and enforcement and may not exceed one hundred
fifty dollars. The department shall establish by rule exemptions from
payment of the annual fee for type 4 and 5 signs that do not generate
rental income.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.42.130 and 1999 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every permit issued by the department shall be assigned a separate
identification number, and each permittee shall fasten to each sign a
weatherproof label, not larger than ((sixteen)) twenty-eight square
inches, that shall be furnished by the department and on which shall be
plainly visible the permit number. The permittee shall also place his
or her name in a conspicuous position on the front or back of each
sign. The failure of a sign to have such a label affixed to it is
prima facie evidence that it is not in compliance with the provisions
of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 47.42.048 (State and local prohibitions)
and 1974 ex.s. c 80 s 3 are each repealed.

--- END ---