BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.04.021 and 1999 c 397 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The juvenile court shall be a division of the superior court.
In judicial districts having more than one judge of the superior court,
the judges of such court shall annually assign one or more of their
number to the juvenile court division. In any judicial district having
a court commissioner, the court commissioner shall have the power,
authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with a juvenile court judge, to
hear all cases under this chapter and to enter judgment and make orders
with the same power, force, and effect as any judge of the juvenile
court, subject to motion or demand by any party within ten days from
the entry of the order or judgment by the court commissioner as
provided in RCW 2.24.050. In any judicial district having a family law
commissioner appointed pursuant to chapter 26.12 RCW, the family law
commissioner shall have the power, authority, and jurisdiction,
concurrent with a juvenile court judge, to hear cases under Title 13
RCW and chapter 28A.225 RCW as provided in RCW 26.12.010, and to enter
judgment and make orders with the same power, force, and effect as any
judge of the juvenile court, subject to motion or demand by any party
within ten days from the entry of the order or judgment by the court
commissioner as provided in RCW 2.24.050.
(2) Cases in the juvenile court shall be tried without a jury,
except for termination of parental rights cases under chapter 13.34
RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.090 and 2000 c 122 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any party has a right to be represented by an attorney in all
proceedings under this chapter, to introduce evidence, to be heard in
his or her own behalf, to examine witnesses, to receive a decision
based solely on the evidence adduced at the hearing, and to an unbiased
fact finder.
(2) At all stages of a proceeding in which a child is alleged to be
dependent, the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian has the
right to be represented by counsel, and if indigent, to have counsel
appointed for him or her by the court. Unless waived in court, counsel
shall be provided to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian,
if such person (a) has appeared in the proceeding or requested the
court to appoint counsel and (b) is financially unable to obtain
counsel because of indigency.
(3) If a party to an action under this chapter is represented by
counsel, no order shall be provided to that party for his or her
signature without prior notice and provision of the order to counsel.
(4) Copies of department of social and health services or
supervising agency records to which parents have legal access pursuant
to chapter 13.50 RCW shall be given to the child's parent, guardian,
legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel, prior to any shelter care
hearing and within fifteen days after the department or supervising
agency receives a written request for such records from the parent,
guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel. These records
shall be provided to the child's parents, guardian, legal custodian, or
legal counsel a reasonable period of time prior to the shelter care
hearing in order to allow an opportunity to review the records prior to
the hearing. These records shall be legible and shall be provided at
no expense to the parents, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her
counsel. When the records are served on legal counsel, legal counsel
shall have the opportunity to review the records with the parents and
shall review the records with the parents prior to the shelter care
hearing.
(5) The right to trial by jury shall apply to all termination
actions. The rules of evidence shall apply, and shall not be relaxed
in all jury trials in termination actions.

--- END ---