BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: Since 2010,
the department of commerce and the office of regulatory assistance have
convened and coordinated a number of cross-agency collaborative
regulatory streamlining efforts focused on improving the regulatory
experience for small businesses, while maintaining public health and
safety; the department of commerce has established efficient and
effective regulation as one of its four global priorities to support
the mission to grow and improve jobs; the state auditor's office issued
a regulatory performance audit in 2012 identifying many agency actions
that can also improve the business community's ability to comply with
regulatory requirements; and the Washington state economic development
commission's 2012 comprehensive statewide strategy emphasized the need
for smarter regulations in order to achieve long-term global
competitiveness, prosperity, and economic opportunity for all the
state's citizens.
(2) The legislature further finds that while individual agency
streamlining activities result in improvements, businesses are required
to interact with many state and local agencies, all with unique
requirements, processes, forms, instructions, payment options, and
electronic transaction capabilities. Cross-agency and cross-jurisdictional regulatory improvements are needed to meaningfully
improve the overall business customer experience and ability to more
easily understand and comply with requirements.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to authorize a business
regulatory efficiency program administered by the department of
commerce with the goal of providing an improved regulatory environment
in Washington. By enhancing, simplifying, and better coordinating
state and local regulatory processes for specific industry sectors, the
amount of time it takes businesses to conduct their interactions with
state government will decrease, compliance will increase, and
businesses will have the opportunity to generate more revenue and
create more jobs, thereby strengthening Washington's economy and
overall global competitiveness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with the office of regulatory
assistance and the office of accountability and performance, must
conduct multijurisdictional regulatory streamlining projects that each
impact a specific industry sector or subsector within a specific
geographical location. Planning for an initial pilot project must
begin by September 1, 2013, and the initial pilot project must be
underway by December 31, 2013. One or more projects must be
implemented in each subsequent calendar year through 2019.
(2) The department must establish and implement a competitive
process and select a minimum of one applicant comprised of a public-private partnership for participation in each project. The initial
pilot project must focus on the manufacturing sector. The department,
in consultation with the economic development commission, must
determine the sectors for subsequent projects. The criteria to be used
to select projects must include:
(a) Evidence of strong business commitment to the project;
(b) Evidence of strong commitment by the local government
jurisdictions where the project is located to allocate necessary staff
to the project and to streamline laws, rules, and administrative
process requirements both within their jurisdictions and
collaboratively across jurisdictions;
(c) Willingness to apply lean principles and tools to streamline
the business regulatory experience;
(d) Identification of a lead partner capable of providing project
management and coordination of partners;
(e) Support of the stakeholders necessary to implement the project;
(f) A plan and capacity to complete the project within the time
frame; and
(g) A minimum of fifty percent match must be provided from project
partners. The match may be cash, in-kind, or a combination of cash and
in-kind.
(3) The department is encouraged to collaborate with nonprofit
industry organizations, the private sector, foundations, and other
interested entities to successfully complete each project.
(4) The department must pursue opportunities for nonstate funding
as the match to the fifty percent or more provided by project partners.
A maximum of fifty thousand dollars of state funds may be used for a
project.
(5) The department may contract with a third party for expertise
and facilitation.
(6) All state agencies with regulatory requirements that impact the
project's industry sector must participate.
(7) The state agencies, local jurisdictions, business partners, and
other participants must jointly:
(a) Develop a project plan to conduct a cross-jurisdictional review
process;
(b) Identify and review all laws, rules, and administrative
processes and requirements pertaining to the selected sector;
(c) Apply specific criteria to evaluate the extent to which the
laws, rules, and administrative processes and requirements provide for
consistent, clear, and efficient customer experiences while continuing
to maintain public health, safety, and environmental standards;
(d) Develop an implementation plan and schedule that identifies
priority streamlining actions;
(e) Present their recommendations to the department for comment and
endorsement; and
(f) Present their recommendations to the Washington state economic
development commission for comment, endorsement, and evaluation.
(8) The department must document and distribute the streamlined
laws, rules, processes, and other potentially replicable information,
derived from the projects to the association of Washington cities and
Washington state association of counties for distribution to their
membership.
(9) The department must brief the economic development committees
of the legislature by January 15, 2014, on the status of the initial
pilot project, and must submit a report on the outcomes of the projects
to the economic development committees of the legislature by January
15th of each calendar year, from 2015 through 2020. The department
must include in the reports any streamlining recommendations identified
in the projects that require statutory changes for implementation and
any potentially replicable models, approaches, and tools that could be
applied to other sectors and geographical areas.

--- END ---