BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that relationships
between agricultural producers and personnel assigned to state
regulatory agencies are in need of improvement in a number of areas in
the state. The legislature further finds that many of the staff at
state regulatory agencies lack experience and background with
agricultural operations and producers. The legislature further finds
that tension is created because of a lack of clarity regarding agency
roles in addressing natural resources issues, particularly water
quality, involving agriculture. Furthermore, the legislature finds
agricultural producers lack familiarity with the expectations placed
upon state regulatory personnel.
The legislature finds the state conservation commission includes
representatives of state regulatory agencies and conservation
districts, but does not have representatives of general agricultural
organizations or commodity groups. However, the legislature finds that
the state conservation commission and local conservation districts have
had a long-term experience in successfully working with agricultural
producers and state agency personnel on a range of natural resource
issues to address concerns regarding the use and stewardship of the
state natural resources.
The purpose of this act is to initiate a public process employing
the state conservation commission to test processes to clearly define
agency roles, improve mutual understandings, and build improved working
relationships between agricultural producers and state regulatory
personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The commission shall initiate a state forum that includes
persons designated by the directors of state regulatory agencies, and
agricultural producers nominated to the commission by state and
regional agricultural organizations to:
(i) Design a process to be instituted at the county or regional
level on a pilot project basis that would provide an opportunity for
local producers to meet-and-greet the field staff assigned by the
regulatory agency to that area of the state and begin a dialogue that
improves communication and mutual understanding and cooperation;
(ii) Design a process whereby input and complaints can be received,
evaluated, and form the basis for recommending possible change to
agency procedures;
(iii) Examine and propose revision of existing training provided to
and procedures followed by field enforcement staff of state regulatory
agencies that interact with agricultural producers, including cross-training of state regulatory agency field enforcement staff and
conservation district technical assistance staff;
(iv) Examine policy issues that create tensions between state
regulatory agencies and agricultural organizations and propose methods
to relieve these tensions, including recommending to the legislature
policy changes; and
(v) Examine the roles and responsibilities of the various agencies
and entities, both regulatory and incentive-based, as they relate to
programs interacting with agricultural landowners, and recommend policy
changes to, if necessary, better clarify these roles and
responsibilities.
(b) An initial report of the recommendations in this subsection (1)
shall be made to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature
and to the governor by December 16, 2013.
(2) The state forum may request assistance from local conservation
districts to host and conduct local forums on a pilot basis to initiate
a dialogue between state regulatory agency staff assigned in a
particular county or region of the state, and agricultural and rural
landowners in that county or region. The commission may provide
incentives to those conservation districts that engage in the pilot
program through the commission's existing district governance and
accountability program. The commission shall seek involvement from at
least one district from each side of the crest of the Cascade mountains
each year. The commission shall consult with legislators to assist in
determining which counties may benefit from the establishment of these
forums.
(3) State regulatory agencies shall cooperate with the commission
and participate in the state and local forums. In conducting this
pilot program, the commission may test various options including
establishing yearly or periodic forums.
(4) The commission shall submit a final report by December 1, 2017,
to the committees with jurisdiction over agricultural issues in the
house of representatives and the senate on the results of the forums
and the pilot program, and shall also submit any recommendations to
further decrease tensions and improve working relationships and
understanding between the agricultural landowners and the staff
assigned to state regulatory agencies.
(5) As used in this section, "state regulatory agencies" means the
department of ecology, the department of agriculture, and the
department of fish and wildlife.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2018.

--- END ---