BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.57.160 and 2011 c 204 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules:
(a) Designating any point for mandatory inspection of cattle or
horses or the furnishing of proof that cattle or horses passing or
being transported through the point have been inspected or identified
and are lawfully being transported;
(b) Providing for issuance of individual horse and cattle
identification certificates or other means of horse and cattle
identification;
(c) Designating the documents that constitute other satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle and horses. A bill of sale may not be
designated as documenting satisfactory proof of ownership for cattle;
and
(d) Designating when inspection certificates, certificates of
permit, or other transportation documents required by law or rule must
designate a physical address of a destination. Cattle and horses must
be delivered or transported directly to the physical address of that
destination.
(2) A self-inspection certificate may be accepted as satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle if the director determines that the self-inspection certificate, together with other available documentation,
sufficiently establishes ownership. Self-inspection certificates
completed after June 10, 2010, are not satisfactory proof of ownership
for cattle.
(3)(a) Upon request by a milk producer licensed under chapter 15.36
RCW, the department must issue an official individual identification
tag to be placed by the producer before the first point of sale on bull
calves and free-martins (infertile female calves) under thirty days of
age. The fee for each tag is the cost to the department for
manufacture, purchase, and distribution of the tag plus the applicable
beef commission assessment. As used in this subsection (3), "green
tag" means the official individual identification issued by the
department.
(b) Transactions involving unbranded dairy breed bull calves or
free-martins (infertile female calves) not being moved or transported
out of Washington are exempt from inspection requirements under this
chapter only if:
(i) The animal is under thirty days old and has not been previously
bought or sold;
(ii) The seller holds a valid milk producer's license under chapter
15.36 RCW;
(iii) The sale does not take place at or through a public livestock
market or special sale authorized by chapter 16.65 RCW;
(iv) Each animal is officially identified as provided in (a) of
this subsection; and
(v) A certificate of permit and a bill of sale listing each
animal's green tag accompanies the animal to the buyer's location.
These documents do not constitute proof of ownership under this
chapter.
(c) All fees received under (a) of this subsection, except for the
beef commission assessment, must be deposited in the animal disease
traceability account in the agricultural local fund created in RCW
43.23.230.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.57.370 and 2003 c 326 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fees collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be
deposited in an account in the agricultural local fund and used to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, except as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 16.57.303 (Proceeds from sale of
impounded dairy breed cattle -- Paid to seller) and 2003 c 326 s 37 are
each repealed.

--- END ---