BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.020 and 2011 c 148 s 1 and 2011 c 89 s 14 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician or
psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should
be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a
portion of a facility licensed by the department of health and
certified by the department of social and health services under RCW
71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital,
which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals
experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term
hospitalization;
(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a person
designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment
duties described in chapters 70.96A and 70.96B RCW;
(10) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(11) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in
rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(12) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(13) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental
disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary;
(14) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(((3))) (4);
(15) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(16) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
will not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter;
(17) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm
resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human
needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in
routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of
cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;
(18) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct;
(19) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(20) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to
occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;
(21) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(22) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;
(23) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter;
(24) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county
prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their
capacity as legal representatives of public mental health service
providers under RCW 71.05.130;
(25) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced
by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person
or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts;
(26) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's
cognitive or volitional functions;
(27) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner,
psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health
professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(28) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private
agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental
disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from
public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities
as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery
systems or community mental health programs as defined in RCW
71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration
under chapter 10.77 RCW, and correctional facilities operated by state
and local governments;
(29) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment;
(30) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation,
or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in
whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and
treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, which is
conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care
and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(31) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and
shall also mean a physician, psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by
rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter;
(32) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a
person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner
pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced
practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;
(33) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(34) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(35) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a
department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons
with mental illness, if the agency is operated directly by, federal,
state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such
governments;
(36) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness;
(37) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the
provisions of this chapter;
(38) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in
chapter 71.24 RCW;
(39) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services, or his or her designee;
(40) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 9.94A.030;
(41) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and
approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;
(42) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental
health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over
defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including
court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting
attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic
court duties;
(43) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of
a facility licensed by the department of health and certified by the
department of social and health services under RCW 71.24.035, which is
designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or
determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and
must meet department of health residential treatment facility
standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or
involuntary placement facility;
(44) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records
concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received
services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by
regional support networks and their staffs, and by treatment
facilities. Treatment records include mental health information
contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health
drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service
stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include
notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing
treatment services for the department, regional support networks, or a
treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;
(45) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.
(46) "Outpatient commitment" means court-ordered outpatient
treatment for a person who:
(a) Has had more than two involuntary inpatient or outpatient
commitments within the last twenty-four months;
(b) Is suffering from a mental disorder;
(c) Is capable of surviving safely in the community with
supervision;
(d) In view of the person's treatment history or current behavior,
the person is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient
treatment without an order for outpatient commitment; and
(e) Outpatient treatment that would be provided under an outpatient
commitment order is necessary to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or
deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a
likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled
within a reasonably short period of time.
(47) "Outpatient treatment" includes: Medication; individual or
group therapy; day or partial day programming activities; services and
training, including educational and vocational activities; supervision
of living arrangements; and other services prescribed to either
alleviate the person's disorder or disability, to maintain semi-independent functioning, or to prevent further deterioration that may
reasonably be predicted to result in the need for hospitalization;
(48) "Outpatient treatment psychiatrist or agency," "supervising
psychiatrist, agency, or provider," or similar terms mean the
psychiatrist or agency who is responsible for the management and
supervision of a person's outpatient treatment under order of the
court;
(49) "Subject of the order" means a person who has been ordered by
the court to obtain outpatient treatment under an order of outpatient
commitment;
(50) "Subject of the petition" means a person who, under a petition
filed with the court, is alleged to meet the criteria for outpatient
commitment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person may be ordered to obtain
involuntary outpatient treatment under this chapter if the court finds
that the person:
(a) Has had more than two involuntary inpatient or outpatient
commitments within the last twenty-four months;
(b) Is suffering from a mental disorder;
(c) Is capable of surviving safely in the community with
supervision;
(d) In view of the person's treatment history or current behavior,
the person is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient
treatment without an order for outpatient commitment; and
(e) Outpatient treatment that would be provided under an outpatient
commitment order is necessary to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or
deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a
likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled
within a reasonably short period of time.
(2) A person may file a petition, executed subject to the penalties
of perjury, with the court alleging that another person meets the
criteria for involuntary outpatient treatment. The petition must
state:
(a) Each of the criteria under subsection (1)(a) through (f) of
this section for outpatient commitment;
(b) The petitioner's good faith belief that the subject of the
petition meets each of the criteria of this section;
(c) Facts that support the petitioner's good faith belief that the
subject of the petition meets each of the criteria of this section, but
the hearing on the petition need not be limited to the stated facts;
and
(d) That the subject of the petition is present within the county
where the petition is filed.
(3) The petitioner may request the court to subpoena witnesses, if
necessary, who are needed to support the petition.
(4) The petition may be accompanied by a statement of a
psychiatrist, or of a physician and a mental health professional, who
has examined the subject of the petition before the submission of the
petition. If the subject of the petition has refused to submit to
examination by a psychiatrist, physician, or mental health
professional, the fact of the refusal must be alleged in the petition.
(5) At a probable cause hearing conducted under RCW 71.05.240 or
71.05.310, the court may order outpatient commitment as an option for
treatment without the necessity of receiving a petition for outpatient
commitment. However, the criteria for outpatient commitment must be
met and supported by the evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The court shall hold a hearing on a
petition filed under section 3 of this act as soon as possible, but
within six calendar days after filing of the petition.
(2) Notice of the hearing must be delivered personally or mailed by
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, deliverable to
addressee only, to the subject of the petition, and those interested
parties identified by the petitioner, if any. All reasonable efforts
must be used to notify the subject of the petition of the hearing. The
subject and necessary witnesses must be notified as soon as possible,
but in all cases at least two court days before the hearing. The
petitioner shall certify that the notices have been mailed and to whom,
but proof of receipt of the notices is not required. Notice must also
be served on any other person that the court designates.
(3) The notice must include the following:
(a) The date, time, and place of hearing, a clear statement of the
purpose of the hearing and possible consequences to the subject, and a
statement of the legal standard upon which outpatient commitment is
authorized;
(b) A copy of the petition; and
(c) Notice that the subject of the petition is entitled to be
represented by an attorney and that the court will appoint a public
defender or other attorney for the subject if the subject desires one
and is indigent.
(4) The court may continue the hearing for failure to timely notify
the subject of the petition or those interested parties whom the
petitioner designates should receive notice.
(5) The time and form of the procedure incident to hearing the
issues in the petition must be provided by court rule and be consistent
with this section.
(6) The hearing may be held at a convenient place within the
circuit. The subject of the petition, an interested person, or the
court upon its own motion may request a hearing in another court
because of inconvenience to the parties, witnesses, or the court, or
because of the subject's physical or mental condition.
(7) The hearing must be closed to the public, unless the subject of
the petition requests otherwise.
(8) The subject of the petition shall be present at the hearing.
However, if the subject has been notified of the petition and does not
appear at the hearing, the court, in its discretion, may go forward
with the hearing.
(9) The subject of the petition may be represented by an attorney.
If the subject desires an attorney and is indigent, or if the court
determines that the legal or factual issues raised are of such
complexity that the assistance of an attorney is necessary for an
adequate presentation of the merits or that the subject of the petition
is unable to speak for the subject's self, the court shall order the
appointment of a public defender or other attorney to represent the
subject and continue the hearing for not more than five days.
(10) A subject of the petition may not be ordered to outpatient
commitment unless at least one psychiatrist, or a licensed physician
and a mental health professional, states the full condition of the
subject of the petition and the facts that support the allegation that
the subject meets all the criteria for outpatient commitment, the
recommended outpatient treatment, and the rationale for the recommended
outpatient treatment.
(11) If the subject of the petition has refused to be examined by
a licensed psychiatrist, the court may request the subject to consent
to examination by a psychiatrist or agency appointed by the court. If
the subject of the petition does not consent and the court finds
sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations in the petition are
true, the court may order the commitment of the subject to a
psychiatric facility for examination. The commitment may not be for
more than seventy-two hours. The examining psychiatrist shall submit
the findings and recommendations to the court.
(12) The subject of the petition may secure one or more psychiatric
examinations and present the findings as evidence at the hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) If, after hearing all relevant evidence,
including the results of an examination ordered by the court, if any,
the court finds that the subject of the petition filed under section 3
of this act does not meet the criteria for outpatient commitment, the
court shall dismiss the petition.
(2) If, after hearing all relevant evidence, including the results
of an examination ordered by the court, if any, the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that the subject of the petition meets
the criteria for outpatient commitment, the court shall order the
subject to outpatient commitment and treatment for a period of not more
than twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The court shall state the beginning and
ending dates of the period of commitment, which may not exceed twelve
months, in an order made under section 5 of this act.
(2) The order must also state who should receive notice of intent
to terminate the order of outpatient commitment early, in the event
that the outpatient treatment psychiatrist or agency determines, before
the end of the court-ordered period of treatment, that the order of
outpatient commitment should be terminated early.
(3) The court shall also designate on the order the outpatient
treatment psychiatrist or agency who is to be responsible for the
management and supervision of the subject's outpatient treatment, or
shall designate the regional support network, who in turn shall
designate the agency or psychiatrist. However, the psychiatrist or
agency must agree to the designation.
(4) The court shall order the subject to obtain outpatient
treatment under the treatment plan. The order shall require that the
subject cooperate with the treatment provider and comply with the
course of treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The regional support network shall assure
that resources are available to cover costs related to outpatient
commitment for persons ordered to outpatient commitment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A person adversely affected or aggrieved by
an order of outpatient commitment under sections 3 through 6 of this
act is entitled to judicial review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An outpatient commitment order issued under
section 5 of this act is automatically and fully terminated at the end
of the court-ordered period of outpatient commitment, a period of not
more than twelve months, unless a new court order has been obtained as
provided in sections 3 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A person may petition the court for the
early termination of an order of outpatient commitment issued under
sections 3 through 6 of this act during the period of outpatient
treatment if done more than sixty days after the most recent hearing
involving the subject of the order. The petition must be filed, notice
given, hearing held, and order made in the same manner as provided for
the original petition alleging that the subject of the order met the
criteria for outpatient commitment.
(2) The treating psychiatrist may commence the early termination
procedure for a subject of the order if the treating psychiatrist finds
that the subject no longer meets the criteria for outpatient
commitment.
(3) To commence the early termination procedure, the treating
psychiatrist shall send to the clerk of the court that issued the order
for outpatient commitment notification that, in the psychiatrist's
opinion, the order should be terminated before the end of the period
specified in the court order.
(4) The clerk of the court shall, upon receipt of a notification
under subsection (3) of this section, prepare and mail, to the persons
whom the court order specified are entitled to notice, a notice of
intent of early termination of the order. The notice of early
termination must be mailed at least five days before the intended date
of termination.
(5) If an objection is not filed within five days of the mailing of
notice, the court shall enter an order of termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A person who has received a notice of
intent to terminate an order of outpatient commitment early may file an
objection with the court. Upon receipt of an objection, the court
shall hold a hearing on the termination. The hearing must be conducted
as provided in section 4 of this act. If the court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the subject of the order continues to meet the
criteria for outpatient commitment, the court shall order the subject
to continue the outpatient treatment for the unexpired period of its
earlier order. If the court finds that the subject of the order does
not meet the criteria for outpatient commitment, the court shall
dismiss the objection and terminate the order early.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Before the expiration of the period of
outpatient commitment ordered by the court, a person, including the
treating psychiatrist, may file a petition with the court for an order
of continued outpatient commitment. The petition must be filed and
notice provided in the same manner as under sections 3 and 4 of this
act. The court shall hold a hearing on the petition and make its
decision in the same manner as provided under section 4 of this act.
The court may order the continued outpatient commitment for not more
than twelve months after the date of the hearing. This section is in
addition to the provisions on the objection to termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 2 through 12 of this act are each
added to chapter 71.05 RCW.

--- END ---