BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.240 and 2012 c 230 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except with regard to institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, any official of the state or of any
political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation authorized to disburse funds in payment of salaries and
wages of employees is authorized upon written request of at least
twenty-five employees to pay all or part of such salaries or wages to
any financial institution for either: (a) Credit to the employees'
accounts in such financial institution; or (b) immediate transfer
therefrom to the employees' accounts in any other financial
institutions.
(2) In disbursing funds for payment of salaries and wages of
employees, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 are authorized to require the following payment methods:
(a) For employees who have an account in a financial institution,
payment to any financial institution for either: (i) Credit to the
employees' accounts in such financial institution; or (ii) immediate
transfer therefrom to the employees' accounts in any other financial
institutions; and
(b) For employees who do not have an account in a financial
institution, payment by alternate methods such as payroll cards.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any
employer to require the employees to have an account in any particular
financial institution or type of financial institution. A single
warrant may be drawn in favor of such financial institution, for the
total amount due the employees involved, and written directions
provided to such financial institution of the amount to be credited to
the account of an employee or to be transferred to an account in
another financial institution for such employee. The issuance and
delivery by the disbursing officer of a warrant in accordance with the
procedure set forth herein and proper indorsement thereof by the
financial institution shall have the same legal effect as payment
directly to the employee.
(4) Conservation districts as established and authorized under
chapter 89.08 RCW are exempt from the requirement to obtain a written
request of twenty-five employees as required in subsection (1) of this
section, and may disburse funds in payment of salaries and wages of
employees consistent with this chapter and RCW 89.08.215.
(5) For the purposes of this section "financial institution" means
any bank or trust company established in this state pursuant to chapter
2, Title 12, United States Code, or Title 30 RCW, and any credit union
established in this state pursuant to chapter 14, Title 12, United
States Code, or chapter 31.12 RCW, and any mutual savings bank
established in this state pursuant to Title 32 RCW, and any savings and
loan association established in this state pursuant to chapter 12,
Title 12, United States Code, or Title 33 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 89.08.215 and 2000 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The treasurer of the county in which a conservation district is
located is ex officio treasurer of the district. However, the board of
supervisors by resolution may designate some other person having
experience in financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the
conservation district. The board of supervisors shall require a bond,
with a surety company authorized to do business in the state of
Washington, in an amount and under the terms and conditions which the
board of supervisors by resolution from time to time finds will protect
the district against loss. The premium on this bond shall be paid by
the district.
(2) All district funds shall be paid to the treasurer and disbursed
only on warrants issued by an auditor appointed by the board of
supervisors, upon orders or vouchers approved by it. The treasurer
shall establish a conservation district fund into which shall be paid
all district funds. The treasurer shall maintain any special funds
created by the board of supervisors for the placement of all money as
the board of supervisors may, by resolution, direct.
(3) If the treasurer of the district is the treasurer of the county
all district funds shall be deposited with the county depositaries
under the same restrictions, contracts, and security as provided for
county depositaries. If the treasurer of the district is some other
person, all funds shall be deposited in a bank or banks authorized to
do business in this state as the board of supervisors, by resolution,
designates.
(4) A district may provide and require a reasonable bond of any
other person handling moneys or securities of the district, if the
district pays the premium.
(5)(a) A district may disburse funds in payment of salaries, wages,
and any other approved financial reimbursement to any employee or
contractor of the district to any financial institution for either:
(i) Credit to the employees' or contractors' accounts in such financial
institution; or (ii) immediate transfer therefrom to the employees' or
contractors' accounts in any other financial institutions.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "financial institution" has the
definition in RCW 41.04.240.

--- END ---