BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Persons with mental illness and the public
are both protected when resources for supportive treatment, custody,
and supervision can be deployed where they are most needed to promote
recovery and prevent harm. Development of a static risk tool for
prediction of the risk of rehospitalization and criminal recidivism,
validated for use among Washington state civil and forensic involuntary
mental health detainees, later to be supplemented and improved by
clinical data as it becomes available, will allow the state to optimize
commitment decisions and target community services for the most
vulnerable in a fashion that will promote recovery, protect persons
with mental illness and the public, avoid unnecessary admissions to
jails and emergency rooms, avoid the creation of new crime victims, and
be cost-effective for Washington taxpayers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall develop a standardized static risk assessment instrument
that assesses risk to the community and, if feasible, risk of
rehospitalization for adults involuntarily committed for civil
treatment and forensic mental health evaluations. In developing the
instrument, the institute shall work with psychologists employed by the
department of social and health services and other experts in the
field. The instrument should be cross-validated for relevant
populations within Washington state: Criminal defendants with mental
illness referred for chapter 10.77 RCW evaluations, civilly committed
respondents under chapter 71.05 RCW, and persons acquitted by reason of
insanity. In addition, the instrument should be designed to be used in
conjunction with clinical evaluations that include information
regarding psychosocial history, mental health status, and other dynamic
clinical variables that may add to predictive validity. The Washington
state institute for public policy shall prepare an initial report on
the static instrument by December 2013, with a final report to be
completed by December 2015 which includes a prospective study of the
potential to improve the static instrument by supplementing it with
dynamic clinical variables by 2017.

--- END ---