BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.20.010 and 2012 c 2 s 109 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee
authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the
prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the
applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee
must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as
may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as
follows:
(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or
dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly
conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill
health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any
private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the
purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to
purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as
may be fixed by the board;
(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special
permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of
time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;
(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer
to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other
materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor,
or other products, a special permit;
(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be
thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized
representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the
armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such
military installation;
(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that
manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented
to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of
a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said
liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor
so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display
room during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a
spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption
at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the
convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding.
Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or
distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW
66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an
international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices
of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and
promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the
contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased
from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a
person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or
serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility
if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility.
"Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means
a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to
travelers and guests;
(12) Where the application is for a special permit to allow tasting
of alcohol by persons at least eighteen years of age under the
following circumstances:
(a) The application is from a community or technical college as
defined in RCW 28B.50.030;
(b) The person who is permitted to taste under this subsection is
enrolled as a student in a required or elective class that is part of
a culinary, wine technology, beer technology, or spirituous technology-related degree program;
(c) The alcohol served to any person in the degree-related programs
under (b) of this subsection is tasted but not consumed for the
purposes of educational training as part of the class curriculum with
the approval of the educational provider;
(d) The service and tasting of alcoholic beverages is supervised by
a faculty or staff member of the educational provider who is twenty-one
years of age or older. The supervising faculty or staff member shall
possess a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit under the provisions of
RCW 66.20.310;
(e) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages
does not purchase the alcoholic beverages; and
(f) The permit fee for the special permit provided for in this
subsection (12) shall be waived by the board.

--- END ---