BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.161 and 2012 c 80 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, upon receipt of a fee of forty-five dollars
from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, and fifty-four dollars after
June 30, 2013, unless the driver's license is issued for a period other
than five years from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or six years
after June 30, 2013, in which case the fee shall be nine dollars for
each year that the license is issued, which includes the fee for the
required photograph, shall issue to every qualifying applicant a
driver's license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age
of eighteen is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions
imposed under RCW 46.20.075, until the person reaches the age of
eighteen. The license must include a distinguishing number assigned to
the licensee, the name of record, date of birth, Washington residence
address, photograph, a brief description of the licensee, ((and))
either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon
which the licensee shall write his or her usual signature with pen and
ink immediately upon receipt of the license, and, if applicable, the
person's status as a veteran as provided in subsection (2) of this
section. No license is valid until it has been so signed by the
licensee.
(2) A person may apply to the department to obtain a veteran
designation on a driver's license issued under this section by
providing the United States department of defense discharge document,
DD Form 214, as it exists on the effective date of this section, or
such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section, that shows a discharge
status of "honorable" or "general under honorable conditions" that
establishes the person's service in the armed forces of the United
States. In addition to the fee described in subsection (1) of this
section, the department may charge a fee sufficient to cover the start-up and administrative costs associated with the inclusion of the
designation, but the fee may not exceed two dollars per designation.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.117 and 2012 c 80 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. Except as provided in subsection (5) of
this section, the fee is forty-five dollars from October 1, 2012, to
June 30, 2013, and fifty-four dollars after June 30, 2013, unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2)(a) Design and term. The identicard must:
(((a))) (i) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused
with the official driver's license; and
(((b))) (ii) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section,
expire on the sixth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate after
issuance.
(b) The identicard may include the person's status as a veteran,
consistent with RCW 46.20.161(2).
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.
(5) Alternative issuance/renewal/extension. The department may
issue or renew an identicard for a period other than five years from
October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or six years after June 30, 2013, or
may extend by mail or electronic commerce an identicard that has
already been issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as
possible, the yearly renewal rate of identicard holders. The fee for
an identicard issued or renewed for a period other than five years from
October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or six years after June 30, 2013, or
that has been extended by mail or electronic commerce, is nine dollars
for each year that the identicard is issued, renewed, or extended. The
department may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---