BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the historical
financial hardship being placed on students and the chilling effect
high tuition places on prospective students. The legislature finds
that in order to evaluate and appropriate public resources in a manner
that best supports and promotes equity of access to higher education,
it needs complete information regarding the financial situation and
circumstances of Washington state's public research universities, the
University of Washington and Washington State University. Therefore,
the legislature intends to direct a comprehensive audit of the public
research universities to identify cost and profit centers within their
broadly defined institutional and ecological systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state auditor shall conduct a
comprehensive financial audit of Washington's state universities. The
purpose of the audit is to identify cost and profit centers within, and
in partnership with, the state universities. The audit must focus on
public funds; student fees, in particular tuition; and auxiliary
enterprises, which for the purposes of the audit at the University of
Washington includes University of Washington medical center, the
internal lending program, the W fund, and the center for
commercialization. The audit at each university must achieve the
following:
(a) Identify the major sources of funding over the most recent five
years, including public funding and funding from the federal
government;
(b) Review and evaluate the policies and practices that the
university uses to track and allocate public funding;
(c) Determine how the university spent its state appropriations,
student fees, federal grant funding, and any inflationary increases in
federal grant funding;
(d) Review and evaluate the procedures and practices used by the
university to track and adjust nonsalary expenditure categories such as
travel, consultants, entertainment, and general supplies;
(e) Identify how the university defines restricted funds and
determine for each type of public funding the amount that is restricted
to specific purposes by the funding source;
(f) Assess the university's policies and practices for tracking
per-student expenditures for instruction and identify the average
amount per student that the university has spent on instruction for
undergraduate students in each of the past five fiscal years;
(g) Obtain the university's definition of auxiliary enterprises and
determine the number of auxiliary enterprises, including the University
of Washington medical center, the University of Washington internal
lending program, the W fund, and the center for commercialization, that
exist in the university system, the methods the university uses to
track revenues and expenditures of auxiliary enterprises, and the
policies and practices the university has in place to ensure that state
funding is not used to supplement or guarantee projects or programs
authorized by auxiliary enterprises;
(h) Identify how much money is being spent on undergraduate
education and to what extent undergraduate education is subsidizing
graduate education; and
(i) Determine how tuition funds are being used and to what extent
they are being used to fund the University of Washington medical
center, the University of Washington internal lending program, the W
fund, and the center for commercialization and to back bonds authorized
by the university.
(2) Any work performed by the state auditor's office shall not
duplicate existing audits, and where applicable, shall make maximum use
of existing audit records, accreditation reviews, and performance
measures required by the office of financial management and nationally
or regionally recognized accreditation organizations including
accreditation of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and
ambulatory care facilities.
(3) By January 1, 2014, the state auditor shall deliver the
comprehensive financial audit of the state universities to the governor
and relevant committees of the legislature. The state auditor shall
recommend whether follow-up audits are necessary to ensure the
effective use of public funds, student fees, and auxiliary enterprises.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2014.

--- END ---