BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88.110 and 2009 c 518 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the expenditure programs and the allotment
and reserve procedures to be followed by the executive branch for
public funds.
(1) Allotments of an appropriation for any fiscal period shall
conform to the terms, limits, or conditions of the appropriation.
(2) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of operating and capital instructions for preparing
a statement of proposed expenditures at least thirty days before the
beginning of a fiscal period. The set of instructions need not include
specific appropriation amounts for the agency.
(3) Within forty-five days after the beginning of the fiscal period
or within forty-five days after the governor signs the omnibus biennial
appropriations act, whichever is later, all agencies shall submit to
the governor a statement of proposed expenditures at such times and in
such form as may be required by the governor.
(4) The office of financial management shall develop a method for
monitoring capital appropriations and expenditures that will capture at
least the following elements:
(a) Appropriations made for capital projects including
transportation projects;
(b) Estimates of total project costs including past, current,
ensuing, and future biennial costs;
(c) Comparisons of actual costs to estimated costs;
(d) Comparisons of estimated construction start and completion
dates with actual dates;
(e) Documentation of fund shifts between projects.
This data may be incorporated into the existing accounting system
or into a separate project management system, as deemed appropriate by
the office of financial management.
(5) The office of financial management, prior to approving
allotments for major capital construction projects valued over five
million dollars, with the exception of projects at institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, which may be valued up
to ten million dollars, shall institute procedures for reviewing such
projects at the predesign stage that will reduce long-term costs and
increase facility efficiency. The procedures shall include, but not be
limited to, the following elements:
(a) Evaluation of facility program requirements and consistency
with long-range plans;
(b) Utilization of a system of cost, quality, and performance
standards to compare major capital construction projects; and
(c) A requirement to incorporate value-engineering analysis and
constructability review into the project schedule.
(6) No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for
such major capital construction projects including, without exception,
land acquisition, site development, predesign, design, construction,
and equipment acquisition and installation, until the allotment of the
funds to be expended has been approved by the office of financial
management. This limitation does not prohibit the continuation of
expenditures and obligations into the succeeding biennium for projects
for which allotments have been approved in the immediate prior
biennium.
(7) Minor works projects, as defined by the office of financial
management, may be valued up to five million dollars for institutions
of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(8) If at any time during the fiscal period the governor projects
a cash deficit in a particular fund or account as defined by RCW
43.88.050, the governor shall make across-the-board reductions in
allotments for that particular fund or account so as to prevent a cash
deficit, unless the legislature has directed the liquidation of the
cash deficit over one or more fiscal periods. Except for the
legislative and judicial branches and other agencies headed by elective
officials, the governor shall review the statement of proposed
operating expenditures for reasonableness and conformance with
legislative intent. The governor may request corrections of proposed
allotments submitted by the legislative and judicial branches and
agencies headed by elective officials if those proposed allotments
contain significant technical errors. Once the governor approves the
proposed allotments, further revisions may at the request of the office
of financial management or upon the agency's initiative be made on a
quarterly basis and must be accompanied by an explanation of the
reasons for significant changes. However, changes in appropriation
level authorized by the legislature, changes required by across-the-board reductions mandated by the governor, changes caused by executive
increases to spending authority, and changes caused by executive
decreases to spending authority for failure to comply with the
provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW may require additional revisions.
Revisions shall not be made retroactively. However, the governor may
assign to a reserve status any portion of an agency appropriation
withheld as part of across-the-board reductions made by the governor
and any portion of an agency appropriation conditioned on a contingent
event by the appropriations act. The governor may remove these amounts
from reserve status if the across-the-board reductions are subsequently
modified or if the contingent event occurs. The director of financial
management shall enter approved statements of proposed expenditures
into the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system within
forty-five days after receipt of the proposed statements from the
agencies. If an agency or the director of financial management is
unable to meet these requirements, the director of financial management
shall provide a timely explanation in writing to the legislative fiscal
committees.
(((8))) (9) It is expressly provided that all agencies shall be
required to maintain accounting records and to report thereon in the
manner prescribed in this chapter and under the regulations issued
pursuant to this chapter. Within ninety days of the end of the fiscal
year, all agencies shall submit to the director of financial management
their final adjustments to close their books for the fiscal year.
Prior to submitting fiscal data, written or oral, to committees of the
legislature, it is the responsibility of the agency submitting the data
to reconcile it with the budget and accounting data reported by the
agency to the director of financial management.
(((9))) (10) The director of financial management may exempt
certain public funds from the allotment controls established under this
chapter if it is not practical or necessary to allot the funds.
Allotment control exemptions expire at the end of the fiscal biennium
for which they are granted. The director of financial management shall
report any exemptions granted under this subsection to the legislative
fiscal committees.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.94.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 726 and 2011 c 151
s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for itself if the aggregate principal
amount payable thereunder is greater than an amount to be established
from time to time by the state finance committee or participate in a
program providing for the issuance of certificates of participation,
including any contract for credit enhancement, without the prior
approval of the state finance committee. Except as provided in RCW
28B.10.022, the state finance committee shall approve the form of all
financing contracts or a standard format for all financing contracts.
The state finance committee also may:
(a) Consolidate existing or potential financing contracts into
master financing contracts with respect to property acquired by one or
more agencies, departments, instrumentalities of the state, the state
board for community and technical colleges, or a state institution of
higher learning; or to be acquired by another agency;
(b) Approve programs providing for the issuance of certificates of
participation in master financing contracts for the state or for other
agencies;
(c) Enter into agreements with trustees relating to master
financing contracts; and
(d) Make appropriate rules for the performance of its duties under
this chapter.
(2) In the performance of its duties under this chapter, the state
finance committee may consult with representatives from the department
of general administration, the office of financial management, and the
office of the chief information officer.
(3) With the approval of the state finance committee, the state
also may enter into agreements with trustees relating to financing
contracts and the issuance of certificates of participation.
(4) Except for financing contracts for real property authorized
under RCW 28B.10.022(4) or used for the purposes described under
chapter 28B.140 RCW, the state may not enter into any financing
contract for real property of the state without prior approval of the
legislature. For the purposes of this requirement, a financing
contract must be treated as used for real property if it is being
entered into by the state for the acquisition of land; the acquisition
of an existing building; the construction of a new building; or a major
remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or rebuilding of an existing
building. Prior approval of the legislature is not required under this
chapter for a financing contract entered into by the state under this
chapter for energy conservation improvements to existing buildings
where such improvements include: (a) Fixtures and equipment that are
not part of a major remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or
rebuilding of the building, or (b) other improvements to the building
that are being performed for the primary purpose of energy
conservation. Such energy conservation improvements must be determined
eligible for financing under this chapter by the office of financial
management in accordance with financing guidelines established by the
state treasurer, and are to be treated as personal property for the
purposes of this chapter.
(5) The state may not enter into any financing contract on behalf
of another agency without the approval of such a financing contract by
the governing body of the other agency.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.022 and 2003 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards
of trustees of the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the state board for community and technical colleges, are severally
authorized to enter into financing contracts as provided in chapter
39.94 RCW. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
financing contracts shall be subject to the approval of the state
finance committee.
(2) The board of regents of a state university may enter into
financing contracts which are payable solely from and secured by all or
any component of the fees and revenues of the university derived from
its ownership and operation of its facilities not subject to
appropriation by the legislature and not constituting "general state
revenues," as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, without the prior approval of the state finance
committee.
(3) Except for financing contracts for facilities or equipment
described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the board of regents shall notify
the state finance committee at least sixty days prior to entering into
such contract and provide information relating to such contract as
requested by the state finance committee.
(4) The regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
community and technical colleges may enter into financing contracts for
real property as defined in RCW 39.94.040(4) when the financing
contracts are payable solely from and secured by all or any component
of the fees and revenues of that college or university that are (a)
derived from its ownership and operation of its facilities, (b) not
subject to allotment under chapter 43.88 RCW, (c) not subject to
appropriation by the legislature, and (d) not constituting "general
state revenues," as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution. Financing contracts under this subsection must be
approved by the state finance committee but do not require further
legislative authorization.

--- END ---