BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.67.010 and 2006 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(2) "Costs of training" and "training costs" means the direct costs
experienced under a contract with a qualified training institution for
formal technical or skill training, including basic skills. "Costs of
training" includes amounts in the contract for costs of instruction,
materials, equipment, rental of class space, marketing, and overhead.
"Costs of training" does not include employee tuition reimbursements
unless the tuition reimbursement is specifically included in a
contract.
(3) "Participant" means:
(a) A private employer or an industry cluster association that,
under this chapter, undertakes a training program with a qualified
training institution; or
(b) A private employer that is a member of an industry cluster
association and has hired a trainee of such a program.
(4) "Qualified training institution" means a public community or
technical college or a private vocational school licensed by either the
workforce training and education coordinating board or the higher
education coordinating board.
(5) "Training allowance" and "allowance" means a voucher, credit,
or payment from the board to a participant to cover training costs.
(6) "Training program" means a program funded under this chapter at
a qualified training institution.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.67.020 and 2012 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington customized employment training program is hereby
created to provide training assistance to employers locating or
expanding in the state.
(2)(a) Application to receive funding under this program must be
made to the board by employers or industry cluster associations in a
form and manner as specified by the board. Successful applicants must
receive a training allowance from the board to cover the costs of
training at a qualified training institution. Employers or industry
cluster associations may not receive an allowance for training costs
((which)) that exceed the maximum annual training cost per employee, as
established by the board, and are not eligible to receive an allowance
or allowances of over five hundred thousand dollars per calendar year.
(b) Allowances must be granted for applicants who meet the
following criteria:
(i) The employer or industry cluster association must have entered
into an agreement with a qualified training institution to engage in
customized training and the employer or industry cluster association
must agree to: (A) Upon completion of the training, make a payment to
the employment training finance account created in RCW 28B.67.030 in an
amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of the training allowance;
and (B) over the subsequent eighteen months, make monthly or quarterly
payments, as specified in the agreement, to the employment training
finance account created in RCW 28B.67.030 in an amount equal to three-quarters of the amount of the training allowance. ((During calendar
years 2009 and 2010, participants may delay payments due under this
section for up to eighteen months.)) The payments into the employment
training finance account provided for in this section do not constitute
payment to the institution.
(ii) When hiring, ((the employer)) participants must make good
faith efforts, as determined by the board, to hire from trainees in the
participant's training program. The agreement with the qualified
training institution provided for in (b)(i) of this subsection must
specify terms for reimbursement or additional payment to the employment
training finance account by the ((employer)) participant if ((the
participant does not, when hiring, make)) good faith efforts to hire
from trainees in the participant's training program are not made.
(iii) The training allowance may not be used to train workers who
have been hired as a result of a strike or lockout.
(c) Preference is given to employers with fewer than fifty
employees.
(d) Preference is given to training that leads to transferable
skills that are interchangeable among different jobs, employers, or
workplaces.
(3) Qualified training institutions may enter into agreements with
four-year institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, in accordance with the interlocal cooperation act, chapter
39.34 RCW.
(4) The board and qualified training institutions may solicit and
receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, from tribal, local, federal, or other governmental entities,
as well as private sources, for the purpose of providing training
allowances under chapter 112, Laws of 2006. All revenue thus solicited
and received must be deposited into the employment training finance
account created in RCW 28B.67.030.
(5) Qualified training institutions must make good faith efforts to
develop training programs using trainers preferred by participants.
(6) For employers who (a) have requested training under the job
skills program created under chapter 28C.04 RCW but are not able to
participate in the job skills program because the funds have all been
committed, and (b) desire to become participants in the Washington
customized employment training program, the board shall ensure a
seamless process toward participation.
(7) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2017.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.67.030 and 2012 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington
customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 must
be deposited into the employment training finance account, which is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the state
board for community and technical colleges may authorize expenditures
from the account and no appropriation is required for expenditures.
The money in the account must be used solely for training allowances
under the Washington customized employment training program created in
RCW 28B.67.020 and for providing up to seventy-five thousand dollars
per year for training, marketing, and facilitation services to increase
the use of the program. The deposit of payments under this section
from a participant ceases when the board specifies that the participant
has met the monetary obligations of the program. ((During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the employment
training finance account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance in the account.))
(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of RCW
28B.67.020(4) must be deposited into the employment training finance
account to provide training allowances.
(3) The definitions in RCW 28B.67.010 apply to this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---