BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.050 and 1998 c 267 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, the director shall
issue commercial licenses and permits to a qualified person upon
receiving a completed application accompanied by the required fee.
(2) An application submitted to the department under this chapter
shall contain the name and address of the applicant and any other
information required by the department or this title. An application
for a food fish guide license under RCW 77.65.370 or game fish guide
license under RCW 77.65.480 must include:
(a) The applicant's driver's license or other government issued
identification card number and the jurisdiction of issuance;
(b) The applicant's unified business identifier number under a
master license issued under RCW 19.02.070;
(c) Proof of current certification in first aid and cardiopulmonary
resuscitation; and
(d) A certificate of insurance demonstrating that the applicant has
general liability coverage of at least three hundred thousand dollars.
(3) An applicant for a commercial fishery license or delivery
license may designate a vessel to be used with the license. An
applicant for a commercial fishery license or delivery license may also
designate up to two alternate operators.
(((3))) (4) An application submitted to the department under this
chapter shall contain the applicant's declaration under penalty of
perjury that the information on the application is true and correct.
(((4))) (5) Upon issuing a commercial license under this chapter,
the director shall assign the license a unique number that the license
shall retain upon renewal. The department shall use the number to
record any commercial catch under the license. This does not preclude
the department from using other, additional, catch record methods.
(((5))) (6) The fee to replace a license that has been lost or
destroyed is twenty dollars.

--- END ---