BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.340.080 and 2010 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Two or more nonhigh school districts may form an interdistrict
cooperative((,)) to offer an innovation academy cooperative, as defined
in RCW 28A.340.085 and subject to the approval of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.340.090, for high
school students residing in the participating nonhigh school districts
or for high school students residing in other school districts who
enroll in the cooperative under RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230.
However, a high school student residing in a school district that is
not a participating member of the cooperative may not enroll
exclusively in online courses or an online school program as defined by
RCW 28A.250.010.
(2) Enrollment in an innovation academy cooperative is optional for
students. For students residing in a participating nonhigh school
district who enroll in a high school district rather than the
innovation academy cooperative, the provisions of RCW 28A.540.110 and
chapter 28A.545 RCW apply to the nonhigh school district.
(3) Each innovation academy cooperative shall designate one of the
participating nonhigh school districts to report enrolled students for
funding purposes. The reporting district shall claim the monthly full-time equivalent students enrolled in the innovation academy cooperative
and receive state funding allocations, including basic education
allocations that are based on the small high school allocation under
the appropriations act to the extent the number of students enrolled in
the innovation academy cooperative meets the criteria for a small high
school.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.225 and 2009 c 380 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for students who reside out-of-state and students under
RCW 28A.225.217, a district shall accept applications from nonresident
students who are the children of full-time certificated and classified
school employees, and those children shall be permitted to enroll:
(a) At the school to which the employee is assigned;
(b) At a school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned; or
(c) At a school in the district that provides early intervention
services pursuant to RCW 28A.155.065 or preschool services pursuant to
RCW 28A.155.070, if the student is eligible for such services.
(2) A district may reject applications under this section if:
(a) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership;
(b) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(2)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants; or
(c) Enrollment of a child under this section would displace a child
who is a resident of the district, except that if a child is admitted
under subsection (1) of this section, that child shall be permitted to
remain enrolled at that school, or in that district's kindergarten
through twelfth grade continuum, until he or she has completed his or
her schooling.
(3) A nonhigh district that is participating in an innovation
academy cooperative may not accept an application from a high school
student that conflicts with RCW 28A.340.080.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, all
districts accepting applications from nonresident students or from
students receiving home-based instruction for admission to the
district's schools shall consider equally all applications received.
Each school district shall adopt a policy establishing rational, fair,
and equitable standards for acceptance and rejection of applications by
June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection of a nonresident
student if:
(a) Acceptance of a nonresident student would result in the
district experiencing a financial hardship;
(b) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership; ((or))
(c) Accepting of the nonresident student would conflict with RCW
28A.340.080; or
(d) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(((3)(c))) (4)(d) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants.
For purposes of subsections (2)(a) and (((3))) (4)(b) of this
section, "gang" means a group which: (i) Consists of three or more
persons; (ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing
basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal
purposes.
(((4))) (5) The district shall provide to applicants written
notification of the approval or denial of the application in a timely
manner. If the application is rejected, the notification shall include
the reason or reasons for denial and the right to appeal under RCW
28A.225.230(3).

--- END ---