BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.05.100 and 2002 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Upon approval of a redistricting plan by three of the voting
members of the commission, but not later than ((January 1st)) November
15th of the year ending in ((two)) one, the commission shall submit the
plan to the legislature.
(2) After submission of the plan by the commission, the legislature
shall have the next thirty days during any regular or special session
to amend the commission's plan. If the legislature amends the
commission's plan the legislature's amendment must be approved by an
affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the members elected or
appointed thereto, and may not include more than two percent of the
population of any legislative or congressional district.
(3) The plan approved by the commission, with any amendment
approved by the legislature, shall be final upon approval of such
amendment or after expiration of the time provided for legislative
amendment by subsection (2) of this section whichever occurs first, and
shall constitute the districting law applicable to this state for
legislative and congressional elections, beginning with the next
elections held in the year ending in two. This plan shall be in force
until the effective date of the plan based upon the next succeeding
federal decennial census or until a modified plan takes effect as
provided in RCW 44.05.120(6).
(4) If three of the voting members of the commission fail to
approve and submit a plan within the time limitations provided in
subsection (1) of this section, the supreme court shall adopt a plan by
March 1st of the year ending in two. Any such plan approved by the
court is final and constitutes the districting law applicable to this
state for legislative and congressional elections, beginning with the
next election held in the year ending in two. This plan shall be in
force until the effective date of the plan based on the next succeeding
federal decennial census or until a modified plan takes effect as
provided in RCW 44.05.120(6).

Sec. 2 RCW 44.05.110 and 2011 c 60 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Following the period provided by RCW 44.05.100(1) for the
commission's adoption of a plan, the commission shall take all
necessary steps to conclude its business and cease operations. The
commission shall prepare a financial statement disclosing all
expenditures made by the commission. The official record shall contain
all relevant information developed by the commission pursuant to
carrying out its duties under this chapter, maps, data collected,
minutes of meetings, written communications, and other information of
a similar nature. Once the commission ceases to exist, the chief
election officer shall be the custodian of the official record for
purposes of reprecincting and election administration. The chief
election officer shall provide for the permanent preservation of this
official record pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW and Title 40 RCW. Once
the commission ceases to exist any budget surplus shall revert to the
state general fund.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 44.05.120 for a reconvened
commission, the commission shall cease to exist on ((July)) May 1st of
each year ending in two unless the supreme court extends the
commission's term.

--- END ---