BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in the state of
Washington, there exists a type of court administered by the judiciary
commonly called a specialty court. Judges in the trial courts
throughout the state effectively utilize specialty courts to remove
defendants with their consent from the normal criminal court system and
allow those defendants the opportunity to obtain treatment services to
address particular issues that may have contributed to the conduct that
led to their arrest in exchange for dismissal of the charges. Trial
courts have proved adept at creative approaches in fashioning a wide
variety of specialty courts addressing the spectrum of social issues
that can contribute to criminal activity.
The legislature also finds that there are presently more than
seventy-four specialty courts operating in the state of Washington that
save costs to both the trial courts and law enforcement by strategic
focus of resources within the criminal justice system. There are
presently more than fifteen types of specialty courts in the state
including: Veteran's treatment court, adult drug court, juvenile drug
court, family dependency treatment court, mental health court, DUI
court, community court, reentry drug court, tribal healing to wellness
court, truancy court, homeless court, domestic violence court, gambling
court, and Back on TRAC: Treatment, responsibility, accountability on
campus.
The legislature recognizes the inherent authority of the judiciary
under Article IV, section 1 of the state Constitution to establish
specialty courts. The legislature recognizes the outstanding
contribution to the state and a local community made by the
establishment of specialty courts and desires to provide a general
provision in statute acknowledging and encouraging the judiciary to
provide for such courts to address the particular needs within a given
judicial jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature respectfully encourages the supreme court to
adopt any administrative orders and court rules of practice and
procedure it deems necessary to support the establishment of effective
specialty courts.
(2) Any jurisdiction that establishes a specialty court under this
section may seek state or federal funding as it becomes available for
the establishment, maintenance, and expansion of specialty courts and
for the provision by participating agencies of treatment to
participating defendants. The administrative office of the courts may
enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with state or federal
departments and agencies to provide treatment and other social services
to participants. The departments and agencies shall collaborate and,
to the extent possible, provide financial and other assistance to the
judicial branch in order to establish and maintain specialty courts.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit courts from providing direct in-house treatment services.
(3) Any jurisdiction establishing a specialty court shall endeavor
to incorporate the treatment court principles of best practices as
recognized by state and national treatment court agencies and
organizations in structuring a particular program, which may include:
(a) Determine the population;
(b) Perform a clinical assessment;
(c) Develop the treatment plan;
(d) Supervise the offender;
(e) Forge agency, organization, and community partnerships;
(f) Take a judicial leadership role;
(g) Develop case management strategies;
(h) Address transportation issues;
(i) Evaluate the program;
(j) Ensure a sustainable program.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "specialty court" means a
specialized pretrial or sentencing docket in select criminal cases
where agencies coordinate together to provide treatment for a defendant
who has particular needs. The specialty court does not provide
treatment but contracts or collaborates with experienced and expert
treatment providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---