BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 When the state tourism office was closed in
2011, the Washington tourism alliance was formed to provide a privately
funded and managed statewide tourism marketing program. While the
tourism alliance has kept the basics of a statewide tourism marketing
in place, it is necessary to find a long-term reliable funding
mechanism and source so that Washington state can continue to compete
with its neighboring states for valuable tourist dollars. It is the
intent of the legislature to establish a working group comprised of
public and private sector stakeholders in order to identify possible
long-term funding solutions which incorporate private-public
partnerships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A tourism stakeholder task force
comprised of representatives from the department of revenue, the
department of commerce, the Washington public ports association, the
Washington tourism alliance, the Washington lodging association, the
Washington restaurant association, and other private sector and
nonprofit organizations interested in tourism must convene to identify
effective operational structures and long-term funding sources for the
implementation of a statewide tourism marketing program.
(2) The tourism stakeholder task force must convene no less than
three separate meetings over the interim. Issues for discussion must
include, but are not limited to: The appropriate funding level for a
statewide tourism marketing program, identification of long-term
funding sources and mechanisms for collecting funds from those sources,
identification of the proper governance structure including the
relationship between the public and private sectors, and measurements
needed to identify the outcomes from the use of tourism marketing
funds. Specific recommendations on these issues are due to the
legislature by December 1, 2013.
(3) Legislative staff to the applicable committees must assist the
tourism stakeholder task force in planning and facilitating all task
force meetings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire December
1, 2013.

--- END ---