BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
continuing operation and maintenance of the state ferry system is an
integral part of Washington's economy. The legislature recognizes
further that the department of transportation has dedicated substantial
funds to designing, redesigning, constructing, and improving ferries
and ferry facilities. In order to provide for the continuing viability
of the ferry system, the legislature intends to limit the scope of the
department's responsibilities and powers with regard to the ferry
system to only the maintenance and operation of ferries and ferry
facilities and the acquisition of new ferries or ferry facilities when
directed by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2015, the department may not design,
construct, or make substantial alterations to ferries or ferry
facilities unless so directed by the legislature. For the purposes of
this subsection, "substantial alterations" means any project that is
anticipated to cost more than twenty-five percent of the fair market
value of the ferry or ferry facility to be altered at the time of the
alteration.
(2) This section does not limit the department's power to purchase
or otherwise acquire ferries or ferry facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---