BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of financial management shall
contract with an independent and objective consultant or consultants,
as selected by the climate legislative and executive work group created
in section 2 of this act, to prepare a credible evaluation of
approaches to reducing greenhouse gas emissions, as outlined in this
section.
(2) The evaluation must be provided to the governor by October 15,
2013, for use by the climate legislative and executive work group
created in section 2 of this act, and prior to that date the
independent and objective consultant or consultants selected under
subsection (1) of this section may provide selective analyses, drafts,
or portions of the report to the work group.
(3) The evaluation must include a review of comprehensive
greenhouse gas emission reduction programs being implemented in other
states and countries, including a review of reduction strategies being
implemented in the Pacific Northwest, on the west coast, in neighboring
provinces in Canada, and in other regions of the country. For each
program, the evaluation must include available information about:
(a) The effectiveness in achieving the jurisdiction's emission
reduction objectives, including the cost per ton of emission reduction;
(b) The relative impact upon different sectors of the
jurisdiction's economy, including power rates, agriculture,
manufacturing, and transportation fuel costs;
(c) The impacts upon household consumption and spending, including
fuel, food, and housing costs, and program measures to mitigate impacts
to low-income populations;
(d) Displacement of emission sources from the jurisdiction due to
the program;
(e) Any significant cobenefits to the jurisdiction, such as
reduction of potential adverse effects to public health, from
implementing the program;
(f) Opportunities for new manufacturing infrastructure, investments
in cleaner energy, and greater energy efficiency and jobs;
(g) Achievements in greater independence from fossil fuels and the
costs and benefits to their economy of doing so; and
(h) The most effective strategy and the trade-offs made to
implement that strategy.
(4) The evaluation must analyze:
(a) Washington's emissions and related energy consumption profile,
including:
(i) Total expenditures for energy by fuel category; and
(ii) The sources of the fuels, including imports of oil and other
fossil fuels;
(b) Options for an approach to emissions reduction that would
increase expenditures upon energy sources produced in state relative to
expenditures upon imported energy sources, and how that increase would
affect job growth and economic performance;
(c) Opportunities for new manufacturing infrastructure and other
job producing investments in Washington relating to cleaner energy and
greater energy efficiency;
(d) Existing studies of the potential costs to Washington consumers
and businesses of greenhouse gas emissions reduction programs or
strategies being implemented in other jurisdictions;
(e) Washington state policies to stabilize or reduce greenhouse gas
emissions that will contribute to meeting the greenhouse gas emissions
targets, including:
(i) Renewable fuels standard;
(ii) Energy codes adopted by the state building code council;
(iii) Emission performance standards;
(iv) Appliance standards;
(v) The energy independence act;
(vi) Energy efficiency and energy consumption requirement programs
for public buildings;
(vii) Conversion of public vehicles to clean fuels; and
(viii) Public purchasing requirements of vehicles that use clean
fuels; and
(f) The overall effect on global greenhouse gas levels if
Washington meets its greenhouse gas emissions targets.
(5) The evaluation must also examine and summarize federal policies
that will contribute to meeting the state greenhouse emissions targets,
including:
(a) Renewable fuel standards;
(b) Tax incentives for renewable energy;
(c) Tailpipe emissions standards for vehicles;
(d) Corporate average fuel economy standards for cars and light
trucks; and
(e) Clean air act requirements for emissions from stationary
sources and fossil-fueled electric generating units.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The climate legislative and executive
work group is created. The work group consists of five members and
includes:
(i) The governor, or the governor's designee, who shall be a
nonvoting member;
(ii) One member and an alternate from each major caucus of the
house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(iii) One member and an alternate from each major caucus of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate.
(b) An alternate may serve as a member at a work group meeting only
when a member from that caucus is unable to attend the meeting.
(2) The governor or the governor's designee is the chair of the
work group.
(3) As required under section 1(1) of this act, the work group must
select the consultant or consultants to be retained by the office of
financial management. The consultant or consultants must demonstrate
that they can perform nonpartisan, objective, and independent work.
The work group may not select a consultant or consultants whose
employer has retained a lobbyist in Washington state during the
immediately preceding five years. Nor may the work group select a
consultant or consultants whose employer or who has personally
contributed to the campaign of a statewide elected official,
legislative candidate, or any other political committee in the previous
four years. No less than four of the work group's five members must
support the retention of a consultant or consultants.
(4) The purpose of the work group is to recommend a state program
of actions and policies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, that if
implemented would ensure achievement of the state's emissions targets
in RCW 70.235.020. The recommendations must be prioritized to ensure
the greatest amount of environmental benefit for each dollar spent and
based on measures of environmental effectiveness, including
consideration of current best science, the effectiveness of the program
and policies in terms of costs, benefits, and results, and how best to
administer the program and policies. The work group recommendations
must include a timeline for actions and funding needed to implement the
recommendations. In order for a recommendation to be included in the
report, it must be supported by a majority of the work group's voting
members. Minority reports or comments must be included in the report.
(5) The members and alternates of the work group must be appointed
by May 1, 2013. The work group may meet up to twice per month and must
hold its first meeting by May 15, 2013.
(6) The work group shall use the evaluation required under section
1 of this act to inform the work group regarding experiences in other
jurisdictions and may call on the author of the evaluation to respond
to questions. All state agencies shall also cooperate with the work
group in providing information regarding previous and current climate
action reports and analyses.
(7) The work group shall schedule one or more meetings or portions
of meetings at which the views of the public may be provided to the
work group.
(8) The report of the work group must be provided to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nothing in this act may be construed to
enhance or diminish any existing authority regarding greenhouse gas
emissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---