BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Designated state agency" means the department of social and
health services, the department of health, the health care authority,
the department of commerce, the department of ecology, the department
of fish and wildlife, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the department of early learning.
(b) "Federal receipts" means the federal financial assistance, as
defined in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 7501 on the effective date of this section,
that is reported as part of a single audit.
(c) "Single audit" is as defined in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 7501 on the
effective date of this section.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a designated state
agency shall prepare as part of the agency's biennial budget submittal
under this chapter a report that:
(a) Reports the aggregate value of federal receipts the designated
state agency estimated for the ensuing biennium;
(b) Calculates the percentage of the designated state agency's
total budget for the ensuing biennium that constitutes federal receipts
that the designated state agency received; and
(c) Develops plans for operating the designated state agency if
there is a reduction of:
(i) Five percent or more in the federal receipts that the
designated state agency receives; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent or more in the federal receipts that the
designated state agency receives.
(3) The report required by subsection (2) of this section prepared
by the superintendent of public instruction shall include the
information required by subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this section
for each school district within the state.

--- END ---