BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to repeal an unused
and obsolete tax credit provision relating to property taxes paid on
timber on public lands. The legislature finds that repealing this
unused and obsolete crediting provision will clean up the statutes and
reduce taxpayer confusion. The current statute provides a credit for
property taxes paid on privately owned timber standing on public land;
however, since 2005, privately owned timber standing on public land has
been exempt from the property tax. Therefore, because no new tax
credits could have been earned under RCW 84.33.077 since 2005, the
legislature finds that the statute is obsolete and should be repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 84.33.077 (Credit for property taxes
paid on timber on public land) and 1984 c 204 s 21 & 1983 1st ex.s. c
62 s 8 are each repealed.

--- END ---