BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Solar energy can play an increasingly constructive role in the
state's electrical energy supply;
(b) The state energy code is intended to result in the construction
of increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings in order to help
achieve a broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel greenhouse gas
emission homes and buildings by 2031, an objective that can
fundamentally undermine the financial stability of local electric
utilities;
(c) Current state policies are designed to promote distributed
solar energy systems through a combination of taxpayer subsidies, in
the form of an investment cost recovery incentive, and ratepayer
subsidies, in the form of net metering and interconnection standards;
(d) While the cost and efficiency of solar energy systems have
improved over time, increased penetration of distributed solar energy
systems has been hindered by several factors, including: (i) The
higher cost of solar energy relative to the cost of general utility
service, which in Washington is among the lowest in the country; (ii)
the cost and feasibility of integrating distributed solar energy
systems into utility operations; and (iii) the capability of customers
to finance such systems themselves;
(e) Electric utilities are best suited to identify where
distributed solar energy systems can be located on their distribution
and transmission networks to maximize their contribution to system
operations and to minimize costs borne by utility customers; and
(f) Electric utilities can finance the installation of distributed
solar energy systems at a lower cost than individual customers or
third-party developers.
(2) The legislature declares that state policy should be reformed
to promote the deployment of distributed solar energy generation in a
manner that relies less on ratepayer subsidies and on cost-shifting
among utility customers and more on utilizing current state policies
and regulatory mechanisms to improve the cost-effectiveness of
distributed solar energy systems and to empower the state's electric
utilities to function as change agents and national leaders in the
deployment of solar energy technologies.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.030 and 2012 c 22 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3)(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) Organic by-products of
pulping and the wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal manure; (iii)
solid organic fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v)
untreated wooden demolition or construction debris; (vi) food waste and
food processing residuals; (vii) liquors derived from algae; (viii)
dedicated energy crops; and (ix) yard waste.
(b) "Biomass energy" does not include: (i) Wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iii) municipal solid waste.
(4) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(5) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(6) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(7) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(8) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(9) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.
(10) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(11) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than freshwater that commences operation after March 31,
1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest; or
(ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington
state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration
services;
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments; and
(c) Qualified biomass energy.
(12) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(13) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(14) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(15) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(16) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(17) "Qualified biomass energy" means electricity produced from a
biomass energy facility that: (a) Commenced operation before March 31,
1999; (b) contributes to the qualifying utility's load; and (c) is
owned either by: (i) A qualifying utility; or (ii) an industrial
facility that is directly interconnected with electricity facilities
that are owned by a qualifying utility and capable of carrying
electricity at transmission voltage.
(18) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(19) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by freshwater. The
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(20) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; or (i) biomass energy.
(21) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(22) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.
(23) "Distributed solar energy system" means any device or
combination of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an
energy source for the production of thermal energy or for use in the
generation of electricity from a facility that has an electrical
generating capacity or thermal equivalent of not more than five
kilowatts for a residential retail electric customer and one hundred
kilowatts for a commercial retail electric customer and that is
installed at a premises.
(24) "Premises" means any residential property, commercial real
estate, or lands, owned or leased by a retail electric customer within
the service area of a single qualifying utility.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.285.040 and 2012 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-
effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (j) of this subsection, each
qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable resources or acquire
equivalent renewable energy credits, or any combination of them, to
meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a
qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double the
facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce
eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of
the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable
resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(j)(i) Beginning January 1, 2016, only a qualifying utility that
owns or is directly interconnected to a qualified biomass energy
facility may use qualified biomass energy to meet its compliance
obligation under RCW 19.285.040(2).
(ii) A qualifying utility may no longer use electricity and
associated renewable energy credits from a qualified biomass energy
facility if the associated industrial pulping or wood manufacturing
facility ceases operation other than for purposes of maintenance or
upgrade.
(k) An industrial facility that hosts a qualified biomass energy
facility may only transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated
with its facility to the qualifying utility with which it is directly
interconnected with facilities owned by such a qualifying utility and
that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage. The
qualifying utility may only use an amount of renewable energy credits
associated with qualified biomass energy that are equivalent to the
proportionate amount of its annual targets under (a)(ii) and (iii) of
this subsection that was created by the load of the industrial
facility. A qualifying utility that owns a qualified biomass energy
facility may not transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated
with qualified biomass energy to another person, entity, or qualifying
utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.
(4) In complying with the targets established in subsection (2)(a)
of this section, a qualifying utility that owns a distributed solar
energy system may count the output of that system according to the
multiplier established as follows:
(a) The commission shall adopt rules by August 31, 2013, and every
two years thereafter, to establish a multiplier for electricity from
distributed solar energy systems owned by an investor-owned utility.
The multiplier must equalize the economic value of energy generated
from distributed solar energy systems with the cost of acquiring
utility scale wind energy to comply with the annual targets in
subsection (2)(a) of this section. The cost basis for a distributed
solar energy system must contain a return on investment for the
investor-owned utility that is equal to the return that the commission
has authorized for the company's other capital assets.
(b) The governing body of a qualifying utility that is not an
investor-owned utility may establish by August 31, 2013, and every two
years thereafter, a multiplier for electricity from distributed solar
energy systems owned by the utility. The multiplier must equalize the
economic value of energy generated from distributed solar energy
systems with the cost of acquiring utility scale wind energy by the
utility to comply with the annual targets in subsection (2)(a) of this
section.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "cost of acquiring utility
scale wind energy" means the value attributed to commercially available
utility scale wind generation by a qualifying utility in its latest
completed integrated resource plan under chapter 19.280 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.16.110 and 2011 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means an owner and assignee of a community
solar project as defined in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section that
is responsible for applying for the investment cost recovery incentive
on behalf of the other owners and performing such administrative tasks
on behalf of the other owners as may be necessary, such as receiving
investment cost recovery incentive payments, and allocating and paying
appropriate amounts of such payments to the other owners.
(2)(a) "Community solar project" means:
(i) A solar energy system that is capable of generating up to
seventy-five kilowatts of electricity and is owned by local
individuals, households, nonprofit organizations, or nonutility
businesses that is placed on the property owned by a cooperating local
governmental entity that is not in the light and power business or in
the gas distribution business;
(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that is capable of
generating up to seventy-five kilowatts of electricity and that is
voluntarily funded by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for
their financial support, the utility gives contributors a payment or
credit on their utility bill for the value of the electricity produced
by the project; or
(iii) A solar energy system, placed on the property owned by a
cooperating local governmental entity that is not in the light and
power business or in the gas distribution business, that is capable of
generating up to seventy-five kilowatts of electricity, and that is
owned by a company whose members are each eligible for an investment
cost recovery incentive for the same customer-generated electricity as
provided in RCW 82.16.120.
(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a)
of this subsection:
(i) "Company" means an entity that is:
(A)(I) A limited liability company;
(II) A cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW; or
(III) A mutual corporation or association formed under chapter
24.06 RCW; and
(B) Not a "utility" as defined in this subsection (2)(b); and
(ii) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and
(iii) "Utility" means a light and power business, an electric
cooperative, or a mutual corporation that provides electricity service.
(3) "Customer-generated electricity" ((means)) includes:
(a) A community solar project ((or));
(b) A solar energy system that has a generating capacity of not
more than one hundred kilowatts or its thermal equivalent, is owned by
a qualifying utility, and is installed on the premises of a residential
or commercial retail electric customer of the qualifying utility in
Washington; or
(c) The alternating current electricity that is generated from a
renewable energy system located in Washington and installed on an
individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that is
also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
Except for community solar projects, a system located on a leasehold
interest does not qualify under this definition. ((Except for utility-owned community solar projects, "customer-generated electricity" does
not include electricity generated by a light and power business with
greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas
distribution business.))
(4) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied by the
appropriate economic development factor.
(5) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local government
of this state including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns,
municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose
districts, and school districts.
(6) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(7) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system, an
anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(8) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight to produce thermal
energy as an energy source for use in the generation of electricity.
(9) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct
current to alternating current in a solar energy system.
(10) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(11) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity
by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.
(12) "Qualifying utility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
19.285.030.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.16.120 and 2011 c 179 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any individual, business, local governmental entity, ((not
in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business))
qualifying utility, or a participant in a community solar project may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system.
(b) In the case of a community solar project as defined in RCW
82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the administrator must apply for the investment
cost recovery incentive on behalf of each of the other owners.
(c) In the case of a community solar project as defined in RCW
82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the company owning the community solar project
must apply for the investment cost recovery incentive on behalf of each
member of the company.
(2)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under subsection (4) of this section, the applicant
must submit to the department of revenue and to the climate and rural
energy development center at the Washington State University,
established under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner
prescribed by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system.
(A) If the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the certification must
also include the name and address of each of the owners of the
community solar project.
(B) If the applicant is a company that owns a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the certification must
also include the name and address of each member of the company;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state;
(E) A stirling converter manufactured in Washington state; or
(F) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems; and
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue must notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(l).
(3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
must be made to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system.
(A) If the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the application must also
include the name and address of each of the owners of the community
solar project.
(B) If the applicant is a company that owns a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the application must
also include the name and address of each member of the company;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section; and
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system must notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(l).
(c)(i) Persons, administrators of community solar projects, and
companies receiving incentive payments must keep and preserve, for a
period of five years, suitable records as may be necessary to determine
the amount of incentive applied for and received. Such records must be
open for examination at any time upon notice by the light and power
business that made the payment or by the department. If upon
examination of any records or from other information obtained by the
business or department it appears that an incentive has been paid in an
amount that exceeds the correct amount of incentive payable, the
business may assess against the person for the amount found to have
been paid in excess of the correct amount of incentive payable and must
add thereto interest on the amount. Interest is assessed in the manner
that the department assesses interest upon delinquent tax under RCW
82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(4) Except for community solar projects and solar energy systems
owned by qualifying utilities, the investment cost recovery incentive
may be paid fifteen cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless
requests exceed the amount authorized for credit to the participating
light and power business. For community solar projects and solar
energy systems owned by qualifying utilities, the investment cost
recovery incentive may be paid thirty cents per economic development
kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the amount authorized for credit
to the participating light and power business. For the purposes of
this section, the rate paid for the investment cost recovery incentive
may be multiplied by the following factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state or a solar stirling converter
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(5)(a) No individual, household, business, ((or)) local
governmental entity, or qualifying utility is eligible for incentives
provided under subsection (4) of this section for more than five
thousand dollars per year.
(b) Except as provided in (c) through (e) of this subsection (5),
each applicant in a community solar project is eligible for up to five
thousand dollars per year.
(c) Where the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), each owner is eligible
for an incentive but only in proportion to the ownership share of the
project, up to five thousand dollars per year.
(d) Where the applicant is a company owning a community solar
project that has applied for an investment cost recovery incentive on
behalf of its members, each member of the company is eligible for an
incentive that would otherwise belong to the company but only in
proportion to each ownership share of the company, up to five thousand
dollars per year. The company itself is not eligible for incentives
under this section.
(e) In the case of a utility-owned community solar project, each
ratepayer that contributes to the project is eligible for an incentive
in proportion to the contribution, up to five thousand dollars per
year.
(6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments must be reduced proportionately.
(7) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy system
belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the light
and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.
(9) No incentive may be paid under this section for kilowatt-hours
generated before July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2020.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.16.130 and 2010 c 202 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A light and power business shall be allowed a credit against
taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to investment cost
recovery incentive payments made in any fiscal year under RCW
82.16.120. The credit shall be taken in a form and manner as required
by the department. The credit under this section for the fiscal year
may not exceed one-half percent of the businesses' taxable power sales
due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) or one hundred thousand dollars,
whichever is greater. Incentive payments to participants in a utility-owned community solar project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(ii) may
only account for up to twenty-five percent of the total allowable
credit. Incentive payments to participants in a company-owned
community solar project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii) may only
account for up to five percent of the total allowable credit.
Incentive payments claimed by a qualifying utility may only account for
up to fifty percent of the total allowable credit. The credit may not
exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds
shall not be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not used to
earn a credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a credit in
subsequent years.
(2) For any business that has claimed credit for amounts that
exceed the correct amount of the incentive payable under RCW 82.16.120,
the amount of tax against which credit was claimed for the excess
payments shall be immediately due and payable. The department shall
assess interest but not penalties on the taxes against which the credit
was claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, 2020. Credits may not be claimed after June 30, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt a rule by December 31, 2013, to
enable and encourage electrical companies to acquire, install, and
maintain cost-effective distributed solar energy systems, as that term
is defined in RCW 19.285.030. The rule must allow an electrical
company to earn a fair return on common equity and recover costs,
including, but not limited to, the cost of debt incurred for
investments made in the acquisition, installation, operation, and
maintenance of distributed solar energy systems. The rule may require
that a customer or class of customer contribute a reasonable amount to
the electrical utility's cost of acquiring, installing, operating, and
maintaining a distributed solar energy system at the retail electric
customer's premises if necessary to ensure that the distributed solar
energy system meets the requirement of being cost-effective. If a
financial contribution is required of a customer, the rule must
provide that such a contribution be paid to an electrical company under
terms and conditions that will most readily accomplish the purpose of
this section without increasing financial risk to the company's
shareholders or other customers.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cost-effective" means, at the time a distributed solar energy
system is placed in the rate base, the distributed solar energy system
is reasonably expected to generate energy at a total incremental system
cost per unit of energy delivered to end use that is less than or equal
to the cost per unit of energy delivered to end use from utility scale
wind generation, considering: (i) The value of an investment cost
recovery incentive available to qualifying utility investments in
distributed solar energy systems under RCW 82.16.120; (ii) the
multiplier applied to distributed solar energy systems pursuant to RCW
19.285.040; (iii) the value of any renewable energy credits produced by
distributed solar energy systems and sold by the electrical company;
(iv) the value of any other state and federal tax credits that would
derive from the production of energy from a distributed solar energy
system; and (v) the financial contribution that may be required from a
customer pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(b) "Cost of acquiring utility scale wind energy" means the value
attributed to commercially available utility scale wind generation by
a qualifying utility in its last completed integrated resource plan
under chapter 19.280 RCW.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---