BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.130 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 933 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The home visiting services account is created in the
((custody of the state treasurer)) state treasury. Revenues to the
account shall consist of appropriations by the legislature and all
other sources deposited in the account. All federal funds received by
the department for home visiting activities must be deposited into the
account.
(b)(i) Expenditures from the account shall be used for state
matching funds for the purposes of the program established in this
section and federally funded activities for the home visiting program,
including administrative expenses. ((Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.))
(ii) The department oversees the account and is the lead state
agency for home visiting system development. The nongovernmental
private-public partnership administers the home visiting service
delivery system and provides implementation support functions to funded
programs.
(iii) The director or the director's designee and the
nongovernmental private-public partnership must determine the match
rate of public funds invested into the account with private funds
annually.
(iv) Authorizations for expenditures may be given only after
private funds are committed ((and available)). The nongovernmental
private-public partnership must report to the department regularly to
demonstrate sufficient investment of private match funds into the
account.
(c) Expenditures from the account are ((exempt from the
appropriations and)) subject to appropriation and the allotment
provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. ((However, amounts used for program
administration by the department are subject to the allotment and
budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is
required for these expenditures.))
(2) The department must expend moneys from the account to provide
state matching funds for partnership activities to implement home
visiting services and administer the infrastructure necessary to
develop, support, and evaluate evidence-based, research-based, and
promising home visiting programs.
(3) Activities eligible for funding through the account include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Home visiting services that achieve one or more of the
following: (i) Enhancing child development and well-being by
alleviating the effects on child development of poverty and other known
risk factors; (ii) reducing the incidence of child abuse and neglect;
or (iii) promoting school readiness for young children and their
families; and
(b) Development and maintenance of the infrastructure for home
visiting programs, including training, quality improvement, and
evaluation.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department shall contract with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership designated in RCW 43.215.070
to administer programs funded through the home visiting services
account. The department shall monitor performance and provide periodic
reports on the use outcomes of the home visiting services account.
(5) The nongovernmental private-public partnership shall, in the
administration of the programs:
(a) Fund programs through a competitive bid process or in
compliance with the regulations of the funding source; and
(b) Convene an advisory committee of early learning and home
visiting experts, including one representative from the department, to
advise the partnership regarding research and the distribution of funds
from the account to eligible programs.
(((6) To promote continuity for families receiving home visiting
services through programs funded on May 4, 2010, those programs funded
under chapter 43.121 RCW shall be funded through June 30, 2012, based
on availability of funds and the achievement of stated performance
goals. This section does not require any program to receive continuous
funding beyond June 30, 2012. Organizations that may receive program
funding include local health departments; nonprofit, neighborhood-based, community, regional, or statewide organizations; and federally
recognized Indian tribes located in the state.))

--- END ---