BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.80.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 939 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 445 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the human resources director, the director of
enterprise services, or the Washington personnel resources board
adopted under RCW 41.06.157.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and ((the dollar
amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits))
the employer's percentage contribution of the total weighted average of
the projected health care premium for each employee eligible for
insurance. The projected health care premium is the weighted average
across all health care benefit plans and tiers. However, except as
provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of higher
education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be certified
for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the ((dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits))
employer's percentage contribution of the total weighted average of the
projected health care premium for each employee eligible for insurance
shall be conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the
exclusive bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The
exclusive bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to
chapter 47.64 RCW shall bargain the ((dollar amount expended on behalf
of each employee for health care benefits)) employer's percentage
contribution of the total weighted average of the projected health care
premium for each employee eligible for insurance with the employer as
part of the coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed
to by the employer and the coalition shall be included in all master
collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For
institutions of higher education, promotional preferences and the
number of names to be certified for vacancies shall be bargained under
the provisions of RCW 41.80.010(4). For agreements covering the
((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, any agreement between the
employer and the coalition regarding ((the dollar amount expended on
behalf of each employee for)) health care benefits is a separate
agreement and shall not be included in the master collective bargaining
agreements negotiated by the parties.
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.64.270 and 2011 c 367 s 713 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The employer and one coalition of all the exclusive bargaining
representatives subject to this chapter and chapter 41.80 RCW shall
conduct negotiations regarding the ((dollar amount expended on behalf
of each employee for health care benefits)) employer's percentage
contribution of the total weighted average of the projected health care
premium for each employee eligible for insurance.
(2) Absent a collective bargaining agreement to the contrary, the
department of transportation shall provide contributions to insurance
and health care plans for ferry system employees and dependents, as
determined by the state health care authority, under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(3) The employer and employee organizations may collectively
bargain for insurance plans other than health care benefits, and
employer contributions may exceed that of other state agencies as
provided in RCW 41.05.050.
(4) For the ((2011-2013)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a collective
bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits
negotiated between the employer and coalition pursuant to RCW
41.80.020(3) ((regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee)) must be a separate agreement for which the governor may
request funds necessary to implement the agreement. ((If such an
agreement is negotiated and funded by the legislature, this agreement
will supersede any terms and conditions of an expired 2009-2011
biennial collective bargaining agreement under this chapter regarding
health care benefits.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning no later than January 1, 2014, all state employee
health care benefit plans under this chapter must be offered in
conjunction with an employee wellness program developed pursuant to RCW
41.05.540. The program must include premium reductions, premium
increases, or other financial incentives to promote employee
achievement of identified wellness targets or goals.
(2) The governor shall appoint an eight member health and wellness
advisory committee to consult with and advise the director regarding
the employee wellness program. Three members must be representatives
of state employee labor organizations, one member must be a
nonrepresented state employee, and four members must be representatives
of state agencies or higher education institutions. The members shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall convene the
advisory committee not less than four times a year to discuss the
employee wellness program design and experience, and to solicit
recommendations from the committee.
(3) For employees covered by collective bargaining agreements for
the period of July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, the employee
wellness program must be offered at the end of the time period
established in RCW 41.80.010(7).

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.540 and 2007 c 259 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health care authority, in coordination with the
((department of health,)) health plans participating in public
employees' benefits board programs((,)) and the ((University of
Washington's center for health promotion, shall establish)) state
agencies shall expand and maintain a state employee health and wellness
program focused on reducing the health risks and improving the health
status of state employees((,)) and dependents((, and retirees))
enrolled in the public employees' benefits board. The program shall
use public and private sector best practices to achieve goals of
measurable health outcomes, measurable productivity improvements,
positive impact on the cost of medical care, and positive return on
investment. The program shall establish standards for health promotion
and disease prevention activities, and develop a mechanism to update
standards as evidence-based research brings new information and best
practices forward.
(2) The state employee health and wellness program shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance and other services as needed to
wellness staff in all state agencies and institutions of higher
education by; building on the success with the worksite wellness
demonstrations and expanding the Washington worksite wellness program;
(b) Develop effective communication tools and ongoing training for
wellness staff;
(c) ((Contract)) Complete consolidated contracting with outside
vendors for ((evaluation of program goals;
(d) Strongly encourage the widespread completion of online health
assessment tools for all state employees, dependents, and retirees.
The health assessment tool must be voluntary and confidential. Health
assessment data and claims data shall be used to:
(i) Engage state agencies and institutions of higher education in
providing evidence-based programs targeted at reducing identified
health risks;
(ii) Guide contracting with third-party vendors to implement
behavior change tools for targeted high-risk populations; and
(iii) Guide the benefit structure for state employees, dependents,
and retirees to include covered services and medications known to
manage and reduce health risks)) worksite wellness activities such as,
but not limited to, on-site flu vaccination clinics, mobile
mammography, healthy weight control programs, chronic disease
management courses, and other evidence-based programs that support
employee health and wellness;
(d) Develop and refine common core data elements for health plans
and agency worksites to assist with comparable measurement and
assessment of outcomes;
(e) Gather and monitor data from agencies on the worksite wellness
activities and outcomes including impacts on productivity and employee
wellness, and complete an analysis and summary of the outcomes
annually;
(f) Coordinate with the public employees benefits board to design
a benefit package that more strongly encourages the use of high-value
services and member engagement in health assessment and wellness
programs. A benefit design must incorporate a financial incentive for
completing a health assessment and participating in health activities
as an integral structural component in the benefit design rather than
as a freestanding assessment tool;
(g) Ensure the design of the health and wellness program and
benefit structure complement the development of chronic care management
and medical home models consistent with the requirements of RCW
41.05.023 and 41.05.670.
(3) ((The health care authority shall report to the legislature in
December 2008 and December 2010 on outcome goals for the employee
health program.)) To expand the employee health and wellness program
and build a strategic link with the benefit design and worksite
supports, the health care authority must engage in collaborative
discussions with enrollees in the public employees benefits board
program, the various employee unions representing employees, and state
agencies. Consolidated recommendations from all participants on the
benefit design and incentive structure must be shared with the board
for consideration.

--- END ---