BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is allowed a credit against the tax due under this
chapter as provided in this section. The credit equals:
(a) Twenty percent of wages and benefits paid up to a maximum of
three thousand dollars for each qualified employment position filled by
an unemployed veteran of Operation Enduring Freedom or Operation Iraqi
Freedom.
(b) Ten percent of wages and benefits paid up to a maximum of one
thousand five hundred dollars for each qualified employment position
filled by an unemployed veteran of an armed conflict prior to Operation
Enduring Freedom.
(2) The department must keep a running total of all credits allowed
under this chapter during each fiscal year. The department may not
allow any credits that would cause the total to exceed ten million
dollars in any fiscal year. If all or part of a claim for credit is
disallowed under this subsection, the disallowed portion is carried
over to the next fiscal year. However, the carryover into the next
fiscal year is only permitted to the extent that the cap for the next
fiscal year is not exceeded. Priority must be given to credits carried
over from a previous fiscal year.
(3) The credit may be used against any tax due under this chapter,
and may be carried over until used. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(4) The taxpayer must keep records necessary for the department to
determine eligibility under this section. The department may prescribe
rules and procedures regarding the administration of this section.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed during two consecutive full calendar quarters. For
seasonal employers, "qualified employment position" also includes the
equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for two consecutive
full calendar quarters.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (5)(a), "full-time" means a
normal work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(iii) If an employee is either voluntarily or involuntarily
separated from employment, the position does not cease to be a
qualified employment position if the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement who is an unemployed veteran.
(b) "Unemployed" has the same meaning as in RCW 50.04.310.
(c) "Veteran" means every person who has received an honorable
discharge or received a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable
record, where applicable, and who has served as a member in any branch
of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard
and armed forces reserves, and has fulfilled his or her initial
military service obligation, and has served in operation enduring
freedom, operation Iraqi freedom, or any armed conflict prior to
operation enduring freedom.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Pursuant to chapter 43.136 RCW, the joint
legislative audit and review committee must review the business and
occupation tax credit established under section 1 of this act by July
1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the hire
our heroes tax credit program.

--- END ---