BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.12.183 and 2011 c 190 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or after January 1, 2012, any business that owns and
operates a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter 46.72 RCW, a
limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under chapter 81.72
RCW and the for hire operator or chauffeur of such vehicle is within
the mandatory coverage of this title.
(2) On or after January 1, 2012, any business that as owner or
agent leases a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter 46.72 RCW, a
limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under chapter 81.72
RCW to a for hire operator or a chauffeur and the for hire operator or
chauffeur of such vehicle is within the mandatory coverage of this
title.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a business that has
contracted for the services of a business that owned and operated, or
as owner or agent leased, a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter
46.72 RCW, a limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under
chapter 81.72 RCW is not within the mandatory coverage of this title,
and is not responsible primarily or indirectly for premiums upon the
work.
(4) Prior to January 1, 2012, any business that owned and operated,
or as owner or agent leased, a for hire vehicle licensed under chapter
46.72 RCW, a limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a taxicab under
chapter 81.72 RCW, and the for hire operator or chauffeur of such
vehicle is presumed not to have been within the mandatory coverage of
this title. However, a claim is presumed to have been within the
mandatory coverage of this title and may be used to rebut the
presumption of this subsection (4) if the claim:
(a) Is for a medical or time loss payment by or on behalf of a for
hire operator or chauffeur;
(b) Is a result of work performed and injury suffered prior to
January 1, 2012, with or through any business that owned and operated,
or as owner or agent leased:
(i) A for hire vehicle licensed under chapter 46.72 RCW;
(ii) A limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW; or
(iii) A taxicab under chapter 81.72 RCW.
(5) Any business that owned and operated, or as owner or agent
leased, or contracted for the services of, a for hire vehicle licensed
under chapter 46.72 RCW, a limousine under chapter 46.72A RCW, or a
taxicab under chapter 81.72 RCW that paid premium, penalty, or interest
to the department in settlement of a claim for unpaid premiums by the
department prior to January 1, 2012, where no fault for such premium
claim was admitted, must have such payment refunded by the department
within ninety days after the effective date of this section.
(6) Any payment made pursuant to subsection (5) of this section
must be reduced by the amount of any expenditure made by the department
for or on behalf of any for hire operator or chauffeur contracted or
affiliated with the business, as a result of a medical or time loss
claim, and which originates in or is otherwise attributable to the
period for which the premium claim is assessed on the business by the
department.
(7) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Chauffeur" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.04.115;
and
(b) "For hire operator" means a person who is operating a vehicle
for the purpose of carrying persons for compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies both prospectively and
retroactively to all causes of action arising under this section.

--- END ---