BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.28.080 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 437 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who sells or gives, or permits to be sold or
given, to any person under the age of eighteen years any cigar,
cigarette, cigarette paper or wrapper, ((or)) tobacco in any form, a
vapor product, or any instrument or paraphernalia that is solely
designed for the smoking or ingestion of tobacco or shisha, including
a hookah or water pipe, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) It shall be no defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section that the person acted, or was believed by the defendant to act,
as agent or representative of another.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Shisha" includes any mixture of tobacco leaf and honey,
molasses, dried fruit, or any other sweetener.
(b) "Vapor product" means a noncombustible tobacco-derived product
containing nicotine that employs a mechanical heating element, battery,
or circuit, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to heat a
liquid nicotine solution contained in cartridges. Vapor product does
not include any product that is regulated by the United States food and
drug administration under chapter V of the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act.

--- END ---