BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that Washington families, workers, and
employers continue to struggle to make ends meet. As families and
employers have streamlined their budgets and services, so should state
government. Government continues to increase the burden on citizens
and employers through perpetual alteration and expansion of rules.
During 2012, an estimated 1,129 new sections to the Washington
Administrative Code were permanently adopted, 2,211 sections were
permanently amended, 393 emergency rule filings were made, and 961
sections were permanently repealed. A total of 5,511 pages of
permanent rule changes were made and 2,398 pages of emergency rules
were adopted.
The constant changing of rules provides uncertainty to citizens
and employers and adds additional costs to taxpayers as agencies hold
public meetings and telephone conferences, and employees spend
thousands of hours working on drafts for rules. Furthermore, continual
proposal of new rules distracts employers from being productive in
their respective businesses due to a need to comment on these proposed
rules, and to change their policies, procedures, tools, and equipment
to implement the rules once they are adopted. Most agencies do not
track the number of hours employees spend on rule making nor do they
track the cost to the agency to do this task. One way to reduce
millions of dollars in employee and administrative costs is to impose
a moratorium on formal and informal rule making by state agencies
except in certain specified instances. This moratorium is to last for
three years or until the state is no longer facing financial deficits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Agency rule making is suspended until the later of July 1,
2016, or such time as the economic and revenue forecast council reports
for three consecutive quarters that state revenue collections have
increased above the official forecast adopted pursuant to RCW 82.33.010
on or before February 20th in an even-numbered year or March 20th in an
odd-numbered year, except in the following cases:
(a) A rule is needed to implement a federal law;
(b) A rule is needed to implement the terms of a governor-declared
state of emergency;
(c) A rule is needed by the department of health to respond to a
public health emergency;
(d) A rule is needed to set the times for the taking of wildlife,
fish, or shellfish pursuant to RCW 77.12.047(1) and 77.04.055(2); or
(e) Legislation specifically directs that rule making be
undertaken. Rules adopted under this subsection (1)(e) must be
approved by the legislature in the ensuing legislative session before
the rule may take effect.
(2) This section does not prohibit an agency from repealing rules.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.310 and 2011 c 298 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section are subject to section 2 of this
act.
(2)(a) To meet the intent of providing greater public access to
administrative rule making and to promote consensus among interested
parties, agencies must solicit comments from the public on a subject of
possible rule making before filing with the code reviser a notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. The agency must prepare a
statement of inquiry that:
(i) Identifies the specific statute or statutes authorizing the
agency to adopt rules on this subject;
(ii) Discusses why rules on this subject may be needed and what
they might accomplish;
(iii) Identifies other federal and state agencies that regulate
this subject, and describes the process whereby the agency would
coordinate the contemplated rule with these agencies;
(iv) Discusses the process by which the rule might be developed,
including, but not limited to, negotiated rule making, pilot rule
making, or agency study;
(v) Specifies the process by which interested parties can
effectively participate in the decision to adopt a new rule and
formulation of a proposed rule before its publication.
(b) The statement of inquiry must be filed with the code reviser
for publication in the state register at least thirty days before the
date the agency files notice of proposed rule making under RCW
34.05.320 and the statement, or a summary of the information contained
in that statement, must be sent to any party that has requested receipt
of the agency's statements of inquiry.
(((2))) (3) Agencies are encouraged to develop and use new
procedures for reaching agreement among interested parties before
publication of notice and the adoption hearing on a proposed rule.
Examples of new procedures include, but are not limited to:
(a) Negotiated rule making by which representatives of an agency
and of the interests that are affected by a subject of rule making,
including, where appropriate, county and city representatives, seek to
reach consensus on the terms of the proposed rule and on the process by
which it is negotiated; and
(b) Pilot rule making which includes testing the feasibility of
complying with or administering draft new rules or draft amendments to
existing rules through the use of volunteer pilot groups in various
areas and circumstances, as provided in RCW 34.05.313 or as otherwise
provided by the agency.
(((3))) (4)(a) An agency must make a determination whether
negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or another process for
generating participation from interested parties prior to development
of the rule is appropriate.
(b) An agency must include a written justification in the rule-making file if an opportunity for interested parties to participate in
the rule-making process prior to publication of the proposed rule has
not been provided.
(((4))) (5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(b) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(c) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(d) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(e) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(f) Rules that set or adjust fees under the authority of RCW
19.02.075 or that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards, including fees set or adjusted under the authority of RCW
19.80.045; or
(g) Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal:
(i) A procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; or
(ii) A filing or related process requirement for applying to an
agency for a license or permit.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.313 and 1995 c 403 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section are subject to section 2 of this
act.
(2) During the development of a rule or after its adoption, an
agency may develop methods for measuring or testing the feasibility of
complying with or administering the rule and for identifying simple,
efficient, and economical alternatives for achieving the goal of the
rule. A pilot project shall include public notice, participation by
volunteers who are or will be subject to the rule, a high level of
involvement from agency management, reasonable completion dates, and a
process by which one or more parties may withdraw from the process or
the process may be terminated. Volunteers who agree to test a rule and
attempt to meet the requirements of the draft rule, to report
periodically to the proposing agency on the extent of their ability to
meet the requirements of the draft rule, and to make recommendations
for improving the draft rule shall not be obligated to comply fully
with the rule being tested nor be subject to any enforcement action or
other sanction for failing to comply with the requirements of the draft
rule.
(((2))) (3) An agency conducting a pilot rule project authorized
under subsection (((1))) (2) of this section may waive one or more
provisions of agency rules otherwise applicable to participants in such
a pilot project if the agency first determines that such a waiver is in
the public interest and necessary to conduct the project. Such a
waiver may be only for a stated period of time, not to exceed the
duration of the project.
(((3))) (4) The findings of the pilot project should be widely
shared and, where appropriate, adopted as amendments to the rule.
(((4))) (5) If an agency conducts a pilot rule project in lieu of
meeting the requirements of the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85
RCW, the agency shall ensure the following conditions are met:
(a) If over ten small businesses are affected, there shall be at
least ten small businesses in the test group and at least one-half of
the volunteers participating in the pilot test group shall be small
businesses.
(b)(i) If there are at least one hundred businesses affected, the
participation by small businesses in the test group shall be as
follows:
(A) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ twenty-six to fifty employees;
(B) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ eleven to twenty-six employees; and
(C) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ zero to ten employees.
(ii) If there do not exist a sufficient number of small businesses
in each size category set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection willing to
participate in the pilot project to meet the minimum requirements of
that subsection, then the agency must comply with this section to the
maximum extent practicable.
(c) The agency may not terminate the pilot project before
completion.
(d) Before filing the notice of proposed rule making pursuant to
RCW 34.05.320, the agency must prepare a report of the pilot rule
project that includes:
(i) A description of the difficulties small businesses had in
complying with the pilot rule;
(ii) A list of the recommended revisions to the rule to make
compliance with the rule easier or to reduce the cost of compliance
with the rule by the small businesses participating in the pilot rule
project;
(iii) A written statement explaining the options it considered to
resolve each of the difficulties described and a statement explaining
its reasons for not including a recommendation by the pilot test group
to revise the rule; and
(iv) If the agency was unable to meet the requirements set forth in
(b)(i) of this subsection, a written explanation of why it was unable
to do so and the steps the agency took to include small businesses in
the pilot project.

Sec. 5 RCW 34.05.320 and 2012 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section are subject to section 2 of this
act.
(2) At least twenty days before the rule-making hearing at which
the agency receives public comment regarding adoption of a rule, the
agency shall cause notice of the hearing to be published in the state
register. The publication constitutes the proposal of a rule. The
notice shall include all of the following:
(a) A title, a description of the rule's purpose, and any other
information which may be of assistance in identifying the rule or its
purpose;
(b) Citations of the statutory authority for adopting the rule and
the specific statute the rule is intended to implement;
(c) A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated
effects, including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing
rules, a short description of the changes the proposal would make, and
a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed action;
(d) The agency personnel, with their office location and telephone
number, who are responsible for the drafting, implementation, and
enforcement of the rule;
(e) The name of the person or organization, whether private,
public, or governmental, proposing the rule;
(f) Agency comments or recommendations, if any, regarding statutory
language, implementation, enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to
the rule;
(g) Whether the rule is necessary as the result of federal law or
federal or state court action, and if so, a citation to such law or
court decision;
(h) When, where, and how persons may present their views on the
proposed rule;
(i) The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;
(j) A copy of the small business economic impact statement prepared
under chapter 19.85 RCW, or a copy of the school district fiscal impact
statement under RCW 28A.305.135 in the case of the state board of
education, or an explanation for why the agency did not prepare the
statement;
(k) A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the
rule adoption; and
(l) If RCW 34.05.328 does apply, a statement indicating that a copy
of the preliminary cost-benefit analysis described in RCW
34.05.328(1)(c) is available.
(((2))) (3)(a) Upon filing notice of the proposed rule with the
code reviser, the adopting agency shall have copies of the notice on
file and available for public inspection. Except as provided in (b) of
this subsection, the agency shall forward three copies of the notice to
the rules review committee.
(b) A pilot of at least ten agencies, including the departments of
labor and industries, fish and wildlife, revenue, ecology, retirement
systems, and health, shall file the copies required under this
subsection, as well as under RCW 34.05.350 and 34.05.353, with the
rules review committee electronically for a period of four years from
June 10, 2004. The office of regulatory assistance shall negotiate the
details of the pilot among the agencies, the legislature, and the code
reviser.
(((3))) (4) No later than three days after its publication in the
state register, the agency shall cause either a copy of the notice of
proposed rule adoption, or a summary of the information contained on
the notice, to be mailed to each person, city, and county that has made
a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such notices. An agency
may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed
copies of these notices.
(((4))) (5) In addition to the notice required by subsections
(((1))) (2) and (((2))) (3) of this section, an institution of higher
education shall cause the notice to be published in the campus or
standard newspaper of the institution at least seven days before the
rule-making hearing.

Sec. 6 RCW 34.05.328 and 2011 c 298 s 21 and 2011 c 149 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section are subject to section 2 of this
act.
(2) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (((5))) (6) of
this section, an agency must:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice must include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis must be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for
those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(((2))) (3) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection
(((1))) (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the agency must place in
the rule-making file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality
so as to persuade a reasonable person that the determinations are
justified.
(((3))) (4) Before adopting rules described in subsection (((5)))
(6) of this section, an agency must place in the rule-making file a
rule implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order.
The plan must describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(((4))) (5) After adopting a rule described in subsection (((5)))
(6) of this section regulating the same activity or subject matter as
another provision of federal or state law, an agency must do all of the
following:
(a) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (((4)))
(5)(a), the agency must report to the legislature pursuant to (b) of
this subsection;
(b) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this
section applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees under the authority of RCW
19.02.075 or that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards, including fees set or adjusted under the authority of RCW
19.80.045;
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents; or
(viii) Rules of the department of revenue that adopt a uniform
expiration date for reseller permits as authorized in RCW 82.32.780 and
82.32.783.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency must state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(((6))) (7) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the office of regulatory assistance, after
consulting with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business,
labor, and environmental organizations, must report to the governor and
the legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report must document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---