BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If child protective services has knowledge of substantiated
abuse or neglect, not mere allegations of child abuse or neglect, child
protective services shall contact the public school district where the
child is enrolled and share the information related to the abuse or
neglect with the school district's superintendent or the
superintendent's designee.
(2) Each school district shall have a designated point of contact
where child protective services can share substantiated concerns of
child abuse or neglect with the school district superintendent or the
superintendent's designee.
(3) Information provided to public school districts on
substantiated child abuse or neglect must remain confidential and may
only be shared with school district personnel who have a legitimate
educational interest.

--- END ---