BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the current process for collection
and disclosure of certified payroll records on public works projects is
an inefficient use of public resources and results in unreasonable
delays for interested parties seeking the records. The legislature
therefore intends to create a pilot program for the collection of
payroll records on public works projects.
(2) The department of labor and industries must contract out for a
labor compliance software program that allows contractors and
subcontractors on public works projects to electronically submit
complete and current payroll records to awarding agencies. At a
minimum, the labor compliance software program must collect information
necessary to ensure compliance with prevailing wage requirements,
including names and identifying information of workers, daily hours
worked per pay period, the prevailing wage classification applicable to
the worker, and the wages earned by the worker in the pay period. The
department of labor and industries may consult with the department of
enterprise services and with the capital projects advisory review board
when selecting the labor compliance software program.
(3) The awarding agency for any public works project subject to
this section must require the contractor and each and every
subcontractor on the project to submit current and complete payroll
information using the labor compliance software program before any
payment or disbursement of public funds. Following the final
acceptance of a public works project, funds retained pursuant to RCW
60.28.011 may not be released to the contractor until the awarding
agency has complete and accurate payroll records for every contractor
and subcontractor who performed work on the project.
(4) Participation in the pilot program is mandatory for public
works projects advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2014, and
before January 1, 2019, as follows:
(a) For four-year institutions of higher education, public works
projects estimated to cost one million dollars or more;
(b) For public school districts, public works projects estimated to
cost one million dollars or more;
(c) For King county, public works projects estimated to cost one
million dollars or more.
(5) Participation in the pilot program is optional for all other
public works projects. An awarding agency may participate in the pilot
program on a project-by-project basis, and must disclose pilot program
participation in the bid solicitation.

--- END ---