BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Any local improvement district bonds, and interest thereon, issued
against a bond redemption fund of a local improvement district pursuant
to RCW 87.03.485 shall be a valid claim of the owner thereof only as
against the local improvement guarantee fund, the local improvement
district redemption fund, and the assessments or revenues pledged to
such fund or funds and do not constitute a general indebtedness against
the issuing irrigation district unless the board of directors by
resolution expressly provides for a pledge of general indebtedness.
Except where the board provides for a pledge of general indebtedness,
each such bond must state upon its face that it is payable from the
local improvement district redemption fund and the local improvement
guarantee fund only.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.310 and 1999 c 153 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380, unless a different
meaning is required, the words defined in this section shall have the
meanings indicated.
(1) "Farm and agricultural land" shall mean the same as defined in
RCW 84.34.020(2).
(2) "Timber land" shall mean the same as defined in RCW
84.34.020(3).
(3) "Local government" shall mean any city, town, county, water-sewer district, public utility district, port district, ((irrigation
district,)) flood control district, or any other municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision authorized
to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary and/or storm sewerage
systems, domestic water supply and/or distribution systems, or road
construction or improvement purposes. "Local government" does not
include an irrigation district with respect to any local improvement
district created or local improvement assessment levied by that
irrigation district.
(4) "Local improvement district" shall mean any local improvement
district, utility local improvement district, local utility district,
road improvement district, or any similar unit created by a local
government for the purpose of levying special benefit assessments
against property specially benefited by improvements relating to such
districts.
(5) "Owner" shall mean the same as defined in RCW 84.34.020(5) or
the applicable statutes relating to special benefit assessments.
(6) The term "average rate of inflation" shall mean the annual rate
of inflation as determined by the department of revenue averaged over
the period of time as provided in RCW 84.34.330 (1) and (2). Such
determination shall be published not later than January 1 of each year
for use in that assessment year.
(7) "Special benefit assessments" shall mean special assessments
levied or capable of being levied in any local improvement district or
otherwise levied or capable of being levied by a local government to
pay for all or part of the costs of a local improvement and which may
be levied only for the special benefits to be realized by property by
reason of that local improvement.

Sec. 3 RCW 87.03.480 and 1959 c 75 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any desired special construction, reconstruction, betterment or
improvement or purchase or acquisition of improvements already
constructed, for any authorized district service, including but not
limited to the safeguarding of open canals or ditches for the
protection of the public therefrom, which are for the special benefit
of the lands tributary thereto and within an irrigation district may be
constructed or acquired and provision made to meet the cost thereof as
follows:
The holders of title or evidence of title to one-quarter of the
acreage proposed to be assessed, may file with the district board their
petition reciting the nature and general plan of the desired
improvement and specifying the lands proposed to be specially assessed
therefor. ((The petition shall be accompanied by a bond in the sum of
one hundred dollars with surety to be approved by the board,
conditioned that the petitioners will pay the cost of an investigation
of the project and of the hearing thereon if it is not established.
The board may at any time require a bond in an additional sum.)) A
local improvement district may include adjoining, vicinal, or
neighboring improvements even though the improvements and the
properties benefited are not connected or continuous. Such
improvements may be owned by the United States, the state of
Washington, the irrigation district, or another local government. Upon
approval of the board of an adjoining irrigation district, an
irrigation district may form local improvement districts or utility
local improvement districts that are composed entirely or in part of
territory within that adjoining district. Upon the filing of the
petition the board, with the assistance of a competent engineer, shall
make an investigation of the feasibility, cost, and need of the
proposed local improvement together with the ability of the lands to
pay the cost, and if it appears feasible, they ((shall)) may elect to
have plans and an estimate of the cost prepared. If a protest against
the establishment of the proposed improvement signed by a majority of
the holders of title in the proposed local district is presented at or
before the hearing, or if the proposed improvement should be found not
feasible, too expensive, or not in the best interest of the district,
or the lands to be benefited insufficient security for the costs, they
shall dismiss the petition ((at the expense of the petitioners)).

Sec. 4 RCW 87.03.485 and 1983 c 167 s 222 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event that the ((said)) board ((shall)) approves ((said))
the petition, the board shall fix a time and place for the hearing
thereof and shall publish a notice once a week for two consecutive
weeks preceding the date of such hearing and the last publication shall
not be more than seven days before such date and shall mail such a
notice on or before the second publication date by first-class mail,
postage prepaid, to each owner or reputed owner of real property within
the proposed local improvement district, as shown on the rolls of the
county treasurer as of a date not more than twenty days immediately
prior to the date such notice was mailed. Such notice must be
published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which
any portion of the land proposed to be included in such local
improvement district lies. Such notice shall state that the lands
within ((said)) the described boundaries are proposed to be organized
as a local improvement district, stating generally the nature of the
proposed improvement; that bonds for such local improvement district
are proposed to be issued as the bonds of the irrigation district, or
that a contract is proposed to be entered into between the district and
the United States or the state of Washington, or both, that the lands
within ((said)) the local improvement district are to be assessed for
such improvement, that such bonds or contract will be ((a primary)) the
obligation of such local improvement district ((and a general
obligation of the irrigation district)) and stating a time and place of
hearing thereon. At the time and place of hearing named in ((said))
the notice, all persons interested may appear before the board and show
cause for or against the formation of the proposed improvement district
and the issuance of bonds or the entering into of a contract as
aforesaid. The board may designate a hearing officer to conduct the
hearing, and the hearing officer shall report recommendations on the
establishment of the local improvement district to the board for final
action. Upon the hearing the board shall determine as to the
establishment of the proposed local improvement district. Any
landowner whose lands can be served or will be benefited by the
proposed improvement, may make application to the board at the time of
hearing to include such land and the board of directors in such cases
shall, at its discretion, include such lands within such district. The
board of directors may exclude any land specified in ((said)) the
notice from ((said)) the district provided, that in the judgment of the
board, the inclusion thereof will not be practicable.
As an alternative plan and subject to all of the provisions of this
chapter, the board of directors may initiate the organization of a
local improvement district as herein provided. To so organize a local
improvement district the board shall adopt and record in its minutes a
resolution specifying the lands proposed to be included in such local
improvement district or by describing the exterior boundaries of such
proposed district or by both. ((Said)) The resolution shall state
generally the plan, character and extent of the proposed improvements,
that the land proposed to be included in such improvement district will
be assessed for such improvements; and that local improvement district
bonds of the irrigation district will be issued or a contract entered
into as hereinabove in this section provided to meet the cost thereof
and that such bonds or contract will be ((a primary)) the obligation of
such local improvement district ((and a general obligation of the
irrigation district)). ((Said)) The resolution shall fix a time and
place of hearing thereon and shall state that unless a majority of the
holders of title or of evidence of title to lands within the proposed
local improvement district file their written protest at or before
((said)) the hearing, consent to the improvement will be implied.
A notice containing a copy of ((said)) the resolution must be
published once a week for two consecutive weeks preceding the date of
such hearing and the last publication shall not be more than seven days
before such date, and shall be mailed on or before the second
publication date by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to each owner or
reputed owner of real property within the proposed local improvement
district, as shown on the rolls of the county treasurer as of a date
not more than twenty days immediately prior to the date such notice was
mailed, and the hearing thereon shall not be held in less than twenty
days from the adoption of such resolution. Such notice must be
published in one newspaper, of general circulation, in each county in
which any portion of the land proposed to be included in such local
improvement district lies. ((Said)) The hearing shall be held and all
subsequent proceedings conducted in accordance with the provisions of
this act relating to the organization of local improvement districts
initiated upon petition.

Sec. 5 RCW 87.03.490 and 2003 c 53 s 412 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If decision shall be rendered in favor of the improvement, the
board shall enter an order establishing the boundaries of the
improvement district and shall adopt plans for the proposed improvement
and determine the number of annual installments not exceeding fifty in
which the cost of the improvement shall be paid. The cost of the
improvement shall be provided for by the issuance of local improvement
district bonds of the district from time to time, therefor, either
directly for the payment of the labor and material or for the securing
of funds for such purpose, or by the irrigation district entering into
a contract with the United States or the state of Washington, or both,
to repay the cost of the improvement. The bonds shall bear interest at
a rate or rates determined by the board, payable semiannually, and
shall state upon their face that they are issued as bonds of the
irrigation district; that all lands within the local improvement
district shall be ((primarily)) liable to assessment for the principal
and interest of the local improvement district bonds ((and that the
bonds are also a general obligation of the district)). The bonds may
be in such denominations as the board of directors may in its
discretion determine, except that bonds other than bond number one of
any issue shall be in a denomination that is a multiple of one
((hundred)) thousand dollars((, and no bond shall be sold for less than
par. Any contract entered into for the local improvement by the
district with the United States or the state of Washington, or both
although all the lands within the local improvement district shall be
primarily liable to assessment for the principal and interest thereon,
shall be a general obligation of the irrigation district)). Such bonds
may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as
provided in RCW 39.46.030.
(2) No election shall be necessary to authorize the issuance of
such local improvement bonds or the entering into of such a contract.
((Such bonds, when issued, shall be signed by the president and
secretary of the irrigation district with the seal of the district
affixed. The printed, engraved, or lithographed facsimile signatures
of the president and secretary of the district's board of directors
shall be sufficient signatures on the bonds or any coupons: PROVIDED,
That such facsimile signatures on the bonds may be used only after the
filing, by the officer whose facsimile signature is to be used, with
the secretary of state of his or her manual signature certified by him
or her under oath, whereupon that officer's facsimile signature has the
same legal effect as his or her manual signature: PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That either the president of the board of directors' or the secretary's
signature on the bonds shall be manually subscribed: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That whenever such facsimile reproduction of the signature of
any officer is used in place of the manual signature of such officer,
the district's board of directors shall specify in a written order or
requisition to the printer, engraver, or lithographer the number of
bonds or any coupons upon which such facsimile signature is to be
printed, engraved, or lithographed and the manner of numbering the
bonds or any coupons upon which such signature shall be placed. Within
ninety days after the completion of the printing, engraving, or
lithographing of such bonds or any coupons, the plate or plates used
for the purpose of affixing the facsimile signature shall be destroyed,
and it shall be the duty of the district's board of directors, within
ninety days after receipt of the completed bonds or any coupons, to
ascertain that such plate or plates have been destroyed. Every
printer, engraver, or lithographer who, with the intent to defraud,
prints, engraves, or lithographs a facsimile signature upon any bond or
coupon without written order of the district's board of directors, or
fails to destroy such plate or plates containing the facsimile
signature upon direction of such issuing authority, is guilty of a
class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.))
(3) The proceeds from the sale of such bonds shall be deposited
with the treasurer of the district, who shall place them in a special
fund designated "Construction fund of local improvement district number
. . . . . ."
(4) Whenever such improvement district has been organized, the
((boundaries thereof may be enlarged)) board may enlarge the boundaries
of the improvement district to include other lands which can be served
or will be benefited by the proposed improvement upon petition of the
owners thereof and the consent of the United States or the state of
Washington, or both, in the event the irrigation district has
contracted with the United States or the state of Washington, or both,
to repay the cost of the improvement: PROVIDED, That at such time the
lands so included shall pay their equitable proportion upon the basis
of benefits of the improvement theretofore made by the local
improvement district and shall be liable for the indebtedness of the
local improvement district in the same proportion and same manner and
subject to assessment as if the lands had been incorporated in the
improvement district at the beginning of its organization.
(5) Notwithstanding this section, such bonds may be issued and sold
in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 87.03.495 and 1988 c 127 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The cost of the improvement and of the operation and
maintenance thereof, if any, shall be especially assessed against the
lands within such local improvement district in proportion to the
benefits accruing thereto, and shall be levied and collected in the
manner provided by law for the levy and collection of land assessments
or toll assessments or both such form of assessments.
(b) The costs of the improvement must include, but not be limited
to:
(i) The cost of all of the construction or improvement authorized
for the district;
(ii) The estimated cost and expense of all engineering and
surveying necessary for the improvement done under the supervision of
the irrigation district engineer;
(iii) The estimated cost and expense of ascertaining the ownership
of the lots or parcels of land included in the assessment district;
(iv) The estimated cost and expense of advertising, mailing, and
publishing all necessary notices;
(v) The estimated cost and expense of accounting and clerical
labor, and of books and blanks extended or used on the part of the
irrigation district treasurer in connection with the improvement;
(vi) All cost of the acquisition of rights-of-way, property,
easements, or other facilities or rights, including without limitation
rights to use property, facilities, or other improvements appurtenant,
related to, or useful in connection with the local improvement, whether
by eminent domain, purchase, gift, payment of connection charges,
capacity charges, or other similar charges or in any other manner; and
(vii) The cost for legal, financial, and appraisal services and any
other expenses incurred by the irrigation district for the district or
in the formation thereof, or by irrigation district in connection with
such construction or improvement and in the financing thereof,
including the issuance of any bonds and the cost of providing for
increases in the local improvement guaranty fund, or providing for a
separate reserve fund or other security for the payment of principal of
and interest on such bonds.
(c) Any of the costs set forth in this section may be excluded from
the cost and expense to be assessed against the property in the local
improvement district and may be paid from any other moneys available
therefor if the board of directors so designates by resolution at any
time.
(d) The board may give credit for all or any portion of any
property or other donation against an assessment, charge, or other
required financial contribution for improvements within a local
improvement district.
(2) All provisions for the assessment, equalization, levy, and
collection of assessments for irrigation district purposes shall be
applicable to assessments for local improvements except that no
election shall be required to authorize ((said)) the improvement or the
expenditures therefor or the bonds issued to meet the cost thereof or
the contract authorized in RCW 87.03.485 to repay the cost thereof. In
addition or as an alternative, an irrigation district may elect to
apply all or a portion of the provisions for the assessment,
equalization, levy, and collection of assessments applicable to city or
town local improvement districts; however any duties of the city or
town treasurer shall be the duties of the treasurer of the county in
which the office of the district is located or other treasurer of the
district if appointed pursuant to RCW 87.03.440. In connection with a
hearing on the assessment roll, the board may designate a hearing
officer to conduct the hearing, and the hearing officer must report
recommendations on the assessment roll to the board for final action.
Assessments when collected by the county treasurer for the payment for
the improvement of any local improvement district shall constitute a
special fund to be called "bond redemption or contract repayment fund
of local improvement district No. . . . . . ."
(3) Bonds issued under this chapter shall be eligible for disposal
to and purchase by the director of ecology under the provisions of the
state reclamation act.
(4) The cost or any unpaid portion thereof, of any such
improvement, charged or to be charged or assessed against any tract of
land may be paid in one payment under and pursuant to such rules as the
board of directors may adopt, and all such amounts shall be paid over
to the county treasurer who shall place the same in the appropriate
fund. No such payment shall thereby release such tract from liability
to assessment for deficiencies or delinquencies of the levies in such
improvement district until all of the bonds or the contract, both
principal and interest, issued or entered into for such local
improvement district have been paid in full. The receipt given for any
such payment shall have the foregoing provision printed thereon. The
amount so paid shall be included on the annual assessment roll for the
current year, provided, such roll has not then been delivered to the
treasurer, with an appropriate notation by the secretary that the
amount has been paid. If the roll for that year has been delivered to
the treasurer then the payment so made shall be added to the next
annual assessment roll with appropriate notation that the amount has
been paid.

Sec. 7 RCW 87.03.510 and 1983 c 167 s 224 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby established for each irrigation district in this
state having local improvement districts therein a fund for the purpose
of guaranteeing to the extent of such fund and in the manner herein
provided, the payment of its local improvement bonds and warrants
issued or contract entered into to pay for the improvements provided
for in this act. Such fund shall be designated "local improvement
guarantee fund" and for the purpose of maintaining the same, every
irrigation district shall hereafter levy from time to time, as other
assessments authorized by RCW 87.03.240 are levied, such sums as may be
necessary to meet the financial requirements thereof: PROVIDED, That
such sums so assessed pursuant to RCW 87.03.240 in any year shall not
be more than sufficient to pay the outstanding warrants or contract
indebtedness on ((said)) the fund and to establish therein a balance
which shall not exceed ((five)) ten percent of the outstanding
obligations thereby guaranteed. The balance may also be established
from the deposit of prepaid local improvement assessments or proceeds
of local improvement district bonds. Whenever any bond redemption
payment, interest payment, or contract payment of any local improvement
district shall become due and there is insufficient funds in the local
improvement district fund for the payment thereof, there shall be paid
from ((said)) the local improvement district guarantee fund, by warrant
or by such other means as is called for in the contract, a sufficient
amount, which together with the balance in the local improvement
district fund shall be sufficient to redeem and pay ((said)) the bond
or coupon or contract payment in full. ((Said)) The warrants against
((said)) the guarantee fund shall draw interest at a rate determined by
the board and ((said)) the bonds and interest payments shall be paid in
their order of presentation or serial order. Whenever there shall be
paid out of the guarantee fund any sum on account of principal or
interest of a local improvement bond or warrant or contract the
irrigation district, as trustee for the fund, shall be subrogated to
all of the rights of the owner of the bond or contract amount so paid,
and the proceeds thereof, or of the assessment underlying the same
shall become part of the guarantee fund. There shall also be paid into
such guarantee fund any interest received from bank deposits of the
fund, as well as any surplus remaining in any local improvement
district fund, after the payment of all of its outstanding bonds or
warrants or contract indebtedness which are payable primarily out of
such local improvement district fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 87.03.515 and 1983 c 167 s 225 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be lawful for any irrigation district which has issued
local improvement district bonds for ((said)) the improvements, as in
this chapter provided, to issue in place thereof an amount of
((general)) local improvement district or revenue refunding bonds of
the irrigation district ((not in excess of such issue of local
improvement district bonds, and to sell the same, or any part thereof,
or exchange the same, or any part thereof, with the owners of such
previously issued local improvement district bonds for the purpose of
redeeming said bonds)) in accordance with chapter 39.53 RCW: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, ((That all the provisions of this chapter regarding the
authorization and issuing of bonds shall apply, and: PROVIDING,
FURTHER,)) That the issuance of ((said)) the bonds shall not release
the lands of the local improvement district or districts from liability
for special assessments for the payment thereof: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the lien of any issue of bonds of the district prior in point of
time to the issue of bonds or local improvement district bonds herein
provided for((,)) shall be deemed a prior lien.

Sec. 9 RCW 87.03.527 and 1959 c 104 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever ((a local improvement district is sought to be established
within an irrigation)) the board establishes a local improvement
district, in addition or as an alternative to the procedures provided
in RCW 87.03.480 through 87.03.525, there may be employed any method
authorized by law for the formation of ((districts or)) improvement
districts ((so that when formed it will qualify under the provisions of
chapter 89.16 RCW)) and the levying, collection, and enforcement by
foreclosure of assessments therein, including without limitation the
formation method employed by cities or towns.

Sec. 10 RCW 87.06.020 and 1988 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After thirty-six calendar months from the month of the date of
delinquency, or twenty-four months from the month of the date of
delinquency with respect to any local improvement district assessment,
the treasurer shall prepare certificates of delinquency on the property
for the unpaid irrigation district assessments, and for costs and
interest. An individual certificate of delinquency may be prepared for
each property or the individual certificates may be compiled and issued
in one general certificate including all delinquent properties. Each
certificate shall contain the following information:
(a) Description of the property assessed;
(b) Street address of property, if available;
(c) Years for which assessed;
(d) Amount of delinquent assessments, costs, and interest;
(e) Name appearing on the treasurer's most current assessment roll
for the property; and
(f) A statement that interest will be charged on the amount listed
in (d) of this subsection at a rate of twelve percent per year,
computed monthly and without compounding, from the date of the issuance
of the certificate and that additional costs, incurred as a result of
the delinquency, will be imposed, including the costs of a title
search((;)).
(2) The treasurer may provide for the posting of the certificates
or other measures designed to advertise the certificates and encourage
the payment of the amounts due.

Sec. 11 RCW 87.28.103 and 1979 ex.s. c 185 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
When the directors of the district have decided to issue revenue
bonds as herein provided, they shall call a special election in the
irrigation district at which election shall be submitted to the
electors thereof possessing the qualifications prescribed by law the
question whether revenue bonds of the district in the amount and
payable according to the plan of payment adopted by the board and for
the purposes therein stated shall be issued. ((Said)) The election
shall be called, noticed, conducted, and canvassed in the same manner
as provided by law for irrigation district elections to authorize an
original issue of bonds payable from revenues derived from annual
assessments upon the real property in the district: PROVIDED, That the
board of directors shall have full authority to issue revenue bonds as
herein provided payable within a maximum period of forty years without
a special election((: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any irrigation
district indebted to the state of Washington shall get the written
consent of the director of the department of ecology prior to the
issuance of said revenue bonds)).

Sec. 12 RCW 87.28.200 and 1979 ex.s. c 185 s 19 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any irrigation district shall have the power to establish utility
local improvement districts within its territory and to levy special
assessments within such utility local improvement districts in the same
manner as provided for irrigation district local improvement districts:
PROVIDED, That it must be specified in any petition for the
establishment of a utility local improvement district that the sole
purpose of the assessments levied against the real property located
within the utility local improvement district shall be the payment of
the proceeds of those assessments into ((the)) a revenue bond fund for
the payment of revenue bonds, that no warrants or bonds shall be issued
in any such utility local improvement district, and that the collection
of interest and principal on all assessments in such utility local
improvement district, when collected, shall be paid into ((the)) that
revenue bond fund, except that special assessments paid before the
issuance and sale of bonds may be deposited in a fund for the payment
of costs of improvements in the utility local improvement district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---