BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.79.210 and 1996 c 191 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A license issued under this chapter must be renewed, except as
provided in this chapter. The licensee shall comply with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as
determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules to allow a person renewing a
license under subsection (1) of this section to satisfy up to twenty-five percent of his or her continuing education credits by providing
medical services to people enrolled in medicaid or, at no cost, to
people who are uninsured. The commission shall recognize the
satisfaction of one continuing education credit for each hour spent
providing direct care to patients.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.080 and 2011 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state
shall pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance
with administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted
as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(b) The commission shall request licensees to submit information
about their current professional practice at the time of license
renewal. This information may include practice setting, medical
specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by
the commission.
(c)(i) A physician who resides and practices in Washington and
obtains or renews a retired active license shall be exempt from
licensing fees imposed under this section. The commission may
establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements
which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. The
rules shall provide that mandatory continuing education requirements
may be met in part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of
approved activities relating to professional liability risk management.
The number of hours of continuing education for a physician holding a
retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours per year.
(ii) The commission shall adopt rules to allow a person renewing a
license under this subsection to satisfy up to twenty-five percent of
his or her continuing education credits by providing medical services
to people enrolled in medicaid or, at no cost, to people who are
uninsured. The commission shall recognize the satisfaction of one
continuing education credit for each hour spent providing direct care
to patients.
(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the
commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to
licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's web site;
including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings
attended by organization members; or another distribution method
determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the
office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to
distribute information under this subsection.
(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant
who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without
examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the
requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in
the practice of medicine.

--- END ---