BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.685 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 438 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The uniformed service shared leave pool is created to allow
employees to donate leave to be used as shared leave for any employee
who has been called to service in the uniformed services and who meets
the requirements of RCW 41.04.665. Participation in the pool shall, at
all times, be voluntary on the part of the employee. The military
department, in consultation with the office of financial management,
shall administer the uniformed service shared leave pool.
(2) Employees as defined in subsection (10) of this section who are
eligible to donate leave under RCW 41.04.665 may donate leave to the
uniformed service shared leave pool.
(3) An employee as defined in subsection (10) of this section who
has been called to service in the uniformed services and is eligible
for shared leave under RCW 41.04.665 may request shared leave from the
uniformed service shared leave pool.
(4) It shall be the responsibility of the employee who has been
called to service to provide an earnings statement verifying military
salary, orders of service, and notification of a change in orders of
service or military salary.
(5) Shared leave under this section may not be granted unless the
pool has a sufficient balance to fund the requested shared leave for
the expected term of service.
(6) Shared leave paid under this section, in combination with
military salary, shall not exceed the level of the employee's state
monthly salary.
(7) Any leave donated shall be removed from the personally
accumulated leave balance of the employee donating the leave.
(8) An employee who receives shared leave from the pool is not
required to recontribute such leave to the pool, except as otherwise
provided in this section.
(9) Leave that may be donated or received by any one employee shall
be calculated as in RCW 41.04.665.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee" has the meaning provided in RCW 41.04.655((, except
that "employee" as used in this section does not include employees of
school districts and educational service districts)).
(b) "Service in the uniformed services" has the meaning provided in
RCW 41.04.655.
(c) "Military salary" includes base, specialty, and other pay, but
does not include allowances such as the basic allowance for housing.
(d) "Monthly salary" includes monthly salary and special pay and
shift differential, or the monthly equivalent for hourly employees.
"Monthly salary" does not include:
(i) Overtime pay;
(ii) Call back pay;
(iii) Standby pay; or
(iv) Performance bonuses.
(11) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
military department, shall adopt rules and policies governing the
donation and use of shared leave from the uniformed service shared
leave pool, including definitions of pay and allowances and guidelines
for agencies to use in recordkeeping concerning shared leave.
(12) Agencies shall investigate any alleged abuse of the uniformed
service shared leave pool and on a finding of wrongdoing, the employee
may be required to repay all of the shared leave received from the
uniformed service shared leave pool.
(13) Higher education institutions shall adopt policies consistent
with the needs of the employees under their respective jurisdictions.

--- END ---