BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to transitioning any resident of a residential habilitation
center to community–based housing under the care or direction of the
secretary, the secretary must ensure the resident's housing meets the
minimum requirements for housing quality standards as established by
the United States department of housing and urban development under 24
C.F.R. Part 982.401 as it currently exists. The secretary is to
conduct periodic inspections of such property to ensure the property
continues to meet these standards. The secretary is to maintain a
written checklist of all inspections.

--- END ---