BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that promoting a
financially viable health care system in all parts of the state is a
critical interest. The federal centers for medicare and medicaid
services has recognized the crucial role hospitals play in providing
care in rural areas by creating the sole community hospital program,
which allows certain small rural hospitals to receive enhanced payments
for medicare services. The legislature further finds that creating a
similar reimbursement system for the state's medicaid program for sole
community hospitals will promote the long-term financial viability of
the rural health care system in those communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.5225 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 31 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance
programs under this chapter for services provided by hospitals,
regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, shall
be made based on allowable costs incurred during the year, when
services are provided by a rural hospital certified by the centers for
medicare and medicaid services as a critical access hospital. Any
additional payments made by the authority for the healthy options
program shall be no more than the additional amounts per service paid
under this section for other medical assistance programs.
(2) Beginning on July 24, 2005, a moratorium shall be placed on
additional hospital participation in critical access hospital payments
under this section. However, rural hospitals that applied for
certification to the centers for medicare and medicaid services prior
to January 1, 2005, but have not yet completed the process or have not
yet been approved for certification, remain eligible for medical
assistance payments under this section.
(3) Payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance
programs under this chapter for services provided by a hospital,
regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, shall
be increased to one hundred twenty-five percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates, when services are provided by a rural hospital
certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as a sole
community hospital as of January 1, 2013, with less than one hundred
fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011. The enhanced
payment rates under this subsection shall be considered the hospital's
medicaid payment rate for purposes of any other state or private
programs that pay hospitals according to medicaid payment rates.
Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program
may not receive the increased reimbursement rates provided in this
subsection for inpatient services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---