BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
centralize and consolidate the procurement of interpreter services and
expand the use of language access providers, thereby reducing
administrative costs while protecting consumers. The legislature
further intends to institute quality controls by establishing an
advisory group to advise state agencies on the qualifications,
training, and education of state certified spoken language interpreters
through the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services and the Washington
state health care authority are each authorized to purchase interpreter
services on behalf of limited-English speaking or sensory-impaired
applicants and recipients of public assistance.
(2) The department of labor and industries is authorized to
purchase interpreter services for doctors providing services to
limited-English speaking or sensory-impaired injured workers or crime
victims. No later than July 1, 2014, the department must purchase
interpreter services directly from language access providers through
the use of scheduling and billing software, or through no more than
three contracts with scheduling and coordinating delivery
organizations, or both.
(3) No later than July 1, 2016, the department of social and health
services, the Washington state health care authority, and the
department of labor and industries shall integrate the purchase of
interpreter services through one centralized system.
(4) All language access providers procured under this section must
be certified or authorized by the department of social and health
services. When a state-certified language access provider is not
available, a language access provider with other certifications or
qualifications deemed to meet state standards may be used. Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude providing interpretive services through
state employees.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.26.100 and 2012 c 224 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in any manner to
the operation of the state legislature except as requested by the
legislature.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the contracting
for services and activities that are necessary to establish, operate,
or manage the state data center, including architecture, design,
engineering, installation, and operation of the facility, that are
approved by the technology services board or the acquisition of
proprietary software and information technology services necessary for
or part of the provision of services offered by the consolidated
technology services agency.
(3) Primary authority for the purchase of specialized equipment,
and instructional and research material, for their own use rests with
the institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(4) Universities operating hospitals with approval from the
director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010,
and for health care programs provided in state correctional
institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions
as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, may make purchases for
hospital operation by participating in contracts for materials,
supplies, and equipment entered into by nonprofit cooperative hospital
group purchasing organizations if documented to be more cost-effective.
(5) Primary authority for the purchase of materials, supplies, and
equipment, for resale to other than public agencies, rests with the
state agency concerned.
(6) The authority for the purchase of insurance and bonds rests
with the risk manager under RCW 43.19.769, except for institutions of
higher education that choose to exercise independent purchasing
authority under RCW 28B.10.029.
(((7) The authority to purchase interpreter services and
interpreter brokerage services on behalf of limited-English speaking or
sensory-impaired applicants and recipients of public assistance rests
with the department of social and health services and the health care
authority.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall establish
the spoken language interpreter advisory group to advise the
departments of social and health services, labor and industries, and
enterprise services and the Washington state health care authority on
the policies, rules, and regulations governing certification and
authorization of spoken language interpreters. The director of the
department of social and health services, in consultation with the
directors of the departments of labor and industries and enterprise
services, and the director of the Washington state health care
authority shall make appointments to the advisory group as follows:
(a) One language access officer each from the department of social
and health services, the department of labor and industries, the
department of enterprise services, or a designee department, and the
Washington state health care authority;
(b) Three language interpreters, initial terms being two serving
two years, and one serving three years;
(c) One medical provider, who shall serve an initial three-year
term;
(d) One hospital language access administrator, who shall serve an
initial two-year term;
(e) Two representatives from an immigrant or refugee advocacy
organization, one serving an initial term of one year and the other an
initial term of two years;
(f) One representative from a labor organization, serving an
initial term of two years;
(g) One member from the public, serving an initial three-year term;
and
(h) One representative from the department of social and health
services language testing and certification program.
(2) After initial appointments, members under subsection (1)(b)
through (g) of this section shall serve three-year terms and may be
appointed to no more than two sequential terms.
(3) Members of the advisory group may be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The department of social and health services shall provide
staff to the advisory group.
(5) The advisory group shall meet as needed or as requested by the
director of the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The advisory group established under section 4 of this act shall
have the following duties:
(1) Develop and recommend policies to enhance the quality of
interpreters;
(2) Evaluate the certification standards used by the department of
social and health services and make recommendations; and
(3) Other duties as requested.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.26.090 and 2012 c 224 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Establish overall state policies, standards, and procedures
regarding the procurement of goods and services by all state agencies;
(2) Develop policies and standards for the use of credit cards or
similar methods to make purchases;
(3) Establish procurement processes for information technology
goods and services, using technology standards and policies established
by the office of the chief information officer under chapter 43.41A
RCW;
(4) Enter into contracts or delegate the authority to enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to facilitate the purchase, lease,
rent, or otherwise acquire all goods and services and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of all state agencies, except as
provided in RCW 39.26.100;
(5) Have authority to delegate to agencies authorization to
purchase goods and services. The authorization must specify
restrictions as to dollar amount or to specific types of goods and
services, based on a risk assessment process developed by the
department. Acceptance of the purchasing authorization by an agency
does not relieve the agency from conformance with this chapter or from
policies established by the director. Also, the director may not
delegate to a state agency the authorization to purchase goods and
services if the agency is not in substantial compliance with overall
procurement policies as established by the director;
(6) Develop procurement policies and procedures, such as unbundled
contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate the
purchase of goods and services from Washington small businesses,
microbusinesses, and minibusinesses, and minority and women-owned
businesses to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments;
(7) Develop and implement an enterprise system for electronic
procurement;
(8) Provide for a commodity classification system and provide for
the adoption of goods and services commodity standards;
(9) Establish overall state policy for compliance by all agencies
regarding:
(a) Food procurement procedures and materials that encourage and
facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by state agencies and
institutions to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments; and
(b) Policies requiring all food contracts to include a plan to
maximize to the extent practicable and consistent with international
trade agreement commitments the availability of Washington grown food
purchased through the contract;
(10) Develop guidelines and criteria for the purchase of vehicles,
high gas mileage vehicles, and alternate vehicle fuels and systems,
equipment, and materials, that reduce overall energy-related costs and
energy use by the state, including investigations into all
opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean technologies by
state and local governments, and including the requirement that new
passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards
for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States
secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and
conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002); ((and))
(11) By July 1, 2014, develop and implement a model for providing
interpreter services by purchasing the services of language access
providers through the use of scheduling and billing software, or
through no more than three contracts with scheduling and coordinating
delivery organizations, or both; and
(12) Develop and enact rules to implement the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.56.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW
70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 ((or
74.08A.340)), 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(8) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(9) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor
who provides spoken language interpreter services ((for department of
social and health services appointments or medicaid enrollee
appointments, or provided these services on or after January 1, 2009,
and before June 10, 2010, whether paid by a broker, language access
agency, or the department)), whether paid by a language access agency,
broker, or the respective department: (i) For department of social and
health services appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments, or who
provided these services on or after January 1, 2009, and before June
10, 2010; (ii) for department of labor and industries authorized
providers, or who provided these services on or after January 1, 2012,
and before the effective date of this section; or (iii) for state
agencies through the department of enterprise services, or who provided
these services on or after January 1, 2012, and before the effective
date of this section.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or
employee of a broker or a language access agency.
(11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(12) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(9),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.56.510 and 2010 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to language access
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of language access providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The governor or the governor's designee shall represent the public
employer for bargaining purposes.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and language access providers, except
as follows:
(a) ((A statewide unit of all language access providers is)) The
only language access provider units appropriate for purposes of
collective bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 are:
(i) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for department of social and
health services appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments;
(ii) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for department of labor and
industries medical authorized providers; and
(iii) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for any state agency through the
department of enterprise services, excluding language access providers
included in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection;
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of language access
providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070.
Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest
in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention
filed under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW;
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for language
access providers under this section is limited solely to: (i) Economic
compensation, such as the manner and rate of payments; (ii)
professional development and training; (iii) labor-management
committees; and (iv) grievance procedures. Retirement benefits are not
subject to collective bargaining. By such obligation neither party may
be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession
unless otherwise provided in this chapter;
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of language access
providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state;
(e) Language access providers do not have the right to strike;
(f) If a single employee organization is the exclusive bargaining
representative for two or more units, upon petition by the employee
organization, the units may be consolidated into a single larger unit
if the public employment relations commission considers the larger unit
to be appropriate. If consolidation is appropriate, the public
employment relations commission shall certify the employee organization
as the exclusive bargaining representative of the new unit.
(3) Language access providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and language access
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Each party with whom the department of social and health
services, the department of labor and industries, and the department of
enterprise services contracts for language access services and each of
their subcontractors shall provide to the department an accurate list
of language access providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, including
their names, addresses, and other contact information, annually by
January 30th, except that initially the lists must be provided within
thirty days of ((June 10, 2010)) the effective date of this section.
The departments shall, upon request, provide a list of all language
access providers, including their names, addresses, and other contact
information, to a labor union seeking to represent language access
providers.
(5) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The ((department's)) obligation of the department of social and
health services, the department of labor and industries, and the
department of enterprise services to comply with the federal statute
and regulations; and
(b) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under chapter 74.04 or 39.26 RCW or
Title 51 RCW. The governor may not enter into, extend, or renew any
agreement under this chapter that does not expressly reserve the
legislative rights described in this subsection.
(6) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (7) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the
agreement.
(7) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section may not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section,
the request may not be submitted before July 1, 2011; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(8) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be
reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to
implement the agreement.
(9) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(10) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(11) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of language access providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized
by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---