BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.097 and 2010 c 271 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each applicant for a building permit of a building
necessitating potable water shall provide evidence of an adequate water
supply for the intended use of the building. Evidence may be in the
form of a water right permit from the department of ecology, a letter
from an approved water purveyor stating the ability to provide water,
a demonstration by the applicant that the use of water from a permit-exempt well is consistent with applicable rules adopted by the
department of ecology under chapter 90.54 RCW for the specific basin or
subbasin, or another form sufficient to verify the existence of an
adequate water supply. In addition to other authorities, the county or
city may impose conditions on building permits requiring connection to
an existing public water system where the existing system is willing
and able to provide safe and reliable potable water to the applicant
with reasonable economy and efficiency. An application for a water
right shall not be sufficient proof of an adequate water supply.
(2) Within counties not required or not choosing to plan pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040, the county and the state may mutually determine
those areas in the county in which the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply. The departments of health and ecology
shall coordinate on the implementation of this section. Should the
county and the state fail to mutually determine those areas to be
designated pursuant to this subsection, the county may petition the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to mediate
or, if necessary, make the determination.
(3) Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt
from the provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after
consultation with local governments, may adopt rules to implement this
section, which may recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.17.110 and 1995 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The city, town, or county legislative body shall inquire into
the public use and interest proposed to be served by the establishment
of the subdivision and dedication. It shall determine: (a) If
appropriate provisions are made for, but not limited to, the public
health, safety, and general welfare, for open spaces, drainage ways,
streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops, potable
water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation, playgrounds,
schools and schoolgrounds, and shall consider all other relevant facts,
including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe
walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and
(b) whether the public interest will be served by the subdivision and
dedication.
(2)(a) A proposed subdivision and dedication shall not be approved
unless the city, town, or county legislative body makes written
findings that: (((a))) (i) Appropriate provisions are made for the
public health, safety, and general welfare and for such open spaces,
drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit
stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation,
playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all other relevant facts,
including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe
walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and
(((b))) (ii) the public use and interest will be served by the platting
of such subdivision and dedication. If it finds that the proposed
subdivision and dedication make such appropriate provisions and that
the public use and interest will be served, then the legislative body
shall approve the proposed subdivision and dedication. Dedication of
land to any public body, provision of public improvements to serve the
subdivision, and/or impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through
82.02.090 may be required as a condition of subdivision approval.
Dedications shall be clearly shown on the final plat. No dedication,
provision of public improvements, or impact fees imposed under RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that constitutes an
unconstitutional taking of private property. The legislative body
shall not as a condition to the approval of any subdivision require a
release from damages to be procured from other property owners.
(b) Permit-exempt wells authorized under RCW 90.44.050 may be used
by a city, town, or county legislative authority to satisfy the
requirements of this section for the appropriate provision of potable
water to a subdivision as long as such use is consistent with
applicable rules adopted by the department of ecology under chapter
90.54 RCW for the specific basin or subbasin.
(3) If the preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park
with an area of less than two acres and the donor has designated that
the park be named in honor of a deceased individual of good character,
the city, town, or county legislative body must adopt the designated
name.

--- END ---