BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the tax code of
Washington state includes tax preferences enacted to achieve a variety
of policy goals for the public interest. To measure the effectiveness
of a specific tax preference in meeting these goals, the legislature
has adopted processes and accountability measures, including such
requirements as a tax exemption study in RCW 43.06.400, review by the
citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences in
chapter 43.136 RCW, and taxpayer reporting in chapter 82.32 RCW. In
order to make policy choices going forward regarding the best use of
limited state resources, the legislature concludes that it is necessary
to articulate the legislative intent for each tax preference and enact
an expiration date where applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For any bill introduced in either the house of representatives
or the senate that adopts a new tax preference or expands or extends an
existing tax preference, the bill must include legislative intent
provisions, establishing the policy goals and any related metrics that
might provide context and/or data for purposes of reviewing the
preference under chapter 43.136 RCW.
(2) For purposes of this section, "tax preference" has the same
meaning as in RCW 43.136.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature must include an expiration date on any
applicable tax preference taking effect on or after July 1, 2013.
(2) "Applicable tax preference," for purposes of this section,
means any tax preference except for those that clarify an ambiguity or
correct a technical inconsistency.

--- END ---