BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known and cited as the
professional compensation parity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature recognizes the importance of
providing quality professional services to those who are unable to
afford them. Professional persons have attained a privileged position
in society and have an ethical, moral, and legal duty to provide their
services at a significantly reduced rate for those clients or patients
who may be of limited means. For indigent persons, insurance may not
be a luxury or may not cover all or any of the costs associated with
the professional services rendered. The notion of a just and civilized
society demands that much is required of those to whom much has been
given.
While the medical profession has for many years been required under
federal and state law, including chapter 70.170 RCW, to scale the fees
demanded for services according to the capacity of the patient to pay,
there have been no similar requirements for the legal profession.
Lawyers are able to routinely demand hourly fees well in excess of the
capacity of their clients to pay. These clients often have no
insurance to cover fees and costs which can quickly amount to thousands
of dollars. Even those attorneys who provide legal services on a
contingency basis effectively take thousands of dollars out of the
pockets of those most deserving and in need of resources. It is the
intent of the legislature to correct the disparate fee structure
between professionals in the legal and medical professions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, all attorneys licensed to practice law in the state of
Washington and any law firm doing business in the state of Washington
must charge an indigent person a fee for services which is based upon
the sliding fee schedule for determination of discounts from charges
for persons who qualify for such discounts developed by the Washington
state bar association.
(2) No law firm, its legal staff, or any attorney licensed to
practice law in the state of Washington may adopt or maintain client
screening practices or policies which result in:
(a) A significant reduction in the proportion of clients who are
unable to pay for legal services;
(b) A significant reduction in the proportion of individuals
referred or requesting legal services for which payment is, or is
likely to be, less than the anticipated charges for or costs of such
services; or
(c) The refusal to accept clients who are expected to require
unusually costly or prolonged cases for reasons other than those
related to the appropriateness of the legal services available at the
law firm or by the attorney.
(3) No law firm or attorney may adopt or maintain practices or
policies which deny access to legal services based on a person's
ability to pay.
(4) No law firm or attorney may refer a client with an active case
in which litigation is pending in a court unless the referral is
performed at the request of the client or is due to the limited
resources of the transferring law firm or attorney. Law firms or
attorneys must follow reasonable procedures in making referrals to
other law firms or attorneys, including requiring a confirmation of
acceptance of the referral by the receiving law firm or attorney.
(5) For the purpose of providing indigent legal representation,
each law firm or attorney must develop, implement, and maintain an
indigent representation policy which, consistent with this chapter,
enables indigent persons access to appropriate law firm or attorney-based legal services, provides a sliding fee schedule for determination
of discounts from charges for persons who qualify for such discounts,
and notifies persons who may be eligible for indigent representation.
(6) Each law firm or attorney must make every reasonable effort to
determine the existence or nonexistence of private or public
sponsorship which might cover in full or part the charges for legal
services rendered by the law firm or attorney to a client. An initial
determination of sponsorship status must precede collection efforts
directed at the client.
(7) For the purposes of this chapter, "indigent person" means any
person with a family income below one hundred thirty-eight percent of
the federal poverty standard. Indigent persons may be discounted the
full amount of attorney fees and costs, provided that such persons are
not eligible for other private or public insurance coverage for legal
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The Washington state bar association must:
(1) Develop the sliding fee schedule required in section 3 of this
act. The sliding fee schedule is not effective until thirty days after
the next intervening session of the legislature;
(2) Develop definitions by rule, as appropriate, for this chapter;
(3) Monitor law firm and attorney compliance with this chapter;
(4) Report instances of noncompliance to the state attorney general
or the appropriate federal agency;
(5) Develop specific guidelines to assist law firms and attorneys
in setting sliding fee schedules required by this chapter;
(6) Monitor the distribution of indigent client representation
among law firms and attorneys, with reference to factors such as the
relative need for indigent representation in court jurisdictions and
trends in private and public insurance coverage for legal services; and
(7) Prepare reports that identify any problems in the distribution
of indigent client representation among law firms and attorneys which
are in contradiction of the intent of this chapter. The report must
include an assessment of the effects of the provisions of this chapter
on access to legal services, as well as an evaluation of the
contribution of all purchasers of care to indigent legal
representation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 2 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---