BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state
route number 520 floating bridge project is facing a funding shortfall,
and that imposing tolls to cross Lake Washington on Interstate 90 is
being considered as a revenue source to complete the state route number
520 project. The legislature recognizes further that such tolls may
disproportionately impact the residents who must traverse a portion of
Interstate 90 to access employment and necessary medical services.
Therefore, and in response to concerns raised by local governments
regarding this disproportionate impact on their citizens, the
legislature intends to direct the department of transportation to
explore options to mitigate any disproportionate impact that would be
felt by these residents as a result of such tolling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) During any ongoing or any future study into the tolling of
Interstate 90 west of Interstate 405, the department must explore and
evaluate options to mitigate the effect of tolling on affected
residents.
(2) The department must consider the following mitigation options:
(a) Allowing all Washington residents to traverse a portion of the
tolled section of Interstate 90 without paying a toll. Residents may
choose either (i) the portion of Interstate 90 between the easternmost
landing west of Mercer Island and the westernmost landing on Mercer
Island; or (ii) the portion of Interstate 90 between the westernmost
landing east of Mercer Island and the easternmost landing on Mercer
Island;
(b) Assessing a toll only when a driver traverses, in either
direction, the entire portion of Interstate 90 between the easternmost
landing west of Mercer Island and the westernmost landing east of
Mercer Island; and
(c) Allowing affected residents to choose one portion of the tolled
section of Interstate 90 upon which they may travel without paying a
toll. Residents may choose either (i) the portion of Interstate 90
between the easternmost landing west of Mercer Island and the
westernmost landing on Mercer Island or (ii) the portion of Interstate
90 between the westernmost landing east of Mercer Island and the
easternmost landing on Mercer Island.
(3) The department may also consider any alternative mitigation
options that conform to the purpose of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "affected residents" means
those people who must use a portion of Interstate 90 west of Interstate
405 upon which tolling is considered in order to access necessary
medical services, such as a hospital.

--- END ---