BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.52.060 and 2005 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, it shall be the duty
of the chief of the Washington state patrol to file, tabulate, and
analyze all accident reports and to publish annually, immediately
following the close of each fiscal year, and monthly during the course
of the year, statistical information based thereon showing the number
of accidents, the location, the frequency, whether any driver involved
in the accident was distracted at the time of the accident and the
circumstances thereof, and other statistical information which may
prove of assistance in determining the cause of vehicular accidents.
Distractions contributing to an accident to be reported must include at
least the following: Not distracted; operating a handheld electronic
telecommunication device; operating a hands-free wireless
telecommunication device; other electronic devices (including, but not
limited to, PDA's, laptop computers, navigational devices, etc.);
adjusting an audio or entertainment system; smoking; eating or
drinking; reading or writing; grooming; interacting with children,
passengers, animals, or objects in the vehicle; other inside
distractions; outside distractions; and distraction unknown.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, such accident
reports and analysis or reports thereof shall be available to the
director of licensing, the department of transportation, the utilities
and transportation commission, the traffic safety commission, and other
public entities authorized by the chief of the Washington state patrol,
or their duly authorized representatives, for further tabulation and
analysis for pertinent data relating to the regulation of highway
traffic, highway construction, vehicle operators, and all other
purposes, and to publish information so derived as may be deemed of
publication value.
(3) Information compiled, collected, received, filed, tabulated, or
analyzed under this section is subject to public disclosure in a manner
consistent with chapter 42.56 RCW, but is inadmissible in any current,
pending, or future action for damages against a government agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.52.080 and 1979 c 158 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
All required accident reports and supplemental reports and copies
thereof, including reports prepared pursuant to RCW 46.52.070, shall be
((without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be)) for
the confidential use of the county prosecuting attorney and chief of
police or county sheriff, as the case may be, and the director of
licensing ((and)), the department of transportation, the chief of the
Washington state patrol, and other officer or commission as authorized
by law, except that any such officer shall disclose the names and
addresses of persons reported as involved in an accident or as
witnesses thereto, the vehicle license plate numbers and descriptions
of vehicles involved, and the date, time, and location of an accident,
to any person who may have a proper interest therein, including the
driver or drivers involved, or the legal guardian thereof, the parent
of a minor driver, any person injured therein, the owner of vehicles or
property damaged thereby, or any authorized representative of such an
interested party, or the attorney or insurer thereof. No such accident
reports, supplemental reports, or ((copy)) copies thereof shall be used
as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an
accident, except that any officer above named for receiving accident
reports shall furnish, upon demand of any person who has, or who claims
to have, made such a report, or, upon demand of any court, a
certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not
been made to the chief of the Washington state patrol solely to prove
a compliance or a failure to comply with the requirement that such a
report be made in the manner required by law: PROVIDED, That the
reports may be used as evidence when necessary to prosecute charges
filed in connection with a violation of RCW 46.52.088.

--- END ---