BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.324 and 2004 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a qualifying
blood bank, a qualifying tissue bank, or a qualifying blood and tissue
bank to the extent the amounts are exempt from federal income tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Qualifying blood bank" means ((a blood bank that qualifies
as)) an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing on
June 10, 2004, that is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R., part 607 as
existing on June 10, 2004, and whose primary business purpose is the
collection, preparation, ((and processing of blood)) testing or
processing of blood, on behalf of itself or other qualifying blood bank
or qualifying blood and tissue bank. "Qualifying blood bank" does not
include a comprehensive cancer center that is recognized as such by the
national cancer institute.
(b) "Qualifying tissue bank" means a tissue bank that qualifies as
an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing on June
10, 2004, is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R., part 1271 as existing on
June 10, 2004, and whose primary business purpose is the recovery,
processing, storage, labeling, packaging, or distribution of human bone
tissue, ligament tissue and similar musculoskeletal tissues, skin
tissue, heart valve tissue, or human eye tissue. "Qualifying tissue
bank" does not include a comprehensive cancer center that is recognized
as such by the national cancer institute.
(c) "Qualifying blood and tissue bank" ((is a bank that qualifies
as)) means an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing
on June 10, 2004, that is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R., part 607
and part 1271 as existing on June 10, 2004, and whose primary business
purpose is the collection, preparation, ((and processing of blood))
testing, or processing of blood, on behalf of itself or other
qualifying blood bank or qualifying blood and tissue bank, and the
recovery, processing, storage, labeling, packaging, or distribution of
human bone tissue, ligament tissue and similar musculoskeletal tissues,
skin tissue, and heart valve tissue. "Qualifying blood and tissue
bank" does not include a comprehensive cancer center that is recognized
as such by the national cancer institute.

--- END ---