BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An electric vehicle charging station must be indicated by
vertical signage identifying the station as an electric vehicle
charging station and indicating that it is only for electric vehicle
charging. The signage must be consistent with the manual on uniform
traffic control devices, as adopted by the department of transportation
under RCW 47.36.030. Additionally, the electric vehicle charging
station must be indicated by green pavement markings. Supplementary
signage may be posted to provide additional information including, but
not limited to, the amount of the monetary penalty under subsection (2)
of this section for parking in the station while not connected to the
charging equipment.
(2) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of one
hundred twenty-four dollars, for any person to park a vehicle in an
electric vehicle charging station provided on public or private
property if the vehicle is not connected to the charging equipment.
The parking infraction must be processed as prescribed under RCW
3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(3).
(3) For purposes of this section, "electric vehicle charging
station" means a public or private parking space that is served by
charging equipment that has as its primary purpose the transfer of
electric energy to a battery or other energy storage device in an
electric vehicle.

--- END ---