BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, any provision in a
construction agreement that requires a party or that party's surety or
insurer to indemnify another against liability for damage arising out
of death or bodily injury to persons or damage to property caused in
whole or in part by the negligence of the indemnitee is void.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not affect any provision in
a construction agreement that requires a party or that party's surety
or insurer to indemnify another against liability for damage arising
out of death or bodily injury to persons or damage to property to the
extent that the death or bodily injury to persons or damage to property
arises out of the fault of the indemnitor, or the fault of the
indemnitor's agents, representatives, or subcontractors.
(3) Except as provided in this section, a provision in a
construction agreement is void if the provision requires a party or
that party's surety or insurer to waive a right of subrogation,
indemnity, or contribution for amounts paid by reason of a loss caused
in whole or in part by the negligence of another person.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not affect a provision for
waiver of subrogation, indemnity, or contribution that applies to
proceeds of a property insurance policy.
(5) As used in this section, "construction agreement" means any
written agreement for the planning, design, construction, alteration,
repair, improvement or maintenance of any building, highway, road
excavation or other structure, project, development, or improvement
attached to real estate including moving, demolition, or tunneling in
connection therewith.
(6) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any real property lease or rental agreement between a landlord
and tenant whether or not any provision of the lease or rental
agreement relates to or involves planning, design, construction,
alteration, repair, improvement, or maintenance as long as the
predominant purpose of the lease or rental agreement is not planning,
design, construction, alteration, repair, improvement, or maintenance
of real property; or
(b) Any personal property lease or rental agreement.

--- END ---