BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that research shows
that an inspiring and informed teacher is the most important school-related factor influencing student achievement, so it is critical to
train and support both new and experienced educators. The legislature
also finds that the state has many experienced and exemplary teachers
who could help enrich the teaching experiences of other teachers in
their buildings, including beginning teachers. The legislature further
finds that the state lacks a career advancement structure that provides
administrative-level compensation for outstanding teachers who continue
classroom teaching while they act as instructional leaders for their
buildings. The legislature intends to establish a program designed to
keep master teachers working directly with students in the classroom
while they are providing instructional leadership and mentoring for
other teachers in their buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2013, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall create the STEM AP master teacher pilot program for
the 2013-14 school year in five geographically diverse school
districts, including urban, rural, large, and small districts. Each of
the five districts may have no more than three designated STEM AP
master teachers during the pilot program.
(2) The purposes of the pilot program are to:
(a) Elevate the status of the STEM and AP teaching profession by
recognizing and rewarding outstanding STEM AP teachers thereby making
STEM and AP more attractive;
(b) Provide exemplary science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics teachers with opportunities to serve as master teachers
while they remain in their own classrooms working directly with
students;
(c) Provide an opportunity for experienced and exemplary teachers
to help and mentor new teachers and other teachers in the building; and
(d) Provide a career advancement structure that provides
administrative-level compensation for master teachers.
(3) As used in this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act,
"STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) STEM AP master teachers shall:
(a) Teach at least one AP course;
(b) Be assigned to teach in their own classrooms and act as
instructional leaders and mentors for other teachers in the building;
(c) Be expected to work beyond the districts' contracted days for
certificated instructional staff and must be on a year-round calendar
and contract;
(d) Create curriculum, provide demonstration lessons, and field
test new learning strategies for use by other teachers;
(e) Provide professional development training and coaching for
teachers;
(f) Receive a salary of no less than one hundred thousand dollars;
and
(g) Not be subject to the collective bargaining agreement of the
school district.
(2) Each school district in the STEM master teacher pilot program
shall select STEM master teachers who are exemplary STEM teachers at
the elementary school and secondary school levels who teach in a STEM
subject, which may also include special education teachers and teachers
of English language learners who teach a STEM subject. In selecting
the members, the school district shall make decisions based on multiple
measures, which may include the teacher's:
(a) Evaluations;
(b) Assessment of content knowledge;
(c) Demonstration of practical professional experience in the
teacher's discipline, such as having worked in industry or research;
(d) Ability to improve student academic achievement in the STEM
fields and the AP program, as demonstrated by, if applicable, student
academic growth in such fields;
(e) Ability to enhance student engagement in such fields;
(f) Record of leadership in the teacher's school and involvement in
professional and outreach activities; and
(g) Record of teaching students not on grade level, not on track to
graduate college, and not career ready.
(3) The selection criteria for master teachers must be based on the
ability to demonstrate exemplary skills and knowledge about effective
instructional and classroom management practices. This is evidenced
by:
(a) A three-year rolling average of the percentage of students
taught by the teacher that complete an AP class, which must be at least
seventy-five percent of the teacher's students;
(b) A three-year rolling average of the percentage of students
taught by the teacher that score at least a three on an AP exam, which
must be at least seventy percent of the teacher's students; and
(c) The percentage of students that meet or exceed the state
standard on the state assessments, disaggregated by student subgroups,
including race, ethnicity, poverty, English language learners, and
special education, which must be at least seventy percent in the
aggregate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report by
December 1, 2014, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature that summarizes the pilot program and its effectiveness and
identifies optimal strategies for the design and implementation of the
program statewide. The report must also include a recommendation as to
whether or not the pilot program should be continued, expanded, or
otherwise modified.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2010 c 235 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service.
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) ((Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff
may exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities,
for incentives, or for implementing specific measurable innovative
activities, including professional development, specified by the school
district to: (a) Close one or more achievement gaps, (b) focus on
development of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM)
learning opportunities, or (c) provide arts education. Beginning
September 1, 2011, school districts shall annually provide a brief
description of the innovative activities included in any supplemental
contract to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall summarize
the district information and submit an annual report to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
Supplemental contracts)) Locally funded salary enhancements for
nonbasic education functions that are unique to the school district
shall be limited to no more than ten percent of the state amount for
the school district's state provided salaries. Such locally funded
salary enhancements shall not cause the state to incur any present or
future funding obligation. ((Supplemental contracts)) Locally funded
salary enhancements for nonbasic education functions shall be subject
to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the
provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and if not
renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with RCW
28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may ((enter into a
supplemental contract)) provide locally funded salary enhancements
under this subsection for the provision of services which are a part of
the basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the
state Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 ((and)), 28A.400.275, and 28A.400.280.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the annual minimum instructional program of basic
education offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum required instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before the 2014-15 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, subject to a phased-in
implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature. Course distribution requirements may be established by
the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of ((a)) the minimum ((of one hundred
eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by
a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315)) required annual
instructional hours under this section. However, effective May 1,
1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the
((one hundred and eighty day)) school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high
school((,)) including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation
and early release from school upon the request of a student, and all
such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the
extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of
RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.195.010 and 2009 c 548 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be
subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the
health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a
sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The
state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate
any specific educational or other programs for private schools except
as hereinafter in this section provided.
Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school
districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public
instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements
hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After
review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools
or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In
case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and
the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year
in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. The state board of education shall not require private
school students to meet the student learning goals, obtain a
certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual
achievement to graduate from high school, to master the essential
academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW
28A.655.061. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary
basis, to have their students master these essential academic learning
requirements, take the assessments, and obtain a certificate of
academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement.
Minimum requirements shall be as follows:
(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall
consist of no less than ((one hundred eighty school days or the
equivalent in)) the annual minimum required instructional hour
offerings under RCW 28A.150.220, with a school-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours for students
enrolled in grades one through twelve, and at least four hundred fifty
hours for students enrolled in kindergarten.
(2) The school day shall be the same as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.
(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state
certification except as follows:
(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no
counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a
state certificate to teach those courses.
(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without
certification may teach students so long as a certified person
exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be
submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
reporting and explaining such circumstances.
(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for
parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach
children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a
minimum that:
(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of
an employee of the approved private school who is certified under
chapter 28A.410 RCW;
(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian,
or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this
subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;
(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one
contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision
who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;
(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person;
and
(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty
students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.
(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent
records against loss or damage.
(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be
adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district:
PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and
fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical
facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is
instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the
basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language,
social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units
for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.
(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain
up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and
operation of the school or school district.
All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching
material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section
provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not
specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility
of the administration and administrators of the particular private
school involved.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.305.140 and 2012 c 53 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the state
board of education may grant waivers to school districts from the
provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on the basis that
such waiver or waivers are necessary to:
(a) Implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students
in the district an effective education system that is designed to
enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may
include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for
students who experience difficulty with the regular education program;
(b) Implement an innovation school or innovation zone designated
under RCW 28A.630.081; or
(c) Implement a collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project approved under RCW 28A.630.104.
(2) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.
(3) The state board shall not grant waivers from the minimum
required annual instructional hour offerings under RCW 28A.150.220.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.305.140 and 1990 c 33 s 267 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the state
board of education may grant waivers to school districts from the
provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on the basis that
such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement successfully a local
plan to provide for all students in the district an effective education
system that is designed to enhance the educational program for each
student. The local plan may include alternative ways to provide
effective educational programs for students who experience difficulty
with the regular education program.
(2) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.
(3) The state board shall not grant waivers from the minimum
required annual instructional hour offerings under RCW 28A.150.220.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.310.240 and 2009 c 47 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every educational service district board shall adopt written
policies granting leaves to persons under contracts of employment with
the district in positions requiring either certification or classified
qualifications, including but not limited to leaves for attendance at
official or private institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves
for employees in positions requiring certification qualification, and
leaves for illness, injury, bereavement, and emergencies for both
certificated and classified employees, with such compensation as the
board prescribes. The board shall adopt written policies granting
annual leave with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies as
follows:
(a) For persons under contract with the district for a full fiscal
year, at least ten days;
(b) For persons under contract with the district as part-time
employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total number of
days contracted for bears to ((one hundred eighty days)) the minimum
required annual instructional hour offerings under RCW 28A.150.220;
(c) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and
accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per fiscal year. Provisions
of any contract in force on July 23, 1989, which conflict with
requirements of this subsection shall continue in effect until contract
expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed between the
parties shall be consistent with this subsection;
(d) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
shall be the same as the compensation the person would have received
had the person not taken the leave provided in this section;
(e) Leave provided in this section not taken shall accumulate from
fiscal year to fiscal year up to ((a maximum of one hundred eighty
days)) the minimum required annual instructional hour offerings under
RCW 28A.150.220 for the purposes of RCW 28A.310.490, and for leave
purposes up to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a
given contract, but not greater than one fiscal year. Such accumulated
time may be taken at any time during the fiscal year, or up to twelve
days per year may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick
leave; and
(f) Accumulated leave under this section shall be transferred to
educational service districts, school districts, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the state school for the blind,
the ((school for the deaf)) Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, institutions of higher education, and
community and technical colleges, and from any such district, school,
or office to another such district, school, office, institution of
higher education, or community or technical college. An intervening
customary summer break in employment or the performance of employment
duties shall not preclude such a transfer.
(2) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving
the district may, under rules of the board, be granted to the person
when the person returns to the employment of the district.
(3) Leave for illness or injury accumulated before July 23, 1989,
under the administrative practices of an educational service district,
and such leave transferred before July 23, 1989, to or from an
educational service district, school district, or the office of the
superintendent of public instruction under the administrative practices
of the district or office, is declared valid and shall be added to such
leave for illness or injury accumulated after July 23, 1989.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.330.100 and 2006 c 263 s 417 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors of a school district of the first class,
in addition to the general powers for directors enumerated in this
title, shall have the power:
(1) To employ for a term of not exceeding three years a
superintendent of schools of the district, and for cause to dismiss him
or her, and to fix his or her duties and compensation;
(2) To employ, and for cause dismiss one or more assistant
superintendents and to define their duties and fix their compensation;
(3) To employ a business manager, attorneys, architects, inspectors
of construction, superintendents of buildings and a superintendent of
supplies, all of whom shall serve at the board's pleasure, and to
prescribe their duties and fix their compensation;
(4) To employ, and for cause dismiss, supervisors of instruction
and to define their duties and fix their compensation;
(5) To prescribe a course of study and a program of exercises which
shall be consistent with the course of study prepared by the
superintendent of public instruction for the use of the common schools
of this state;
(6) To, in addition to the minimum requirements imposed by this
title establish and maintain such grades and departments, including
night, high, kindergarten, vocational training and, except as otherwise
provided by law, industrial schools, and schools and departments for
the education and training of any class or classes of youth with
disabilities, as in the judgment of the board, best shall promote the
interests of education in the district;
(7) To determine the length of time over and above ((one hundred
eighty days)) the minimum required annual instructional hour offerings
under RCW 28A.150.220 that school shall be maintained((: PROVIDED,
That for purposes of apportionment no district shall be credited with
more than one hundred and eighty-three days' attendance in any school
year)); and to fix the time for annual opening and closing of schools
and for the daily dismissal of pupils before the regular time for
closing schools;
(8) To maintain a shop and repair department, and to employ, and
for cause dismiss, a foreman and the necessary help for the maintenance
and conduct thereof;
(9) To provide free textbooks and supplies for all children
attending school;
(10) To require of the officers or employees of the district to
give a bond for the honest performance of their duties in such penal
sum as may be fixed by the board with good and sufficient surety, and
to cause the premium for all bonds required of all such officers or
employees to be paid by the district: PROVIDED, That the board may, by
written policy, allow that such bonds may include a deductible proviso
not to exceed two percent of the officer's or employee's annual salary;
(11) To prohibit all secret fraternities and sororities among the
students in any of the schools of the said districts; and
(12) To appoint a practicing physician, resident of the school
district, who shall be known as the school district medical inspector,
and whose duty it shall be to decide for the board of directors all
questions of sanitation and health affecting the safety and welfare of
the public schools of the district who shall serve at the board's
pleasure: PROVIDED, That children shall not be required to submit to
vaccination against the will of their parents or guardian.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.340.030 and 1990 c 33 s 368 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Eligible school districts desiring to form a cooperative
project pursuant to RCW 28A.340.020 through 28A.340.070 shall submit to
the superintendent of public instruction an application for review as
a cooperative project. The application shall include, but not be
limited to, the following information:
(a) A description of the cooperative project, including the
programs, services, and administrative activities that will be operated
jointly;
(b) The improvements in curriculum offerings and educational
opportunities expected to result from the establishment of the proposed
cooperative project;
(c) A list of any statutory requirements or administrative rules
which are considered financial disincentives to the establishment of
cooperative projects and which would impede the operation of the
proposed cooperative project; and the financial impact to the school
districts and the state expected to result by the granting of a waiver
from such statutory requirements or administrative rules;
(d) An assessment of community support for the proposed
cooperative project, which assessment shall include each community
affected by the proposed cooperative project; and
(e) A plan for evaluating the educational and cost-effectiveness
of the proposed cooperative project, including curriculum offerings and
staffing patterns.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall review the
application before the applicant school districts may commence the
proposed cooperative project.
(3)(a) In reviewing applications, the superintendent shall be
limited to:
(((a))) (i) The granting of waivers from statutory requirements,
for which the superintendent of public instruction has the express
power to implement pursuant to the adoption of rules, or administrative
rules that need to be waived in order for the proposed cooperative
project to be implemented: PROVIDED, That no statutory requirement or
administrative rule dealing with health, safety, or civil rights may be
waived and the minimum required annual instructional hour offerings
under RCW 28A.150.220 shall not be waived; and
(((b))) (ii) ensuring the technical accuracy of the application.
(b) Any waiver granted by the superintendent of public instruction
shall be reviewed and may be renewed by the superintendent every five
years subject to the participating districts submitting a new
application pursuant to this section.
(((3))) (4) If additional eligible school districts wish to
participate in an existing cooperative project the cooperative project
as a whole shall reapply for review by the superintendent of public
instruction.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.400.300 and 2012 c 186 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided
by law, shall:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, employ
for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause discharge all
certificated and classified employees;
(b) Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under
contracts of employment with the school district(s) in positions
requiring either certification or classified qualifications, including
but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or private
institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for employees in
positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for
illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and
classified employees, and with such compensation as the board of
directors prescribe: PROVIDED, That the board of directors shall adopt
written policies granting to such persons annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury and emergencies as follows:
(i) For such persons under contract with the school district for a
full year, at least ten days;
(ii) For such persons under contract with the school district as
part time employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total
number of days contracted for bears to ((one hundred eighty days)) the
minimum required annual instructional hour offerings under RCW
28A.150.220;
(iii) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and
accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per year; provisions of any
contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of
this subsection shall continue in effect until contract expiration;
after expiration, any new contract executed between the parties shall
be consistent with this subsection;
(iv) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
shall be the same as the compensation such person would have received
had such person not taken the leave provided in this proviso;
(v) Leave provided in this proviso not taken shall accumulate from
year to year up to a maximum of ((one hundred eighty days)) the minimum
required annual instructional hour offerings under RCW 28A.150.220 for
the purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.400.220, and for leave purposes
up to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a given
contract, but not greater than one year. Such accumulated time may be
taken at any time during the school year or up to twelve days per year
may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick leave;
(vi) Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter
195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated
under administrative practice of school districts prior to the
effective date of section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW
28.58.430) is hereby declared valid, and shall be added to leave for
illness or injury accumulated under this proviso;
(vii) Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum
of forty-five days shall be creditable as service rendered for the
purpose of determining the time at which an employee is eligible to
retire, if such leave is taken it may not be compensated under the
provisions of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;
(viii) Accumulated leave under this proviso shall be transferred to
and from one district to another, the office of superintendent of
public instruction, offices of educational service district
superintendents and boards, the state school for the blind, the
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss,
institutions of higher education, and community and technical colleges,
to and from such districts, schools, offices, institutions of higher
education, and community and technical colleges;
(ix) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving
said district may, under rules of the board, be granted to such person
when the person returns to the employment of the district.
(2) When any certificated or classified employee leaves one school
district within the state and commences employment with another school
district within the state, the employee shall retain the same
seniority, leave benefits and other benefits that the employee had in
his or her previous position: PROVIDED, That classified employees who
transfer between districts after July 28, 1985, shall not retain any
seniority rights other than longevity when leaving one school district
and beginning employment with another. If the school district to which
the person transfers has a different system for computing seniority,
leave benefits, and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted
the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits as a person in
that district who has similar occupational status and total years of
service.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section, discharges
of certificated and classified employees in school districts that are
dissolved due to financial insolvency shall be conducted in accordance
with RCW 28A.315.229.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.630.083 and 2011 c 260 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction and the state board
of education, each within the scope of their statutory authority, may
grant waivers of state statutes and administrative rules for designated
innovation schools and innovation zones as follows:
(i) Waivers may be granted under RCW 28A.655.180 and 28A.305.140;
(ii) Waivers may be granted to permit the commingling of funds
appropriated by the legislature on a categorical basis for such
programs as, but not limited to, highly capable students, transitional
bilingual instruction, and learning assistance; ((and))
(iii) Waivers may be granted of other administrative rules that in
the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction or the state
board of education are necessary to be waived to implement an
innovation school or innovation zone; and
(iv) Waivers from the minimum required annual instructional hour
offerings under RCW 28A.150.220 shall not be granted.
(b) State administrative rules dealing with public health, safety,
and civil rights, including accessibility for individuals with
disabilities, may not be waived.
(2) At the request of a school district, the superintendent of
public instruction may petition the United States department of
education or other federal agencies to waive federal regulations
necessary to implement an innovation school or innovation zone.
(3) The state board of education may grant waivers for innovation
schools or innovation zones of administrative rules pertaining to
calculation of course credits for high school courses.
(4) Waivers may be granted under this section for a period not to
exceed the duration of the designation of the innovation school or
innovation zone.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction and the state board of
education shall provide an expedited review of requests for waivers for
designated innovation schools and innovation zones. Requests may be
denied if the superintendent of public instruction or the state board
of education conclude that the waiver:
(a) Is likely to result in a decrease in academic achievement in
the innovation school or innovation zone;
(b) Would jeopardize the receipt of state or federal funds that a
school district would otherwise be eligible to receive, unless the
school district submits a written authorization for the waiver
acknowledging that receipt of these funds could be jeopardized; or
(c) Would violate state or federal laws or rules that are not
authorized to be waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 RCW 28A.305.141 (Waiver from one hundred
eighty-day school year requirement -- Criteria -- Recommendation to the
legislature) and 2009 c 543 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 8 and 14 of this act expire June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 9 of this act takes effect June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The sum of fifteen million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2015, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of paying
salaries of the STEM AP master teachers under section 3 of this act.

--- END ---