BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.25.060 and 2011 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may be issued a commercial driver's license unless
that person is a resident of this state, has successfully completed a
course of instruction in the operation of a commercial motor vehicle
that has been approved by the director or has been certified by an
employer as having the skills and training necessary to operate a
commercial motor vehicle safely, and has passed a knowledge and skills
test for driving a commercial motor vehicle that complies with minimum
federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated in 49
C.F.R. part 383, subparts G and H, and has satisfied all other
requirements of the CMVSA in addition to other requirements imposed by
state law or federal regulation. The tests must be prescribed and
conducted by the department. In addition to the fee charged for
issuance or renewal of any license, the applicant shall pay a fee of no
more than ((ten)) thirty-five dollars for ((each)) the classified
knowledge examination, classified endorsement knowledge examination, or
any combination of classified license and endorsement knowledge
examinations. The applicant shall pay a fee of no more than ((one))
two hundred fifty dollars for ((each)) the classified skill examination
or combination of classified skill examinations conducted by the
department.
(b) The department may authorize a person, including an agency of
this or another state, an employer, a private driver training facility,
or other private institution, or a department, agency, or
instrumentality of local government, to administer the skills test
specified by this section under the following conditions:
(i) The test is the same which would otherwise be administered by
the state;
(ii) The third party has entered into an agreement with the state
that complies with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 383.75; and
(iii) The director has adopted rules as to the third party testing
program and the development and justification for fees charged by any
third party.
(c) If the applicant's primary use of a commercial driver's license
is for any of the following, then the applicant shall pay a fee of no
more than ((seventy-five)) two hundred twenty-five dollars for ((each))
the classified skill examination or combination of classified skill
examinations whether conducted by the department or a third-party
tester:
(i) Public benefit not-for-profit corporations that are federally
supported head start programs; or
(ii) Public benefit not-for-profit corporations that support early
childhood education and assistance programs as described in RCW
43.215.405(2).
(d) Payment of the examination fees under this subsection entitles
the applicant to take the examination up to two times in order to pass.
(2) The department shall work with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to develop modified P1 and P2 skill examinations
that also include the skill examination components required to obtain
an "S" endorsement. In no event may a new applicant for an "S"
endorsement be required to take two separate examinations to obtain an
"S" endorsement and either a P1 or P2 endorsement, unless that
applicant is upgrading his or her existing commercial driver's license
to include an "S" endorsement. The combined P1/S or P2/S skill
examination must be offered to the applicant at the same cost as a
regular P1 or P2 skill examination.
(3)(a) The department may waive the skills test and the requirement
for completion of a course of instruction in the operation of a
commercial motor vehicle specified in this section for a commercial
driver's license applicant who meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. part
383.77.
(b) An applicant who operates a commercial motor vehicle for
agribusiness purposes is exempt from the course of instruction
completion and employer skills and training certification requirements
under this section. By January 1, 2010, the department shall submit
recommendations regarding the continuance of this exemption to the
transportation committees of the legislature. For purposes of this
subsection (3)(b), "agribusiness" means a private carrier who in the
normal course of business primarily transports:
(i) Farm machinery, farm equipment, implements of husbandry, farm
supplies, and materials used in farming;
(ii) Agricultural inputs, such as seed, feed, fertilizer, and crop
protection products;
(iii) Unprocessed agricultural commodities, as defined in RCW
17.21.020, where such commodities are produced by farmers, ranchers,
vineyardists, or orchardists; or
(iv) Any combination of (b)(i) through (iii) of this subsection.
The department shall notify the transportation committees of the
legislature if the federal government takes action affecting the
exemption provided in this subsection (3)(b).
(4) A commercial driver's license or commercial driver's
instruction permit may not be issued to a person while the person is
subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle,
or while the person's driver's license is suspended, revoked, or
canceled in any state, nor may a commercial driver's license be issued
to a person who has a commercial driver's license issued by any other
state unless the person first surrenders all such licenses, which must
be returned to the issuing state for cancellation.
(5)(a) The department may issue a commercial driver's instruction
permit to an applicant who is at least eighteen years of age and holds
a valid Washington state driver's license and who has submitted a
proper application, passed the general knowledge examination required
for issuance of a commercial driver's license under subsection (1) of
this section, and paid the appropriate fee for the knowledge
examination and an application fee of ((ten)) forty dollars.
(b) A commercial driver's instruction permit may not be issued for
a period to exceed six months. Only one renewal or reissuance may be
granted within a two-year period.
(c) The holder of a commercial driver's instruction permit may
drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway only when accompanied by
the holder of a commercial driver's license valid for the type of
vehicle driven who occupies a seat beside the individual for the
purpose of giving instruction in driving the commercial motor vehicle.
The holder of a commercial driver's instruction permit is not
authorized to operate a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous
materials.
(d) The department shall transmit the fees collected for commercial
driver's instruction permits to the state treasurer.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.25.100 and 2002 c 272 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a person has been disqualified from operating a commercial
motor vehicle, the person is not entitled to have the commercial
driver's license restored until after the expiration of the appropriate
disqualification period required under RCW 46.25.090 or until the
department has received a drug and alcohol assessment and evidence is
presented of satisfactory participation in or completion of any
required drug or alcohol treatment program for ending the
disqualification under RCW 46.25.090(7). After expiration of the
appropriate period and upon payment of a requalification fee of
((twenty)) thirty-five dollars, or one hundred fifty dollars if the
person has been disqualified under RCW 46.25.090(7), the person may
apply for a new, duplicate, or renewal commercial driver's license as
provided by law. If the person has been disqualified for a period of
one year or more, the person shall demonstrate that he or she meets the
commercial driver's license qualification standards specified in RCW
46.25.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.202 and 2007 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department may enter into a memorandum of understanding
with any federal agency for the purposes of facilitating the crossing
of the border between the state of Washington and the Canadian province
of British Columbia.
(2) The department may enter into an agreement with the Canadian
province of British Columbia for the purposes of implementing a border-crossing initiative.
(3)(a) The department may issue an enhanced driver's license or
identicard for the purposes of crossing the border between the state of
Washington and the Canadian province of British Columbia to an
applicant who provides the department with proof of: United States
citizenship, identity, and state residency. The department shall
continue to offer a standard driver's license and identicard. If the
department chooses to issue an enhanced driver's license, the
department must allow each applicant to choose between a standard
driver's license or identicard, or an enhanced driver's license or
identicard.
(b) The department shall implement a one-to-many biometric matching
system for the enhanced driver's license or identicard. An applicant
for an enhanced driver's license or identicard shall submit a biometric
identifier as designated by the department. The biometric identifier
must be used solely for the purpose of verifying the identity of the
holders and for any purpose set out in RCW 46.20.037. Applicants are
required to sign a declaration acknowledging their understanding of the
one-to-many biometric match.
(c) The enhanced driver's license or identicard must include
reasonable security measures to protect the privacy of Washington state
residents, including reasonable safeguards to protect against
unauthorized disclosure of data about Washington state residents. If
the enhanced driver's license or identicard includes a radio frequency
identification chip, or similar technology, the department shall ensure
that the technology is encrypted or otherwise secure from unauthorized
data access.
(d) The requirements of this subsection are in addition to the
requirements otherwise imposed on applicants for a driver's license or
identicard. The department shall adopt such rules as necessary to meet
the requirements of this subsection. From time to time the department
shall review technological innovations related to the security of
identity cards and amend the rules related to enhanced driver's
licenses and identicards as the director deems consistent with this
section and appropriate to protect the privacy of Washington state
residents.
(e) Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.118, the department may make images
associated with enhanced drivers' licenses or identicards from the
negative file available to United States customs and border agents for
the purposes of verifying identity.
(4) ((The department may set a fee for the issuance of enhanced
drivers' licenses and identicards under this section.)) The fee for an
enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard is fifty-four dollars,
which is in addition to the fees for any regular driver's license or
identicard. If the enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard is
issued, renewed, or extended for a period other than six years, the fee
for each class is nine dollars for each year that the enhanced driver's
license or enhanced identicard is issued, renewed, or extended.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.17.040 and 2011 c 171 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
((A)) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall collect a service fee of:
(1) Twelve dollars for changes in a certificate of title, with or
without registration renewal, or for verification of record and
preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the
certificate of title application or transfer; and
(2) Five dollars for a registration renewal, issuing a transit
permit or a studded tire permit if obtained separately from the annual
registration renewal, or any other service under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.17.050 and 2010 c 161 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting a report of sale filed under RCW 46.12.650(2), the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall require the applicant to pay((:
(1))) the filing fee under RCW 46.17.005(1), the license plate
technology fee under RCW 46.17.015, ((and)) the license service fee
under RCW 46.17.025 ((to the county auditor or other agent; and
(2) The subagent)), and the service fee under RCW 46.17.040(2) ((to
the subagent)).

Sec. 6 RCW 46.17.060 and 2010 c 161 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting a transitional ownership record filed under RCW
46.12.660, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay((:
(1))) the filing fee under RCW 46.17.005(1), the license plate
technology fee under RCW 46.17.015, ((and)) the license service fee
under RCW 46.17.025 ((to the county auditor or other agent; and
(2) The subagent)), and the service fee under RCW 46.17.040(2) ((to
the subagent)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The service fees collected under RCW 46.17.040, 46.17.050, and
46.17.060 must be distributed as follows:
(1) If paid to the department, the fees must be deposited into the
department of licensing services account under RCW 46.68.220.
(2) If paid to the county auditor or other agent, the fees must be
deposited into that county's general fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.12.650 and 2010 c 161 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Releasing interest. An owner releasing interest in a vehicle
shall:
(a) Sign the release of interest section provided on the
certificate of title or on a release of interest document or form
approved by the department;
(b) Give the certificate of title or most recent evidence of
ownership to the person gaining the interest in the vehicle;
(c) Give the person gaining interest in the vehicle an odometer
disclosure statement if one is required; and
(d) Report the vehicle sold as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) Report of sale. An owner shall notify the department, county
auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director in
writing within ((five)) twenty-one business days after a vehicle is or
has been:
(a) Sold;
(b) Given as a gift to another person;
(c) Traded, either privately or to a dealership;
(d) Donated to charity;
(e) Turned over to an insurance company or wrecking yard; or
(f) Disposed of.
(3) Report of sale properly filed. A report of sale is properly
filed if it is received by the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director within ((five)) twenty-one
business days after the date of sale or transfer and it includes:
(a) The date of sale or transfer;
(b) The owner's name and address;
(c) The name and address of the person acquiring the vehicle;
(d) The vehicle identification number and license plate number;
(e) A date or stamp by the department showing it was received on or
before the ((fifth)) twenty-first business day after the date of sale
or transfer; and
(f) Payment of the fees required under RCW 46.17.050 ((if the
report of sale is processed by a county auditor or other agent or
subagent appointed by the director)).
(4) Report of sale - administration. (a) The department shall:
(((a))) (i) Provide or approve reports of sale forms;
(((b))) (ii) Provide a system enabling an owner to submit reports
of sale electronically;
(((c))) (iii) Immediately update the department's vehicle record
when a report of sale has been filed;
(((d))) (iv) Provide instructions on release of interest forms that
allow the seller of a vehicle to release their interest in a vehicle at
the same time a financial institution, as defined in RCW 30.22.040,
releases its lien on the vehicle; and
(((e))) (v) Send a report to the department of revenue that lists
vehicles for which a report of sale has been received but no transfer
of ownership has taken place. The department shall send the report
once each quarter.
(b) A report of sale that is received by the department, county
auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director after the
twenty-first day becomes effective on the day it is received by the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director.
(5)(a) Transferring ownership. A person who has recently acquired
a vehicle by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action shall apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director for a new certificate of title
within fifteen days of delivery of the vehicle. A secured party who
has possession of the certificate of title shall either:
(i) Apply for a new certificate of title on behalf of the owner and
pay the fee required under RCW 46.17.100; or
(ii) Provide all required documents to the owner, as long as the
transfer was not a breach of its security agreement, to allow the owner
to apply for a new certificate of title.
(b) Compliance with this subsection does not affect the rights of
the secured party.
(6) Certificate of title delivered to secured party. The
certificate of title must be kept by or delivered to the person who
becomes the secured party when a security interest is reserved or
created at the time of the transfer of ownership. The parties must
comply with RCW 46.12.675.
(7) Penalty for late transfer. A person who has recently acquired
a motor vehicle by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or
legal action who does not apply for a new certificate of title within
fifteen calendar days of delivery of the vehicle is charged a penalty,
as described in RCW 46.17.140, when applying for a new certificate of
title. It is a misdemeanor to fail or neglect to apply for a transfer
of ownership within forty-five days after delivery of the vehicle. The
misdemeanor is a single continuing offense for each day that passes
regardless of the number of days that have elapsed following the forty-five day time period.
(8) Penalty for late transfer - exceptions. The penalty is not
charged if the delay in application is due to at least one of the
following:
(a) The department requests additional supporting documents;
(b) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
fails to perform or is neglectful;
(c) The owner is prevented from applying due to an illness or
extended hospitalization;
(d) The legal owner fails or neglects to release interest;
(e) The owner did not know of the filing of a report of sale by the
previous owner and signs an affidavit to the fact; or
(f) The department finds other conditions exist that adequately
explain the delay.
(9) Review and issue. The department shall review applications for
certificates of title and issue certificates of title when it has
determined that all applicable provisions of law have been complied
with.
(10) Rules. The department may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director must issue a studded tire permit authorizing
the use of studded tires as provided under RCW 46.37.420 to a vehicle
owner upon submittal of a proper application and payment of the studded
tire permit fee under RCW 46.17.400(1)(g).
(2) Each studded tire permit is valid on a vehicle during the
registration year as outlined in RCW 46.16A.020.
(3) The department must also issue an identifying marker that the
vehicle owner must place on the vehicle license plate for the studded
tire permit to be valid.
(4) Operating a vehicle on a public highway without a valid studded
tire permit and properly affixing the identifying marker to the vehicle
license plate is a traffic infraction; however, a vehicle owner or the
owner's authorized representative has five days from the date of
purchasing studded tires to apply for a studded tire permit. In
addition to any other penalties imposed for a traffic infraction, an
additional fifteen dollar penalty is assessed for a violation of this
section. The additional fifteen dollar penalty imposed under this
subsection must be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the
motor vehicle fund created under RCW 46.68.070.
(5) The vehicle owner is solely responsible for obtaining a studded
tire permit under this section, and a tire dealer is not obligated to
confirm, validate, document, disclose, enforce, report, or educate on
the requirements of this section. This section does not create a right
of action, whether civil or criminal, against any tire dealer.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.17.400 and 2011 c 171 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for one of the following
permits, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay the
following permit fee by permit type in addition to any other fee or tax
required by law:

PERMIT TYPE FEE AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary $15.00 RCW 46.16A.300 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Department temporary $.50 RCW 46.16A.305 RCW 46.68.450

(c) Farm vehicle trip $6.25 RCW 46.16A.330 RCW 46.68.035

(d) Nonresident military $10.00 RCW 46.16A.340 RCW 46.68.070

(e) Nonresident temporary snowmobile $5.00 RCW 46.10.450 RCW 46.68.350

(f) Special fuel trip $30.00 RCW 82.38.100 RCW 46.68.460

(g) Studded tire $15.00 Section 9 of this act Section 11 of this act

(h) Temporary ORV use $7.00 RCW 46.09.430 RCW 46.68.045

(((h))) (i) Vehicle trip $25.00 RCW 46.16A.320 RCW 46.68.455

(2) Permit fees as provided in subsection (1) of this section are
in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, except an
additional filing fee may not be charged for:
(a) Dealer temporary permits;
(b) Special fuel trip permits; and
(c) Vehicle trip permits.
(3) Five dollars of the fifteen dollar dealer temporary permit fee
provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section must be credited to the
payment of vehicle license fees at the time application for
registration is made. The remainder must be deposited to the state
patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The studded tire permit fee imposed under RCW 46.17.400(1)(g) for
studded tire permits issued under section 9 of this act must be
distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty-five percent to the transportation improvement account
created in RCW 47.26.084; and
(2) Forty-five percent to the county arterial preservation account
created in RCW 46.68.090.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.37.420 and 2012 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of
this state unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires
except vehicles equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet
federal standards that are installed and used in accordance with the
manufacturer's instructions.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no tire
on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its periphery any block,
flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance of any material other
than rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of
the tire((, except that)).
(3)(a) It is permissible to use: (i) Farm machinery equipped with
pneumatic tires or solid rubber tracks having protuberances that will
not injure the highway((,)); and ((except also that it is permissible
to use)) (ii)(A) tire chains, (B) alternative traction devices, or (C)
metal studs imbedded within the tire subject to studded tire permit
requirements under section 9 of this act, of reasonable proportions and
of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol, upon any
vehicle when required for safety because of snow, ice, or other
conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid.
(b) It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the tire
between April 1st and November 1st, except that a vehicle may be
equipped year-round with tires that have retractable studs if: (((a)))
(i) The studs retract pneumatically or mechanically to below the wear
bar of the tire when not in use; and (((b))) (ii) the retractable studs
are engaged only between November 1st and April 1st. Retractable studs
may be made of metal or other material and are not subject to the
lightweight stud weight requirements under RCW 46.04.272. The state
department of transportation may, from time to time, determine
additional periods in which the use of tires with metal studs imbedded
therein is lawful.
(((3))) (4) The state department of transportation and local
authorities in their respective jurisdictions may issue special permits
authorizing the operation upon a highway of traction engines or
tractors having movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the
periphery of the movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm
machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be
prohibited under this section.
(((4))) (5) Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used
between November 1st and April 1st upon school buses and fire
department vehicles, any law or regulation to the contrary
notwithstanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---