BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.10.030 and 2009 c 549 s 5048 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general shall:
(1) Appear for and represent the state before the supreme court or
the court of appeals in all cases in which the state is interested;
(2) Institute and prosecute all actions and proceedings for, or for
the use of the state, which may be necessary in the execution of the
duties of any state officer. However, the attorney general shall not
be required to institute or prosecute actions or proceedings on behalf
of superior court judges unless requested to do so by the administrator
for the courts under chapter 2.56 RCW. In such an action on behalf of
superior court judges, one-half of the attorneys' fees and costs shall
be borne by the administrator for the courts and one-half shall be
borne by the attorney general;
(3) Defend all actions and proceedings against any state officer or
employee acting in his or her official capacity, in any of the courts
of this state or the United States;
(4) Consult with and advise the several prosecuting attorneys in
matters relating to the duties of their office, and when the interests
of the state require, he or she shall attend the trial of any person
accused of a crime, and assist in the prosecution;
(5) Consult with and advise the governor, members of the
legislature, and other state officers, and when requested, give written
opinions upon all constitutional or legal questions relating to the
duties of such officers;
(6) Prepare proper drafts of contracts and other instruments
relating to subjects in which the state is interested;
(7) Give written opinions, when requested by either branch of the
legislature, or any committee thereof, upon constitutional or legal
questions;
(8) Enforce the proper application of funds appropriated for the
public institutions of the state, and prosecute corporations for
failure or refusal to make the reports required by law;
(9) Keep in proper books a record of all cases prosecuted or
defended by him or her, on behalf of the state or its officers, and of
all proceedings had in relation thereto, and deliver the same to his or
her successor in office;
(10) Keep books in which he or she shall record all the official
opinions given by him or her during his or her term of office, and
deliver the same to his or her successor in office;
(11) Pay into the state treasury all moneys received by him or her
for the use of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.08 RCW
to read as follows:
No legal action may be brought by a superior court judge or judges
against the state or a county until ninety days have elapsed after the
claim has been filed with the attorney general or county prosecuting
attorney, as the case may be. For the period of one hundred twenty
days following the filing of such a suit, the parties must engage in
mediation or other form of alternative dispute resolution to resolve
the suit.

--- END ---