BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts derived by mint growers and
processors engaged in the manufacturing and wholesaling of mint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to mint
growers and processors of propane or natural gas used to distill mint
oil. The propane or natural gas must be used exclusively to distill
mint oil.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by mint growers and processors of propane or natural gas to distill
mint oil. The propane or natural gas must be used exclusively to
distill mint oil.
(2) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of
section 2 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---