BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to provide funds necessary for the
location, design, right-of-way, and construction of the Columbia river
crossing project, there shall be issued and sold upon the request of
the department of transportation up to four hundred fifty million
dollars in funding and the additional cost of financing in general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington, first payable from toll
revenue and excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in
accordance with sections 2 through 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Upon the request of the department of
transportation, the state finance committee shall supervise and provide
for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by this
act in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by this act
shall be sold in the manner, at time or times, in amounts, and at the
price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by this act shall be deposited in the Columbia river
crossing project account created under RCW 47.56.894 and shall be
available only for the purposes enumerated in section 1 of this act,
for the payment of bond anticipation notes or other interim financing,
if any, capitalizing interest on the bonds, and for the payment of bond
issuance costs, including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Bonds issued under the authority of this
section and sections 1, 5, and 6 of this act shall distinctly state
that they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall
pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the
principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an
unconditional promise to pay such principal and interest as the same
shall become due. The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be
first payable in the manner provided in this act from toll revenue and
then from proceeds of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
to the extent toll revenue is not available for that purpose. Toll
revenue and the state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW are hereby pledged to the
payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued under the
authority of this act, and the legislature agrees to continue to impose
these toll charges on the Columbia river crossing project, and on any
other eligible toll facility designated by the legislature and on which
the imposition of tolls is authorized by the legislature in respect of
the bonds, and excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in
amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all
bonds issued under the authority of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 For bonds issued under the authority of this
act, the state treasurer shall first withdraw toll revenue from the
Columbia river crossing project account created under RCW 47.56.894
and, to the extent toll revenue is not available, excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels in the motor vehicle fund and deposit in the
toll facility bond retirement account, or a special subaccount in the
account, such amounts, and at such times, as are required by the bond
proceedings.
Any excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels required for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by this act shall
be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and
which is, or may be, appropriated to the department for state highway
purposes. Funds required shall never constitute a charge against any
other allocations of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues
to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising
from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the
state in the motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet the
requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.
Any payments for bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken
from other revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes
that are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns shall
be repaid from available toll revenue in the manner provided in the
bond proceedings or, if toll revenue is not available for that purpose,
from the first excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required for bond retirement
or interest on the bonds. Any excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds
authorized by this act shall be reimbursed to the motor vehicle fund
from toll revenue in the manner and with the priority specified in the
bond proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Bonds issued under the authority of this
section and sections 1, 4, and 5 of this act and any other general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or that may
be authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuels excise
taxes for the payment of principal and interest thereon shall be an
equal charge against the revenues from such motor vehicle and special
fuels excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If and to the extent that the state finance
committee determines, in consultation with the department of
transportation and the tolling authority, that it will be beneficial
for the state to issue any bonds authorized in sections 1 and 4 through
6 of this act as toll revenue bonds rather than as general obligation
bonds, the state finance committee is authorized to issue and sell,
upon the request of the department of transportation, such bonds as
toll revenue bonds and not as general obligation bonds.
Notwithstanding sections 4 and 5 of this act, each such bond shall
contain a recital that payment or redemption of the bond and payment of
the interest and any premium thereon is payable solely from and secured
solely by a direct pledge, charge, and lien upon toll revenue and is
not a general obligation of the state to which the full faith and
credit of the state is pledged.
Toll revenue is hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the
interest thereon issued under the authority of this section, and the
legislature agrees to continue to impose these toll charges on the
Columbia river crossing project, in amounts sufficient to pay, when
due, the principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The state finance committee may determine
and include in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds
under this act such terms, provisions, covenants, and conditions as it
may deem appropriate in order to assist with the marketing and sale of
the bonds, confer rights upon the owners of bonds, and safeguard rights
of the owners of bonds including, among other things:
(1) Provisions regarding the maintenance and operation of eligible
toll facilities;
(2) The pledges, uses, and priorities of application of toll
revenue;
(3) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely
by toll revenue as provided by this act, or shall be payable from and
secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels and the full faith and credit of the state as
provided in this act;
(4) In consultation with the department of transportation and the
tolling authority, financial covenants requiring that the eligible toll
facilities must produce specified coverage ratios of toll revenue to
debt service on bonds;
(5) The purposes and conditions that must be satisfied prior to the
issuance of any additional bonds that are to be payable from and
secured by any toll revenue on an equal basis with previously issued
and outstanding bonds payable from and secured by toll revenue;
(6) Provisions that bonds for which any toll revenue are pledged,
or for which a pledge of any toll revenue may be reserved, may be
structured on a senior, parity, subordinate, or special lien basis in
relation to any other bonds for which toll revenue is pledged, with
respect to toll revenue only; and
(7) Provisions regarding reserves, credit enhancement, liquidity
facilities, and payment agreements with respect to bonds.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, covenants and conditions detailing
the character of management, maintenance, and operation of eligible
toll facilities, insurance for eligible toll facilities, financial
management of toll revenue, and disposition of eligible toll facilities
must first be approved by the department of transportation.
The owner of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate
proceeding require and compel performance of any duties imposed upon
the tolling authority and the department of transportation and their
respective officials, including any duties imposed upon or undertaken
by them or by their respective officers, agents, and employees, in
connection with the construction, maintenance, and operation of
eligible toll facilities and in connection with the collection,
deposit, investment, application, and disbursement of the proceeds of
the bonds and toll revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 For the purposes of this act, "toll revenue"
means all toll receipts, all interest income derived from the
investment of toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds
received for the benefit of transportation facilities in the state,
including eligible toll facilities. However, for the purpose of any
pledge of toll revenue to the payment of particular bonds issued under
this act, "toll revenue" means and includes only such toll revenue or
portion thereof that is pledged to the payment of those bonds in the
resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds. Toll revenue
constitutes "fees and revenues derived from the ownership or operation
of any undertaking, facility, or project" as that phrase is used in
Article VIII, section 1(c)(1) of the state Constitution.
For the purposes of this act, "tolling authority" has the same
meaning as in RCW 47.56.810.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.10.882 and 2011 c 377 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The toll facility bond retirement account is created in the state
treasury for the purpose of payment of the principal of and interest
and premium on bonds. Both principal of and interest on the bonds
issued for the purposes of chapter 498, Laws of 2009 ((and)), chapter
377, Laws of 2011, and this act shall be payable from the toll facility
bond retirement account. The state finance committee may provide that
special subaccounts be created in the account to facilitate payment of
the principal of and interest on the bonds. The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount required for principal and interest on the
bonds in accordance with the bond proceedings.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.56.894 and 2012 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special account to be known as the Columbia river crossing
project account is created in the state treasury.
(2) Deposits to the account must include:
(a) All proceeds of bonds and loans issued for the Columbia river
crossing project, including any capitalized interest;
(b) All tolls and other revenues received from the operation of the
Columbia river crossing project as a toll facility to be deposited at
least monthly;
(c) Any interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment
of those revenues;
(d) Notwithstanding RCW 47.12.063, proceeds from the sale of any
surplus real property acquired for the Columbia river crossing project;
and
(e) All damages, liquidated or otherwise, collected under any
contract involving the Columbia river crossing project.
(3) Subject to the covenants made by the state in the bond
proceedings authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds for the Columbia
river crossing project, toll charges, other revenues, and interest
received from the operation of the Columbia river crossing project as
a toll facility may be used to:
(a) Pay any required costs allowed under RCW 47.56.820; and
(b) Repay amounts to the motor vehicle fund as required.
(4) When repaying the motor vehicle fund, the state treasurer must
transfer funds from the Columbia river crossing project account to the
motor vehicle fund on or before each debt service date for bonds issued
for the Columbia river crossing project in an amount sufficient to
repay the motor vehicle fund for amounts transferred from that fund to
the highway bond retirement fund to provide for any bond principal and
interest due on that date. The state treasurer may establish
subaccounts for the purpose of segregating toll charges, bond sale
proceeds, and other revenues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 11 of this act takes effect if the
requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met.

--- END ---