BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of any article of personal property, valued at less than ten thousand
dollars, purchased or received as a prize in a contest of chance, as
defined in RCW 82.04.285, from a nonprofit organization or a library,
if the gross income the nonprofit organization or library receives from
the sale is exempt under RCW 82.04.3651.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---