BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
retain and grow family wage jobs in rural, economically distressed
areas; to promote healthy forests; and to utilize Washington's abundant
natural resources to promote diversified renewable energy use in the
state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.956 and 2009 c 469 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog
fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including
forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood
pellets; and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) If a taxpayer who claimed an exemption under this section
closes a facility in Washington for which employment positions were
reported under section 4 of this act, resulting in a loss of jobs
located within the state, the department must declare the amount of the
tax exemption claimed under this section for the previous two calendar
years to be immediately due.
(4) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2024.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.956 and 2009 c 469 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.956;
and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every taxpayer claiming an exemption under RCW 82.08.956 or
82.12.956 must file with the department a complete annual survey as
required under RCW 82.32.585, except that the taxpayer must file a
separate survey for each facility owned or operated in the state of
Washington.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.136 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The intent of the tax exemption provided in RCW 82.08.956 and
82.12.956 is to promote the retention of relatively high wage jobs in
the counties where facilities who purchase and use hog fuel are
located. Specifically, in a time when there is increasing pressure to
close industrial facilities like mills and relocate this economic
activity out of state or overseas, rural areas of the state are at risk
of losing critical jobs that directly, or indirectly, support entire
communities. The legislature, in enacting the hog fuel tax exemption,
hopes to retain seventy five percent of the jobs at each facility in
the state at which the exemption is claimed, between now and June 30,
2024.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review
the performance through July 1, 2018, of the tax preferences
established in RCW 82.08.956 and 82.12.956, and prepare a report to the
legislature by October 31, 2019.
(3) The department of revenue must provide the committee with
annual survey information and any other tax data necessary to conduct
the review required in subsection (2) of this section. The employment
security department and other agencies, as requested, must cooperate
with the committee by providing information about the average wage of
employment in the county where each facility owned or operated by a
company claiming the exemption is located. The report is not limited
to, but must include, the following information:
(a) Identification of the baseline number of jobs existing as of
January 1, 2013, in facilities where the preference has been claimed,
as well as related wage and benefit information;
(b) Identification of how the number of jobs at these facilities
has changed during the duration of the credit;
(c) Analysis of how the wages provided to employees at affected
facilities compare to the average wages in the county in which the
facility is located;
(d) Analysis of how the benefits, including medical and other
health care benefits, provided to employees at affected facilities
compare to the average wages in the county in which the facility is
located; and
(e) Whether and to what extent the goal has been achieved, of
retaining seventy-five percent of employment at the facilities at which
the exemption has been claimed.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---