BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that given the
tremendous strains on the state budget, it is crucial to view all state
operations in light of the state's paramount and constitutionally
required duties. This is true for all state agencies under each of the
coequal branches of government, including the judicial branch. The
state Constitution in Article IV, section 2 provides that there shall
be five supreme court judges. For over one hundred years, the
legislature has seen fit by statute to add four additional justices to
that august body.
(2) Recent opinions by the Washington state supreme court have
demonstrated that this legislative decision may be constitutionally
problematic. First, the court has made it clear that the state
legislature should be focused on prioritizing its budget according to
constitutionally mandated duties, McCleary v. State, 173 Wn. 477, 269
P.3d 227 (2012). Given the nature of this mandate, the legislature
finds that it can no longer justify the luxury of four additional
supreme court justices. In addition, the Washington state supreme
court has indicated that the legislature may exceed its authority when
it adds to the minimum requirements provided in the plain language of
the state Constitution, League of Education Voters v. Gregoire, Case
No. 87425-5 (2013)(law requiring tax increases receive a two-thirds
vote unconstitutional in light of plain constitutional language
providing for a minimum voting requirement for passage of bills). With
due deference to the doctrine of separation of powers and the
Washington state supreme court as head of a coequal branch of
government, the legislature finds that the state supreme court should
return to the minimum number of judges provided for and enshrined in
the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW
to read as follows:
On June 30, 2013, all existing judges of the state supreme court
shall meet in public to cast lots by drawing straws. Effective July 1,
2013, the positions of the four judges casting losing lots by drawing
the shortest straws shall be terminated and those judges shall not
serve the remainder of their respective unexpired terms. Any savings
accruing to the state as a result of the elimination of the positions
and associated administrative expenses of the four judges casting
losing lots shall be used to fund basic education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nothing in this act prohibits or constricts
the right of the people to approve an increase to the number of judges
on the supreme court by a constitutional amendment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 2.04.070 (Number of judges) and 1909 c
24 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2013.

--- END ---