BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
Any enactment of the legislature with a fiscal note indicating a
fiscal impact greater than zero dollars shall expire no later than one
year after the earliest effective date applicable to any section of the
enactment, unless specific funding for the purposes of the enactment,
referencing the enactment by bill or chapter number, is provided in an
appropriation that takes effect before the enactment expires.

--- END ---