BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the federal
patient protection and affordable care act provides an opportunity to
expand medicaid to adults with incomes below one hundred thirty-three
percent of the federal poverty level, as defined in the social security
act section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII). The federal law establishes the
eligibility requirements and benefit requirements for the medicaid
expansion to align with the subsidized coverage options that will be
available through the health benefit exchange and provide a continuum
of coverage options for low-income individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority is authorized to implement the medicaid expansion
defined in section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the federal social
security act, consistent with budget authorization provided in the
omnibus appropriations act.

--- END ---