BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the United
States department of education designated Washington's waiver of
certain provisions of the federal elementary and secondary education
act to be at "high-risk." The legislature further finds that the
federal department of education directed Washington to require the use
of student results on the federally mandated statewide administered
reading or language arts and mathematics assessments as one of the
measures of student growth in Washington's teacher and principal
evaluations. The legislature intends to address the concerns of the
federal department of education by requiring the student results on the
federally mandated statewide administered reading or language arts and
mathematics assessments be used as one of the multiple measures of
student growth for the teachers who teach the relevant subjects in the
grades in which the assessments are administered and for principals who
are assigned to schools in which at least one of the relevant subjects
are taught in at least one of the grades in which the assessments are
administered.
(2) The legislature recognizes the importance of science in the
school curriculum and that the federally mandated statewide
administered science assessments are not currently required to be used
as one of the multiple measures of student growth for teacher
evaluation. The legislature further recognizes that there are
technical difficulties in using the science assessments because they
are not annual assessments but instead are only administered in the
fifth, eighth, and tenth grades. The legislature intends to revisit
this issue in the future and further intends, if appropriate, to use
the statewide administered science assessment as one of the multiple
measures of student growth for teacher evaluation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.100 and 2012 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom
teachers and certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers
the criteria shall be developed in the following categories:
Instructional skill; classroom management, professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; the handling of
student discipline and attendant problems; and interest in teaching
pupils and knowledge of subject matter.
(b) Every board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure
provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910, and 41.59.920,
establish evaluative criteria and procedures for all certificated
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel. The evaluative
criteria must contain as a minimum the criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section and must
be prepared within six months following adoption of the superintendent
of public instruction's minimum criteria. The district must certify to
the superintendent of public instruction that evaluative criteria have
been so prepared by the district.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established in
subsection (7)(c) of this section, every board of directors shall, in
accordance with procedures provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170,
41.59.910, and 41.59.920, establish revised evaluative criteria and a
four-level rating system for all certificated classroom teachers.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Centering instruction
on high expectations for student achievement; (ii) demonstrating
effective teaching practices; (iii) recognizing individual student
learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs; (iv)
providing clear and intentional focus on subject matter content and
curriculum; (v) fostering and managing a safe, positive learning
environment; (vi) using multiple student data elements to modify
instruction and improve student learning; (vii) communicating and
collaborating with parents and the school community; and (viii)
exhibiting collaborative and collegial practices focused on improving
instructional practice and student learning. Student growth data, as
determined under (f) of this subsection, must be a substantial factor
in evaluating the summative performance of certificated classroom
teachers for at least three of the evaluation criteria listed in this
subsection.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the certificated
classroom teacher must describe performance along a continuum that
indicates the extent to which the criteria have been met or exceeded.
The summative performance ratings shall be as follows: Level 1 -unsatisfactory; level 2 - basic; level 3 - proficient; and level 4 -distinguished. A classroom teacher shall receive one of the four
summative performance ratings for each of the minimum criteria in (b)
of this subsection and one of the four summative performance ratings
for the evaluation as a whole, which shall be the comprehensive
summative evaluation performance rating. By December 1, 2012, the
superintendent of public instruction must adopt rules prescribing a
common method for calculating the comprehensive summative evaluation
performance rating for each of the preferred instructional frameworks,
including for a focused evaluation under subsection (12) of this
section, giving appropriate weight to the indicators evaluated under
each criteria and maximizing rater agreement among the frameworks.
(d) By December 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall adopt rules that provide descriptors for each of the summative
performance ratings, based on the development work of pilot school
districts under subsection (7) of this section. Any subsequent changes
to the descriptors by the superintendent may only be made following
consultation with a group broadly reflective of the parties represented
in subsection (7)(a) of this section.
(e) By September 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall identify up to three preferred instructional frameworks that
support the revised evaluation system. The instructional frameworks
shall be research-based and establish definitions or rubrics for each
of the four summative performance ratings for each evaluation criteria.
Each school district must adopt one of the preferred instructional
frameworks and post the selection on the district's web site. The
superintendent of public instruction shall establish a process for
approving minor modifications or adaptations to a preferred
instructional framework that may be proposed by a school district.
(f)(i) Student growth data that is relevant to the teacher and
subject matter must be a factor in the evaluation process and must be
based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. However, for teachers
who teach reading or language arts or mathematics in a grade in which
the federally mandated statewide student assessments are administered,
one of the multiple measures of student growth must be the student
results on the relevant assessment. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall provide to each school district the
relevant state-level assessment information necessary to determine
student growth for the purpose of teacher evaluations.
(ii) Student growth data elements may include the teacher's
performance as a member of a grade-level, subject matter, or other
instructional team within a school when the use of this data is
relevant and appropriate. Student growth data elements may also
include the teacher's performance as a member of the overall
instructional team of a school when use of this data is relevant and
appropriate.
(iii) As used in this subsection (2), "student growth" means the
change in student achievement between two points in time.
(g) Student input may also be included in the evaluation process.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, it
shall be the responsibility of a principal or his or her designee to
evaluate all certificated personnel in his or her school. During each
school year all classroom teachers and certificated support personnel
shall be observed for the purposes of evaluation at least twice in the
performance of their assigned duties. Total observation time for each
employee for each school year shall be not less than sixty minutes. An
employee in the third year of provisional status as defined in RCW
28A.405.220 shall be observed at least three times in the performance
of his or her duties and the total observation time for the school year
shall not be less than ninety minutes. Following each observation, or
series of observations, the principal or other evaluator shall promptly
document the results of the observation in writing, and shall provide
the employee with a copy thereof within three days after such report is
prepared. New employees shall be observed at least once for a total
observation time of thirty minutes during the first ninety calendar
days of their employment period.
(b) As used in this subsection and subsection (4) of this section,
"employees" means classroom teachers and certificated support personnel
except where otherwise specified.
(4)(a) At any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is
not judged satisfactory based on district evaluation criteria shall be
notified in writing of the specific areas of deficiencies along with a
reasonable program for improvement. For classroom teachers who have
been transitioned to the revised evaluation system pursuant to the
district implementation schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of
this section, the following comprehensive summative evaluation
performance ratings based on the evaluation criteria in subsection
(2)(b) of this section mean a classroom teacher's work is not judged
satisfactory:
(i) Level 1; or
(ii) Level 2 if the classroom teacher is a continuing contract
employee under RCW 28A.405.210 with more than five years of teaching
experience and if the level 2 comprehensive summative evaluation
performance rating has been received for two consecutive years or for
two years within a consecutive three-year time period.
(b) During the period of probation, the employee may not be
transferred from the supervision of the original evaluator.
Improvement of performance or probable cause for nonrenewal must occur
and be documented by the original evaluator before any consideration of
a request for transfer or reassignment as contemplated by either the
individual or the school district. A probationary period of sixty
school days shall be established. Days may be added if deemed
necessary to complete a program for improvement and evaluate the
probationer's performance, as long as the probationary period is
concluded before May 15th of the same school year. The probationary
period may be extended into the following school year if the
probationer has five or more years of teaching experience and has a
comprehensive summative evaluation performance rating as of May 15th of
less than level 2. The establishment of a probationary period does not
adversely affect the contract status of an employee within the meaning
of RCW 28A.405.300. The purpose of the probationary period is to give
the employee opportunity to demonstrate improvements in his or her
areas of deficiency. The establishment of the probationary period and
the giving of the notice to the employee of deficiency shall be by the
school district superintendent and need not be submitted to the board
of directors for approval. During the probationary period the
evaluator shall meet with the employee at least twice monthly to
supervise and make a written evaluation of the progress, if any, made
by the employee. The evaluator may authorize one additional
certificated employee to evaluate the probationer and to aid the
employee in improving his or her areas of deficiency. Should the
evaluator not authorize such additional evaluator, the probationer may
request that an additional certificated employee evaluator become part
of the probationary process and this request must be implemented by
including an additional experienced evaluator assigned by the
educational service district in which the school district is located
and selected from a list of evaluation specialists compiled by the
educational service district. Such additional certificated employee
shall be immune from any civil liability that might otherwise be
incurred or imposed with regard to the good faith performance of such
evaluation. If a procedural error occurs in the implementation of a
program for improvement, the error does not invalidate the
probationer's plan for improvement or evaluation activities unless the
error materially affects the effectiveness of the plan or the ability
to evaluate the probationer's performance. The probationer must be
removed from probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the
satisfaction of the evaluator in those areas specifically detailed in
his or her initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in
his or her program for improvement. A classroom teacher who has been
transitioned to the revised evaluation system pursuant to the district
implementation schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of this section
must be removed from probation if he or she has demonstrated
improvement that results in a new comprehensive summative evaluation
performance rating of level 2 or above for a provisional employee or a
continuing contract employee with five or fewer years of experience, or
of level 3 or above for a continuing contract employee with more than
five years of experience. Lack of necessary improvement during the
established probationary period, as specifically documented in writing
with notification to the probationer constitutes grounds for a finding
of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210.
(c) When a continuing contract employee with five or more years of
experience receives a comprehensive summative evaluation performance
rating below level 2 for two consecutive years, the school district
shall, within ten days of the completion of the second ((summative))
comprehensive (([comprehensive summative])) summative evaluation or May
15th, whichever occurs first, implement the employee notification of
discharge as provided in RCW 28A.405.300.
(d) Immediately following the completion of a probationary period
that does not produce performance changes detailed in the initial
notice of deficiencies and program for improvement, the employee may be
removed from his or her assignment and placed into an alternative
assignment for the remainder of the school year. In the case of a
classroom teacher who has been transitioned to the revised evaluation
system pursuant to the district implementation schedule adopted under
subsection (7)(c) of this section, the teacher may be removed from his
or her assignment and placed into an alternative assignment for the
remainder of the school year immediately following the completion of a
probationary period that does not result in the required comprehensive
summative evaluation performance ratings specified in (b) of this
subsection. This reassignment may not displace another employee nor
may it adversely affect the probationary employee's compensation or
benefits for the remainder of the employee's contract year. If such
reassignment is not possible, the district may, at its option, place
the employee on paid leave for the balance of the contract term.
(5) Every board of directors shall establish evaluative criteria
and procedures for all superintendents, principals, and other
administrators. It shall be the responsibility of the district
superintendent or his or her designee to evaluate all administrators.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, such evaluation
shall be based on the administrative position job description. Such
criteria, when applicable, shall include at least the following
categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in recognizing
good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation
and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership;
and ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.
(6)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established by
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall
establish revised evaluative criteria and a four-level rating system
for principals.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Creating a school
culture that promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching
for students and staff; (ii) demonstrating commitment to closing the
achievement gap; (iii) providing for school safety; (iv) leading the
development, implementation, and evaluation of a data-driven plan for
increasing student achievement, including the use of multiple student
data elements; (v) assisting instructional staff with alignment of
curriculum, instruction, and assessment with state and local district
learning goals; (vi) monitoring, assisting, and evaluating effective
instruction and assessment practices; (vii) managing both staff and
fiscal resources to support student achievement and legal
responsibilities; and (viii) partnering with the school community to
promote student learning. Student growth data, as determined under (f)
of this subsection, must be a substantial factor in evaluating the
summative performance of the principal for at least three of the
evaluation criteria listed in this subsection.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the principal
must describe performance along a continuum that indicates the extent
to which the criteria have been met or exceeded. The summative
performance ratings shall be as follows: Level 1 - unsatisfactory;
level 2 - basic; level 3 - proficient; and level 4 - distinguished. A
principal shall receive one of the four summative performance ratings
for each of the minimum criteria in (b) of this subsection and one of
the four summative performance ratings for the evaluation as a whole,
which shall be the comprehensive summative evaluation performance
rating.
(d) By December 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall adopt rules that provide descriptors for each of the summative
performance ratings, based on the development work of pilot school
districts under subsection (7) of this section. Any subsequent changes
to the descriptors by the superintendent may only be made following
consultation with a group broadly reflective of the parties represented
in subsection (7)(a) of this section.
(e) By September 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall identify up to three preferred leadership frameworks that support
the revised evaluation system. The leadership frameworks shall be
research-based and establish definitions or rubrics for each of the
four performance ratings for each evaluation criteria. Each school
district shall adopt one of the preferred leadership frameworks and
post the selection on the district's web site. The superintendent of
public instruction shall establish a process for approving minor
modifications or adaptations to a preferred leadership framework that
may be proposed by a school district.
(f) Student growth data that is relevant to the principal must be
a factor in the evaluation process and must be based on multiple
measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. However, for principals assigned to a
school in which reading or language arts or mathematics are taught in
at least one of the grades in which the federally mandated statewide
assessments are administered, one of the multiple measures of student
growth must be the student results on the relevant assessments. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide to
each school district the relevant state-level assessment information
necessary to determine student growth for the purpose of teacher
evaluations.
(ii) As used in this subsection (6), "student growth" means the
change in student achievement between two points in time.
(g) Input from building staff may also be included in the
evaluation process.
(h) For principals who have been transitioned to the revised
evaluation system pursuant to the district implementation schedule
adopted under subsection (7)(c) of this section, the following
comprehensive summative evaluation performance ratings mean a
principal's work is not judged satisfactory:
(i) Level 1; or
(ii) Level 2 if the principal has more than five years of
experience in the principal role and if the level 2 comprehensive
summative evaluation performance rating has been received for two
consecutive years or for two years within a consecutive three-year time
period.
(7)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration
with state associations representing teachers, principals,
administrators, school board members, and parents, to be known as the
steering committee, shall create models for implementing the evaluation
system criteria, student growth tools, professional development
programs, and evaluator training for certificated classroom teachers
and principals. Human resources specialists, professional development
experts, and assessment experts must also be consulted. Due to the
diversity of teaching assignments and the many developmental levels of
students, classroom teachers and principals must be prominently
represented in this work. The models must be available for use in the
2011-12 school year.
(b) A new certificated classroom teacher evaluation system that
implements the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a new
principal evaluation system that implements the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section shall be phased-in beginning with the
2010-11 school year by districts identified in (d) of this subsection
and implemented in all school districts beginning with the 2013-14
school year.
(c) Each school district board of directors shall adopt a schedule
for implementation of the revised evaluation systems that transitions
a portion of classroom teachers and principals in the district to the
revised evaluation systems each year beginning no later than the 2013-14 school year, until all classroom teachers and principals are being
evaluated under the revised evaluation systems no later than the 2015-16 school year. A school district is not precluded from completing the
transition of all classroom teachers and principals to the revised
evaluation systems before the 2015-16 school year. The schedule
adopted under this subsection (7)(c) must provide that the following
employees are transitioned to the revised evaluation systems beginning
in the 2013-14 school year:
(i) Classroom teachers who are provisional employees under RCW
28A.405.220;
(ii) Classroom teachers who are on probation under subsection (4)
of this section;
(iii) Principals in the first three consecutive school years of
employment as a principal;
(iv) Principals whose work is not judged satisfactory in their most
recent evaluation; and
(v) Principals previously employed as a principal by another school
district in the state of Washington for three or more consecutive
school years and in the first full year as a principal in the school
district.
(d) A set of school districts shall be selected by the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in a collaborative
process resulting in the development and piloting of new certificated
classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems during the 2010-11
and 2011-12 school years. These school districts must be selected
based on: (i) The agreement of the local associations representing
classroom teachers and principals to collaborate with the district in
this developmental work and (ii) the agreement to participate in the
full range of development and implementation activities, including:
Development of rubrics for the evaluation criteria and ratings in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; identification of or
development of appropriate multiple measures of student growth in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; development of appropriate
evaluation system forms; participation in professional development for
principals and classroom teachers regarding the content of the new
evaluation system; participation in evaluator training; and
participation in activities to evaluate the effectiveness of the new
systems and support programs. The school districts must submit to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction data that is used in
evaluations and all district-collected student achievement, aptitude,
and growth data regardless of whether the data is used in evaluations.
If the data is not available electronically, the district may submit it
in nonelectronic form. The superintendent of public instruction must
analyze the districts' use of student data in evaluations, including
examining the extent that student data is not used or is underutilized.
The superintendent of public instruction must also consult with
participating districts and stakeholders, recommend appropriate
changes, and address statewide implementation issues. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report evaluation system
implementation status, evaluation data, and recommendations to
appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by July 1, 2011,
and at the conclusion of the development phase by July 1, 2012. In the
July 1, 2011, report, the superintendent shall include recommendations
for whether a single statewide evaluation model should be adopted,
whether modified versions developed by school districts should be
subject to state approval, and what the criteria would be for
determining if a school district's evaluation model meets or exceeds a
statewide model. The report shall also identify challenges posed by
requiring a state approval process.
(e)(i) The steering committee in (a) of this subsection (((7)(a) of
this section)) and the pilot school districts in (d) of this subsection
(((7)(d) of this section)) shall continue to examine implementation
issues and refine tools for the new certificated classroom teacher
evaluation system in subsection (2) of this section and the new
principal evaluation system in subsection (6) of this section during
the 2013-14 through 2015-16 implementation phase.
(ii) Particular attention shall be given to the following issues:
(A) Developing a report for the legislature and governor, due by
December 1, 2013, of best practices and recommendations regarding how
teacher and principal evaluations and other appropriate elements shall
inform school district human resource and personnel practices. The
legislature and governor are provided the opportunity to review the
report and recommendations during the 2014 legislative session;
(B) Taking the new teacher and principal evaluation systems to
scale and the use of best practices for statewide implementation;
(C) Providing guidance regarding the use of student growth data to
assure it is used responsibly and with integrity;
(D) Refining evaluation system management tools, professional
development programs, and evaluator training programs with an emphasis
on developing rater reliability;
(E) Reviewing emerging research regarding teacher and principal
evaluation systems and the development and implementation of evaluation
systems in other states;
(F) Reviewing the impact that variable demographic characteristics
of students and schools have on the objectivity, reliability, validity,
and availability of student growth data; and
(G) Developing recommendations regarding how teacher evaluations
could inform state policies regarding the criteria for a teacher to
obtain continuing contract status under RCW 28A.405.210. In developing
these recommendations the experiences of school districts and teachers
during the evaluation transition phase must be considered.
Recommendations must be reported by July 1, 2016, to the legislature
and the governor.
(iii) To support the tasks in (e)(ii) of this subsection, the
superintendent of public instruction may contract with an independent
research organization with expertise in educator evaluations and
knowledge of the revised evaluation systems being implemented under
this section.
(iv) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the
statewide implementation of revised teacher and principal evaluation
systems using data reported under RCW 28A.150.230 as well as periodic
input from focus groups of administrators, principals, and teachers.
(v) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit reports
detailing findings, emergent issues or trends, recommendations from the
steering committee, and pilot school districts, and other
recommendations, to enhance implementation and continuous improvement
of the revised evaluation systems to appropriate committees of the
legislature and the governor beginning July 1, 2013, and each July 1st
thereafter for each year of the school district implementation
transition period concluding with a report on December 1, 2016.
(8)(a) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year, evaluation results
for certificated classroom teachers and principals must be used as one
of multiple factors in making human resource and personnel decisions.
Human resource decisions include, but are not limited to: Staff
assignment, including the consideration of an agreement to an
assignment by an appropriate teacher, principal, and superintendent;
and reduction in force. Nothing in this section limits the ability to
collectively bargain how the multiple factors shall be used in making
human resource or personnel decisions, with the exception that
evaluation results must be a factor.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
report to the legislature and the governor regarding the school
district implementation of the provisions of (a) of this subsection by
December 1, 2017.
(9) Each certificated classroom teacher and certificated support
personnel shall have the opportunity for confidential conferences with
his or her immediate supervisor on no less than two occasions in each
school year. Such confidential conference shall have as its sole
purpose the aiding of the administrator in his or her assessment of the
employee's professional performance.
(10) The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise or cause
the evaluation or supervision of certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel or administrators in accordance with
this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it is his or her
specific assigned or delegated responsibility to do so, shall be
sufficient cause for the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's contract
under RCW 28A.405.210, or the discharge of such evaluator under RCW
28A.405.300.
(11) After a certificated classroom teacher or certificated support
personnel has four years of satisfactory evaluations under subsection
(1) of this section, a school district may use a short form of
evaluation, a locally bargained evaluation emphasizing professional
growth, an evaluation under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or
any combination thereof. The short form of evaluation shall include
either a thirty minute observation during the school year with a
written summary or a final annual written evaluation based on the
criteria in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and based on at least
two observation periods during the school year totaling at least sixty
minutes without a written summary of such observations being prepared.
A locally bargained short-form evaluation emphasizing professional
growth must provide that the professional growth activity conducted by
the certificated classroom teacher be specifically linked to one or
more of the certificated classroom teacher evaluation criteria.
However, the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of
this section shall be followed at least once every three years unless
this time is extended by a local school district under the bargaining
process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW. The employee or evaluator may
require that the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1) or (2)
of this section be conducted in any given school year. No evaluation
other than the evaluation authorized under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section may be used as a basis for determining that an employee's
work is not satisfactory under subsection (1) or (2) of this section or
as probable cause for the nonrenewal of an employee's contract under
RCW 28A.405.210 unless an evaluation process developed under chapter
41.59 RCW determines otherwise. The provisions of this subsection
apply to certificated classroom teachers only until the teacher has
been transitioned to the revised evaluation system pursuant to the
district implementation schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of
this section.
(12) All certificated classroom teachers and principals who have
been transitioned to the revised evaluation systems pursuant to the
district implementation schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of
this section must receive annual performance evaluations as provided in
this subsection:
(a) All classroom teachers and principals shall receive a
comprehensive summative evaluation at least once every four years. A
comprehensive summative evaluation assesses all eight evaluation
criteria and all criteria contribute to the comprehensive summative
evaluation performance rating.
(b) The following categories of classroom teachers and principals
shall receive an annual comprehensive summative evaluation:
(i) Classroom teachers who are provisional employees under RCW
28A.405.220;
(ii) Principals in the first three consecutive school years of
employment as a principal;
(iii) Principals previously employed as a principal by another
school district in the state of Washington for three or more
consecutive school years and in the first full year as a principal in
the school district; and
(iv) Any classroom teacher or principal who received a
comprehensive summative evaluation performance rating of level 1 or
level 2 in the previous school year.
(c)(i) In the years when a comprehensive summative evaluation is
not required, classroom teachers and principals who received a
comprehensive summative evaluation performance rating of level 3 or
above in the previous school year are required to complete a focused
evaluation. A focused evaluation includes an assessment of one of the
eight criteria selected for a performance rating plus professional
growth activities specifically linked to the selected criteria.
(ii) The selected criteria must be approved by the teacher's or
principal's evaluator and may have been identified in a previous
comprehensive summative evaluation as benefiting from additional
attention. A group of teachers may focus on the same evaluation
criteria and share professional growth activities. A group of
principals may focus on the same evaluation criteria and share
professional growth activities.
(iii) The evaluator must assign a comprehensive summative
evaluation performance rating for the focused evaluation using the
methodology adopted by the superintendent of public instruction for the
instructional or leadership framework being used.
(iv) A teacher or principal may be transferred from a focused
evaluation to a comprehensive summative evaluation at the request of
the teacher or principal, or at the direction of the teacher's or
principal's evaluator.
(v) Due to the importance of instructional leadership and assuring
rater agreement among evaluators, particularly those evaluating teacher
performance, school districts are encouraged to conduct comprehensive
summative evaluations of principal performance on an annual basis.
(vi) A classroom teacher or principal may apply the focused
evaluation professional growth activities toward the professional
growth plan for professional certificate renewal as required by the
professional educator standards board.
(13) Each school district is encouraged to acknowledge and
recognize classroom teachers and principals who have attained level 4 -distinguished performance ratings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2015, from the general fund to The Evergreen State
College for the Washington institute for public policy to conduct an
analysis on the K-12 student growth measurements as assessed by the
state's smarter balanced assessment.

--- END ---