BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known and cited as the
kids first act.
The legislature finds that over the last thirty years education has
been a declining priority of the state budget. From 1981-1983 to 2011-2013, the growth rate in noneducation spending has been double that of
education. This trend has diverted billions of dollars away from
education and into nonparamount, nonconstitutionally mandated areas of
the budget, resulting in significant real-life consequences including:
(1) A state supreme court decision that the state has failed to
provide ample funding for basic education in violation of the state
Constitution;
(2) Tuition rates at public universities and colleges that on
average have doubled over the last decade and are among the highest in
the nation, ranking in the top fifteen for community colleges and four-year institutions of higher education; and
(3) An educational pipeline that results in fewer than one in five
high school ninth graders graduating from college, a rate that places
Washington in the bottom half of the country.
To reverse this thirty-year trend and the consequences arising
therefrom, this kids first act prioritizes education by requiring that
two-thirds of the growth in state revenues in each fiscal biennium over
the next decade be expended on education, including early learning,
basic education, and higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2025, to the extent
that biennial revenues to the state general fund and related funds
exceed state general fund and related fund revenues for the prior
fiscal biennium, the revenue may be expended by the legislature only if
at least two-thirds of the expenditures are for education programs and
the other net state appropriations for education programs are not
reduced below the appropriation level in the prior biennium.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Biennial revenues to the state general fund and related funds"
includes the unrestricted ending fund balance from the prior fiscal
biennium and includes the transfer or diversion of revenue or money to
or from another fund or account but excludes transfers to the budget
stabilization account under Article VII, section 12 of the state
Constitution.
(b) "Related funds" means the Washington opportunity pathways
account and the education legacy trust account.
(c) "Appropriations for education programs" are:
(i) State allocations to school districts, charter schools, and
educational service districts;
(ii) Appropriations to the state's institutions of higher education
and appropriations to state student financial aid programs; and
(iii) Appropriations for the early learning program under RCW
43.215.455 and 43.215.456.
(3) The calculations necessary to determine compliance with this
section shall be performed by the economic and revenue forecast
council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---