BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
Payroll Services
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that the supreme
court's decision in William Rogers v. Tacoma, while clarifying the
taxation of temporary staffing agencies, resulted in differing
interpretations of regulatory requirements in order to qualify for a
pass-through exclusion from Washington B&O taxes for payroll
reimbursements made within an affiliated group.
(2) The legislature passed Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6143 during the 2010 legislative session that directed the
department of revenue to conduct a review and provide a report on the
state's tax policies with respect to the taxation of intercompany
transactions. The report affirms that centralized payroll reporting
systems can result in an additional layer of tax for Washington
businesses. Exclusions for payroll reimbursements allow businesses to
have efficient administrative costs without incurring an additional tax
obligation resulting exclusively from streamlining payroll processes.
Further, this treatment of allowing for an exclusion of payroll cost
reimbursements within a centralized payroll system is consistent with
historical tax practices of the department of revenue prior to the
William Rogers decision.
(3) The department of revenue continues to work with taxpayers to
study taxation of transactions within and between affiliated business
organizations in order to determine the appropriate policies and to
identify areas where statutory and regulatory changes may be necessary.
(4) The legislature finds that the tax policy of allowing
exclusions for payroll cost reimbursements within a centralized payroll
reporting system is appropriate and should be affirmed. The
legislature adopts the historical tax policy of allowing exclusions for
payroll cost reimbursements within a centralized payroll reporting
system of an affiliated group and requires the implementation of such
tax policy from the effective date of this section. In affirming this
tax policy, the legislature also intends to monitor these transactions
to ensure they are being used appropriately and not for tax avoidance
purposes and to monitor the potential impact on state revenue
collections. The legislature does not intend for part I of this act to
retroactively create a right of refund for taxes paid on payroll cost
reimbursements prior to the enactment of this statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax,
amounts that a qualified employer of record engaged in providing
paymaster services receives from an affiliated business to cover
employee costs of a qualified employee. However, no exclusion is
allowed under this section for any employee costs incurred in
connection with a contractual obligation of the taxpayer to provide
services, including staffing services as defined in RCW 82.04.540.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Affiliated" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.32.655(7).
(b) "Employee costs" are the actual cost of wages and salaries,
benefits, workers' compensation, payroll taxes, withholding, or other
assessments paid to or on behalf of an employee.
(c) "Functional employment relationship" means having control over
the work schedule and activities of the employees and control over all
employment decisions such as salary, discipline, hiring, or layoffs.
(d) "Paymaster services" means providing payroll and related human
resource services.
(e) "Qualified employee" means an employee with whom the affiliated
business has a functional employment relationship. Neither the
employer of record, nor any other affiliate, may have a functional
employment relationship with the employee.
(f) "Qualified employer of record" is a person who:
(i) Has no functional employment relationship with a qualified
employee; and
(ii) Has no contractual liability with a qualified employee for the
employee costs. A qualified employer of record may have statutory or
common law liability to the qualified employees or to third parties for
employee costs.
(3) Section 1701(1) of this act does not apply to the deduction
authorized in this section.

PART II
Dairy Products
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The intent of part II of this act is to
incentivize the creation of additional jobs in Washington in the dairy
industry and related industries that manufacture dairy-based products.
More specifically, it is the intent of part II of this act to encourage
infant formula producers to locate new facilities in Washington or
expand existing facilities in Washington through an extension of a
preferential business and occupation tax rate for dairy producers. It
is the further intent of the legislature to provide this tax incentive
in a fiscally responsible manner where the actual revenue impact of the
legislation substantially conforms with the fiscal estimate provided in
the legislation's fiscal note.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.04.260 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 602 and 2012 2nd
sp.s. c 6 s 204 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products ((that as of
September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131,
133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy
products such as whey and casein; or selling the same)); or selling
dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who
either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of
state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or
component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons
the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21
C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from
the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.365 percent through June 30, 2013,
and beginning July 1, 2013, multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.04.260 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 204 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products ((that as of
September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131,
133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy
products such as whey and casein; or selling the same)); or selling
dairy products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who
either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of
state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or
component in the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons
the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21
C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from
the manufacturing of the dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.04.4268 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 202 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((This chapter does not apply to)) In computing tax there may
be deducted from the measure of tax, the value of products or the gross
proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing dairy products; or
(b) Selling ((manufactured dairy products to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state)) dairy products manufactured by the seller to purchasers who
either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of
this state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient
or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product. A person taking
an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve
records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the
goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of
business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.
(2) "Dairy products" ((means dairy products that as of September
20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and
135, including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products
such as whey and casein)) has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.260.
(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

PART III
Honey Beekeepers
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) The legislature finds that in 2008 the
legislature passed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6468, which
provided temporary tax relief for honey beekeepers. The legislature
further finds that the 2008 legislation included the following intent
language: "The legislature finds that recent occurrences of colony
collapse disorder and the resulting loss of bee hives will have an
economic impact on the state's agricultural sector. The legislature
intends to provide temporary business and occupation tax relief for
Washington's apiarists." The legislature further finds that in 2013,
colony collapse disorder is still a significant problem for the apiary
industry.
(2) Because of the continuing problems associated with colony
collapse disorder, it is the legislature's intent to extend the tax
relief provided in the 2008 legislation, subject to a rigorous and
periodic review of the health of honey bee colonies in Washington to
determine whether colony collapse disorder is still a significant
problem in the apiary industry. It is the legislature's intent that
the tax relief provided in part III of this act will not be extended
when data indicates that honey bee colony survivorship has improved, as
provided in the colony collapse disorder progress report, published
annually by the United States department of agriculture, and data
provided by the Washington state department of agriculture to the joint
legislative audit and review committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of feed
to an eligible apiarist for use in the raising of a bee colony used to
make honey bee products.
(2) This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(3) The definitions in RCW 82.04.629 apply to this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of feed to an eligible apiarist for use in the raising of a bee
colony used to make honey bee products.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.629 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 43.136
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As part of the joint legislative audit and review committee's
tax preference review under this chapter for the tax preferences
contained within part III of this act, the joint legislative audit and
review committee must also evaluate whether Washington state taxes are
a disproportionately large percentage of a commercial beekeeper's
operational or capital costs, including an analysis of the impact of
Washington state taxes on similar sized businesses.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 (1) The department of agriculture must
convene a honey bee work group to address challenges facing the honey
bee industry and to develop a report outlining solutions that bolster
the use of Washington honey bee colonies used to pollinate tree fruits,
berries, and seeds. The work group must include the following members:
Two members from the Washington state beekeepers association; one
apiarist as defined in RCW 15.60.005 with no less than one thousand
hives; one apiarist as defined in RCW 15.60.005 with no more than
twenty-five hives; one member from the Washington State University
apiary lab; one member from the Washington state department of
agriculture; one member from the tree fruit industry; and one member
from the seed industry.
(2) The work group may include or seek input from other agencies,
organizations, or stakeholders. By December 31, 2014, and in
compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department must submit the work
group's report to the legislature that includes the following: (a)
Proposed changes to the industry's tax structure to increase
competitiveness with out-of-state beekeepers for pollination contracts;
(b) providing analytics and metrics to measure the value of the
proposed tax structure changes; (c) proposed additional resources
needed to continue applied and basic research to support commercial
beekeepers in the state and to recover colony losses; (d) identifying
colony levels needed to meet the pollination demands of the Washington
agricultural industry; (e) identifying other policy changes that would
increase the competitiveness of Washington beekeepers; (f) other
industry needs that would increase the market share of pollination
contracts awarded to Washington beekeepers; and (g) metrics needed to
provide accountability for state resources invested in the honey bee
industry.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.04.629 and 2008 c 314 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts derived from the
wholesale sale of honey bee products by an eligible apiarist who owns
or keeps bee colonies and who does not qualify for an exemption under
RCW 82.04.330 in respect to such sales.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to any person selling such products at retail or to any
person selling manufactured substances or articles.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply ((to)) throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Bee colony" means a natural group of honey bees containing
seven thousand or more workers and one or more queens, housed in a man-made hive with movable frames, and operated as a beekeeping unit.
(b) "Eligible apiarist" means a person who owns or keeps one or
more bee colonies and who grows, raises, or produces honey bee products
for sale at wholesale and is registered under RCW 15.60.021.
(c) "Honey bee products" means queen honey bees, packaged honey
bees, honey, pollen, bees wax, propolis, or other substances obtained
from honey bees. "Honey bee products" does not include manufactured
substances or articles.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2017.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.04.630 and 2008 c 314 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by an eligible
apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.04.629, for providing bee pollination
services to a farmer using a bee colony owned or kept by the person
providing the pollination services.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.08.0204 and 2008 c 314 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
honey bees to an eligible apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.04.629. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2017.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.12.0204 and 2008 c 314 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of honey bees by an eligible apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.04.629.
This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with
an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 2008 c 314 s 7 (uncodified) is repealed.

PART IV
Clay Targets
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 The legislature intends for the tax
preferences in sections 402 and 403 of this act to be temporary in
order for the legislature to assess the actual fiscal impact of the tax
preferences to ensure that they reasonably conform with the fiscal
estimate provided in the legislation's fiscal note. It is not the
legislature's intent to establish a broad policy of providing sales and
use tax exemptions for business consumables used by businesses in the
provision of services to customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of clay
targets purchased by a nonprofit gun club for use in providing the
activity of clay target shooting for a fee.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files. For sellers who electronically file their taxes,
the department must provide a separate tax reporting line for exemption
amounts claimed under this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by a nonprofit gun club of clay targets that are provided while
conducting the activity of clay target shooting for a fee.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2017.

PART V
Products that Impart Flavor to Food
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The intent of part V of this act is to
provide tax relief to restaurants for business inputs that cannot be
reused and are consumed for a specific purpose during the cooking
process. More specifically, it is the intent of part V of this act to
provide a sales and use tax exemption for specific items used in the
cooking process that impart flavor and therefore are similar to an
ingredient added to a final product that is sold to the consumer. It
is also the intent of the legislature to provide this tax preference in
a fiscally responsible manner where the actual revenue impact of the
legislation substantially conforms with the fiscal estimate provided in
the legislation's fiscal note. Therefore, the legislature intends for
this tax preference to be temporary so the legislature can assess the
actual fiscal impact of the tax preference and whether the tangible
personal property subject to the exemption is being used in a manner
consistent with an ingredient or component that becomes part of a
product sold to a final consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to restaurants of
products that impart flavor to food during the cooking process and
that:
(a) Are completely or substantially consumed by combustion during
the cooking process, such as wood chips, charcoal, charcoal briquettes,
and grape vines; or
(b) Support the food during the cooking process and are comprised
entirely of wood, such as cedar grilling planks.
(2) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to any
type of gas fuel.
(3) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption
certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption
certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed
under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. For sellers who
electronically file their taxes, the department must provide a separate
tax reporting line for exemption amounts claimed under this section.
(4) For purposes of this subsection, "restaurant" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.9995.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply to restaurants with respect to
the use of products that impart flavor to food during the cooking
process and that:
(a) Are completely or substantially consumed by combustion during
the cooking process, such as wood chips, charcoal, charcoal briquettes,
and grape vines; or
(b) Support the food during the cooking process and are comprised
entirely of wood, such as cedar grilling planks.
(2) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to any
type of gas fuel.
(3) For purposes of this subsection, "restaurant" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.9995.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2017.

PART VI
Cooperative Finance Organizations
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 (1) The intent of part VI of this act is
to provide tax relief for customers of rural electric cooperatives by
providing a business and occupation tax deduction for interest income
on loans made by certain finance organizations to rural electric
cooperatives. It is the further intent of the legislature to provide
this tax deduction in a fiscally responsible manner where the actual
revenue impact of the legislation substantially conforms with the
fiscal estimate provided in the legislation's fiscal note.
(2) To measure the effectiveness of this tax preference in meeting
its policy objectives, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall specifically evaluate customer rates charged by rural electric
cooperatives that are repaying debt to the national rural utilities
cooperative finance organization, or any similar financing
organization, and the impact the business and occupation deduction
provided under part VI of this act has had on those rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax,
amounts received by a cooperative finance organization where the
amounts are derived from loans to rural electric cooperatives or other
nonprofit or governmental providers of utility services organized under
the laws of this state.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Cooperative finance organization" means a nonprofit
organization with the primary purpose of providing, securing, or
otherwise arranging financing for rural electric cooperatives.
(b) "Rural electric cooperative" means a nonprofit, customer-owned
organization that provides utility services to rural areas.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Section 602 of this act applies to amounts
received on or after October 1, 2013.

PART VII
Investment Data for Investment Firms
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 (1) The legislature finds that in 2007,
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981 was enacted into law, which
provided a sales tax exemption for electronically delivered standard
financial information if the sales were to an investment management
company or financial institution. The legislature further finds that
in 2009 and 2010, Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2075 and
Substitute House Bill No. 2620 were passed, to address the taxation of
electronically delivered products. The legislature further finds that
this legislation imposed sales and use tax on most digital services,
goods, and prewritten software, but provided a broad business exemption
for digital goods. The legislature further finds that the sales tax
exemption for standard financial information from the 2007 legislation
was eliminated because it was believed that the broader business
exemption in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2075 covered these
transactions. The legislature further finds that the method of
transmission of data by data providers to investment management
companies has evolved over time where data providers add search tools
to their web-based data, which makes it subject to sales tax.
(2) The legislature's intent under part VII of this act is to
conform with a previously determined policy objective of exempting
certain standard financial information purchased by international
investment management companies from sales and use tax on the
understanding that the fiscal impact is minimal. Therefore, it is the
legislature's further intent to reevaluate the exemption in three years
to ensure that actual fiscal impact on state revenues reasonably
conforms with the fiscal estimate in the fiscal note for this
legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
standard financial information to qualifying international investment
management companies. The exemption provided in this section applies
regardless of whether the standard financial information is provided to
the buyer in a tangible format or on a tangible storage medium or as a
digital product transferred electronically.
(2) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption
certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption
certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed
under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. For sellers who
electronically file their taxes, the department must provide a separate
tax reporting line for exemption amounts claimed under this section.
(3) A buyer may not continue to claim the exemption under this
section once the buyer has purchased standard financial information
during the current calendar year with an aggregate total selling price
in excess of fifteen million dollars and an exemption has been claimed
under this section or section 703 of this act for such standard
financial information. The fifteen million dollar limitation under
this subsection does not apply to any other exemption under this
chapter that applies to standard financial information. Sellers are
not responsible for ensuring a buyer's compliance with the fifteen
million dollar limitation under this subsection. Sellers may not be
assessed for uncollected sales tax on a sale to a buyer claiming an
exemption under this section after having exceeded the fifteen million
dollar limitation under this subsection, except as provided in RCW
82.08.050 (4) and (5).
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Qualifying international investment management company"
means a person:
(A) Who is primarily engaged in the business of providing
investment management services; and
(B) Who has gross income that is at least ten percent derived from
providing investment management services to:
(I) Persons or collective investment funds residing outside the
United States; or
(II) Collective investment funds with at least ten percent of their
investments located outside the United States.
(ii) The definitions in RCW 82.04.293 apply to this subsection
(4)(a).
(b)(i) "Standard financial information" means financial data,
facts, or information, or financial information services, not
generated, compiled, or developed only for a single customer. Standard
financial information includes, but is not limited to, financial market
data, bond ratings, credit ratings, and deposit, loan, or mortgage
reports.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "financial market
data" means market pricing information, such as for securities,
commodities, and derivatives; corporate actions for publicly and
privately traded companies, such as dividend schedules and
reorganizations; corporate attributes, such as domicile, currencies
used, and exchanges where shares are traded; and currency information.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of
standard financial information by qualifying international investment
management companies. The exemption provided in this section applies
regardless of whether the standard financial information is in a
tangible format or resides on a tangible storage medium or is a digital
product transferred electronically to the qualifying international
investment management company.
(2) The definitions, conditions, and requirements in section 702 of
this act apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2021.

PART VIII
Dancing
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 It is the intent of part VIII of this act
to provide a sales tax exemption for cover charges to patrons at
establishments that provide the opportunity to dance. The intent is to
provide tax relief to businesses who have been reporting the income for
cover charges under the service and other classification, but not
intending to avoid their tax obligation of collecting retail sales tax
because of department and taxpayer confusion regarding the appropriate
tax treatment of this income. To ensure proper tax reporting in the
future by businesses who provide the opportunity to dance, the
legislature intends to review the tax preference and its actual fiscal
impact on state revenues to determine if the fiscal impact to state
revenues reasonably conforms with the fiscal estimate in the fiscal
note for this legislation.

Sec. 802 RCW 82.04.050 and 2011 c 174 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who:
(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065; or
(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1)
(a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere
leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is
presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging
for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a)(i) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited
to golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day
trips for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers.
(ii) Until July 1, 2017, amusement and recreation services do not
include the opportunity to dance provided by an establishment in
exchange for a cover charge.
(iii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(a):
(A) "Cover charge" means a charge, regardless of its label, to
enter an establishment or added to the purchaser's bill by an
establishment or otherwise collected after entrance to the
establishment, and the purchaser is provided the opportunity to dance
in exchange for payment of the charge.
(B) "Opportunity to dance" means that an establishment provides a
designated physical space, on either a temporary or permanent basis,
where customers are allowed to dance and the establishment either
advertises or otherwise makes customers aware that it has an area for
dancing;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers.
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6)
includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to
perform data processing.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing"
means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the
required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to
usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image
processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing,
claim processing, and similar activities.
(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or
the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or
improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.
(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service
described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a
"sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

PART IX
Solar Extension
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 (1) The legislature finds that to attract
and maintain clean energy technology manufacturing businesses, a
competitive business climate is crucial. The legislature further finds
that specific tax preferences can facilitate a positive business
climate in Washington. The legislature further finds that businesses
in the solar silicon industry have had to reduce employment due to
global conditions. Therefore, the legislature intends to extend a
preferential business and occupation tax rate to manufacturers and
wholesalers of specific solar energy material and parts to maintain and
grow jobs in the solar silicon industry.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee, as part of
its tax preference review process, must assess the actual fiscal impact
of this tax preference in relation to the fiscal estimate for the tax
preference and assess changes in employment for firms claiming the
preferential tax rate.

Sec. 902 RCW 82.04.294 and 2011 c 179 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules or
stirling converters, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at wholesale of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules or stirling converters, or of solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules or
stirling converters, or of the solar grade silicon to be used
exclusively in components of such systems, multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(3) Silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar
devices, solar grade silicon, or compound semiconductor solar wafers
are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.9651 and
82.12.9651.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell manufactured
from a silicon solar wafer.
(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(h) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity
by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.
(i) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating substrate on
which various semiconducting materials are deposited to produce a
photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(5) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual ((report)) survey with the department under
RCW ((82.32.534)) 82.32.585.
(6) This section expires June 30, ((2014)) 2017.

PART X
Hog Fuel
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 It is the intent of the legislature to
retain and grow family wage jobs in rural, economically distressed
areas; to promote healthy forests; and to utilize Washington's abundant
natural resources to promote diversified renewable energy use in the
state.

Sec. 1002 RCW 82.08.956 and 2009 c 469 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog
fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including
forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood
pellets; and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) If a taxpayer who claimed an exemption under this section
closes a facility in Washington for which employment positions were
reported under section 1004 of this act, resulting in a loss of jobs
located within the state, the department must declare the amount of the
tax exemption claimed under this section for the previous two calendar
years to be immediately due.
(4) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2024.

Sec. 1003 RCW 82.12.956 and 2009 c 469 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.956;
and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Every taxpayer claiming an exemption under RCW 82.08.956 or
82.12.956 must file with the department a complete annual survey as
required under RCW 82.32.585, except that the taxpayer must file a
separate survey for each facility owned or operated in the state of
Washington.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 A new section is added to chapter 43.136
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The intent of the tax exemption provided in RCW 82.08.956 and
82.12.956 is to promote the retention of relatively high wage jobs in
the counties where facilities who purchase and use hog fuel are
located. Specifically, in a time when there is increasing pressure to
close industrial facilities like mills and relocate this economic
activity out of state or overseas, rural areas of the state are at risk
of losing critical jobs that directly, or indirectly, support entire
communities. The legislature, in enacting the hog fuel tax exemption,
hopes to retain seventy five percent of the jobs at each facility in
the state at which the exemption is claimed, between now and June 30,
2024.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review
the performance through July 1, 2018, of the tax preferences
established in RCW 82.08.956 and 82.12.956, and prepare a report to the
legislature by October 31, 2019.
(3) The department of revenue must provide the committee with
annual survey information and any other tax data necessary to conduct
the review required in subsection (2) of this section. The employment
security department and other agencies, as requested, must cooperate
with the committee by providing information about the average wage of
employment in the county where each facility owned or operated by a
company claiming the exemption is located. The report is not limited
to, but must include, the following information:
(a) Identification of the baseline number of jobs existing as of
January 1, 2013, in facilities where the preference has been claimed,
as well as related wage and benefit information;
(b) Identification of how the number of jobs at these facilities
has changed during the duration of the credit;
(c) Analysis of how the wages provided to employees at affected
facilities compare to the average wages in the county in which the
facility is located;
(d) Analysis of how the benefits, including medical and other
health care benefits, provided to employees at affected facilities
compare to the average wages in the county in which the facility is
located; and
(e) Whether and to what extent the goal has been achieved, of
retaining seventy-five percent of employment at the facilities at which
the exemption has been claimed.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2024.

PART XI
Large Airplanes
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 (1) The legislature intends to promote
the economic development of our state's aerospace cluster and increase
the tax revenues collected by the state through promoting a competitive
marketplace for storing and modifying unfurnished, noncommercial
aircraft. The legislature finds that Washington is currently losing
these types of jobs to other states, resulting in the loss of high-wage
jobs and new tax revenue. Further, the legislature finds that the
current tax statutes are an impediment to encouraging the development
of aerospace clusters in our state. Therefore, the legislature intends
to modify our state's tax policy to encourage aerospace cluster
development within the state and increase tax revenues.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee, as part of
its tax preference review process, must estimate the net impact on
state tax revenues by comparing the decrease in state revenues
resulting from the changes made in part XI of this act to the
additional tax revenues generated from the direct, indirect, and
induced economic impacts from those changes. The committee must also,
to the extent practicable, estimate job growth in the aerospace cluster
resulting from the changes made in part XI of this act. The committee
must conduct its tax preference review of part XI of this act during
calendar year 2016 and report its findings and recommendations to the
legislature by January 1, 2017.

Sec. 1102 RCW 47.68.250 and 2003 c 375 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every aircraft ((shall)) must be registered with the department
for each calendar year in which the aircraft is operated or is based
within this state. A fee of fifteen dollars ((shall be)) is charged
for each such registration and each annual renewal thereof.
(2) Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate,
permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of
the aircraft, and payment of the excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for
the privilege of using the aircraft within this state during the year
for which the registration is sought, and payment of the registration
fee required by this section ((shall be)) are the only requisites for
registration of an aircraft under this section.
(3) The registration fee imposed by this section ((shall be)) is
payable to and collected by the secretary. The fee for any calendar
year must be paid during the month of January, and ((shall)) must be
collected by the secretary at the time of the collection by him or her
of the ((said)) excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the
requirements for registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she
((shall thereupon)) must issue to the owner of the aircraft a
certificate of registration therefor. The secretary ((shall)) must pay
to the state treasurer the registration fees collected under this
section, which registration fees ((shall)) must be credited to the
aeronautics account in the transportation fund.
(4) It ((shall)) is not ((be)) necessary for the registrant to
provide the secretary with originals or copies of federal certificates,
permits, ratings, or licenses. The secretary ((shall)) must issue
certificates of registration, or such other evidences of registration
or payment of fees as he or she may deem proper; and in connection
therewith may prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition
of such certificates or other evidences.
(5) The provisions of this section ((shall)) do not apply to:
(((1))) (a) An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the
service of any government or any political subdivision thereof,
including the government of the United States, any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, which is
not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;
(((2))) (b) An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign
country;
(((3))) (c) An aircraft ((which)) that is owned by a nonresident
((and registered in another state: PROVIDED, That if said aircraft
shall remain in and/or be based in this state for a period of ninety
days or longer it shall not be exempt under this section)) if:
(i) The aircraft remains in this state or is based in this state,
or both, for a period less than ninety days; or
(ii) The aircraft is a large private airplane as defined in section
1103 of this act and remains in this state for a period of ninety days
or longer, but only when:
(A) The airplane is in this state exclusively for the purpose of
repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, including any flight testing
related to the repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, or for the
purpose of continual storage of not less than one full calendar year;
(B) An employee of the facility providing these services is on
board the airplane during any flight testing; and
(C) Within ninety days of the date the airplane first arrived in
this state during the calendar year, the nonresident files a written
statement with the department indicating that the airplane is exempt
from registration under this subsection (5)(c)(ii). The written
statement must be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and must include such information as the department
requires. The department may require additional periodic verification
that the airplane remains exempt from registration under this
subsection (5)(c)(ii) and that written statements conform with the
provisions of RCW 9A.72.085;
(((4))) (d) An aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying
constituting an act of interstate or foreign commerce;
(((5))) (e) An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer
thereof while being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for
the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the aircraft;
(((6))) (f) An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery,
test, or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft
dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW; and
(((7))) (g) An aircraft based within the state that is in an
unairworthy condition, is not operated within the registration period,
and has obtained a written exemption issued by the secretary.
(6) The secretary ((shall)) must be notified within thirty days of
any change in ownership of a registered aircraft. The notification
((shall)) must contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX number of the aircraft,
the full name and address of the former owner, and the full name and
address of the new owner. For failure to so notify the secretary, the
registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary, subject
to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of
ten dollars by the new owner.
(7) A municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases
an airport, as defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate,
((shall)) must require from an aircraft owner proof of aircraft
registration as a condition of leasing or selling tiedown or hanger
space for an aircraft. It is the responsibility of the lessee or
purchaser to register the aircraft. The airport ((shall)) must work
with the aviation division to assist in its efforts to register
aircraft by providing information about based aircraft on an annual
basis as requested by the division.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(i) Sales of large private airplanes to nonresidents of this state;
and
(ii) Sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving large private
airplanes owned by nonresidents of this state.
(b) The exemption provided by this section applies only when the
large private airplane is not required to be registered with the
department of transportation, or its successor, under chapter 47.68
RCW. The airplane owner or lessee claiming an exemption under this
section must provide the department, upon request, a copy of the
written statement required under RCW 47.68.250(5)(c)(ii) documenting
the airplane's registration exemption and any additional information
the department may require.
(2) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption
certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption
certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed
under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. For sellers who
electronically file their taxes, the department must provide a separate
tax reporting line for exemption amounts claimed under this section.
(3) Upon request, the department of transportation must provide to
the department of revenue information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.
(4) For purposes of this section "large private airplane" means an
airplane not used in interstate commerce, not owned or leased by a
government entity, weighing more than forty-one thousand pounds, and
assigned a category A, B, C, or D test flow management system aircraft
weight class by the federal aviation administration's office of
aviation policy and plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use
of:
(i) Large private airplanes owned by nonresidents of this state;
and
(ii) Labor and services rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving large private airplanes owned by nonresidents of
this state.
(b) The exemption provided by this section applies only when the
large private airplane is not required to be registered with the
department of transportation, or its successor, under chapter 47.68
RCW. The airplane owner or lessee claiming an exemption under this
section must provide the department, upon request, a copy of the
written statement required under RCW 47.68.250(5)(c)(ii) documenting
the airplane's registration exemption and any additional information
the department may require.
(2) Upon request, the department of transportation must provide to
the department of revenue information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.
(3) For purposes of this section, the conditions, limitation, and
definitions in section 1103 of this act apply to this section.

Sec. 1105 RCW 82.48.100 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 12 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any
government or any political subdivision thereof, including the
government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or the District of Columbia, which are not engaged
in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;
(2) Aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;
(3) Aircraft ((which)) that are owned by a nonresident and
registered in another state((. However, if any such aircraft remains
in and/or is based in this state for a period of ninety days or longer
it is not exempt under this section)), if the aircraft remains in this
state or is based in this state, or both, for a period less than ninety
days;
(4)(a) Aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying ((which))
that constitutes interstate or foreign commerce, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) The exemption provided by (a) of this subsection does not apply
to aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying that constitutes
interstate or foreign commerce when such aircraft will be in this state
exclusively for the purpose of continual storage of not less than one
full calendar year; ((and))
(5) Aircraft owned by the manufacturer thereof while being operated
for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews
for purchasers of the aircraft;
(((5))) (6) Aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test,
or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft
dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW;
(((6))) (7) Aircraft owned by a nonresident of this state if the
aircraft is kept at an airport in this state and that airport is
jointly owned or operated by a municipal corporation or other
governmental entity of this state and a municipal corporation or other
governmental entity of another state, and the owner or operator of the
aircraft provides the department with proof that the owner or operator
has paid all taxes, license fees, and registration fees required by the
state in which the owner or operator resides; and
(((7))) (8) Aircraft that are: (a) Owned by a nonprofit
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code; and (b)
exclusively used to provide emergency medical transportation services.

PART XII
Blood Banks
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201 Part XII of this act is intended to allow
flexibility for nonprofit organizations where qualifying activities
will be provided by more than one organization. It is not the
legislature's intent to expand the lines of nontaxable activity.
Therefore, the legislature further intends to reassess the changes made
in part XII of this act to ensure the actual fiscal impact reasonably
conforms with the fiscal estimate provided in the fiscal note for the
legislation.

Sec. 1202 RCW 82.04.324 and 2004 c 82 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
this chapter does not apply to amounts received by a qualifying blood
bank, a qualifying tissue bank, or a qualifying blood and tissue bank
to the extent the amounts are exempt from federal income tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Qualifying blood bank" means ((a blood bank that qualifies
as)) an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing on
June 10, 2004, that is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R., part 607 as
existing on June 10, 2004, and whose primary business purpose is the
collection, preparation, ((and processing of blood)) testing or
processing of blood, on behalf of itself or other qualifying blood bank
or qualifying blood and tissue bank. "Qualifying blood bank" does not
include a comprehensive cancer center that is recognized as such by the
national cancer institute.
(b) "Qualifying tissue bank" means a tissue bank that qualifies as
an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing on June
10, 2004, is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R., part 1271 as existing on
June 10, 2004, and whose primary business purpose is the recovery,
processing, storage, labeling, packaging, or distribution of human bone
tissue, ligament tissue and similar musculoskeletal tissues, skin
tissue, heart valve tissue, or human eye tissue. "Qualifying tissue
bank" does not include a comprehensive cancer center that is recognized
as such by the national cancer institute.
(c) "Qualifying blood and tissue bank" ((is a bank that qualifies
as)) means an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) as existing
on June 10, 2004, that is registered pursuant to 21 C.F.R., part 607
and part 1271 as existing on June 10, 2004, and whose primary business
purpose is the collection, preparation, ((and processing of blood))
testing, or processing of blood, on behalf of itself or other
qualifying blood bank or qualifying blood and tissue bank, and the
recovery, processing, storage, labeling, packaging, or distribution of
human bone tissue, ligament tissue and similar musculoskeletal tissues,
skin tissue, and heart valve tissue. "Qualifying blood and tissue
bank" does not include a comprehensive cancer center that is recognized
as such by the national cancer institute.
(3) A person claiming the exemption under this section must report
amounts exempt under this section to the department. Except for
persons whose primary business purpose is the collection, preparation,
and processing of blood, a person may not claim an exemption under this
section for more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars in tax per
calendar year.

PART XIII
Mint Growers
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1301 The legislature finds that mint growers
utilize fuel to generate heat to extract oil from harvested mint and
thereby produce a saleable agricultural product. Diesel fuel is often
used as the fuel source that generates heat to distill mint. This on-farm diesel fuel is currently exempt from sales and use tax. The
legislature further finds that propane and natural gas are alternative
sources of cleaner burning fuel. A transition by mint growers to these
alternative fuel sources, though costly, provides air quality benefits
as compared to the use of diesel. It is the intent of the legislature
to provide an incentive to mint growers to make the transition to
cleaner fuels by extending the sales and use tax exemptions to propane
and natural gas used by farmers who produce mint oil.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1302 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
farmers of propane or natural gas used exclusively to distill mint on
a farm.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files. For sellers who electronically file their taxes,
the department must provide a separate line for exemption amounts
claimed under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "farmer" has the same meaning
as provided in RCW 82.04.213.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1303 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of propane or natural gas by a farmer to exclusively distill mint
on a farm.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "farmer" has the same meaning
as provided in RCW 82.04.213.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

PART XIV
Nonprofit Fund-raising Activities
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1401 It is the intent of part XIV of this act
to provide use tax relief for individuals who support charitable
activities by purchasing or winning articles of personal property from
a nonprofit organization or library when the personal property is sales
tax exempt. It is also the intent of the legislation to provide this
tax preference in a fiscally responsible manner by capping the
exemption for articles of personal property that are valued at ten
thousand dollars or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1402 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of personal property, valued at less than ten
thousand dollars, purchased or received as a prize in a contest of
chance, as defined in RCW 82.04.285, from a nonprofit organization or
a library, if the gross income the nonprofit organization or library
receives from the sale is exempt under RCW 82.04.3651.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2017.

PART XV
Renewable Energy Extension
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1501 It is the intent of the legislature to
help promote energy independence in the state of Washington and to
better position Washington to attract a vibrant clean energy technology
manufacturing sector to the state. The purpose of the tax preference
created in part XV of this act is to incentivize electricity generation
from renewable energy sources, reducing the costs of transitioning to
these sources and technologies by exempting machinery, equipment, and
labor and service charges associated with such electricity generation
from the retail sales and use tax. This tax preference makes the most
of the local renewable resources, protects us from the price volatility
of certain fossil fuel sources, and helps the state achieve its
greenhouse gas emissions targets. In addition, promoting manufacture
and installation of facilities capable of generating power from
renewable sources can create economic benefits in both rural and urban
counties, creating high-quality jobs and developing a skilled workforce
in an industry sector in which significant job growth is anticipated
over the coming decades.

Sec. 1502 RCW 82.08.962 and 2009 c 469 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 82.08.963, purchasers who have
paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass
energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic
digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust,
or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption as provided
in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, the tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of machinery and
equipment described in (a) of this subsection that are used directly in
generating electricity or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, through ((June 30, 2013)) January 1,
2020, the amount of the exemption under this subsection (1) is equal to
seventy-five percent of the state and local sales tax paid. The
purchaser is eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(c) in
the form of a remittance.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.962, the following
definitions apply:
(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) By-products of pulping and wood
manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic fuels
from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition or
construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from algae
and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids; and
(x) yard waste. "Biomass energy" does not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth
forests; or municipal solid waste.
(b) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst.
(c) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel, of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 of the federal
internal revenue code, collected from a "landfill" as defined under RCW
70.95.030.
(d)(i) "Machinery and equipment" means fixtures, devices, and
support facilities that are integral and necessary to the generation of
electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power.
(ii) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (A) Hand-powered
tools; (B) property with a useful life of less than one year; (C)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (D) replacement parts that do not increase productivity,
improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of machinery and
equipment; (E) buildings; or (F) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are
permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.
(3)(a) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by wind energy, solar energy, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas power if
it provides any part of the process that captures the energy of the
wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources,
anaerobic digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy
from exhaust, or landfill gas, converts that energy to electricity, and
stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(b) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by fuel cells if it provides any part of the process that
captures the energy of the fuel, converts that energy to electricity,
and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(4)(a) A purchaser claiming an exemption in the form of a
remittance under subsection (1)(c) of this section must pay the tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020 and all applicable local sales taxes imposed
under the authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The purchaser
may then apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. A purchaser may not apply for a
remittance under this section more frequently than once per quarter.
The purchaser must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases for which the exemption is claimed. The purchaser
must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to
determine whether the purchaser is entitled to an exemption under this
section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents
describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the purchaser, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying purchasers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(5) This section expires ((July 1, 2013)) January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1503 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
Every taxpayer claiming an exemption under RCW 82.08.962 or
82.12.962 must file with the department a complete annual survey as
required under RCW 82.32.585, except that the taxpayer must file a
separate survey for each facility owned or operated in the state of
Washington developed with machinery, equipment, services, or labor for
which the exemption under part XV of this act is claimed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1504 A new section is added to chapter 43.136
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The intent of the tax preference provided in RCW 82.08.962 and
82.12.962 is to promote electricity generation by facilities with
generating capacity of not less than one thousand watts, using
renewable energy fuel sources in order to improve energy security and
decrease greenhouse gas emissions. Encouraging the development of more
facilities that generate power from renewable energy has both immediate
and long-term value to the state.
(2) As part of the joint legislative audit and review committee's
2019 tax preference reviews conducted under this chapter, the joint
legislative audit and review committee must assess the performance of
the tax preferences established in RCW 82.08.956 and 82.12.956 with
reference to the intent and performance milestones established in this
section.
(3) The department of revenue must provide the joint legislative
audit and review committee with annual survey information and any other
tax data necessary to conduct the review required in subsection (2) of
this section. The Washington State University energy program,
department of ecology, and other agencies, as requested, must cooperate
with the committee by providing information to assist the committee's
analysis.
(4) The report is not limited to, but must include, the following
information:
(a) Identification of the baseline number of facilities, prior to
July 1, 2009, with generating capacity of not less than one thousand
watts, using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power.
(b) The number of facilities developed each year by purchasers
claiming the preference for machinery, equipment, labor, or other
services, and the increase in the number of such facilities, as
compared to the baseline established in (a) of this subsection.
(c) The total generating capacity in megawatts and total power
production in kilowatt-hours of the facilities reported in (b) of this
subsection.
(d) The estimated greenhouse gas emissions avoided as a result of
power generation from renewable energy sources by the facilities
reported in (b) of this subsection.
(e) The number of barrels of oil and tons of coal avoided as a
result of power generation from renewable energy sources by the
facilities reported in (b) of this subsection, as estimated from the
average fuel mix of electricity generated statewide.
(f) The number of employees and wages and benefits reported by
taxpayers claiming the exemption at the facilities reported in (a) of
this subsection.
(g) Subject to data availability, analysis of how the wages and
benefits reported in (e) of this subsection compare with statewide
averages and averages in the county in which the facility is located.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2020.

Sec. 1505 RCW 82.12.962 and 2009 c 469 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 82.12.963, consumers who have paid
the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass
energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic
digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust,
or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption as provided
in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of
machinery and equipment described in (a) of this subsection that are
used directly in generating electricity or to sales of or charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery
and equipment.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, through ((June 30, 2013)) January 1,
2020, the amount of the exemption under this subsection (1) is equal to
seventy-five percent of the state and local sales tax paid. The
consumer is eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(c) in
the form of a remittance.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption in the form of a remittance
under subsection (1)(c) of this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 and all applicable local use taxes imposed under the
authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The consumer may then
apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. A consumer may not apply for a remittance under
this section more frequently than once per quarter. The consumer must
specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases
or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed. The consumer must
retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to
determine whether the consumer is entitled to an exemption under this
section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents
describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the consumer, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying consumers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(3) Purchases exempt under RCW 82.08.962 are also exempt from the
tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020.
(4) The definitions in RCW 82.08.962 apply to this section.
(5) This section expires ((June 30, 2013)) January 1, 2020.

PART XVI
Small Solar Extension
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1601 It is the intent of the legislature to
help promote energy independence in the state of Washington. The
purpose of the tax preference created in part XVI of this act is to
incentivize electricity generation from solar energy, reducing the
costs of transitioning to solar energy by exempting machinery,
equipment, and labor and service charges from the retail sales and use
tax to increase affordability for Washington residents. It is also the
intent of the legislature to provide this tax preference in a fiscally
responsible manner where the actual revenue impact of the legislation
substantially conforms with the fiscal estimate provided in the
legislation's fiscal note. Therefore, the legislature intends for this
tax preference to be temporary so the legislature can assess the actual
fiscal impact of the tax preference.

Sec. 1602 RCW 82.08.963 and 2009 c 469 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity or
producing thermal heat using solar energy, or to sales of or charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such
machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
more than ten kilowatts of electricity or producing not more than three
million British thermal units per day and provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files. For sellers who electronically file their taxes, the
department must provide a separate tax reporting line for exemption
amounts claimed by a buyer under this section.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.963:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity or production and use of thermal heat using
solar energy;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
((and))
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity with solar energy if it provides any part of the process
that captures the energy of the sun, converts that energy to
electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for
entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and
distribution systems; and
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in producing thermal
heat with solar energy if it uses a solar collector or a solar hot
water system that (i) meets the certification standards for solar
collectors and solar hot water systems developed by the solar rating
and certification corporation; or (ii) is determined by the Washington
State University extension whether a solar collector or solar hot water
system is an equivalent collector or system.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2018.

Sec. 1603 RCW 82.12.963 and 2009 c 469 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating not more than ten
kilowatts of electricity or producing not more than three million
British thermal units per day using solar energy, or to the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.963 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2018.

PART XVII
Tax Preference Transparency and Accountability
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1701 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every new tax
preference expires on the first day of the calendar year that is
subsequent to the calendar year that is ten years from the effective
date of the tax preference. With respect to any new property tax
exemption, the exemption does not apply to taxes levied for collection
beginning in the calendar year that is subsequent to the calendar year
that is ten years from the effective date of the tax preference.
(b) A future amendment that expands a tax preference does not
extend the tax preference beyond the period provided in this subsection
unless an extension is expressly and unambiguously stated in the
amendment.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if legislation
creating a new tax preference includes an expiration date for the new
tax preference.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any existing
tax preference that is amended to clarify an ambiguity or correct a
technical inconsistency. Future enacted legislation intended to make
such clarifications or corrections must explicitly indicate this
intent.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "New tax preference" means a tax preference that initially
takes effect after August 1, 2013, or a tax preference in effect as of
August 1, 2013, that is expanded or extended after August 1, 2013, even
if the expanding or extending amendment includes any other change to
the tax preference.
(b) "Tax preference" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.136.021 with
respect to any state tax administered by the department, except does
not include the Washington estate and transfer tax in chapter 83.100
RCW.
(5) The department must provide written notice to the office of the
code reviser of a ten-year expiration date required under this section
for a new tax preference.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1702 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, every bill enacting a new tax
preference must include a tax preference performance statement.
(2) A tax preference performance statement must state the
legislative purpose for the new tax preference. The tax preference
performance statement must indicate one or more of the following
general categories, by reference to the applicable category specified
in this subsection, as the legislative purpose of the new tax
preference:
(a) Tax preferences intended to induce certain designated behavior
by taxpayers;
(b) Tax preferences intended to improve industry competitiveness;
(c) Tax preferences intended to create or retain jobs;
(d) Tax preferences intended to reduce structural inefficiencies in
the tax structure;
(e) Tax preferences intended to provide tax relief for certain
businesses or individuals; or
(f) A general purpose not identified in (a) through (e) of this
subsection.
(3) In addition to identifying the general legislative purpose of
the tax preference under subsection (2) of this section, the tax
preference performance statement must provide additional detailed
information regarding the legislative purpose of the new tax
preference.
(4) A new tax preference performance statement must specify clear,
relevant, and ascertainable metrics and data requirements that allow
the joint legislative audit and review committee and the legislature to
measure the effectiveness of the new tax preference in achieving the
purpose designated under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If the tax preference performance statement for a new tax
preference indicates a legislative purpose described in subsection
(2)(b) or (c) of this section, any taxpayer claiming the new tax
preference must file an annual survey in accordance with RCW 82.32.585.
(6)(a) Taxpayers claiming a new tax preference must report the
amount of the tax preference claimed by the taxpayer to the department
as otherwise required by statute or determined by the department as
part of the taxpayer's regular tax reporting responsibilities. For new
tax preferences allowing certain types of gross income of the business
to be excluded from business and occupation or public utility taxation,
the tax return must explicitly report the amount of the exclusion,
regardless of whether it is structured as an exemption or deduction, if
the taxpayer is otherwise required to report taxes to the department on
a monthly or quarterly basis. For a new sales and use tax exemption,
the total sales or uses subject to the exemption claimed by the buyer
must be reported on an addendum to the buyer's tax return if the buyer
is otherwise required to report taxes to the department on a monthly or
quarterly basis and the buyer is required to submit an exemption
certificate, or similar document, to the seller.
(b) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) Property tax exemptions;
(ii) Tax preferences required by constitutional law;
(iii) Tax preferences for which the tax benefit to the taxpayer is
less than one thousand dollars per calendar year; or
(iv) Taxpayers who are annual filers.
(c) The department may waive the filing requirements of this
subsection for taxpayers who are not required to file electronically
any return, report, or survey under this chapter.
(7)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the amount
claimed by a taxpayer for any new tax preference is subject to public
disclosure and is not considered confidential tax information under RCW
82.32.330, if the reporting periods subject to disclosure ended at
least twenty-four months prior to the date of disclosure and the
taxpayer is required to report the amount of the tax preference claimed
by the taxpayer to the department under subsection (6) of this section.
(b)(i) The department may waive the public disclosure requirement
under (a) of this subsection (7) for good cause. Good cause may be
demonstrated by a reasonable showing of economic harm to a taxpayer if
the information specified under this subsection is disclosed. The
waiver under this subsection (7)(b)(i) only applies to the new tax
preferences provided in this act.
(ii) The amount of the tax preference claimed by a taxpayer during
a calendar year is confidential under RCW 82.32.330 and may not be
disclosed under this subsection if the amount for the calendar year is
less than ten thousand dollars.
(c) In lieu of the disclosure and waiver requirements under this
subsection, the requirements under RCW 82.32.585 apply to any tax
preference that requires a survey.
(8) If a new tax preference does not include the information
required under subsections (2) through (4) of this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee is not required to perform a tax
preference review under chapter 43.136 RCW, and it is legislatively
presumed that it is the intent of the legislature to allow the new tax
preference to expire upon its scheduled expiration date.
(9) For the purposes of this section, "tax preference" and "new tax
preference" have the same meaning as provided in section 1701 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1703 A new section is added to chapter 43.136
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislative auditor, with the assistance of a task force,
must make recommendations on the appropriate data and metrics that
should be included in tax preference performance statements to evaluate
new tax preferences, as provided under section 1702 of this act.
(2)(a) The task force is comprised of five members: (i) One person
from the department of revenue; (ii) one person from an association
representing Washington businesses; (iii) one person from the office of
financial management; (iv) the legislative auditor or a designee of the
legislative auditor; and (v) an economist with substantial experience
in state taxes.
(b) The task force must choose its chair from among its membership.
(3) By January 1, 2014, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
legislative auditor must submit a report to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature the findings and recommendations of the
task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1704 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1705 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1706 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1707 A new section is added to chapter 82.14B
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1708 A new section is added to chapter 82.16
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1709 A new section is added to chapter 82.18
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1710 A new section is added to chapter 82.19
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1711 A new section is added to chapter 82.21
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1712 A new section is added to chapter 82.23A
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1713 A new section is added to chapter 82.23B
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1714 A new section is added to chapter 82.24
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1715 A new section is added to chapter 82.26
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1716 A new section is added to chapter 82.27
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1717 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1718 A new section is added to chapter 82.45
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1719 A new section is added to chapter 82.48
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1720 A new section is added to chapter 82.64
RCW to read as follows:
See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1721 A new section is added to chapter 84.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under RCW 84.52.065.
(2) See section 1702 of this act for reporting requirements for any
new tax preference for the tax imposed under RCW 84.52.065.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1722 A new section is added to chapter 54.28
RCW to read as follows:
(1) See section 1701 of this act for the expiration date of new tax
preferences for the tax imposed under this chapter.
(2) See section 1702 of this act for reporting requirements for any
new tax preference for the tax imposed under this chapter.

PART XVIII
Recommendations to Update and Improve Annual Surveys and Reports
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1801 By December 1, 2013, the department of
revenue, in consultation with the joint legislative audit and review
committee, must make recommendations to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on ways to update and improve the annual
report and annual survey. The recommendations must include suggested
revisions to the report and survey that would make the data more
relevant and reduce the administrative burden on the taxpayer.

PART XIX
Miscellaneous Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1901 Section 202 of this act expires July 1,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1902 Section 203 of this act takes effect July
1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1903 Parts III, X, XV, and XVI of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1904 Except as otherwise provided in this act,
this act takes effect October 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1905 Part XI of this act takes effect January
1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1906 Part XI of this act expires July 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1907 2013 2nd sp. sess. c . . . s 1202
(section 1202 of this act), as now existing, is repealed, effective
July 1, 2016.

--- END ---