BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.12.283 and 2010 c 8 s 10006 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department of transportation determines that any
real property owned by the state of Washington and under the
jurisdiction of the department is no longer required for highway
purposes and that it is in the public interest to do so, the department
may, in its discretion, sell the property under RCW 47.12.063 or under
subsections (2) through (6) of this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines to sell real property under
its jurisdiction at public auction, the department shall first give
notice thereof by ((publication on the same day of the week for two
consecutive weeks, with the first publication at least two weeks prior
to the date of the auction, in a legal newspaper of general circulation
in the area where the property to be sold is located. The notice shall
be placed in both the legal notices section and the real estate
classified section of the newspaper)) the most appropriate method as
determined by the department. The notice shall contain a description
of the property, the time and place of the auction, and the terms of
the sale. The sale may be for cash or by real estate contract.
(3) The department shall sell the property at the public auction,
in accordance with the terms set forth in the notice, to the highest
and best bidder providing the bid is equal to or higher than the
appraised fair market value of the property.
(4) If no bids are received at the auction or if all bids are
rejected, the department may, in its discretion, enter into
negotiations for the sale of the property or may list the property with
a licensed real estate broker. No property shall be sold by
negotiations or through a broker for less than the property's appraised
fair market value. Any offer to purchase real property pursuant to
this subsection shall be in writing and may be rejected at any time
prior to written acceptance by the department.
(5) ((Before the department shall approve any offer for the
purchase of real property having an appraised value of more than ten
thousand dollars, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the
department shall first publish a notice of the proposed sale in a local
newspaper of general circulation in the area where the property is
located. The notice shall include a description of the property, the
selling price, the terms of the sale, including the price and interest
rate if sold by real estate contract, and the name and address of the
department employee or the real estate broker handling the transaction.
The notice shall further state that any person may, within ten days
after the publication of the notice, deliver to the designated state
employee or real estate broker a written offer to purchase the property
for not less than ten percent more than the negotiated sale price,
subject to the same terms and conditions. A subsequent offer shall not
be considered unless it is accompanied by a deposit of twenty percent
of the offer in the form of cash, money order, cashiers check, or
certified check payable to the Washington state treasurer, to be
forfeited to the state (for deposit in the motor vehicle fund) if the
offeror fails to complete the sale if the offeror's offer is accepted.
If a subsequent offer is received, the first offeror shall be informed
by registered or certified mail sent to the address stated in his or
her offer. The first offeror shall then have ten days, from the date
of mailing the notice of the increased offer, in which to file with the
designated state employee or real estate broker a higher offer than
that of the subsequent offeror. After the expiration of the ten-day
period, the department shall approve in writing the highest and best
offer which the department then has on file.
(6))) All moneys received pursuant to this section, less any real
estate broker's commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 or revenues
deposited into the transportation facilities account created in section
3 of this act, ((shall)) must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.400 and 2007 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Disposition" means sales, exchanges, or other actions
resulting in a transfer of land ownership.
(b) "State agencies" includes:
(i) The department of natural resources established in chapter
43.30 RCW;
(ii) The department of fish and wildlife established in chapter
43.300 RCW;
(iii) The department of transportation established in chapter 47.01
RCW;
(iv) The parks and recreation commission established in chapter
79A.05 RCW; and
(v) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services established in this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, state
agencies proposing disposition of state-owned land must provide written
notice of the proposed disposition to the legislative authorities of
the counties, cities, and towns in which the land is located at least
sixty days before entering into the disposition agreement.
(3) The department of transportation, when proposing the
disposition of state-owned land, must provide written notice of the
proposed disposition to the legislative authorities of the counties,
cities, and towns in which the land is located at least thirty days
before entering into the disposition agreement.
(4) The requirements of this section are in addition and
supplemental to other requirements of the laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The transportation facilities account is created in the motor
vehicle fund. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, all revenues received by the department from the sale
of the following surplus property previously managed by the facilities
division within the department must be deposited into the account: (a)
Safety rest areas, (b) pit sites, (c) capital improvements, (d) waste
sites, (e) quarry sites, and (f) maintenance facility sites. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Revenues and
interest from the account may be used only for surplus property
expenditures and the repair and replacement of department facilities.
(2) Proceeds from the sale of surplus property previously managed
by the facilities division must first be used to reimburse the office
of real estate services within the department for costs related to the
sale. Proceeds used for cost recovery purposes under this subsection
may be withheld from being deposited into the account.
(3) Proceeds from the sale of surplus property may be withheld from
being deposited into the account if they will be used to fund an active
highway project in the immediate area of where the surplus property is
located.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.12.063 and 2011 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell the property ((or
exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or
for construction of improvements)) at fair market value to any person
through the solicitation of written bids through public advertising in
the manner prescribed under RCW 47.28.050 or in the manner prescribed
under RCW 47.12.283.
(3) The department may forego the processes prescribed by RCW
47.28.050 and 47.12.283 and sell the real property to any of the
following entities or persons at fair market value:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) To any other owner of real property required for transportation
purposes;
(i) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW; or
(j) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(4) When selling real property pursuant to RCW 47.12.283, the
department may withhold or withdraw the property from an auction when
requested by one of the entities or persons listed in subsection (3) of
this section and only after the receipt of a nonrefundable deposit
equal to ten percent of the fair market value of the real property or
five thousand dollars, whichever is less. This subsection does not
prohibit the department from exercising its discretion to withhold or
withdraw the real property from an auction if the department determines
that the property is no longer surplus or chooses to sell the property
through one of the other means listed in subsection (2) of this
section. If a transaction under this subsection is not completed
within sixty days, the real property must be put back up for sale.
(5) Sales to purchasers may, at the department's option, be for
cash((,)) or by real estate contract((, or exchange of land or
improvements. Transactions involving the construction of improvements
must be conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW and Title 39 RCW, as
applicable, and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules)).
The department may not enter into equal value land exchange
transactions.
(6) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by deed
executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(7) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant to
((the provisions of)) this section, less any real estate broker
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 ((shall)) or revenues
deposited into the transportation facilities account created in section
3 of this act, must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 24 and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the
budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of licensing services account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities
community trust account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water
assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility
investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high
capacity transportation account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the
highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account,
the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine
resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the
oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account,
the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance
account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the real estate appraiser commission account,
the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program
account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust
account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility
safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account,
the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife
account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation facilities account, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration
account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western
Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated
plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation
revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation
taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state
university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 25 and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 16 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the
budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the Columbia river
crossing project account, the common school construction fund, the
county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice
assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account,
the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations account, the
education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the
election account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act
account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State
College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account,
the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the public health services account, the high capacity
transportation account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety
fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital
safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources
stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the mobile home
park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse
roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational
vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the
resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the
rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund,
the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special
category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the
state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number
520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond
retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation facilities
account, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund,
the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
economic development commission account, the Washington state health
insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account,
the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the
Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima
integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan
implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan
implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state
reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act expires on the date
the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are
met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act takes effect on the
date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012
are met.

--- END ---