BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.012 and 2012 c 117 s 265 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a board, known as the "Washington state liquor
((control)) and cannabis board," consisting of three members, to be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, who shall
each be paid an annual salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. The governor may, in his or her
discretion, appoint one of the members as chair of the board, and a
majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the board.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.101 and 2013 c 276 s 2 and 2013 c 116 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated where used in this chapter:
(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the
practitioner's authorized agent); or
(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the
presence of the practitioner.
(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at
the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does
not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or
employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.
(c) (("Board")) "Commission" means the ((state board of)) pharmacy
quality assurance commission.
(d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or
state laws, or federal or ((board)) commission rules.
(e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:
(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of
a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or
(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual
represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially
similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule
I or II.
(2) The term does not include:
(i) a controlled substance;
(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect
for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the
federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent
conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or
(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption
before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.
(f) "Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(g) "Department" means the department of health.
(h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order,
the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.
(k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in
the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any
supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food)
intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use
as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components,
parts, or accessories.
(m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its
successor agency.
(n) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug
of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a
prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone
nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.
(o) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:
(1) that the ((state board of)) pharmacy quality assurance
commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the
principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the
manufacture of a controlled substance;
(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be
used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and
(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
the manufacture of the controlled substance.
(p) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (y)(5) of
this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the
term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42),
and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW
69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any
positional or geometric isomer.
(q) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product
identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is
uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the
labeling.
(r) "Lot number" shall identify the licensee by business or trade
name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the
date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.
(s) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance,
either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of
natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by
a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any
packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of
its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding,
packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled
substance:
(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's
administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of
the practitioner's professional practice; or
(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent
under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(t) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than
0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or
resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber
produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant,
any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted
therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.
(u) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state
liquor ((control)) and cannabis board to process marijuana into
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana,
and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.
(v) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the state
liquor ((control)) and cannabis board to produce and sell marijuana at
wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.
(w) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that meet all of
the following criteria: (i) Contain marijuana ((or marijuana extracts
and)); (ii) are less than fifty percent marijuana; (iii) have a THC
concentration greater than 0.3 percent and no greater than twenty
percent; and (iv) are intended for human use. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include useable marijuana or marijuana
concentrates.
(x) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the state
liquor ((control)) and cannabis board to sell marijuana concentrates,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.
(y) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable
origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a
combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium
derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers,
whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not
include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate,
including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves
from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their
salts have been removed.
(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.
(6) Cocaine base.
(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer
thereof.
(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity
of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).
(z) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of
conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium
(opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include,
unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the
dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts
(dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory
forms of dextromethorphan.
(aa) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver
somniferum L., except its seeds.
(bb) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(cc) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium
poppy, after mowing.
(dd) "Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter
18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any
limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010
subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter
18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW;
a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under
chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW
who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW
18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific
investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise
permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a
controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or
research in this state.
(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered,
or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state.
(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and
surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed
physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant
specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her
state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or
her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner
licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed
to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.
(ee) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued
by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his
or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.
(ff) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.
(gg) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the state liquor
((control)) and cannabis board for the retail sale of marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.
(hh) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(ii) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state
of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the
jurisdiction of the United States.
(jj) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant
Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined
percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid
in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.
(kk) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a
controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a
member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal
owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.
(ll) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term
"useable marijuana" does not include marijuana-infused products or
marijuana concentrates.
(mm) "Authorization card" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.51A.010.
(nn) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.51A.010.
(oo) "Health care professional" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.51A.010.
(pp) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.51A.010.
(qq) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting of fifty
percent or more of the separated resin, whether crude or purified,
obtained from marijuana. The term "marijuana concentrates" does not
include useable marijuana or marijuana-infused products.
(rr) "CBD concentration" means the percent of cannabidiol content
per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or
weight of marijuana product.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.325 and 2013 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce
marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other
marijuana producers, regulated by the state liquor ((control)) and
cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The production,
possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer,
shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.
Every marijuana producer's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, shall specify the location at which the marijuana producer
intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and
the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.
The application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two
hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a
marijuana producer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate
license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana
producer intends to produce marijuana.
(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process,
package, and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and
marijuana-infused products for sale at wholesale to marijuana
processors and marijuana retailers, regulated by the state liquor
((control)) and cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The
processing, packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of
marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws
of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly
licensed marijuana processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense
under Washington state law. Every marijuana processor's license shall
be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at
which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state
of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person
to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana processor's
license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for
issuance and renewal of a marijuana processor's license shall be one
thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each
location at which a marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.
(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at
retail in retail outlets, regulated by the state liquor ((control)) and
cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The possession,
delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013, chapter 69.51A RCW, and the
rules adopted to implement and enforce ((it)) these chapters, by a
validly licensed marijuana retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil
offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana retailer's license
shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the
location of the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which
must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall
not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for
a marijuana retailer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The
annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana retailer's license
shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required
for each location at which a marijuana retailer intends to sell
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.342 and 2013 c 3 s 9 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of chapter
3, Laws of 2013 according to their true intent or of supplying any
deficiency therein, the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board may
adopt rules not inconsistent with the spirit of chapter 3, Laws of 2013
as are deemed necessary or advisable. Without limiting the generality
of the preceding sentence, the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis
board is empowered to adopt rules regarding the following:
(1) The equipment and management of retail outlets and premises
where marijuana is produced or processed, and inspection of the retail
outlets and premises;
(2) The books and records to be created and maintained by
licensees, the reports to be made thereon to the state liquor
((control)) and cannabis board, and inspection of the books and
records;
(3) Methods of producing, processing, and packaging marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of
sanitation; and standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products produced,
processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;
(4) Security requirements for retail outlets and premises where
marijuana is produced or processed, and safety protocols for licensees
and their employees;
(5) Screening, hiring, training, and supervising employees of
licensees;
(6) Retail outlet locations and hours of operation;
(7) Labeling requirements and restrictions on advertisement of
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products;
(8) Forms to be used for purposes of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or the
rules adopted to implement and enforce it, the terms and conditions to
be contained in licenses issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013, and the
qualifications for receiving a license issued under chapter 3, Laws of
2013, including a criminal history record information check. The state
liquor ((control)) and cannabis board may submit any criminal history
record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the
identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order
that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and
convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms.
The state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board shall require
fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation;
(9) Application, reinstatement, and renewal fees for licenses
issued under chapter 3, Laws of 2013, and fees for anything done or
permitted to be done under the rules adopted to implement and enforce
chapter 3, Laws of 2013;
(10) The manner of giving and serving notices required by chapter
3, Laws of 2013 or rules adopted to implement or enforce it;
(11) Times and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by
which, licensees shall transport and deliver marijuana, marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products within
the state;
(12) Identification, seizure, confiscation, destruction, or
donation to law enforcement for training purposes of all marijuana,
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products produced, processed, sold, or offered for sale within this
state which do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed
by chapter 3, Laws of 2013 or the rules adopted to implement and
enforce it((: PROVIDED, That nothing in chapter 3, Laws of 2013 shall
be construed as authorizing the state liquor control board to seize,
confiscate, destroy, or donate to law enforcement marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products produced, processed, sold,
offered for sale, or possessed in compliance with the Washington state
medical use of cannabis act,)) or chapter 69.51A RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.50.345 and 2013 c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
The state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board, subject to the
provisions of this chapter ((3, Laws of 2013)), must adopt rules ((by
December 1, 2013,)) that establish the procedures and criteria
necessary to implement the following:
(1) Licensing of marijuana producers, marijuana processors, and
marijuana retailers, including prescribing forms and establishing
application, reinstatement, and renewal fees. Application forms for
marijuana producers must request the applicant to state whether the
applicant intends to produce marijuana for sale by marijuana retailers
who hold medical marijuana endorsements and the amount of or percentage
of canopy the applicant intends to commit to growing plants established
to be of a THC concentration, CBD concentration, and THC to CBD ratio
appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or
marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients;
(2) The state liquor and cannabis board must reconsider limits on
the amount of square feet permitted to be in production on the
effective date of this section and increase the percentage of
production space for those marijuana producers who intend to grow
plants for marijuana retailers who hold medical marijuana endorsements
if the marijuana producer designates the increased production space to
plants with a THC to CBD ratio appropriate for marijuana concentrates,
useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to be sold to
qualifying patients. If current marijuana producers do not use all the
increased production space, the liquor and cannabis board may reopen
the license period for new marijuana producer license applicants but
only to those marijuana producers who agree to grow products for
medical marijuana endorsed retail outlets. Priority in licensing must
be given to marijuana producer license applicants who have an
application pending on the effective date of this section but who are
not yet licensed and then to new marijuana producer license applicants;
(3) Determining, in consultation with the office of financial
management, the maximum number of retail outlets that may be licensed
in each county, taking into consideration:
(a) Population distribution;
(b) Security and safety issues; ((and))
(c) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products to discourage purchases from the illegal market;
(((3))) and
(d) The number of retail outlets holding medical marijuana
endorsements necessary to meet the medical needs of qualifying patients
and allowing for a number of such locations to be solely medical. The
state liquor and cannabis board must reconsider the maximum number of
retail outlets it established before the effective date of this section
and allow for a new license application period and a greater number of
retail outlets to be permitted in order to accommodate the medical
needs of qualifying patients and designated providers;
(4) Establishing a preference for those marijuana retailers who are
applying for a medical marijuana endorsement and who will be selling
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products to only qualifying patients and designated providers if the
state liquor and cannabis board determines that the needs of qualifying
patients are not being met by currently licensed marijuana retailers;
(5) Determining the maximum quantity of marijuana a marijuana
producer may have on the premises of a licensed location at any time
without violating Washington state law;
(((4))) (6) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana,
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products a marijuana processor may have on the premises of a licensed
location at any time without violating Washington state law;
(((5))) (7) Determining the maximum quantities of marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products a
marijuana retailer may have on the premises of a retail outlet at any
time without violating Washington state law;
(((6))) (8) In making the determinations required by subsections
(((3))) (2) through (((5))) (7) of this section, the state liquor
((control)) and cannabis board shall take into consideration:
(a) Security and safety issues;
(b) The provision of adequate access to licensed sources of
marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to discourage purchases from the illegal market; and
(c) Economies of scale, and their impact on licensees' ability to
both comply with regulatory requirements and undercut illegal market
prices;
(((7))) (9) Determining the nature, form, and capacity of all
containers to be used by licensees to contain marijuana, marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, and
their labeling requirements, to include but not be limited to:
(a) The business or trade name and Washington state unified
business identifier number of the licensees that grew, processed, and
sold the marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or
marijuana-infused product;
(b) Lot numbers of the marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product;
(c) THC concentration of the marijuana, marijuana concentrates,
useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product;
(d) Medically and scientifically accurate information about the
health and safety risks posed by marijuana use; and
(e) Language required by RCW 69.04.480;
(((8))) (10) In consultation with the department of agriculture,
establishing classes of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, and marijuana-infused products according to grade,
condition, cannabinoid profile, THC concentration, or other qualitative
measurements deemed appropriate by the state liquor ((control)) and
cannabis board;
(((9))) (11) Establishing reasonable time, place, and manner
restrictions and requirements regarding advertising of marijuana,
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter
((3, Laws of 2013)), taking into consideration:
(a) Federal laws relating to marijuana that are applicable within
Washington state;
(b) Minimizing exposure of people under twenty-one years of age to
the advertising; and
(c) The inclusion of medically and scientifically accurate
information about the health and safety risks posed by marijuana use in
the advertising;
(((10))) (12) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when,
and the manner, methods, and means by which, licensees shall transport
and deliver marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and
marijuana-infused products within the state;
(((11))) (13) In consultation with the department and the
department of agriculture, establishing accreditation requirements for
testing laboratories used by licensees to demonstrate compliance with
standards adopted by the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board,
and prescribing methods of producing, processing, and packaging
marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products; conditions of sanitation; and standards of
ingredients, quality, and identity of marijuana, marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products
produced, processed, packaged, or sold by licensees;
(((12))) (14) Specifying procedures for identifying, seizing,
confiscating, destroying, and donating to law enforcement for training
purposes all marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and
marijuana-infused products produced, processed, packaged, labeled, or
offered for sale in this state that do not conform in all respects to
the standards prescribed by this chapter ((3, Laws of 2013)) or the
rules of the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.50.354 and 2013 c 3 s 13 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
There may be licensed, in no greater number in each of the counties
of the state than as the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board
shall deem advisable, retail outlets established for the purpose of
making marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products available for sale to adults aged twenty-one and over and to
qualifying patients who hold valid authorization cards and are aged
eighteen and older. Retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter ((3, Laws of 2013)) and chapter 69.51A RCW
and the rules adopted to implement and enforce ((it)) this chapter, by
a validly licensed marijuana retailer or retail outlet employee, shall
not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
A marijuana retailer and employees of the marijuana retailer may
identify the strains, varieties, THC concentration, CBD concentration,
and THC to CBD ratios of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and
marijuana-infused products, available for sale when assisting
qualifying patients and designated providers at the retail outlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A medical marijuana endorsement to a marijuana retail license
is hereby established to permit a marijuana retailer to sell marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to:
(a) Both the recreational market in compliance with this chapter
and the medical market in compliance with chapter 69.51A RCW; or
(b) Only the medical market in compliance with chapter 69.51A RCW.
(2) An applicant may apply for a medical marijuana endorsement
concurrently with an application for a marijuana retail license.
(3) To be issued an endorsement, a marijuana retailer must:
(a) Indicate on its application whether the retailer intends to
sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products to: (i) Both the recreational markets in compliance with this
chapter and the medical market in compliance with chapter 69.51A RCW;
or (ii) only the medical market in compliance with chapter 69.51A RCW;
(b) Not authorize the medical use of marijuana for qualifying
patients at the retail outlet or permit health care professionals to
authorize the medical use of marijuana for qualifying patients at the
retail outlet;
(c) Carry marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products with a CBD concentration and THC to CBD ratio
identified by the state liquor and cannabis board under subsection (5)
of this section;
(d) Not use labels or market marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products in a way that make them
intentionally attractive to minors or recreational users;
(e) Keep copies of the qualifying patient's or designated
provider's authorization card, or keep equivalent records as required
by rule of the state liquor and cannabis board or the department of
revenue to document the validity of tax exempt sales under RCW
69.50.535; and
(f) Meet other requirements as adopted by rule of the department or
the state liquor and cannabis board.
(4) A marijuana retailer holding a medical marijuana endorsement
and employees of the retailer may identify the strains, varieties, THC
concentration, CBD concentration, and THC to CBD ratios of marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products,
available for sale when assisting qualifying patients and designated
providers at the retail outlet. A marijuana retailer holding a medical
marijuana endorsement may sell or provide at no charge products with a
THC concentration of 0.3 percent or less to qualifying patients or
designated providers who possess valid authorization cards.
(5)(a) The state liquor and cannabis board must adopt rules on
requirements for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and
marijuana-infused products that may be sold to qualifying patients
under a medical marijuana endorsement. These rules must include:
(i) THC concentration, CBD concentration, and THC to CBD ratios
appropriate for marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or
marijuana-infused products sold to qualifying patients;
(ii) Labeling requirements including that the labels attached to
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused
products contain THC concentration, CBD concentration, and THC to CBD
ratios;
(iii) The number and type of such products that must be offered at
medical marijuana endorsed stores; and
(iv) Other product requirements the state liquor and cannabis board
determines necessary to address the medical needs of qualifying
patients.
(b) The state liquor and cannabis board must adopt rules on
additional requirements for those retail outlets that intend to sell
only to qualifying patients and designated providers under a medical
marijuana endorsement.
(6) A marijuana retailer holding an endorsement to sell marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products to
qualifying patients may consult the medical marijuana registry
established in section 21 of this act for the sole purpose of
confirming the validity of qualifying patient or designated provider
authorization cards.

Sec. 9 RCW 69.50.357 and 2013 c 3 s 14 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Retail outlets shall sell no products or services other than
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products,
or paraphernalia intended for the storage or use of marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.
(2) Except as provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection, licensed
marijuana retailers shall not employ persons under twenty-one years of
age or allow persons under twenty-one years of age to enter or remain
on the premises of a retail outlet.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2015, marijuana retailers that hold a medical
marijuana endorsement and are licensed to only sell medical marijuana
may allow qualifying patients who hold valid authorization cards and
are eighteen to twenty-one years of age to enter or remain on the
premises and may allow qualifying patients with valid authorization
cards under the age of eighteen to enter or remain on the premises if
those minor patients are with their parent or guardian who also holds
a valid authorization card; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, marijuana retailers that hold a medical
marijuana endorsement and are licensed to sell marijuana for both
medical and recreational use, may allow qualifying patients aged
eighteen years of age or older to enter or remain on the premises of a
retail outlet if they possess a valid authorization card.
(3) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display any signage in
a window, on a door, or on the outside of the premises of a retail
outlet that is visible to the general public from a public right-of-way, other than a single sign no larger than one thousand six hundred
square inches identifying the retail outlet by the licensee's business
or trade name. The state liquor and cannabis board shall adopt rules
establishing a symbol that marijuana retailers who hold a medical
marijuana endorsement may use on their sign to indicate they possess a
medical marijuana endorsement.
(4) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products in a
manner that is visible to the general public from a public right-of-way.
(5) No licensed marijuana retailer or employee of a retail outlet
shall open or consume, or allow to be opened or consumed, any marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product on the
outlet premises.
(6) The state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board shall fine a
licensee one thousand dollars for each violation of any subsection of
this section. Fines collected under this section must be deposited
into the dedicated marijuana fund created under RCW 69.50.530.

Sec. 10 RCW 69.50.360 and 2013 c 3 s 15 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
The following acts, when performed by a validly licensed marijuana
retailer or employee of a validly licensed retail outlet in compliance
with rules adopted by the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board
to implement and enforce this chapter ((3, Laws of 2013)), shall not
constitute criminal or civil offenses under Washington state law:
(1) Purchase and receipt of marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products that have been properly
packaged and labeled from a marijuana processor validly licensed under
this chapter ((3, Laws of 2013));
(2) Possession of quantities of marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products that do not exceed the maximum
amounts established by the state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board
under RCW 69.50.345(((5))) (7); ((and))
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, delivery,
distribution, and sale, on the premises of the retail outlet, of any
combination of the following amounts of marijuana concentrates, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused product to any person twenty-one years
of age or older:
(a) One ounce of useable marijuana;
(b) Sixteen ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;
((or))
(c) Seventy-two ounces of marijuana-infused product in liquid form;
or
(d) Seven grams of marijuana concentrates; and
(4) Beginning July 1, 2015, delivery, distribution, and sale, on
the premises of the retail outlet holding a medical marijuana
endorsement, of any combination of the following amounts of marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product to a
qualifying patient holding a valid authorization card who is eighteen
years of age or older or a designated provider holding a valid
authorization card:
(a) Three ounces of useable marijuana or as much useable marijuana
as is indicated on the authorization card of the patient or provider;
(b) Forty-eight ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;
(c) Two hundred sixteen ounces of marijuana-infused product in
liquid form; or
(d) Twenty-one grams of marijuana concentrates.

Sec. 11 RCW 69.50.4013 and 2013 c 3 s 20 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a
valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014, any person who violates
this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(3)(a) The possession, by a person twenty-one years of age or
older, of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-
infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW
69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any
other provision of Washington state law.
(b) The possession by a qualifying patient or designated provider
of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused
products, or plants, as that term is defined in RCW 69.51A.010, in
accordance with section 18 or 25 of this act is not a violation of this
section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to:
(a) Beginning July 1, 2015, sales of marijuana concentrates,
useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or products containing
THC with a THC concentration of 0.3 percent or less by marijuana
retailers who hold medical marijuana endorsements under section 8 of
this act to qualifying patients or designated providers who hold valid
authorization cards; or
(b) Until September 1, 2015, sales of marijuana concentrates,
useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or products containing
THC with a THC concentration of 0.3 percent or less by collective
gardens under RCW 69.51A.085.
(2) Each seller making exempt sales under subsection (1) of this
section must maintain information establishing the purchaser's
eligibility for the exemption in the form and manner required by the
department.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the terms "THC
concentration," "marijuana concentrates," "useable marijuana,"
"marijuana-infused products," and "marijuana retailers" have the
meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101 and the terms "qualifying patients,"
"designated providers," and "authorization card" have the meaning
provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products,
or products containing THC with a THC concentration of 0.3 percent or
less in compliance with chapters 69.50 and 69.51A RCW by:
(a) Until September 1, 2015, collective gardens under RCW
69.51A.085 and the qualifying patients participating in the collective
gardens;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, qualifying patients or designated
providers who hold valid authorization cards; or
(c) Beginning July 1, 2015, marijuana retailers who hold a medical
marijuana endorsement under chapter 69.50 RCW with respect to marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or
products containing THC with a THC concentration of 0.3 percent or less
if such marijuana or product is provided at no charge to a qualifying
patient or designated provider who holds a valid authorization card.
Each such retailer providing such marijuana or product at no charge
must maintain information establishing eligibility for this exemption
in the form and manner required by the department.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the terms "THC
concentration," "marijuana concentrates," "useable marijuana,"
"marijuana-infused products," and "marijuana retailers" have the
meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101 and the terms "qualifying patients,"
"designated providers," and "authorization card" have the meaning
provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

Sec. 14 RCW 28B.20.502 and 2011 c 181 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
The University of Washington and Washington State University may
conduct scientific research on the efficacy and safety of administering
((cannabis)) marijuana as part of medical treatment. As part of this
research, the University of Washington and Washington State University
may develop and conduct studies to ascertain the general medical safety
and efficacy of ((cannabis)) marijuana and may develop medical
guidelines for the appropriate administration and use of ((cannabis))
marijuana.

Sec. 15 RCW 69.51A.005 and 2011 c 181 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) There is medical evidence that some patients with terminal or
debilitating medical conditions may, under their health care
professional's care, benefit from the medical use of ((cannabis))
marijuana. Some of the conditions for which ((cannabis)) marijuana
appears to be beneficial include, but are not limited to:
(i) Nausea, vomiting, and cachexia associated with cancer, HIV-positive status, AIDS, hepatitis C, anorexia, and their treatments;
(ii) Severe muscle spasms associated with multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy, and other seizure and spasticity disorders;
(iii) Acute or chronic glaucoma;
(iv) Crohn's disease; and
(v) Some forms of intractable pain.
(b) Humanitarian compassion necessitates that the decision to use
((cannabis)) marijuana by patients with terminal or debilitating
medical conditions is a personal, individual decision, based upon their
health care professional's professional medical judgment and
discretion.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends that, so long as such
activities are in compliance with this chapter:
(a) Qualifying patients with terminal or debilitating medical
conditions who, in the judgment of their health care professionals, may
benefit from the medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana, shall not be
arrested, prosecuted, or subject to other criminal sanctions or civil
consequences under state law based solely on their medical use of
((cannabis)) marijuana, notwithstanding any other provision of law;
(b) Persons who act as designated providers to such patients shall
also not be arrested, prosecuted, or subject to other criminal
sanctions or civil consequences under state law, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, based solely on their assisting with the
medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana; and
(c) Health care professionals shall also not be arrested,
prosecuted, or subject to other criminal sanctions or civil
consequences under state law for the proper authorization of medical
use of ((cannabis)) marijuana by qualifying patients for whom, in the
health care professional's professional judgment, the medical use of
((cannabis)) marijuana may prove beneficial.
(3) Nothing in this chapter establishes the medical necessity or
medical appropriateness of ((cannabis)) marijuana for treating terminal
or debilitating medical conditions as defined in RCW 69.51A.010.
(4) Nothing in this chapter diminishes the authority of
correctional agencies and departments, including local governments or
jails, to establish a procedure for determining when the use of
((cannabis)) marijuana would impact community safety or the effective
supervision of those on active supervision for a criminal conviction,
nor does it create the right to any accommodation of any medical use of
((cannabis)) marijuana in any correctional facility or jail.

Sec. 16 RCW 69.51A.010 and 2010 c 284 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Designated provider" means a person who((:
(a))) is ((eighteen)) twenty-one years of age or older((;
(b))) and:
(a)(i) Is the parent or guardian of a qualifying patient who is
under the age of eighteen; or
(ii) Has been designated in writing by a qualifying patient to
serve as a designated provider ((under this chapter)) for that patient;
(((c))) (b) Has been entered into the medical marijuana registry as
being the designated provider to a qualifying patient and may only
provide medical marijuana to that qualifying patient;
(c) Is prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the
personal, medical use of the qualifying patient for whom the individual
is acting as designated provider; ((and))
(d) Is in compliance with this chapter; and
(e) Is the designated provider to only one patient at any one time.
(2) "Health care professional," for purposes of this chapter only,
means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician
assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an osteopathic physicians' assistant
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW.
(3) "Medical use of marijuana" means the manufacture, production,
possession, transportation, delivery, ingestion, application, or
administration of marijuana((, as defined in RCW 69.50.101(q),)) for
the exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his
or her terminal or debilitating ((illness)) medical condition.
(4) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(a)(i) Is a patient of a health care professional;
(((b))) (ii) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as
having a terminal or debilitating medical condition;
(((c))) (iii) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time
of such diagnosis;
(((d))) (iv) Has been advised by that health care professional
about the risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana; ((and
(e))) (v) Has been advised by that health care professional that
((they)) he or she may benefit from the medical use of marijuana;
(vi) Has been entered into the medical marijuana registry; and
(vii) Is otherwise in compliance with the terms and conditions
established in this chapter.
(b) "Qualifying patient" does not include a person who is actively
being supervised for a criminal conviction by a corrections agency or
department that has determined that the terms of this chapter are
inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision and all
related processes and procedures related to that supervision.
(5) Until April 1, 2016, "tamper-resistant paper" means paper that
meets one or more of the following industry-recognized features:
(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;
(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or
modification of information on the paper; or
(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit
valid documentation.
(6) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means a condition
severe enough to significantly interfere with the patient's activities
of daily living and ability to function, which can be objectively
assessed and evaluated and limited to the following:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; ((or))
(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications;
((or))
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications; ((or))
(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms unrelieved by
standard treatments or medications; ((or))
(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain
unrelieved by standard treatments or medications; ((or))
(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting,
wasting, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms, or
spasticity, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard treatments
or medications; or
(g) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical quality assurance commission in consultation with the
board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as directed in this chapter.
(7) Until April 1, 2016, "valid documentation" means:
(a) A statement signed and dated by a qualifying patient's health
care professional written on tamper-resistant paper, which states that,
in the health care professional's professional opinion, the patient may
benefit from the medical use of marijuana; and
(b) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license
or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.
(8) "Authorization card" means a card issued by the department to
qualifying patients whose health care professionals have entered them
into the department's medical marijuana registry.
(9) "Department" means the department of health.
(10) "Marijuana" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.
(11) "Marijuana processor" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.50.101.
(12) "Marijuana producer" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.50.101.
(13) "Marijuana retailer" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.50.101.
(14) "Marijuana-infused products" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.50.101.
(15) "Medical marijuana registry" means the secure and confidential
registry of qualifying patients and designated providers established in
section 25 of this act.
(16) "Plant" means a marijuana plant having at least three
distinguishable and distinct leaves, each leaf being at least three
centimeters in diameter, and a readily observable root formation
consisting of at least two separate and distinct roots, each being at
least two centimeters in length. Multiple stalks emanating from the
same root ball or root system is considered part of the same single
plant.
(17) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated
cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and
grounds adjacent thereto; premises where goods and services are offered
to the public for retail sale; public buildings, public meeting halls,
lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theaters,
stores, garages, and filling stations that are open to and are
generally used by the public and to which the public is permitted to
have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, buses, ferries, and
other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots,
stops, and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open
to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing
beaches, parks, or playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar
nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of access,
and that are generally used by the public.
(18) "THC concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.
(19) "Useable marijuana" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.
(20) "Marijuana concentrates" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.50.101.
(21) "Principal care provider" means the health care professional
who is designated by a qualifying patient as being the principal care
provider for that patient.

Sec. 17 RCW 69.51A.030 and 2011 c 181 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following acts do not constitute crimes under state law or
unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW, and a health care
professional may not be arrested, searched, prosecuted, disciplined, or
subject to other criminal sanctions or civil consequences or liability
under state law, or have real or personal property searched, seized, or
forfeited pursuant to state law, notwithstanding any other provision of
law as long as the health care professional complies with subsection
(2) of this section:
(a) Advising a patient about the risks and benefits of medical use
of ((cannabis)) marijuana or that the patient may benefit from the
medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana or until April 1, 2016, providing
a patient with valid documentation; or
(b) ((Providing)) Registering a patient meeting the criteria
established under RCW 69.51A.010(((26) with valid documentation)) (4)
with the medical marijuana registry, based upon the health care
professional's assessment of the patient's medical history and current
medical condition, ((where such use is)) if the health care
professional has complied with this chapter and he or she determines
within a professional standard of care or in the individual health care
professional's medical judgment the qualifying patient may benefit from
medical use of marijuana.
(2)(a) A health care professional may only ((provide a patient with
valid documentation authorizing the medical use of cannabis or))
register the patient with the medical marijuana registry established in
section ((901)) 21 of this act if he or she has a ((newly initiated or
existing)) documented relationship with the patient, as a ((primary))
principal care provider or a specialist, relating to the diagnosis and
ongoing treatment or monitoring of the patient's terminal or
debilitating medical condition, and only after:
(i) Completing ((a)) an in-person physical examination of the
patient ((as appropriate, based on the patient's condition and age));
(ii) Documenting the terminal or debilitating medical condition of
the patient in the patient's medical record and that the patient may
benefit from treatment of this condition or its symptoms with medical
use of ((cannabis)) marijuana;
(iii) Informing the patient of other options for treating the
terminal or debilitating medical condition and documenting in the
patient's medical record that the patient has received this
information; and
(iv) Documenting in the patient's medical record other measures
attempted to treat the terminal or debilitating medical condition that
do not involve the medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana.
(b) A health care professional shall not:
(i) Accept, solicit, or offer any form of pecuniary remuneration
from or to a ((licensed dispenser, licensed producer, or licensed
processor of cannabis products)) marijuana retailer, marijuana
processor, or marijuana producer;
(ii) Offer a discount or any other thing of value to a qualifying
patient who is a customer of, or agrees to be a customer of, a
particular ((licensed dispenser, licensed producer, or licensed
processor of cannabis products)) marijuana retailer;
(iii) Examine or offer to examine a patient for purposes of
diagnosing a terminal or debilitating medical condition at a location
where ((cannabis)) marijuana is produced, processed, or ((dispensed))
sold;
(iv) Have a business or practice which consists ((solely))
primarily of authorizing the medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana.
However, the health care professional's business or practice must have
a permanent physical location;
(v) Include any statement or reference, visual or otherwise, on the
medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana in any advertisement for his or
her business or practice; or
(vi) Hold an economic interest in an enterprise that produces,
processes, or ((dispenses cannabis)) sells marijuana if the health care
professional authorizes the medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana.
(3) A violation of any provision of subsection (2) of this section
constitutes unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As part of registering a qualifying patient or designated
provider in the medical marijuana registry, the health care
professional may include recommendations on the amount of marijuana
that is likely needed by the qualifying patient for his or her medical
needs and in accordance with subsection (2) of this section. If no
recommendations are included at point of registration, the qualifying
patient or designated provider may purchase at a marijuana retailer
that holds a medical marijuana endorsement a combination of the
following: Three ounces of useable marijuana; forty-eight ounces of
marijuana-infused product in solid form; two hundred sixteen ounces of
marijuana-infused product in liquid form; or twenty-one grams of
marijuana concentrates. The qualifying patient or designated provider
may also grow, in his or her domicile, up to six plants for the
personal medical use of the qualifying patient. If plants are grown
for the qualifying patient, the patient or designated provider may
possess as much useable marijuana as can be produced by three plants or
by the number of plants for which the patient or provider is authorized
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If a health care professional determines that the medical needs
of a patient exceed the amounts provided for in subsection (1) of this
section, the health care professional may recommend a greater amount of
useable marijuana or plants for the personal medical use of the patient
but not to exceed eight ounces of useable marijuana or fifteen plants.
This amount must be entered into the registry at point of registration
of the qualifying patient or designated provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall convene a work group of representatives of
the medical quality assurance commission, board of osteopathic medicine
and surgery, the nursing care quality assurance commission, the board
of naturopathy, and representatives of the medical marijuana community
including patients, attorneys, and health care professionals, to
develop practice guidelines for health care professionals to consider
when authorizing the medical use of marijuana for patients and consider
appropriate training and practice standards for employees of a licensed
marijuana retailer that holds a medical marijuana endorsement. The
representatives of the medical marijuana community must be appointed by
the governor. The practice guidelines shall address:
(a) Conditions that may benefit from the medical use of marijuana;
(b) Assessing a patient to determine if he or she has a
debilitating condition or intractable pain;
(c) Conducting an adequate examination of a patient for the need
for marijuana for medical use;
(d) Dosing criteria related to the medical use of marijuana;
(e) Developing a treatment plan for patients who may benefit from
the medical use of marijuana;
(f) Communicating with a patient about the medical use of marijuana
and other options for treating his or her terminal or debilitating
medical condition;
(g) Maintaining records for patients who have been authorized to
use marijuana for medical purposes; and
(h) Other issues identified by the work group as necessary to
provide appropriate care to patients who have been authorized to use
marijuana for medical purposes.
(2) In developing standards for employees of a licensed marijuana
retailer that holds a medical marijuana endorsement, the work group
shall identify appropriate practices for advising qualifying patients
or designated providers in selecting types of marijuana for their
condition, instructing qualifying patients and designated providers on
product use, fulfilling orders, and safe handling of products. The
work group shall adopt a definition of "medical grade marijuana" to
guide licensed marijuana retailers that hold a medical marijuana
endorsement in making decisions in selecting types of marijuana for
patients. The recommendations of the work group under this subsection
are advisory and do not establish regulatory standards, unless adopted
by the state liquor and cannabis board or the department pursuant to
existing authority.
(3) The department shall make the practice guidelines and training
and practice standards broadly available to health care professionals
and employees of licensed marijuana retailers that hold a medical
marijuana endorsement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Health care professionals may authorize the medical use of
marijuana for qualifying patients who are under the age of eighteen if:
(a) The minor's parent or guardian participates in the minor's
treatment and agrees to the medical use of marijuana by the minor;
(b) The parent or guardian acts as the designated provider for the
minor and has sole control over the minor's marijuana. However, the
minor may possess up to the amount of marijuana that is necessary for
his or her next dose; and
(c) The minor may not grow plants or purchase marijuana from a
marijuana retailer.
(2) A health care professional who authorizes the medical use of
marijuana by a minor must do so as part of the course of treatment of
the minor's terminal or debilitating medical condition. If authorizing
a minor for the medical use of marijuana, the health care professional
must:
(a) Consult with other health care providers involved in the
child's treatment, as medically indicated, before authorization or
reauthorization of the medical use of marijuana;
(b) Reexamine the minor at least once a year or more frequently as
medically indicated. The reexamination must:
(i) Determine that the minor continues to have a terminal or
debilitating medical condition and that the condition benefits from the
medical use of marijuana; and
(ii) Include a follow-up discussion with the minor's parent or
guardian to ensure the parent or guardian continues to participate in
the treatment of the minor;
(c) Enter both the minor and the minor's parent or guardian who is
acting as the designated provider in the medical marijuana registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2015, the department must adopt rules for the
creation, implementation, maintenance, and timely upgrading of a secure
and confidential medical marijuana registry that allows:
(a) A health care professional to register a qualifying patient or
designated provider and include the amount of marijuana concentrates,
useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or plants for which the
qualifying patient is authorized under section 18 of this act;
(b) Persons authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled
substances to access information on their patients for the purpose of
providing medical or pharmaceutical care for their patients;
(c) A qualifying patient or designated provider to request and
receive his or her own information;
(d) Appropriate local, state, and federal law enforcement or
prosecutorial officials who are engaged in a bona fide specific
investigation of suspected marijuana-related activity that is illegal
under Washington state law to confirm the validity of the authorization
card of a qualifying patient or designated provider;
(e) A marijuana retailer holding a medical marijuana endorsement to
confirm the validity of the authorization card of a qualifying patient
or designated provider;
(f) The department of revenue to verify tax exemptions under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW;
(g) The department and the health care professional's disciplining
authorities to monitor registrations and ensure compliance with this
chapter by their licensees; and
(h) Registrations to expire one year after entry into the registry.
(2) A qualifying patient and his or her designated provider, if
any, must be placed in the medical marijuana registry by the qualifying
patient's health care professional. After a qualifying patient or
designated provider is placed in the medical marijuana registry, he or
she must be provided with:
(a) A receipt of registration, generated by the registry and
available immediately at point of registration; and
(b) An authorization card provided by the department, to be mailed
to the qualifying patient or designated provider.
(3) The receipt of registration is valid for sixty days or until
the qualifying patient or designated provider receives an authorization
card from the department, whichever comes first. The receipt of
registration is to be considered an authorization card for purposes of
this chapter.
(4) The receipt of registration and authorization card must be
developed by the department and include:
(a) A randomly generated and unique identifying number;
(b) For designated providers, the unique identifying number of the
qualifying patient whom the provider is assisting;
(c) A photograph of the qualifying patient or designated provider's
face taken by the registering health care professional in accordance
with rules adopted by the department;
(d) The amount of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana,
marijuana-infused products, or plants for which the qualifying patient
is authorized under section 18 or 25 of this act;
(e) The effective date and expiration date of the receipt of
registration and the authorization card;
(f) The name of the health care professional who registered the
qualifying patient or designated provider; and
(g) For the authorization card, additional security features as
necessary to ensure its validity.
(5) The department may adopt rules developing an alternative method
to having the photograph required by subsection (4)(c) of this section
submitted by the health care professional.
(6) The department must adopt rules regarding the department's
destruction of the photographs of qualifying patients and designated
providers immediately upon issuance of the authorization cards.
(7) Authorization cards are valid for one year from the date the
health care professional registers the qualifying patient or designated
provider in the medical marijuana registry. Qualifying patients may
not be reentered into the medical marijuana registry until they have
been reexamined by a health care professional and determined to meet
the definition of qualifying patient. After reexamination, the health
care professional must reenter the qualifying patient or designated
provider into the medical marijuana registry and a new authorization
card will then be issued by the department in accordance with
department rules. The department must adopt rules on replacing lost or
stolen authorization cards.
(8) The department must adopt rules for removing qualifying
patients and designated providers from the medical marijuana registry
upon expiration of the authorization card as well as a method for
permitting qualifying patients and designated providers to remove
themselves from the medical marijuana registry before expiration and
for health care professionals to remove qualifying patients and
designated providers from the medical marijuana registry before
expiration if the patient or provider no longer qualifies for the
medical use of marijuana. The department must retain registry records
for at least five calendar years to permit the state liquor and
cannabis board and the department of revenue to verify eligibility for
tax exemptions.
(9) During development of the medical marijuana registry, the
department of health shall consult with stakeholders and persons with
relevant expertise to include, but not be limited to, qualifying
patients, designated providers, health care professionals, state and
local law enforcement agencies, and the University of Washington
computer science and engineering security and privacy research lab.
(10) The medical marijuana registry must meet the following
requirements:
(a) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registry must be nonreversible, pursuant to definitions and standards
set forth by the national institute of standards and technology;
(b) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registry must not be susceptible to linkage by use of data external to
the registry;
(c) The registry must incorporate current best differential privacy
practices, allowing for maximum accuracy of registry queries while
minimizing the chances of identifying the personally identifiable
information included therein; and
(d) The registry must be upgradable and updated in a timely fashion
to keep current with state of the art privacy and security standards
and practices.
(11)(a) Personally identifiable information of qualifying patients
and designated providers included in the medical marijuana registry is
confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or copying
under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(b) Information contained in the medical marijuana registry may be
released in aggregate form, with all personally identifying information
redacted, for the purpose of statistical analysis and oversight of
agency performance and actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Records in the medical marijuana registry established in section 21
of this act containing names and other personally identifiable
information of qualifying patients and designated providers are exempt
from disclosure under this chapter.

Sec. 23 RCW 42.56.270 and 2013 c 305 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, marijuana license, gambling license, or lottery retail
license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4).

Sec. 24 RCW 69.51A.040 and 2011 c 181 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
The medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana in accordance with the
terms and conditions of this chapter does not constitute a crime and a
qualifying patient or designated provider in compliance with the terms
and conditions of this chapter may not be arrested, prosecuted, or
subject to other criminal sanctions or civil consequences, for
possession, manufacture, or delivery of, or for possession with intent
to manufacture or deliver, ((cannabis)) marijuana under state law, or
have real or personal property seized or forfeited for possession,
manufacture, or delivery of, or for possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver, ((cannabis)) marijuana under state law, and
investigating ((peace)) law enforcement officers and ((law
enforcement)) agencies may not be held civilly liable for failure to
seize ((cannabis)) marijuana in this circumstance, if:
(1)(a) The qualifying patient or designated provider holds a valid
authorization card and possesses no more than ((fifteen cannabis plants
and:
(i) No more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis;
(ii) No more cannabis product than what could reasonably be
produced with no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis; or
(iii) A combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that
does not exceed a combined total representing possession and processing
of no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis)) the amount of
marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, plants, or marijuana-infused
products authorized under section 18 or 25 of this act.
(b) If a person is both a qualifying patient and a designated
provider for another qualifying patient, the person may possess no more
than twice the amounts described in (((a) of this subsection)) section
18 of this act, whether the plants, ((useable cannabis, and cannabis
product)) marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products are possessed individually or in combination between
the qualifying patient and his or her designated provider;
(2) The qualifying patient or designated provider presents his or
her ((proof of registration with the department of health,))
authorization card to any ((peace)) law enforcement officer who
questions the patient or provider regarding his or her medical use of
((cannabis)) marijuana;
(3) The qualifying patient or designated provider keeps a copy of
his or her ((proof of registration with the registry established in
section 901 of this act)) authorization card and the qualifying patient
or designated provider's contact information posted prominently next to
any ((cannabis)) plants, ((cannabis)) marijuana concentrates,
marijuana-infused products, or useable ((cannabis)) marijuana located
at his or her residence;
(4) The investigating ((peace)) law enforcement officer does not
possess evidence that:
(a) The designated provider has converted ((cannabis)) marijuana
produced or obtained for the qualifying patient for his or her own
personal use or benefit; or
(b) The qualifying patient ((has converted cannabis produced or
obtained for his or her own medical use to the qualifying patient's
personal, nonmedical use or benefit)) sold, donated, or otherwise
supplied marijuana to another person;
(5) ((The investigating peace officer does not possess evidence
that)) The designated provider has served as a designated provider to
more than one qualifying patient within a fifteen-day period; and
(6) The ((investigating peace officer has not observed evidence of
any of the circumstances identified in section 901(4) of this act))
qualifying patient or designated provider participates in a cooperative
as provided in section 25 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Qualifying patients or designated providers may form a
cooperative and share responsibility for acquiring and supplying the
resources needed to produce and process marijuana only for: (a) The
medical use of members of the cooperative; or (b) medical research. No
more than four people may become members of the cooperative under this
section and all members must hold valid authorization cards.
(2) The location of the cooperative must be registered with the
state liquor and cannabis board and this is the only location where
cooperative members may grow or process marijuana. This registration
must include the names of all participating members and copies of each
participant's authorization card. Only qualifying patients or
designated providers registered with the state liquor and cannabis
board in association with the location may participate in growing or
receive useable marijuana or marijuana-infused products grown at that
location.
(3) If a qualifying patient or designated provider no longer
participates in growing at the location, he or she must notify the
state liquor and cannabis board within fifteen days of the date the
qualifying patient or designated provider ceases participation. The
state liquor and cannabis board must remove his or her name from
connection to the cooperative. Additional qualifying patients or
designated providers may not join the cooperative until fifteen days
have passed since the date on which the last qualifying patient or
designated provider notifies the state liquor and cannabis board that
he or she no longer participates in that cooperative.
(4) Qualifying patients or designated providers who grow plants
under this section:
(a) May grow up to the total amount of plants for which each
participating member is authorized on their authorization cards. At
the location, the qualifying patients or designated providers may
possess no more useable marijuana than what can be produced with the
number of plants permitted under this subsection;
(b) Must provide assistance in growing plants. A monetary
contribution or donation is not to be considered assistance under this
section. Participants must provide labor in order to participate; and
(c) May not sell, donate, or otherwise provide marijuana, marijuana
concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products to a
person who is not participating under this section.
(5) The location of the cooperative must be the domicile of one of
the participants. Only one cooperative may be located per property tax
parcel. A copy of each participant's authorization card must be kept
at the location at all times.
(6) The state liquor and cannabis board may adopt rules to
implement this section, including any security requirements necessary
to ensure the safety of the cooperative and to reduce the risk of
diversion from the cooperative.
(7) The state liquor and cannabis board may inspect a cooperative
registered under this section to ensure members are in compliance with
this section. The state liquor and cannabis board must adopt rules on
reasonable inspection hours and reasons for inspections.

Sec. 26 RCW 69.51A.045 and 2011 c 181 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A qualifying patient or designated provider in possession of
((cannabis)) plants, marijuana concentrates, useable ((cannabis))
marijuana, or ((cannabis)) marijuana-infused products exceeding the
limits set forth in ((RCW 69.51A.040(1))) section 18 or 25 of this act
but otherwise in compliance with all other terms and conditions of this
chapter may establish an affirmative defense to charges of violations
of state law relating to ((cannabis)) marijuana through proof at trial,
by a preponderance of the evidence, that the qualifying patient's
necessary medical use exceeds the amounts set forth in RCW
69.51A.040(((1))).
(2) An investigating ((peace)) law enforcement officer may seize
((cannabis)) plants, marijuana concentrates, useable ((cannabis))
marijuana, or ((cannabis)) marijuana-infused products exceeding the
amounts set forth in ((RCW 69.51A.040(1): PROVIDED, That)) section 18
or 25 of this act. In the case of ((cannabis)) plants, the qualifying
patient or designated provider shall be allowed to select the plants
that will remain at the location. The officer and his or her law
enforcement agency may not be held civilly liable for failure to seize
((cannabis)) marijuana in this circumstance.

Sec. 27 RCW 69.51A.055 and 2011 c 181 s 1105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The arrest and prosecution protections established in RCW
69.51A.040 may not be asserted in a supervision revocation or violation
hearing by a person who is supervised by a corrections agency or
department, including local governments or jails, that has determined
that the terms of this section are inconsistent with and contrary to
his or her supervision.
(b) The affirmative defenses established in RCW ((69.51A.043,))
69.51A.045((, 69.51A.047, and section 407 of this act)) may not be
asserted in a supervision revocation or violation hearing by a person
who is supervised by a corrections agency or department, including
local governments or jails, that has determined that the terms of this
section are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.
(2) ((The provisions of)) RCW 69.51A.040((, 69.51A.085, and
69.51A.025 do)) does not apply to a person who is supervised for a
criminal conviction by a corrections agency or department, including
local governments or jails, that has determined that the terms of this
chapter are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.
(((3) A person may not be licensed as a licensed producer, licensed
processor of cannabis products, or a licensed dispenser under section
601, 602, or 701 of this act if he or she is supervised for a criminal
conviction by a corrections agency or department, including local
governments or jails, that has determined that licensure is
inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.))

Sec. 28 RCW 69.51A.060 and 2011 c 181 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be a class 3 civil infraction to use or display
medical ((cannabis)) marijuana in a manner or place which is open to
the view of the general public.
(2) Nothing in this chapter establishes a right of care as a
covered benefit or requires any state purchased health care as defined
in RCW 41.05.011 or other health carrier or health plan as defined in
Title 48 RCW to be liable for any claim for reimbursement for the
medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana. Such entities may enact
coverage or noncoverage criteria or related policies for payment or
nonpayment of medical ((cannabis)) marijuana in their sole discretion.
(3) Nothing in this chapter requires any health care professional
to authorize the medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana for a patient.
(4) Nothing in this chapter requires any accommodation of any on-site medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana in any place of employment,
in any school bus or on any school grounds, in any youth center, in any
correctional facility, or smoking ((cannabis)) marijuana in any public
place or hotel or motel. However, a school may permit a minor who
meets the requirements of section 20 of this act to consume medical
marijuana on school grounds. Such use must be in accordance with
school policy relating to medication use on school grounds.
(5) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the possession or use of
marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products on federal property.
(6) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the use of medical
((cannabis)) marijuana by any person who is subject to the Washington
code of military justice in chapter 38.38 RCW.
(((6))) (7) Employers may establish drug-free work policies.
Nothing in this chapter requires an accommodation for the medical use
of ((cannabis)) marijuana if an employer has a drug-free workplace.
(((7))) (8) Until September 1, 2015, it is a class C felony to
fraudulently produce any record purporting to be, or tamper with the
content of any record for the purpose of having it accepted as, valid
documentation under RCW 69.51A.010(((32)(a))) (7), or to backdate such
documentation to a time earlier than its actual date of execution.
(((8))) (9) No person shall be entitled to claim the protection
from arrest and prosecution under RCW 69.51A.040 ((or the affirmative
defense under RCW 69.51A.043)) for engaging in the medical use of
((cannabis)) marijuana in a way that endangers the health or well-being
of any person through the use of a motorized vehicle on a street, road,
or highway, including violations of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or
equivalent local ordinances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person knowingly or intentionally:
(a) To access the medical marijuana registry for any reason not
authorized under section 21 of this act;
(b) To disclose any information received from the medical marijuana
registry in violation of section 21 of this act including, but not
limited to, qualifying patient or designated provider names, addresses,
or amount of marijuana for which they are authorized;
(c) To produce an authorization card or to tamper with an
authorization card for the purpose of having it accepted by a marijuana
retailer in order to purchase marijuana as a qualifying patient or
designated provider or to grow marijuana plants in accordance with
section 18 or 25 of this act;
(d) If a person is a designated provider to a qualifying patient,
to sell, donate, or otherwise use the marijuana produced or obtained
for the qualifying patient for the designated provider's own personal
use or benefit; or
(e) If the person is a qualifying patient, to sell, donate, or
otherwise supply marijuana produced or obtained by the qualifying
patient to another person.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than two
years, fined not more than two thousand dollars, or both.

Sec. 30 RCW 69.51A.070 and 2007 c 371 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state medical quality assurance commission in
consultation with the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or
other appropriate agency as designated by the governor, shall accept
for consideration petitions submitted to add terminal or debilitating
conditions to those included in this chapter. In considering such
petitions, the Washington state medical quality assurance commission in
consultation with the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery shall
include public notice of, and an opportunity to comment in a public
hearing upon, such petitions. The Washington state medical quality
assurance commission in consultation with the board of osteopathic
medicine and surgery may make a preliminary finding of good cause
before the public hearing and shall, after hearing, approve or deny
such petitions within ((one)) two hundred ((eighty)) ten days of
submission. The approval or denial of such a petition shall be
considered a final agency action, subject to judicial review.

Sec. 31 RCW 69.51A.100 and 2011 c 181 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A qualifying patient may revoke his or her designation of a
specific designated provider and designate a different designated
provider at any time. A revocation of designation must be in writing,
signed and dated, and provided to the department and designated
provider. The protections of this chapter cease to apply to a person
who has served as a designated provider to a qualifying patient
seventy-two hours after receipt of that patient's revocation of his or
her designation.
(2) A person may stop serving as a designated provider to a given
qualifying patient at any time by revoking that designation in writing,
signed and dated, and provided to the department and the qualifying
patient. However, that person may not begin serving as a designated
provider to a different qualifying patient until fifteen days have
elapsed from the date the last qualifying patient designated him or her
to serve as a provider.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section,
including a procedure to remove the name of the designated provider
from the medical marijuana registry upon receipt of a revocation under
this section.

Sec. 32 RCW 69.51A.110 and 2011 c 181 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
A qualifying patient's medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana as
authorized by a health care professional may not be a sole
disqualifying factor in determining the patient's suitability for an
organ transplant, unless it is shown that this use poses a significant
risk of rejection or organ failure. This section does not preclude a
health care professional from requiring that a patient abstain from the
medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana, for a period of time determined
by the health care professional, while waiting for a transplant organ
or before the patient undergoes an organ transplant.

Sec. 33 RCW 69.51A.120 and 2011 c 181 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
A qualifying patient or designated provider may not have his or her
parental rights or residential time with a child restricted solely due
to his or her medical use of ((cannabis)) marijuana in compliance with
the terms of this chapter absent written findings supported by evidence
that such use has resulted in a long-term impairment that interferes
with the performance of parenting functions as defined under RCW
26.09.004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
Neither this chapter nor chapter 69.50 RCW prohibits a health care
professional from selling or donating topical, noningestable products
that have a THC concentration of less than .3 percent to qualifying
patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
Valid documentation may not be issued by a health care professional
after April 1, 2016. All valid documentation expires April 1, 2016.
Until April 1, 2016, qualifying patients and designated providers in
possession of valid documentation may establish an affirmative defense
to charges of violations of state law relating to marijuana through
proof at trial, by a preponderance of evidence, that the qualifying
patient has been authorized by a health care professional for the
medical use of marijuana, that the qualifying patient meets the
requirements of RCW 69.51A.010(4), and that the qualifying patient's
necessary medical use exceeds the amounts set forth in RCW 69.50.360.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
A medical marijuana advisory group must be appointed by the
governor to advise and assist the state liquor and cannabis board in
adopting rules relating to the medical use of marijuana. The advisory
group will meet at the call of the state liquor and cannabis board.
Membership of the advisory group includes, but is not limited to the
following:
(1) Three health care professionals who authorize the medical use
of marijuana;
(2) Two pharmacists, one with compounding experience;
(3) One licensed marijuana producer with medical marijuana
experience;
(4) One licensed marijuana processor with medical marijuana
experience;
(5) One licensed marijuana retailer with medical marijuana
experience; and
(6) One qualifying patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 (1) The legislature finds marijuana use for
qualifying patients is a valid and necessary option health care
professionals may recommend for their patients. The legislature
further finds that although there is a distinction between recreational
and medical use of marijuana, the changing environment for recreational
marijuana use in Washington will also affect qualifying patients. The
legislature further finds that while recognizing the difference between
recreational and medical use of marijuana, it is imperative to develop
a single, comprehensive regulatory scheme for marijuana use in the
state. Acknowledging that the implementation of this act may result in
changes to how qualifying patients access medical marijuana, the
legislature intends to ease the transition towards a regulated market
and provide a statutory means for a safe, consistent, and secure source
of marijuana for qualifying patients. Therefore, the legislature
intends to provide qualifying patients a retail sales and use tax
exemption on purchases of marijuana for medical use when authorized by
a health care professional. Because marijuana is neither a
prescription medicine nor an over-the-counter medication, this policy
should in no way be construed as precedence for changes in the
treatment of prescription medications or over-the-counter medications.
(2)(a) This section is the tax preference performance statement for
the retail sales and use tax exemptions for marijuana concentrates,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products purchased by
qualifying patients provided in sections 12 and 13 of this act. The
performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent
evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a
private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(b) The legislature categorizes the tax preference as one intended
to accomplish the general purposes indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).
(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
provide qualifying patients a retail sales and use tax exemption on
purchases of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for medical use when authorized by a health care
professional and registered with the medical marijuana registry.
(d) To measure the effectiveness of the exemption provided in this
act in achieving the specific public policy objectives described in (c)
of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee
must evaluate the actual fiscal impact of the sales and use tax
exemption in this act compared to the estimated impact in the fiscal
note for this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 All references to the Washington state
liquor control board must be construed as referring to the Washington
state liquor and cannabis board. The code reviser must prepare
legislation for the 2015 legislative session changing all references in
the Revised Code of Washington from the Washington state liquor control
board to the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 69.51A.020 (Construction of chapter) and 2011 c 181 s 103
& 1999 c 2 s 3;
(2) RCW 69.51A.025 (Construction of chapter -- Compliance with RCW
69.51A.040) and 2011 c 181 s 413;
(3) RCW 69.51A.047 (Failure to register or present valid
documentation -- Affirmative defense) and 2011 c 181 s 406;
(4) RCW 69.51A.090 (Applicability of valid documentation
definition) and 2010 c 284 s 5;
(5) RCW 69.51A.140 (Counties, cities, towns -- Authority to adopt and
enforce requirements) and 2011 c 181 s 1102; and
(6) RCW 69.51A.200 (Evaluation) and 2011 c 181 s 1001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 RCW 69.51A.085 (Collective gardens) and
2011 c 181 s 403, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective September 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 RCW 69.51A.043 (Failure to register--Affirmative defense) and 2011 c 181 s 402, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective September 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 Sections 6, 8, 11, 17, 18, 20, 24 through
26, 28, 29, 31, and 39 of this act take effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---