BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.17.350 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to
pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper $ 4.90 $ 3.50 RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer $ 34.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats
or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered) $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle $ 18.00 $ 18.00 RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle
trailer $ 15.00 $ 15.00 RCW 46.68.035

(l) Snowmobile $ ((30.00)) 40.00 $ ((30.00)) 40.00 RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, vintage $ 12.00 $ 12.00 RCW 46.68.350

(n) Sport utility vehicle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(o) Tow truck $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(q) Travel trailer $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(r) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle,
on-road use $12.00 $12.00 RCW 46.09.540

(s) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle,
off-road use $18.00 $18.00 RCW 46.09.510

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this
section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005,
and any other fee or tax required by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.17.350 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to
pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper $ 4.90 $ 3.50 RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer $ 34.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats
or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered) $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle $ 18.00 $ 18.00 RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle
trailer $ 15.00 $ 15.00 RCW 46.68.035

(l) Snowmobile $ ((30.00)) 50.00 $ ((30.00)) 50.00 RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, vintage $ 12.00 $ 12.00 RCW 46.68.350

(n) Sport utility vehicle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(o) Tow truck $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(q) Travel trailer $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(r) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle,
on-road use $12.00 $12.00 RCW 46.09.540

(s) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle,
off-road use $18.00 $18.00 RCW 46.09.510

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this
section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005,
and any other fee or tax required by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act applies to snowmobile
registrations that are due on or after October 1, 2014. Section 1 of
this act expires October 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act applies to snowmobile
registrations that are due on or after October 1, 2015. Section 2 of
this act takes effect October 1, 2015.

--- END ---