BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.517 and 2002 c 290 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness
Level Offender Score
0 to 2 Offender Score
3 to 5 Offender Score
6 to 9 or more

III 51 to 68 months 68+ to 100 months 100+ to 120 months

II 12+ to 20 months 20+ to 60 months 60+ to 120 months

I 0 to 6 months 6+ to ((18)) 12
months 12+ to 24 months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12+
equals one year and one day.
(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as
authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug
offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under
RCW 2.28.170.
(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal
defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or
substance abuse treatment.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.729 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for
good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits.
(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration.
If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the
administrator of a county jail facility shall certify to the department
the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the ((amount))
number of days of ((earned)) early release ((time)) credits lost or not
earned. The department may approve a jail certification from a
correctional agency that calculates ((earned)) early release time based
on the actual amount of confinement time served by the offender before
sentencing when an erroneous calculation of confinement time served by
the offender before sentencing appears on the judgment and sentence.
The department must adjust an offender's rate of early release listed
on the jail certification to be consistent with the rate applicable to
offenders in the department's facilities. However, the department is
not authorized to adjust the number of presentence early release days
that the jail has certified as lost or not earned.
(2) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after
July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good
time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed
ten percent of the sentence.
(c) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time if he or she:
(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to
reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community custody.
(d) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence.
(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender
who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(c) of
this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by the
Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection (3)(c) of
this section does not apply to offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.
(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as
provided in this section and who will be supervised by the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011, shall be transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release time;
(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for
release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the
community;
(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu
of earned release time if the department determines an offender's
release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions
of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of
the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk
to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under
this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence
or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;
(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release
plan, the department may do one or more of the following:
(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned
early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three
months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the
offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(5);
(ii) Provide rental vouchers to the offender for a period not to
exceed three months if rental assistance will result in an approved
release plan. The voucher must be provided in conjunction with
additional transition support programming or services that enable an
offender to participate in services including, but not limited to,
substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender
treatment, educational programming, or employment programming;
(e) For each offender who is the recipient of a rental voucher, the
department shall include, concurrent with the data that the department
otherwise obtains and records, the housing status of the offender for
the duration of the offender's supervision.
(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.48.130 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 85 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that all jail inmates
receive appropriate and cost-effective emergency and necessary medical
care. Governing units, the health care authority, and medical care
providers shall cooperate to achieve the best rates consistent with
adequate care.
(2) Payment for emergency or necessary health care shall be by the
governing unit, except that the health care authority shall directly
reimburse the provider pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW, in accordance
with the rates and benefits established by the authority, if the
confined person is eligible under the authority's medical care programs
as authorized under chapter 74.09 RCW. After payment by the authority,
the financial responsibility for any remaining balance, including
unpaid client liabilities that are a condition of eligibility or
participation under chapter 74.09 RCW, shall be borne by the medical
care provider and the governing unit as may be mutually agreed upon
between the medical care provider and the governing unit. In the
absence of mutual agreement between the medical care provider and the
governing unit, the financial responsibility for any remaining balance
shall be borne equally between the medical care provider and the
governing unit. Total payments from all sources to providers for care
rendered to confined persons ((eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW)) shall
not exceed the amounts that would be paid by the authority for similar
services provided under Title XIX medicaid, unless additional resources
are obtained from the confined person.
(3) Providers of hospital services that are hospitals licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW shall contract with a correctional facility for
inpatient, outpatient, and ancillary services if deemed appropriate by
the correctional facility. Except in a county in which there are (1)
a single hospital with which the local correctional facilities may
contract and with a state correctional facility housing more than one
thousand five hundred offenders; (2) two hospitals with which the local
correctional facilities may contract and with a state correctional
facility housing more than two thousand offenders, the correctional
facility may only reimburse a provider of hospital services at a rate
no more than the amount payable under the medicaid reimbursement
structure, plus any additional amount provided specifically for this
purpose in the state omnibus appropriations act, regardless of whether
the hospital is located within or outside of Washington. In a county
in which there is a single hospital with which the local correctional
facilities may contract and with a state correctional facility housing
more than one thousand five hundred offenders or in a county in which
there are two hospitals with the local correctional facilities may
contract and with a state correctional facility housing more than two
thousand offenders, the department of corrections shall pay the
difference between the medicaid reimbursement and the amount agreed to
by the correctional facility and the provider of hospital services. A
correctional facility may participate, at the correctional facility's
expense, in the provider one system operated by the Washington state
health care authority for payment of hospital services through a
process coordinated by the department of corrections pursuant to this
section.
(4) As part of the screening process upon booking or preparation of
an inmate into jail, general information concerning the inmate's
ability to pay for medical care shall be identified, including
insurance or other medical benefits or resources to which an inmate is
entitled. This information shall be made available to the authority,
the governing unit, and any provider of health care services.
(((4))) (5) The governing unit or provider may obtain reimbursement
from the confined person for the cost of health care services not
provided under chapter 74.09 RCW, including reimbursement from any
insurance program or from other medical benefit programs available to
the confined person. Nothing in this chapter precludes civil or
criminal remedies to recover the costs of medical care provided jail
inmates or paid for on behalf of inmates by the governing unit. As
part of a judgment and sentence, the courts are authorized to order
defendants to repay all or part of the medical costs incurred by the
governing unit or provider during confinement.
(((5))) (6) To the extent that a confined person is unable to be
financially responsible for medical care and is ineligible for the
authority's medical care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, or for
coverage from private sources, and in the absence of an interlocal
agreement or other contracts to the contrary, the governing unit may
obtain reimbursement for the cost of such medical services from the
unit of government whose law enforcement officers initiated the charges
on which the person is being held in the jail: PROVIDED, That
reimbursement for the cost of such services shall be by the state for
state prisoners being held in a jail who are accused of either escaping
from a state facility or of committing an offense in a state facility.
(((6))) (7) There shall be no right of reimbursement to the
governing unit from units of government whose law enforcement officers
initiated the charges for which a person is being held in the jail for
care provided after the charges are disposed of by sentencing or
otherwise, unless by intergovernmental agreement pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW.
(((7))) (8) Under no circumstance shall necessary medical services
be denied or delayed because of disputes over the cost of medical care
or a determination of financial responsibility for payment of the costs
of medical care provided to confined persons.
(((8))) (9) Nothing in this section shall limit any existing right
of any party, governing unit, or unit of government against the person
receiving the care for the cost of the care provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
As a condition of licensure, a hospital must contract with a
correctional facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.92.151 and 2009 c 28 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
sentence of a prisoner confined in a county jail facility for a felony,
gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor conviction may be reduced by earned
release credits in accordance with procedures that shall be developed
and promulgated by the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The
earned early release time shall be for good behavior and good
performance as determined by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction. Any program established pursuant to this section shall
allow an offender to earn early release credits for presentence
incarceration. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender
with earned early release credits in advance of the offender actually
earning the credits. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious
violent offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on
or after July 1, 1990, the aggregate earned early release time may not
exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In no other case may the
aggregate earned early release time exceed one-third of the total
sentence.
(2) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.
(3) If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the
department, the administrator of a county jail facility shall certify
to the department the amount of time spent in custody at the facility
and the number of days of early release credits lost or not earned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729, the department
shall recalculate the earned release date for any offender currently
serving a term in a facility or institution either operated by the
state or utilized under contract. The earned release date shall be
recalculated whether the offender is currently incarcerated or is
sentenced after the effective date of this section, and regardless of
the offender's date of offense. For offenders whose offense was
committed prior to the effective date of this section, the
recalculation shall not extend a term of incarceration beyond that to
which an offender is currently subject.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature declares that section 6 of
this act does not create any liberty interest. The department is
authorized to take the time reasonably necessary to complete the
recalculations of section 6 of this act after the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 1 of this act applies to sentences
imposed on or after July 1, 2013, regardless of the date of offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 and 2 and 5 through 7 of this
act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---