BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the community and technical colleges must include a twenty
percent surcharge on tuition fees for nonresident undergraduate or
graduate students who hold lawful nonimmigrant status pursuant to 8
U.S.C. Sec. 1101 (a)(15)(F) or (J). The revenue from the surcharge
must be deposited in the general fund.

--- END ---