BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that the
opportunity to implement medicaid expansion for adults with incomes
below one hundred and thirty-three percent of the federal poverty level
provides the nexus to streamline the medicaid program, improve the
program efficiency, and maximize federal funding to save millions of
dollars in the state budget while ensuring additional funding is
available for the private health delivery system.
(2) Certain parameters must be established as a condition to
implement the medicaid expansion defined in the social security act
section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) including, but not limited to, the
following: Development of a budget circuit breaker, implementation of
personal responsibility for enrollees through cost-sharing and through
individual incentives, implementation of enhanced program performance
expectations, and elimination of an array of separate medical programs.
The health care authority is also directed to make program improvements
that ensure enrollees a choice of health plans, monitor crowd-out of
employer coverage, and report on opportunities to integrate behavioral
health services with the medical program.

PART II
CIRCUIT BREAKER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 74.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The authority is authorized to implement the medicaid expansion
defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII),
consistent with budget authorization provided in the omnibus
appropriations act, as long as the federal medical assistance
percentages defined in the social security act, section 1905(y), remain
at the levels outlined in law. A circuit breaker is provided to ensure
the state budget is not adversely impacted by the federal government.
(2) If the federal medical assistance percentage for the expansion
falls below ninety percent, the authority shall ensure that the state
does not incur any additional costs above what would have been incurred
had the federal authority remained at ninety percent. The director is
authorized to make any necessary program adjustments to comply with
this requirement, including adding or adjusting premiums, modifying
benefits, or reducing optional programs.
(3) To the extent a waiver is needed to accomplish this, the
director shall promptly apply for such waiver. If a waiver is not
approved, the expansion program shall be closed upon appropriate
notification to the legislature and enrollees.

PART III
PROGRAM CONSOLIDATION AND ENROLLEE RESPONSIBILITY
Sec. 301 RCW 74.09.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 2 and 2011 c 316
s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(2) "Children's health program" means the health care services
program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in
households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as
annually defined by the federal department of health and human services
as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for
medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically
needy.
(3) "Chronic care management" means the health care management
within a health home of persons identified with, or at high risk for,
one or more chronic conditions. Effective chronic care management:
(a) Actively assists patients to acquire self-care skills to
improve functioning and health outcomes, and slow the progression of
disease or disability;
(b) Employs evidence-based clinical practices;
(c) Coordinates care across health care settings and providers,
including tracking referrals;
(d) Provides ready access to behavioral health services that are,
to the extent possible, integrated with primary care; and
(e) Uses appropriate community resources to support individual
patients and families in managing chronic conditions.
(4) "Chronic condition" means a prolonged condition and includes,
but is not limited to:
(a) A mental health condition;
(b) A substance use disorder;
(c) Asthma;
(d) Diabetes;
(e) Heart disease; and
(f) Being overweight, as evidenced by a body mass index over
twenty-five.
(5) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county
council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(8) "Director" means the director of the Washington state health
care authority.
(9) "Full benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an individual
who, for any month: Has coverage for the month under a medicare
prescription drug plan or medicare advantage plan with part D coverage;
and is determined eligible by the state for full medicaid benefits for
the month under any eligibility category in the state's medicaid plan
or a section 1115 demonstration waiver that provides pharmacy benefits.
(10) "Health home" or "primary care health home" means coordinated
health care provided by a licensed primary care provider coordinating
all medical care services, and a multidisciplinary health care team
comprised of clinical and nonclinical staff. The term "coordinating
all medical care services" shall not be construed to require prior
authorization by a primary care provider in order for a patient to
receive treatment for covered services by an optometrist licensed under
chapter 18.53 RCW. Primary care health home services shall include
those services defined as health home services in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396w-4 and, in addition, may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Comprehensive care management including, but not limited to,
chronic care treatment and management;
(b) Extended hours of service;
(c) Multiple ways for patients to communicate with the team,
including electronically and by phone;
(d) Education of patients on self-care, prevention, and health
promotion, including the use of patient decision aids;
(e) Coordinating and assuring smooth transitions and follow-up from
inpatient to other settings;
(f) Individual and family support including authorized
representatives;
(g) The use of information technology to link services, track
tests, generate patient registries, and provide clinical data; and
(h) Ongoing performance reporting and quality improvement.
(11) "Internal management" means the administration of medical
assistance, medical care services, the children's health program, and
the limited casualty program.
(12) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care program
provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons who are
without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary medical
services.
(13) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care
program provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title
XIX of the federal social security act including the medicaid expansion
authorized under section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII), contingent upon state
and federal funding.
(14) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of care
financed by state funds and provided to disability lifeline benefits
recipients, and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction services
provided under chapter 74.50 RCW. The medical care services program
authorized through the federal bridge waiver expires December 31, 2013,
consistent with the terms of the waiver agreement.
(15) "Multidisciplinary health care team" means an
interdisciplinary team of health professionals which may include, but
is not limited to, medical specialists, nurses, pharmacists,
nutritionists, dieticians, social workers, behavioral and mental health
providers including substance use disorder prevention and treatment
providers, doctors of chiropractic, physical therapists, licensed
complementary and alternative medicine practitioners, home care and
other long-term care providers, and physicians' assistants.
(16) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(17) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually
by the United States department of health and human services, or
successor agency.
(18) "Primary care provider" means a general practice physician,
family practitioner, internist, pediatrician, osteopath, naturopath,
physician assistant, osteopathic physician assistant, and advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed under Title 18 RCW.
(19) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

Sec. 302 RCW 74.09.055 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority is authorized to establish copayment, deductible,
or coinsurance, or other cost-sharing requirements for recipients of
any medical programs defined in RCW 74.09.010, except that premiums
shall not be imposed on children in households at or below ((two
hundred)) one hundred thirty-eight percent of the federal poverty
level.
(2) The authority must seek a waiver to implement cost-sharing
levels similar to the cost-sharing applied to the basic health
population in the bridge waiver, for those with similar incomes.

Sec. 303 RCW 74.09.510 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 9 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 15 s 25 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Medical assistance may be provided in accordance with eligibility
requirements established by the authority, as defined in the social
security Title XIX state plan ((for mandatory categorically needy
persons)) and:
(1) Individuals who would be eligible for cash assistance except
for their institutional status;
(2) Individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who would be
eligible for medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent children and who
are in (a) foster care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing facility
or an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual
disabilities, or (d) inpatient psychiatric facilities;
(3) Individuals who:
(a) Are under twenty-one years of age;
(b) On or after July 22, 2007, were in foster care under the legal
responsibility of the department or a federally recognized tribe
located within the state; and
(c) On their eighteenth birthday, were in foster care under the
legal responsibility of the department or a federally recognized tribe
located within the state;
(4) Persons who are aged, blind, or disabled who: (a) Receive only
a state supplement, or (b) would not be eligible for cash assistance if
they were not institutionalized;
(5) Categorically eligible individuals ((who meet the income and
resource requirements of the cash assistance programs)) as defined in
the social security act;
(6) Individuals who are enrolled in managed health care systems,
who have otherwise lost eligibility for medical assistance, but who
have not completed a current six-month enrollment in a managed health
care system, and who are eligible for federal financial participation
under Title XIX of the social security act;
(7) Children and pregnant women allowed by federal statute for whom
funding is appropriated;
(8) Working individuals with disabilities authorized under section
1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act for whom funding is
appropriated;
(9) Other individuals eligible for medical services under ((RCW
74.09.035 based on age, blindness, or disability and income and
resources standards for medical care services and)) RCW 74.09.700 for
whom federal financial participation is available under Title XIX of
the social security act;
(10) Persons allowed by section 1931 of the social security act for
whom funding is appropriated; and
(11) Women who: (a) Are under sixty-five years of age; (b) have
been screened for breast and cervical cancer under the national breast
and cervical cancer early detection program administered by the
department of health or tribal entity and have been identified as
needing treatment for breast or cervical cancer; and (c) are not
otherwise covered by health insurance. Medical assistance provided
under this subsection is limited to the period during which the woman
requires treatment for breast or cervical cancer, and is subject to any
conditions or limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations act.
The program is closed to new enrollees after December 31, 2013, but
enrollees receiving treatment may complete treatment or transfer to
more comprehensive coverage available through the medicaid expansion.

Sec. 304 RCW 74.09.522 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 29, 2011 1st
sp.s. c 9 s 2, and 2011 c 316 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Managed health care system" means any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring
organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by
contract health care services covered under this chapter and rendered
by licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated basis and that meets the
requirements of section 1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal
social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under
section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(b) "Nonparticipating provider" means a person, health care
provider, practitioner, facility, or entity, acting within their scope
of practice, that does not have a written contract to participate in a
managed health care system's provider network, but provides health care
services to enrollees of programs authorized under this chapter whose
health care services are provided by the managed health care system.
(2) The authority shall enter into agreements with managed health
care systems to provide health care services to ((recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families)) medical assistance enrollees
under the following conditions:
(a) ((Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand
recipients statewide;
(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of
all recipients of temporary assistance for needy families;
(c))) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the
federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems
in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their
enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the authority may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of
a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the authority shall not restrict a
recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as
established by the authority by rule;
(((d))) (b) By January 1, 2015, enrollees in the medicaid expansion
defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(1)(A)(i)(VIII),
must be provided a choice of plan consistent with the enrollment
practices offered other enrollees processed by the health benefit
exchange: PROVIDED, That the authority report to the legislature on
adverse impacts that may necessitate program modification;
(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating
managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number
of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons
served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the
authority under federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(((e))) (d)(i) In negotiating with managed health care systems the
authority shall adopt a uniform procedure to enter into contractual
arrangements, to be included in contracts issued or renewed on or after
January 1, 2012, including:
(A) Standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;
(B) The financial integrity of the responding system;
(C) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care
management within health homes;
(D) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that,
by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and
inpatient use; and
(E) Promoting provider participation in the program of training and
technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions
described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocation of funds to support
provider participation in the training, unless the managed care system
is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in place for
chronic care management.
(ii)(A) Health home services contracted for under this subsection
may be prioritized to enrollees with complex, high cost, or multiple
chronic conditions.
(B) Contracts that include the items in (((e))) (d)(i)(C) through
(E) of this subsection must not exceed the rates that would be paid in
the absence of these provisions;
(((f))) (e) The authority shall seek waivers from federal
requirements as necessary to implement this chapter;
(((g))) (f) The authority shall, wherever possible, enter into
prepaid capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if
this is not possible or feasible, the authority may enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;
(((h))) (g) The authority shall define those circumstances under
which a managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan
services and assure that recipients shall not be charged for such
services;
(((i))) (h) Nothing in this section prevents the authority from
entering into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to
receive services under this chapter; and
(((j))) (i) The ((department)) authority must consult with the
federal center for medicare and medicaid innovation and seek funding
opportunities to support health homes.
(3)(a) Contracts must incorporate accountability measures that
monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and may include an
expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that
documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of
health improvements and outcome measures.
(b) Contracts may allow plans to offer small incentives for
enrollees to participate in prevention and wellness activities.
(4) The authority shall ensure that publicly supported community
health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent
and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems
are seriously considered as contractors. The authority shall
coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter
70.47 RCW.
(((4))) (5) The authority shall work jointly with the state of
Oregon and other states in this geographical region in order to develop
recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and
the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while
controlling related costs.
(((5))) (6) The legislature finds that competition in the managed
health care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence
of a large number of managed health care system options for medicaid
clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on
prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and
disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized.
To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall
guide the authority in its healthy options managed health care
purchasing efforts:
(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to
contract with the authority to the extent that minimum contracting
requirements defined by the authority are met, at payment rates that
enable the authority to operate as far below appropriated spending
levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this
section.
(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of
contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not
voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:
(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income
populations;
(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;
(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services
offered to enrollees;
(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services,
including ability to supply an adequate provider network;
(v) Payment rates; and
(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract
requirements established by the authority, including consideration of
past and current performance and participation in other state or
federal health programs as a contractor.
(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year
contracting periods.
(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving
low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the
contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.
(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet
state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state
laws. The authority shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net
worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health
carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the
Washington state health care authority to take action under a contract
upon finding that a contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes
the contractor's ability to meet its contract obligations.
(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the authority and
contract bidders or the authority and contracting carriers related to
the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be
clearly set out in the procurement document.
(((6))) (7) The authority may apply the principles set forth in
subsection (((5))) (6) of this section to its managed health care
purchasing efforts on behalf of clients receiving supplemental security
income benefits to the extent appropriate.
(((7))) (8) A managed health care system shall pay a
nonparticipating provider that provides a service covered under this
chapter to the system's enrollee no more than the lowest amount paid
for that service under the managed health care system's contracts with
similar providers in the state.
(((8))) (9) For services covered under this chapter to medical
assistance or medical care services enrollees and provided on or after
August 24, 2011, nonparticipating providers must accept as payment in
full the amount paid by the managed health care system under subsection
(((7))) (8) of this section in addition to any deductible, coinsurance,
or copayment that is due from the enrollee for the service provided.
An enrollee is not liable to any nonparticipating provider for covered
services, except for amounts due for any deductible, coinsurance, or
copayment under the terms and conditions set forth in the managed
health care system contract to provide services under this section.
(((9))) (10) Pursuant to federal managed care access standards, 42
C.F.R. Sec. 438, managed health care systems must maintain a network of
appropriate providers that is supported by written agreements
sufficient to provide adequate access to all services covered under the
contract with the ((department)) authority, including hospital-based
physician services. The ((department)) authority will monitor and
periodically report on the proportion of services provided by
contracted providers and nonparticipating providers, by county, for
each managed health care system to ensure that managed health care
systems are meeting network adequacy requirements. No later than
January 1st of each year, the ((department)) authority will review and
report its findings to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of
the legislature for the preceding state fiscal year.
(((10))) (11) Subsections (((7))) (8) through (((9))) (10) of this
section expire July 1, 2016.
(12) The authority must develop contract performance measures that
demonstrate meaningful measurement of enrollee health status and
wellness, efforts by the managed care plan to increase enrollee
participation in meaningful activities including a wellness visit, and
application of evidence-based practices. The performance measures
shall assist the authority and the legislature in monitoring managed
care plan accountability and monitoring for limited access to
appropriate care or fraud.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 74.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The authority, in cooperation with the department, must
complete a study on the integration of the behavioral health system
into the medical purchasing. The medicaid expansion and the
implementation of mental health parity in the medical benefits provide
the natural opportunity to redesign the medical package and align the
delivery systems to ensure enrollees can access the full scope of
medical care, including mental health services and chemical dependency
services, as part of their comprehensive medical package.
(2) The integration of the behavioral health services may include
contracting with the regional support networks as providers within the
managed care contracts, or other community-based delivery strategies
that ensure the full range of care is available to enrollees, while
providing an accountable contract to monitor performance and manage
costs efficiently and effectively.
(3) The study must identify the pathway to integration with a focus
on administrative efficiency, seamless delivery of care for enrollees,
and critical connectivity with social support systems, crisis
intervention systems, and criminal justice systems.
(4) The study must be submitted to the governor and the legislature
by October 1, 2014, and must be submitted with recommendations for the
necessary statutory changes and the budget transition.

PART IV
MONITORING CROWD-OUT
Sec. 401 RCW 74.09.053 and 2009 c 568 s 6 and 2009 c 479 s 62 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in November 2012, the department of social and health
services, in coordination with the health care authority, shall by
November 15th of each year report to the legislature:
(a) The number of medical assistance recipients who: (i) Upon
enrollment or recertification had reported being employed, and
beginning with the 2008 report, the month and year they reported being
hired; or (ii) upon enrollment or recertification had reported being
the dependent of someone who was employed, and beginning with the 2008
report, the month and year they reported the employed person was hired.
For recipients identified under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, the
department shall report the basis for their medical assistance
eligibility, including but not limited to family medical coverage,
transitional medical assistance, children's medical coverage, aged
coverage, or coverage for persons with disabilities; member months; and
the total cost to the state for these recipients, expressed as general
fund-state and general fund-federal dollars. The information shall be
reported by employer size for employers having more than fifty
employees as recipients or with dependents as recipients. This
information shall be provided for the preceding January and June of
that year.
(b) The following aggregated information: (i) The number of
employees who are recipients or with dependents as recipients by
private ((and governmental)) employers; (ii) the number of employees
who are recipients or with dependents as recipients by employer size
for employers with fifty or fewer employees, fifty-one to one hundred
employees, one hundred one to one thousand employees, one thousand one
to five thousand employees and more than five thousand employees; and
(iii) the number of employees who are recipients or with dependents as
recipients by industry type.
(2) For each aggregated classification, the report will include the
number of hours worked, the number of department of social and health
services covered lives, and the total cost to the state for these
recipients. This information shall be for each quarter of the
preceding year.
(3) Beginning in November 2015, reports must include information on
the medicaid enrollees that may have dropped employer coverage. Data
must be gathered to monitor any crowd-out of employer coverage related
to the expansion of medicaid coverage.
(4) Crowd-out data should be shared with the Washington state
institute for public policy for monitoring and inclusion in their grant
research on medicaid, and the agency must work with the United States
health and human services department to explore alternatives that may
allow an efficient method of providing premium assistance and help
enrollees retain their employer coverage or other private coverage if
cost-effective for the state.

PART V
REPEALERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed, effective December 31, 2013:
(1) RCW 74.09.035 (Medical care services -- Eligibility, standards--Limits) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6, 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 3, & 2011 c
284 s 3;
(2) RCW 70.47.002 (Intent -- 2002 c 2) and 2002 c 2 s 1;
(3) RCW 70.47.005 (Transfer power, duties, and functions to
Washington state health care authority) and 1993 c 492 s 201;
(4) RCW 70.47.010 (Legislative findings -- Purpose -- Director to
coordinate eligibility) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 82, 2009 c 568 s 1,
2000 c 79 s 42, 1993 c 492 s 208, & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 3;
(5) RCW 70.47.015 (Enrollment -- Findings -- Intent -- Enrollee premium
share -- Expedited application and enrollment process -- Commission for
insurance producers) and 2009 c 479 s 49, 2008 c 217 s 99, 1997 c 337
s 1, & 1995 c 265 s 1;
(6) RCW 70.47.020 (Definitions) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 83, 2011
1st sp.s. c 9 s 3, 2011 c 284 s 1, 2011 c 205 s 1, 2009 c 568 s 2, 2007
c 259 s 35, 2005 c 188 s 2, 2004 c 192 s 1, 2000 c 79 s 43, 1997 c 335
s 1, & 1997 c 245 s 5;
(7) RCW 70.47.030 (Basic health plan trust account -- Basic health
plan subscription account) and 2004 c 192 s 2, 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s
913, 1993 c 492 s 210, & 1992 c 232 s 907;
(8) RCW 70.47.040 (Basic health plan -- Health care authority head to
be administrator -- Joint operations) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 7, 1993 c
492 s 211, & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 6;
(9) RCW 70.47.050 (Rules) and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 7;
(10) RCW 70.47.060 (Powers and duties of administrator -- Schedule of
services -- Premiums, copayments, subsidies -- Enrollment) and 2011 c 284
s 2, 2009 c 568 s 3, 2007 c 259 s 36, 2006 c 343 s 9, 2004 c 192 s 3,
2001 c 196 s 13, & 2000 c 79 s 34;
(11) RCW 70.47.0601 (Income determination -- Unemployment
compensation) and 2011 c 4 s 18;
(12) RCW 70.47.070 (Benefits from other coverages not reduced) and
2009 c 568 s 4 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 9;
(13) RCW 70.47.080 (Enrollment of applicants -- Participation
limitations) and 1993 c 492 s 213 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 10;
(14) RCW 70.47.090 (Removal of enrollees) and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s
11;
(15) RCW 70.47.100 (Participation by a managed health care system--Expiration of subsections) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 9 s 4, 2011 c 316 s 5,
2009 c 568 s 5, 2004 c 192 s 4, 2000 c 79 s 35, & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s
12;
(16) RCW 70.47.110 (Enrollment of medical assistance recipients)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 84, 1991 sp.s. c 4 s 3, & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5
s 13;
(17) RCW 70.47.115 (Enrollment of persons in timber impact areas)
and 1992 c 21 s 7 & 1991 c 315 s 22;
(18) RCW 70.47.120 (Administrator -- Contracts for services) and 1997
c 337 s 7 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 14;
(19) RCW 70.47.130 (Exemption from insurance code) and 2009 c 298
s 4, 2004 c 115 s 2, 2000 c 5 s 21, 1997 c 337 s 8, 1994 c 309 s 6, &
1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 15;
(20) RCW 70.47.140 (Reservation of legislative power) and 1987 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 2;
(21) RCW 70.47.150 (Confidentiality) and 2005 c 274 s 336 & 1990 c
54 s 1;
(22) RCW 70.47.160 (Right of individuals to receive services -- Right
of providers, carriers, and facilities to refuse to participate in or
pay for services for reason of conscience or religion -- Requirements)
and 1995 c 266 s 3;
(23) RCW 70.47.170 (Annual reporting requirement) and 2009 c 568 s
7 & 2006 c 264 s 1;
(24) RCW 70.47.200 (Mental health services -- Definition -- Coverage
required, when) and 2005 c 6 s 6;
(25) RCW 70.47.201 (Mental health services -- Rules) and 2005 c 6 s
11;
(26) RCW 70.47.210 (Prostate cancer screening) and 2006 c 367 s 7;
(27) RCW 70.47.220 (Increase in reimbursement rates not applicable)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 15;
(28) RCW 70.47.230 (Payments to nonparticipating providers) and
2011 1st sp.s. c 9 s 5;
(29) RCW 70.47.240 (Discontinuation of health coverage -- Preexisting
condition) and 2012 c 64 s 3;
(30) RCW 70.47.250 (Federal basic health option -- Report to
legislature -- Certification -- Director's findings -- Program's guiding
principles) and 2012 c 87 s 15;
(31) RCW 70.47.900 (Short title) and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1;
(32) RCW 70.47.901 (Severability -- 1987 1st ex.s. c 5) and 1987 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 26; and
(33) RCW 70.47.902 (Construction -- Chapter applicable to state
registered domestic partnerships -- 2009 c 521) and 2009 c 521 s 151.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Section 303 of this act takes effect
December 31, 2013.

--- END ---