BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Part I of this act addresses providing
greater flexibility to school districts by enabling them to fully
realign resources around the evidence-based practices that will lead to
better student achievement. Additionally, reforms to compensation
policies will be initiated.
Part II of this act addresses the celebration of school district,
school, and student success through recognition of the achievement with
an awards program and a rewards program for innovation. Additionally,
an inventory of research-based and evidence-based practices will be
developed to guide school districts as they implement improvements.
Part III of this act addresses school discipline and school
expulsion. The legislature intends to provide school districts with a
model policy to help standardize these disciplinary practices and data
collection of suspensions and expulsions. The legislature further
intends to create opportunities for reentry and reengagement in school
for long-term suspended or expelled students through an individually
tailored plan.

PART I
SCHOOL DISTRICT FLEXIBILITY
Sec. 101 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2010 c 235 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service.
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4)(a) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff
may exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities,
for incentives, or for implementing specific measurable innovative
activities, including professional development, specified by the school
district to: (((a))) (i) Close one or more achievement gaps, (((b)))
(ii) focus on development of science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM) learning opportunities, or (((c))) (iii) provide
arts education. Beginning September 1, 2011, school districts shall
annually provide a brief description of the innovative activities
included in any supplemental contract to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall summarize the district information and
submit an annual report to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. Supplemental contracts shall not cause
the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380.
No district may enter into a supplemental contract under this
subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic
education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(b)(i) Beginning July 1, 2013, the excess salary and benefits
authorized under (a) of this subsection shall not exceed the excess
salary and benefits, measured as the percentage over the base salary,
provided to certificated instructional staff by separate contract
during the 2012-13 school year.
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2015, school districts may apply to the
state board of education to increase the percentage over base salary
provided. The state board shall authorize such increases solely based
on the number of schools in the district that receive an "A," "B," or
"C" under the school-grading program in section 202 of this act. The
state board of education shall create an application process, criteria
addressing the number of schools that are required to receive an "A,"
"B," or "C" to justify an increase, and the range of increases that may
be authorized that corresponds to that criteria.
(5) Strategic innovative grants awarded under section 205 of this
act are not subject to this section.
(6) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 ((and)), 28A.400.275, and 28A.400.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 Section 101 of this act does not affect or
impair any collective bargaining agreements in effect on the effective
date of this section between an employer and educational employees or
employee organization under chapter 41.59 RCW. Any collective
bargaining agreement entered into or renewed after the effective date
of this section shall be consistent with section 101 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 RCW 28A.400.201 (Enhanced salary
allocation model for educator development and certification -- Technical
working group -- Report and recommendation) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s
468, 2010 c 236 s 7, & 2009 c 548 s 601 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) A joint select committee on educator
compensation is created to provide oversight, monitoring, and direction
to revise the current salary allocation schedule to create a new
educator compensation model for certificated instructional staff and
principals that links the educator compensation policies of the state
to research-based practices shown to increase an educator's
effectiveness and positive impact on student learning. The new model
is intended to have a more flexible structure, be more data-driven, and
encourage innovation by using salary differentials to reflect effective
educator skills and working conditions.
(2) The members of the joint select committee shall be as follows:
(a) The chair and the ranking minority member of the house of
representatives committee on appropriations;
(b) The chair and the ranking minority member of the house of
representatives committee on education;
(c) The chair and the ranking minority member of the senate
committee on ways and means; and
(d) The chair and the ranking minority member of the senate
committee on early learning and K-12 education.
(3) A chair may appoint a designee to function in his or her place.
(4) The chair of the house of representatives committee on
appropriations and the chair of the senate ways and means committee
shall convene the initial meeting.
(5) The staff of the house of representatives committee on
appropriations and the staff of the senate ways and means committee
shall provide staff support for any public meetings.
(6) The members of the joint select committee must be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Expenses of the
committee must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of
representatives, and committee expenditures are subject to approval by
the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of
representatives executive rules committee, or their successor
committees.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2016.

PART II
RECOGNITION AND REFORMS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The legislature finds that there is a need
to recognize highly productive public schools and reward innovation.
The legislature further finds that there is a parallel need to assist
public schools that are struggling. The legislature intends to address
both of these needs by creating a recognition program, a grant program
to reward innovation, and a locally administered school reform program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The primary purposes of a school-grading program are to enhance
the learning gains of all students, provide feedback to schools and
school districts, supply parents and community members with
understandable information about their schools, and provide information
regarding school accountability and recognition.
(2) Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, the state board of
education must implement a school-grading program that identifies
schools as having one of the following grades:
(a) "A" for schools making excellent progress;
(b) "B" for schools making above average progress;
(c) "C" for schools making satisfactory progress;
(d) "D" for schools making less than satisfactory progress; and
(e) "F" for schools failing to make adequate progress.
(3) Each school that has students who are tested using the
assessments administered statewide in reading, writing, mathematics,
and science required under RCW 28A.655.061, 28A.655.066, and
28A.655.070 shall earn a school grade, except as follows:
(a) To protect the privacy of students, schools, and districts,
schools testing fewer than ten students in a grade level; and
(b) A school that serves any combination of students in
kindergarten through grade three shall not earn a school grade based on
test scores because its students are not tested. Such schools shall be
included in the school-grading program by earning the grade designation
of the K-3 feeder-pattern school identified by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and verified by the school
district. A school feeder pattern exists if at least sixty percent of
the students in the school serving a combination of students in
kindergarten through grade three are scheduled to be assigned to the
graded school. The school with students in kindergarten through grade
three will earn the grade earned by its feeder-pattern school.
(4)(a) A school's grade shall be determined by the state board of
education using the accountability index, cooperatively developed under
RCW 28A.657.110 by the state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The index must measure the
increase in student achievement on the statewide administered
assessments in reading, writing, mathematics, and science; and the
reduction in student achievement gaps. The index may include other
student outcome measurements.
(b) For schools with any combination of grades nine, ten, eleven,
and twelve, at least fifty percent of a school's grade shall be
determined using the accountability index and the remaining percentage
shall be based on the following factors, if the factors are not already
included in the accountability index:
(i) The high school graduation rate of the school as calculated by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(ii) As valid data becomes available, the performance and
participation of the school's students in AP courses, international
baccalaureate courses, and dual enrollment courses; and student
achievement of national industry certification;
(iii) Postsecondary readiness of all of the school's on-time
graduates as measured by the SAT, the ACT, or a placement test; and
(iv) The high school graduation rate of at-risk students.
(5)(a) The state board of education shall adopt appropriate
criteria for each school grade.
(b) The criteria must give added weight to student achievement in
reading.
(c) Schools earning a grade of "C" or higher must demonstrate that
at least half of the students in the school who are in the lowest
twenty-fifth percentile in reading and mathematics on the statewide
administered assessments are making adequate progress; if not, the
school letter grade is decreased by one letter.
(d) For schools with any combination of grades nine, ten, eleven,
and twelve, the criteria for school grades must also give added weight
to the graduation rate of all eligible at-risk students. In order for
a high school to earn a grade of "A," the school must demonstrate that
its at-risk students are making adequate progress.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
annually report each school district's grade to the governor and the
legislature. A school district's grade must be calculated using
student performance and learning gains data on statewide assessments
used for determining school grades under subsection (4) of this section
for each eligible student enrolled for a full school year in the
district. This calculation methodology captures information describing
each eligible student in the district who may have transferred among
schools within the district or who is enrolled in a school that does
not earn a grade.
(7) By August 1, 2014, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall adapt the model school performance report and the
agency web site originally developed under RCW 28A.655.110 to include
each school district's grade and each school's grade. Each school
district's and school's report card shall be published annually, with
the school and district grade history, by the agency on its web site.
(8) Each school district must include in its annual school
performance report required under RCW 28A.655.110 each school's grade
and must also include the school district's grade.
(9) For the purposes of this section, "at-risk students" means
students scoring at level one or level two on the eighth grade
statewide administered reading and mathematics assessment.
(10) The state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules, as necessary,
to administer this section.
(11)(a) The school-grading program shall be a pilot program during
the 2013-14 school year. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall conduct the pilot program in five geographically
diverse school districts, including urban, rural, large, and small
districts.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract with an organization in Washington state that conducts and
disseminates action research, partners with state and local agencies
and organizations, and provides data services and support for school
and district improvement planning to conduct an independent evaluation
of the school-grading pilot program. The evaluation shall be submitted
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
governor, and the legislature by December 1, 2014. The evaluation must
include recommendations on any necessary modifications, if any, to the
criteria or the process used to grade schools and districts.
(12) The state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction must make all the modifications
recommended in the evaluation and implement the school-grading program
statewide in the 2014-15 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2014, the Washington institute for public policy
shall compile an in-depth cost-benefit analysis and list of the most
effective research-proven practices and programs for the delivery of K-12 public school instruction. The analysis must include a prioritized
list based on positive impact on student performance, the highest and
best use of resources, and the largest return on investment. The
purpose of this effort is to inform executive and legislative branch
decisions in making future additional K-12 funding enhancements. The
list shall be updated every two years.
(2) By August 1, 2014, the Washington institute for public policy
shall prepare an initial inventory of evidence-based and research-based
effective practices, activities, and programs for use by school
districts in the delivery of instruction. The inventory must include
information on the best methods and practices for providing educational
opportunities for students in specific categorical programs of basic
education and must also include information on effective educator and
school leadership compensation systems. In addition, the inventory
must include information on evidence-based and research-based practices
for closing opportunity gaps and for the best and highest use of
learning assistance program funds to serve underachieving students or
students in poverty. To the extent possible, this information will be
informed by a review of successful schools meeting or exceeding
anticipated educational outcomes based on demographic challenges. The
inventory must be updated every two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The school-grading program created in section 202 of this act
must be used to recognize highly productive public schools.
(2) Beginning with the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the
superintendent of public instruction shall implement a school
recognition program for public schools. Schools that are designated as
making excellent progress and thereby receiving an "A" grade under
section 202 of this act shall receive the Washington achievement award
to be presented jointly by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the state board of education at an annual award
ceremony. Award winning schools shall receive a banner and acrylic
award to proudly display in their buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The strategic innovative grant account is created in the state
treasury to be used for awarding grants to public school districts for
the implementation of effective educator and school leadership
compensation systems. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The account may receive gifts, grants, and donations
from individuals or public or private entities.
(2) By August 1st of each odd-numbered year, school districts may
submit applications to the professional educator standards board for
strategic innovative grants for the fiscal biennium. The applications
may include plans for any or all of the following to:
(a) Reward teachers and other educators who help students make
significant academic progress;
(b) Provide incentives for team and individual staff performance in
schools achieving educational and other outcomes specified by the
school district;
(c) Provide monetary incentives to effective teachers who have
essential expertise and who are willing to transfer employment to
positions at hard-to-staff or low-performing schools;
(d) Provide monetary or other rewards to effective teachers who are
assigned to teach in critical shortage areas or subjects;
(e) Augment any existing funds or reallocated funds to maximize the
amount of remuneration directed at strategic innovative research-based
compensation systems; and
(f) Offer bonus payments to school building leaders based on
improved teacher and student performance.
(3) Each application under subsection (2) of this section must
include appropriate achievement goals for student academic progress and
plans for the professional development of the designated teachers and
other staff. Any teacher or certificated instructional staff person
receiving an award under this section must be evaluated at least level
3 - proficient under RCW 28A.405.100.
(4)(a) The professional educator standards board, in consultation
with the Washington state institute for public policy, shall award
grants to school districts based on the level of innovation and the
degree to which the proposal implements compensation systems that are
evidence-based and research-based.
(b) By December 1st of each odd-numbered year, the professional
educator standards board must report to the education and fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate regarding the
amounts and the purposes of the grants that are awarded.
(5) The monetary awards granted under this section are not subject
to the limitations of RCW 28A.400.200 and may not be used to supplant
any new or existing state, federal, or local funding for compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 41.56
RCW to read as follows:
All collective bargaining agreements entered into between a school
district employer and school district employees under this chapter
after the effective date of this section, and bargaining agreements
existing on the effective date of this section but renewed or extended
after the effective date of this section, shall be consistent with
section 205 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 41.59
RCW to read as follows:
All collective bargaining agreements entered into between a school
district employer and school district employees under this chapter
after the effective date of this section, and bargaining agreements
existing on the effective date of this section but renewed or extended
after the effective date of this section, shall be consistent with
section 205 of this act.

PART III
SCHOOL SUSPENSIONS AND EXPULSIONS
Sec. 301 RCW 28A.600.015 and 2006 c 263 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and
distribute to all school districts lawful and reasonable rules
prescribing the substantive and procedural due process guarantees of
pupils in the common schools. Such rules shall authorize a school
district to use informal due process procedures in connection with the
short-term suspension of students to the extent constitutionally
permissible: PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public instruction
deems the interest of students to be adequately protected. When a
student suspension or expulsion is appealed, the rules shall authorize
a school district to impose the suspension or expulsion temporarily
after an initial hearing for no more than ten consecutive school days
or until the appeal is decided, whichever is earlier. Any days that
the student is temporarily suspended or expelled before the appeal is
decided shall be applied to the term of the student suspension or
expulsion and shall not limit or extend the term of the student
suspension or expulsion. An expulsion or suspension of a student may
not be for an indefinite period of time.
(2) Short-term suspension procedures may be used for suspensions of
students up to and including, ten consecutive school days.
(3) Emergency expulsions must end or be converted to another form
of corrective action within ten school days from the date of the
emergency removal from school. Notice and due process rights must be
provided when an emergency expulsion is converted to another form of
corrective action.

Sec. 302 RCW 28A.600.020 and 2006 c 263 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.600.010 shall be
interpreted to ensure that the optimum learning atmosphere of the
classroom is maintained, and that the highest consideration is given to
the judgment of qualified certificated educators regarding conditions
necessary to maintain the optimum learning atmosphere.
(2) Any student who creates a disruption of the educational process
in violation of the building disciplinary standards while under a
teacher's immediate supervision may be excluded by the teacher from his
or her individual classroom and instructional or activity area for all
or any portion of the balance of the school day, or up to the following
two days, or until the principal or designee and teacher have
conferred, whichever occurs first. Except in emergency circumstances,
the teacher first must attempt one or more alternative forms of
corrective action. In no event without the consent of the teacher may
an excluded student return to the class during the balance of that
class or activity period or up to the following two days, or until the
principal or his or her designee and the teacher have conferred.
(3) In order to preserve a beneficial learning environment for all
students and to maintain good order and discipline in each classroom,
every school district board of directors shall provide that written
procedures are developed for administering discipline at each school
within the district. Such procedures shall be developed with the
participation of parents and the community, and shall provide that the
teacher, principal or designee, and other authorities designated by the
board of directors, make every reasonable attempt to involve the parent
or guardian and the student in the resolution of student discipline
problems. Such procedures shall provide that students may be excluded
from their individual classes or activities for periods of time in
excess of that provided in subsection (2) of this section if such
students have repeatedly disrupted the learning of other students. The
procedures must be consistent with the rules of the superintendent of
public instruction and must provide for early involvement of parents in
attempts to improve the student's behavior.
(4) The procedures shall assure, pursuant to RCW 28A.400.110, that
all staff work cooperatively toward consistent enforcement of proper
student behavior throughout each school as well as within each
classroom.
(5)(a) A principal shall consider imposing long-term suspension or
expulsion as a sanction when deciding the appropriate disciplinary
action for a student who, after July 27, 1997:
(((a))) (i) Engages in two or more violations within a three-year
period of RCW 9A.46.120, 28A.320.135, 28A.600.455, 28A.600.460,
28A.635.020, 28A.600.020, 28A.635.060, 9.41.280, or 28A.320.140; or
(((b))) (ii) Engages in one or more of the offenses listed in RCW
13.04.155.
(b) The principal shall communicate the disciplinary action taken
by the principal to the school personnel who referred the student to
the principal for disciplinary action.
(6) Any corrective action involving a suspension or expulsion from
school for more than ten days must have an end date of not more than
one calendar year from the time of corrective action. Districts shall
make reasonable efforts to assist students and parents in returning to
an educational setting prior to and no later than the end date of the
corrective action. Where warranted based on public health or safety,
a school district may petition the superintendent of public
instruction, pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, for authorization to exceed the
one calendar year limitation provided in this subsection. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules outlining
the limited circumstances in which a school district may petition the
superintendent of public instruction to exceed the one calendar year
limitation, including safeguards to ensure that the district has made
every effort to plan for the student's return to school and that the
student's extended expulsion from the district does not impair the
student's constitutional right to education.
(7) Nothing in this section prevents a public school district,
educational service district, the Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, or the state school for the blind if it has
suspended or expelled a student from the student's regular school
setting from providing educational services to the student in an
alternative setting or modifying the suspension or expulsion on a case-by-case basis.

Sec. 303 RCW 28A.600.410 and 1992 c 155 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state of Washington excludes tens of thousands of students from
school each year due to out-of-school suspensions and expulsions. Out-of-school suspensions and expulsions contribute to poor academic
achievement, lower graduation rates, and higher dropout rates. It is
the intent of the legislature to minimize the use of out-of-school
suspension and expulsion and its impact on student achievement by
reducing the number of days that students are excluded from school due
to disciplinary action. Student behavior should not result in the
permanent loss of educational opportunity in the public school system.
School districts are encouraged to find alternatives to suspension
including reducing the length of a student's suspension conditioned by
the commencement of counseling or other treatment services. Consistent
with current law, the conditioning of a student's suspension does not
obligate the school district to pay for the counseling or other
treatment services except for those stipulated and agreed to by the
district at the inception of the suspension.

Sec. 304 RCW 28A.300.046 and 2011 c 288 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
establishing a standard definition of student absence from school. In
adopting the definition, the superintendent shall review current
practices in Washington school districts, definitions used in other
states, and any national standards or definitions used by the national
center for education statistics or other national groups. The
superintendent shall also consult with the building bridges work group
established under RCW 28A.175.075.
(b) Using the definition of student absence adopted under this
section, the superintendent shall establish an indicator for measuring
student attendance in high schools for purposes of the PASS program
under RCW 28A.175.130.
(2)(a) The K-12 data governance group under RCW 28A.300.507 shall
establish the parameters and an implementation schedule for statewide
collection through the comprehensive education and data research system
of: (i) Student attendance data using the definitions of student
absence adopted under this section; and (ii) student discipline data
with a focus on suspensions and expulsions from school.
(b) ((At a minimum,)) Student suspension and expulsion data
collected for the purposes of this subsection (2) must be:
(i) Made publicly available and easily accessible on the
superintendent of public instruction's web site; and
(ii) Disaggregated and cross-tabulated as established under RCW
28A.300.042.
(c) School districts must collect and submit student attendance
data and student discipline data for high school students through the
comprehensive education and data research system for purposes of the
PASS program under RCW 28A.175.130 beginning in the 2012-13 school
year.

Sec. 305 RCW 28A.300.042 and 2009 c 468 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction in this title must be disaggregated by at least
the following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American
Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low
income, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and
students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of
1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).
(2) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as
required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to disaggregation by subgroups
including:
(a) Gender;
(b) Foster care;
(c) Homeless;
(d) School district;
(e) School;
(f) Grade level;
(g) Behavior infraction code, including:
(i) Bullying;
(ii) Tobacco;
(iii) Alcohol;
(iv) Illicit drug;
(v) Fighting without major injury;
(vi) Violence without major injury;
(vii) Violence with major injury;
(viii) Possession of a weapon; and
(ix) Other behavior resulting from a short-term or long-term
suspension, expulsion, or interim alternative education setting
intervention;
(h) Intervention applied, including:
(i) Short-term suspension;
(ii) Long-term suspension;
(iii) Emergency expulsion;
(iv) Expulsion;
(v) Interim alternative education settings;
(vi) No intervention applied; and
(vii) Other intervention applied that is not described in this
subsection (2)(h);
(i) Number of days a student is suspended or expelled, to be
counted in half or full days; and
(j) Any other categories added at a future date by the data
governance group.
(3) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as
required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to cross-tabulation at a
minimum by the following:
(a) School and district;
(b) Race, low income, special education, transitional bilingual,
migrant, foster care, homeless, students covered by section 504 of the
federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794),
and categories to be added in the future;
(c) Behavior infraction code; and
(d) Intervention applied.

Sec. 306 RCW 28A.300.507 and 2009 c 548 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A K-12 data governance group shall be established within the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to assist in the
design and implementation of a K-12 education data improvement system
for financial, student, and educator data. It is the intent that the
data system reporting specifically serve requirements for teachers,
parents, superintendents, school boards, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the legislature, and the public.
(2) The K-12 data governance group shall include representatives of
the education data center, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, and school district staff, including information
technology staff. Additional entities with expertise in education data
may be included in the K-12 data governance group.
(3) The K-12 data governance group shall:
(a) Identify the critical research and policy questions that need
to be addressed by the K-12 education data improvement system;
(b) Identify reports and other information that should be made
available on the internet in addition to the reports identified in
subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Create a comprehensive needs requirement document detailing the
specific information and technical capacity needed by school districts
and the state to meet the legislature's expectations for a
comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system as described under
RCW 28A.655.210;
(d) Conduct a gap analysis of current and planned information
compared to the needs requirement document, including an analysis of
the strengths and limitations of an education data system and programs
currently used by school districts and the state, and specifically the
gap analysis must look at the extent to which the existing data can be
transformed into canonical form and where existing software can be used
to meet the needs requirement document;
(e) Focus on financial and cost data necessary to support the new
K-12 financial models and funding formulas, including any necessary
changes to school district budgeting and accounting, and on assuring
the capacity to link data across financial, student, and educator
systems; and
(f) Define the operating rules and governance structure for K-12
data collections, ensuring that data systems are flexible and able to
adapt to evolving needs for information, within an objective and
orderly data governance process for determining when changes are needed
and how to implement them. Strong consideration must be made to the
current practice and cost of migration to new requirements. The
operating rules should delineate the coordination, delegation, and
escalation authority for data collection issues, business rules, and
performance goals for each K-12 data collection system, including:
(i) Defining and maintaining standards for privacy and
confidentiality;
(ii) Setting data collection priorities;
(iii) Defining and updating a standard data dictionary;
(iv) Ensuring data compliance with the data dictionary;
(v) Ensuring data accuracy; and
(vi) Establishing minimum standards for school, student, financial,
and teacher data systems. Data elements may be specified "to the
extent feasible" or "to the extent available" to collect more and
better data sets from districts with more flexible software. Nothing
in RCW 43.41.400, this section, or RCW 28A.655.210 should be construed
to require that a data dictionary or reporting should be hobbled to the
lowest common set. The work of the K-12 data governance group must
specify which data are desirable. Districts that can meet these
requirements shall report the desirable data. Funding from the
legislature must establish which subset data are absolutely required.
(4)(a) The K-12 data governance group shall provide updates on its
work as requested by the education data center and the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee.
(b) The work of the K-12 data governance group shall be
periodically reviewed and monitored by the educational data center and
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
(5) To the extent data is available, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall make the following minimum
reports available on the internet. The reports must either be run on
demand against current data, or, if a static report, must have been run
against the most recent data:
(a) The percentage of data compliance and data accuracy by school
district;
(b) The magnitude of spending per student, by student estimated by
the following algorithm and reported as the detailed summation of the
following components:
(i) An approximate, prorated fraction of each teacher or human
resource element that directly serves the student. Each human resource
element must be listed or accessible through online tunneling in the
report;
(ii) An approximate, prorated fraction of classroom or building
costs used by the student;
(iii) An approximate, prorated fraction of transportation costs
used by the student; and
(iv) An approximate, prorated fraction of all other resources
within the district. District-wide components should be disaggregated
to the extent that it is sensible and economical;
(c) The cost of K-12 basic education, per student, by student, by
school district, estimated by the algorithm in (b) of this subsection,
and reported in the same manner as required in (b) of this subsection;
(d) The cost of K-12 special education services per student, by
student receiving those services, by school district, estimated by the
algorithm in (b) of this subsection, and reported in the same manner as
required in (b) of this subsection;
(e) Improvement on the statewide assessments computed as both a
percentage change and absolute change on a scale score metric by
district, by school, and by teacher that can also be filtered by a
student's length of full-time enrollment within the school district;
(f) Number of K-12 students per classroom teacher on a per teacher
basis;
(g) Number of K-12 classroom teachers per student on a per student
basis;
(h) Percentage of a classroom teacher per student on a per student
basis; and
(i) The cost of K-12 education per student by school district
sorted by federal, state, and local dollars.
(6) ((The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
preliminary report to the legislature by November 15, 2009, including
the analyses by the K-12 data governance group under subsection (3) of
this section and preliminary options for addressing identified gaps.
A final report, including a proposed phase-in plan and preliminary cost
estimates for implementation of a comprehensive data improvement system
for financial, student, and educator data shall be submitted to the
legislature by September 1, 2010.
(7))) All reports and data referenced in this section and RCW
43.41.400 and 28A.655.210 shall be made available in a manner
consistent with the technical requirements of the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee and the education data
center so that selected data can be provided to the legislature,
governor, school districts, and the public.
(((8))) (7) Reports shall contain data to the extent it is
available. All reports must include documentation of which data are
not available or are estimated. Reports must not be suppressed because
of poor data accuracy or completeness. Reports may be accompanied with
documentation to inform the reader of why some data are missing or
inaccurate or estimated.
(8) The K-12 data governance group shall examine the data collected
under the behavior infraction subgroup in RCW 28A.300.042(2)(g)(ix) and
create at least four additional behavior infraction codes including the
four most common behaviors reported under the behavior infraction
subgroup in RCW 28A.300.042(2)(g)(ix), and may create other categories
as needed, by December 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts should make efforts to have suspended or
expelled students return to the educational setting they were suspended
or expelled from as soon as possible. School districts should convene
a school reentry meeting with the student and the student's parents or
guardians within twenty days of the student's long-term suspension or
expulsion to discuss a plan to reenter and reengage the student in a
school program.
(2) In developing a reentry and reengagement plan, school districts
should consider shortening the length of time that the student is
suspended or expelled, other forms of corrective action, and supportive
interventions that aid in the student's academic success and keep the
student engaged and on track to graduate. School districts must create
a reentry and reengagement plan tailored to the student's individual
circumstances, including consideration of the incident that led to the
student's long-term suspension or expulsion. The plan should aid the
student in taking the necessary steps to remedy the situation that led
to the student's suspension or expulsion.
(3) Any reentry meetings conducted by the school district involving
the suspended or expelled student and his or her parents or guardians
are not intended to replace a petition for readmission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 (1) The Washington state school directors'
association in partnership with the office of the education ombudsman
shall seek community input and develop a model policy for school
districts to implement changes to suspension and expulsion policies.
(2) The model policy must include at a minimum: Appropriate
discipline actions for unwanted student behavior, training in cultural
sensitivity regarding school discipline policies and procedures;
prevention and intervention guidance including best practices; and
parental engagement.
(3) The model policy must be made available on the Washington state
school directors' association web site by May 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 Nothing in chapter . . ., Laws of 2013
(this act) prevents a public school district, law enforcement agencies,
or law enforcement personnel from enforcing laws protecting health and
human safety.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Sections 101, 102, 204, and 205 of this
act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Section 103 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---