BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that high quality
early learning opportunities are an important factor in lifelong
success. The legislature is committed to expanding high quality
evidence-based early learning opportunities in order to improve
educational outcomes. The legislature further finds that moving toward
effective and research-based practices are critical in achieving
educational and societal outcomes from early learning investments. The
legislature intends to continue improvements in early learning through
ongoing evaluation, application of emerging research, and enhanced
quality assurance. It is the intent of the legislature that additional
investments in early learning will be based on current information
regarding the most efficient, research-based, and cost-effective
investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) During the 2013-2015 biennium, the
department of early learning shall increase enrollments in the early
learning program established in RCW 43.215.400 by ten percent from the
2011-2013 biennium enrollments, subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose. Rates paid for early learning
program enrollments must also be increased by ten percent from the
2011-2013 biennium during the 2013-2015 biennium, subject to
availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose. The
department of early learning shall continue to review and evaluate the
contracts used to provide the early learning program to ensure the
contractors are operating research-based programs in a cost-effective
manner.
(2) The department of early learning, along with the office of
financial management, shall develop an implementation plan for
expanding the early learning program established in RCW 43.215.400,
which will include, at a minimum, the number of new enrollments to be
requested for each year, a detailed proposal for recruiting the
necessary contractors, and an oversight and evaluation design. The
department of early learning must deliver this implementation plan to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 During the 2013-2015 biennium, the
Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a
comprehensive retrospective outcome evaluation and return on investment
analysis of the early childhood program established in RCW 43.215.400.
The evaluation must assess both short-term and long-term outcomes for
participants in the program, including educational and social outcomes.
The study must also report findings from a review of the research
evidence on components of successful early education program
strategies. The study must also include an examination of family
support services provided through early childhood programs. The
institute shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2014.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.215.405 and 2010 c 231 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.450,
43.215.141 (as recodified by this act), 43.215.142 (as recodified by
this act), and 43.215.900 through 43.215.903.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW
43.215.420.
(2) "Approved programs" means those state-supported education and
special assistance programs which are recognized by the department as
meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the department to qualify
under RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.450 and 43.215.900 through
43.215.903 and are designated as eligible for funding by the department
under RCW 43.215.430 and 43.215.440.
(3) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the
needs of the child and includes education, health, and family support
services.
(4) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(5) "Eligible child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten
whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the
federal poverty level, as published annually by the federal department
of health and human services, and includes a child whose family is
eligible for public assistance, and who is not a participant in a
federal or state program providing comprehensive services; a child
eligible for special education due to disability under RCW 28A.155.020;
and may include children who are eligible under rules adopted by the
department if the number of such children equals not more than ten
percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program.
Priority for enrollment shall be given to children from families with
the lowest income, children in foster care, or to eligible children
from families with multiple needs.
(6) "Family support services" means providing opportunities for
parents to:
(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;
(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting
skills;
(c) Further their education and training;
(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;
(e) Increase their self-reliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 43.215.141 and 43.215.142 are each
recodified as sections under the subchapter heading "early childhood
education and assistance program" in chapter 43.215 RCW.

--- END ---