BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Each biennium, nearly two billion dollars in public funds are
spent on the purchase of employee insurance benefits for more than two
hundred thousand public school employees and their dependents and, of
that amount, almost one-half billion dollars is for insurance benefits
for classified employees, the majority of which are part-time
employees;
(b) Each biennium, more than two billion dollars in state revenues
are spent on the purchase of employee insurance benefits for more than
two hundred twenty-five thousand state agency and higher education
employees and their dependents covered by plans offered by the public
employees' benefits board;
(c) Beginning January 1, 2014, the federal affordable care act will
create a new marketplace for health insurance in Washington state that
includes:
(i) A health benefit exchange to enable consumers to compare
qualified health insurance options to find the plan that best meets
their needs and budget;
(ii) A requirement that plans offered on the exchange include
coverage for all essential health benefits;
(iii) Federal tax credits to make health insurance premiums more
affordable for individuals whose income is below four hundred percent
of the federal poverty level and who do not have access to an employer-provided health plan;
(iv) Federal subsidies to reduce out-of-pocket medical expenses for
persons with incomes below two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level and who do not have access to an employer-provided health
plan; and
(v) A requirement that employers with more than fifty full-time
employees offer a health benefit plan to all their full-time employees
or pay a shared-responsibility penalty;
(d) The implementation of the Washington health benefit exchange,
premium tax credits, and out-of-pocket subsidies in 2014 presents a new
opportunity for school districts and the state to provide increased
access to affordable health insurance coverage for part-time employees,
especially for the lowest-paid employees and those seeking full family
insurance coverage, in a more cost-effective manner.
(2) The legislature establishes the following goals:
(a) For school districts and the state to take advantage of the
federal affordable care act, including the Washington health benefit
exchange, premium tax credits, and subsidies to make more affordable
health benefit plans available to part-time school district and state
employees;
(b) Provide more affordable options for full family health benefits
coverage for low-income part-time employees;
(c) Dedicate a portion of the savings resulting from part-time
employees obtaining coverage and tax credits through the exchange as a
source of funding for school districts and the state to reimburse
premium or out-of-pocket costs, or for compensation increases, for
those employees;
(d) Redirect a portion of the savings from reduced state spending
for school district, state agency, and higher education part-time
employees' health benefits to other public school needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, school districts must
identify opportunities for using the plans, premium credits, and
subsidies available through the Washington health benefit exchange to
provide affordable health insurance benefits qualifying for part-time
employees.
(2) School districts must fully comply with the affordable care
act's employer shared responsibility provisions that require affordable
health benefit plan coverage be offered to all full-time employees, as
defined by federal regulations.
(3) From funding provided in the omnibus appropriations act, and
other funding sources, school districts must establish compensation
arrangements to reimburse a portion of the premium or out-of-pocket
costs of part-time employees who obtain health insurance coverage
through the Washington health benefit exchange. Such compensation may
be provided in the amount and in the form the school district
determines will best promote the goals stated in section 1 of this act.
Any compensation provided under this section shall be considered a part
of basic benefits.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.065 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for employees. In developing these
plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits; and
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities.
(3) To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan in effect on
January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit changes or
increases in employee point-of-service payments or employee premium
payments for benefits or the administration of a high deductible health
plan in conjunction with a health savings account. ((The board may
establish employee eligibility criteria which are not substantially
equivalent to employee eligibility criteria in effect on January 1,
1993.))
(4) The eligibility provisions of this subsection have effect
through December 31, 2013. Except if bargained for under chapter 41.80
RCW, the board shall design benefits and determine the terms and
conditions of employee and retired employee participation and coverage,
including establishment of eligibility criteria subject to the
requirements of this chapter. Employer groups obtaining benefits
through contractual agreement with the authority for employees defined
in RCW 41.05.011(6) (a) through (d) may contractually agree with the
authority to benefits eligibility criteria which differs from that
determined by the board. The eligibility criteria established by the
board shall be no more restrictive than the following:
(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection, an
employee is eligible for benefits from the date of employment if the
employing agency anticipates he or she will work an average of at least
eighty hours per month and for at least eight hours in each month for
more than six consecutive months. An employee determined ineligible
for benefits at the beginning of his or her employment shall become
eligible in the following circumstances:
(i) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month and for at least eight hours in each month and whose anticipated
duration of employment is revised from less than or equal to six
consecutive months to more than six consecutive months becomes eligible
when the revision is made.
(ii) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month over a period of six consecutive months and for at least eight
hours in each of those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the
first of the month following the six-month averaging period.
(b) A seasonal employee is eligible for benefits from the date of
employment if the employing agency anticipates that he or she will work
an average of at least eighty hours per month and for at least eight
hours in each month of the season. A seasonal employee determined
ineligible at the beginning of his or her employment who works an
average of at least half-time, as defined by the board, per month over
a period of six consecutive months and at least eight hours in each of
those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the first of the month
following the six-month averaging period. A benefits-eligible seasonal
employee who works a season of less than nine months shall not be
eligible for the employer contribution during the off season, but may
continue enrollment in benefits during the off season by self-paying
for the benefits. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee who works a
season of nine months or more is eligible for the employer contribution
through the off season following each season worked.
(c) Faculty are eligible as follows:
(i) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will work
half–time or more for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are eligible for benefits from the date of employment.
Eligibility shall continue until the beginning of the first full month
of the next instructional year, unless the employment relationship is
terminated, in which case eligibility shall cease the first month
following the notice of termination or the effective date of the
termination, whichever is later.
(ii) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work for
the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are
eligible for benefits at the beginning of the second consecutive
quarter or semester of employment in which he or she is anticipated to
work, or has actually worked, half-time or more. Such an employee
shall continue to receive uninterrupted employer contributions for
benefits if the employee works at least half-time in a quarter or
semester. Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work
for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period, but
who actually work half-time or more throughout the entire instructional
year, are eligible for summer or off-quarter coverage. Faculty who
have met the criteria of this subsection (4)(c)(ii), who work at least
two quarters of the academic year with an average academic year
workload of half-time or more for three quarters of the academic year,
and who have worked an average of half-time or more in each of the two
preceding academic years shall continue to receive uninterrupted
employer contributions for benefits if he or she works at least half-time in a quarter or semester or works two quarters of the academic
year with an average academic workload each academic year of half-time
or more for three quarters. Eligibility under this section ceases
immediately if this criteria is not met.
(iii) Faculty may establish or maintain eligibility for benefits by
working for more than one institution of higher education. When
faculty work for more than one institution of higher education, those
institutions shall prorate the employer contribution costs, or if
eligibility is reached through one institution, that institution will
pay the full employer contribution. Faculty working for more than one
institution must alert his or her employers to his or her potential
eligibility in order to establish eligibility.
(iv) The employing agency must provide written notice to faculty
who are potentially eligible for benefits under this subsection (4)(c)
of their potential eligibility.
(v) To be eligible for maintenance of benefits through averaging
under (c)(ii) of this subsection, faculty must provide written
notification to his or her employing agency or agencies of his or her
potential eligibility.
(d) A legislator is eligible for benefits on the date his or her
term begins. All other elected and full-time appointed officials of
the legislative and executive branches of state government are eligible
for benefits on the date his or her term begins or they take the oath
of office, whichever occurs first.
(e) A justice of the supreme court and judges of the court of
appeals and the superior courts become eligible for benefits on the
date he or she takes the oath of office.
(f) Except as provided in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection,
eligibility ceases for any employee the first of the month following
termination of the employment relationship.
(g) In determining eligibility under this section, the employing
agency may disregard training hours, standby hours, or temporary
changes in work hours as determined by the authority under this
section.
(h) Insurance coverage for all eligible employees begins on the
first day of the month following the date when eligibility for benefits
is established. If the date eligibility is established is the first
working day of a month, insurance coverage begins on that date.
(i) Eligibility for an employee whose work circumstances are
described by more than one of the eligibility categories in (a) through
(e) of this subsection shall be determined solely by the criteria of
the category that most closely describes the employee's work
circumstances.
(j) Except for an employee eligible for benefits under (b) or
(c)(ii) of this subsection, an employee who has established eligibility
for benefits under this section shall remain eligible for benefits each
month in which he or she is in pay status for eight or more hours, if
(i) he or she remains in a benefits-eligible position and (ii) leave
from the benefits-eligible position is approved by the employing
agency. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee is eligible for the
employer contribution in any month of his or her season in which he or
she is in pay status eight or more hours during that month.
Eligibility ends if these conditions are not met, the employment
relationship is terminated, or the employee voluntarily transfers to a
noneligible position.
(k) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Academic year" means summer, fall, winter, and spring quarters
or semesters;
(ii) "Half-time" means one-half of the full-time academic workload
as determined by each institution, except that half-time for community
and technical college faculty employees shall have the same meaning as
"part-time" under RCW 28B.50.489;
(iii) "Benefits-eligible position" shall be defined by the board.
(5) Beginning January 1, 2014, eligibility for health care benefits
is as provided under this subsection. Except if bargained for under
chapter 41.80 RCW, the board must design benefits and determine the
terms and conditions of employee and retired employee participation and
coverage. The terms and conditions must be consistent with the
provisions of this subsection. Employer groups obtaining benefits
through contractual agreement with the authority for employees defined
in RCW 41.05.011(6) (a), (b), (c), and (d) may contractually agree with
the authority to benefits eligibility criteria which differs from the
criteria contained in this section. The eligibility criteria for
health care benefits is:
(a) Each employee who is a full-time employee as defined by section
1513 of the patient protection and affordable care act and related
regulations, as administered by the authority, is eligible for
benefits. Except if bargained for pursuant to (a)(i) of this
subsection, or if authorized by the office of financial management
pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection, employees who are not full-time
employees as defined by section 1513 of the patient protection and
affordable care act and related regulations, as administered by the
authority, are not eligible for benefits.
(i) The employer and exclusive bargaining representative, pursuant
to chapter 41.80 RCW, may bargain part-time employee eligibility
criteria that does not exceed the criteria under subsection (4) of this
section.
(ii) The office of financial management may approve part-time
employee eligibility criteria that does not exceed the criteria under
subsection (4) of this section for part-time state positions not
covered under any collective bargaining agreement.
(b) A legislator is eligible for benefits on the date his or her
term begins. All other elected and full-time appointed officials of
the legislative and executive branches of state government are eligible
for benefits on the date their term begins or they take the oath of
office, whichever occurs first.
(c) Justices of the supreme court and judges of the court of
appeals and the superior courts become eligible for benefits on the
date they take the oath of office.
(d) Except as provided by section 1513 of the patient protection
and affordable care act and related regulations, as administered by the
authority, eligibility ceases for any employee the first day of the
month following termination of the employment relationship.
(e) Insurance coverage for all eligible employees begins on the
first day of the month following the date when eligibility for benefits
is established. If the date eligibility is established is the first
working day of a month, insurance coverage begins on that date.
(f) From funding provided in the omnibus appropriations act, the
authority must establish and administer a compensation arrangement to
reimburse a portion of the premium or out-of-pocket costs of part-time
state agency and higher education institution employees who obtain
health insurance coverage through the Washington health benefit
exchange. Only persons who are expected to be employed for at least
eighty hours per month for at least six consecutive months are eligible
for the exchange premium reimbursement benefit provided under this
section, and only for months in which they work at least eighty hours.
The exchange premium reimbursement benefit may not exceed two dollars
per hour for the number of hours worked by the part-time employee in a
month, and in no case may exceed two hundred sixty dollars per month.
Reimbursement may only be provided for coverage of the employee and the
employee's spouse and dependent children. The authority may adopt
rules that are consistent with the goals in section 1 of this act to
implement the benefit.
(6) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems.
(((6))) (7)(a) For any open enrollment period following August 24,
2011, the board shall offer a health savings account option for
employees that conforms to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(b) By November 30, 2015, and each year thereafter, the authority
shall submit a report to the relevant legislative policy and fiscal
committees that includes the following:
(i) Public employees' benefits board health plan cost and service
utilization trends for the previous three years, in total and for each
health plan offered to employees;
(ii) For each health plan offered to employees, the number and
percentage of employees and dependents enrolled in the plan, and the
age and gender demographics of enrollees in each plan;
(iii) Any impact of enrollment in alternatives to the most
comprehensive plan, including the high deductible health plan with a
health savings account, upon the cost of health benefits for those
employees who have chosen to remain enrolled in the most comprehensive
plan.
(((7))) (8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
for any open enrollment period following August 24, 2011, the board
shall offer a high deductible health plan in conjunction with a health
savings account developed under subsection (((6))) (7) of this section.
(((8))) (9) Employees shall choose participation in one of the
health care benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted
to waive coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(((9))) (10) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring
entities that desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and
casualty insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The
board may approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring
entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of
Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests
of employees and the state. The board shall adopt rules setting forth
criteria by which it shall evaluate the plans.
(((10))) (11) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees'
benefits board shall make available one or more fully insured long-term
care insurance plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84
RCW. Such programs shall be made available to eligible employees,
retired employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible
dependents which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents
of the employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the
employee or retiree. Employees of local governments, political
subdivisions, and tribal governments not otherwise enrolled in the
public employees' benefits board sponsored medical programs may enroll
under terms and conditions established by the administrator, if it does
not jeopardize the financial viability of the public employees'
benefits board's long-term care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(((11))) (12) The board may establish penalties to be imposed by
the authority when the eligibility determinations of an employing
agency fail to comply with the criteria under ((this chapter)) section
1513 of the patient protection and affordable care act and related
regulations, as administered by the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
For the period from July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2015, the
authority shall develop and implement an outreach and education program
to inform part-time state and school district employees of the health
insurance plans, premium tax credits, and out-of-pocket cost subsidies
available to individuals who purchase health plans offered through the
Washington health benefit exchange. The outreach and education program
shall be developed in collaboration with school districts, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, labor organizations, the
Washington health benefit exchange, and other appropriate entities.

--- END ---