BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the concept
of no net loss has been applied in environmental regulatory processes
in Washington state, such as the state's shoreline management and
hydraulic project regulatory processes. For example, the state's
shoreline management system establishes a standard of no net loss of
shoreline ecological functions from the implementation of local
shoreline master programs, including impacts to shoreline ecological
functions resulting from new development. This no net loss standard is
also used by the state's hydraulic project approval program, which
applies a no net loss standard of protection for fish habitat.
(2) The legislature further finds that the citizens of Washington
state will benefit from the application of the no net loss standard to
recreational opportunities on state lands. Maintaining access to the
state's public lands is vital to preserving the many recreational and
health benefits those lands provide to the citizens of the state.
State lands provide an innumerable number of valuable recreational
opportunities including, but not limited to, hunting, fishing, hiking,
bicycling, horseback riding, off-road vehicle use, and wildlife
viewing. In turn, these recreational opportunities generate economic
opportunities for the communities surrounding those lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must ensure no net loss of public recreational
opportunities on department-managed lands. Prior to or upon closing an
area or access to an area that supports recreational opportunities, the
department must open, reopen, or provide additional access to an area
that supports a reasonably equivalent level of recreational
opportunities.
(2) Nothing in this section affects the trust management
obligations of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must ensure no net loss of public recreational
opportunities on department-managed lands. Prior to or upon closing an
area or access to an area that supports recreational opportunities, the
department must open, reopen, or provide additional access to an area
that supports a reasonably equivalent level of recreational
opportunities.

--- END ---