BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.69.030 and 2009 c 350 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section, no orders for a refund under this chapter ((shall)) may be
made except on a claim:
(((1))) (a) Verified by the person who paid the tax, the person's
guardian, executor or administrator; and
(((2))) (b) Filed with the county treasurer within three years
after the due date of the payment sought to be refunded; and
(((3))) (c) Stating the statutory ground upon which the refund is
claimed.
(2) No claim for an order of refund is required for a refund that
is based upon:
(a) An order of the board of equalization, state board of tax
appeals, or court of competent jurisdiction justifying a refund under
RCW 84.69.020 (9) through (12);
(b) A decision by the treasurer or assessor that is rendered within
three years after the due date of the payment to be refunded,
justifying a refund under RCW 84.69.020; or
(c) A decision by the assessor or department approving an exemption
application that is filed under chapter 84.36 RCW within three years
after the due date of the payment to be refunded.
(3) A county legislative authority may authorize a refund on a
claim filed more than three years after the due date of the payment
sought to be refunded if the claim arises from taxes paid as a result
of a manifest error in a description of property.

--- END ---