BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the United States
must make additional efforts to retain the creative advantage that
enables the country to successfully compete in the increasingly
competitive global economy. The legislature further finds that many
states, including Washington, have taken steps to strengthen science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) education in schools in
an effort to increase the states' competitive edge and to spur the
economy with innovations, new industries, and additional jobs. The
legislature further finds that STEM education is a necessary component
for economic success, but it is not sufficient to produce the necessary
creative innovations.
The legislature finds that an "A for art" must be added to turn
STEM into STEAM education. The legislature finds that research and
data shows that activities like the arts support and foster creativity,
which is essential to innovation. The legislature further finds that
combining exceptional STEM education with the creativity inspired
through the arts to provide STEAM education should be encouraged in the
schools.
The legislature finds that improving STEAM education from early
learning through college is imperative for creating better
opportunities for the next generation and keeping our economy strong.
The legislature intends to promote STEAM education to increase student
engagement as well as unlock creative thinking and innovation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2010 c 235 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service.
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities,
for incentives, or for implementing specific measurable innovative
activities, including professional development, specified by the school
district to: (a) Close one or more achievement gaps, (b) focus on
development of science, technology, engineering, arts, and mathematics
(((STEM))) (STEAM) learning opportunities, or (c) provide arts
education. Beginning September 1, 2011, school districts shall
annually provide a brief description of the innovative activities
included in any supplemental contract to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall summarize the district information and
submit an annual report to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. Supplemental contracts shall not cause
the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380.
No district may enter into a supplemental contract under this
subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic
education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 ((and)), 28A.400.275, and 28A.400.280.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.410.221 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board shall, in its regular
review and revision of teacher certification standards as required by
RCW 28A.410.210, revise standards for the elementary education
endorsement and middle level and secondary mathematics and science
teacher endorsements as well as other subject area endorsements with
STEM-related components. Standards revisions related to mathematics
shall be adopted by September 1, 2013. Standards revisions related to
science shall be adopted by September 1, 2014. The revised standards
shall include the integration of science, technology, engineering,
arts, and mathematics (((STEM))) (STEAM) knowledge and skill and be
aligned, as appropriate, with common core mathematics standards, the
((2009 [2008])) 2008 revision of state mathematics student learning
standards and performance expectations, the biology end-of-course
assessment, and the 2012 student science learning standards developed
from the conceptual framework for science education and next generation
standards and related student performance expectations. In addition to
appropriate mathematics and science content, the endorsement standards
must also include the concepts and instructional practices of the
interdisciplinary connections with engineering and technology.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.700.120 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to high
schools to implement specialized courses in science, technology,
engineering, arts, and mathematics (((STEM))) (STEAM) careers as
provided by a national multidisciplinary science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics program. Grant funds must be allocated on
a one-time basis and may be used to purchase course curriculum and
equipment, initial course student materials, and support professional
development for course teachers.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant
recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (2). This is a
competitive grant process. Successful high school applicants must:
(a) Demonstrate engaged and committed high school and district
leadership and faculty in support of expanding specialized ((STEM))
STEAM courses;
(b) Demonstrate that faculty are appropriately trained to offer
specialized ((STEM)) STEAM courses or a plan for faculty to obtain the
appropriate training;
(c) Demonstrate capacity to offer the specialized ((STEM)) STEAM
courses and maximize the use of grant resources by addressing:
Availability of appropriate physical space, meeting program technology
requirements, providing projected enrollment at the high school and
from area high schools as appropriate, planned hours and days each week
the program is to be offered, and other specific program requirements
set forth by the superintendent of public instruction;
(d) Provide the plan for course implementation that includes a
beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and
retaining students in the course;
(e) Provide a plan to promote opportunities for students to acquire
college credit;
(f) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the
community and partner support for implementing specialized ((STEM))
STEAM courses. Partner support may include one or more of the
following: Supplying materials, instruction support, internships,
mentorships, apprenticeships, and other program components;
(g) Demonstrate connections to community and technical college
programs as well as links to four-year higher education institution
((STEM)) STEAM programs; and
(h) Demonstrate capacity to continue the course in years succeeding
the initial grant year.
(3)(a) The education data center in the office of financial
management must, with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, collect student course enrollment and course completion
information.
(b) The education data center must: (i) Study mathematics and
science course-taking patterns of students completing specialized
((STEM)) STEAM courses; and (ii) follow the students to employment or
further training and education in the two years following high school.
This study must be designed to inform policymakers about the extent to
which specialized science, technology, engineering, arts, and
mathematics classes taken by students reduce mathematics remediation of
students entering the workplace, apprenticeships, community and
technical colleges, and four-year institutions of higher education.
Study findings must be reported annually beginning January 2014 and
each January thereafter through January 2018 to the governor,
appropriate state agencies, and the appropriate education and fiscal
committees of the legislature.

--- END ---