BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.33.020 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 and 2012 c 182 s
1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Four times each year the supervisor must prepare, subject to
the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council under RCW
82.33.010:
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections.
(2) The supervisor must submit forecasts prepared under this
section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under RCW
82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the committees on ways
and means and the chairs of the committees on transportation of the
senate and house of representatives, including one copy to the staff of
each of the committees, on or before November 20th, February 20th ((in
the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years)), June
27th, and September 27th. All forecasts must include both estimated
receipts and estimated revenues in conformance with generally accepted
accounting principles as provided by RCW 43.88.037. In odd-numbered
years, the period covered by forecasts for the state general fund and
related funds must cover the current fiscal biennium and the next
ensuing fiscal biennium. In even-numbered years, the period covered by
the forecasts for the state general fund and related funds shall be
current fiscal and the next two ensuing fiscal biennia.
(3) All agencies of state government must provide to the supervisor
immediate access to all information relating to economic and revenue
forecasts. Revenue collection information must be available to the
supervisor the first business day following the conclusion of each
collection period.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff must co-locate and share information, data, and files with the tax research
section of the department of revenue but may not duplicate the duties
and functions of one another.
(5) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this section,
the supervisor must provide estimated revenue from tuition fees as
defined in RCW 28B.15.020.
(6) The economic and revenue forecast council must, in consultation
with the economic and revenue forecast work group created in RCW
82.33.040, review the existing economic and revenue forecast council
revenue model, data, and methodologies and in light of recent economic
changes, engage outside experts if necessary, and recommend changes to
the economic and revenue forecast council revenue forecasting process
to increase confidence and promote accuracy in the revenue forecast.
The recommendations are due by September 30, 2012, and every five years
thereafter.

--- END ---