BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
TAX PARITY
Sec. 101 RCW 82.14B.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Consumer" means a person who purchases a prepaid wireless
telecommunications service in a retail transaction.
(2) "Emergency services communication system" means a multicounty
or countywide communications network, including an enhanced 911
emergency communications system, which provides rapid public access for
coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment, and
facilities for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.
(((2))) (3) "Enhanced 911 emergency communications system" means a
public communications system consisting of a network, database, and on-premises equipment that is accessed by dialing or accessing 911 and
that enables reporting police, fire, medical, or other emergency
situations to a public safety answering point. The system includes the
capability to selectively route incoming 911 voice or data to the
appropriate public safety answering point that operates in a defined
911 service area and the capability to automatically display the name,
address, and telephone number of incoming 911 voice or data at the
appropriate public safety answering point. "Enhanced 911 emergency
communications system" includes the modernization to next generation
911 systems.
(((3))) (4) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service"
has the same meaning as provided by the federal communications
commission in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 9.3 on January 1, 2009, or a subsequent
date determined by the department.
(((4))) (5) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service
line" means an interconnected voice over internet protocol service that
offers an active telephone number or successor dialing protocol
assigned by a voice over internet protocol provider to a voice over
internet protocol service customer that has inbound and outbound
calling capability, which can directly access a public safety answering
point when such a voice over internet protocol service customer has a
place of primary use in the state.
(((5))) (6) "Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it
in RCW 80.04.010.
(((6))) (7) "Place of primary use" means the street address
representative of where the subscriber's use of the radio access line
or interconnected voice over internet protocol service line occurs,
which must be:
(a) The residential street address or primary business street
address of the subscriber; and
(b) In the case of radio access lines, within the licensed service
area of the home service provider.
(((7))) (8) "Prepaid wireless telecommunications service" means a
telecommunications service that provides the right to use mobile
wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services
including the download of digital products delivered electronically,
content, and ancillary services, which must be paid for in full in
advance and sold in predetermined units or dollars.
(9) "Private telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 80.04.010.
(((8))) (10) "Radio access line" means the telephone number
assigned to or used by a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice
service available to the public for hire from a radio communications
service company. Radio access lines include, but are not limited to,
radio-telephone communications lines used in cellular telephone
service, personal communications services, and network radio access
lines, or their functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access
lines do not include lines that provide access to one-way signaling
service, such as paging service, or to communications channels suitable
only for data transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service,
such as wireless roaming service, or to a private telecommunications
system.
(((9))) (11) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio
paging providers. It does include those persons or entities that
provide commercial mobile radio services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec.
332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and nonfacilities-based resellers.
(((10))) (12) "Retail transaction" means the purchase of prepaid
wireless telecommunications service from a seller for any purpose other
than resale.
(13) "Seller" means a person who sells prepaid wireless
telecommunications service to another person.
(14) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telecommunications
service, a competitive telephone service, or interconnected voice over
internet protocol service. "Subscriber" does not include a consumer,
as defined in this section.
(((11))) (15) "Switched access line" means the telephone service
line which connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main
telephone(s) to the local exchange company's switching office.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.14B.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 202 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 203 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 204 of this act:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The state enhanced 911 excise tax and the county enhanced 911
excise tax on switched access lines must be collected from the
subscriber by the local exchange company providing the switched access
line.
(((2))) (b) The state enhanced 911 excise tax and the county
enhanced 911 excise tax on radio access lines must be collected from
the subscriber by the radio communications service company, including
those companies that resell radio access lines, providing the radio
access line to the subscriber, and the seller of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service.
(((3))) (c) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes on
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines must be
collected from the subscriber by the interconnected voice over internet
protocol service company providing the interconnected voice over
internet protocol service line to the subscriber.
(((4))) (d) The amount of the tax must be stated separately on the
billing statement which is sent to the subscriber.
(2)(a) The state and county enhanced 911 excise tax must be
collected from the consumer by the seller of a prepaid wireless
telecommunications service for each retail transaction occurring in
this state.
(b) The department must transfer all tax proceeds remitted by a
seller under this subsection (2) as provided in RCW 82.14B.030 (2) and
(6).
(c) The taxes required by this subsection to be collected by the
seller must be separately stated in any sales invoice or instrument of
sale.
(d) A retail seller of a prepaid wireless telecommunications
service may retain five cents of the excise tax specified in RCW
82.14B.030(6)(a)(ii) that is collected from each transaction.
(e) When practicable, the amount of the tax imposed under this
subsection (2) must be separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or
other similar document that is provided to the consumer by the seller.
When a separate disclosure to the consumer is not practicable, the
seller may prominently display a sign notifying consumers of the tax.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.14B.042 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 202 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 203 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 204 of this act:
(1) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by this
chapter must be paid:
(a) By the subscriber to the local exchange company providing the
switched access line, the radio communications service company
providing the radio access line, or the interconnected voice over
internet protocol service company providing the interconnected voice
over internet protocol service line((.)); or
(b) By the consumer to the seller of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service;
(2) Each local exchange company, each radio communications service
company, ((and)) each interconnected voice over internet protocol
service company, and each seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications
service must collect from the subscriber the full amount of the taxes
payable. The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes required by
this chapter to be collected by a company, or seller of prepaid
wireless telecommunications service, are deemed to be held in trust by
the company or seller until paid to the department. Any local exchange
company, radio communications service company, seller of prepaid
wireless telecommunications service, or interconnected voice over
internet protocol service company that appropriates or converts the tax
collected to its own use or to any use other than the payment of the
tax to the extent that the money collected is not available for payment
on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor((.));
(((2))) (3) If any local exchange company, radio communications
service company, seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service,
or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company fails to
collect the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax or, after
collecting the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the manner
prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of its
own act or the result of acts or conditions beyond its control, the
company or seller is personally liable to the state for the amount of
the tax, unless the company or seller has taken from the buyer in good
faith documentation, in a form and manner prescribed by the department,
stating that the buyer is not a subscriber or consumer or is otherwise
not liable for the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax((.));
(((3))) (4) The amount of tax, until paid by the subscriber to the
local exchange company, the radio communications service company, the
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company, or to the
department, or until paid by the consumer to the seller of prepaid
wireless telecommunications service, or to the department, constitutes
a debt from the subscriber to the company, or from the consumer to the
seller. Any company or seller that fails or refuses to collect the tax
as required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to
gain some advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any
subscriber or consumer who refuses to pay any tax due under this
chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. The state and county enhanced 911
excise taxes required by this chapter to be collected by the local
exchange company, radio communications service company, or
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company must be
stated separately on the billing statement that is sent to the
subscriber((.)); and
(((4))) (5) If a subscriber has failed to pay to the local exchange
company, radio communications service company, or interconnected voice
over internet protocol service company or a consumer has failed to pay
the seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service, the state or
county enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by this chapter and the
company or seller has not paid the amount of the tax to the department,
the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
subscriber or consumer for collection of the tax, in which case a
penalty of ten percent may be added to the amount of the tax for
failure of the subscriber or consumer to pay the tax to the company or
seller, regardless of when the tax is collected by the department. Tax
under this chapter is due as provided under RCW 82.14B.061.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 202 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 203 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 204 of this act:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding seventy cents per month for each switched access
line. The amount of tax must be uniform for each switched access line.
Each county must provide notice of the tax to all local exchange
companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the
date on which the first payment is due. The tax imposed under this
subsection must be remitted to the department by local exchange
companies on a tax return provided by the department. The tax must be
deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in
RCW 82.14B.063.
(2)(a) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a
county enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines:
(i) By subscribers whose place of primary use is located within the
county in an amount not exceeding seventy cents per month for each
radio access line under this subsection (2)(a)(i); and
(ii) By consumers whose retail transaction occurs within the county
in an amount not exceeding seventy cents per retail transaction. The
amount of tax must be uniform for each ((radio access line)) retail
transaction under this subsection (2)(a)(ii).
(b) The county must provide notice of the tax to all radio
communications service companies serving in the county at least sixty
days in advance of the date on which the first payment is due. The tax
imposed under this section must be remitted to the department by radio
communications service companies, ((including those companies)) and
sellers of prepaid wireless telecommunications services, including
those companies and sellers that resell radio access lines, on a tax
return provided by the department. The tax must be deposited in the
county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in RCW 82.14B.063.
(3)(a) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of interconnected voice over
internet protocol service lines in an amount not exceeding seventy
cents per month for each interconnected voice over internet protocol
service line. The amount of tax must be uniform for each line and must
be levied on no more than the number of voice over internet protocol
service lines on an account that are capable of simultaneous
unrestricted outward calling to the public switched telephone network.
(b) The interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
must use the place of primary use of the subscriber to determine which
county's enhanced 911 excise tax applies to the service provided to the
subscriber.
(c) The tax imposed under this section must be remitted to the
department by interconnected voice over internet protocol service
companies on a tax return provided by the department.
(d) The tax must be deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax
account as provided in RCW 82.14B.063.
(e) To the extent that a local exchange carrier and an
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
contractually jointly provide a single service line, only one service
company is responsible for remitting the enhanced 911 excise taxes, and
nothing in this section precludes service companies who jointly provide
service from agreeing by contract which of them ((shall)) must remit
the taxes collected.
(4) Counties imposing a county enhanced 911 excise tax must provide
an annual update to the enhanced 911 coordinator detailing the
proportion of their county enhanced 911 excise tax that is being spent
on:
(a) Efforts to modernize their existing enhanced 911 communications
system; and
(b) Enhanced 911 operational costs.
(5) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax may not exceed twenty-five cents per month for each switched access line. The tax must be
uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed under this
subsection must be remitted to the department by local exchange
companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds
must be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created
in RCW 38.52.540.
(6)(a) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on the use of all
radio access lines:
(i) By subscribers whose place of primary use is located within the
state in an amount of twenty-five cents per month for each radio access
line. The tax must be uniform for each radio access line under this
subsection (6)(a)(i); and
(ii) By consumers whose retail transaction occurs within the state
in an amount not exceeding thirty cents per retail transaction. The
tax must be uniform for each ((radio access line)) retail transaction
under this subsection (6)(a)(ii).
(b) The tax imposed under this section must be remitted to the
department by radio communications service companies, and sellers of
prepaid wireless telecommunications service, including those companies
and sellers that resell radio access lines, on a tax return provided by
the department. Tax proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer in the
enhanced 911 account created in RCW 38.52.540. The tax imposed under
this section is not subject to the state sales and use tax or any local
tax.
(7) For purposes of the state and county enhanced 911 excise tax
imposed by subsections (2) and (6) of this section, the retail
transaction is deemed to occur at the location where the transaction is
sourced to under RCW 82.32.520(3)(c).
(8) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines in the state.
The amount of tax may not exceed twenty-five cents per month for each
interconnected voice over internet protocol service line whose place of
primary use is located in the state. The amount of tax must be uniform
for each line and must be levied on no more than the number of voice
over internet protocol service lines on an account that are capable of
simultaneous unrestricted outward calling to the public switched
telephone network. The tax imposed under this subsection must be
remitted to the department by interconnected voice over internet
protocol service companies on a tax return provided by the department.
Tax proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(((8))) (9) For calendar year 2011, the taxes imposed by
subsections (5) and (((7))) (8) of this section must be set at their
maximum rate. By August 31, 2011, and by August 31st of each year
thereafter, the state enhanced 911 coordinator must recommend the level
for the next year of the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by
subsections (5) and (((7))) (8) of this section, based on a systematic
cost and revenue analysis, to the utilities and transportation
commission. The commission must by the following October 31st
determine the level of the state enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by
subsections (5) and (((7))) (8) of this section for the following year.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.14B.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 202 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 203 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 204 of this act:
(1) Unless a seller, local exchange company, radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company has taken from the buyer documentation, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber, consumer, or is otherwise not liable for the tax, the
burden of proving that a sale of the use of a switched access line,
radio access line, or interconnected voice over internet protocol
service line was not a sale to a subscriber, consumer, or was not
otherwise subject to the tax is upon the person who made the sale.
(2) If a seller, local exchange company, radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company does not receive documentation, in a form and manner prescribed
by the department, stating that the buyer is not a subscriber,
consumer, or is otherwise not liable for the tax at the time of the
sale, have such documentation on file at the time of the sale, or
obtain such documentation from the buyer within a reasonable time after
the sale, the seller, local exchange company, radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company remains liable for the tax as provided in RCW 82.14B.042,
unless the seller, local exchange company, radio communications service
company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
can demonstrate facts and circumstances according to rules adopted by
the department that show the sale was properly made without payment of
the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax.
(3) The penalty imposed by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on
state or county enhanced 911 excise taxes due but not paid as a result
of the improper use of documentation stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber or consumer or is otherwise not liable for the state or
county enhanced 911 excise tax. This subsection does not prohibit or
restrict the application of other penalties authorized by law.

PART II
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The legislature finds that the
department of revenue has consistently interpreted the phrase "a
residential class of telephone service" as it would have been
understood when the residential telephone service exemption was enacted
in 1983. The legislature further finds that in 1983, all telephone
service was divided into separate "local" and "toll" services for
"residential" and "business" classifications, as defined by regulatory
tariffs filed with the utilities and transportation commission. As a
result, the department of revenue has consistently restricted the
residential telephone service exemption in RCW 82.08.0289 to nontoll
telephone service provided under a residential customer regulatory
tariff. This includes traditional landline telephone service but
excludes cellular telephone service and voice over internet protocol
telephone service, which are not subject to regulatory tariffs.
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) The department of revenue's interpretation of the residential
telephone service exemption has been upheld by the board of tax appeals
but was rejected by the Thurston county superior court in a 2011
decision. In Sprint Spectrum LP v. State of Washington Department of
Revenue, Cause No. 10-2-02276-4, the Thurston county superior court
ruled that the taxpayer's sales of cellular telephone services to
nonbusiness customers qualified for the residential telephone service
exemption in RCW 82.08.0289. That decision was subsequently vacated by
agreement of the parties.
(b) Although this litigation did not result in any binding court
decision, and the department of revenue continues to interpret the
exemption as applying only to nontoll telephone service provided under
a regulatory tariff filed with the utilities and transportation
commission, the residential telephone service exemption will continue
to be the subject of litigation as other taxpayers claim entitlement to
the exemption for other services.
(c) Further litigation would be costly and could result in the
unintended expansion of the exemption to all telephone services that a
carrier treats as residential, such as cellular and voice over internet
protocol telephone service provided to nonbusiness customers, and to
long-distance service provided to residential customers for a flat
rate. This could result in extremely large and devastating revenue
impacts for the state and local governments.
(d) The mobile telecommunications sourcing provisions in RCW
82.32.520 render the sales tax exemption in RCW 82.08.0289 for mobile
telecommunications services provided to a customer whose place of
primary use is outside this state redundant.
(3) The legislature intends by this act to (a) reduce litigation
risk and associated costs, (b) prevent unexpected adverse fiscal
impacts that would result if a court were to broadly construe the
residential telephone service exemption, and (c) improve equity in the
sales taxation of telecommunications services.
(4) Therefore, this act is intended to:
(a) Clarify retroactively that, prior to this act, the residential
telephone service exemption in RCW 82.08.0289 has always applied only
to residential nontoll telephone service offered under a tariff filed
with the utilities and transportation commission, consistent with the
department of revenue's long-standing interpretation of the exemption;
(b) Allow fixed interconnected voice over internet protocol
telecommunications service as identified in this act to qualify for the
residential telephone service exemption for periods prior to the
effective date of this section; and
(c) Prospectively eliminate the exemptions in RCW 82.08.0289 for
residential telephone service, coin-operated telephone service, and
mobile telecommunications services provided to a customer whose place
of primary use is outside this state.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.08.0289 and 2007 c 6 s 1006 and 2007 c 6 s 1005
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.040 in section 102 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.042 in section 103 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.030 in section 104 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.200 in section 105 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 203 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 204 of this act:
(1) Until the effective date of this section, the tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to sales of:
(a) Local service;
(b) Coin-operated telephone service; and
(c) Mobile telecommunications services, including any toll service,
provided to a customer whose place of primary use is outside this
state.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065, as well as the definitions in
this subsection, apply to this section.
(a) "Local service" means:
(i) Ancillary services and telecommunications service, as those
terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than toll service, provided
to an individual subscribing to a residential class of telephone
service offered under a tariff required to be filed with the Washington
utilities and transportation commission under Title 80 RCW; and
(ii) Fixed interconnected voice over internet protocol service,
other than the nonlocal service allocation attributable to that
service, sold by a provider to an individual classified as residential
by that provider.
(b) "Toll service" means long distance service regardless of the
method of billing for such service but does not include customer access
line charges for access to a toll calling network.
(c) "Coin-operated telephone service" means a telecommunications
service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct
deposits of money to operate.
(d) "Fixed interconnected voice over internet protocol service"
means a service that meets the definition of interconnected voice over
internet protocol service in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 9.3 on January 1, 2009, and
that offers an active telephone number or successor dialing protocol
assigned by a provider; provides inbound and outbound calling
capability; and can be used for transmission of telephone calls only
from a fixed location.
(e) "Nonlocal service allocation" means the portion of the
provider's fixed interconnected voice over internet protocol service
attributable to the provider's nationwide nonlocal service activity as
determined using a method sanctioned by the federal communications
commission in FCC 06-94 and reported to the federal communications
commission for the same calendar quarter. If the provider does not
report any nonlocal service activity to the federal communications
commission, the full revenue derived from the fixed interconnected
voice over internet protocol service is deemed part of the nonlocal
service allocation.
(f) "Provider" means provider of a fixed interconnected voice over
internet protocol service that is subject to a franchise fee in this
state under the authority of 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a).

Sec. 203 RCW 80.36.430 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 968 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.040 in section 102 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.042 in section 103 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.030 in section 104 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.200 in section 105 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 202 of this act:
(1) The Washington telephone assistance program ((shall)) must be
funded by ((a telephone assistance excise tax on all switched access
lines)) the legislature by means of a biennial general fund
appropriation to the department and by funds from any federal
government or other programs for this purpose. ((Switched access lines
are defined in RCW 82.14B.020. The telephone assistance excise tax
shall be applied equally to all residential and business access lines
not to exceed fourteen cents per month. The department shall submit an
approved annual budget for the Washington telephone assistance program
to the department of revenue no later than March 1st prior to the
beginning of each fiscal year. The department of revenue shall then
determine the amount of telephone assistance excise tax to be placed on
each switched access line and shall inform local exchange companies and
the utilities and transportation commission of this amount no later
than May 1st. The department of revenue shall determine the amount of
telephone assistance excise tax by dividing the total of the program
budget funded by the telephone assistance excise tax, as submitted by
the department, by the total number of switched access lines in the
prior calendar year. The telephone assistance excise tax shall be
separately identified on each ratepayer's bill as the "Washington
telephone assistance program." All money collected from the telephone
assistance excise tax shall be transferred to a telephone assistance
fund administered by the department.))
(2) Local exchange companies ((shall)) must bill the fund for their
expenses incurred in offering the telephone assistance program,
including administrative and program expenses. The department
((shall)) must disburse the money to the local exchange companies. The
department is exempted from having to conclude a contract with local
exchange companies in order to effect this reimbursement. The
department ((shall)) must recover its administrative costs from the
fund. The department may specify by rule the range and extent of
administrative and program expenses that will be reimbursed to local
exchange companies.
(3) The department ((shall)) must enter into an agreement with the
department of commerce for an amount not to exceed eight percent of the
prior fiscal year's total revenue for the administrative and program
expenses of providing community service voice mail services. The
community service voice mail service may include toll-free lines in
community action agencies through which recipients can access their
community service voice mailboxes at no charge.
(((4) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 biennia, the department
shall enter into an agreement with the WIN 211 organization for
operational support. During the 2011-2013 biennium, the department
shall provide five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for this
purpose.
(5) During the 2009-2011 biennium, the telephone assistance fund
shall also be used in support of the economic services administration
call centers and related operations.))

Sec. 204 RCW 43.20A.725 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 944 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.040 in section 102 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.042 in section 103 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.030 in section 104 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.200 in section 105 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 202 of this act:
(1) The department, through the sole authority of the office or its
successor organization, ((shall)) must maintain a program whereby an
individual of school age or older who possesses a hearing or speech
impairment is provided with telecommunications equipment, software,
and/or peripheral devices, digital or otherwise, that is determined by
the office to be necessary for such a person to access and use
telecommunications transmission services effectively.
(2) The department, through the sole authority of the office or its
successor organization, ((shall)) must maintain a program where
telecommunications relay services of a human or electronic nature will
be provided to connect hearing impaired, deaf-blind, or speech impaired
persons with persons who do not have a hearing or speech impairment.
Such telecommunications relay services ((shall)) must provide the
ability for an individual who has a hearing or speech impairment to
engage in voice, tactile, or visual communication by wire or radio with
a hearing individual in a manner that is functionally equivalent to the
ability of an individual who does not have a hearing or speech
impairment to communicate using voice or visual communication services
by wire or radio subject to subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(3) The telecommunications relay service and equipment distribution
program may operate in such a manner as to provide communications
transmission opportunities that are capable of incorporating new
technologies that have demonstrated benefits consistent with the intent
of this chapter and are in the best interests of the citizens of this
state.
(4) The office ((shall)) must administer and control the award of
money to all parties incurring costs in implementing and maintaining
telecommunications services, programs, equipment, and technical support
services according to this section. The relay service contract
((shall)) must be awarded to an individual company registered as a
telecommunications company by the utilities and transportation
commission, to a group of registered telecommunications companies, or
to any other company or organization determined by the office as
qualified to provide relay services, contingent upon that company or
organization being approved as a registered telecommunications company
prior to final contract approval. The relay system providers and
telecommunications equipment vendors ((shall)) must be selected on the
basis of cost-effectiveness and utility to the greatest extent possible
under the program and technical specifications established by the
office.
(a) To the extent funds are available under the then-current rate
and not otherwise held in reserve or required for other purposes
authorized by this chapter, the office may award contracts for
communications and related services and equipment for hearing impaired
or speech impaired individuals accessing or receiving services provided
by, or contracted for, the department to meet access obligations under
Title 2 of the federal Americans with disabilities act or related
federal regulations.
(b) The office ((shall)) must perform its duties under this section
with the goal of achieving functional equivalency of access to and use
of telecommunications services similar to the enjoyment of access to
and use of such services experienced by an individual who does not have
a hearing or speech impairment only to the extent that funds are
available under the then-current rate and not otherwise held in reserve
or required for other purposes authorized by this chapter.
(5) The program ((shall)) must be funded by ((a telecommunications
relay service (TRS) excise tax applied to each switched access line
provided by the local exchange companies. The office shall determine,
in consultation with the office's program advisory committee, the
budget needed to fund the program on an annual basis, including both
operational costs and a reasonable amount for capital improvements such
as equipment upgrade and replacement. The budget proposed by the
office, together with documentation and supporting materials, shall be
submitted to the office of financial management for review and
approval. The approved budget shall be given by the department in an
annual budget to the department of revenue no later than March 1st
prior to the beginning of the fiscal year. The department of revenue
shall then determine the amount of telecommunications relay service
excise tax to be placed on each switched access line and shall inform
local exchange companies and the utilities and transportation
commission of this amount no later than May 1st. The department of
revenue shall determine the amount of telecommunications relay service
excise tax to be collected in the following fiscal year by dividing the
total of the program budget, as submitted by the office, by the total
number of switched access lines in the prior calendar year, as reported
to the department of revenue under chapter 82.14B RCW, and shall not
exercise any further oversight of the program under this subsection
other than administering the collection of the telecommunications relay
service excise tax as provided in RCW 82.72.010 through 82.72.090. The
telecommunications relay service excise tax shall not exceed nineteen
cents per month per access line. The telecommunications relay service
excise tax shall be separately identified on each ratepayer's bill with
the following statement: "Funds federal ADA requirement." All
proceeds from the telecommunications relay service excise tax shall be
put into a fund to be administered by the office through the
department. During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the
funds may also be used to provide individualized employment services
and employment-related counseling to people with disabilities, and
technical assistance to employers about the employment of people with
disabilities. "Switched access line" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.14B.020)) the legislature by means of a biennial general fund
appropriation to the department for the purposes of the program.
(6) The telecommunications relay service program and equipment
vendors ((shall)) must provide services and equipment consistent with
the requirements of federal law for the operation of both interstate
and intrastate telecommunications services for the hearing impaired or
speech impaired. The department and the utilities and transportation
commission ((shall be)) are responsible for ensuring compliance with
federal requirements and ((shall)) must provide timely notice to the
legislature of any legislation that may be required to accomplish
compliance.
(7) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules establishing
eligibility criteria, ownership obligations, financial contributions,
and a program for distribution to individuals requesting and receiving
such telecommunications devices distributed by the office, and other
rules necessary to administer programs and services consistent with
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 80.36.600 (Universal service program -- Planning and
preparation -- Commission's duties -- Approval of legislature required--Definitions) and 1999 c 372 s 16 & 1998 c 337 s 1;
(2) RCW 82.72.010 (Definitions) and 2007 c 6 s 1010 & 2004 c 254 s
3;
(3) RCW 82.72.020 (Authorization to administer telephone program
excise taxes) and 2004 c 254 s 4;
(4) RCW 82.72.030 (Collection of tax by local exchange company) and
2004 c 254 s 5;
(5) RCW 82.72.040 (Tax payment and collection requirements) and
2009 c 563 s 214 & 2004 c 254 s 6;
(6) RCW 82.72.050 (Administration of telephone program excise
taxes) and 2004 c 254 s 7;
(7) RCW 82.72.060 (Tax returns) and 2004 c 254 s 8;
(8) RCW 82.72.070 (Liability for payment of taxes) and 2009 c 563
s 215 & 2004 c 254 s 9; and
(9) RCW 82.72.080 (Liability for payment of taxes upon termination,
dissolution, or abandonment of business) and 2004 c 254 s 10.

PART III
UNIVERSAL COMMUNICATIONS SERVICE PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) The legislature finds that the state
and the public receive an important public benefit from communications
systems that enable as many consumers as possible to be connected to
the public network. Stable and ubiquitous communications services play
a crucial role in the protection of the public's physical and economic
safety and welfare.
(2) In legislation adopted in 1999, the legislature declared a
policy of support for universal communications services, subject to
legislative implementation. Recent changes in the communications
marketplace, including changes in access to federal universal services
funds, may expose the public to risk of disruption or cessation of
communications services and unstable rates for some customers,
particularly those in rural areas of the state, with resulting risks to
public safety and welfare. The legislature finds that the state has a
role in solving this problem under its authority to regulate
communications services providers as common carriers under Article XII,
section 19 of the state Constitution.
(3) For these reasons, the legislature intends to establish a
temporary program of assistance for universal communications services.
The purpose of the program is to protect safety and welfare by
supporting continued provision of basic telecommunications services at
stable rates under agreements subject to the supervision of the
utilities and transportation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 80.36
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
sections 303 through 309 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Basic residential service" means those services set out in 47
C.F.R. Sec. 54.101(a)(2011) and mandatory extended area service
approved by the commission.
(2) "Basic telecommunications services" means the following
services:
(a) Single-party service;
(b) Voice grade access to the public switched network;
(c) Support for local usage;
(d) Dual tone multifrequency signaling (touch-tone);
(e) Access to emergency services (911);
(f) Access to operator services;
(g) Access to interexchange services;
(h) Access to directory assistance; and
(i) Toll limitation services.
(3) "Communications provider" means a provider that provides a
working telephone number to a final consumer for intrastate wireline or
wireless communications services or interconnected voice over internet
protocol service, and includes local exchange carriers.
(4) "Communications services" includes telecommunications services
and information services and any combination thereof.
(5) "Incumbent local exchange carrier" has the same meaning as set
forth in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 251(h).
(6) "Incumbent public network" means the network established by
incumbent local exchange carriers for the delivery of communications
services to customers that is used by communications providers for
origination or termination of communications services by or to
customers.
(7) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service" means an
interconnected voice over internet protocol service that: (a) Enables
real-time, two-way voice communications; (b) requires a broadband
connection from the user's location; (c) requires internet protocol-compatible customer premises equipment; and (d) permits users generally
to receive calls that originate on the public network and to terminate
calls to the public network.
(8) "Program" means the state universal communications services
program created in section 303 of this act.
(9) "Telecommunications" has the same meaning as defined in 47
U.S.C. Sec. 153(43).
(10) "Telecommunications act of 1996" means the telecommunications
act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104, 110 Stat. 56).
(11) "Working telephone number" means a north American numbering
plan telephone number, or successor dialing protocol, that is developed
for use in placing calls to or from the public network, that enables a
consumer to make or receive calls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 80.36
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A state universal communications services program is
established. The program is established to protect public safety and
welfare under the authority of the state to regulate telecommunications
under Article XII, section 19 of the state Constitution. The purpose
of the program is to support continued provision of basic
telecommunications services under rates established by the commission
during the time in which communications providers in the state are
adapting to changes in federal universal service fund and intercarrier
compensation support.
(2) Under the program, eligible communications providers may
receive distributions from the universal communications services
account created in section 308 of this act in exchange for the
affirmative agreement to provide continued services under the rates,
terms, and conditions established by the commission under this chapter
for the period covered by the distribution. Disbursements from the
account may not exceed the following amounts: Five million dollars in
fiscal year one, four million dollars in fiscal year two, three million
dollars in fiscal year three, two million dollars in fiscal year four,
and one million dollars in fiscal year five. The commission must
implement and administer the program under terms and conditions
established in sections 302 through 308 of this act.
(3) A communications provider is eligible to receive distributions
from the account if:
(a) The communications provider is: (i) An incumbent local
exchange carrier serving fewer than forty thousand access lines in the
state; or (ii) a radio communications service company providing
wireless two-way voice communications service to less than the
equivalent of forty thousand access lines in the state. For purposes
of determining the access line threshold, the access lines or
equivalents of all affiliates must be counted as one threshold;
(b) The customers of the communications provider are at risk of
rate instability or service interruptions or cessations absent a
distribution to the provider that will allow the provider to maintain
rates reasonably close to the benchmark; and
(c) The communications provider meets any other criteria
established by the commission.
(4)(a) Distributions to eligible communications providers are based
on a benchmark established by the commission. The benchmark is the
rate the commission determines to be a reasonable amount customers
should pay for basic residential service provided over the incumbent
public network. However, if an incumbent local exchange carrier is
charging rates above the benchmark for the basic residential service,
that provider may not seek distributions from the fund for the purpose
of reducing those rates to the benchmark.
(b) To receive a distribution under the program, the recipient
provider must affirmatively consent to continue providing
communications services to its customers under rates, terms, and
conditions established by the commission pursuant to this chapter for
the period covered by the distribution.
(5) The program is funded from amounts deposited by the legislature
in the universal communications services account established in section
308 of this act. The commission must operate the program within
amounts appropriated for this purpose and deposited in the account.
(6) The commission must implement the program through a contract
with a neutral third-party administrator. The administrator must be
selected through a competitive process and its activities are subject
to oversight by the commission. The commission establishes and
approves the budget and program expenses. The commission may authorize
disbursements to the administrator from the universal communications
services account established in section 308 of this act.
(7) The commission, directly or through the administrator, must
periodically review the accounts and records of any communications
provider that receives distributions under the program to ensure
compliance with the program and monitor the providers' use of the
funds.
(8) The commission may establish an advisory board, consisting of
a reasonable balance of representatives from different types of
communications providers and consumers, to advise the commission on
selecting and overseeing the administrator of the program.
(9) The program terminates on June 30, 2019, and no distributions
may be made after that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 80.36
RCW to read as follows:
To implement the program, the commission must adopt rules for the
following purposes:
(1) Operation of the program, including criteria for eligibility
for distributions and identification of any reports or data that must
be filed with the commission;
(2) Operation of the universal communications services account
established in section 308 of this act;
(3) Criteria for election of the independent third-party
administrator;
(4) Establishment of the benchmark used to calculate distributions;
(5) Readoption, amendment, or repeal of any existing rules adopted
pursuant to RCW 80.36.610 and 80.36.620 as necessary to be consistent
with sections 302 through 309 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 80.36
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, the
commission may impose penalties for failure to make or delays in making
or filing any reports required by the commission for administration of
the program. In addition, the commission may recover amounts
determined to have been improperly distributed under section 303 of
this act. For the purposes of this section, the provisions of RCW
80.04.380 through 80.04.405, inclusive, apply to all companies that
receive support from the universal communications services account
created in section 308 of this act.
(2) Any action taken under this section must be taken only after
providing the affected communications provider with notice and an
opportunity for a hearing, unless otherwise provided by law.
(3) Any amounts recovered under this section must be deposited in
the universal communications services account created in section 308 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 80.36
RCW to read as follows:
The commission may delegate to the commission secretary or other
staff the authority to resolve disputes, approve expenses of the
administrator, and make other administrative decisions necessary to the
administration and supervision of the program consistent with the
relevant statutes and commission rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 80.36
RCW to read as follows:
The commission must adopt rules to implement this act prior to July
1, 2014, to ensure that this act is implemented in a timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 80.36
RCW to read as follows:
The universal communications services account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Revenues to the account consist of
moneys deposited in the account by the legislature and any penalties or
other recoveries received pursuant to section 305 of this act.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the
universal communications services program established in section 303 of
this act. Only the secretary of the commission or the secretary's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 309 RCW 80.36.610 and 1998 c 337 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The commission is authorized to take actions, conduct
proceedings, and enter orders as permitted or contemplated for a state
commission under the ((federal)) telecommunications act of 1996((, P.L.
104-104 (110 Stat. 56), but the commission's authority to either
establish a new state program or to adopt new rules to preserve and
advance universal service under section 254(f) of the federal act is
limited to the actions expressly authorized by RCW 80.36.600)). The
commission may establish by rule fees to be paid by persons seeking
commission action under the ((federal)) telecommunications act of 1996,
and by parties to proceedings under that act, to offset in whole or
part the commission's expenses that are not otherwise recovered through
fees in implementing the act((, but new fees or assessments charged
telecommunications carriers to either establish a state program or to
adopt rules to preserve and advance universal service under section
254(f) of the federal act do not take effect until the legislature has
approved a state universal service program.
(2) The legislature intends that under the future universal service
program established in this state:
(a) Every telecommunications carrier that provides intrastate
telecommunications services shall contribute, on an equitable and
nondiscriminatory basis, to the preservation and advancement of
universal service in the state;
(b) The contributions shall be competitively and technologically
neutral; and
(c) The universal service program to be established in accordance
with RCW 80.36.600 shall not be inconsistent with the requirements of
47 U.S.C. Sec. 254)).

PART IV
SALES TAX PROVISIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 82.08.020 and 2011 c 171 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, there is
levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price on each retail sale in this state of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and
(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365, nonhighway vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.09.310, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6)(a) Beginning July 1, 2013, the rate of tax for persons
providing "competitive telephone services," "telecommunication
services," or "ancillary services" as those terms are defined in RCW
82.04.065, must be the rate of tax determined by the department as
prescribed in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Beginning with the rate of tax in subsection (1) of this
section, the department must make adjustments to that rate based upon
the effects of this act, including the provisions in Part I of this
act, as they apply to competitive telephone services, telecommunication
services, or ancillary services, so that the overall effect to the
general fund of the state will result in revenue neutrality. In making
this calculation the department must consider all increases or
decreases in revenues as well as required expenditures. The department
must make this determination by October 1, 2013.
(7) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail
sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The repeals in section 205 of this act do
not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the statutes repealed or under any rule or order adopted
under them nor does it affect any proceedings instituted under them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 For services affected by the expiration of
the exemption for local service under RCW 82.08.0289(1) that cover a
billing period starting before and ending after the effective date of
section 202 of this act, RCW 82.08.064(3)(a) is deemed to apply, and
retail sales tax will apply to the first billing period starting on or
after the effective date of section 202 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Section 202 of this act applies
prospectively as well as retroactively to tax periods open for
assessment or refund of taxes under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.060,
including any refund claims or disputed assessments pending before the
department of revenue, board of tax appeals, or any court of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 In accordance with Article VIII, section
5 of the state Constitution, section 202 of this act does not authorize
refunds of sales tax validly collected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 (1) Except as provided otherwise in this
section, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2013.
(2) Part I of this act takes effect January 1, 2014.
(3) Except for section 307 of this act, Part III of this act takes
effect July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 Part III of this act expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---