BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the centers
for medicare and medicaid services recently released draft regulations
which provide an opportunity for states to use medicaid funding to
purchase coverage for eligible beneficiaries in the individual market
through the health benefit exchange.
(2) Premium assistance enables individuals to stay with the same
health plan and same provider network as their income fluctuates above
and below medicaid eligibility levels. Churning, the cycle of losing
and regaining medicaid insurance coverage due to income changes, can be
disruptive and generate economic, social, and health costs. Premium
assistance can provide a seamless continuum of insurance affordability
programs for individuals with incomes below four hundred percent of the
federal poverty level who will experience frequent income changes that
impact eligibility for the insurance programs.
(3) Premium assistance can provide medicaid beneficiaries the same
access to providers as privately insured individuals by giving them
access to the commercial market, while at the same time ensuring
providers are paid market rates for individuals.
(4) Premium assistance has been available for states to use the
medicaid program to wrap around employer coverage for an employed
individual who is also eligible for medicaid, and for enrollees in the
children's health insurance program. Premium assistance in the
medicaid program has required states provide enrollees with all the
benefits an enrollee is entitled to under medicaid and ensure the cost-sharing does not exceed the federal medicaid rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall submit a waiver request to the federal
centers for medicare and medicaid to implement a targeted premium
assistance program for the expansion adults, identified in section
1902(a)(1)(A)(i)(VIII), of the social security act, with incomes above
one hundred percent of the federal poverty level, and for children
covered in the children's health insurance program with incomes above
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level, with a goal of
providing seamless coverage through the health benefit exchange and
improving opportunities for families to be covered in the same health
plan. The waiver request must include the possibility of applying
premiums for individuals and cost-sharing that may exceed the five
percent of family income required in federal law.
(2) The authority shall submit a report to the legislature and the
governor that provides recommendations to make the targeted premium
assistance program cost neutral by September 1, 2014. The authority is
encouraged to be creative, use subject matter experts, and exhaust all
possible options to achieve cost neutrality. The report shall also
include a detailed plan and timeline. A formal waiver proposal must be
submitted with the goal of implementation by October 1, 2015, or the
first day of the open enrollment period for the health benefit exchange
in calendar year 2016, whichever is earlier.

--- END ---