BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.50.150 and 2004 c 242 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The employer of any employee whose retirement benefits are
based in part on excess compensation, as defined in this section,
shall, upon receipt of a billing from the department, pay into the
appropriate retirement system the present value at the time of the
employee's retirement of the total estimated cost of all present and
future benefits from the retirement system attributable to the excess
compensation. The state actuary shall determine the estimated cost
using the same method and procedure as is used in preparing fiscal note
costs for the legislature. However, the director may in the director's
discretion decline to bill the employer if the amount due is less than
fifty dollars. Accounts unsettled within thirty days of the receipt of
the billing shall be assessed an interest penalty of one percent of the
amount due for each month or fraction thereof beyond the original
thirty-day period.
(2) "Excess compensation," as used in this section, includes the
following payments, if used in the calculation of the employee's
retirement allowance:
(a) A cash out of unused annual leave in excess of two hundred
forty hours of such leave. "Cash out" for purposes of this subsection
means:
(i) Any payment in lieu of an accrual of annual leave; or
(ii) Any payment added to salary or wages, concurrent with a
reduction of annual leave;
(b) A cash out of any other form of leave;
(c) A payment for, or in lieu of, any personal expense or
transportation allowance to the extent that payment qualifies as
reportable compensation in the member's retirement system;
(d) The portion of any payment, including overtime payments, that
exceeds twice the regular daily or hourly rate of pay; ((and))
(e) The portion of total reportable compensation in the salary
averaging period used in the calculation of the employee's retirement
allowance that, due to reportable compensation from overtime, bonuses,
cash outs of any form of leave, or lump sum payments, exceeds one
hundred twenty-five percent of the employee's total reportable
compensation in the immediately preceding service creditable time
period of equivalent length; and
(f) Any termination or severance payment.
(3) This section applies to the retirement systems listed in RCW
41.50.030 and to retirements occurring on or after March 15, 1984.
Nothing in this section is intended to amend or determine the meaning
of any definition in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.35,
41.37, or 43.43 RCW or to determine in any manner what payments are
includable in the calculation of a retirement allowance under such
chapters.
(4) An employer is not relieved of liability under this section
because of the death of any person either before or after the billing
from the department.
(5) The change in the definition of "excess compensation" made in
this 2013 act shall be effective for all retirements occurring after
June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Beginning no later than September 1, 2013,
the department shall review compensation increases reported for all
persons who retired from the law enforcement officers and firefighters
retirement system plan 1 since July 1, 2010. The department shall
conduct an on-site audit of the employer compensation records in all
cases where the base salary reported for an individual increased by
more than ten percent in the final two years prior to retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
No collective bargaining agreement covering state, higher education
institution, or local government employees entered into pursuant to
this chapter after the effective date of this act may include a
provision that bases employee eligibility for voluntary overtime on
seniority or eligibility for retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
No collective bargaining agreement covering educational employees
entered into pursuant to this chapter after the effective date of this
act may include a provision that bases employee eligibility for
voluntary overtime on seniority or eligibility for retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW
to read as follows:
No collective bargaining agreement covering state or higher
education institution employees entered into pursuant to this chapter
after the effective date of this act may include a provision that bases
employee eligibility for voluntary overtime on seniority or eligibility
for retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The local government self-insurance program of the department
of enterprise services shall support employers of law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 retirees to
develop a voluntarily risk pool to share the noninsured retiree medical
costs of long-term care and major medical services.
(2) The department shall provide assistance to a work group
composed of city, county, and fire district representatives to
establish a local government risk pool for law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 retiree medical services,
including requirements for:
(a) Employer participation and withdrawal from the risk pool;
(b) Medical services to be reimbursed by the risk pool; and
(c) Employer premiums for the risk pool, which shall be the sole
source of funding for claims and administration.
(3) Upon request the office of the state actuary may provide
actuarial support for the work group review and analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If statutory changes are needed to implement
the work group's proposed requirements for a local government risk pool
developed pursuant to section 6 of this act, the local government self-insurance program shall submit a report and proposed legislation to the
fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2013.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.26.200 and 1981 c 294 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person feeling aggrieved by any order or determination of a
disability board denying disability leave or disability retirement, or
canceling a previously granted disability retirement allowance, shall
have the right to appeal the order or determination to the director.
Any member or employer feeling aggrieved by any order or determination
of a disability board granting or denying coverage for any service or
item requested as a medical service shall have the right to appeal the
order or determination to the director. The director shall have no
jurisdiction to entertain the appeal unless a notice of appeal is filed
with the director within thirty days following the rendition of the
order by the applicable disability board. A copy of the notice of
appeal shall be served upon the director and the applicable disability
board and, within ninety days thereof, the disability board shall
certify its decision and order which shall include findings of fact and
conclusions of law, together with a transcript of all proceedings in
connection therewith, to the director for review. Upon review of the
record, the director may affirm the order of the disability board or
may remand the case for such further proceedings as he or she may
direct, in accordance with such rules of procedure as the director
shall promulgate. The director shall review appeals involving coverage
of medical services using standards recommended by the health care
authority medical director appointed pursuant to RCW 41.05.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 8 of this act takes effect March 1,
2014.

--- END ---