BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that private
exchanges combine new technologies and traditional customer service
including online eligibility verification, mechanisms for allowing
employers who connect their employees or retirees with exchanges to
offer subsidies, and meaningful health plan comparisons. These
exchanges are sometimes called marketplaces or intermediaries, and work
directly with consumers to connect them with the desired health
insurance product.
(2) The legislature finds that private exchanges are designed to
help consumers find plans personalized to their various needs,
including specific health conditions, preferred and convenient doctors
and hospital networks, and family budgets.
(3) The legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the
residents of Washington to transition functions of the Washington
health benefit exchange into the hands of private exchanges where there
is a proven track record of connecting customers with appropriate and
affordable health insurance, superior customer satisfaction, and an
abundance of plans from which to choose.
(4) Furthermore, the legislature finds that having robust
competition among health insurance plans accrues benefits to consumers
and the people of Washington, in like manner, eliminating the current
monopoly held by the Washington health benefit exchange and creating an
opportunity for competition and superior service among private
exchanges will demonstrate market efficiencies and expand business
opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2014, the exchange shall, in collaboration with the
office of the insurance commissioner, apply to the secretary of the
United States department of health and human services for a waiver to
authorize Washington state to explore the opportunity of offering
multiple private health benefit exchanges in Washington state by
January 1, 2016.
(2) The exchange, in collaboration with the office of the insurance
commissioner, must hire a neutral consultant to conduct analyses and
make preparations for the transition from a single health benefit
exchange to multiple private health benefit exchanges. Research must
include, but is not limited to:
(a) Seeking clarity on how advance premium tax credits and
cost-sharing subsidies would be accessed through multiple
organizations;
(b) Conducting a cost-benefit analysis and assessment of the
impacts on consumers and the insurance market; and
(c) Suggested statutory changes required in order to implement the
new private health benefit exchanges.
(3) The current exchange may continue to operate after
implementation of the private health benefit exchanges. However, the
current exchange shall receive no special treatment or aid that would
create an unlevel playing field or advantage over the private health
benefit exchanges.

--- END ---