BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Additive transportation funding is
hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes for the period ending June 30, 2015.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act:
(a) "Lapse" means the amount shall return to unappropriated status.
(b) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.
(c) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,100,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided in this section are subject to the
limitations in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1957), Laws of
2013.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the entire
connecting Washington account--state appropriation is provided solely
for the Program I projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation
Document 2013-4, as developed April 18, 2013.
(3) $9,200,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the SR 509/I-5/SR 167 Freight
Corridor project. The secretary of transportation must work with the
freight mobility strategic investment board to ensure that the project
is a priority project within the state freight mobility plan required
under the federal moving ahead for progress in the 21st century act.
(4) The connecting Washington account--state appropriation includes
up to $230,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1956), Laws of 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,100,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall prioritize storm water retrofit projects
when selecting maintenance and preservation projects, and shall
prioritize storm water retrofit projects based on the projected benefit
for compliance with the department's national pollution discharge
elimination system permit.
(2) $20,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of removing fish
passage barriers related to the transportation system that are
identified by the department pursuant to any legal obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,100,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall prioritize storm
water retrofit projects when selecting maintenance and preservation
projects, and shall prioritize storm water retrofit projects based on
the projected benefit for compliance with the department's national
pollution discharge elimination system permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided in this section are further subject to the
limitations in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1957), Laws of
2013.
(2) The connecting Washington account--state appropriation includes
up to $110,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1956), Laws of 2013.
(3) $110,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of constructing a
ferry boat vessel with a carrying capacity of at least one hundred
forty-four cars.
(4) $10,000,000 of the connecting Washington account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Mukilteo and Seattle terminal
replacement projects of the Washington state ferry system. The amount
provided in this subsection represents the first portion of a ten-year
state funding plan as described in LEAP Transportation Document 2013-4,
as developed April 18, 2013. This LEAP transportation document
identifies: (a) $119,100,000 in state funds to be provided over ten
years to complete the Mukilteo terminal replacement project; and (b)
$278,200,000 in state funds to be provided over ten years for
substantial advancement of the Seattle terminal replacement project,
including: (i) Design work and selection of a preferred plan; (ii)
replacing timber pilings with pilings sufficient to support a selected
terminal design; (iii) replacing the timber portion of the dock with a
new and reconfigured steel and concrete dock; and (iv) other staging
and construction work as the amount allows.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL--PROGRAM Y--CAPITAL
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,800,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $16,800,000 of the multimodal
transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for
reliability and slope stabilization projects on the Cascades passenger
rail corridor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL
PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,800,000
Essential Rail Assistance Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $20,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to public transit agencies.
(2) $16,800,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to local governments under
the complete streets grant program.
(3) $2,200,000 of the essential rail assistance account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the freight mobility strategic
investment board for the freight rail assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND
SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND
INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND
SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Capital Vessel Replacement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $418,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,058,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,476,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1954),
Laws of 2013 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the appropriations in
this act are null and void.

--- END ---