BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county with a population of one million or more may impose,
by approval of a majority of the registered voters of the county voting
on the proposition at a general or special election, a local motor
vehicle excise tax of up to one and one-half percent annually on the
value of every motor vehicle registered to a person residing within the
county based on any guidebook, report, or compendium of recognized
standing in the automotive industry, such as the Kelley Blue Book or
the National Automobile Dealers' Association Guide. A motor vehicle
excise tax may not be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW 46.17.355,
except for motor vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds
or less, RCW 46.16A.425, 46.17.335, or 46.17.350(1)(c).
(2) A county imposing a tax under this section must contract,
before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance imposing the
local motor vehicle excise tax, administration and collection to the
department of licensing, as appropriate, which must deduct an amount,
as provided by contract, for administration and collection expenses
incurred by the department.
(3) If the department of licensing determines a value for a vehicle
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, any person who pays a
locally imposed motor vehicle excise tax for that vehicle may appeal
the valuation to the department of licensing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
If the taxpayer is successful on appeal, the department must refund the
excess tax.
(4) The tax imposed under this section applies only when renewing
a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing.
(5)(a) A county imposing a tax under this section must use sixty
percent of the net funds, after any deductions pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section, for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs
of public transportation systems.
(b) The remaining forty percent of the net funds, after any
deductions pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, must be used for
the operations and maintenance of local roads and must be distributed
on a pro rata basis to the county imposing the local motor vehicle
excise tax and to incorporated cities and towns within the county based
upon the population of the unincorporated portion of the county, the
population of an incorporated city, or the population of an
incorporated town as a percentage of the total population of the
county.
(6) For purposes of this section, the population of an incorporated
city or town is the most recent population determined by the office of
financial management.

--- END ---