BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state of Washington is positioned in a globally accessible,
strategic location and possesses an innovative, creative workforce; and
(b) Among the state's greatest assets is its well-trained aerospace
workforce skilled in advanced mechatronics, including but not limited
to engineers, machinists, and airframe and propulsion certified
mechanics. The workforce possesses the expertise necessary to generate
complex products for commercial airlines, military, space, and
communications. This expertise includes: Research and development;
design, use of exotic materials, and application of high-tolerance
manufacturing; logistical management, tracking, and precision assembly,
aeronautical systems, and aerodynamics; certification and regulatory
compliance; and customer service and in-service operations.
(2) The legislature intends to capitalize upon the state's positive
business climate, its locally owned and operated businesses, and its
creative, competent workforce to be catalysts for Washington's economic
renewal and recovery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must encourage, through new or repurposed
programs, the innovative, creative, and entrepreneurial talents of the
Washington state workforce to "innovate here" with access to public and
private resources to prototype new technology and develop commercial
applications for the aerospace industry and for other industries that
may benefit from the transfer of aerospace technologies.
(2) Using existing resources, the department must make it a top
level priority to conduct a worldwide search to attract public and
private investment in aerospace-related workforce, plant, and
technology in Washington state. The department is encouraged to pursue
direct foreign investment by the global aerospace sector to create a
competitive marketplace for labor, technology, and innovation. The
department must invite aerospace and related industry manufacturing
companies to "choose Washington" for their next expansion by featuring
the aerospace manufacturing industry tax incentives, fee waivers,
expenditure discounts, and any other preferences approved by the
legislature in 2003 including:
(a) Income tax credits;
(b) Sales and use tax exemptions and refunds;
(c) Real and personal property tax abatements;
(d) Infrastructure grants and technical assistance;
(e) Free or discounted land and buildings;
(f) Low-cost financing for capital expenditures;
(g) Utility discounts;
(h) Waiver of permit fees;
(i) Expedited permits;
(j) Environmental and pollution control incentives;
(k) Federal and state research and development credits;
(l) Wage rebates;
(m) Job creation tax incentives;
(n) Employee training grants and credits;
(o) Federal and state targeted employment credits;
(p) Hiring and employee screening assistance; and
(q) Any additional available preferences.
(3) The department must assist small businesses that are locally
owned and operated by enterprising engineers, machinists, mechanics,
and other innovators developing their technologies and services for
global markets. The department must partner with impact Washington to
ensure that these new enterprises have access to advanced manufacturing
processes.
(4) The department must work to create the conditions that will
recruit new investment and to develop the existing aerospace industry
cluster and related industries that benefit from aerospace technology
and workforce.
(5) The department must submit a written report to appropriate
legislative committees every six months regarding the number of
potential investors contacted, the amount of private capital invested,
new product commercialization achieved, net jobs created and retained,
and other relevant information pertinent to an evaluation of the
department's efforts and that of the economic condition of Washington
state's aerospace industry. The department, in consultation with the
department of revenue, must feature in the report the specific
preferences and incentives used by the state to attract, retain, and
expand aerospace businesses and jobs, with an evaluation of which of
these preferences and incentives have accomplished their intended
purposes.
(6)(a) The department must undertake an assessment of program
effectiveness of research, training, and service at the state's
colleges and universities in areas of importance to the state's
aerospace industry, related industries, and to investment in aerospace
and related industries.
(b) By December 31, 2013, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
department must submit a written report to the legislature: Assessing
the funding, strengths, limitations, and regulatory barriers in
research, training, and service at the state's colleges and
universities in areas of importance to the state's aerospace industry
and related industries; and the veracity and completeness of
information provided to the public by the state's colleges and
universities in relation to such research, training, and service.

--- END ---