BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the United States
Constitution is the supreme law of our nation, and this body has full
confidence in its ability to endure all tests. Many immigrants came to
our nation to escape government-sanctioned persecution of their faith.
This body believes that any law which is designed to restrict the
liberty of one faith tradition erodes the founding principle of
religious liberty and that it is, as James Madison wrote in 1785,
proper to "take alarm" at any such "experiment on our liberties." Our
state has a history of embracing an individual's right to practice the
faith tradition of his or her choice within the law and free of
government interference. The legislature also finds that a
multiplicity of religious beliefs, traditions, and heritages bring
strength to our state. This body believes that it is not the role of
the legislature of Washington state to disparage or marginalize any
religious tradition. This body finds abhorrent all forms of
discrimination, including those forms of discrimination targeting
religion or belief. Our state benefits from a number of individuals
and institutions whose faith motivates them to provide food to the
hungry, shelter to the needy, inexpensive or free health services, and
other humanitarian services. Religious leaders who facilitate conflict
resolution often achieve results that ease the burdens on our courts.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.030 and 2009 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race,
creed, color, national origin, sex, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability is recognized as and
declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;
(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;
(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without
discrimination, including discrimination against families with
children;
(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without
discrimination;
(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions
with health maintenance organizations without discrimination:
PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300,
48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the
purposes of this subparagraph;
(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory
boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for
purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution
of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or
contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which
is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and
which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or
covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to
restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude
any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, honorably discharged veteran or
military status, sexual orientation, the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability, or national origin or
lawful business relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein
contained shall prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law
pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor practices; and
(g) The right of a mother to breastfeed her child in any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement.
(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the
actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost
of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act
of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).
(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against
an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real
estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the
amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any
unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the
course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a
matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.
(4) Nothing in this section may burden a person or religious
organization's freedom of religion including, but not limited to, the
right of an individual or entity to deny services if providing those
goods or services would be contrary to the individual's or entity
owner's sincerely held religious beliefs, philosophical beliefs, or
matters of conscience. This subsection does not apply to the denial of
services to individuals recognized as a protected class under federal
law applicable to the state as of the effective date of this section.
The right to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely
held religious belief, philosophical belief, or matter of conscience
may not be burdened unless the government proves that it has a
compelling governmental interest in infringing the specific act or
refusal to act and has used the least restrictive means to further that
interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---