BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.160 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) On or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, all taxes
collected under RCW 82.08.150 during the preceding month must be
remitted to the state department of revenue, to be deposited with the
state treasurer. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, upon receipt of such moneys the state treasurer must credit
sixty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) and one hundred percent of the sums collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (3) and (4) to the state general fund and
((thirty-five)) seventeen and one-half percent of the sums collected
and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) to a fund which is hereby
created to be known as the "liquor excise tax fund." Seventeen and
one-half percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150
(1) and (2) must be deposited into the impaired driving safety account
in RCW 46.68.260.
(2) During the 2012 fiscal year, 66.19 percent of the sums
collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be
deposited in the state general fund and the remainder collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the
liquor excise tax fund.
(3) During fiscal year 2013, all funds collected under RCW
82.08.150 (1), (2), (3), and (4) must be deposited into the state
general fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.68.260 and 2004 c 95 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The impaired driving safety account is created in the ((custody of
the state treasurer)) state treasury. All receipts from fees collected
under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) shall be
deposited according to RCW 46.68.041. Additionally, the tax imposed
under RCW 66.24.290(5) must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from this account may be used only to fund projects to
reduce impaired driving and to provide funding to local governments for
costs associated with enforcing laws relating to driving and boating
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

--- END ---