BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.290 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1301 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board. Any certificate of approval holder authorized to act
as a distributor under RCW 66.24.270 ((shall)) must pay the taxes
imposed by this section.
(a) Every such brewery or beer distributor ((shall)) must report
all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and
((shall)) must pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of
manufacturing and selling the beer and strong beer within the state a
tax of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on
sales to licensees within the state and on sales to licensees within
the state of bottled and canned beer, including strong beer, ((shall))
must pay a tax computed in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty
cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
(b) Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is
not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer and strong beer ((shall)) must be sold by breweries and
distributors in sealed barrels or packages.
(c) The moneys collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be
distributed as follows: (i) Three-tenths of a percent ((shall)) must
be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (ii) of the
remaining moneys: (A) Twenty percent ((shall)) must be distributed to
counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (B) eighty
percent ((shall)) must be distributed to incorporated cities and towns
in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.
(d) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase beer from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
brewery or microbrewery ((shall)) must make monthly reports to the
liquor control board on beer purchased during the preceding calendar
month in the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the
board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax ((shall))
must be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of
the following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) ((shall)) must be deposited in the state general
fund.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent
of the revenues collected from this additional tax ((shall)) must be
distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining
moneys ((shall)) must be transferred to the state general fund.
(5)(a) ((From June 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013,)) An additional
tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to fifteen
dollars and fifty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on July 1,
1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the ((state general
fund)) impaired driving safety account created in RCW 46.68.260.
(6) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(7) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.68.260 and 2004 c 95 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The impaired driving safety account is created in the ((custody of
the state treasurer)) state treasury. All receipts from fees collected
under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) shall be
deposited according to RCW 46.68.041. Additionally, the tax imposed
under RCW 66.24.290(5) must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from this account may be used only to fund projects to
reduce impaired driving and to provide funding to local governments for
costs associated with enforcing laws relating to driving and boating
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

--- END ---