BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.38.760 and 2009 c 378 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person subject to this code who:
(a) Operates or physically controls any vehicle, aircraft, or
vessel in a reckless or wanton manner or while impaired by a substance
described in RCW 38.38.762; or
(b) Operates or is in actual physical control of any vehicle,
aircraft, or vessel while drunk or when the alcohol concentration in
the person's blood or breath is equal to or exceeds the applicable
limit under subsection (2) of this section; or
(c) Operates or is in actual physical control of any vehicle,
aircraft, or vessel in a reckless or wanton manner
shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the blood
alcohol content limit with respect to alcohol concentration in a
person's blood is ((0.08)) 0.05 grams of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters of blood and with respect to alcohol concentration in a
person's breath is ((0.08)) 0.05 grams of alcohol per two hundred ten
liters of breath, as shown by chemical analysis.
(3) For purposes of this section, "blood alcohol content limit"
means the amount of alcohol concentration in a person's blood or breath
at which operation or control of a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel is
prohibited.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.308 and 2013 c 3 s 31 (Initiative Measure No.
502), 2012 c 183 s 7, and 2012 c 80 s 12 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration, THC concentration, or
presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any
offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.
Neither consent nor this section precludes a police officer from
obtaining a search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol or
THC in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her
system and being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those
instances where the person is incapable due to physical injury,
physical incapacity, or other physical limitation, of providing a
breath sample or where the person is being treated in a hospital,
clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other
similar facility or where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe
that the person is under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be
administered by a qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(5).
The officer shall inform the person of his or her right to refuse the
breath or blood test, and of his or her right to have additional tests
administered by any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided
in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially
the following language, that:
(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least
one year; and
(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to
take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and
(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered,
the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended,
revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if:
(i) The driver is age twenty-one or over and the test indicates
either that the alcohol concentration of the driver's breath or blood
is ((0.08)) 0.05 or more or that the THC concentration of the driver's
blood is 5.00 or more; or
(ii) The driver is under age twenty-one and the test indicates
either that the alcohol concentration of the driver's breath or blood
is 0.02 or more or that the THC concentration of the driver's blood is
above 0.00; or
(iii) The driver is under age twenty-one and the driver is in
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504; and
(d) If the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive is
suspended, revoked, or denied the driver may be eligible to immediately
apply for an ignition interlock driver's license.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of felony driving under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs under RCW 46.61.502(6), felony physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.504(6), vehicular homicide as
provided in RCW 46.61.520, or vehicular assault as provided in RCW
46.61.522, or if an individual is under arrest for the crime of driving
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided
in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there
has been serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood
test may be administered without the consent of the individual so
arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is ((0.08)) 0.05 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's
blood is 5.00 or more, if the person is age twenty-one or over, or that
the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.02 or
more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood is above 0.00, if
the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person refuses to
submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law enforcement
officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the department,
where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the person's
blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section and that the person waives the right to a hearing if he or she
receives an ignition interlock driver's license;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol or THC concentration in violation of RCW
46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was
((0.08)) 0.05 or more, or the THC concentration of the person's blood
was 5.00 or more, if the person is age twenty-one or over, or that the
alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more,
or the THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00, if the
person is under the age of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within twenty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of three hundred seventy-five dollars as part of the
request. If the request is mailed, it must be postmarked within twenty
days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a
request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the required three
hundred seventy-five dollar fee, the department shall afford the person
an opportunity for a hearing. The department may waive the required
three hundred seventy-five dollar fee if the person is an indigent as
defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the hearing is subject to and shall be scheduled and conducted
in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be
conducted in the county of the arrest, except that all or part of the
hearing may, at the discretion of the department, be conducted by
telephone or other electronic means. The hearing shall be held within
sixty days following the arrest or following the date notice has been
given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood
test, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, in
which case the action by the department shall be stayed, and any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6)(c) of this section
extended, if the person is otherwise eligible for licensing. For the
purposes of this section, the scope of the hearing shall cover the
issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to
believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having
alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or more, or THC
in his or her system in a concentration above 0.00, if the person was
under the age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under
arrest, and (a) whether the person refused to submit to the test or
tests upon request of the officer after having been informed that such
refusal would result in the revocation of the person's license, permit,
or privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered,
whether the applicable requirements of this section were satisfied
before the administration of the test or tests, whether the person
submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was administered
without express consent as permitted under this section, and whether
the test or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration of the
person's breath or blood was ((0.08)) 0.05 or more, or the THC
concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or more, if the person was
age twenty-one or over at the time of the arrest, or that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or more, or the
THC concentration of the person's blood was above 0.00, if the person
was under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn
report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085
submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the
officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving
or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or
the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration of 0.02 or more, or THC in his or her system
in a concentration above 0.00, and was under the age of twenty-one and
that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, or notifies the department of
licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the
license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the
deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than one hundred
fifty days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the
date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court
stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions
on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the
department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the
period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not
recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is
rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered
treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the
court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel
the stay and any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary
license issued under this subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.3101 and 2013 c 3 s 32 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
Pursuant to RCW 46.20.308, the department shall suspend, revoke, or
deny the arrested person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as
follows:
(1) In the case of a person who has refused a test or tests:
(a) For a first refusal within seven years, where there has not
been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for one
year;
(b) For a second or subsequent refusal within seven years, or for
a first refusal where there has been one or more previous incidents
within seven years that have resulted in administrative action under
this section, revocation or denial for two years or until the person
reaches age twenty-one, whichever is longer.
(2) In the case of an incident where a person has submitted to or
been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood was ((0.08)) 0.05 or
more, or that the THC concentration of the person's blood was 5.00 or
more:
(a) For a first incident within seven years, where there has not
been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, suspension for ninety days;
(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years,
revocation or denial for two years.
(3) In the case of an incident where a person under age twenty-one
has submitted to or been administered a test or tests indicating that
the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.02 or
more, or that the THC concentration of the person's blood was above
0.00:
(a) For a first incident within seven years, suspension or denial
for ninety days;
(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years,
revocation or denial for one year or until the person reaches age
twenty-one, whichever is longer.
(4) The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for
any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this section for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under RCW
46.61.5055 arising out of the same incident.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.25.090 and 2011 c 227 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of not less than one year if a report has been
received by the department pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 or 46.25.120, or
if the person has been convicted of a first violation, within this or
any other jurisdiction, of:
(a) Driving a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or any
drug;
(b) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration in the person's system is 0.04 or more, or driving a
noncommercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the
person's system is ((0.08)) 0.05 or more, or is 0.02 or more if the
person is under age twenty-one, as determined by any testing methods
approved by law in this state or any other state or jurisdiction;
(c) Leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle
driven by the person;
(d) Using a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;
(e) Refusing to submit to a test or tests to determine the driver's
alcohol concentration or the presence of any drug while driving a motor
vehicle;
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when, as a result of prior
violations committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle, the
driver's commercial driver's license is revoked, suspended, or
canceled, or the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial
motor vehicle;
(g) Causing a fatality through the negligent operation of a
commercial motor vehicle, including but not limited to the crimes of
vehicular homicide and negligent homicide.
If any of the violations set forth in this subsection occurred
while transporting hazardous material, the person is disqualified for
a period of not less than three years.
(2) A person is disqualified for life if it has been determined
that the person has committed or has been convicted of two or more
violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this
section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two or more
separate incidents.
(3) The department may adopt rules, in accordance with federal
regulations, establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which
a disqualification for life under subsection (2) of this section may be
reduced to a period of not less than ten years.
(4) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for life who uses a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony
involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled
substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW, or possession with intent
to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance, as
defined by chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if:
(A) Convicted of or found to have committed a second serious
traffic violation while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
(B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been a prior
serious traffic violation; or
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if:
(A) Convicted of or found to have committed a third or subsequent
serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
(B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been two or more
prior serious traffic violations.
(b) The disqualification period under (a)(ii) of this subsection
must be in addition to any other previous period of disqualification.
(c) For purposes of determining prior serious traffic violations
under this subsection, each conviction of or finding that a driver has
committed a serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor
vehicle or noncommercial motor vehicle, arising from a separate
incident occurring within a three-year period, must be counted.
(6) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(a) Not less than one hundred eighty days nor more than one year if
convicted of or found to have committed a first violation of an out-of-service order while driving a commercial vehicle;
(b) Not less than two years nor more than five years if, during a
ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed two violations of out-of-service orders while driving a
commercial motor vehicle in separate incidents;
(c) Not less than three years nor more than five years if, during
a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed three or more violations of out-of-service orders while
driving commercial motor vehicles in separate incidents;
(d) Not less than one hundred eighty days nor more than two years
if the person is convicted of or is found to have committed a first
violation of an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous
materials, or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport
sixteen or more passengers, including the driver. A person is
disqualified for a period of not less than three years nor more than
five years if, during a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or
is found to have committed subsequent violations of out-of-service
orders, in separate incidents, while transporting hazardous materials,
or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver.
(7) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle if a report has been received by the department under RCW
46.25.125 that the person has received a verified positive drug test or
positive alcohol confirmation test as part of the testing program
conducted under 49 C.F.R. 40. A disqualification under this subsection
remains in effect until the person undergoes a drug and alcohol
assessment by a substance abuse professional meeting the requirements
of 49 C.F.R. 40, and the person presents evidence of satisfactory
participation in or successful completion of a drug or alcohol
treatment and/or education program as recommended by the substance
abuse professional, and until the person has met the requirements of
RCW 46.25.100. The substance abuse professional shall forward a
diagnostic evaluation and treatment recommendation to the department of
licensing for use in determining the person's eligibility for driving
a commercial motor vehicle. Persons who are disqualified under this
subsection more than twice in a five-year period are disqualified for
life.
(8)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for the period of time specified in (b) of this subsection if
he or she is convicted of or is found to have committed one of the
following six offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing while
operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state,
or local law or regulation:
(i) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;
(ii) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;
(iii) For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop
before driving onto the crossing;
(iv) For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive
completely through the crossing without stopping;
(v) For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or
the directions of an enforcement officer at the crossing;
(vi) For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of
insufficient undercarriage clearance.
(b) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a first violation of a railroad-highway grade
crossing violation;
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if the driver is
convicted of or is found to have committed a second railroad-highway
grade crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year
period;
(iii) Not less than one year if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade
crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year period.
(9) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for not more than one year if a report has been received by the
department from the federal motor carrier safety administration that
the person's driving has been determined to constitute an imminent
hazard as defined by 49 C.F.R. 383.5. A person who is simultaneously
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under this
subsection and under other provisions of this chapter, or under 49
C.F.R. 383.52, shall serve those disqualification periods concurrently.
(10) Within ten days after suspending, revoking, or canceling a
commercial driver's license or disqualifying a driver from operating a
commercial motor vehicle, the department shall update its records to
reflect that action.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.61.502 and 2013 c 3 s 33 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug if the person drives a
vehicle within this state:
(a) And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol
concentration of ((0.08)) 0.05 or higher as shown by analysis of the
person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) The person has, within two hours after driving, a THC
concentration of 5.00 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(c) While the person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor, marijuana, or any drug; or
(d) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor, marijuana, and any drug.
(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state
shall not constitute a defense against a charge of violating this
section.
(3)(a) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before the
administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause
the defendant's alcohol concentration to be ((0.08)) 0.05 or more
within two hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of
this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the
omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to
assert the affirmative defense.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(b) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of marijuana after the time of driving and before the
administration of an analysis of the person's blood to cause the
defendant's THC concentration to be 5.00 or more within two hours after
driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the
defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial
hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative
defense.
(4)(a) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two
hours after the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two
hours of the alleged driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of
((0.08)) 0.05 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol
concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug
in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.
(b) Analyses of blood samples obtained more than two hours after
the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two hours of
the alleged driving, a person had a THC concentration of 5.00 or more
in violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, and in any case in
which the analysis shows a THC concentration above 0.00 may be used as
evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by
marijuana in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) It is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9.94A RCW, or
chapter 13.40 RCW if the person is a juvenile, if:
(a) The person has four or more prior offenses within ten years as
defined in RCW 46.61.5055; or
(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:
(i) Vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a);
(ii) Vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b);
(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified
in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or
(iv) A violation of this subsection (6) or RCW 46.61.504(6).

Sec. 6 RCW 46.61.504 and 2013 c 3 s 35 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug if the person has actual physical control of a vehicle within this
state:
(a) And the person has, within two hours after being in actual
physical control of the vehicle, an alcohol concentration of ((0.08))
0.05 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood
made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) The person has, within two hours after being in actual physical
control of a vehicle, a THC concentration of 5.00 or higher as shown by
analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(c) While the person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug; or
(d) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor and any drug.
(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does
not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.
No person may be convicted under this section if, prior to being
pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has moved the vehicle
safely off the roadway.
(3)(a) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of alcohol after the time of being in actual physical control
of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of the
person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration
to be ((0.08)) 0.05 or more within two hours after being in such
control. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the
defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial
hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative
defense.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(b) of this section, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of marijuana after the time of being in actual physical
control of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of
the person's blood to cause the defendant's THC concentration to be
5.00 or more within two hours after being in control of the vehicle.
The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant
notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in
the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.
(4)(a) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two
hours after the alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle
may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged being in
such control, a person had an alcohol concentration of ((0.08)) 0.05 or
more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case
in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be
used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(c) or
(d) of this section.
(b) Analyses of blood samples obtained more than two hours after
the alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle may be used
as evidence that within two hours of the alleged being in control of
the vehicle, a person had a THC concentration of 5.00 or more in
violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, and in any case in
which the analysis shows a THC concentration above 0.00 may be used as
evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by
marijuana in violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) It is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9.94A RCW, or
chapter 13.40 RCW if the person is a juvenile, if:
(a) The person has four or more prior offenses within ten years as
defined in RCW 46.61.5055; or
(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:
(i) Vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a);
(ii) Vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b);
(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified
in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or
(iv) A violation of this subsection (6) or RCW 46.61.502(6).

Sec. 7 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2012 c 183 s 12, 2012 c 42 s 2, and
2012 c 28 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than three
hundred sixty-four days. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based.
In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under
this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of
electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than three
hundred sixty-four days. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may
not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition
of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to
the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and sixty days of electronic home
monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of sixty days
electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional
four days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and ninety days of electronic home
monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of ninety days
electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional
six days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the
court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or
deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or
deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of one hundred
twenty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least
an additional eight days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol
the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic
home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty
days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or
mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for
granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred fifty days of
electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may
order at least an additional ten days in jail. The offender shall pay
for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality
where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court
may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment
and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:
(a) The person has four or more prior offenses within ten years; or
(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:
(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified
in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or
(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).
(5)(a) The court shall require any person convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to
comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the
installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device
installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.
(b) If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any
alcohol, the court may order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring
through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor
device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's
system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless
the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds
that are available from an alternative source identified by the court.
The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost.
(6) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) Order the use of an ignition interlock or other device for an
additional six months;
(b) In any case in which the person has no prior offenses within
seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), order a penalty by a fine of not less than one thousand
dollars and not more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent;
(c) In any case in which the person has one prior offense within
seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), order a penalty by a fine of not less than two thousand
dollars and not more than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent;
(d) In any case in which the person has two or three prior offenses
within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), order a penalty by a fine of not less than three thousand
dollars and not more than ten thousand dollars. One thousand dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(7) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(8) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(9) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
Upon its own motion or upon motion by a person, a court may find,
on the record, that notice to the department under RCW 46.20.270 has
been delayed for three years or more as a result of a clerical or court
error. If so, the court may order that the person's license, permit,
or nonresident privilege shall not be revoked, suspended, or denied for
that offense. The court shall send notice of the finding and order to
the department and to the person. Upon receipt of the notice from the
court, the department shall not revoke, suspend, or deny the license,
permit, or nonresident privilege of the person for that offense.
For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(10) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(11)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to
three hundred sixty-four days in jail, the court shall also suspend but
shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five
years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include:
(i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid
license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the future;
(ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an
alcohol concentration of ((0.08)) 0.05 or more within two hours after
driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her
breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a
law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the
person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor.
The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the
probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised
probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence
may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(12) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-four days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-four days.
(13) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(3).
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction
for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with
the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result
of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction
for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with
the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result
of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance;
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522; or
(ix) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a
violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant
participate in a chemical dependency treatment program;
If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent
conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the
subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the
revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current
offense; and
(c) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within ten years before or after the arrest for the current
offense.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.61.506 and 2013 c 3 s 37 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding
arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person while
driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, if the person's alcohol
concentration is less than ((0.08)) 0.05 or the person's THC
concentration is less than 5.00, it is evidence that may be considered
with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(2)(a) The breath analysis of the person's alcohol concentration
shall be based upon grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath.
(b) The blood analysis of the person's THC concentration shall be
based upon nanograms per milliliter of whole blood.
(c) The foregoing provisions of this section shall not be construed
as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing
upon the question whether the person was under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(3) Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid
under the provisions of this section or RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
shall have been performed according to methods approved by the state
toxicologist and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by
the state toxicologist for this purpose. The state toxicologist is
directed to approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to supervise
the examination of individuals to ascertain their qualifications and
competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits which shall
be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the state
toxicologist.
(4)(a) A breath test performed by any instrument approved by the
state toxicologist shall be admissible at trial or in an administrative
proceeding if the prosecution or department produces prima facie
evidence of the following:
(i) The person who performed the test was authorized to perform
such test by the state toxicologist;
(ii) The person being tested did not vomit or have anything to eat,
drink, or smoke for at least fifteen minutes prior to administration of
the test;
(iii) The person being tested did not have any foreign substances,
not to include dental work, fixed or removable, in his or her mouth at
the beginning of the fifteen-minute observation period;
(iv) Prior to the start of the test, the temperature of any liquid
simulator solution utilized as an external standard, as measured by a
thermometer approved of by the state toxicologist was thirty-four
degrees centigrade plus or minus 0.3 degrees centigrade;
(v) The internal standard test resulted in the message "verified";
(vi) The two breath samples agree to within plus or minus ten
percent of their mean to be determined by the method approved by the
state toxicologist;
(vii) The result of the test of the liquid simulator solution
external standard or dry gas external standard result did lie between
.072 to .088 inclusive; and
(viii) All blank tests gave results of .000.
(b) For purposes of this section, "prima facie evidence" is
evidence of sufficient circumstances that would support a logical and
reasonable inference of the facts sought to be proved. In assessing
whether there is sufficient evidence of the foundational facts, the
court or administrative tribunal is to assume the truth of the
prosecution's or department's evidence and all reasonable inferences
from it in a light most favorable to the prosecution or department.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the subject
of the test from challenging the reliability or accuracy of the test,
the reliability or functioning of the instrument, or any maintenance
procedures. Such challenges, however, shall not preclude the
admissibility of the test once the prosecution or department has made
a prima facie showing of the requirements contained in (a) of this
subsection. Instead, such challenges may be considered by the trier of
fact in determining what weight to give to the test result.
(5) When a blood test is administered under the provisions of RCW
46.20.308, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its
alcoholic or drug content may be performed only by a physician, a
registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a nursing assistant as
defined in chapter 18.88A RCW, a physician assistant as defined in
chapter 18.71A RCW, a first responder as defined in chapter 18.73 RCW,
an emergency medical technician as defined in chapter 18.73 RCW, a
health care assistant as defined in chapter 18.135 RCW, or any
technician trained in withdrawing blood. This limitation shall not
apply to the taking of breath specimens.
(6) The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified
technician, chemist, registered nurse, or other qualified person of his
or her own choosing administer one or more tests in addition to any
administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The test
will be admissible if the person establishes the general acceptability
of the testing technique or method. The failure or inability to obtain
an additional test by a person shall not preclude the admission of
evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the direction of a law
enforcement officer.
(7) Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or
tests at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information
concerning the test or tests shall be made available to him or her or
his or her attorney.

Sec. 9 RCW 79A.60.040 and 1998 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a
reckless manner.
(2) It shall be a violation for a person to operate a vessel while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug. A person is
considered to be under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
if:
(a) The person has ((0.08)) 0.05 grams or more of alcohol per two
hundred ten liters of breath, as shown by analysis of the person's
breath made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) The person has ((0.08)) 0.05 percent or more by weight of
alcohol in the person's blood, as shown by analysis of the person's
blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(c) The person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug; or
(d) The person is under the combined influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor and any drug.
The fact that any person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this state
shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this
section. A person cited under this subsection may upon request be
given a breath test for breath alcohol or may request to have a blood
sample taken for blood alcohol analysis. An arresting officer shall
administer field sobriety tests when circumstances permit.
(3) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable as
provided under RCW 9.92.030. In addition, the court may order the
defendant to pay restitution for any damages or injuries resulting from
the offense.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.56.540 and 2000 c 69 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of operating a vessel while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs if the person operates a
covered vessel within this state while:
(a) The person has ((0.06)) 0.05 grams or more of alcohol per two
hundred ten liters of breath, as shown by analysis of the person's
breath made under RCW 90.56.550; or
(b) The person has ((0.06)) 0.05 percent or more by weight of
alcohol in the person's blood as shown by analysis of the person's
blood made under RCW 90.56.550; or
(c) The person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or drugs; or
(d) The person is under the combined influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or drugs.
(2) The fact that any person charged with a violation of this
section is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this
state shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating
this section.
(3) Operating a vessel while intoxicated is a class C felony under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.56.550 and 1991 c 200 s 606 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding
arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by a person while
operating a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
drugs, if the amount of alcohol in the person's blood or breath at the
time alleged as shown by analysis of his blood or breath is less than
((0.06)) 0.05 percent by weight of alcohol in his blood or ((0.06))
0.05 grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of the person's
breath, it is evidence that may be considered with other competent
evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs.
(2) The breath analysis shall be based upon grams of alcohol per
two hundred ten liters of breath. The foregoing provisions of this
section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any
other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person
was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(3) Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid
under this section shall have been performed according to methods
approved by the state toxicologist and by an individual possessing a
valid permit issued by the state toxicologist for this purpose. The
state toxicologist shall approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to
supervise the examination of individuals to ascertain their
qualifications and competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue
permits that are subject to termination or revocation at the discretion
of the state toxicologist.
(4) If a blood test is administered under this section, the
withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcoholic
content may be performed only by a physician, a registered nurse, or a
qualified technician. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of
breath specimens.
(5) The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified
technician, chemist, registered nurse, or other qualified person of his
or her own choosing administer one or more tests in addition to any
administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The
failure or inability to obtain an additional test by a person shall not
preclude the admission of evidence relating to the test or tests taken
at the direction of a law enforcement officer.
(6) Upon the request of the person who submits to a test or tests
at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information
concerning the test or tests shall be made available to the person or
his or her attorney.

--- END ---