BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.240.020 and 2008 c 288 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or
retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute
for sale, or distribute for use in this state a children's product or
product component containing the following:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section,
lead at more than .009 percent by weight (ninety parts per million);
(b) Cadmium at more than .004 percent by weight (forty parts per
million); or
(c) Phthalates, individually or in combination, at more than 0.10
percent by weight (one thousand parts per million).
(2) Beginning July 1, 2015, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or
retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute
for sale, or distribute for use in this state children's products or
residential upholstered furniture, as defined in RCW 70.76.010,
containing TDCPP or TCEP in amounts greater than one hundred parts per
million in any product component.
(3) If determined feasible for manufacturers to achieve and
necessary to protect children's health, the department, in consultation
with the department of health, may by rule require that no
manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell,
offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this
state a children's product or product component containing lead at more
than .004 percent by weight (forty parts per million).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.240 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2015, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or
retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute
for sale or distribute for use in this state, residential upholstered
furniture, as defined in RCW 70.76.010, or children's products
containing a flame retardant in any product component in amounts
greater than one hundred parts per million identified by the department
as a high priority chemical of high concern for children as required
under RCW 70.240.030.
(2) Except for TDCPP and TCEP, the department shall grant an
exemption to restrictions under subsection (1) of this section for a
length of time requested by the manufacturer, but not to exceed two
years, if the manufacturer of residential upholstered furniture or
children's products demonstrates, and the department determines, that
there is no technically feasible safer alternative to meet applicable
Washington state or federal fire safety standards.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2015, at the request of the department, a
manufacturer of residential upholstered furniture or children's
products shall, within sixty days of the request, submit a certificate
of compliance stating that the product or product component meets the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section. A manufacturer
required under any other state statute to provide a certificate of
compliance may develop one certificate containing all required
information.
(4) The certificate of compliance must include the following:
(a) Chemical names and chemical abstracts service registry numbers
for all chemicals present in the product or product component that act
as flame retardants;
(b) The specific basis upon which an exemption, if applicable, is
claimed; and
(c) The signature of an authorized official of the manufacturing
company.
(5) A manufacturer completing a certificate of compliance shall
keep a copy of the certificate on file for as long as the product or
product component contains flame retardants. If a manufacturer ceases
to sell or distribute products or product components containing flame
retardants, the manufacturer must retain the certificate on file for
three years from the date of the last sale or distribution.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.240.010 and 2008 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Children's cosmetics" means cosmetics that are made for,
marketed for use by, or marketed to children under the age of twelve.
"Children's cosmetics" includes cosmetics that meet any of the
following conditions:
(a) Represented in its packaging, display, or advertising as
appropriate for use by children;
(b) Sold in conjunction with, attached to, or packaged together
with other products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as
appropriate for use by children; or
(c) Sold in any of the following:
(i) Retail store, catalogue, or online web site, in which a person
exclusively offers for sale products that are packaged, displayed, or
advertised as appropriate for use by children; or
(ii) A discrete portion of a retail store, catalogue, or online web
site, in which a person offers for sale products that are packaged,
displayed, or advertised as appropriate for use by children.
(2) "Children's jewelry" means jewelry that is made for, marketed
for use by, or marketed to children under the age of twelve.
"Children's jewelry" includes jewelry that meets any of the following
conditions:
(a) Represented in its packaging, display, or advertising as
appropriate for use by children under the age of twelve;
(b) Sold in conjunction with, attached to, or packaged together
with other products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as
appropriate for use by children;
(c) Sized for children and not intended for use by adults; or
(d) Sold in any of the following:
(i) A vending machine;
(ii) Retail store, catalogue, or online web site, in which a person
exclusively offers for sale products that are packaged, displayed, or
advertised as appropriate for use by children; or
(iii) A discrete portion of a retail store, catalogue, or online
web site, in which a person offers for sale products that are packaged,
displayed, or advertised as appropriate for use by children.
(3)(a) "Children's product" includes any of the following:
(i) Toys;
(ii) Children's cosmetics;
(iii) Children's jewelry;
(iv) A product designed or intended by the manufacturer to help a
child with sucking or teething, to facilitate sleep, relaxation, or the
feeding of a child, or to be worn as clothing by children; or
(v) Child car seats.
(b) "Children's product" does not include the following:
(i) Batteries;
(ii) Slings and catapults;
(iii) Sets of darts with metallic points;
(iv) Toy steam engines;
(v) Bicycles and tricycles;
(vi) Video toys that can be connected to a video screen and are
operated at a nominal voltage exceeding twenty-four volts;
(vii) Chemistry sets;
(viii) Consumer electronic products, including but not limited to
personal computers, audio and video equipment, calculators, wireless
phones, game consoles, and handheld devices incorporating a video
screen, used to access interactive software and their associated
peripherals;
(ix) Interactive software, intended for leisure and entertainment,
such as computer games, and their storage media, such as compact disks;
(x) BB guns, pellet guns, and air rifles;
(xi) Snow sporting equipment, including skis, poles, boots, snow
boards, sleds, and bindings;
(xii) Sporting equipment, including, but not limited to bats,
balls, gloves, sticks, pucks, and pads;
(xiii) Roller skates;
(xiv) Scooters;
(xv) Model rockets;
(xvi) Athletic shoes with cleats or spikes; and
(xvii) Pocket knives and multitools.
(4) "Cosmetics" includes articles intended to be rubbed, poured,
sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the
human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting
attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and articles intended for
use as a component of such an article. "Cosmetics" does not include
soap, dietary supplements, or food and drugs approved by the United
States food and drug administration.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "High priority chemical" means a chemical identified by a state
agency, federal agency, or accredited research university, or other
scientific evidence deemed authoritative by the department on the basis
of credible scientific evidence as known to do one or more of the
following:
(a) Harm the normal development of a fetus or child or cause other
developmental toxicity;
(b) Cause cancer, genetic damage, or reproductive harm;
(c) Disrupt the endocrine system;
(d) Damage the nervous system, immune system, or organs or cause
other systemic toxicity;
(e) Be persistent, bioaccumulative, and toxic; or
(f) Be very persistent and very bioaccumulative.
(7) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a children's product or an importer or domestic
distributor of a children's product. For the purposes of this
subsection, "importer" means the owner of the children's product.
(8) "Phthalates" means di-(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate (DEHP), dibutyl
phthalate (DBP), benzyl butyl phthalate (BBP), diisonoyl phthalate
(DINP), diisodecyl phthalate (DIDP), or di-n-octyl phthalate (DnOP).
(9) "Toy" means a product designed or intended by the manufacturer
to be used by a child at play.
(10) "Trade association" means a membership organization of persons
engaging in a similar or related line of commerce, organized to promote
and improve business conditions in that line of commerce and not to
engage in a regular business of a kind ordinarily carried on for
profit.
(11) "Very bioaccumulative" means having a bioconcentration factor
or bioaccumulation factor greater than or equal to five thousand, or if
neither are available, having a log Kow greater than 5.0.
(12) "Very persistent" means having a half-life greater than or
equal to one of the following:
(a) A half-life in soil or sediment of greater than one hundred
eighty days;
(b) A half-life greater than or equal to sixty days in water or
evidence of long-range transport.
(13) "TDCPP" means the chemical (tris(1,3-dichloro-2-propyl)phosphate); chemical abstracts service number 13674-87-8, as of
the effective date of this section.
(14) "TCEP" means the chemical (tris(2-chloroethyl)phosphate);
chemical abstracts service number 115-96-8, as of the effective date of
this section.

--- END ---