BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that patient safety
and service are essential components of a successful health care
system. Recognizing the limitations of individual providers and
resources, it is not possible for each health care provider to offer
every possible service to every patient in a safe and timely manner.
To that end, there has been a long tradition in all areas of the health
care field to utilize a referral process in order to effectively
connect a patient with the services he or she needs. In order to
facilitate safe, timely, medically appropriate, and efficient patient
care, the legislature finds that a standardization of the referral
process in the pharmacy profession is in the best interests of
patients, pharmacies, and pharmacists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Pharmacies and pharmacists have a duty to facilitate the
delivery of lawfully prescribed and medically appropriate drugs or
devices and those approved for restricted distribution by pharmacies,
to patients in a timely manner, except under the following
circumstances:
(a) Prescriptions containing obvious or known errors, inadequacies
in the instructions, known contraindications, or incompatible
prescriptions;
(b) Potentially fraudulent prescriptions; and
(c) National or state emergencies or guidelines affecting
availability, usage, or supplies of drugs or devices.
(2) A pharmacy or pharmacist fulfills the duty to facilitate the
delivery of a lawfully prescribed and medically appropriate drug or
device if, when presented with a lawful, medically appropriate
prescription or request for distribution, a pharmacy or pharmacist:
(a) Dispenses or delivers the lawfully prescribed and medically
appropriate drug or device or a therapeutically equivalent alternative
drug or device;
(b) Facilitates the patient's access to the lawfully prescribed and
medically appropriate drug or device by referring the patient to a
pharmacy or other appropriate health care provider to provide the drug
or device. To complete the referral, the referring pharmacy or
pharmacist must contact the provider of the patient's choice to confirm
that the drug or device is available, and communicate the prescription
to the new provider; or
(c) Returns the unfilled prescription if the patient or the
patient's caregiver objects to a referral.
(3) Nothing in this section requires a pharmacy to deliver a drug
or device without payment of its usual and customary or contracted
charge.
(4) A pharmacy or pharmacist may not be disciplined or
discriminated against in employment or professional privileges for
referring a patient to another provider in lieu of dispensing a drug or
device so long as the pharmacy or pharmacist has complied with the
requirements of this section.

--- END ---