BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914 and 2012 c 228
s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4)(a)(ii) of this section:
(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years, reductions or
increases in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and
technical colleges and shall be three percent below the full-time
resident undergraduate tuition fees for the 2012-13 academic year.
(b) Beginning in the ((2011-12)) 2015-16 academic year, reductions
or increases in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the
omnibus appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at
community and technical colleges and shall not exceed inflation as
measured by the implicit price deflator for personal consumption
expenditures for the United States for the previous calendar year, as
compiled by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States
department of commerce and reported in the most recent quarterly
publication of the economic and revenue forecast council or successor
agency.
(3) The governing boards of the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state board for
community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time
tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in
other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical
colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models. The board
may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.
(((3))) (4)(a)(i) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and
through the end of the ((2014-15)) 2018-19 academic year, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees
for all students, including summer school students and students in
other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or
increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs,
campuses, courses, or students; however ((, during the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, reductions or)):
(A) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years, full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduate students shall be three percent below
the full-time resident undergraduate tuition fees for the 2012-13
academic year, except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection; and
(B) Increases in tuition must be uniform among resident
undergraduate students beginning in academic year 2015-16 and must not
exceed inflation as measured by the implicit price deflator for
personal consumption expenditures for the United States for the
previous calendar year, as compiled by the bureau of economic analysis
of the United States department of commerce and reported in the most
recent quarterly publication of the economic and revenue forecast
council or successor agency, except as provided in (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
(ii) If Senate Bill No. . . . (S-2759/13) becomes law, then in any
fiscal year that state funding for a college or university falls below
the funding rates for full-time equivalent resident students specified
in RCW 28B.10.776, the governing board may increase full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduate students for the ensuing academic year
by an amount not to exceed the amount necessary to achieve the funding
levels specified in RCW 28B.10.776.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Each governing board shall make public
its proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the
governing board of the institution considers adoption and allow
opportunity for public comment. However, the requirement to make
public a proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before
the governing board considers adoption shall not apply if the omnibus
appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th.
Governing boards shall be required to provide data regarding the
percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and
the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the state board for community and technical college system shall
consult with existing student associations or organizations with
undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential
tuition increases. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students
receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of
total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(((4) Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19
academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for
resident undergraduates as follows:
(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the
level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year
2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in
(d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the
actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments
as required in the omnibus appropriations act;
(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident
undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student
funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the
global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing
board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068;
and
(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an
institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth
percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.))
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year
institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(((9) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on
advanced tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:
(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded
status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program; and
(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding
how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the
ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2012 c 229 s 525 and 2012 c 229 s 524
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to facilitate the full implementation of ((chapter 10,
Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. for the 2011-12 through 2018-19 academic
years)) RCW 28B.10.776 if Senate Bill No. . . . (S-2759/13) becomes law
and RCW 28B.15.067, the institutions of higher education are authorized
to adopt tuition levels that are less than, equal to, or greater than
the tuition levels assumed in the omnibus appropriations act, subject
to the conditions and limitations in this chapter, chapter 28B.10 RCW,
and the omnibus appropriations act.
(2) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2011, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the student
achievement council, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of:
(a) The total per-student funding level that represents the
sixtieth percentile of funding for similar institutions of higher
education in the global challenge states; and
(b) The tuition that represents the sixtieth percentile of resident
undergraduate tuition for similar institutions of higher education in
the global challenge states.
(3) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy index ranks
states on indicators of their potential to compete in the new economy.
At least once every five years, the office of financial management
shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge states are
appropriate. The office of financial management shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.
(4) Institutions of higher education, in collaboration with
relevant student associations, shall aim to have all students who can
benefit from available tax credits that mitigate the costs of higher
education take advantage of these opportunities. These tax credits
include the American opportunity tax credit provided in the American
recovery and reinvestment act of 2009, the lifetime learning credit,
and other relevant tax credits for as long as they are available.
(5)(a) Institutions shall make every effort to communicate to
students and their families the benefits of such tax credits and
provide assistance to students and their families on how to apply.
(b) Information about relevant tax credits shall, to the greatest
extent possible, be incorporated into financial aid counseling,
admission information, and individual billing statements.
(c) Institutions shall, to the greatest extent possible, use all
means of communication, including but not limited to web sites, online
catalogues, admission and registration forms, mass email messaging,
social media, and outside marketing to ensure information about
relevant tax credits is visible and compelling, and reaches the maximum
amount of student and families that can benefit.
(6) In the event that the economic value of the American
opportunity tax credit is reduced or expires at any time before
December 31, 2012, institutions of higher education shall:
(a) Develop an updated tuition mitigation plan established under
RCW 28B.15.102 for the purpose of minimizing, to the greatest extent
possible, the increase in net cost of tuition or total cost of
attendance for students resulting from any such change. This plan
shall include the methods specified by the four-year institution of
higher education to avoid adding additional loan debt burdens to
students regardless of the source of such loans;
(b) Report to the governor and the relevant committees of the
legislature on their plans to adjust their tuition mitigation plans no
later than ninety days after any such change to the American
opportunity tax credit.

--- END ---