BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In 2005, to address an unexpected
significant loss of tax revenue resulting from the Estate of Hemphill
decision and to provide additional funding for public education, the
legislature enacted a stand-alone estate and transfer tax, effective
May 17, 2005. The stand-alone estate and transfer tax applies to the
transfer of property at death. By defining the term "transfer" to mean
a "transfer as used in section 2001 of the internal revenue code," the
legislature clearly expressed its intent that a "transfer" for purposes
of determining the federal taxable estate is also a "transfer" for
purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate.
(2) In In re Estate of Bracken, 175 Wn.2d 549, 290 P.3d 99 (2012),
the Washington supreme court narrowly construed the term "transfer" as
defined in the Washington estate tax code.
(3) The legislature finds that it is well established that the term
"transfer" as used in the federal estate tax code is construed broadly
and extends to the "shifting from one to another of any power or
privilege incidental to the ownership or enjoyment of property" that
occurs at death. Fernandez v. Wiener, 326 U.S. 340, 352 (1945).
(4) The legislature further finds that: The Bracken decision held
certain qualified terminable interest property (QTIP) of married
couples was transferred without incurring Washington state estate tax
liability, which: (a) Creates an inequity never intended by the
legislature because unmarried individuals did not enjoy any similar
opportunities to avoid or greatly reduce their potential Washington
estate tax liability; and (b) may create disparate treatment between
QTIP property and other property transferred between spouses that is
eligible for the marital deduction.
(5) Therefore, the legislature finds that it is necessary to
reinstate the legislature's intended meaning when it enacted the estate
tax, restore parity between married couples and unmarried individuals,
restore parity between QTIP property and other property eligible for
the marital deduction, and prevent the adverse fiscal impacts of the
Bracken decision by reaffirming its intent that the term "transfer" as
used in the Washington estate and transfer tax is to be given its
broadest possible meaning consistent with established United States
supreme court precedents, subject only to the limits and exceptions
expressly provided by the legislature.
(6) As curative, clarifying, and remedial, the legislature intends
for sections 2 and 4 of this act to apply both prospectively and
retroactively to estates of decedents dying on or after May 17, 2005.
(7) The legislature, while finding it necessary to address the
inequity and significant unanticipated fiscal impact created by the
Bracken decision, also finds that the state's estate tax burdens family
owned businesses, undermines job creation, and discourages savings and
investment. Therefore, the legislature also intends by this act to
increase the threshold for determining whether the tax applies to an
estate, and also to decrease the tax rate to seventy-five percent of
current rates by calendar year 2022.

Sec. 2 RCW 83.100.020 and 2013 c 23 s 341 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in this chapter:
(1))) Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to
RCW 83.100.040 in section 3 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.047 in section 4 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.047 in section 5 of this act: The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1)(a) "Applicable exclusion amount" means:
(i) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents dying
before January 1, 2006;
(ii) Two million dollars for estates of decedents dying on or after
January 2006, and before January 1, 2015;
(iii) Three million dollars for estates of decedents dying during
the 2015 calendar year;
(iv) Four million dollars for estates of decedents dying during the
2016 calendar year; and
(v) For estates of decedents dying after December 31, 2016, the
applicable exclusion amount equals the federal exclusion amount.
(b) For purposes of this subsection "federal exclusion amount"
means the estate's basic exclusion amount as determined under section
2010(c)(3) of the internal revenue code as existing on January 1, 2013.
(2) "Decedent" means a deceased individual((;)).
(((2))) (3) "Department" means the department of revenue, the
director of that department, or any employee of the department
exercising authority lawfully delegated to him or her by the
director((;)).
(((3))) (4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by
chapter 11 of the internal revenue code((;)).
(((4))) (5) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the
internal revenue code((;)).
(((5))) (6) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used
in section 2031 of the internal revenue code((;)).
(((6))) (7) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof((;)).
(((7))) (8) "Person required to file the federal return" means any
person required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the internal
revenue code, such as the personal representative of an estate((;)).
(((8))) (9) "Property" means property included in the gross
estate((;)).
(((9))) (10) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in
Washington at time of death((;)).
(((10))) (11) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed
under this chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax
under RCW 83.100.120((;)).
(((11))) (12) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001
of the internal revenue code and includes any shifting upon death of
the economic benefit in property or any power or legal privilege
incidental to the ownership or enjoyment of property. However,
"transfer" does not include a qualified heir disposing of an interest
in property qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing
to use the property for farming purposes((;)).
(((12))) (13) "Internal revenue code" means, for the purposes of
this chapter and RCW 83.110.010, the United States internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005((;)).
(((13))) (14) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable
estate((, less: (a) One million five hundred thousand dollars for
decedents dying before January 1, 2006; and (b) two million dollars for
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006; and (c))) and includes,
but is not limited to, the value of any property included in the gross
estate under section 2044 of the internal revenue code, regardless of
whether the decedent's interest in such property was acquired before
May 17, 2005, (a) plus amounts required to be added to the Washington
taxable estate under RCW 83.100.047, (b) less: (i) The applicable
exclusion amount; (ii) the amount of any deduction allowed under RCW
83.100.046; and (iii) amounts allowed to be deducted from the
Washington taxable estate under RCW 83.100.047.
(((14))) (15) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the internal revenue code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 3 RCW 83.100.040 and 2010 c 106 s 234 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.020 in section 2 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.047 in section 4 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.047 in section 5 of this act:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington. For the
purposes of this section, any intangible property owned by a resident
is located in Washington.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the
amount of tax is the amount provided in the following table:

If Washington Taxable

The amount of Tax Equals
Of Washington
Taxable Estate Value
Greater than

Estate is at least But Less Than Initial Tax Amount Plus Tax Rate %

$0 $1,000,000 $0 10.00% $0

$1,000,000 $2,000,000 $100,000 14.00% $1,000,000

$2,000,000 $3,000,000 $240,000 15.00% $2,000,000

$3,000,000 $4,000,000 $390,000 16.00% $3,000,000

$4,000,000 $6,000,000 $550,000 17.00% $4,000,000

$6,000,000 $7,000,000 $890,000 18.00% $6,000,000

$7,000,000 $9,000,000 $1,070,000 18.50% $7,000,000

$9,000,000 $1,440,000 19.00% $9,000,000

(b) If any property in the decedent's estate is located outside of
Washington, the amount of tax is the amount determined in (a) of this
subsection multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is
the value of the property located in Washington. The denominator of
the fraction is the value of the decedent's gross estate. Property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 must be excluded from
the numerator and denominator of the fraction.
(c) The applicable tax rate due under this chapter is reduced for
estates of decedents dying after December 31, 2017, as follows:
(i) For decedents dying in calendar year 2018, the amount of tax
due is the amount determined in (a) or (b) of this subsection, as
applicable, multiplied by ninety-five percent;
(ii) For decedents dying in calendar year 2019, the amount of tax
due is the amount determined in (a) or (b) of this subsection, as
applicable, multiplied by ninety percent;
(iii) For decedents dying in calendar year 2020, the amount of tax
due is the amount determined in (a) or (b) of this subsection, as
applicable, multiplied by eighty-five percent;
(iv) For decedents dying in calendar year 2021, the amount of tax
due is the amount determined in (a) or (b) of this subsection, as
applicable, multiplied by eighty percent;
(v) For decedents dying in calendar year 2022 and thereafter, the
amount of tax due is the amount determined in (a) or (b) of this
subsection, as applicable, multiplied by seventy-five percent.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is a stand-alone estate tax
that incorporates only those provisions of the internal revenue code as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005, that do not conflict with
the provisions of this chapter. The tax imposed under this chapter is
independent of any federal estate tax obligation and is not affected by
termination of the federal estate tax.

Sec. 4 RCW 83.100.047 and 2005 c 516 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.020 in section 2 of this act and the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.040 in section 3 of this act:
(1) If the federal taxable estate on the federal return is
determined by making an election under section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, or if no federal return is required to be filed,
the department may provide by rule for a separate election on the
Washington return, consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, for the purpose of determining the amount of tax
due under this chapter. The election ((shall be)) is binding on the
estate and the beneficiaries, consistent with the internal revenue
code. All other elections or valuations on the Washington return
((shall)) must be made in a manner consistent with the federal return,
if a federal return is required, and such rules as the department may
provide.
(2) Amounts deducted for federal income tax purposes under section
642(g) of the internal revenue code of 1986((, shall)) are not ((be))
allowed as deductions in computing the amount of tax due under this
chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any department rule, if a taxpayer makes an
election consistent with section 2056 of the internal revenue code as
permitted under this section, the taxpayer's Washington taxable estate,
and the surviving spouse's Washington taxable estate, must be adjusted
as follows:
(a) For the taxpayer that made the election, any amount deducted by
reason of section 2056(b)(7) of the internal revenue code is added to,
and the value of property for which a Washington election under this
section was made is deducted from, the Washington taxable estate.
(b) For the estate of the surviving spouse, the amount included in
the estate's gross estate pursuant to section 2044 (a) and (b)(1)(A) of
the internal revenue code is deducted from, and the value of any
property for which an election under this section was previously made
is added to, the Washington taxable estate.

Sec. 5 RCW 83.100.047 and 2009 c 521 s 192 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.020 in section 2 of this act and the 2013 amendments to RCW
83.100.040 in section 3 of this act:
(1)(a) If the federal taxable estate on the federal return is
determined by making an election under section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code, or if no federal return is required to be filed,
the department may provide by rule for a separate election on the
Washington return, consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the
internal revenue code and (b) of this subsection, for the purpose of
determining the amount of tax due under this chapter. The election
((shall be)) is binding on the estate and the beneficiaries, consistent
with the internal revenue code and (b) of this subsection. All other
elections or valuations on the Washington return ((shall)) must be made
in a manner consistent with the federal return, if a federal return is
required, and such rules as the department may provide.
(b) The department ((shall)) must provide by rule that a state
registered domestic partner is deemed to be a surviving spouse and
entitled to a deduction from the Washington taxable estate for any
interest passing from the decedent to his or her domestic partner,
consistent with section 2056 or 2056A of the internal revenue code but
regardless of whether such interest would be deductible from the
federal gross estate under section 2056 or 2056A of the internal
revenue code.
(2) Amounts deducted for federal income tax purposes under section
642(g) of the internal revenue code of 1986 ((shall)) are not ((be))
allowed as deductions in computing the amount of tax due under this
chapter.
(3) Notwithstanding any department rule, if a taxpayer makes an
election consistent with section 2056 of the internal revenue code as
permitted under this section, the taxpayer's Washington taxable estate,
and the surviving spouse's Washington taxable estate, must be adjusted
as follows:
(a) For the taxpayer that made the election, any amount deducted by
reason of section 2056(b)(7) of the internal revenue code is added to,
and the value of property for which a Washington election under this
section was made is deducted from, the Washington taxable estate.
(b) For the estate of the surviving spouse, the amount included in
the estate's gross estate pursuant to section 2044 (a) and (b)(1)(A) of
the internal revenue code is deducted from, and the value of any
property for which an election under this section was previously made
is added to, the Washington taxable estate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 4 of this act apply both
prospectively and retroactively to all estates of decedents dying on or
after May 17, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act does not affect any final judgment,
no longer subject to appeal, entered by a court of competent
jurisdiction before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 4 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 5 of this act takes effect January
1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Except for section 5 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---