BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.020 and 2013 c 23 s 341 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in this chapter:
(1))) The following definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Applicable exclusion amount" means:
(i) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents dying
before January 1, 2006;
(ii) Two million dollars for estates of decedents dying on or after
January 2006, and before January 1, 2015;
(iii) Three million dollars for estates of decedents dying during
the 2015 calendar year;
(iv) Four million dollars for estates of decedents dying during the
2016 calendar year; and
(v) For estates of decedents dying after December 31, 2016, the
applicable exclusion amount equals the federal exclusion amount.
(b) For purposes of this subsection "federal exclusion amount"
means the estate's basic exclusion amount as determined under section
2010(c)(3) of the internal revenue code as existing on January 1, 2013.
(2) "Decedent" means a deceased individual((;)).
(((2))) (3) "Department" means the department of revenue, the
director of that department, or any employee of the department
exercising authority lawfully delegated to him or her by the
director((;)).
(((3))) (4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by
chapter 11 of the internal revenue code((;)).
(((4))) (5) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the
internal revenue code((;)).
(((5))) (6) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used
in section 2031 of the internal revenue code((;)).
(((6))) (7) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof((;)).
(((7))) (8) "Person required to file the federal return" means any
person required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the internal
revenue code, such as the personal representative of an estate((;)).
(((8))) (9) "Property" means property included in the gross
estate((;)).
(((9))) (10) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in
Washington at time of death((;)).
(((10))) (11) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed
under this chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax
under RCW 83.100.120((;)).
(((11))) (12) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001
of the internal revenue code. However, "transfer" does not include a
qualified heir disposing of an interest in property qualifying for a
deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing to use the property for
farming purposes((;)).
(((12))) (13) "Internal revenue code" means, for the purposes of
this chapter and RCW 83.110.010, the United States internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005((;)).
(((13))) (14) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable
estate((, less: (a) One million five hundred thousand dollars for
decedents dying before January 1, 2006; and (b) two million dollars for
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006; and (c))) less: (a) The
applicable exclusion amount; (b) the amount of any deduction allowed
under RCW 83.100.046; and (c) amounts allowed to be deducted from the
Washington taxable estate under RCW 83.100.047.
(((14))) (15) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the internal revenue code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 2 RCW 83.100.040 and 2010 c 106 s 234 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington. For the
purposes of this section, any intangible property owned by a resident
is located in Washington.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the
amount of tax is the amount provided in the following table:

If Washington Taxable

The amount of Tax Equals
Of Washington
Taxable Estate Value
Greater than

Estate is at least But Less Than Initial Tax Amount Plus Tax Rate %

$0 $1,000,000 $0 10.00% $0

$1,000,000 $2,000,000 $100,000 14.00% $1,000,000

$2,000,000 $3,000,000 $240,000 15.00% $2,000,000

$3,000,000 $4,000,000 $390,000 16.00% $3,000,000

$4,000,000 $6,000,000 $550,000 17.00% $4,000,000

$6,000,000 $7,000,000 $890,000 18.00% $6,000,000

$7,000,000 $9,000,000 $1,070,000 18.50% $7,000,000

$9,000,000 $1,440,000 19.00% $9,000,000

(b) If any property in the decedent's estate is located outside of
Washington, the amount of tax is the amount determined in (a) of this
subsection multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is
the value of the property located in Washington. The denominator of
the fraction is the value of the decedent's gross estate. Property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 must be excluded from
the numerator and denominator of the fraction.
(c) The applicable tax rates due under this chapter are reduced for
estates of decedents dying after December 31, 2017, as follows:
(i) For fiscal year 2018, the applicable tax rate must be
multiplied by ninety-five percent;
(ii) For fiscal year 2019, the applicable tax rate must be
multiplied by ninety percent;
(iii) For fiscal year 2020, the applicable tax rate must be
multiplied by eighty-five percent;
(iv) For fiscal year 2021, the applicable tax rate must be
multiplied by eighty percent; and
(v) For fiscal year 2022 and thereafter, the applicable tax rate
must be multiplied by seventy-five percent.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is a stand-alone estate tax
that incorporates only those provisions of the internal revenue code as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005, that do not conflict with
the provisions of this chapter. The tax imposed under this chapter is
independent of any federal estate tax obligation and is not affected by
termination of the federal estate tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---