BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public
institutions of higher education have experienced dramatic reductions
in state support over the last four fiscal years, which have
necessitated large increases in tuition prices. The legislature
further finds that the combination of decreases in state funding and
increases in tuition have led to a scenario where public higher
education is being funded disproportionately by the students and their
families. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to more
equitably distribute the support of public higher education between the
state and students and their families by (1) establishing a funding
methodology that is based on enrollment levels with which to provide
predictable and stable baseline state funding to the institutions of
higher education; and (2) establishing a process whereby any state
funds over and above the level needed for the baseline levels of state
funding are distributed among the institutions of higher education
based on their performance in meeting statewide goals and expectations,
and to reward the highest performers.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.776 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
((It is the policy of the state of Washington that the essential
requirements level budget calculation for)) (1) Beginning with fiscal
year 2014, institutions of higher education ((include enrollment levels
necessary to maintain, by educational sector, the participation rate
funded in the 1993 fiscal year. The participation rate shall be based
on the state's estimated population ages seventeen and above by
appropriate age groups)) shall receive a level of state funding that is
equal to the maintenance level appropriations in the omnibus
appropriations act for the 2013-2015 biennium expressed as a per-resident student rate that is based on a three-year average of the
number of actual full-time equivalent enrolled resident students for
the current academic year and the two previous academic years as
reported in the state-funded public higher education enrollment reports
produced by the office of financial management.
(2) The per-resident student rates specified in subsection (1) of
this section shall increase each fiscal year by the rate of inflation
as measured by the implicit price deflator.
(3) The per-resident student rates specified in subsection (1) of
this section in existence at the time when specific appropriations are
made for creation or expansion of new or existing programs of study
shall receive a step adjustment in the following fiscal year to reflect
this additional level of funding.
(4) State universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges are
legally entitled to receive the levels of state funding specified in
subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(5) Beginning with fiscal year 2014, any state funds appropriated
for institutions of higher education that remain after satisfying the
per-resident student rates specified in subsections (1) through (3) of
this section, or any increases in state appropriations for the
institutions of higher education, must be distributed as provided in
this subsection (5).
(a) A proportionate share must be distributed to the state board
for community and technical colleges for disbursement to the community
and technical colleges based on performance in accordance with the
student achievement initiative.
(b) A proportionate share must be distributed to the public four-year institution sector of higher education. This share must be
disbursed to the state universities, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College that have met the requirements in RCW
28B.77.090(2), and disbursement must be as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act based on a three-year average of performance, or in
recognition of the highest performing four-year institution of higher
education, in the following metrics:
(i) Average time to degree for undergraduate students;
(ii) Number of undergraduate high-demand degrees produced;
(iii) Freshman retention;
(iv) Low-income population; and
(v) Space utilization.
(6) For the purposes of subsection (5) of this section,
"proportionate share" means the proportion of near general fund
appropriations to either (a) the state board for community and
technical colleges or (b) the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College, relative to the total
near general fund appropriations to the institutions of higher
education.
(7) For the purposes of this section, the inflation adjustment
shall be computed using the percentage change on the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States
for the previous calendar year, as compiled by the bureau of economic
analysis of the United States department of commerce and reported in
the most recent quarterly publication of the economic and revenue
forecast council or successor agency.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.77.090 and 2013 c 23 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An accountability monitoring and reporting system is
established as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) To provide consistent, easily understood data among the public
four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in
other states, the following data must be reported to the education data
center annually by December 1st, and at a minimum include data
recommended by a national organization representing state chief
executives. The education data center in consultation with the council
may change the data requirements to be consistent with best practices
across the country. This data must, to the maximum extent possible, be
disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of
origin, age, and socioeconomic status, and include the following for
the four-year institutions of higher education:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Graduate and professional degrees awarded;
(c) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(d) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(e) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(f) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(g) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive
academic years;
(h) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(i) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(j) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(k) Program participation and degree completion rates in bachelor
and advanced degree programs in the sciences, which includes
agriculture and natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences,
computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering
technologies, health professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and
statistics, and physical sciences and science technologies, including
participation and degree completion rates for students from
traditionally underrepresented populations;
(l) Annual enrollment: Annual unduplicated number of students
enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher education
including by student level;
(m) Annual first-time enrollment: Total first-time students
enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education;
(n) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in expected length,
awarded per one hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students at
the state level;
(o) Market penetration: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in program length,
awarded relative to the state's population age eighteen to twenty-four
years old with a high school diploma;
(p) Student debt load: Median three-year distribution of debt
load, excluding private loans or debts incurred before coming to the
institution;
(q) Space utilization: For each academic year, the average number
of hours per week each classroom seat and classroom lab is utilized;
(r) Data related to enrollment, completion rates, participation
rates, and debt load shall be disaggregated for students in the
following income brackets to the maximum extent possible:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income; and
(((r))) (s) Yearly percentage increases in the average cost of
undergraduate instruction.
(3) Four-year institutions of higher education must count all
students when collecting data, not only first-time, full-time first-year students.
(4) In conjunction with the office of financial management, all
four-year institutions of higher education must display the data
described in subsection (2) of this section in a uniform dashboard
format on the office of financial management's web site no later than
December 1, 2011, and updated thereafter annually by December 1st. To
the maximum extent possible, the information must be viewable by race
and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and
socioeconomic status. The information may be tailored to meet the
needs of various target audiences such as students, researchers, and
the general public.
(5) The council shall use performance data from the education data
center for the purposes of strategic planning, to report on progress
toward achieving statewide goals, and to develop priorities proposed in
the ten-year plan for higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The office of financial management shall
convene a work group to review the per-resident student rates
established in section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2013 1st sp. sess.
(section 2 of this act) and make recommendations for achieving equal
funding for similar institutions by the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. In
making final recommendations, the work group shall consider that there
is a legislative goal to achieve the following per-resident student
rates by the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium:
(a) Ten thousand dollars for the research institutions as defined
in RCW 28B.10.016;
(b) Seven thousand five hundred dollars for the regional
institutions as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; and
(c) Five thousand dollars for the community and technical colleges.
(2) The work group must include the following members:
(a) One representative from the student achievement council;
(b) One representative from the education data center created in
RCW 43.41.400;
(c) One representative from each state university, regional
university, and state college as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; and
(d) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges.
(3) The office of financial management shall submit a final
recommendation of the work group to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2014.
(4) This section expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.778 (Budget calculation -- New enrollments -- Funding
level -- Inflation factor) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 3;
(2) RCW 28B.10.780 (Budget calculation -- Funding level) and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 4;
(3) RCW 28B.10.782 (Budget calculation -- Increased enrollment target
level -- Availability of information) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 5;
(4) RCW 28B.10.784 (Budget calculation -- Participation rate and
enrollment level estimates -- Recommendations to governor and
legislature) and 2012 c 229 s 517 & 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 6; and
(5) RCW 28B.15.101 (Authority to modify tuition rates -- Performance-based measures and goals -- Institutional performance plans) and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 10 s 5.

--- END ---