BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.22 RCW
to read as follows:
Any first-class city in a county with a population greater than one
million five hundred thousand that imposes a license fee or tax upon
the business activity of marine manufacturing and industrial businesses
may not impose a license fee or tax upon the business activity of
marine manufacturing and industrial businesses that are annexed into
the city for a minimum period of five years from the effective date of
the annexation.

--- END ---