BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.090 and 2006 c 334 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation, pursuant to its rules with
respect to state highways, and local authorities, with respect to
public highways under their jurisdiction, may, upon application in
writing and good cause being shown therefor, issue a special permit in
writing, or electronically, authorizing the applicant to operate or
move a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a size, weight of vehicle,
or load exceeding the maximum set forth in RCW 46.44.010, 46.44.020,
46.44.030, 46.44.034, and 46.44.041 upon any public highway under the
jurisdiction of the authority granting such permit and for the
maintenance of which such authority is responsible. However, the
department of transportation and local authorities may not issue a
overheight or overwidth special permit for a vehicle moving a load that
exceeds the actual measured minimum clearance height or width of a
bridge on the proposed route on Washington state highways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.36 RCW
to read as follows:
All structures over or across any public highway that provide less
than sixteen feet of clearance from the roadway must be signed with a
low clearance sign indicating the height of the structure. The sign
must be consistent with the manual on uniform traffic control devices
as adopted by the department under RCW 47.36.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---