BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning August 1, 2013, or upon the expiration of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the provisions of
this section, whichever is later, each school district board of
directors must adopt a policy on assignment of certificated
instructional staff consistent with the provisions of this section.
This section applies to all collective bargaining agreements entered
into or renewed after the effective date of this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Certificated instructional staff" means classroom teachers and
educational staff associates;
(b) "Displaced" means a certificated instructional staff member
assigned to a particular school no longer has an assignment to that
school as a result of a request for reassignment by the certificated
instructional staff member, a principal, or the district
administration; change in program; change in enrollment; or
implementation of a state or federal accountability intervention model.
As provided under RCW 28A.405.100(4)(b), a certificated instructional
staff member may not be displaced during a probationary period to the
supervision of an individual other than the original evaluator; and
(c) "Nonprovisional" means a certificated instructional staff
member who does not fall under the provisions of RCW 28A.405.220.
(3) A nonprovisional certificated instructional staff member may be
assigned to a particular school only with the agreement of the
principal and the staff member being assigned. The principal shall
receive input on assignment decisions from at least two teachers
employed at the school who are chosen by the faculty of teachers at the
school to represent them in the hiring process. As provided under RCW
28A.405.100(8), evaluation results must be used as one of multiple
factors in the consideration of an agreement to an assignment beginning
with the 2015-16 school year.
(4) If an assignment cannot be found, the superintendent or
designee may assign the certificated instructional staff member to a
temporary position, including a substitute assignment, an instructional
support position, a position in a district office, or other position.
(5) If a displaced nonprovisional certificated instructional staff
member is not assigned to a nontemporary position by May 15th of the
school year following the displacement, the superintendent may initiate
nonrenewal of contract as provided under RCW 28A.405.210, including due
process in the form of notice of nonrenewal and the opportunity for a
hearing. Lack of assignment under this section of a displaced
certificated instructional staff member to a nontemporary position
after eight or more months, including cumulative time spent in
successive assignments to temporary positions, constitutes grounds for
a finding of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.210.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to grant employers or
employees the right to reach agreements that are in conflict with the
provisions of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---