BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,334,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,020,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,354,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,334,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation and $32,020,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the US 395/North Spokane Corridor
projects (600010A & 600003A). Any future savings on the projects must
stay on the US 395/Interstate 90 corridor and be made available to the
current phase of the North Spokane corridor projects or any future
phase of the projects.
(2) This section consists of additive appropriations to what was
appropriated by the legislature in section 306(11), chapter 306, Laws
of 2013.

--- END ---