BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.26.200 and 2012 c 224 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The director shall provide notice to the contractor of the
director's intent to debar with the specific reason for the debarment.
The department must establish the debarment process by rule.
(b) After reasonable notice to the contractor and reasonable
opportunity for that contractor to be heard, the director has the
authority to debar a contractor for cause from consideration for award
of contracts. The debarment must be for a period of not more than
three years.
(2) The director may debar a contractor based on a finding of one
or more of the following causes:
(a) Conviction for commission of a criminal offense as an incident
to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public or private contract or
subcontract, or in the performance of such contract or subcontract;
(b) Conviction or a final determination in a civil action under
state or federal statutes of fraud, embezzlement, theft, forgery,
bribery, falsification or destruction of records, receiving stolen
property, violation of the federal false claims act, 31 U.S.C. Sec.
3729 et seq., or the state medicaid fraud false claims act, chapter
74.66 RCW, or any other offense indicating a lack of business integrity
or business honesty that currently, seriously, and directly affects
responsibility as a state contractor;
(c) Conviction under state or federal antitrust statutes arising
out of the submission of bids or proposals;
(d) Two or more violations within the previous five years of the
federal labor relations act as determined by the national labor
relations board or court of competent jurisdiction;
(e) Violation of contract provisions, as set forth in this
subsection, of a character that is regarded by the director to be so
serious as to justify debarment action:
(i) Deliberate failure without good cause to perform in accordance
with the specifications or within the time limit provided in the
contract; or
(ii) A recent record of failure to perform or of unsatisfactory
performance in accordance with the terms of one or more contracts,
however the failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance caused by
acts beyond the control of the contractor may not be considered to be
a basis for debarment;
(f) Violation of ethical standards set forth in RCW 39.26.020; and
(g) Any other cause the director determines to be so serious and
compelling as to affect responsibility as a state contractor, including
debarment by another governmental entity for any cause listed in
regulations.
(3) The director must issue a written decision to debar. The
decision must:
(a) State the reasons for the action taken; and
(b) Inform the debarred contractor of the contractor's rights to
judicial or administrative review.

--- END ---