BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
serious shortage of alcohol and drug detoxification and treatment
centers that is creating overwhelming problems for individuals,
families, and the society in this state. Existing funding for
detoxification and treatment for individuals addicted to alcohol and
drugs is insufficient to meet the demand in this state.
(2) By taxing liquor, the legislature intends to raise funds for
additional alcohol and drug treatment directly from a major source of
the problem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A tax is imposed on every person for the
privilege of selling, at wholesale or retail, liquor in this state.
The rate of the tax is equal to:
(a) In the case of beer, 1 cent per twelve ounces;
(b) In the case of wine, 1 cent per four ounces; and
(c) In the case of spirits, 1 cent per ounce.
(2)(a) In calculating the amount of tax due under this section, if
the total amount of liquor sold in this state during the reporting
period is not a whole number, the taxable quantity must be rounded up
or down to the nearest ounce, as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) For a fraction of an ounce that is equal to or greater than
one-half ounce, the taxable quantity must be rounded up to the nearest
ounce. For a fraction of an ounce that is less than one-half ounce,
the taxable quantity must be rounded down to the nearest ounce.
(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this section.
The tax reporting frequency for the tax imposed in this section must
coincide with the taxpayer's reporting frequency for the tax imposed in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(4) The department may require taxpayers to report the taxable
quantity of liquor in units of measure other than ounces.
(5) The tax imposed in this section is in addition to all other
taxes imposed in this title on the same taxable event.
(6) Revenues from the tax under this chapter must be deposited in
the alcohol and drug treatment account created in section 5 of this
act.
(7) The definitions in chapters 66.04, 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW
apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The tax imposed in this chapter does not
apply to any successive sale of previously taxed liquor.
(2) Any person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
maintain documentation establishing that the liquor was previously
taxed under this chapter. The documentation may be in the form of
information on the invoice, or certification from the previous seller,
stating:
(a) All of the liquor, or a specific stated portion of the liquor,
was previously subject to the tax imposed in this chapter; and
(b) The amount of tax remitted or to be remitted to the department
in respect of the liquor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The tax imposed in this chapter does not
apply to any activity or person that the state is prohibited from
taxing under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or laws
of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The alcohol and drug treatment account is
created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account are
subject to appropriation. Revenues from the tax in section 1 of this
act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account must be
used for additional improvements to services already provided by city,
county, and state alcohol and drug treatment and detoxification
programs and may not be used to supplant existing funds for such
programs. Funds may be distributed by grants or by appropriation.
Grant funding must be appropriated by the legislature and administered
by the department of social and health services under chapter 70.96A
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---