BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.19.040 and 2010 c 161 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Parking privileges for persons with disabilities must be
renewed at least every five years, as required by the director, by
satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of the privileges.
Satisfactory proof must include a signature from a physician, advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant certifying that
the applicant has a disability that meets the criteria listed in RCW
46.19.010.
(2) The department shall match and purge its database of parking
permits issued to persons with disabilities with available death record
information at least every twelve months.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to administer the parking
privileges for persons with disabilities program.

--- END ---