BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that research
shows that an inspiring and informed educator and strong school-based
principal leadership are important school-related factors influencing
student achievement. The legislature further recognizes that the
ongoing educational reform efforts enacted by the legislature,
including the teacher and principal evaluation efforts, the common core
state standards for instruction and assessment, school-level reform
approaches, and other reform programs and activities, present new
challenges for principals and educators.
(2) The legislature finds that because research shows that high-quality educators are so important for student success, that ongoing
training and professional development is essential to support educators
and increase student learning. The legislature further finds that part
of the plan for meeting the constitutional obligations to fully fund a
program of basic education must therefore include increased
professional development and training in order to give educators and
principals the tools they need to be successful with the new reforms
already established. The legislature further finds that the Washington
state institute for public policy reported that content-specific
professional development is much more effective than general training.
The legislature also finds that providing a clear topic for
professional development each biennium will better align and support
educators across the state's school districts and schools and will
ensure state resources are used in a manner that is proven to
positively impact student learning.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to provide additional time
and resources for content-specific professional learning days for each
state-funded certificated instructional staff and school building-based
administrator to increase his or her knowledge and skills in the areas
of current and future educational reforms. The legislature further
intends to phase-in time and resources for state-funded classified
employees who are engaged in student instruction.
(4) The goal of the legislature is to provide a sufficient number
of professional learning days necessary to meet the needs in
Washington's schools and to designate the professional learning days to
be part of basic education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.200 and 2009 c 548 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The program of basic education established under this chapter
is deemed by the legislature to comply with the requirements of Article
IX, section 1 of the state Constitution, which states that "It is the
paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education
of all children residing within its borders, without distinction or
preference on account of race, color, caste, or sex," and is adopted
pursuant to Article IX, section 2 of the state Constitution, which
states that "The legislature shall provide for a general and uniform
system of public schools."
(2) The legislature defines the program of basic education under
this chapter as that which is necessary to provide the opportunity to
develop the knowledge and skills necessary to meet the state-established high school graduation requirements that are intended to
allow students to have the opportunity to graduate with a meaningful
diploma that prepares them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. Basic education by necessity is an
evolving program of instruction intended to reflect the changing
educational opportunities that are needed to equip students for their
role as productive citizens and includes the following:
(a) The instructional program of basic education the minimum
components of which are described in RCW 28A.150.220;
(b) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.190 RCW for
students in residential schools as defined by RCW 28A.190.020 and for
juveniles in detention facilities as identified by RCW 28A.190.010;
(c) The program of education provided by chapter 28A.193 RCW for
individuals under the age of eighteen who are incarcerated in adult
correctional facilities; ((and))
(d) Transportation and transportation services to and from school
for eligible students as provided under RCW 28A.160.150 through
28A.160.180; and
(e) Professional learning days as provided under section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning in the 2014-15 school year, the legislature shall
annually provide additional time and resources for high-quality,
content-specific, professional learning days for each state-funded
certificated instructional staff and school building-based
administrator to increase knowledge and skills in the areas of current
and future educational reforms. The minimum funding for a professional
learning day must be equivalent to the aggregate amount provided for
the state-funded salaries for each certificated instructional staff and
school-based administrator in the school district for one full school
day. School districts must be required to expend the funds on
professional learning activities but the learning is not required to be
accomplished in one full school day and it may be organized in whatever
time blocks the district chooses so long as the total time equates to
one full school day. The learning improvement day must take place
outside of the minimum one hundred eighty-day school calendar.
(b) For the 2014-15 school year, the funds provided for a
professional learning day must be used for professional development on
the teacher and principal evaluation program under RCW 28A.405.100.
School districts may select the topic for the professional learning day
for certificated instructional staff who are not subject to evaluation
under RCW 28A.405.100.
(c) For the 2015-16 school year, the funds provided under this
section shall be used for professional development on the best
practices for instruction of the common core state standards. School
districts may select the topic for the professional learning day for
certificated instructional staff who do not provide instruction in the
content areas or grade levels addressed by the common core state
standards.
(d) After the 2015-16 school year:
(i) The topics for the professional learning days must be specified
in the omnibus appropriations act; and
(ii) The legislature will begin phasing-in a professional learning
day for state-funded classified employees who are engaged in student
instruction.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement this section.
(3) The funding provided under this section shall be deemed to be
part of the legislature's definition of basic education under Article
IX of the state Constitution.

--- END ---