BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.112.210 and 2009 c 279 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authority is authorized to establish, by resolution, a
schedule of fines and penalties for civil infractions established in
RCW 81.112.220. An authority is authorized to proscribe a standard
size, content, and format for citations issued from electronic
hand-held devices, provided that the citation form includes only the
content required under RCW 7.80.070 that is directly related to fare
payment civil infractions under this chapter. Fines established by ((a
regional transit)) an authority shall not exceed those imposed for
class 1 infractions under RCW 7.80.120.
(2)(a) ((A regional transit)) An authority may designate persons to
monitor fare payment who are equivalent to and are authorized to
exercise all the powers of an enforcement officer, defined in RCW
7.80.040. An authority is authorized to employ personnel to either
monitor fare payment, or to contract for such services, or both.
(b) In addition to the specific powers granted to enforcement
officers under RCW 7.80.050 and 7.80.060, persons designated to monitor
fare payment also have the authority to take the following actions:
(i) Request proof of payment from passengers;
(ii) Request personal identification from a passenger who does not
produce proof of payment when requested;
(iii) Issue a citation conforming to the requirements established
in RCW 7.80.070, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section;
and
(iv) Request that a passenger leave the ((regional transit))
authority facility when the passenger has not produced proof of payment
after being asked to do so by a person designated to monitor fare
payment.
(3) ((Regional transit)) Authorities shall keep records of
citations in the manner prescribed by RCW 7.80.150. All civil
infractions established by chapter 20, Laws of 1999 shall be heard and
determined by a district or municipal court as provided in RCW 7.80.010
(1), (2), and (4).

--- END ---