BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.180 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1) By December 31, 2011, the department shall:
(a) Close Frances Haddon Morgan residential rehabilitation center
and relocate current residents consistent with the requirements of
section 7 of this act; and
(b) Establish at least two state operating living alternatives on
the campus of the Frances Haddon Morgan center, if residents have
chosen to receive care in such a setting and subject to federal
requirements related to the receipt of federal medicaid matching funds.
(2)(a) Upon August 24, 2011, the department shall not permit any
new admission to Yakima Valley School unless such admission is limited
to the provision of short-term respite or crisis stabilization
services. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no current
permanent resident of Yakima Valley School shall be required or
compelled to relocate to a different care setting as a result of
chapter 30, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.
(b) The Yakima Valley School shall continue to operate as a
residential habilitation center until such time that the census of
permanent residents has reached sixteen persons. As part of the
closure plan, at least two cottages will be converted to state-operated
living alternatives, subject to federal requirements related to the
receipt of federal medicaid matching funds.
(3) To assure the successful implementation of subsections (1) and
(2) of this section,)) The department, within available funds:
(((a))) (1) Shall establish state-operated living alternatives to
provide community residential services to residential habilitation
center residents transitioning to the community under chapter 30, Laws
of 2011 1st sp. sess. who prefer a state-operated living alternative.
The department shall offer residential habilitation center employees
opportunities to work in state-operated living alternatives as they are
established;
(((b))) (2) May use existing supported living program capacity in
the community for former residential habilitation center residents who
prefer and choose a supported living program;
(((c) Shall continue to staff and operate at Yakima Valley School
crisis stabilization beds and respite service beds at the existing bed
capacity as of June 1, 2011, for individuals with developmental
disabilities requiring such services;
(d))) (3) Shall establish up to eight state-staffed crisis
stabilization beds and up to eight state-staffed respite beds based
upon funding provided in the omnibus appropriations act and the
geographic areas with the greatest need for those services; ((and
(e))) (4) Shall establish regional or mobile specialty services
evenly distributed throughout the state, such as dental care, physical
therapy, occupational therapy, and specialized nursing care, which can
be made available to former residents of residential habilitation
centers and, within available funds, other individuals with
developmental disabilities residing in the community; and
(5) Shall continue to provide respite services in residential
habilitation centers and continue to develop respite care in the
community with a goal of allowing clients to access services where they
choose.

--- END ---