BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that violence in
health care settings, particularly emergency departments, is a serious
concern. In 2009 there were two thousand fifty assaults and violent
acts reported by registered nurses requiring an average of four days
away from work (BLS, Private Industry, State and Local Government,
2011). Further, the health care sector leads all other industries,
with forty-five percent of all nonfatal assaults against workers
resulting in lost work days in the United States (BLS, 2006). The
legislature is particularly concerned about practices that result in
individuals who are convicted or suspected of violent crimes or crimes
of a sexual nature being unattended by law enforcement in hospitals.
Such practices result in unreasonable risks to patients, health care
providers, and hospital visitors. The legislature also finds that
caring for individuals convicted or suspected of violent crimes or
crimes of a sexual nature requires intensive resources on the part of
health care providers. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure
such individuals who are brought or caused to be brought to a hospital
by law enforcement are appropriately guarded by law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) "Hospital" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 70.41.020.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means a general authority Washington
law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020 and a limited
authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW
10.93.020. The agencies include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) The Washington state patrol;
(b) All law enforcement agencies and police departments of any
political subdivision of the state; and
(c) The department of corrections.
(3) "Law enforcement officer" includes police officers, the
attorney general and the attorney general's deputies, sheriffs and
their regular deputies, corrections officers, and tribal law
enforcement officers. "Law enforcement officer" also includes an
employee or agent of:
(a) A law enforcement agency as described under subsection (2) of
this section; or
(b) A federal governmental agency.
A law enforcement officer is also authorized by law to engage in or
supervise the prevention, detection, investigation, or prosecution of,
or the incarceration of any person for, any violation of law, and who
has statutory powers of arrest.
(4) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of the crimes under this subsection (4)(a); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(5) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.132;
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080;
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or
(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) if
the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to
register) on at least one prior occasion;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(6) "Violent offense" means any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(b) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(c) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(d) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(e) Indecent liberties, if committed by forcible compulsion;
(f) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(g) Arson in the second degree;
(h) Assault in the second degree;
(i) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(j) Extortion in the first degree;
(k) Robbery in the second degree; or
(l) Drive-by shooting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 All individuals suspected or convicted of a
serious violent offense, sex offense, or violent offense who are
brought or caused to be brought to a hospital by a law enforcement
officer or at the direction of a law enforcement agency must be:
(1) Identified as an individual suspected or convicted of a serious
violent offense, sex offense, or violent offense by the law enforcement
officer or law enforcement agency to the responsible hospital
department manager and staff providing care; and
(2) Accompanied at all times in the hospital by a law enforcement
officer or guard supplied by the responsible law enforcement agency,
except when otherwise directed by the individual's attending physician.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In no case may the hospital be billed or
charged for the expense of the law enforcement officer or guard
accompanying an individual suspected or convicted of a serious violent
offense, sex offense, or violent offense while the individual receives
treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
All individuals suspected or convicted of a serious violent
offense, sex offense, or violent offense who are brought or caused to
be brought to a hospital by a law enforcement officer or at the
direction of a law enforcement agency must be accompanied by a law
enforcement officer or guard supplied by the responsible law
enforcement agency as directed in sections 1 through 4 of this act.

--- END ---