BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before December 31, 2015, each institution of higher education
must adopt a policy to award academic credit for military training
applicable to the student's certificate or degree requirements. The
policy shall apply to any individual who is enrolled in the institution
of higher education and who has successfully completed a military
training course or program as part of his or her military service that
is:
(a) Recommended for credit by a national higher education
association that provides credit recommendations for military training
courses and programs;
(b) Included in the individual's military transcript issued by any
branch of the armed services; or
(c) Other documented military training or experience.
(2) Each institution of higher education must develop a procedure
for receiving the necessary documentation to identify and verify the
military training course or program that an individual is claiming for
academic credit.
(3) Each institution of higher education must provide a copy of its
policy for awarding academic credit for military training to any
applicant who listed prior or present military service in his or her
application. Each institution of higher education must develop and
maintain a list of military training courses and programs that have
qualified for academic credit.
(4) Each institution of higher education must submit its policy for
awarding academic credit for military training to the prior learning
assessment work group convened pursuant to RCW 28B.77.230.

--- END ---