BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.340.010 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The lives of military families are dominated by frequent
deployments, relocations, and extended periods of single parenthood.
Military spouses are some of the most mobile populations in our
country, making the maintenance of professional licenses a significant
obstacle. According to the 2010 defense management data center, there
are thirty-three thousand three hundred eighty active duty and ten
thousand eight hundred thirty-seven reserve military spouses residing
in Washington. Military families depend on two incomes and want to
achieve their goals and aspirations. It is the intent of the
legislature to recognize the sacrifices made by military families in
service to our country and our state and to help alleviate the
hardships military families face due to their highly transient life.
(2) Military service members work in many different professions and
occupations while in service. These members frequently receive
extensive training and experience through their service. However,
service members often have a difficult time converting their military
training and experience into civilian training, accreditation, or
employment when they leave the service. As a result, service members
face significant obstacles in making a smooth transition to civilian
life, including finding jobs for which they are qualified or obtaining
licenses in professions for which they have been trained and performed
while in service. It is the intent of the legislature to recognize the
training and experience gained through military service and to
eliminate the barriers for allowing service members to successfully
reenter the civilian workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.340 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means any board, commission, or other authority for
issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit under this
title, chapter 19.105 RCW, chapter 42.44 RCW, chapter 46.82 RCW,
chapter 64.36 RCW, and chapter 67.08 RCW.
(2) "Military" means any branch of the United States armed forces,
the national guard, and armed forces reserves.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.340.020 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((For the purposes of this section, "authority" means any
board, commission, or other authority for issuance of a license,
certificate, registration, or permit under this title.
(2))) To the extent resources are available((:
(a))), each authority shall establish procedures to expedite the
issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit to perform
professional services regulated by each ((such)) authority to a person:
(((i))) (a) Who is ((certified or)) licensed, certified, or
registered, or has a permit in another state to perform professional
services in that state;
(((ii))) (b) Whose spouse is the subject of a military transfer to
Washington; and
(((iii))) (c) Who left employment in the other state to accompany
the person's spouse to Washington.
(((b))) (2) The procedure must include a process for issuing the
person a license, certificate, registration, or permit, if, in the
opinion of the authority, the requirements for licensure,
certification, registration, or obtaining a permit of such other state
are substantially equivalent to that required in Washington.
(((c))) (3) Each authority ((in this title)) shall develop a method
and adopt rules to authorize a person who meets the criteria in
subsection (1)(a)(((i))) through (((iii))) (c) of this ((subsection))
section to perform services regulated by the authority in Washington by
issuing the person a temporary license, certificate, registration, or
permit for a limited period of time to allow the person to perform
services regulated by the authority while completing any specific
additional requirements in Washington that are not related to training
or practice standards of the profession that were not required in the
other state in which the person is licensed, certified, or registered,
or has a permit. Nothing in this section requires the authority to
issue a temporary license, certificate, registration, or permit if the
standards of the other state are substantially unequal to Washington
standards.
(((d))) (4) An applicant must state in the application that he or
she:
(((i))) (a) Has requested verification from the other state or
states that the person is currently licensed, certified, registered, or
has a permit; and
(((ii))) (b) Is not subject to any pending investigation, charges,
or disciplinary action by the regulatory body of the other state or
states.
(((e))) (5) If the authority finds reasonable cause to believe that
an applicant falsely affirmed or stated either of the requirements
under (((d)(i) or (ii) of this)) subsection (4)(a) or (b) of this
section, the authority may summarily suspend the license, certificate,
registration, or permit pending an investigation or further action to
discipline or revoke the license, certificate, registration, or permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.340 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each authority must recognize military training and experience
for satisfying any or all requirements for obtaining a license,
certificate, registration, or permit for professional services if:
(a) The applicant provides sufficient documentation of:
(i) The completion of a military training or education program;
(ii) Any experience working in an occupational or professional
field while in military service;
(iii) Any certificate, award, or other acknowledgment of
qualification to perform a job or specialized duty; or
(iv) Any other relevant training or experience; and
(b) The training, experience, or other qualification is
substantially equivalent to any or all of the requirements for
obtaining the license, certification, registration, or permit for
professional services issued by the authority.
(2) Each authority shall develop procedures to evaluate military
training and experience in relation to any and all requirements for
obtaining a license, certificate, registration, or permit for
professional services.
(3) If an authority determines that the documentation is not
substantially equivalent to meet any of the requirements, it must
inform the applicant in writing of its decision and identify the
specific criteria that were not met. The applicant must be provided an
opportunity to submit additional documentation or information that
addresses the identified deficiency.
(4) Each authority must maintain a list of all military training
programs, certificates, awards, or work experience that it has examined
and approved in an application that fulfills a requirement for
obtaining a license, certification, registration, or permit for
professional services. The list must be submitted to the department of
veterans affairs by each authority by December 1st of each year.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.105.570 and 2011 c 351 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state, as provided in
section 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.44.220 and 2011 c 351 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state, as provided in
section 4 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.82.440 and 2011 c 351 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state, as provided in
section 4 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 64.36.350 and 2011 c 351 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state, as provided in
section 4 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 67.08.320 and 2011 c 351 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state, as provided in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.08.500 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 1;
(2) RCW 18.11.290 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 2;
(3) RCW 18.16.300 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 3;
(4) RCW 18.39.570 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 4;
(5) RCW 18.43.190 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 5;
(6) RCW 18.85.490 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 6;
(7) RCW 18.96.230 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 7;
(8) RCW 18.140.290 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 8;
(9) RCW 18.145.150 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c 351
s 9;
(10) RCW 18.165.310 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c
351 s 10;
(11) RCW 18.170.310 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c
351 s 11;
(12) RCW 18.185.310 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c
351 s 12;
(13) RCW 18.210.230 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c
351 s 13;
(14) RCW 18.220.211 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c
351 s 14;
(15) RCW 18.280.200 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c
351 s 15; and
(16) RCW 18.300.160 (Military training or experience) and 2011 c
351 s 16.

--- END ---