BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 76.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner of public or private forested lands may bring a civil
action in superior court for property damage to public or private
forested lands, including real and personal property on those lands,
when the damage results from a fire that started on or spread from
public or private forested lands.
(2) Liability under this section attaches to the extent that
evidence demonstrates that:
(a) An action or inaction by a person relating to the start or
spread of the fire from public or private forested lands constituted
negligence or a higher degree of fault; and
(b) The action or inaction under (a) of this subsection was a
proximate cause of the property damage.
(3) Recoverable damages under this section are limited to:
(a) Either: (i) The difference in the fair market value of the
damaged property immediately before and after the fire. For real
property, the state-certified general real estate appraiser must
identify and analyze all relevant characteristics and uses of the
property including cultural, recreational, and environmental
characteristics and uses, to the extent such characteristics or uses
contribute to the fair market value of the property based on the
highest and best use of the property. The state-certified general real
estate appraiser shall expressly address the assumptions and conditions
used to evaluate such characteristics and uses, consistent with
standards of professional appraisal practice adopted under chapter
18.140 RCW; or (ii) the reasonable cost of restoring the damaged
property to the general condition it was in immediately before the
fire. However, recovery for the cost of restoration may not exceed the
difference in the fair market value of the damaged property immediately
before and after the fire;
(b) The reasonable expenses incurred to suppress or extinguish the
fire unless otherwise provided for in this chapter; and
(c) Any other objectively verifiable monetary loss, that is not
duplicative of the recovery specified under (a) or (b) of this
subsection including, but not limited to: Out-of-pocket expenses; loss
of earnings; loss of use of property; or loss of business or employment
opportunities. Such loss must be established by evidence of prefire
investments, income, expenses, or contracts specific to the damaged
property.
(4) This section provides the exclusive cause of action for
property damage to public or private forested lands, including real and
personal property on those lands, resulting from a fire that started on
or spread from public or private forested lands.
(5) The definitions in this subsection only apply throughout this
section relating to the specification of damages for fire damage to
public and private forested lands, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, and do not apply to and are not intended as a source for
interpretation of other sections of this chapter.
(a) "Fair market value" means the amount that a willing buyer would
pay to a willing seller for property in an arms-length transaction if
both parties were fully informed about all advantages and disadvantages
of the property and neither party is acting under a compulsion to sell,
as determined by: (i) For real property, a state-certified general
real estate appraiser as defined under RCW 18.140.010; and (ii) for
personal property, an appraiser qualified to appraise the property
based on training and experience. For real property, the state-certified general real estate appraiser must identify and analyze all
relevant characteristics and uses of the property including cultural,
recreational, and environmental characteristics and uses, to the extent
such characteristics or uses contribute to the fair market value of the
property based on the highest and best use of the property. The state-certified general real estate appraiser shall expressly address the
assumptions and conditions used to evaluate such characteristics and
uses, consistent with standards of professional appraisal practice
adopted under chapter 18.140 RCW.
(b) "Forest tree species" means a tree species that is capable of
producing logs, fiber, or other wood materials that are suitable for
the production of lumber, sheeting, pulp, firewood, or other forest
products.
(c) "Owner of public or private forested lands" means any person in
actual control of public or private forested lands, whether the control
is based either on legal or equitable title, or on any other interest
entitling the holder to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the
timber on the land in any manner.
(d) "Person" includes: An individual; a corporation; a public or
private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal government
or governmental entity; any business organization, including
corporations and partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals
acting with a common purpose.
(e) "Public or private forested lands" means any lands used or
biologically capable of being used for growing forest tree species
regardless of the existing use of the land except when the predominant
physical use of the land at the time of the fire is not consistent with
the growing, conservation, or preservation of forest tree species.
Examples of inconsistent uses include, but are not limited to,
buildings, airports, parking lots, mining, solid waste disposal,
cropfields, orchards, vineyards, pastures, feedlots, communication
sites, and home sites that may include up to ten acres. Public or
private forested lands do not include state highways, county roads,
railroad rights-of-way, and utility rights-of-way that cross over,
under, or through such lands.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.040 and 2009 c 549 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, if any person shall
for any lawful purpose kindle a fire upon his or her own land, he or
she shall do it at such time and in such manner, and shall take such
care of it to prevent it from spreading and doing damage to other
persons' property, as a prudent and careful person would do, and if he
or she fails so to do he or she shall be liable in an action on the
case to any person suffering damage thereby to the full amount of such
damage.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.060 and 2011 c 336 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
The common law right to an action for damages done by fires, is not
taken away or diminished by RCW 4.24.040, 4.24.050, and 4.24.060((, but
it may be pursued; but)). However:
(1) Any person availing himself or herself of the provisions of RCW
4.24.040, shall be barred of his or her action at common law for the
damage so sued for((, and));
(2) No action shall be brought at common law for kindling fires in
the manner described in RCW 4.24.050((; but)). However, if any such
fires shall spread and do damage, the person who kindled the ((same))
fire and any person present and concerned in driving ((such)) the
lumber, by whose act or neglect ((such)) the fire is suffered to spread
and do damage shall be liable in an action on the case for the amount
of damages thereby sustained; and
(3) A civil action for property damage to public or private
forested lands, including real and personal property on those lands,
resulting from a fire that started on or spread from public or private
forested lands may be brought only under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act does not: Affect or preclude any
action relating to the imposition of criminal or civil penalties as
authorized by law; affect or preclude the recovery of fire suppression
costs as authorized under chapter 76.04 RCW; affect or preclude an
action under RCW 4.24.630 against a person who goes onto the land of
another without authorization and wrongfully, intentionally, and
unreasonably causes a fire resulting in property damage; affect or
preclude an action under chapter 27.44 or 27.53 RCW; or affect the
provisions of RCW 76.04.016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies prospectively only and not
retroactively. It applies only to causes of action that arise on or
after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---