BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.155 RCW
to read as follows:
The community forest trust account is created in the state
treasury. All moneys received for the acquisition, sale, management,
and administration of the department's duties under this chapter for
community forest trust lands including, but not limited to, proceeds
from the sale of valuable materials from community forest trust lands,
interest earned on investments in the account, and all other revenue
related to community forest trust lands created or acquired pursuant to
this chapter must be deposited into the account. The account is
authorized to receive fund transfers and appropriations from the
general fund, as well as gifts, grants, and endowments from public or
private sources as may be made from time to time. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used by the commissioner to reimburse management costs
incurred by the department on community forest trust lands, for the
acquisition of interests in land or other real property to be managed
as community forest trust lands, for technical assistance grants
pursuant to RCW 79.155.120, and for all other purposes consistent with
this chapter. However, the board may authorize any expenditures made
to: (1) Reimburse state and local governmental entities' eligible
financial contributions for the acquisition of community forest trust
lands under RCW 79.155.090; or (2) acquire real property for the
community forest trust under RCW 79.155.040(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 43.30.385 and 2012 c 166 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the
department for the purpose of acquiring real property, including all
reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as a replacement
for the property transferred to the state parks and recreation
commission, as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the
land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060 and to receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department.
(2) ((In addition to the other purposes identified in this section,
the park land trust revolving fund may be utilized by the department to
hold funding for future acquisition of lands for the community forest
trust program from willing sellers under RCW 79.155.040.
(3)))(a) Proceeds from transfers of real property to the state
parks and recreation commission or other proceeds identified from
transfers of real property as directed by the legislature shall be
deposited in the park land trust revolving fund.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds
from real property transferred or disposed under RCW 79.22.060 must be
used solely to purchase replacement forest land, that must be actively
managed as a working forest, within the same county as the property
transferred or disposed. If the real property was transferred under
RCW 79.22.060 (1)(c) and (2)(c) from within a county participating in
the state forest land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, replacement
forest land may be located within any county participating in the land
pool.
(c) Disbursement from the park land trust revolving fund to acquire
replacement property and for operating and maintaining public use and
recreation facilities shall be on the authorization of the department.
(d) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
RCW 79A.80.090 must be solely used for the purpose of operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails,
managed by the department.
(((4))) (3) In order to maintain an effective expenditure and
revenue control, the park land trust revolving fund is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
(((5))) (4) The department is authorized to solicit and receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department. The department may seek voluntary contributions from
individuals and organizations for this purpose. Voluntary
contributions will be deposited into the park land trust revolving fund
and used solely for the purpose of public use and recreation facilities
operations and maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered
a fee for use of these facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.64.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1000 are each
amended to read as follows:
A resource management cost account in the state treasury is created
to be used solely for the purpose of defraying the costs and expenses
necessarily incurred by the department in managing and administering
state lands, ((community forest trust lands, and)) aquatic lands, and
the making and administering of leases, sales, contracts, licenses,
permits, easements, and rights-of-way as authorized under the
provisions of this title. Appropriations from the resource management
cost account to the department shall be expended for no other purposes.
Funds in the resource management cost account may be appropriated or
transferred by the legislature for the benefit of all of the trusts
from which the funds were derived. During the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatics revenues in
the resources management cost account to the marine resources
stewardship trust account for the purposes of chapter 43.372 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.64.040 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1001 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order
to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for
the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way
issued by the department and affecting state lands((, community forest
trust lands,)) and aquatic lands, provided that no deduction shall be
made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.
(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150
prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection((s (4) and (6))) (5)
of this section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not
exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in
connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and
aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the
department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters.
(4) ((Deductions authorized under this section for transactions
pertaining to community forest trust lands must be established at a
level sufficient to defray over time the management costs for
activities prescribed in a parcel's management plan adopted pursuant to
RCW 79.155.080, and, if deemed appropriate by the board consistent with
RCW 79.155.090, to reimburse the state and any local entities' eligible
financial contributions for acquisition of the parcel.
(5))) In the event that the department sells logs using the
contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through
79.15.530, the moneys received subject to this section are the net
proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.
(((6))) (5) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the
twenty-five percent limitation on deductions set in subsection (3) of
this section may be increased up to thirty percent by the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.155.090 and 2011 c 216 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any revenue produced on community forest trust lands must be((,
consistent with RCW 79.64.040,)) allocated as follows:
(a) All costs incurred by the department in managing the parcel
must be fully reimbursed; and
(b) After the department's management costs are reimbursed, any
remaining revenue must then be prioritized to fulfill the management
objectives for the specific parcel as identified in the postacquisition
management plan developed under RCW 79.155.080 consistent with the
management principles outlined in RCW 79.155.030.
(2)(a) If, by the determination of the board, there is revenue
remaining in any given biennium after fulfilling the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, then the board has the discretion to
reimburse any local entities' eligible financial contributions for
acquisition of the parcel under RCW 79.155.070(2) and any state
contribution to the acquisition of the parcel up to an amount that
represents fifty percent of the difference between the parcel's
original appraised fair market value and the parcel's timber and forest
land value. However, any funds used as part of the local contribution
may not be reimbursed if the funds were originally provided through a
state or federal grant, provided through a fully compensated transfer
of development rights at fair market value, or provided by a donation
of funds or property.
(b) If the board decides to reimburse the state and local
contribution, then it must allocate the reimbursement so that fifty
percent is provided to the state general fund and fifty percent is
provided to any eligible partnering local entities.
(c) Nothing in this section creates an expectation, requirement, or
fiduciary duty for the board or the associated community forest trust
lands to generate revenue in excess of amounts as provided in
subsection (1)(a) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 24 and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the
budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school
construction fund, the community forest trust account, the county
arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight
mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the
public health services account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account,
the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural
resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension
funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle
account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource
management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural
mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special
category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the
state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number
520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond
retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration
account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western
Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated
plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation
revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation
taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state
university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 25 and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 16 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the
budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia
river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the Columbia river
crossing project account, the common school construction fund, the
community forest trust account, the county arterial preservation
account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred
compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of licensing services account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental
disabilities community trust account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll
lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the
education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight
mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the
public health services account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account,
the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural
resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension
funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle
account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource
management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural
mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special
category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the
state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number
520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond
retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration
account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western
Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated
plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation
revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation
taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, the state
university permanent fund, and the state reclamation revolving account
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act expires on the date
the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are
met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 7 of this act takes effect on the
date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012
are met.

--- END ---