BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.60A.160 and 2006 c 343 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created in the department a veterans innovations
program((, which consists of the defenders' fund and the competitive
grant program)). The purpose of the veterans innovations program is to
provide crisis and emergency relief and education, training, and
employment assistance to veterans and their families in their
communities.
(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the
specific purposes provided in this section, the department must:
(a) Establish a process to make veterans and those still serving in
the national guard or armed forces reserve aware of the veterans
innovations program;
(b) Develop partnerships to assist veterans, national guard, or
reservists in completing the veterans innovations program application;
and
(c) Provide funding to support eligible veterans, national guard
members, or armed forces reserves for:
(i) Crisis and emergency relief; and
(ii) Education, training, and employment assistance.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.60A.175 and 2011 c 60 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from
public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the ((defenders'
fund and the competitive grant)) veterans innovations program and spend
gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts,
grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17A.560.
(2) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of RCW 43.60A.160 through
43.60A.185.
(3) The department may perform all acts and functions as necessary
or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied
under chapter 343, Laws of 2006.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.60A.185 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 924 are each
amended to read as follows:
The veterans innovations program account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of the
veterans innovations program. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
the funds may be used for contracting for veterans' claims assistance
services.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.60A.165 (Defenders' fund -- Eligibility for assistance)
and 2007 c 522 s 952 & 2006 c 343 s 4;
(2) RCW 43.60A.170 (Competitive grant program) and 2010 1st sp.s.
c 7 s 115 & 2006 c 343 s 5;
(3) RCW 43.131.405 (Veterans innovations program -- Termination) and
2006 c 343 s 10; and
(4) RCW 43.131.406 (Veterans innovations program -- Repeal) and 2010
1st sp.s. c 37 s 925, 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 116, & 2006 c 343 s 11.

--- END ---