BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.110.020 and 2013 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the person who is responsible for the
administration of the service contracts, the service contracts plan, or
the protection product guarantees.
(2) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(3) "Consumer" means an individual who buys any tangible personal
property that is primarily for personal, family, or household use.
(4) "Home heating fuel service contract" means a contract or
agreement for a separately stated consideration for a specific duration
to perform the repair, replacement, or maintenance of a home heating
fuel supply system including the fuel tank and all visible pipes, caps,
lines, and associated parts or the indemnification for repair,
replacement, or maintenance for operational or structural failure due
to a defect in materials or workmanship, or normal wear and tear.
(5) "Incidental costs" means expenses specified in the guarantee
incurred by the protection product guarantee holder related to damages
to other property caused by the failure of the protection product to
perform as provided in the guarantee. "Incidental costs" may include,
without limitation, insurance policy deductibles, rental vehicle
charges, the difference between the actual value of the stolen vehicle
at the time of theft and the cost of a replacement vehicle, sales
taxes, registration fees, transaction fees, and mechanical inspection
fees. Incidental costs may be paid under the provisions of the
protection product guarantee in either a fixed amount specified in the
protection product guarantee or sales agreement, or by the use of a
formula itemizing specific incidental costs incurred by the protection
product guarantee holder to be paid.
(6) "Maintenance agreement" means a contract of limited duration
that provides for scheduled maintenance only.
(7) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle subject to registration under
chapter 46.16A RCW.
(8) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
incorporated or unincorporated association, joint stock company,
reciprocal insurer, syndicate, or any similar entity or combination of
entities acting in concert.
(9) "Premium" means the consideration paid to an insurer for a
reimbursement insurance policy.
(10) "Protection product" means any ((product)) protective
chemical, substance, device, or system offered or sold with a guarantee
to repair or replace another product or pay incidental costs upon the
failure of the product to perform pursuant to the terms of the
protection product guarantee. Protection product does not include fuel
additives, oil additives, or other chemical products applied to the
engine, transmission, or fuel system of a motor vehicle.
(11) "Protection product guarantee" means a written agreement by a
protection product guarantee provider to repair or replace another
product or pay incidental costs upon the failure of the protection
product to perform pursuant to the terms of the protection product
guarantee. The reimbursement of incidental costs promised under a
protection product guarantee must be tied to the purchase of a physical
product that is formulated or designed to make the specified loss or
damage from a specific cause less likely to occur.
(12) "Protection product guarantee holder" means a person who is
the purchaser or permitted transferee of a protection product
guarantee.
(13) "Protection product guarantee provider" means a person who is
contractually obligated to the protection product guarantee holder
under the terms of the protection product guarantee. Protection
product guarantee provider does not include an authorized insurer
providing a reimbursement insurance policy.
(14) "Protection product seller" means the person who sells the
protection product to the consumer.
(15) "Provider fee" means the consideration paid by a consumer for
a service contract.
(16) "Reimbursement insurance policy" means a policy of insurance
that is issued to a service contract provider or a protection product
guarantee provider to provide reimbursement to the service contract
provider or the protection product guarantee provider or to pay on
behalf of the service contract provider or the protection product
guarantee provider all contractual obligations incurred by the service
contract provider or the protection product guarantee provider under
the terms of the insured service contracts or protection product
guarantees issued or sold by the service contract provider or the
protection product guarantee provider.
(17) "Road hazard" means a hazard that is encountered while driving
a motor vehicle. Road hazards may include but are not limited to
potholes, rocks, wood debris, metal parts, glass, plastic, curbs, or
composite scraps.
(18)(a) "Service contract" means a contract or agreement entered
into at any time for consideration over and above the lease or purchase
price of the property for any specific duration to perform the repair,
replacement, or maintenance of property or the indemnification for
repair, replacement, or maintenance for operational or structural
failure due to a defect in materials or workmanship((,)) or normal wear
and tear. Service contracts may provide for the repair, replacement,
or maintenance of property for damage resulting from power surges and
accidental damage from handling, with or without additional provision
for incidental payment of indemnity under limited circumstances,
including towing, rental, emergency road services, or other expenses
relating to the failure of the product or of a component part thereof.
(b) "Service contract" also includes a contract or agreement sold
for separately stated consideration for a specific duration to perform
any one or more of the following services:
(i) The repair or replacement of tires and/or wheels damaged as a
result of coming into contact with road hazards ((including but not
limited to potholes, rocks, wood debris, metal parts, glass, plastic,
curbs, or composite scraps)). However, a contract or agreement meeting
the definition under this subsection (((17))) (18)(b) in which the
party obligated to perform is either a tire or wheel manufacturer or a
motor vehicle manufacturer is exempt from the requirements of this
chapter;
(ii) The removal of dents, dings, or creases on a motor vehicle
that can be repaired using the process of paintless dent removal
without affecting the existing paint finish and without replacing
vehicle body panels, sanding, bonding, or painting;
(iii) The repair of chips or cracks in, or the replacement of,
motor vehicle windshields as a result of damage caused by road hazards;
(iv) The replacement of a motor vehicle key or key fob in the event
that the key or key fob becomes inoperable or is lost or stolen;
(v) Services provided pursuant to a protection product guarantee;
and
(vi) Other services approved by rule of the commissioner that are
not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(c) "Service contract" does not include coverage for:
(i) Repair or replacement due to damage to the interior surfaces or
to the exterior paint or finish of a vehicle. However, coverage for
these types of damage may be offered in connection with the sale of a
protection product as defined in this section; or
(ii) Fuel additives, oil additives, or other chemical products
applied to the engine, transmission, or fuel system of a motor vehicle.
(((18))) (19) "Service contract holder" or "contract holder" means
a person who is the purchaser or holder of a service contract.
(((19))) (20) "Service contract provider" means a person who is
contractually obligated to the service contract holder under the terms
of the service contract.
(((20))) (21) "Service contract seller" means the person who sells
the service contract to the consumer.
(((21))) (22) "Warranty" means a warranty made solely by the
manufacturer, importer, or seller of property or services without
consideration; that is not negotiated or separated from the sale of the
product and is incidental to the sale of the product; and that
guarantees indemnity for defective parts, mechanical or electrical
breakdown, labor, or other remedial measures, such as repair or
replacement of the property or repetition of services.

--- END ---