BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following terms used in this chapter shall have the meanings
set forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Commission" means the Washington state medical quality
assurance commission.
(2) "Physician" means a person licensed under this chapter.
(3) "Practitioner" means either a physician or physician assistant
licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.
(4) "Quality improvement program" means a program that seeks to
educate and improve practitioner proficiency with regard to quality of
care, professional standards, ethical guidelines, and other practice
standard issues established by the commission pursuant to sections 2
through 8 of this act. The quality improvement program consists of
multiple nondisciplinary and nonreportable tools for use by the
commission at its discretion to resolve issues relating to medical
practice.
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(((3))) (6) "Resident physician" means an individual who has
graduated from a school of medicine which meets the requirements set
forth in RCW 18.71.055 and is serving a period of postgraduate clinical
medical training sponsored by a college or university in this state or
by a hospital accredited by this state. For purposes of this chapter,
the term shall include individuals designated as intern or medical
fellow.
(((4))) (7) "Emergency medical care" or "emergency medical service"
has the same meaning as in chapter 18.73 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature considers physicians and
physician assistants as lifelong learners. The legislature further
recognizes the nature of this learning, practice correction, and
practice improvement typically occurs in an environment that is
conducive to learning but not without consequence. This learning or
guidance occurs at the direction of more learned peers. Historically,
this would occur through the actions of professional associations
intended to maintain and improve levels of competency through
instruction and guidance. It was through this process that senior
members of the association identified and addressed potentially harmful
practice deficits before these deficits developed into habits that
could harm the patient and by extension the profession. As not all
licensed practitioners in the state of Washington are members of
professional associations, but all medical practitioners are licensed
by the commission, it is appropriate that the commission fulfill the
role of providing practice correction to those practitioners in need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The commission shall establish a quality
improvement program for the purposes of addressing deficits or concerns
in the practice of its licensees which are not unprofessional conduct
as set forth in RCW 18.130.180 and which do not pose a threat to the
safety of patients. The goal of the program is to improve the care of
practitioners in a nonpunitive, confidential environment that will
result in safer and higher quality care to the citizens of this state.
The quality improvement program is educational and nondisciplinary.
However, the commission may initiate one or more elements of the
quality improvement program with a licensee at any time, including
during the complaint process prior to the commission filing charges or
allegations against a respondent.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a meeting of the
commission, a committee of the commission, or a review panel for the
purpose of discussing or adopting a nondisciplinary resolution
authorized by this section is not subject to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and amendments thereto, and is not
subject to the open public meetings act as provided in chapter 42.30
RCW, and amendments thereto.
(3) A nondisciplinary resolution authorized by this section and all
entity records and all findings pursuant to sections 4 through 8 of
this act are not subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW,
and are not admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative
action, except that such resolution is admissible in any disciplinary
proceeding by the commission.
(4) A nondisciplinary resolution authorized by this section is not
a disciplinary action or other order or adjudication. No failure to
adhere to the applicable standard of care or violation of the
Washington medical practice act may be implied by participation in the
quality improvement program or the adoption of a nondisciplinary
resolution.
(5) The commission may initiate one or more elements of the quality
improvement program with a licensee through the formal complaint
process, through the investigative process, or concerns shared
informally with the commission by peers, employers, or other concerned
parties associated with the licensee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The establishment of the quality
improvement program authorizes the commission to perform any or all of
the following in the effort of executing the program:
(a) Entering into relationships supportive of the quality
improvement program with professionals who provide the following
services: Evaluation, education, or quality care improvement;
(b) Receiving and assessing reports from any source raising issues
with a physician's or physician assistant's care or conduct that may
need improvement;
(c) Intervening in cases of questionable behavior or care, or in
cases where there is reasonable cause to suspect there is a quality of
care or behavior issue but not unprofessional conduct as set forth in
RCW 18.130.180;
(d) Upon reasonable cause, referring physicians or physician
assistants for evaluation, education, or quality improvement;
(e) Monitoring the education and quality improvement of physicians
and physician assistants through meetings with the practitioner and
individuals assisting the practitioner pursuant to this section;
(f) Providing monitoring and continuing rehabilitative support of
physicians and physician assistants;
(g) Performing such other activities as agreed upon by the
commission and the practitioner; and
(h) Providing prevention, education, and continuing education,
where appropriate.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commission may issue and establish
the terms of a professional development plan to resolve a concern,
complaint, or investigation of a complaint received by the commission
relating to practitioners licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.71A RCW.
(2) A professional development plan may not contain a provision
that:
(a) Revokes, suspends, limits, or restricts a person's license or
other authorization to practice medicine; or
(b) Assesses an administrative penalty against a person.
(3) A professional development plan may not be imposed to resolve
a complaint:
(a) Concerning:
(i) A patient death;
(ii) The commission of a felony; or
(iii) A matter in which the physician engaged in inappropriate
sexual behavior or contact with a patient or became financially or
personally involved with a patient in an inappropriate manner; or
(b) In which the appropriate resolution may involve a restriction
on the manner in which a license holder practices medicine.
(4) The commission may only issue a professional development plan
to resolve a complaint against a license holder if the license holder
has not previously entered into a professional development plan within
the last five years.
(5) The license holder participating in a professional development
plan is responsible for the costs of administering this plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The commission may issue a letter of
guidance to resolve a concern, complaint, or investigation of a
complaint received by the commission relating to practitioners licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.71A RCW. The letter of guidance may detail
alleged areas of concern relating to medical practice of a licensee and
possible remedies the licensee may undertake to educate themselves on
the subject.
(2) The letter of guidance does not represent a disciplinary
finding of the commission and may not be used as evidence in any civil
or malpractice proceedings.
(3) The commission may use the letter of guidance in administrative
matters while carrying out its statutory duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The commission may compel an informal
interview to resolve a concern, complaint, or investigation of a
complaint received by the commission relating to practitioners licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.71A RCW.
(2) A commissioner and a commission medical consultant shall attend
the informal interview.
(3) The purpose of the informal interview is to conduct a candid
discussion between medical professionals regarding a specific area of
practice or situation of concern relating to practice.
(4) The licensee may choose to attend the informal interview with
legal representation.
(5) An informal interview does not preclude the commission from
proceeding with further investigation and disciplinary actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The commission may compel a quality
assessment to resolve a concern, complaint, or investigation of a
complaint received by the commission relating to practitioners licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.71A RCW.
(2) The quality assessment may be conducted at the direction of the
commission with a commission approved assessment entity.
(3) The quality assessment may be conducted in cooperation with the
employer of the licensee and any data said employer may choose to
share.
(4) The employer of the licensee may not use the quality assessment
or its results to initiate discipline either internally or with the
commission.
(5) The results of the quality assessment are confidential and not
subject to disclosure.
(6) Elements of the quality assessment may consist of, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) 360 evaluation;
(b) Physical evaluation that includes tests for hearing, vision,
and dexterity;
(c) Mental evaluation that includes cognitive testing;
(d) Practice review or evaluation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 18.71 RCW.

--- END ---