BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to preserve
instructional time offered to students in all grades kindergarten
through twelve by limiting the number of late start and early release
days within the required minimum one hundred eighty-day school
calendar.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.203 and 2009 c 548 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Basic education goal" means the student learning goals and the
student knowledge and skills described under RCW 28A.150.210.
(2) "Certificated administrative staff" means all those persons who
are chief executive officers, chief administrative officers,
confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).
(3) "Certificated employee" as used in this chapter and RCW
28A.195.010, 28A.405.100, 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, 28A.405.250,
28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380, and chapter 41.59 RCW, means those
persons who hold certificates as authorized by rule of the Washington
professional educator standards board.
(4) "Certificated instructional staff" means those persons employed
by a school district who are nonsupervisory certificated employees
within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8).
(5) "Class size" means an instructional grouping of students where,
on average, the ratio of students to teacher is the number specified.
(6) "Classified employee" means a person who does not hold a
professional education certificate or is employed in a position that
does not require such a certificate.
(7) "Classroom teacher" means a person who holds a professional
education certificate and is employed in a position for which such
certificate is required whose primary duty is the daily educational
instruction of students. In exceptional cases, people of unusual
competence but without certification may teach students so long as a
certificated person exercises general supervision, but the hiring of
such classified employees shall not occur during a labor dispute, and
such classified employees shall not be hired to replace certificated
employees during a labor dispute.
(8) "Instructional program of basic education" means the minimum
program required to be provided by school districts and includes
instructional hour requirements and other components under RCW
28A.150.220.
(9) "Program of basic education" means the overall program under
RCW 28A.150.200 and deemed by the legislature to comply with the
requirements of Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution.
(10) "School day" means each day of the school year on which pupils
enrolled in the common schools of a school district are engaged in
academic and career and technical instruction planned by and under the
direction of the school.
(11) "School year" includes the minimum number of school days
required under RCW 28A.150.220 and limited under section 3 of this act,
and begins on the first day of September and ends with the last day of
August, except that any school district may elect to commence the
annual school term in the month of August of any calendar year and in
such case the operation of a school district for such period in August
shall be credited by the superintendent of public instruction to the
succeeding school year for the purpose of the allocation and
distribution of state funds for the support of such school district.
(12) "Teacher planning period" means a period of a school day as
determined by the administration and the board of ((the)) directors of
the district that may be used by teachers for instruction-related
activities including but not limited to preparing instructional
materials; reviewing student performance; recording student data;
consulting with other teachers, instructional assistants, mentors,
instructional coaches, administrators, and parents; or participating in
professional development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Late start or early release of students resulting in partial days
of instruction shall be limited to no more than seven occurrences
during the required minimum one hundred eighty-day school year, except
as provided in RCW 28A.150.290 for unforeseen events. If a school
district chooses to seek a waiver from the office of the superintendent
of public instruction or the state board of education to implement more
than a total of seven late starts and early releases, then each
additional partial day shall count for no more than one-half day for
the purposes of the allocation and distribution of state funds.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.305.140 and 2012 c 53 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In accordance with section 3 of this act, the state board of
education may grant waivers to school districts from the provisions of
RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on the basis that such waiver or
waivers are necessary to:
(a) Implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students
in the district an effective education system that is designed to
enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may
include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for
students who experience difficulty with the regular education program;
(b) Implement an innovation school or innovation zone designated
under RCW 28A.630.081; or
(c) Implement a collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project approved under RCW 28A.630.104.
(2) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.305.140 and 1990 c 33 s 267 are each amended to
read as follows:
In accordance with section 3 of this act, the state board of
education may grant waivers to school districts from the provisions of
RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on the basis that such waiver or
waivers are necessary to implement successfully a local plan to provide
for all students in the district an effective education system that is
designed to enhance the educational program for each student. The
local plan may include alternative ways to provide effective
educational programs for students who experience difficulty with the
regular education program.
The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for the
waiver or waivers.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.180 and 2012 c 53 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In accordance with section 3 of this act, the state board of
education, where appropriate, or the superintendent of public
instruction, where appropriate, may grant waivers to districts from the
provisions of statutes or rules relating to: The length of the school
year; student-to-teacher ratios; and other administrative rules that in
the opinion of the state board of education or the opinion of the
superintendent of public instruction may need to be waived in order for
a district to implement a plan for restructuring its educational
program or the educational program of individual schools within the
district or to implement an innovation school or innovation zone
designated under RCW 28A.630.081 or to implement a collaborative
schools for innovation and success pilot project approved under RCW
28A.630.104.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 to apply for the waivers under this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.655.180 and 2009 c 543 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with section 3 of this act, the state board of
education, where appropriate, or the superintendent of public
instruction, where appropriate, may grant waivers to districts from the
provisions of statutes or rules relating to: The length of the school
year; student-to-teacher ratios; and other administrative rules that in
the opinion of the state board of education or the opinion of the
superintendent of public instruction may need to be waived in order for
a district to implement a plan for restructuring its educational
program or the educational program of individual schools within the
district.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 to apply for the waivers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 4 and 6 of this act expire June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 5 and 7 of this act take effect
June 30, 2019.

--- END ---