BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.280 and 2011 c 360 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The growth management hearings board shall hear and determine
only those petitions alleging either:
(a) That, except as provided otherwise by this subsection, a state
agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments
thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to plans, development
regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the board to hear
petitions alleging noncompliance with RCW 36.70A.5801 or petitions
challenging the regulation of withdrawal of public groundwater exempt
from the permit requirement under RCW 90.44.050;
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted;
(c) That the approval of a work plan adopted under RCW
36.70A.735(1)(a) is not in compliance with the requirements of the
program established under RCW 36.70A.710;
(d) That regulations adopted under RCW 36.70A.735(1)(b) are not
regionally applicable and cannot be adopted, wholly or partially, by
another jurisdiction; or
(e) That a department certification under RCW 36.70A.735(1)(c) is
erroneous.
(2) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or
city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on
which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the
governor within sixty days of filing the request with the board; or (d)
a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.
(3) For purposes of this section "person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or
entity of any character.
(4) To establish participation standing under subsection (2)(b) of
this section, a person must show that his or her participation before
the county or city was reasonably related to the person's issue as
presented to the board.
(5) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management
planning population projection prepared by the office of financial
management, the board shall consider the implications of any such
adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by the board must
be documented and filed with the office of financial management within
ten working days after adoption.
If adjusted by the board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as the "board adjusted
population projection." None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

--- END ---