BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17A.560 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date
a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed by or
acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may solicit or
accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or
authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Contributions
received through the mail after the thirtieth day before a regular
legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is postmarked
prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) The limitations specified in subsection (1) of this section
also apply in odd-numbered years to any period the legislature is not
in session if the legislature has not adopted and submitted to the
governor a biennial operating appropriations act for the ensuing fiscal
biennium.
(3) During the period provided for the consideration of bills by
the governor under Article III, section 12 of the state Constitution,
the governor and any person employed by or acting on behalf of the
governor shall not solicit or accept contributions to a public office
fund, to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign
debt.
(4) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

--- END ---