BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7033 and 2013
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 992 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as
follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under
subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local
toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the
cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics
control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal
year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the
moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in
RCW 70.105D.170.
(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW
82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.
(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection,
the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control
account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this
chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered
under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or
transferred to the account by the legislature.
(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to
the following activities:
(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this
chapter;
(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;
(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(f) ((State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small
businesses, and agriculture;
(g))) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness,
training, and response activities;
(((h))) (g) Water and environmental health protection and
monitoring programs;
(((i))) (h) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(((j) A public participation program;
(k))) (i) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to
pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up
standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and
terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement
under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the
funding will achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or
enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or
mitigation of unfair economic hardship;
(((l) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(m))) (j) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use,
reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;
(((n))) (k) Storm water pollution control projects and activities
that protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous
clean-up sites;
(((o))) (l) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal
funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901
et seq.);
(((p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure
to toxic air pollution;
(q))) (m) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay
for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards
under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:
(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone
designated under RCW 70.105D.150;
(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a
settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and
(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional
criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a
substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise
occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup
commensurate with the scope of the public funding;
(((r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;
(s))) (n) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if
the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed
available funds in those accounts;
(((t))) (o) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department of
ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment,
administration, and air quality programs;
(((u))) (p) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the
state conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish;
((and
(v))) (q) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the
University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;
(((w))) (r) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state
toxics control account may be spent on projects in section 3159,
chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local
toxics control account; and
(((x))) (s) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state
toxics control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed
waste account.
(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local
toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (((c)[(e)]))
(e)(i) of this subsection;
(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of
properties as provided for under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv) of this
subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions
at:
(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high
hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan
or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;
(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone
if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and
there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent
document under the federal cleanup law;
(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in
conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial
actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up
sites;
(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; and
(vi) ((Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and
(vii))) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if
the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed
available funds in those accounts.
(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.
(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government storm water planning and
implementation activities.
(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general
fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may
use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments
under this subsection:
(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government
conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend
over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions
exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the
following limitations:
(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten
years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement
upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at
the facility;
(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the
total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and
(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended
grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the
department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous
biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been
entered into to substantially expend the funds;
(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government
conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement
of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the
agreement;
(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to
it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct
remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local
government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance
with a schedule specified in the agreement;
(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to
fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield
properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation.
Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental
site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments;
feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and
regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic
and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter
43.21C RCW;
(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions
related to areawide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding,
the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or
be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially
liable person;
(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities
that would not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that
would not otherwise occur;
(vii) When pending grant applications under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv)
and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available,
designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for
distribution of available funds.
(((d) [(f)])) (f) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the
department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account
may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059,
chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.
(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no
hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid
waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction,
maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects
designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a
competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However,
this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics
control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with
the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.
(7) ((Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium,)) One percent of
the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for
public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by
a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty
thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated
for public participation that are not expended at the close of any
biennium revert to the state toxics control account.
(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery,
the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to
implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited
procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award
of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of
rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may
administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive
guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.
(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this
section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. ((effects
[affects])) affects the ability of a potentially liable person to
receive public funding.
(10) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the local toxics control
account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for
storm water grants.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.105D.170 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 28 s 1, 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 19 s 7042, and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 991 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The environmental legacy stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Beginning July 1, 2013, and every fiscal year
thereafter, the annual amount received from the tax imposed by RCW
82.21.030 that exceeds one hundred forty million dollars must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account. The state
treasurer may make periodic deposits into the environmental legacy
stewardship account based on forecasted revenue. Moneys in the account
may only be spent after appropriation.
(2) Moneys in the environmental legacy stewardship account may be
spent on:
(a) Grants or loans to local governments for performance and
outcome-based projects, model remedies, demonstration projects,
procedures, contracts, and project management and oversight that result
in significant reductions in the time to complete compared to baseline
averages;
(b) Purposes authorized under RCW 70.105D.070 (3) and (4);
(c) Grants or loans awarded through a competitive grant program
administered by the department to fund design and construction of low-impact development retrofit projects and other high quality projects
that reduce storm water pollution from existing infrastructure. The
competitive grant program must apply criteria to review, rank, and
prioritize projects for funding based on their water quality benefits,
ecological benefits, and effectiveness at reducing environmental
degradation; ((and))
(d) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment;
(e) A public participation program;
(f) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;
(g) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or
disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small
businesses, and agriculture;
(h) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150; and
(i) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure
to toxic air pollution.
(3) Except as provided under RCW 70.105D.070(3) (k) and (q),
nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. expands the ability of
a potentially liable person to receive public funding.
(4) Moneys in the environmental legacy stewardship account may also
be used as follows:
(a) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, shoreline update technical
assistance and for local government shoreline master program update
grants;
(b) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, solid and hazardous waste
compliance at the department of corrections;
(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, activities at the
department of fish and wildlife concerning water quality monitoring,
hatchery water quality regulatory compliance, and technical assistance
to local governments on growth management and shoreline management;
(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, forest practices
regulation and aquatic land investigation and cleanup activities at the
department of natural resources.
(5) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the environmental
legacy stewardship account may be transferred to the local toxics
control account.

--- END ---