BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that nuclear power is
a safe, reliable, cost-effective, and carbon-free source of
electricity. Accordingly, the legislature intends that nuclear power
should be studied as a possible replacement for electricity consumed in
the region that is generated from the combustion of fossil fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A joint select task force on nuclear
energy is created to study how the state can advance and support the
generation of clean energy in the region through the use of nuclear
power. The task force must report any findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(2) In its deliberations, the task force must consider the greatest
amount of environmental benefit for each dollar spent based on the
life-cycle cost of any nuclear power technology. Life-cycle costs must
include the storage and disposal of any nuclear wastes.
(3) The task force must consist of eight members that serve on the
legislative standing committees with primary jurisdiction over energy
issues. The president of the senate shall appoint two members from the
majority caucus and two members from the minority caucus. The speaker
of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each
caucus.
(4) The members of the task force shall select from among their
members a chair and other officers as the task force deems appropriate.
(5) The task force must hold no more than four meetings, with two
of those meetings in Richland, Washington.
(6) The task force must be staffed by senate committee services and
the office of program research. All expenses and hiring of additional
staff shall be subject to the approval of the senate facilities and
operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules
committee.
(7) The task force terminates December 15, 2014.

--- END ---