BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to purchases, or
portions of purchases, by state and local governments that would
otherwise be subject to the tax under this chapter, when they are
purchased with moneys acquired by a state or local government from
indebtedness.
(2) As used in this section "portions or purchases" are those
portions of a purchase that were made from indebtedness when the total
purchase was made from multiple fund sources.
(3) As used in this section, "indebtedness" means all debt issued
by state or local governments for a term greater than one year and does
not include debt to other governments or governmental funds.
(4) The exemption under this section is available only when the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of any items by state or local governments that otherwise would be
subject to the tax under this chapter when the items were purchased
with moneys acquired by a state or local government from indebtedness.
(2) When the item used was acquired by purchase through multiple
funds sources, only the amount that was purchased by moneys acquired
from indebtedness qualify for the exemption under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section the definitions and
requirements in section 1 of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---