BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in sections 2
and 3 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be
used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not
intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to
determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as intended to
extend the purchasing power of funds for school construction,
maintenance, and improvements when such funds are acquired through
indebtedness.
(3) The legislature's specific public policy goal is to reduce the
cost of school projects when such projects are funded through debt.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
provide the data necessary to perform a review to the joint legislative
audit and review committee during the year in which the review will be
conducted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to purchases, or
portions of purchases, for construction, maintenance, or improvement of
facilities owned by public school districts or public charter schools,
when the purchase is made with moneys acquired by the state public
school district, or public charter school from indebtedness.
(2) As used in this section, "portions or purchases" are those
portions of a purchase that were made from indebtedness when the total
purchase was made from multiple fund sources.
(3) As used in this section, "indebtedness" means all debt incurred
by the state, public school district, or public charter school for a
term greater than one year and does not include debt to other
governments or governmental funds.
(4) The exemption under this section is available only when the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of any items used for the construction, maintenance, or improvement
of a facility owned by a public school district or public charter
school when the items were purchased with moneys acquired by the state,
public school district, or public charter school from indebtedness.
(2) When the item used was acquired by purchase through multiple
funds sources, only the amount that was purchased by moneys acquired
from indebtedness qualify for the exemption under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions and
requirements in section 1 of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---