BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that online learning
provides tremendous opportunities for students and apprentices to
access curriculum, courses, and a unique learning environment that
might not otherwise be available. Online learning provides additional
flexibility that can enable students and apprentices to maintain work
and family commitments. Online learning reduces travel and saves
travel time for students and apprentices. Online learning expands
options for students and apprentices in rural areas. Online learning
reduces the length of training time required on campus. Online
learning provides students and apprentices with quicker access to
employment. The legislature supports and encourages online learning
opportunities and believes that online learning is an appropriate and
efficient method for the study of theory for cosmetology, manicuring,
barbering, esthetics, and instructor-training.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.16.020 and 2013 c 187 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Apprentice" means a person who is engaged in a state-approved
apprenticeship program and who must receive a wage or compensation
while engaged in the program.
(2) "Apprentice monthly report" means the apprentice record of
daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the approved apprenticeship
program and provided to the apprentice, audited annually by the
department, and kept on file by the approved apprenticeship program for
three years.
(3) "Apprentice trainer" means a person who gives training to an
apprentice in an approved apprenticeship program and who is approved
under RCW 18.16.280.
(4) "Apprenticeship program" means a state-approved apprenticeship
program pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW and approved under RCW 18.16.280
for the training of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, master
esthetics, and manicuring.
(5) "Apprenticeship training committee" means a committee approved
by the Washington apprenticeship and training council established in
chapter 49.04 RCW.
(6) "Approved apprenticeship shop" means a salon/shop that has been
approved under RCW 18.16.280 and chapter 49.04 RCW to participate in an
apprenticeship program.
(7) "Approved security" means surety bond.
(8) "Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage
in the practice of barbering.
(9) "Board" means the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and
manicuring advisory board.
(10) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of cosmetology.
(11) "Crossover training" means training approved by the director
as training hours that may be credited to current licensees for similar
training received in another profession licensed under this chapter.
(12) "Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a school,
((or)) online by a school, in an approved apprenticeship program
established by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council
and conducted in an approved salon/shop, or online by an approved
apprenticeship program, set by rule under this chapter, and approved by
the department. After consulting with the board, the director may set
by rule a percentage of hours in a curriculum, up to a maximum of ten
percent, that could include hours a student receives while training in
a salon/shop under a contract approved by the department. Each
curriculum must include at least the following required hours:
(a) School curriculum:
(i) Cosmetologist, one thousand six hundred hours;
(ii) Barber, one thousand hours;
(iii) Manicurist, six hundred hours;
(iv) Esthetician, seven hundred fifty hours;
(v) Master esthetician either:
(A) One thousand two hundred hours; or
(B) Esthetician licensure plus four hundred fifty hours of
training;
(vi) Instructor-trainee, five hundred hours.
(b) Apprentice training curriculum:
(i) Cosmetologist, two thousand hours;
(ii) Barber, one thousand two hundred hours;
(iii) Manicurist, eight hundred hours;
(iv) Esthetician, eight hundred hours;
(v) Master esthetician, one thousand four hundred hours.
(13) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(14) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing
or the director's designee.
(15) "Esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of esthetics.
(16) "Individual license" means a cosmetology, barber, manicurist,
esthetician, master esthetician, or instructor license issued under
this chapter.
(17) "Instructor" means a person who gives instruction in a school,
or who provides classroom theory training to apprentices in locations
other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she holds a
license under this chapter, has completed at least five hundred hours
of instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school,
and has passed a licensing examination approved or administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an
accredited postsecondary institution shall upon application be licensed
as an instructor to give instruction in a school, or to provide
classroom theory training to apprentices in locations other than in a
school, in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this
chapter. An applicant who holds an instructional credential from an
accredited community or technical college and who has passed a
licensing examination approved or administered by the director shall
upon application be licensed as an instructor to give instruction in a
school, or to provide classroom theory training to apprentices in
locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she
holds a license under this chapter. To be approved as an "instructor"
in an approved apprenticeship program, the instructor must be a
competent instructor as defined in rules adopted under chapter 49.04
RCW.
(18) "Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently licensed
in this state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, esthetician, or
master esthetician, and is enrolled in an instructor-trainee curriculum
in a school licensed under this chapter.
(19) "Location license" means a license issued under this chapter
for a salon/shop, school, personal services, or mobile unit.
(20) "Manicurist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of manicuring.
(21) "Master esthetician" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of master esthetics.
(22) "Mobile unit" is a location license under this chapter where
the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or
manicuring is conducted in a mobile structure. Mobile units must
conform to the health and safety standards set by rule under this
chapter.
(23) "Person" means any individual, partnership, professional
service corporation, joint stock association, joint venture, or any
other entity authorized to do business in this state.
(24) "Personal services" means a location licensed under this
chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring,
esthetics, or master esthetics is performed for clients in the client's
home, office, or other location that is convenient for the client.
(25) "((The)) Practice of barbering" means the cutting, trimming,
arranging, dressing, curling, shampooing, shaving, and mustache and
beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp.
(26) "((The)) Practice of cosmetology" means arranging, dressing,
cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving, chemical
relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching, lightening, coloring,
waxing, tweezing, shaving, and mustache and beard design of the hair of
the face, neck, and scalp; temporary removal of superfluous hair by use
of depilatories, waxing, or tweezing; manicuring and pedicuring,
limited to cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and caring for and
treatment of the cuticles and nails of the hands and feet, excluding
the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise artificial
nails; esthetics limited to toning the skin of the scalp, stimulating
the skin of the body by the use of preparations, tonics, lotions, or
creams; and tinting eyelashes and eyebrows.
(27) "Practice of esthetics" means the care of the skin for
compensation by application, use of preparations, antiseptics, tonics,
essential oils, exfoliants, superficial and light peels, or by any
device, except laser, or equipment, electrical or otherwise, or by
wraps, compresses, cleansing, conditioning, stimulation, superficial
skin stimulation, pore extraction, or product application and removal;
temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions, creams,
appliance, waxing, threading, tweezing, or depilatories, including
chemical means; and application of product to the eyelashes and
eyebrows, including extensions, design and treatment, tinting and
lightening of the hair, excluding the scalp. Under no circumstances
does the practice of esthetics include the administration of
injections.
(28) "Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping,
polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and
the nails of the hands or feet, and the application and removal of
sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by hand or with mechanical or
electrical apparatus or appliances.
(29) "Practice of master esthetics" means the care of the skin for
compensation including all of the methods allowed in the definition of
the practice of esthetics. It also includes the performance of medium
depth peels and the use of medical devices for care of the skin and
permanent hair reduction. The medical devices include, but are not
limited to, lasers, light, radio frequency, plasma, intense pulsed
light, and ultrasound. The use of a medical device must comply with
state law and rules, including any laws or rules that require
delegation or supervision by a licensed health professional acting
within the scope of practice of that health profession.
(30) "Salon/shop" means any building, structure, or any part
thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring is
conducted; provided that any person, except employees of a salon/shop,
who operates from a salon/shop is required to meet all salon/shop
licensing requirements and may participate in the apprenticeship
program when certified as established by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council established in chapter 49.04 RCW.
(31) "School" means any establishment that offers curriculum of
instruction in the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics,
master esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-trainee to students and is
licensed under this chapter.
(32) "Student" means a person sixteen years of age or older who is
enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and receives
instruction in any of the curricula of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, master esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-training with or
without tuition, fee, or cost, and who does not receive any wage or
commission.
(33) "Student monthly report" means the student record of daily
activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the school and provided to the
student, audited annually by the department, and kept on file by the
school for three years.
(34) "Distance or online learning" means theory training provided
online, by a school licensed under this chapter or an approved
apprenticeship program established by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council, in the areas of cosmetology,
manicuring, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, and instructor-training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall adopt rules regarding distance or online
learning. The rules must include a limit on the number of hours of
online learning that can be used toward licensing requirements in the
areas of cosmetology, manicuring, barbering, esthetics, master
esthetics, and instructor-training.
The department must provide an evaluation review of distance or
online learning in the areas of cosmetology, manicuring, barbering,
esthetics, and instructor-training to the committees of the legislature
that oversee the licensing of those professions no later than January
1, 2016.

--- END ---