BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city of the first class may establish and maintain the
position of warrant officer within the city police department.
(2) The position of warrant officer is hereby created and shall be
maintained by the city within the city police department. The number
and qualifications of warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance, and
their compensation shall be paid by the city.
(3) Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special
authority to make arrests authorized by warrants and other arrests as
are authorized by ordinance.
(4) All criminal and civil process issuing out of any Washington
state court shall be directed to the chief of police of the city served
by the court and/or to the sheriff of the county in which the court is
held and/or the warrant officers and be by them executed according to
law in any county of this state.
(5) No process of court created under this title shall be executed
outside the corporate limits of the city served by the court unless the
person authorized by the process first contacts the applicable law
enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the process is to be served.
(6) Upon a defendant being arrested in another city or county the
cost of arresting or serving process thereon shall be borne by the
court issuing the process including the cost of returning the defendant
from any county of the state to the city.
(7) Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or
retirement benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW on the basis of
service as a warrant officer as described in this section.

--- END ---