BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
under "ARTICLE XI. MERGERS" to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
article unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Converted organization" means the organization into which a
converting organization converts under sections 2 through 5 of this
act.
(2) "Converting limited liability company" means a converting
organization that is a limited liability company.
(3) "Converting organization" means an organization that converts
into another organization pursuant to section 2 of this act.
(4) "Governing statute" of an organization means the statute that
governs the organization's internal affairs.
(5) "Organization" means a general partnership, including a limited
liability partnership; limited partnership, including a limited
liability limited partnership; limited liability company; business
trust; corporation; or any other person having a governing statute.
The term includes domestic and foreign organizations whether or not
formed for profit.
(6) "Organizational documents" means:
(a) For a domestic or foreign general partnership, its partnership
agreement;
(b) For a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, its
certificate of limited partnership and partnership agreement;
(c) For a domestic or foreign limited liability company, its
certificate of formation and limited liability company agreement, or
comparable records as provided in its governing statute;
(d) For a business trust, its agreement of trust and declaration of
trust;
(e) For a domestic or foreign corporation for profit, its articles
of incorporation, bylaws, and other agreements among its shareholders
which are authorized by its governing statute, or comparable records as
provided in its governing statute; and
(f) For any other organization, the basic records that create the
organization and determine its internal governance and the relations
among the persons that own it, have an interest in it, or are members
of it.
(7) "Personal liability" means personal liability for a debt,
liability, or other obligation of an organization which is imposed on
a person that co-owns, has an interest in, or is a member of the
organization:
(a) By the organization's governing statute solely by reason of the
person co-owning, having an interest in, or being a member of the
organization; or
(b) By the organization's organizational documents under a
provision of the organization's governing statute authorizing those
documents to make one or more specified persons liable for all or
specified debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the organization
solely by reason of the person or persons co-owning, having an interest
in, or being a member of the organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
under "ARTICLE XI. MERGERS" to read as follows:
CONVERSION. (1) An organization other than a limited liability
company may convert into a limited liability company, and a limited
liability company may convert into another organization pursuant to
this section and sections 3 through 5 of this act and a plan of
conversion, if:
(a) The other organization's governing statute authorizes the
conversion;
(b) The conversion is not prohibited by the law of the jurisdiction
that enacted the other organization's governing statute; and
(c) The other organization complies with its governing statute in
effecting the conversion.
(2) A plan of conversion must be in a record and must include:
(a) The name and form of the organization before conversion;
(b) The name and form of the organization after conversion;
(c) The terms and conditions of the conversion, including the
manner and basis for converting interests in the converting
organization into any combination of the interests, shares,
obligations, or other securities of the converted organization or any
other organization, or into cash or other property in whole or part;
and
(d) The organizational documents of the converted organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
under "ARTICLE XI. MERGERS" to read as follows:
ACTION ON PLAN OF CONVERSION BY CONVERTING LIMITED LIABILITY
COMPANY. (1) Subject to section 6 of this act, a plan of conversion
must be consented to by all the members of a converting limited
liability company.
(2) Subject to section 6 of this act and any contractual rights,
after a conversion is approved, and at any time before a filing is made
under section 4 of this act, a converting limited liability company may
amend the plan or abandon the planned conversion:
(a) As provided in the plan; and
(b) Except as prohibited by the plan, by the same approval as was
required to approve the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
under "ARTICLE XI. MERGERS" to read as follows:
FILINGS REQUIRED FOR CONVERSION; EFFECTIVE DATE. (1) After a plan
of conversion is approved, the converting organization must make one of
the following filings to complete the conversion:
(a) A converting limited liability company must deliver to the
secretary of state for filing articles of conversion, which must
include:
(i) A statement that the limited liability company has been
converted into another organization;
(ii) The name and form of the converted organization and the
jurisdiction of its governing statute;
(iii) The date the conversion is effective under the governing
statute of the converted organization;
(iv) A statement that the conversion was approved as required by
this chapter;
(v) A statement that the conversion was approved as required by the
governing statute of the converted organization; and
(vi) If the converted organization is a foreign organization not
authorized to transact business in this state, the street and mailing
address of an office that the secretary of state may use for the
purposes of section 5(3) of this act; or
(b) A converting organization that is not a limited liability
company must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a certificate
of formation, together with articles of conversion, which must include:
(i) A statement that the limited liability company was converted
from another organization;
(ii) The name and form of the converting organization and the
jurisdiction of its governing statute; and
(iii) A statement that the conversion was approved in a manner that
complied with the converting organization's governing statute.
(2) The effective time of a conversion is either:
(a) If the converted organization is a limited liability company,
when the certificate of formation takes effect; or
(b) If the converted organization is not a limited liability
company, as provided by the governing statute of the converted
organization.
(3) If the certificate of formation filed pursuant to this section
does not specify a delayed effective date, it becomes effective upon
filing. If the certificate of formation specifies a delayed effective
time and date, the certificate of formation becomes effective at the
time and date specified. If the certificate of formation specifies a
delayed effective date but no time is specified, the certificate of
formation is effective at the close of business on that date. A
delayed effective date for a certificate of formation may not be later
than the ninetieth day after the date it is filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
under "ARTICLE XI. MERGERS" to read as follows:
EFFECT OF CONVERSION. (1) An organization that has been converted
pursuant to this article is for all purposes the same entity that
existed before the conversion.
(2) When a conversion takes effect:
(a) The title to all real estate and other property owned by the
converting organization remains vested in the converted organization
without reversion or impairment;
(b) All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the converting
organization continue as obligations of the converted organization;
(c) An action or proceeding pending by or against the converting
organization may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred;
(d) Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights,
privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting
organization remain vested in the converted organization;
(e) Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the
terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect; and
(f) Except as otherwise agreed, the conversion does not dissolve a
converting limited liability company for the purposes of Article VIII
of this chapter.
(3) A converted organization that is a foreign organization
consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any
obligation owed by the converting limited liability company if before
the conversion the converting limited liability company was subject to
suit in this state on the obligation. A converted organization that is
a foreign organization and not authorized to transact business in this
state appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of
process for purposes of enforcing an obligation under this subsection.
Service on the secretary of state under this subsection is made in the
same manner and with the same consequences as in RCW 25.15.025(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
under "ARTICLE XI. MERGERS" to read as follows:
RESTRICTIONS ON APPROVAL OF CONVERSIONS. If a member of a
converting limited liability company will have personal liability with
respect to a converted organization, then, in addition to the approval
requirements in section 3(1) of this act, approval of a plan of
conversion must also require the signing, by each such member, of a
separate written consent to become subject to such personal liability.

Sec. 7 RCW 25.15.085 and 2010 c 196 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each document required by this chapter to be filed in the
office of the secretary of state shall be executed in the following
manner, or in compliance with the rules established to facilitate
electronic filing under RCW 25.15.007, except as set forth in RCW
25.15.105(4)(b):
(a) Each original certificate of formation must be signed by the
person or persons forming the limited liability company;
(b) A reservation of name may be signed by any person;
(c) A transfer of reservation of name must be signed by, or on
behalf of, the applicant for the reserved name;
(d) A registration of name must be signed by any member or manager
of the foreign limited liability company;
(e) A certificate of amendment or restatement must be signed by at
least one manager, or by a member if management of the limited
liability company is reserved to the members;
(f) A certificate of dissolution must be signed by the person or
persons authorized to wind up the limited liability company's affairs
pursuant to RCW 25.15.295(3);
(g) If a surviving domestic limited liability company is filing
articles of merger, the articles of merger must be signed by at least
one manager, or by a member if management of the limited liability
company is reserved to the members, or if the articles of merger are
being filed by a surviving foreign limited liability company, limited
partnership, or corporation, the articles of merger must be signed by
a person authorized by such foreign limited liability company, limited
partnership, or corporation; ((and))
(h) A foreign limited liability company's application for
registration as a foreign limited liability company doing business
within the state must be signed by any member or manager of the foreign
limited liability company; and
(i) If a converting limited liability company is filing articles of
conversion, the articles of conversion must be signed by at least one
manager, or by a member if management of the limited liability company
is reserved to the members.
(2) Any person may sign a certificate, articles of merger, articles
of conversion, limited liability company agreement, or other document
by an attorney-in-fact or other person acting in a valid representative
capacity, so long as each document signed in such manner identifies the
capacity in which the signator signed.
(3) The person executing the document shall sign it and state
beneath or opposite the signature the name of the person and capacity
in which the person signs. The document must be typewritten or
printed, and must meet such legibility or other standards as may be
prescribed by the secretary of state.
(4) The execution of a certificate ((or)), articles of merger, or
articles of conversion by any person constitutes an affirmation under
the penalties of perjury that the facts stated therein are true.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 23B.09 RCW
to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Converting entity" means the domestic corporation that adopts
a plan of entity conversion or the other entity converting to a
domestic corporation.
(2) "Domestic other entity" means an other entity organized under
the laws of this state.
(3) "Foreign other entity" means an other entity organized under a
law other than the laws of this state.
(4) "Interest holder" means a person who holds of record:
(a) A right to receive distributions from an other entity either in
the ordinary course of business or upon liquidation, other than as an
assignee; or
(b) A right to vote on issues involving an other entity's internal
affairs, other than as an agent, assignee, proxy, or person responsible
for managing its business and affairs.
(5) "Interests" means the interests in an other entity held by its
interest holders.
(6) "Organic document" means a public organic document or a private
organic document.
(7) "Organic law" means the statute governing the internal affairs
of a domestic corporation or other entity.
(8) "Other entity" means any association or entity other than a
domestic corporation, a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, a
domestic or foreign mutual corporation or miscellaneous corporation, or
a governmental or quasi-governmental organization. The term includes,
but is not limited to, foreign corporations, limited partnerships,
general partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability
companies, joint ventures, joint stock companies, business trusts, and
profit unincorporated associations.
(9) "Owner liability" means personal liability for a debt,
obligation, or liability of an entity that is imposed on a person:
(a) Solely by reason of the person's status as a shareholder or
interest holder; or
(b) By the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or an organic
document under a provision of the organic law of an entity authorizing
the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or an organic document to make
one or more specified shareholders, members, or interest holders liable
in their capacity as shareholders, members, or interest holders for all
or specified debts, obligations, or liabilities of the entity.
(10) "Private organic document" means any document, other than the
public organic document, if any, that determines the internal
governance of an other entity.
(11) "Public organic document" means the document, if any, that is
filed of public record to create an other entity, including amendments
and restatements thereof.
(12) "Surviving entity" means the domestic corporation or other
entity that is in existence immediately after consummation of an entity
conversion pursuant to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 23B.09 RCW
to read as follows:
ENTITY CONVERSION. (1) A domestic corporation may become an other
entity pursuant to a plan of entity conversion if the entity conversion
is permitted by the organic law of the other entity by:
(a) Complying with section 11 of this act; and
(b) Filing articles of entity conversion with the secretary of
state.
(2) An other entity may become a domestic corporation if the entity
conversion is permitted by the organic law of the other entity by:
(a) Complying with the procedures for the approval of an entity
conversion provided in the organic law of the other entity; and
(b) Filing articles of entity conversion with the secretary of
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 23B.09
RCW to read as follows:
PLAN OF ENTITY CONVERSION. A plan of entity conversion must be in
a record and must include:
(1) The name of the domestic corporation before conversion;
(2) The name and form of the surviving entity after conversion;
(3) The terms and conditions of the conversion, including the
manner and basis for converting interests in the domestic corporation
into any combination of the interests, shares, obligations, or other
securities of the surviving entity or any other entity or into cash or
other property in whole or part; and
(4) The organic documents of the surviving entity as they will be
in effect immediately after consummation of the conversion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 23B.09
RCW to read as follows:
APPROVAL OF A PLAN OF ENTITY CONVERSION. In the case of an entity
conversion of a domestic corporation to an other entity:
(1) The plan of entity conversion must be adopted by the board of
directors of the converting entity and the shareholders entitled to
vote must approve the plan.
(2) After adopting a plan of entity conversion, the board of
directors of the converting entity must submit the plan of entity
conversion for approval by its shareholders.
(3) The board of directors must recommend the plan of entity
conversion to the shareholders, unless (a) the board of directors makes
a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special
circumstances it should not make such a recommendation; or (b) RCW
23B.08.245 applies, and in either case the board of directors
communicates the basis for so proceeding to the shareholders.
(4) The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan
of entity conversion on any basis, including the affirmative vote of
holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled to vote as a separate voting group
on the plan of entity conversion.
(5) In the case of an entity conversion of a domestic corporation
to a foreign corporation, in addition to any other voting conditions
imposed by the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (4) of
this section, approval of the plan of entity conversion requires the
affirmative vote of shareholders that would be required to approve a
plan of merger under RCW 23B.11.030, and of each other voting group
entitled under RCW 23B.11.035 or the articles of incorporation to vote
separately on a plan of merger. Separate voting by additional voting
groups is required on a plan of entity conversion if such voting group
or groups would be entitled to vote on a plan of merger under the
circumstances described in RCW 23B.11.035. The articles of
incorporation may require a greater or lesser vote to approve a plan of
entity conversion than that provided in this subsection, or a greater
or lesser vote by separate voting groups, so long as the required vote
is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the
plan of entity conversion and of each other voting group entitled to
vote separately on the plan.
(6) In the case of an entity conversion of a domestic corporation
to an other entity that is not a foreign corporation, approval of the
plan of entity conversion requires the approval of all shareholders of
the domestic corporation, whether or not entitled to vote under this
title or the articles of incorporation.
(7) If as a result of the conversion one or more shareholders of
the domestic corporation would become subject to owner liability for
the debts, obligations, or liabilities of any other person or entity,
in addition to the approval requirements under subsections (5) and (6)
of this section, approval of the plan of entity conversion must also
require each such shareholder to execute a separate record consenting
to become subject to such owner liability.
(8) If the approval of the shareholders is to be given at a
meeting, the domestic corporation must notify each shareholder, whether
or not entitled to vote, of the proposed meeting of shareholders at
which the plan of entity conversion is to be submitted for approval in
accordance with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must state that the
purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan
of entity conversion and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or
summary of the plan of entity conversion. The notice must include or
be accompanied by a copy of the organic documents of the surviving
entity as they will be in effect immediately after the conversion.
(9) If any provision of the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or
an agreement to which any of the directors or shareholders of the
domestic corporation are parties, adopted, or entered into before the
effective date of this section applies to a merger of the domestic
corporation, other than a provision that limits or eliminates voting or
dissenters' rights, and the document does not refer to an entity
conversion of the domestic corporation, the provision is deemed to
apply to an entity conversion of the domestic corporation until the
provision is subsequently amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 23B.09
RCW to read as follows:
ARTICLES OF ENTITY CONVERSION. (1) After a plan of entity
conversion by a domestic corporation converting into an other entity
has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, articles of
entity conversion must be signed on behalf of the domestic corporation
by any officer or other duly authorized representative and must be
delivered to the secretary of state for filing.
(2) After the conversion of an other entity into a domestic
corporation has been adopted and approved as required by the organic
law of the converting entity, articles of entity conversion must be
signed on behalf of the converting entity by any officer or other duly
authorized representative and must be delivered to the secretary of
state for filing.
(3) The articles of entity conversion must set forth:
(a) A statement that the converting entity has been converted into
the surviving entity;
(b) The name and form of the converting entity before conversion;
(c) The name and form of the surviving entity after conversion,
which must be a name that satisfies the requirements of RCW 23B.04.010
if the surviving entity after conversion is a domestic corporation;
(d) Articles of incorporation that comply with RCW 23B.02.020 if
the surviving entity after conversion is a domestic corporation;
(e) The date the conversion is effective under the organic law of
the surviving entity;
(f) If the converting entity is a domestic corporation, a statement
that the conversion was duly approved by the shareholders of the
domestic corporation pursuant to section 11 of this act;
(g) If the converting entity is an other entity, a statement that
the conversion was duly approved as required by the organic law of the
converting entity; and
(h) If the surviving entity is a foreign other entity not
authorized to transact business in this state: (i) A statement that
the surviving entity appoints the secretary of state as its agent for
service of process in a proceeding to enforce any obligation or the
rights of dissenting shareholders of the domestic corporation; and (ii)
the street and mailing address of an office which the secretary of
state may use for the purposes of RCW 23B.15.100.
(4) The articles of entity conversion take effect at the effective
time provided in RCW 23B.01.230. Articles of entity conversion under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be combined with any required
conversion filing under the organic law of the other entity if the
combined filing satisfies the requirements of both this section and the
organic law of the other entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 23B.09
RCW to read as follows:
EFFECT OF ENTITY CONVERSION. (1) An entity that has been converted
pursuant to this chapter is, for all purposes of the laws of the state
of Washington, deemed to be the same entity that existed before the
conversion and, unless otherwise agreed or as required under applicable
non-Washington law, the converting entity is not required to wind up
its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets, and the
conversion is not deemed to constitute a dissolution of the converting
entity.
(2) When any conversion becomes effective under this chapter:
(a) The title to all real estate and other property, both tangible
and intangible, owned by the converting entity remains vested in the
surviving entity without reversion or impairment;
(b) All rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of the
converting entity must be preserved unimpaired, and all debts,
liabilities, and other obligations of the converting entity continue as
obligations of the surviving entity, remain attached to the surviving
entity, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the
debts, liabilities, and other obligations had originally been incurred
or contracted by it in its capacity as the surviving entity;
(c) An action or proceeding pending by or against the converting
entity may be continued by or against the surviving entity as if the
conversion had not occurred;
(d) Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights,
privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting entity
remain vested in the surviving entity; and
(e) Except as otherwise provided in the plan of entity conversion,
the terms and conditions of the plan of entity conversion take effect.
(3) When a conversion of a domestic corporation to a foreign other
entity becomes effective, the surviving entity is deemed:
(a) To consent to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to
enforce any obligation owed by the converting entity, if before the
conversion the converting entity was subject to suit in this state on
the obligation;
(b) To appoint the secretary of state as its agent for service of
process in a proceeding to enforce any obligation or the rights of
dissenting shareholders of the domestic corporation in connection with
the conversion; and
(c) To agree that it will promptly pay to the dissenting
shareholders of the domestic corporation the amount, if any, to which
they are entitled under chapter 23B.13 RCW.
(4) Service of process on the secretary of state under this section
is made in the same manner and with the same consequences as in RCW
23B.15.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 23B.09
RCW to read as follows:
ABANDONMENT OF ENTITY CONVERSION. (1) Unless otherwise provided in
a plan of entity conversion of a domestic corporation, after the plan
of entity conversion has been adopted and approved as required by this
chapter, and at any time before the articles of entity conversion have
become effective, the planned conversion may be abandoned by the board
of directors without action by the shareholders.
(2) If any entity conversion is abandoned after articles of entity
conversion have been filed with the secretary of state but before the
entity conversion has become effective, a statement that the entity
conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section, signed
by an officer or other duly authorized representative, must be
delivered to the secretary of state for filing prior to the effective
date of the entity conversion. Upon filing, the statement takes effect
and the entity conversion is deemed abandoned and may not become
effective.

Sec. 15 RCW 23B.13.020 and 2013 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A shareholder is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment
of the fair value of the shareholder's shares in the event of, any of
the following corporate actions:
(a) A plan of merger, which has become effective, to which the
corporation is a party (i) if shareholder approval was required for the
merger by RCW 23B.11.030, 23B.11.080, or the articles of incorporation,
and the shareholder was entitled to vote on the merger, or (ii) if the
corporation was a subsidiary and the plan of merger provided for the
merger of the subsidiary with its parent under RCW 23B.11.040;
(b) A plan of share exchange, which has become effective, to which
the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares have been
acquired, if the shareholder was entitled to vote on the plan;
(c) A sale or exchange, which has become effective, of all, or
substantially all, of the property of the corporation other than in the
usual and regular course of business, if the shareholder was entitled
to vote on the sale or exchange, including a sale in dissolution, but
not including a sale pursuant to court order or a sale for cash
pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net
proceeds of the sale will be distributed to the shareholders within one
year after the date of sale;
(d) An amendment of the articles of incorporation, whether or not
the shareholder was entitled to vote on the amendment, if the amendment
effects a redemption or cancellation of all of the shareholder's shares
in exchange for cash or other consideration other than shares of the
corporation;
(e) Any action described in RCW 23B.25.120; ((or))
(f) Any corporate action approved pursuant to a shareholder vote to
the extent the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of
the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders
are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares; or
(g) A plan of entity conversion in the case of a conversion of a
domestic corporation to a foreign corporation, which has become
effective, to which the domestic corporation is a party as the
converting entity, if: (i) The shareholder was entitled to vote on the
plan; and (ii) the shareholder does not receive shares in the surviving
entity that have terms as favorable to the shareholder in all material
respects and that represent at least the same percentage interest of
the total voting rights of the outstanding shares of the surviving
entity as the shares held by the shareholder before the conversion.
(2) A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for the
shareholder's shares under this chapter may not challenge the corporate
action creating the shareholder's entitlement unless the action fails
to comply with the procedural requirements imposed by this title, RCW
25.10.831 through 25.10.886, the articles of incorporation, or the
bylaws, or is fraudulent with respect to the shareholder or the
corporation.
(3) The right of a dissenting shareholder to obtain payment of the
fair value of the shareholder's shares shall terminate upon the
occurrence of any one of the following events:
(a) The proposed corporate action is abandoned or rescinded;
(b) A court having jurisdiction permanently enjoins or sets aside
the corporate action; or
(c) The shareholder's demand for payment is withdrawn with the
written consent of the corporation.

--- END ---