BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that nonprofit
organizations that provide job training, job placement, and
preemployment services are an important part of the economy. The
legislature further finds that property leased by a nonprofit
organization for the provision of job training, placement, or
preemployment services is subject to property tax while property owned
by the organization and used for identical purposes is exempt from
property tax.
(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement
for the property tax exemption provided in RCW 84.36.030. The
performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent
evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a
private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(b) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to accomplish the general purposes indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (c)
and (d).
(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
remedy a structural inefficiency in the current tax code, and
additionally, to provide an organization claiming the exemption under
RCW 84.36.030(1)(d) with a greater amount of financial resources to
dedicate to job training, education, and placement.
(d) To measure the effectiveness of the exemption provided in this
act in achieving the specific public policy objective described in (c)
of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall evaluate the following:
(i) Changes in the number of people served by the organization's
job training and education programs;
(ii) Changes in the number of individuals placed into jobs who
received job training or education assistance by the organization;
(iii) Changes in the number of locations owned and leased by the
organization providing job training or education programs.
(e)(i) The information provided in the annual report submitted by
the organization under RCW 82.32.534 is intended to provide the
informational basis for the evaluation under (d) of this subsection.
(ii) In addition to the data source described under (e)(i) of this
subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee may use
any other data it deems necessary in performing the evaluation under
(d) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.030 and 2006 c 305 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property ((shall be)) are exempt
from taxation:
(1)(a) Property owned by nonprofit organizations or associations,
organized and conducted for nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used
for character-building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social
services directed at persons of all ages.
(b) The sale of donated merchandise ((shall)) is not ((be))
considered a commercial use of the property under this section if the
proceeds are devoted to the furtherance of the purposes of the selling
organization or association as specified in this subsection (1).
(c) In a county with a population of less than twenty thousand, the
rental or use of property, owned by a nonprofit organization or
association described in (a) of this subsection, by a person, group, or
organization in one of the following ways ((shall)) does not nullify
the exemption:
(i) The property may be rented or used for pecuniary gain or for
business activities or by individuals, groups, and organizations for
private purposes if the rental or use:
(A) Does not exceed fifteen days each assessment year;
(B) No comparable private for-profit facility exists within ten
miles of the property that could be used for the same purpose for which
the property is loaned or rented; and
(C) All income from the rental or use of the exempt property is
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes; or
(ii) The property is rented or used by a nonprofit community group
or other nonprofit organization that might not qualify for exemption if
it owned the property as long as the rental or use of the property:
(A) Does not exceed fifteen days each assessment year;
(B) Does not result in pecuniary gain;
(C) Does not involve business activities;
(D) Is always for the general public good; and
(E) All income from the rental or use of the exempt property is
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(d) Property primarily used for providing job training, placement,
or preemployment services or for supporting job training, placement, or
preemployment services through the sale of donated goods as provided in
(b) of this subsection (1) and which is leased by an organization or
association which otherwise meets the requirements in this subsection
(1) and is exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code. To qualify for the
exemption, the lease, sublease, or lease-purchase agreement must
expressly require the organization or association which is lessee or
sublessee to pay any property taxes for the leased or subleased
property. An organization claiming an exemption under this subsection
(1)(d) must file an annual report under RCW 82.32.534.
(2) Property owned by any nonprofit church, denomination, group of
churches, or an organization or association, the membership of which is
comprised solely of churches or their qualified representatives, which
is utilized as a camp facility if used for organized and supervised
recreational activities and church purposes as related to such camp
facilities. The exemption provided by this ((paragraph shall apply))
subsection applies to a maximum of two hundred acres of any such camp
as selected by the church, including buildings and other improvements
thereon.
(3) Property, including buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property, owned by nonprofit
organizations or associations engaged in character building of boys and
girls under eighteen years of age, and used for such purposes and uses,
provided such purposes and uses are for the general public good((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, if existing charters provide that
organizations or associations, which would otherwise qualify under the
provisions of this ((paragraph)) subsection, serve boys and girls up to
the age of twenty-one years, then such organizations or associations
((shall be)) are deemed qualified pursuant to this section.
(4)(a) Property owned by all organizations and societies of
veterans of any war of the United States, recognized as such by the
department of defense, which ((shall have)) has national charters, and
which ((shall have)) has for their general purposes and objects the
preservation of the memories and associations incident to their war
service and the consecration of the efforts of their members to mutual
helpfulness and to patriotic and community service to state and nation.
To be exempt such property must be used in such manner as may be
reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes and objects of such
societies.
(b) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or for business
activities, except as provided in this subsection (4), nullifies the
exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment year.
The exemption is not nullified by:
(i) The collection of rent or donations if the amount is reasonable
and does not exceed maintenance and operation expenses.
(ii) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(iii) The use of the property for pecuniary gain for periods of not
more than fifteen days in a year.
(c) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(5) Property owned by all corporations, incorporated under any act
of congress, whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to
members of the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on
a system of national and international relief and to apply the same in
mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods,
and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for
preventing the same.
(6) Property owned by nonprofit organizations exempt from federal
income tax under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of ((1954)) 1986, as amended, that are guarantee
agencies under the federal guaranteed student loan program or that
issue debt to provide or acquire student loans.
(7) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "general public good" means
members of the community derive a benefit from the rental or use of the
property by the nonprofit community group or organization.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.534 and 2010 c 114 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
report under this section must file a complete annual report with the
department. The report is due by April 30th of the year following any
calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax
preference that requires a report under this section. The department
may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(b) The report must include information detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for
employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference
was claimed. However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment, wage,
and benefit information per job at the manufacturing site for the year
that the tax preference was claimed. The report must not include names
of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year
that the tax preference was claimed.
(c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by
RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW
82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must
indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this
state during the time period covered by the report.
(d) In lieu of the information required under (b) of this
subsection (1), a person claiming an exemption under RCW
84.36.030(1)(d) must submit information in the report detailing:
(i) The number of individuals receiving job training and education
assistance during the year covered under the report;
(ii) The number of individuals who gained employment through job
training and education assistance provided by the person during the
year covered by the report; and
(iii) The number of locations in which the person operates and
whether the facility at each location is owned or leased by the person.
(e) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a
report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report
filed under this section must also include ((employment, wage, and
benefit information)) the information required under this subsection
for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which
a tax preference was claimed.
(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this
section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this
section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax
preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails
to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW
82.32.590, the department must declare the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed
at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(5) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2015 through 2024.

--- END ---