BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,789,000))
$30,781,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,075,000))
$31,065,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,765,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,629,000))
$63,611,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In support of achieving enhanced access to and affordability of
higher education in Washington state and increased simplicity and
transparency of the financial aid assistance available to students, the
joint higher education committee established in RCW 44.04.360 shall
complete a thorough and holistic review of all state financial aid
programs. The committee's scope of work for this review shall include
completing an inventory of all state funded access, affordability, and
merit programs; identifying which programs serve which populations;
identifying gaps and duplications in service; and compiling any
necessary research on existing programs. The joint higher education
committee's review of state financial aid programs shall include, but
shall not be limited to, the state need grant program established in
chapter 28B.92 RCW, the college bound scholarship program established
in chapter 28B.118 RCW, and other partially or unfunded programs
relating to access to, and affordability of, higher education in
Washington.
(2) To meet the requirements in this section, the joint higher
education committee shall invite the participation of the following:
(a) One representative from the student achievement council;
(b) One representative from Washington's public four-year sector of
higher education; and
(c) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges.
(3) The joint higher education committee shall submit a final
report of its work to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by January 15, 2015. The final report shall include
recommendations for any improvements to state financial aid programs
that will:
(a) Increase access to, and affordability of, higher education in
Washington for all students;
(b) Improve simplicity and transparency of the financial aid
assistance available to students; and
(c) Efficiently utilize state resources in a manner that achieves
serving more students.
(4) The joint higher education committee shall adjust its scope of
work to avoid duplicating the work of the college bound scholarship
program work group established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
6436 (college bound scholarship) if the bill is enacted by June 30,
2014.
(5) Staff support for the work group shall be jointly provided by
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research.

Sec. 102 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,405,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,514,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,069,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In support of achieving enhanced access to and affordability of
higher education in Washington state and increased simplicity and
transparency of the financial aid assistance available to students, the
joint higher education committee established in RCW 44.04.360 shall
complete a thorough and holistic review of all state financial aid
programs. The committee's scope of work for this review shall include
completing an inventory of all state funded access, affordability, and
merit programs; identifying which programs serve which populations;
identifying gaps and duplications in service; and compiling any
necessary research on existing programs. The joint higher education
committee's review of state financial aid programs shall include, but
shall not be limited to, the state need grant program established in
chapter 28B.92 RCW, the college bound scholarship program established
in chapter 28B.118 RCW, and other partially or unfunded programs
relating to access to, and affordability of, higher education in
Washington.
(2) To meet the requirements in this section, the joint higher
education committee shall invite the participation of the following:
(a) One representative from the student achievement council;
(b) One representative from Washington's public four-year sector of
higher education; and
(c) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges.
(3) The joint higher education committee shall submit a final
report of its work to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by January 15, 2015. The final report shall include
recommendations for any improvements to state financial aid programs
that will:
(a) Increase access to, and affordability of, higher education in
Washington for all students;
(b) Improve simplicity and transparency of the financial aid
assistance available to students; and
(c) Efficiently utilize state resources in a manner that achieves
serving more students.
(4) The joint higher education committee shall adjust its scope of
work to avoid duplicating the work of the college bound scholarship
program work group established in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
6436 (college bound scholarship) if the bill is enacted by June 30,
2014.
(5) Staff support for the work group shall be jointly provided by
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research.

Sec. 103 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,000))
$235,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,000))
$458,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,641,000
Medical Aid Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,000
Accident Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,478,000))
$6,998,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for
projects included on the committee's 2013-15 work plan as necessary to
efficiently manage workload.
(2) $332,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$332,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided for
the purposes of chapter 37, Laws of 2011 (workers' compensation).
(3) $323,000 of the performance audits of government account--state
appropriation is provided for consultant and staff costs related to the
economic analysis of tax preferences as directed by chapter 43.136 RCW.
(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
an audit of Washington's state research universities. The purpose of
the audit is to identify cost and profit centers within, and in
partnership with, the research universities. The audit must focus on
public funds; student fees, in particular tuition; and auxiliary
enterprises, which for the purposes of the audit at the University of
Washington includes University of Washington medical center, the
internal lending program, the W fund, and the center for
commercialization. The audit at each university much achieve the
following:
(a) Assess the university's policies and practices for tracking
per-student expenditures for instruction and identify the average
amount per student that the university has spent on instruction for
undergraduate students in each of the past five fiscal years;
(b) Obtain the university's definition of auxiliary enterprises and
determine the number of auxiliary enterprises, including the University
of Washington medical center, the University of Washington internal
lending program, the W fund, and the center for commercialization, that
exist in the university system, the methods the university uses to
track revenue and expenditures of auxiliary enterprises, and the
policies and practices the university has in place to ensure that state
funding is not used to supplement or guarantee projects or programs
authorized by auxiliary enterprises;
(c) Identify how much money is being spent on undergraduate
education and to what extent undergraduate education is subsidizing
graduate education; and
(d) Determine how tuition funds are being used and to what extent
they are being used to fund the University of Washington medical
center, the University of Washington internal lending program, the W
fund, and the center for commercialization and to back bonds authorized
by the university.
(5) The committee shall conduct a study of the current methods of
collecting legal financial obligations and compare those methods with
other debt collection methods, including contracting for debt
collection of legal financial obligations. The study shall include
analysis of the costs and revenues of current methods and compare those
to alternatives, and include analysis of the impact of current methods
and alternatives to revenues received by the state. Included shall be
an examination of costs and revenue generation before and after the
implementation of chapter 379, Laws of 2003 (SSB 5990) and chapter 362,
Laws of 2005 (SSB 5256) and analysis of whether these changes met the
legislative goals of reducing costs and increasing collections. A
report on the results of the analysis shall be presented to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 2014.
(6) The committee shall conduct a study of economic development
programs and projects supported by the state general fund in the
department of commerce. The study shall first review the extent to
which these programs: (a) Included specific economic development
targets; (b) monitored economic development targets; (c) required for
programs which provided support or services through contracts, whether
the contracts were structured such that if economic development targets
were not met, contracts were reviewed or revised; and (d) changed the
economic development targets of associate development organizations
relative to funding increases since 2007. The study will include the
feasibility of determining how to isolate other factors, such as
general economic trends, from the impacts of economic development
programs. The costs and options for conducting future analysis of the
outcomes specific to economic development programs shall be included
and a briefing report shall be provided to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2013. A complete report with study
data and conclusions shall be provided to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(7) The committee shall analyze the incidence and level of taxation
and business incentives available to the financial services industry in
Washington State, and identify the relative differences in taxes and
business incentives compared to California. A report shall be provided
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(8) The committee shall conduct an analysis of how school districts
use school days. The analysis must include:
(a) How school districts define classroom time, nonclassroom time,
instructional time, noninstructional time, and any other definitions of
how the school day is divided or used;
(b) Estimates of time in each category;
(c) How noninstructional time is distributed over the annual number
of school days;
(d) When noninstructional hours occur;
(e) How noninstructional hours are used, including how much
noninstructional time is devoted to professional development for the
purposes of teacher and principal evaluation training or common core
state standards training; and
(f) The extent to which the use of each category of time is
identified or defined in collective bargaining agreements.
To the extent data is not available at the statewide level, the
committee may use case studies or other methods to conduct the
analysis. The committee shall submit a report of its findings to the
education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(9) The committee shall review funding enhancement formulas that
provide minimum staffing unit funding to small school districts and
districts with school plants that have been judged by the state board
of education to be remote and necessary. The committee will make an
assessment of the current formulas and report any recommended
adjustments to the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and the
house of representatives by November 1, 2014. In assessing the current
formulas, the committee may consider: Enhancements being made to basic
education funding in the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act and
committed to under Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2261 (chapter
548, Laws of 2009) and Substitute House Bill No. 2776 (chapter 236,
Laws of 2010); developments in technology or educational service
delivery since the formulas were established; practices in other
states; districts' ability to provide students with access to a program
of education; and inter-district equity.
(((12))) (10) In carrying out the report required by RCW 44.28.157,
the committee shall include by December 2014, an analysis of the
impacts of using the Washington health benefit exchange established in
chapter 43.71 RCW as a mechanism for providing health insurance for
part-time certificated and classified K-12 public school employees.
The analysis shall be conducted in coordination with the health care
authority and shall include a review of how the exchange, federal
health premium tax credits and subsidies for out-of-pocket expenses
administered through the exchange, and Medicaid expansion have
impacted, or could impact, health care costs for individuals, school
districts, and the state. The analysis shall also include a review of
the cost of stand-alone dental plans.
(11) $174,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $348,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6512 (federal funding and state law). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(12) The committee shall conduct an analysis of the changes to
modifying the medicaid dispensing methods for contraceptive drugs in
section 48, chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd special session. The analysis
must include:
(a) Whether the changes to contraceptive methods are achieving the
assumed budget savings; and
(b) A determination of whether a twelve-month supply is an optimal
level of supply to achieve assumed savings at the lowest state cost.

Sec. 104 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,004,000))
$8,119,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,973,000))
$8,088,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,977,000))
$16,207,000

Sec. 105 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,313,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,000
State Health Care Administration Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,529,000))
$3,543,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,496,000

(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for contracted actuarial support
to the task force established in chapter 338, Laws of 2013. The state
actuary shall coordinate with the forecast per capita technical work
groups for physical health, behavioral health, and chemical dependency
services, and with the research and data analysis division within the
department of social and health services, in developing a statement and
scope of work for a request for proposals. The state actuary shall
manage and provide objective oversight to the selection process of an
actuarial firm and also manage the ongoing development and delivery of
work products for the task force to review. The scope of work for the
contracted actuary must include a review of the current public
purchasing and delivery system design for both medicaid and nonmedicaid
services related to health, behavioral health, and chemical dependency.
(2) $163,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, $163,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and
$227,000 of the state health care administration account appropriation
are provided to improve the legislature's access to independent and
objective health care actuarial analysis for the state medicaid and
public employee benefits programs.

Sec. 106 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,911,000))
$6,949,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,836,000))
$6,924,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,747,000))
$13,873,000

Sec. 107 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,068,000))
$1,069,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($994,000))
$993,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000

Sec. 108 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,691,000))
$15,803,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,685,000))
$15,869,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,376,000))
$31,672,000

Sec. 109 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,085,000))
$51,497,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,771,000))
$51,237,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,125,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,611,000))
$53,634,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,691,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,941,000))
$165,842,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for development and implementation of
the information network hub project.
(2) $2,138,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer equipment,
including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades.
(((4))) (3) The distributions made under this subsection and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made
pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(((5))) (4) $1,199,000 of the judicial information systems
account--state appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer
equipment at state courts and state judicial agencies.
(((6) $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and)) (5) $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 ((are)) is provided solely for the implementation
of chapter 210, Laws of 2013 (Senate Bill No. 5052) (superior court
judges Whatcom county). The funds provided in this subsection shall be
expended only if the fourth superior court judge position in Whatcom
county is appointed and serving on the bench.
(((7) $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and)) (6) $108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 ((are)) is provided solely for the implementation
of chapter 142, Laws of 2013 (House Bill No. 1175) (superior court
judges Benton/Franklin counties). The funds provided in this
subsection shall be expended only if the seventh superior court judge
position in Benton and Franklin counties jointly is appointed and
serving on the bench.
(((8) $11,300,000)) (7) $16,606,000 of the judicial information
systems account--state appropriation is provided solely for continued
implementation of the superior court case management system project.
The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with the
judicial information systems committee, the superior court case
management system project steering committee, and the office of the
chief information officer shall develop a revised charter to implement
the next phases of the superior court case management system. The
revised charter shall insure that the superior court case management
system project steering committee continues to provide contract
oversight, in collaboration with the judicial information system
committee, through the implementation period and various phases of the
project. Oversight responsibilities throughout the various phases of
the project must include, but are not limited to, vendor management,
contract and deliverable management, and assuring satisfaction of the
business and technical needs at the local level. The superior court
case management system project steering committee may solicit input
from user groups as deemed appropriate. The revised charter shall be
approved by the judicial information systems committee.
(((9))) (8) $1,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $1,399,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for school
districts for petitions to juvenile court for truant students as
provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The administrator for the
courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts
school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed
under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for
the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with
RCW 28A.225.030.
(((10))) (9)(a) $7,313,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014 and $7,313,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than
60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing
funds.
(((11))) (10) $274,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $274,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of public
guardianship to continue guardianship services for those low-income
incapacitated persons who were receiving services on June 30, 2013.
(((12) $333,000)) (11) $1,426,000 of the judicial information
systems account--state appropriation is provided solely for the content
management system for the appellate courts.
(12) $59,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No.
5981 (Mason county superior court judge). The funds provided in this
subsection shall be expended only if the third superior court judge
position in Mason county is appointed and serving on the bench. If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship for
the purpose of providing guardianship services to low income and
indigent alleged or actual incapacitated persons.

Sec. 110 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,410,000))
$30,859,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,719,000))
$35,540,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,648,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,000))
$304,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,929,000))
$70,351,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and
investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(2) $3,378,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely to expand the parents representation
program into Asotin, Columbia, Garfield, King, Whatcom, and Whitman
counties.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for parents representation program
costs related to increased parental rights termination filings from the
department of social and health services permanency initiative.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the immigration consequences
advisement program at the Washington defenders association.

Sec. 111 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,862,000))
$10,910,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,870,000))
$12,105,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,454,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,186,000))
$24,469,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and an amount not to exceed $40,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 may be
used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise
eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters
authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household
income or asset level.
(2) $48,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $956,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6126 (representation of children in
dependency matters) and to fund the cost of legal services. The office
is authorized to include in its contracts with counties provisions to
reduce reimbursement levels, impose case funding limits or other
measures to remain within appropriated amounts. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 112 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,082,000))
$2,086,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,015,000))
$2,067,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,097,000))
$4,153,000

Sec. 113 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,356,000))
$11,818,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,535,000))
$9,591,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,419,000))
$7,450,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,361,000))
$8,336,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,467,000))
$8,505,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,016,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,860,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,378,000))
$66,960,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($3,301,000)) $3,767,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely to reimburse
counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs
and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures.
Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs
that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $1,926,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The
funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the
amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall
be required to raise contributions or commitments to make
contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent
of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may
make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have
been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and
Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to
the funding for the library as a whole.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature to consider during the 2014
legislative session funding for the publication and distribution of a
primary election voters pamphlet.
(5) $771,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $772,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the state library to purchase
statewide on-line access to the information technology academy to allow
public access to on-line courses and learning resources through public
libraries.

Sec. 114 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($253,000))
$250,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($248,000))
$251,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training
sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees.
The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of enterprise services
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

Sec. 115 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,924,000))
$14,945,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the state treasurer's service
account--state appropriation is provided solely for legal fees related
to additional legal assistance due to changes in federal financial
regulations and an increase in complex and high profile litigation.

Sec. 116 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($728,000))
$755,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($733,000))
$762,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,573,000))
$9,869,000
((Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,090,000))
$11,386,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($728,000)) $755,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014 and (($733,000)) $758,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for staff
and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district
data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district
program audits of state funded public school programs; establish the
specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions
occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular
public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety
net committee when requested.
(2)(a) $300,000 of the state auditing services revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely to contract with a private firm
with accounting expertise to conduct an audit of the use of dedicated
local and operating fee accounts by the state's public institutions of
higher education. The legislature intends that tuition revenue be
expended in support of instruction and student support services and
that other dedicated fees are expended for the purposes for which they
are charged. As a result, the legislature directs this audit to
examine the accounting of these accounts; to provide clarity regarding
the use of these accounts; and to make recommendations for improvement
that will support the ongoing clarity, transparency, and accurate
accounting of the use of these accounts in accordance with legislative
intent. The final audit must include:
(i) For the 2003-2005 through the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, a
thorough examination of the accounting, as required by governmental
accounting standards board requirements that govern accounting
functions of the office of financial management, of:
(A) All revenue into these accounts;
(B) All expenditures out of these accounts; and
(C) All transfers to, from, and within these accounts;
(ii) A narrative summary of the management and uses of these
accounts by the institutions of higher education, including an
explanation of the reserve policies implemented by the institutions of
higher education that govern fund balances in these accounts; and
(iii) Recommendations to improve current practices that will
support the ongoing clarity, transparency, and accurate accounting of
the use of these accounts in a manner that satisfies the governmental
accounting standards board requirements that govern accounting
functions of the office of financial management and that aligns with
the legislature's intended use of these accounts.
(b) The final audit shall be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2015. The
state auditor shall recover the costs of this audit from the public
institutions of higher education.
(c) With any funds remaining from the audit required by this
subsection, the state auditor shall review other issues of significance
in support of the goal of achieving transparency in the use of funding
sources available to institutions of higher education.

Sec. 117 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,000))
$139,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,000))
$173,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $312,000

Sec. 118 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,456,000))
$11,019,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,132,000))
$10,761,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,114,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $997,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($191,286,000))
$206,478,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,279,000))
$2,333,000
Public Services Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,093,000))
$2,106,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($224,628,000))
$241,079,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(4) The executive ethics board shall: (a) Develop a statewide
plan, with performance measures, to provide overall direction and
accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected
offices; (b) coordinate and work with the commission on judicial
conduct and the legislative ethics board; (c) assess and evaluate each
agency's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys,
review Washington state quality award feedback reports, and publish an
annual report on the results to the public; and (d) solicit outside
evaluations, studies, and recommendations for improvements from
academics, nonprofit organizations, the public disclosure commission,
or other entities with expertise in ethics, integrity, and the public
sector.
(5) $424,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacement of a portion of the
agency's personal computers. The amount provided in this subsection is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer and section 945 of this act,
personal computer acquisition and replacement.
(6) $609,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for upgrades to software programs.
The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(7) $150,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (extended foster care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1341 (wrongful imprisonment). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $189,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1420 (transportation improvement projects). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $2,093,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the work of the public counsel
section of the office of the attorney general.
(11) $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to the Washington
coalition of crime victim advocates to provide training, certification,
and technical assistance for crime victim service center advocates.
(12) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and $3,402,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of salary
adjustments addressing recruitment and retention issues for assistant
attorneys general in the first six years of their employment with the
attorney general's office.

Sec. 119 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,260,000))
$1,249,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,230,000))
$1,241,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000

Sec. 120 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,076,000))
$61,054,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,151,000))
$61,524,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($265,004,000))
$266,827,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,638,000))
$5,620,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,036,000))
$2,700,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($445,000))
$443,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,452,000))
$25,442,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,915,000))
$11,910,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($969,000))
$1,166,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,882,000))
$1,879,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,303,000))
$5,300,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,592,000))
$18,038,000
Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($758,000))
$755,000
Washington Community Technology Opportunity Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Liquor Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,605,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($469,094,000))
$468,531,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance
program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall
be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans,
and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed
under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the
terms included in the original loan agreements.
(2) (($500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.)) The director is authorized to expend $1,000,000 from the
financial services regulation fund during the fiscal biennium solely
for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for
alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs
that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an
alternative to litigation.
(3) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior
volunteer program.
(4) The department shall administer its growth management act
technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and
counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or
counties.
(5) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla
Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.
(6) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for
rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.
(7) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in the homeless
family shelter program.
(8) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and (($198,000)) $396,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
Washington new Americans program.
(9) $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for associate development
organizations. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department
shall consider an associate development organization's total resources
when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to
the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086.
(10) $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington asset building
coalitions.
(11) $5,605,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with
the municipal research and services center of Washington.
(12) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of purchasing
contracted services to expand and promote the tourism industry in the
state of Washington.
(a) The department must contract with the Washington tourism
alliance. Expenditure of state moneys is contingent upon the
contractor providing a dollar for dollar cash or in-kind match.
Funding must be provided for the following services:
(i) Serving as a central point of contact through developing and
maintaining a web portal for Washington tourism, operating a call
center, and mailing travel guides;
(ii) Promoting Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets, with emphasis on markets in Europe and Asia;
(iii) Providing information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues; and
(iv) Conducting tourism-related research, including market research
and measuring the return on investment of funded activities.
(b) The department may not use more than 4 percent of the funds to
administer, monitor, and report the outcomes of the services. The
department must electronically submit performance metrics by January 1,
2014, and report the outcomes of the services by January 1, 2015, to
the economic development committees of the legislature.
(c) The department has the authority to designate one or more
alternative contractors if necessary due to performance or other
significant issues. Such change must only be made after consultation
with the Washington tourism alliance, the governor's office, and the
chairs and ranking members of the economic development committees of
the legislature.
(13) $72,000 of the prostitution prevention and intervention
account is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1291 (sex trade victims). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1818 (business and government streamlining). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(15) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to develop an
economic cluster strategy to leverage the state's unique maritime
assets, geography, history, and infrastructure. Goals include growing
employment, targeted economic activity, environmental considerations,
tax revenue to state and local governments, and quality of life
associated with the maritime sector by working with the industry to
understand workforce needs, parity considerations with Oregon and
British Columbia, and tax structure and regulatory barriers. The
department will report its findings to the appropriate committees of
the legislature no later than December 1, 2014.
(16) $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce for
services to homeless families through the Washington families fund.
(17) $5,000,000 of the home security account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the department of commerce to provide emergency
assistance to homeless families in the temporary assistance for needy
families program.
(18) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the economic development commission to
retain one current administrative position. The department shall
convene a work group, chaired by the current chair of the economic
development commission, of representatives of associate development
organizations and the economic development commission to recommend:
(1) Changes to the economic development commission's purpose and source
and amount of funding; (2) objective benchmarks and outcome-based
performance measures for evaluating state investments in economic
development; (3) high priority regulatory reforms to foster a favorable
business climate for long-term private sector job creation and
competitiveness; and (4) organizational roles responsibilities and
structures to strengthen cohesive planning, streamline execution, and
improve outcomes. The work group shall be comprised of representatives
from no less than eight associate development organizations
representing both urban and rural counties and counties on both sides
of the Cascade range. The department shall submit a report of the work
group's recommendation to the fiscal and economic development policy
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2013.
(19) (($4,000,000)) $2,515,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($850,000)) $1,875,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided
solely for purposes of ((creating and operating a community health care
and education and innovation center at the Pacific Medical Center in
Seattle. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used for lease,
maintenance, operations, and other required related expenses for
Seattle community colleges allied health programs and other related
uses identified by the department of commerce. The department is
authorized to enter into a thirty-year lease for the Pacific Medical
Center property)) the lease, maintenance, operations and other related
expenses at the Pacific medical center in Seattle. The department is
authorized to enter into a thirty-year lease for the Pacific medical
center property and is directed to generate revenue from subleases to
the greatest extent possible, consistent with the terms of the lease.
(20) Within the appropriations in this section, the department
shall, by December 1, 2013, develop a comprehensive start-up Washington
strategy to facilitate the growth of start-ups and enhance the state's
competitiveness in recruiting and retaining businesses that start up in
Washington. This shall include but is not limited to: Business and
occupation tax relief, capital investment, regulatory burdens,
workforce and infrastructure needs and support. Start-up businesses
interactions with state government and other public entities as a
customer shall also be considered.
(21) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to identify and
invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align
existing economic development programs and priorities. The department
must consider Washington's position as the most trade dependent state
when identifying priority investments. The department must engage
states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development
organizations, small business development centers, chambers of
commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided.
For each dollar expended the department must receive a one hundred
percent match. The match may be provided by the department through
nongeneral fund sources, or any partnering governments or
organizations. Sector leads established by the department must include
the industries of: (a) Tourism; (b) agriculture, wood products, and
other natural resource industries; and (c) clean technology and
renewable and nonrenewable energy. The department may designate sector
leads through partner organizations or other state agencies. The
department must develop performance metrics and milestones. The
department must electronically submit the performance metrics and
performance-to-date by January 1, 2014, to the economic development
committees of the legislature.
(22) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any
nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than
$1,000,000 per year.
(23) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an
application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and
preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation
project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory
conservation targets.
(24) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the economic impact and
infrastructure cost study for Covington town center.
(25) The department is directed to work with innovation partnership
zone administrators to review the existing grant program, including the
criteria for designation as an innovation partnership zone and the
grant funding criteria. The department shall submit its report to the
legislature by December 1, 2013.
(26) Within existing resources, the department shall provide
administrative and other indirect support to the developmental
disabilities council.
(27) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to contract
with the University of Washington women's center to conduct a study to
research supply chain policies related to labor practices of small,
medium, and large businesses. The study shall analyze whether or not
there is a correlation between supply chain management practices that
protect workers from human trafficking and unsafe working conditions
and higher shareholder value and/or market share. The study will
examine the impact of corporate sourcing practices in social media
feedback and in customer satisfaction. The study shall provide case
studies and best practices in ethical sourcing practices that protect
workers. The study shall recommend how to evaluate and monitor supply
chain management related to labor and vendor management practices of
companies without bias. The study shall make recommendations on how
the state can design legislation on global ethical sourcing practices
that is comprehensive, pragmatic, and enforceable. The study shall be
presented to the house of representatives and senate commerce and labor
committees no later than January 31, 2015.
(28) $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely to the following community mobilization
organizations in the following amounts:
(a) $21,000 to TOGETHER for Drug Free Youth of Chelan and Douglas
counties;
(b) $61,000 to safe streets campaign of Pierce county;
(c) $32,000 to TOGETHER of Thurston county; and
(d) $30,000 to safe Yakima valley of Yakima county.
(29) $1,635,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the department's international trade
program and foreign trade contracts and subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall contract for the
activities and services of its international trade office to include,
but not be limited to, market development assistance and training;
business matchmaking services such as trade shows, missions, and
partner searches; foreign trade representatives, and other activities
that assist Washington companies in exporting their products and
services or expand market share abroad. Vendors must have the option
of providing all or portions of these activities. The annual level of
funding for the contract shall be based on amount provided in this
subsection. The contract shall begin June 1, 2015, and shall be for a
term no longer than three years. Activities currently under contract
may be renewed, but for a term no longer than June 1, 2015.
(30) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the long-term care ombudsman program
to improve ombudsman access to long-term care residents in community
based settings such as adult family homes and assisted living
facilities.
(31) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely to contract with the aerospace futures
alliance to conduct research and development strategies to align the
aerospace supplier industry with the maritime, automobile, medical
device manufacturing, and other industries that share transferable
workforce skills.

Sec. 121 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($764,000))
$757,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($802,000))
$809,000

Lottery Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,616,000

Sec. 122 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,414,000))
$18,182,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,542,000))
$18,526,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,340,000))
$34,340,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $289,000
Personnel Service Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,656,000))
$8,642,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,015,000))
$6,543,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,497,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Agency Innovation and Efficiency Grant Program
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $809,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,123,000))
$93,198,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management shall prepare a report
outlining alternative methods of procuring health benefits for home
care workers, including individual providers and agency providers. In
preparing the report, the office of financial management shall consult
with the department of social and health services, representatives of
individual home care providers, and agency home care providers.
Along with a summary of the current method of providing benefits,
the report must include an analysis of the policy and fiscal
implications of accessing health benefits through the Washington health
benefits exchange. The report must also provide an analysis of a
medicaid section 1115 waiver with the federal centers for medicare and
medicaid services that would provide additional medicaid matching funds
for individual provider home care workers who are provided with health
care benefits through a collective bargaining agreement negotiated with
the state under chapter 74.39A RCW, but would otherwise be eligible for
medicaid under the federal expanded eligibility provisions that take
effect January 1, 2014.
The report must be submitted to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by January 6, 2014.
(2) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $536,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for a study of the state's medical and
public assistance eligibility systems and infrastructure with the goal
of simplifying procedures, improving customer service, and reducing
state expenditures. The study must also examine which state entities
play various roles in the eligibility and data verification processes
in order to determine if eligibility processes can be further
streamlined in light of changes related to the federal affordable care
act. The study must identify how costs will be allocated between state
and federal funding sources and options for maximizing federal
participation. The office of financial management shall provide a
report on its findings and recommendations to the relevant policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2014.
(4)(a) The legislature finds that the state's nationally recognized
student achievement initiative has led to significant improvements at
two-year institutions of higher education. With the goal of creating
such efficiencies within the four-year institutions of higher
education, the office of financial management shall convene, in
coordination with the joint committee on higher education and the
student achievement council, a technical incentive funding model task
force to propose an incentive funding model for the four-year
institutions of higher education. The model will provide new incentive
funding to four-year institutions of higher education that demonstrate
improvement on existing performance measures and control resident
undergraduate tuition growth. Participation in the program is
voluntary; however, funding appropriated for this program shall only be
available to those institutions that have chosen to participate in the
program.
(b) The task force must include the following members:
(i) One representative from the student achievement council;
(ii) One representative from the education data center created in
RCW 43.41.400; and
(iii) One representative from each of the four-year institutions of
higher education.
(c) The program shall include, but shall not be limited to:
(i) A system for allocating new incentive funding to participating
institutions based on an institution's:
(A) Performance in specific metrics;
(B) Control and reduction where possible of resident undergraduate
and graduate tuition; and
(C) Efficient utilization of classrooms, laboratories, and online
and other high technology instructional methods;
(ii) A methodology for allocating funding for performance as
specified in (c)(i)(A) of this subsection that is based on performance
metrics reported in the accountability monitoring and reporting system
established in RCW 28B.77.090 and that recognizes each institution's
unique mission by measuring each institution's performance in these
metrics against its past performance;
(iii) A methodology for investing any unallocated incentive funds
to the state need grant program created in chapter 28B.92 RCW to expand
access to low-income and underserved student populations; and
(iv) A methodology for establishing a baseline level of state
funding that:
(A) Fully supports the state's need for an increasing portion of
its citizens to gain post-secondary education and qualifications;
(B) Recognizes the acute need of the state's high-technology
economy for a sufficient number of graduates in high employer demand
programs of study;
(C) Achieves a more equitable share of support between the state
and students and their families; and
(D) Provides for funding enhancements based on demonstrated
improvements in institutional performance within the educational
achievement and tuition reduction incentive program.
(d) The workgroup shall submit a final report containing an
incentive funding model to the governor and higher education and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2013.
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
contract with a statewide nonprofit organization with expertise in
promoting and supporting STEM education from early learning through
postsecondary education in accordance with chapter 25, Laws of 2013 2nd
sp. sess.
(6) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the education data center to:
(a) Collect and publish short-term and long-term earnings and
employment data for completers of higher education degrees,
apprenticeships, and certificates awarded by institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 for each institution on its web
site by October 1, 2014;
(b) With the assistance of the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, make publicly available on its web
site a detailed inventory of the data that are contained in the data
warehouse. The data center and its contributors shall continue to
expand efforts to improve the integrity of the information and web site
displays to maximize value and utility. The education data center
shall also collaborate with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee to broadly disseminate meaningful
information on the publicly accessible web sites by expanding and
increasing interactive web-based reporting; and
(c) In consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, representatives of the public four-year institutions of higher
education, and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, prepare, or contract with an entity to prepare, an economic
success metrics report of employment and earnings outcomes for degrees,
apprenticeships, and certificates earned at institutions of higher
education. The final report shall be published on the education data
center web site and delivered to the governor and the higher education
and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2014.
(7) Consistent with chapter 9.94A RCW, the sentencing guidelines
commission shall undertake a thorough review of juvenile sentencing as
it relates to the intersection of the adult and juvenile justice
systems and make recommendations for reforms that promote improved
outcomes for youth, public safety, and taxpayer resources. The review
shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) The process and circumstances for transferring a juvenile to
adult jurisdiction, including discretionary and mandatory decline
hearings and automatic transfer to adult jurisdiction;
(b) Sentencing standards, term lengths, sentencing enhancements,
and stacking provisions that apply once a juvenile is transferred to
adult jurisdiction; and
(c) The appropriate custody, treatment, and resources for declined
youth who will complete their term of confinement prior to reaching age
twenty-one.
The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2014.
(8) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
allocate to the University of Washington for the institute for protein
design, and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the office of financial
management to allocate to Washington State University for the air
transportation center of excellence for alternative jet fuels. Funding
provided in this subsection shall not be distributed by the office of
financial management until the state auditor has executed a contract
for the audit required in section 115 of this act.
(9) Within amounts provided in this section, the office of the
chief information officer shall review the security plans of the
provider one system and other health information technology systems
within the health care authority and the department of social and
health services to ensure compliance with federal health information
portability and accountability act rules and the council for affordable
quality healthcare committee on operating rules for information
exchange.
(10) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for an analysis of statewide jail system.
The analysis must examine:
(a) Regional capacities and how the capacity is used for local and
state detention, to include:
(i) Historical and current utilization;
(ii) Level of security;
(iii) Ability to provide medical and mental health care; and
(iv) Availability of programming;
(b) Identification of barriers and solutions for the use of local
jails including:
(i) For individuals who would otherwise be transferred to
department of corrections for a short-term stay;
(ii) Violator population billing and tracking; and
(iii) Long-term stays in jail in lieu of prison; and
(c) Financial impacts to counties of providing felon and juvenile
detention.
An initial report defining benchmarks and desired outcomes shall be
provided to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by July 15,
2014, with a final report of findings and recommendations due November
1, 2014.
(11) $809,000 of the state agency innovation and efficiency grant
program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
purposes of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5872 (state agency innovation
and efficiency grant program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 123 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,772,000))
$38,256,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $151,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of computer
equipment, including servers, routers, and storage system upgrades.
The amount provided in this subsection is conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(2) $137,000 of the administrative hearings revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of a portion of
the agency's personal computers. The amount provided in this
subsection is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements
of the project management oversight standards and policies established
by the office of the chief information officer.
(3) Within the amounts provided in this section, the office shall
improve the timeliness of its hearings and report the progress of its
efforts to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees
of the legislature by November 1, 2014.

Sec. 124 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,696,000))
$25,782,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $596,000 of the lottery administrative account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the lottery's
gaming systems vendor contract.
(2) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of
gaming system capabilities that violates state law.

Sec. 125 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($233,000))
$241,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($224,000))
$232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($457,000))
$473,000

Sec. 126 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,728,000))
$50,875,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $57,000 of the department of retirement
systems expense account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
purposes of Senate Bill No. 6201 (optional life annuities for LEOFF 2
members). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 127 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,985,000))
$108,709,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($106,301,000))
$107,169,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,102,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,000
((Master)) Business License ((Fund)) Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,082,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,751,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($244,446,000))
$246,038,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of revenue is authorized to increase the master
application fee to nineteen dollars and the renewal fee to eleven
dollars consistent with RCW 19.02.075.
(2) $6,751,000 of the data processing revolving account--state
appropriation and $4,853,000 of the master license fund--state
appropriation are provided solely for the replacement of the
department's legacy business systems. The amounts provided in this
subsection are conditioned on the department satisfying the
requirements of the project management oversight standards and policies
established by the office of the chief information officer.
(3) $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $431,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1971 or Senate Bill No. 5873 (communications services reform).
If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in
the subsection shall lapse.
(4) $641,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $297,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5882 or House Bill No. 2081 (tax preferences and
transparency). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2013, the
amounts provided in the subsection shall lapse.
(5) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6057 (hiring persons with developmental disabilities).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $69,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $21,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6515 (state job creation). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $588,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $856,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to provide security at two
department field offices and at the liquor control board's headquarters
to handle cash tax payments for recreational marijuana related
businesses. The department shall enter into an interagency agreement
to provide some of the funding to the liquor control board as needed.
(8) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to implement
Senate Bill No. 6151 (cultural access authorities).
(9) The department must consult with counties it determines to be
directly affected by the United States open golf championship held in
June 2015 in Washington state for the purpose of establishing metrics
to estimate the additional state sales tax revenue attributable to that
event. The department must report the additional state sales tax
revenue attributable to the United States open golf championship to the
fiscal committees of the legislature not later than December 1, 2015.

Sec. 128 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,217,000))
$1,203,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,178,000))
$1,192,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,395,000

Sec. 129 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,077,000))
$3,567,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($200,000 of the minority and women's
business enterprises account--state appropriation is provided for
implementation of a certification program for small business
enterprises.))
(1) The agency will collaborate with the department of
transportation to certify small businesses as small business
enterprises. Funding for this work is provided through interagency
agreement with the state department of transportation.
(2) The department will engage in the stakeholder process with the
department of transportation, cities, counties, ports, transit agencies
and other entities that rely upon the office for federal certification
as a small business enterprise, disadvantaged business enterprise, or
airport concessionaire disadvantaged business enterprise to determine
an equitable manner to fully recover from users the office's costs for
providing this statewide service. Cost to be reviewed include, but are
not limited to, business outreach, certification application and
renewal processing, investigations and audits, and appeals from denials
and decertifications.

Sec. 130 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$227,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,495,000
Health Benefit Exchange Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,555,000))
$49,866,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,126,000))
$55,564,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $676,000 of the health benefit exchange account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1947 (Washington health benefit exchange). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(2) The office of the insurance commissioner shall not curtail
functions relating to solvency, rates and forms, and consumer
protection.
(3) Appropriations in this section, as previously appropriated by
the legislature in section 144, chapter 564, Laws of 2009 for the
implementation of chapter 298, Laws of 2009, are sufficient to
implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6511 (prior
authorization).
(4) $182,000 of the insurance commissioner regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5540 including section 6 of
the bill (out-of-state carriers).

Sec. 131 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,035,000))
$36,059,000

Sec. 132 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,146,000))
$58,223,000
Dedicated Marijuana Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,856,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,116,000))
$64,049,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,494,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
((is)) and $4,856,000 of the dedicated marijuana account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the liquor control board to
implement Initiative Measure No. 502.
(2)(a) The liquor control board must work with the department of
health and the department of revenue to develop recommendations for the
legislature regarding the interaction of medical marijuana regulations
and the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 502. At a minimum, the
recommendations must include provisions addressing the following:
(i) Age limits;
(ii) Authorizing requirements for medical marijuana;
(iii) Regulations regarding health care professionals;
(iv) Collective gardens;
(v) Possession amounts;
(vi) Location requirements;
(vii) Requirements for medical marijuana producing, processing, and
retail licensing;
(viii) Taxation of medical marijuana in relation to recreational
marijuana; and
(ix) The state agency that should be the regulatory body for
medical cannabis.
(b) The board must submit its recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2014.

Sec. 133 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,228,000))
$11,230,000
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,893,000))
$29,944,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,411,000))
$4,414,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,938,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,620,000))
$47,676,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The commission shall work with the Idaho public utilities
commission and the public utility commission of Oregon to identify
common regulatory functions that can be performed jointly, with the
goal of formalizing an agreement that protects essential services while
increasing regulatory effectiveness and efficiencies through economies
of scale. The commission is authorized to enter into an agreement with
such other state public utility commissions to work jointly in
administering specified respective regulatory functions.
(2) Up to $200,000 of the total appropriation is provided for the
commission to continue to evaluate the regulatory processes for energy
companies and identify and implement administrative actions to improve
those processes. The commission shall develop and adopt a schedule for
such administrative actions.

Sec. 134 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,880,000))
$1,840,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,846,000))
$1,794,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,135,000))
$140,213,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,514,000))
$58,397,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,531,000))
$20,251,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,253,000))
$69,625,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,794,000))
$3,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($273,568,000))
$295,917,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($14,531,000)) $20,251,000 of the disaster response account -- state appropriation and (($53,253,000)) $69,625,000 of the disaster
response account--federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters
declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The military department shall submit a report to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees on October 1st and February 1st of each year detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2014-2015 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(2) (($75,000,000)) $60,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee; and
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; and incremental changes from the
previous estimate.
(3) $388,000 of the worker and community right-to-know account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department's equipment
replacement plan. Prior to using appropriated funds for the purchase
of server or other related equipment, the department shall create a
plan, in consultation with consolidated technology services and the
office of the chief information officer, to migrate the department's
existing data center to the state data center located in the 1500
Jefferson building and use services provided by consolidated technology
services instead of purchasing new servers or other related equipment.
If the department has specific service or performance requirements for
locating servers outside the state data center, the agency will submit
a waiver request to the office of the chief information officer as
required in RCW 43.41A.150.

Sec. 135 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,977,000))
$1,992,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,036,000))
$2,078,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($521,000))
$522,000
Personnel Service Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,300,000))
$3,334,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,834,000))
$7,926,000

Sec.136 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,699,000))
$2,705,000

Sec. 137 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,552,000))
$3,475,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the commission
is authorized to increase licensing fees by up to five percent in
fiscal year 2014 and up to five percent in fiscal year 2015; and
background check fees by up to one dollar in fiscal year 2014, and up
to one dollar in fiscal year 2015.

Sec. 138 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,654,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,628,000))
$5,878,000
Building Code Council Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,227,000))
$1,228,000
Enterprise Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,509,000))
$20,222,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,286,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and
services charges, utilities and contracts charges, public and historic
facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the
senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, and joint
legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges
attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The
department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies
to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and
capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the
delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies
named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights
of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically
established.
(2) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.
(3) The building code council account appropriation is provided
solely for the operation of the state building code council as required
by statute and modified by the standards established by executive order
10-06. The council shall not consider any proposed code amendment or
take any other action not authorized by statute or in compliance with
the standards established in executive order 10-06. No member of the
council may receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement for
activities other than physical attendance at those meetings of the
state building code council or the council's designated committees, at
which the opportunity for public comment is provided generally and on
all agenda items upon which the council proposes to take action. The
building code council shall comply with chapter 19.85 RCW, known as the
regulatory fairness act, by including with all proposed substantial
code amendments an analysis addressing cost effectiveness, net
benefits, payback periods, and life-cycle costs.
(((5))) (4) The department of enterprise services shall purchase
flags needed for ceremonial occasions on the capitol campus in order to
fully represent the countries that have an international consulate in
Washington state.
(((6))) (5) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have written
approval from the director of the department of enterprise services.
(((7))) (6) $2,400,000 of the ((data processing revolving account))
enterprise services account--state appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of a pilot program to implement a strategy and
action plan to modernize the state's enterprise financial and
administrative systems. The department, the office of financial
management, and the office of the chief information officer, will lead
the planning effort and establish advisory committees composed of key
stakeholders. The plan will include an assessment of the readiness of
state government to conduct a business transformation and system
replacement project of this scale. The plan shall incorporate the
objectives of lean management and should include recommendations on:
Project scope, phasing and timeline, expected outcomes and measures of
success, product strategy, budget and financing strategy options, risk
mitigation, staffing and organization, and strategies to close
readiness gaps. The department shall submit the implementation plan to
the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15, ((2013)) 2014.
The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(((8) $8,013,000)) (7) $7,062,000 of the data processing revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of a pilot program to implement a time, leave, and attendance
enterprise system. The amounts provided in this subsection are
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer.
(((9))) (8) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the
department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's
business enterprises in equal monthly installments $2,039,000 in fiscal
year 2014 and $2,038,000 in fiscal year 2015.
(((10))) (9) The legislature intends to review for purchase parcel
number one and surrounding property on McNeil Island. The department
shall coordinate with the federal government to obtain an appraisal
determining the fair market value and shall provide an estimate to the
legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2013.
(10) Appropriations to state agencies in this act have been reduced
to reflect the following changes and reductions in services provided by
the department. The department shall revise its central services rates
charged to state agencies to implement these changes in services and
policy: Small agency client services shall be transferred to the
office of financial management on July 1, 2014; small agency human
resources services shall cease on July 1, 2014; the personnel services
fee shall be reduced fifty percent; costs for the print and imaging
program shall be fully recovered through rates charged to state
agencies and other government and nonprofit entities for this service;
and the enterprise services rate shall be reduced to remove the portion
of the rate subsidizing the operations of the print and imaging
program.
(11) Through a competitive process, the department, in consultation
with the office of the chief information officer, must contract with an
entity with significant experience in web portals and e-government
services to provide state agencies with services to include, but not be
limited to, development and management of the state's web portal
(access Washington); development of a state one-stop business portal;
facilitating financial transactions and processing; application
development, hosting and support; and integration services with
existing state agency application systems.
(12) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the incremental costs of purchasing
electricity for use in state government operations from alternative
power sources consisting of high-efficiency co-generation from woody
biomass that is at least sixty-five percent energy efficient based upon
low heat value, coal transition power, and solar energy facilities.
The department shall solicit proposals from local electric utilities
that currently serve state operations, and develop long-term power
purchase contracts that provide alternative power from in-state
generation facilities. For fiscal year 2015, the targets for state
power purchases from in-state alternative power sources are five
average megawatts from high-efficiency co-generation from woody
biomass, fifty average megawatts from coal transition power, and one
average megawatt from solar energy.

Sec. 139 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,044,000))
$967,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the
department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The health care authority and the department are authorized
to develop an integrated health care program designed to slow the
progression of illness and disability and better manage medicaid
expenditures for the aged and disabled population. Under the
Washington medicaid integration partnership (WMIP) and the medicare
integrated care project (MICP), the health care authority and the
department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds appropriated
under sections 204, 206, 208, and 213 of this act as may be necessary
to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP and the MICP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county during the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The amount of funding assigned from each
program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act
for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the
health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients
enrolled. In implementing the WMIP and the MICP, the health care
authority and the department may: (i) Withhold from calculations of
"available resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the
capitated rate for enrolled individuals; and (ii) employ capitation
financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health
care service contractors licensed by the office of the insurance
commissioner and qualified to participate in both the medicaid and
medicare programs.
(b) If Washington has been selected to participate in phase two of
the federal demonstration project for persons dually-eligible for both
medicare and medicaid, the department and the authority may initiate
the MICP. Participation in the project shall be limited to persons who
are eligible for both medicare and medicaid and to counties in which
the county legislative authority has agreed to the terms and conditions
under which it will operate. The purpose of the project shall be to
demonstrate and evaluate ways to improve care while reducing state
expenditures for persons enrolled both in medicare and medicaid. To
that end, prior to initiating the project, the department and the
authority shall assure that state expenditures shall be no greater on
either a per person or total basis than the state would otherwise
incur. Individuals who are solely eligible for medicaid may also
participate if their participation is agreed to by the health care
authority, the department, and the county legislative authority.
(4) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(5) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the
same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for
social services appointments as the one established for medical
appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting directly
with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the
department shall only contract with language access providers who are
working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or
state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available,
the department may use a language access provider who meets other
certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states.
(6) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid
expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services
from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the
department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide
referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that
will be ineligible for the medicaid expansion but are enrolled in
coverage that will be eliminated in the transition to the medicaid
expansion.
(7)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2014, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2014 among programs
after approval by the director of financial management. However, the
department may not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for
a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2014
caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care,
foster care, adoptions support, medicaid personal care, and child
support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not
transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

Sec. 202 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($296,676,000))
$297,533,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($297,641,000))
$299,549,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($489,939,000))
$496,606,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,354,000
Home Security Fund Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,741,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000
Child and Family Reinvestment Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,491,000))
$2,648,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,104,082,000))
$1,108,671,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(2) $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive,
or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children
from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and
adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department
shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.
(3) $538,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $539,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, $656,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation,
and $253,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for children's administration to contract with an educational
advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach.
The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during
the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be
prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or
regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested
educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize
private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.
(4) $10,741,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to
RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220. The department shall contract and
collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the
availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure
crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies
and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of
these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure
facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as
specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW. The reductions to
appropriations in this subsection related to semi-secure crisis
residential centers reflect a reduction to the number of beds for semi-secure crisis residential centers and not a reduction in rates. Any
secure crisis residential center or semi-secure crisis residential
center bed reduction shall not be based solely upon bed utilization.
The department is to exercise its discretion in reducing the number of
beds but to do so in a manner that maintains availability and
geographic representation of semi-secure and secure crisis residential
centers.
(5) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a community-based organization
that has innovated, developed, and replicated a foster care delivery
model that includes a licensed hub home. The community-based
organization will provide training and technical assistance to the
children's administration to develop five hub home models in region 2
that will improve child outcomes, support foster parents, and encourage
the least restrictive community placements for children.
(6) $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $31,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1566 (youth in out-of-home care). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $2,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $28,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1774 (child welfare system). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $1,698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $2,788,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and (($1,894,000)) $2,053,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5405 (extended foster
care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $109,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade
mountains.
(10)(a) $446,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $446,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a contract with a
nongovernmental entity or entities to establish one demonstration site
in a school district or group of school districts in western
Washington.
(b) The children's administration and the nongovernmental entity or
entities shall collaboratively select the demonstration site. The
demonstration site should be a school district or group of school
districts with a significant number of students who are dependent
pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.
(c) The demonstration site established under this subsection must
be selected by September 1, 2013.
(d) The purpose of the demonstration site is to improve the
educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter
13.34 RCW by providing individualized education services and monitoring
and supporting dependent youths' completion of educational milestones,
remediation needs, and special education needs.
(e) The demonstration site established under this subsection must
facilitate the educational progress and graduation of dependent youth.
The contract must be performance-based with a stated goal of improving
the graduation rates of foster youth by two percent per year over five
school year periods, starting with the 2014-15 school year and ending
with the 2019-20 school year. The demonstration site must develop and
provide services aimed at improving the educational outcomes of foster
youth. These services must include:
(i) Direct advocacy for foster youth to eliminate barriers to
educational access and success;
(ii) Consultation with department of social and health services
case workers to develop educational plans for and with participating
youth;
(iii) Monitoring education progress of participating youth;
(iv) Providing participating youth with school and local resources
that may assist in educational access and success; and
(v) Coaching youth, caregivers, and social workers to advocate for
dependent youth in the educational system.
(f) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities must report
demonstration site outcomes to the department of social and health
services and the office of public instruction by June 30, 2014, for the
2013-14 school year, and by June 30, 2015, for the 2014-15 school year.
(g) The children's administration must proactively refer all
students fifteen years or older, within the demonstration site area, to
the selected nongovernmental entity for educational services.
(h) The children's administration must report quarterly to the
legislature on the number of eligible youth and number of youth
referred for services beginning at the close of the second quarter of
fiscal year 2014 and through the final quarter of fiscal year 2015.
(i) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities shall report
to the legislature by June 30, 2015, on the effectiveness of the
demonstration site in increasing graduation rates for dependent youth.
(11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $256,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5315 (Powell fatality team). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for services provided through
children's advocacy centers.
(13)(a) $22,695,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $22,695,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015, and $28,450,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for services for children and
families. Prior to approval of contract services pursuant to RCW
74.13B.020, the amounts provided in this section shall be allotted on
a monthly basis and expenditures shall not exceed allotments based on
a three-month rolling average without approval of the office of
financial management following notification to the legislative fiscal
committees.
(b) The department shall provide these services to safely reduce
the number of children in out-of-home care, the time spent in out-of-home care prior to achieving permanency, and the number of children
returning to out-of-home care following permanency.
(14) $1,783,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, (($6,491,000)) $2,648,000 of the child and family
reinvestment account--state appropriation, and $8,274,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation, are provided solely for the
implementation and operations of the family assessment response
program.
(15) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for a rate add-on paid to residential
facilities providing behavioral rehabilitation service placements to
children or youth who have been assessed as needing mental health
services through the mental health division's children's long-term
inpatient program and are waiting for an available placement. In no
case shall the department decrease any rates paid to such residential
facilities as a result of this subsection.
(16) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for training, technical assistance, and
oversight for an open-source parenting program developed by a
university-based child welfare research entity. The amount provided in
this subsection may be expended only if private or local funds are
available to develop the parenting curriculum. The department shall
make the open-source parenting program developed under this subsection
available to parents and caregivers with an open child welfare case
beginning January 1, 2015.

Sec. 203 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,967,000))
$89,365,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,255,000))
$89,074,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,464,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,981,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Reinvesting in Youth--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($189,047,000))
$187,264,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs
with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The
administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and
therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in
a cost-effective manner.
(7)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer
a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated
juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants,
the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental
health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition
alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the
juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and
will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives
and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in
conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years
old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii)
twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv)
seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three
percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi)
two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional
alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition
alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but
allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding
for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the
block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when
approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile
courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee,
based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state
institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.
(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile
courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight
committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee
is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding
formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current
available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also
have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to
achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court
representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile
accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance
committee, the executive board of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court
research, and a representative of the superior court judges
association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration headquarters program oversight staff, two
representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional
office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation
administration division director. The committee may make changes to
the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and
disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will
increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based
program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit
savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered.
Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or
disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be
determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or
disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the
state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when
evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition
alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left
separate.
(c) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to
develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to
the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and
disposition alternatives.
(8) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and
provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and Washington state institute for public policy. The
agreements between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile
courts, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be
executed to ensure that the juvenile rehabilitation administration
receives the data that the juvenile rehabilitation administration
identifies as needed to comply with this subsection. This includes,
but is not limited to, information by program at the statewide
aggregate level, individual court level, and individual client level
for the purpose of the juvenile rehabilitation administration providing
quality assurance and oversight for the locally committed youth block
grant and associated funds and at times as specified by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration as necessary to carry out these
functions. The data shall be provided in a manner that reflects the
collaborative work the juvenile rehabilitation administration and
juvenile courts have developed regarding program outcomes that
reinforce the greatest cost benefit to the state in the implementation
of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.
(9) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project.
(10) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant program focused on
criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The Washington state
partnership council on juvenile justice may award grants under this
subsection. The council shall give priority to applicants who have
demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs.
Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental
entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that
have a documented history of creating and administering effective
criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for
funding under this subsection.

Sec. 204 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($327,467,000))
$328,527,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($308,723,000))
$323,230,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($561,394,000))
$665,324,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,864,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,215,448,000))
$1,334,945,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $104,999,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $85,895,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible,
levels of regional support network spending shall be maintained in the
following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community
inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal
care and emergency housing assistance. This is a reduction in flexible
nonmedicaid funding of $4,343,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $23,446,000
for fiscal year 2015. This reduction reflects offsets in state funding
related to services that will now be funded with federal dollars
through the affordable care act medicaid expansion. This reduction
shall be distributed as follows:
(i) The $4,343,000 reduction in fiscal year 2014 and $11,723,000 of
the reduction in fiscal year 2015 must be distributed among regional
support networks based on a formula that equally weights each regional
support networks proportion of individuals who become newly eligible
and enroll in medicaid under the expansion provisions of the affordable
care act in fiscal year 2014 and each regional support network's
spending of flexible nonmedicaid funding on services that would be
reimbursable for federal medicaid matching funds if provided to
medicaid enrollees in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.
(ii) The remaining $11,723,000 reduction in fiscal year 2015 must
be distributed among regional support networks based on each regional
support network's proportion of individuals who become newly eligible
and enroll in medicaid under the expansion provisions of the affordable
care act through fiscal year 2015.
(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $7,620,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In
determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided
to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall
consider the differences between regional support networks in the
percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that
are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional
support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are
higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section
to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under
section 204(1)(a) of this act. The department and regional support
networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the
PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this
section.
(c) $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $1,300,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional
support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based
services for persons who require the level of care previously provided
by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state
hospital.
(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 557 per day.
(e) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(f) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(g) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(h) $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall assess
the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern
state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and
modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(i) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(j) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn
additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate
does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate
range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide
medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients.
Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state
funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn
additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application
of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of
crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and
outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for
medicaid.
(k) $3,436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,291,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(l) $523,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $854,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of sections 3 through 5 of chapter
289, Laws of 2013 (E2SHB 1114). Regional support networks must use
this funding for the development of intensive community programs that
allow individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state
hospitals in accordance with plans approved by the department.
(m) $5,986,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $11,592,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $10,160,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 335,
Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5480). Regional support networks must use this
funding for the development of intensive community programs that allow
individuals to be diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals in
accordance with plans approved by the department.
(n) Due to recent approval of federal medicaid matching funds for
the disability lifeline and the alcohol and drug abuse treatment
support act programs, the department shall charge regional support
networks for only the state share rather than the total cost of
community psychiatric hospitalization for persons enrolled in those
programs.
(o) The legislature finds that the circumstances of the Chelan-Douglas regional support network (CD-RSN) make it necessary for CD-RSN
to undergo restructuring in order to provide mental health services
essential to the health and wellness of the citizens within its service
area. The legislature intends to provide additional temporary
financial relief to the CD-RSN while it undergoes internal
restructuring or negotiates a merger with another regional support
network.
The department shall negotiate relief for outstanding fiscal year
2013 reimbursements owed by CD-RSN to the state provided that the CD-RSN has a plan in place that is approved by the department by August 1,
2013, that demonstrates how CD-RSN will maintain financial viability
and stability or will merge with another regional support network.
For the period of July 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013, the
department may alter collection of reimbursement from CD-RSN for
overuse of state hospital beds. To receive a reduction to the required
reimbursement for overuse of state hospital beds, CD-RSN must continue
to prioritize services that reduce its utilization and census at
eastern state hospital and be actively implementing an approved plan to
maintain financial viability or pursuing a future merger with another
regional support network. Up to $298,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is for the department to provide
payments to regional support networks in eastern Washington which have
used less than their allocated or contracted patient days of care at
the state hospital to replace the share of the reimbursements from CD-RSN that the regional support networks would have received under RCW
71.24.320.
(p) $266,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely to maintain services for the King county
regional support network as it works to transition services to settings
that are eligible for federal participation for individuals covered
under the medicaid program.
(q) $6,546,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and $6,546,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the purposes of implementing statewide wraparound
with intensive services for children pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6558 (children's mental health services). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection (q)
shall lapse.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($135,246,000))
$140,320,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($131,863,000))
$130,487,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,863,000))
$159,836,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,097,000))
$58,844,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($481,069,000))
$489,487,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to maintain staffed capacity to
serve an average daily census in forensic wards at western state
hospital of 270 patients per day.
(e) (($2,068,000)) $6,194,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $2,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $240,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the state
psychiatric hospitals to plan, procure, and implement the core elements
of an electronic medical record system that is compliant with the
international classification of diseases (ICD-10) by October 1, 2014.
These funds must only be used for an electronic medical record system
that meets federal criteria for electronic sharing of patient
information and clinical care summaries with doctors' offices,
hospitals, and health systems which use federally certified electronic
health record systems. The procurement and implementation shall be
conducted to allow for these services to be expanded to the department
of corrections. The amounts provided in this subsection are
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,609,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,610,000))
$449,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,286,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,505,000))
$8,344,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 ((and $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are)) is provided solely for children's evidence-based
mental health services.
(b) $446,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $446,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $178,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based
practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and
implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute
must work with the department to develop a plan to seek private,
federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state
general funds. The institute and the department must submit this plan
to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,287,000))
$5,567,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,777,000))
$6,337,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,711,000))
$8,466,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,277,000))
$20,872,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) In accordance with RCW 43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035,
the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in
fiscal years 2014 and 2015 to support the costs of the regulatory
program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates
for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the
department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to
those of the department, including but not limited to the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the
commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the
council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with
regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for
organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower
costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations
which are not accredited.
(b) $74,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $74,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $78,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of chapter 335, Laws of 2013 (ESSB
5480).
(c) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 284,
Laws of 2013 (ESSB 5551).
(d) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which
the public mental health managed care system will operate, the
department must seek to estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of
efficiently and effectively providing a comparable set of medically
necessary mental health benefits to persons of different acuity levels
regardless of where in the state they live. The department must report
to the office of financial management and to the relevant fiscal and
policy committees of the legislature on its proposed new mental health
managed care rate-setting approach by August 1, 2013, and again at
least sixty days prior to implementation of new capitation rates.
(e) $349,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $212,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $302,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of 2013 (ESHB 1519) and
chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).
(f) The department shall work cooperatively with the health care
authority to explore the feasibility of incentivizing small, rural
hospitals to convert, in part or fully, some of their beds to
psychiatric treatment beds. No later than December 31, 2014, the
department shall report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature on the feasibility of such conversion. The report shall
consider rate enhancements and the ability to claim federal medicaid
matching funds on converted beds.
(g) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $21,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided for implementation of section 9, chapter 197, Laws of 2013
(ESHB 1336). The department must utilize these funds for mental health
first aid training targeted at teachers and educational staff in
accordance with the training model developed by the department of
psychology in Melbourne, Australia.
(h) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for the department to continue to develop the child adolescent
needs and strengths assessment tool and build workforce capacity to
provide evidence based wraparound services for children, consistent
with the anticipated settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and
Porter.
(i) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6312 (behavioral health purchasing). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(j) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $675,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the purposes of implementing statewide wraparound
with intensive services for children pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6558 (children's mental health services). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection (j)
shall lapse.

Sec. 205 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($439,963,000))
$444,264,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($458,131,000))
$467,895,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($820,769,000))
$832,546,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,000))
$535,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,718,884,000))
$1,745,240,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and
43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility,
assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to
fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection,
and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the
department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall
include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the
license fee attributed to medicaid clients.
(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015. A processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living
facilities shall be increased to $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year
2014 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(c) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any
portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW
70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult
family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances,
such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full
payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship
to the applicant.
(d) $13,301,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $20,607,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $33,910,000 of the general fund federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
agreement reached between the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw through an interest arbitration
decision under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(((d))) (e) $6,244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $6,244,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are appropriated solely for the
individual and family support program. Within these amounts, the
department shall expand the current number of clients receiving
services and focus on extending services to individuals with
developmental disabilities who are not otherwise receiving paid
services from the department.
(f) (($1,547,000)) $774,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and (($4,790,000)) $2,395,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for a
payment system that satisfies medicaid requirements regarding time
reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts provided in this subsection
are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer.
(g) $1,707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $2,670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $4,376,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity
impacts of the service employees international union healthcare 775nw
arbitration award.
(h) The department is authorized to establish limited exemption
criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline phone is not
available to the employee.
(i) The department shall reimburse with the exceptional care rate
adult family homes that provided care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS
on or before January 1, 2000, and continue to provide care solely to
clients with HIV/AIDS. The department shall not reduce the exceptional
care rate from the rate paid on October 1, 2013.
(j) $136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and $559,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the purposes of converting individual and family
services to a medicaid program and expanding caseloads for individuals
with developmental disabilities pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No.
6387 (developmental disabilities services). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection (j) shall
lapse.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,261,000))
$85,892,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,980,000))
$85,865,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($160,021,000))
$161,677,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,041,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($353,303,000))
$356,475,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with
the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide
transportation, building space, and other support services as are
reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students
living in residential habilitation centers.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,943,000))
$1,972,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,993,000))
$2,090,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,957,000))
$2,108,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,893,000))
$6,170,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $68,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 and $46,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of designing
and implementing the community first choice option benefit pursuant to
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6387 (developmental disabilities services).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse. It is the intent of the legislature to
use all new revenue from the community first choice option to make
needed investments in home and community based services for seniors and
people with developmental disabilities. These investments should
include supports for individuals with developmental disabilities on a
wait list, investing in home care hours, and expanding the family
caregiver support program. It is the intent of the legislature to
appropriate all the net revenue from the community first choice option
to investment in home and community based service in the 2015-2017
fiscal biennium.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 206 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($869,628,000))
$860,070,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($923,218,000))
$914,745,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,934,089,000))
$1,889,623,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,122,000))
$33,471,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,393,000
Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,000,000))
$110,479,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,848,450,000))
$3,811,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $171.35 for
fiscal year 2014 and shall not exceed (($171.58)) $178.82 for fiscal
year 2015, including the rate add-ons described in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. However, if the waiver requested from the federal centers
for medicare and medicaid services in relation to the safety net
assessment is for any reason disapproved, the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate shall not exceed $162.43 for fiscal year 2014 and
shall not exceed $163.58 for fiscal year 2015. There will be no
adjustments for economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2014 and
2015. The economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in
the biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other
biennial appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate
allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no
economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined
in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act
shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations
established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.
(a) For fiscal year 2014 within the funds provided, the department
shall continue to provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per
facility not to exceed $1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase
wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or
to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers,
laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose statewide average
dollars-per-hour wage was less than $15 in calendar year 2008,
according to cost report data. For fiscal year 2015 within funds
provided, the department shall continue to provide an add-on per
medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed $3.15. The add-on
shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for
certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary
aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker
whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $17 in
calendar year 2012, according to cost report data. The add-on may also
be used to address resulting wage compression for related job classes
immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage workers. The
department shall continue reporting requirements and a settlement
process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection.
(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2013, using the payment
methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus
appropriations act, excluding the low wage worker add-on, the direct
care add-on found in subsection (1)(g) of this section, the comparative
add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, to the facility-based payment rates in effect June 30, 2010. If the facility-based
payment rate calculated on July 1, 2013, is smaller than the facility-
based payment rate on June 30, 2010, then the difference shall be
provided to the individual nursing facilities as an add-on payment per
medicaid resident day.
(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW
and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the low wage
worker add-on, the direct care add-on found in subsection (1)(g) of
this section, the comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net
reimbursement, is greater than the direct care rate in effect on June
30, 2010, then the facility shall receive a ten percent direct care
rate add-on to compensate that facility for taking on more acute
clients than they have in the past.
(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to
reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety
net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual
statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.
(e) The rate add-on provided in (c) of this subsection is subject
to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW
74.46.022(6).
(f) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment is for
any reason disapproved, (b), (c), ((and)) (d), and (g) of this
subsection do not apply.
(g) For fiscal year 2015, the department shall provide a direct
care rate add-on applied evenly cross all nursing facilities of no more
than six percent of the direct care payment rate calculated according
to chapter 74.46 RCW. This subsection (g) is not subject to the
reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).
(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2014 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2015 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital
improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of
capital authorization for fiscal years 2014 and 2015.
(3) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and
43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility,
assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to
fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection,
and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the
department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall
include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the
license fee attributed to medicaid clients.
(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015. A processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living
facilities shall be increased to $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year
2014 and $106 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2014 and
$359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2015.
(4) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any
portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW
70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult
family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances,
such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full
payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship
to the applicant.
(5) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients
residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less
restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the
client's care needs.
(((5))) (6) $30,640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014, $48,633,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $79,273,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation
of the agreement reached between the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw through an interest arbitration
decision under the provisions of chapters 74.39A and 41.56 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(((6))) (7) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for operation of
the volunteer services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards
serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to
include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.
(((7) $4,894,000)) (8) $2,447,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and (($15,150,000)) $7,575,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for a
payment system that satisfies medicaid requirements regarding time
reporting for W-2 providers. The amounts provided in this subsection
are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer.
(((8))) (9) The department is authorized to establish limited
exemption criteria in rule to address RCW 74.39A.325 when a landline
phone is not available to the employee.
(((9))) (10) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, in a
report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature that
must be submitted by December 1, 2013, the department of social and
health services must describe the process for establishing medicaid
rates for assisted living and adult family homes. The report must
include information about licensing and physical plant standards,
contracting provisions, and per capita and biennial expenditures for
assisted living and adult family homes.
(((10))) (11) $10,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014, $17,768,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $28,567,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency
parity impacts of the service employees international union healthcare
775nw arbitration award.
(((11))) (12) $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $50,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for staffing and other expenses
associated with the work of the joint legislative executive committee
on planning for aging and disability issues that is established by this
subsection.
(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability
is established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest
caucuses each appointing two members. Four members of the house of
representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each
appointing two members;
(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the
governor;
(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or his or her designee;
(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her
designee; and
(v) The director of the department of retirement systems or his or
her designee.
(b) The committee must convene by September 1, 2013. At the first
meeting, the committee will select cochairs from among its members who
are legislators. All meetings of the committee are open to the public.
(c) The purpose of the committee is to identify key strategic
actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington,
including state budget and policy options, by conducting at least, but
not limited to, the following tasks:
(i) Establish a profile of Washington's current population of older
people and people with disabilities and a projection of population
growth through 2030;
(ii) Establish an inventory of services and supports currently
available to older people and people with disabilities from the health
care and long-term services and support systems and other community
resources such as housing, transportation, income support, and
protection for vulnerable adults;
(iii) Identify state budget and policy options to more effectively
use state, federal and private resources to, over time, reduce the
growth rate in state expenditures that would otherwise occur by
continuing current policy in light of significant population growth;
(iv) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of
an aging population and people with disabilities, and promote healthy
living;
(v) Identify policy options to create financing mechanisms for
long-term services and supports that will promote additional private
responsibility for individuals and families to meet their needs for
service;
(vi) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement,
support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the
availability of workplace retirement savings plans; and
(vii) Identify policy options to help communities adapt to the
aging demographic in planning for housing, land use and transportation.
(d) The committee shall consult with the office of the insurance
commissioner, the caseload forecast council, health care authority, and
other appropriate entities with specialized knowledge of the needs and
growth trends of the aging population and people with disabilities.
(e) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office
of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial
management, and the department of social and health services.
(f) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be
paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of
financial management. Joint committee expenditures are subject to
approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the
house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor
committees. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel
expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter
44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive
compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.
(g) The committee shall issue an interim report to the legislature
by December 10, 2013, and issue final recommendations to the governor
and relevant standing committees of the legislature by December 10,
2014.
(((12))) (13) $240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $1,342,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015, and $1,468,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of
2013 (ESHB 1519) and chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).
(((13))) (14) The department shall review the capital add-on rate
established by RCW 74.39A.320 for effectiveness in incentivizing
assisted living facilities to serve Medicaid eligible clients. Upon
completing its review, the department shall submit its findings along
with recommendations for alternatives to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1,
2013. The department is encouraged to engage stakeholders in
developing alternatives.
(((14))) (15) $239,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $398,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 300, Laws of
2013 (SSB 5630).
(16) $5,094,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for services and support to individuals
who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.
(17) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the department to contract with area
agencies on aging to convene a work group to include first responders
and companies providing life alert or other emergency alert services
and to develop a proposal on how vulnerable adults who have life alert
services might be made known to first responders in the event of a
long-term power or telecommunications outage. The work group shall
review methods for information sharing to include:
(a) Protocols and conditions in which information would be shared;
(b) A process whereby vulnerable life alert and emergency alert
customers may provide permission for their information to be shared in
the event of an emergency;
(c) Privacy protections for participants in the program; and
(d) Liability protections for agencies that collect, maintain, and
track information.
The work group shall develop recommendations and provide them to the
office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative
committees by November 15, 2014.
(18) Within existing appropriations, the department is authorized
to implement the fully capitated demonstration project for individuals
who are dually eligible for medicare and medicaid. Savings realized
from this implementation may be used to offset any general fund--state
costs incurred by the department.
(19) $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and $175,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the purposes of designing and implementing the
community first choice option benefit pursuant to Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6387 (developmental disabilities services). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse. It is the intent of the legislature to use all new
revenue from the community first choice option to make needed
investments in home and community based services for seniors and people
with developmental disabilities. These investments should include
supports for individuals with developmental disabilities on a wait
list, investing in home care hours, and expanding the family caregiver
support program. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate
all the net revenue from the community first choice option to
investment in home and community based service in the 2015-2017 fiscal
biennium.
(20) The department shall reimburse with the exceptional care rate
adult family homes that provided care solely to clients with HIV/AIDS
on or before January 1, 2000, and continue to provide care solely to
clients with HIV/AIDS. The department shall not reduce the exceptional
care rate from the rate paid on October 1, 2013.

Sec. 207 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($402,504,000))
$363,084,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($405,019,000))
$369,714,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,211,774,000))
$1,233,115,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,594,000))
$36,450,000
Administration Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,049,891,000))
$2,007,363,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) (($178,757,000)) $136,955,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($172,999,000)) $137,766,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $5,000,000
of the administrative contingency account--state appropriation, and
(($732,881,000)) $756,523,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families
eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department
must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent
tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units
and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units.
The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash
assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the
program. Within these budget units, the department must develop
program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and
track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to
the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature prior to adopting the new structure. The
secretary of the department of social and health services, working with
WorkFirst partner agencies and in collaboration with the WorkFirst
oversight task force, shall develop a plan for maximizing the following
outcomes and shall report back to the legislature by November 1, 2013.
The outcomes to be measured are: (i) Increased employment; (ii)
completion of education or post-secondary training; (iii) completion of
barrier removal activity including drug and alcohol or mental health
treatment; (iv) housing stability; (v) child care or education
stability for the children of temporary assistance for needy families
recipients; (vi) reduced rate of return after exit from the WorkFirst
program; and (vii) work participation requirements.
(b) (($406,818,000)) $372,704,000 of the amounts in (a) of this
subsection are provided solely for assistance to clients, including
grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency
assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW
74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to
working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy
families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.
(c) (($168,019,000)) $167,808,000 of the amounts in (a) of this
subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst job search, education and
training activities, barrier removal services, limited English
proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The
department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost
effectiveness measures.
(d) (($367,676,000)) $352,085,000 of the amounts in (a) of this
subsection are provided solely for the working connections child care
program under RCW 43.215.135. The amounts provided in this subsection
(d) are provided conditioned on the department of social and health
services and the department of early learning taking additional actions
to identify and reduce the backlog of overpayment cases related to
public assistance programs, including the working connections child
care program. The departments shall collaborate and create a plan to
triage overpayment cases in a manner that identifies and prioritizes
cases with large overpayments and likelihood of fraudulent activity.
The departments shall provide a quarterly report to the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the specific
actions taken as a result of this subsection (d). The department of
social and health services shall also establish an interagency
agreement with the state auditor's office to conduct an independent
performance audit of the office of fraud and accountability recovery.
The audit shall include an analysis of the data reporting elements used
by the office, current methods for determining the closing of cases,
workload allocation, and issues associated with coordination between
the two departments. $300,000 of the amount provided in this
subsection (d) is provided solely for this performance audit.
(e) (($142,124,000)) $142,974,000 of the amounts in (a) of this
subsection are provided solely for WorkFirst and working connections
child care administration and overhead.
(f) The amounts in (b) through (((d))) (e) of this subsection shall
be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified. However,
the department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between (b)
through (((d))) (e) of this subsection, but only if the funding is
available or necessary to transfer solely due to utilization, caseload
changes, or underperformance in terms of client outcomes. The
department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the
office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative
committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task
force. The approval of the director of financial management is
required prior to any transfer under this subsection.
(2) $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(3) $2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and
immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department
to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and
$2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2015 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and
immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department
to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(4) On December 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the department
must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for
both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during
the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service
type and funding source. The report must also include the number of
clients served and outcome data for the clients.
(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit
under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to
be seventy-five percent of the federal supplemental nutrition
assistance program benefit amount.
(6) $18,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of section 1, chapter
337, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5595).
(7) $4,729,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $4,729,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of the
telephone assistance program and the Washington information network 211
organization pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1971 (communication
services). Of these funds, $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
operational support of the Washington information network 211
organization. If Substitute House Bill No. 1971 (communication
services) is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) The department shall review clients receiving services through
the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether
they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens,
and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income
benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization
funding through the department.
(9) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with
the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral
of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement
must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in
selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties
to facilitate applications for veterans' services.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and (($1,500,000)) $650,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2069 (safety net benefits).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 208 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,650,000))
$73,008,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,855,000))
$63,616,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($277,248,000))
$279,242,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,554,000))
$16,316,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,568,000))
$14,285,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($441,325,000))
$447,917,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or
other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for
pregnant, post-partum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a)
Service and other outcome data must be provided to the department by
request; (b) program modifications needed to maximize access to federal
medicaid matching funds will be phased in over the course of the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium; and (c) indirect charges for administering the
program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible, pregnant and parenting women, disability
lifeline, and alcoholism and drug addiction treatment and support act,
and medical care services clients.
(3) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of
treatment programs in fiscal years 2014 and 2015 as necessary to
support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee
schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of
accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to
have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department,
including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To
reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited
programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of
accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these
programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.
(4) $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation (from the
substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is
provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and
alcohol use prevention programs.
(5) $2,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the department to transition 128 beds
from settings that are considered institutions for mental diseases to
facilities with no more than 16 beds that are able to claim federal
match for services provided to medicaid clients or individuals covered
under the department's section 1115 medicaid waiver. The department
may conduct a request for proposal process to fulfill this requirement
and adopt rates that are comparable to the pilot projects implemented
in the 2011-13 fiscal biennium. The department may use these funds to
assist with the costs of providers in setting up or converting to 16-bed facilities. This funding may also be used for providers that are
developing new capacity for clients who will become eligible for
services under the affordable care act medicaid expansion. The number
of beds available for pregnant and parenting women must not be reduced.
(6) (($283,000 of the criminal justice treatment account
appropriation is provided solely for transitional funding for the
family drug court in Pierce county.)) $141,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $142,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
transitional funding for the family drug court in Pierce county.
(7) Within existing appropriations, the department shall prioritize
the prevention and treatment of intravenous, opiate-based drug use.
(8) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely to expand access to a program located in
a county with a population over 700,000 that provides case management
and coordinating services for low-income women who are pregnant or
parenting and have a suspected history of alcohol or drug abuse.

Sec. 209 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,478,000))
$16,523,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,459,000))
$11,410,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,413,000))
$99,397,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,350,000))
$127,330,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $5,006,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 ((and $5,094,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are)) is provided solely
for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing,
or deaf-blind.

Sec. 210 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,420,000))
$37,738,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,813,000))
$37,115,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,233,000))
$74,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of social and health services shall transfer the
stewardship of McNeil Island to the department of corrections
industries program, effective September 1, 2013. The transferred
responsibilities shall include marine operations, waste water
treatment, water treatment, road maintenance, and any other general
island maintenance that is not site specific to the operations of the
special commitment center or the Pierce county secure community
transition facility. Facility maintenance within the perimeter of the
special commitment center shall remain the responsibility of the
department of social and health services. Capital repairs and
maintenance necessary to maintain the special commitment center on
McNeil Island shall be managed by the department of social and health
services. The legislature directs both departments to enter into an
interagency agreement by August 1, 2013. The office of financial
management shall oversee the negotiations of the interagency agreement.
The interagency agreement must describe equipment that will transfer
between the departments, warehouse space that will be shared by the
departments, and occupancy requirements for any shops outside the
perimeter of the special commitment center. The office of financial
management will make the final determination on any disagreements
between the departments on the details of the interagency agreement.
(2) (($3,120,000)) $3,042,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($3,120,000)) $3,024,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided
solely for operational costs specific to island operations of the
special commitment center and the Pierce county secure community
transition facility. The department shall establish an accounting
structure that enables it to track and report on costs specific to
island operations.
(3) By November 1, 2014, the department of social and health
services shall provide a report to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature
that evaluates the department's expenditures for certain medical and
pharmacy costs for its residents within the special commitment center.
The department, as part of its evaluation, shall consult with the
health care authority, the health benefits exchange, and the department
of corrections. At a minimum, the report must look at the following
items:
(a) Obtaining medicaid eligibility for residents;
(b) Feasibility of obtaining insurance for residents through the
health benefit exchange;
(c) Utilizing multi-state consortiums for the purchase of
pharmaceuticals to reduce costs; and
(d) Consolidating contracts for medical inpatient and outpatient
services with western state hospital.
(4) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to
the department of corrections industries program under this subsection,
are transferred to the department of corrections.
(((4))) (5) All classified employees of the department of social
and health services assigned to the department of corrections under
this subsection whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit
description at the department of corrections shall become a part of the
existing bargaining unit at the department of corrections and shall be
considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

Sec. 211 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,127,000))
$29,732,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,333,000))
$29,649,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,150,000))
$37,291,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,264,000))
$97,326,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $228,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $335,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement chapter 320, Laws of 2013 (ESHB 1519) and
chapter 338, Laws of 2013 (2SSB 5732).
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve
at-risk youth.
(3) $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $28,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop a report on state efforts to prevent and
control diabetes. The department, the health care authority, and the
department of health shall submit a coordinated report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014,
on the following:
(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and
undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs
administered by each agency and individuals, including children with
mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those
programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of
lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or
covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of
lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members
impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by
each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its
complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the
complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other
chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact
diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and
the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs;
(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing
programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and
preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount
and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and
activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;
(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on
managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its
complications;
(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action
plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for
consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations
must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes,
prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also
identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the
following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling
and preventing all types of diabetes; and
(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary
savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget
recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (5).

Sec. 212 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,470,000))
$62,740,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,511,000))
$63,506,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,264,000))
$56,784,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($176,245,000))
$183,030,000

Sec. 213 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,131,026,000))
$2,143,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,114,731,000))
$2,158,260,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,245,749,000))
$7,885,470,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,780,000))
$56,409,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,082,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $669,381,000
Health Benefit Exchange Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,277,000))
$16,589,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,809,000))
$35,137,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,206,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,307,569,000))
$13,001,531,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($1,143,994,000)) $1,900,484,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation is provided solely to implement the medicaid expansion as
defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII),
subject to the conditions and limitations in this subsection. If the
federal medical assistance percentage for the medicaid expansion falls
below the percentages in section 1905(y) of the social security act as
of July 1, 2013, the authority shall ensure that the state does not
incur any additional state costs above what would have been incurred
had the federal medical assistance percentages remained at the
percentages in section 1905(y) as of July 1, 2013. The director is
authorized to make any necessary program adjustments to comply with
this requirement, including adding or adjusting premiums, modifying
benefits, or reducing optional programs. To the extent a waiver is
needed to accomplish this, the director shall promptly apply for such
waiver. If a necessary waiver is not approved, the medicaid expansion
program shall be terminated upon appropriate notification to the
legislature and enrollees.
(2) The requirements of this subsection apply to the basic health
plan. This subsection is null and void and has no further effect upon
implementation of the medicaid expansion under subsection (1) of this
section.
(a) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(b) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(c) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(d) Enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan shall be limited
to only include persons who qualify as subsidized enrollees as defined
in RCW 70.47.020 and who (a) qualify for services under 1115 medicaid
demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10; or (b) are foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations
in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(4) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the
medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health
care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction
of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so
that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation
authority.
(5) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard
recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other
assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.
(6) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(7) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care
authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she
would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the
extent necessary.
(8) $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $8,522,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share
hospital payments.
(9) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $800,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for disproportionate share hospital payments to rural
hospitals certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services
as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013, with less than one
hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011 that do not
participate in the certified public expenditures program.
(10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals in
Clallam county that were certified by the centers for medicare and
medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2013,
with less than one hundred fifty acute care licensed beds in fiscal
year 2011.
(11) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health
care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments
to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health
program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the
federal social security act due to their citizenship status.
(12) $6,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by
public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be
responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the
supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum
allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the
payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or
reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E
of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that
costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against
payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because
such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from
these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to
retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing
homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the
interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care
authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or
the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from
the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the
medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The
health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the
eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.
(13) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient
hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including
those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as
critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The
health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and
legislature by November 1, 2013, and by November 1, 2014, that evaluate
whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the
certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no
longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall
submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2014 and fiscal
year 2015, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the
reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with
policies approved in the 2013-2015 biennial operating appropriations
act and in effect on July 1, 2013, (b) one-half of the indigent
assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the
other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the
same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a
hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as
described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess
amounts to the state when requested. (($3,860,000)) $11,928,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and
(($1,137,000)) $14,821,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for state grants for the
participating hospitals.
(14) The health care authority shall seek public-private
partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to
provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the
federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(15) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity
support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to
higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm
or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a
cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe
mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco
use, or African American or Native American race. The health care
authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of
maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care
authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for
maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those
services.
(16) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $121,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $292,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1519
(service coordination organizations) and Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5732 (behavioral health services). If neither of the bills is
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(17) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $55,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop a report on state efforts to prevent and
control diabetes. The authority, the department of social and health
services, and the department of health shall submit a coordinated
report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2014, on the following:
(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and
undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs
administered by each agency and individuals, including children with
mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those
programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of
lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or
covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of
lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members
impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by
each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its
complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the
complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other
chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact
diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and
the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs;
(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing
programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and
preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount
and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and
activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;
(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on
managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its
complications;
(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action
plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for
consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations
must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes,
prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also
identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the
following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling
and preventing all types of diabetes; and
(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary
savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget
recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (17).
(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
shall identify strategies to improve patient adherence to treatment
plans for diabetes and implement these strategies as a pilot through
one health home program to be identified by the authority. The
authority shall report to the governor and the legislature in December
2014 on the progress of strategy implementation. The authority shall
report to the governor and legislature in December 2015 on patient
outcomes and cost savings derived from new adherence strategies in the
health home model and make recommendations for improving the
strategies.
(19) Effective January 1, 2014, managed care contracts must
incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and
improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each
patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline
health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and
outcome measures.
(20) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development of recommendations for funding
integrated school nursing and outreach services. The authority shall
collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to develop recommendations for increasing federal financial
participation for providing nursing services in schools with the goals
of integrating nursing and outreach services and supporting one nurse
for every four hundred fifty students in elementary schools and one
nurse for every seven hundred fifty students in secondary schools. In
developing these recommendations, the authority shall inquire with the
federal centers for medicare and medicaid services about state plan
amendment or waiver options for receiving additional federal matching
funds for school nursing services provided to children enrolled in
apple health for kids. The recommendations shall include proposals for
funding training and reimbursement for nurses that provide outreach
services to help eligible students enroll in apple health for kids and
other social services programs. The authority and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide these
recommendations to the governor and the legislature by December 1,
2013.
(21) $430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to complete grant requirements for the health
information exchange.
(22) $143,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account--state
appropriation and $423,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the rebasing of outpatient and inpatient
payment methods.
(23) $1,163,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account--state
appropriation and $9,710,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement the conversion to the tenth version of
the world health organization's international classification of
diseases.
(24) $111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $359,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to update the medicaid information technology
architecture state self-assessment and to develop the five year road
map for the medicaid information technology architecture architect.
(25) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $126,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to support the Robert Bree collaborative's efforts to
disseminate evidence-based best practices for preventing and treating
health problems.
(26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
shall increase reimbursement rates for primary care services provided
by independent nurse practitioners to medicare levels for the period
from July 1, 2013, to December 31, 2014.
(27) The authority shall seek a medicaid state plan amendment to
create a professional services supplemental payment managed care
program for professional services delivered to managed care recipients
by University of Washington medicine and other public professional
providers. This program shall be effective as soon as administratively
possible and shall operate concurrently with the existing professional
services supplemental payment program. The authority shall apply
federal rules for identifying the difference between average commercial
rates and fee-for-service medicaid payments. This difference will be
multiplied by the number of managed care encounters and incorporated
into the managed care plan capitation rates by a certified actuary.
The managed care plans will pay the providers the difference
attributable to the increased capitation rate. Participating providers
shall be solely responsible for providing the local funds required to
obtain federal matching funds. Any incremental costs incurred by the
authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this
program shall be the responsibility of the participating providers.
Participating providers shall retain the full amount of supplemental
payments provided under this program, net of any costs related to the
program that are disallowed due to audits or litigation against the
state.
(28) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
authority to provide an adult dental benefit beginning January 1, 2014.
(29) To the extent allowed under federal law, the authority shall
require an adult client to enroll in full medicaid coverage instead of
family planning-only coverage unless the client is at risk of domestic
violence.
(30) The authority shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid
expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services
from the authority and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the
authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health
services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange
for clients that will be ineligible for the medicaid expansion but are
enrolled in coverage that will be eliminated in the transition to the
medicaid expansion.
(31) $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $180,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a
toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in
the apple health for kids program.
(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
shall reduce premiums for children with family incomes above 200
percent of the federal poverty level in the state-funded children's
health program who are not eligible for coverage under the federal
children's health insurance program. Premiums in the state and federal
children's health insurance program shall be equal.
(33) The appropriations in this section reflect savings and
efficiencies by transferring children receiving medical care provided
through fee-for-service to medical care provided through managed care.
(34) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $170,561,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the provider incentive program and other
initiatives related to the health information technology medicaid plan.
(((37) $1,531,000)) (35) $1,528,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($280,000)) $2,206,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and
(($10,803,000)) $17,920,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement phase two of the project to create a
single provider payment system that consolidates medicaid medical and
social services payments and replaces the social service payment
system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
authority satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(((38))) (36) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority and the department of social and health services
shall implement the state option to provide health homes for enrollees
with chronic conditions under section 2703 of the federal affordable
care act. The total state match for enrollees who are dually-eligible
for both medicare and medicaid and not enrolled in managed care shall
be no more than the net savings to the state from the enhanced match
rate for its medicaid-only managed care enrollees under section 2703.
(((39))) (37) The health care authority shall not initiate any
services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless
expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care
authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the
federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health
care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys,
those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in
any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the
lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial
management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in
this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants
and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.
(((40))) (38) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by
naturopathic physicians.
(((41))) (39) Within amounts appropriated, the health care
authority shall conduct a review of its management and staffing
structure to identify efficiencies and opportunities to reduce full
time equivalent employees and other administrative costs. A report
summarizing the review and the authority's recommendations to reduce
costs and full time equivalent employees must be submitted to the
governor and legislature by November 1, 2013.
(((42) $17,279,000)) (40) $16,589,000 of the health benefit
exchange account--state appropriation and (($2,721,000)) $3,409,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to support
the operations of the Washington health benefit exchange from January
1, 2015, to June 30, 2015. The Washington state health insurance pool
administrator shall transfer $20,838,000 of pool contributions to the
treasurer for deposit into the health benefit exchange account in
calendar year 2014. Within the amounts provided in this subsection,
$341,000 of the health benefit exchange account--state appropriation
and $688,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for print services and postage for modified adjusted gross
income medicaid eligibility correspondence sent from the health benefit
exchange.
(((43))) (41) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
authority shall continue to provide coverage after December 31, 2013,
for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical
programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would
otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross
income eligibility standard.
(((44) Upon implementation of the medicaid expansion under
subsection (1) of this section, the breast and cervical cancer
treatment program is eliminated. To maintain continuity of coverage,
the authority shall offer the option to stay in a fee-for-service
program to clients that are already enrolled in the breast and cervical
cancer treatment program and will be transitioned into the new adult
group upon implementation of the medicaid expansion. The authority
will continue to provide coverage to clients that are already enrolled
in the breast and cervical cancer treatment program at the time of
program elimination until their courses of treatment are completed.
(45))) (42) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the authority to create a new position to
provide adequate oversight and assistance to managed care
organizations, rural health clinics, and federally qualified health
centers under a new administratively streamlined payment methodology.
Effective July 1, 2013, or upon obtaining any necessary federal
approval, but in no case during the first quarter of a calendar year,
the authority shall implement an administratively streamlined payment
methodology for federally qualified health centers and rural health
clinics. The authority's payments to managed care organizations shall
include the full encounter payment comprised of both the standard and
enhancement payments for federally qualified health centers and rural
health clinics as defined in the medicaid state plan and in accordance
with section 1902(bb) of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1396a(bb)).
At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any
claim to the supplemental payment portion of the rate which will be
reconciled to ensure accurate payment and full pass through of the
obligated funds. For any services eligible for encounter payments, as
defined in the medicaid state plan, managed care organizations shall be
required to pay at least the full published encounter rates directly to
each clinic or center, and payments will be reconciled on at least an
annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority,
with final review and approval by the authority. At the option of any
clinic, the enhancement payment can be received from the managed care
organization on a per member per month basis for all assigned managed
care enrollees in an amount prescribed by the authority. Nothing in
this section is intended to disrupt mutually agreeable contractual
arrangements between managed care organizations and clinics that impact
how the standard payment for services is paid. The authority will
require participating managed care organizations to reimburse federally
qualified health centers and rural health clinics for clean claims in
strict adherence to the timeliness of payment standards established
under contract and specified for the medicaid fee-for-service program
in section 1902(a)(37) of the social security act (42 U.S.C.
1396a(a)(37)), 42 C.F.R. Sec. 447.46, and specified for health carriers
in WAC 284-43-321. The authority shall exercise all necessary options
under its existing sanctions policy to enforce timely payment of
claims. The authority shall ensure necessary staff and resources are
identified to actively monitor and enforce the timeliness and accuracy
of payments to federally qualified health centers and rural health
clinics. By January 1, 2014, and after collaboration with federally
qualified health centers, rural health clinics, managed care plans, and
the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the authority will
produce a report that provides options for a new payment methodology
that rewards innovation and outcomes over volume of services delivered,
and which maintains the integrity of the rural health clinic and
federally qualified health center programs as outlined under federal
law. The report will detail necessary federal authority for
implementation and provide the benefits and drawbacks of each option.
(((46))) (43) $3,605,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely to proportionally reduce the
amounts that rural health clinics owe the state under the calendar year
2009 recoupment.
(((47))) (44) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section
to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles
vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment
benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in
the current medicaid benefit plan beginning January 1, 2014. ((The
authority shall monitor the costs of the habilitative benefit as part
of the forecasting process but shall not provide this benefit in the
current medicaid benefit plan without a direct appropriation in the
omnibus appropriations act)).
(((48))) (45) The appropriations in this section reflect savings
and efficiencies achieved by modifying dispensing methods of
contraceptive drugs. The authority must make arrangements for all
medicaid programs offered through managed care plans or fee-for-service
programs to require dispensing of contraceptive drugs with a one-year
supply provided at one time unless a patient requests a smaller supply
or the prescribing physician instructs that the patient must receive a
smaller supply. Contracts with managed care plans must allow on-site
dispensing of the prescribed contraceptive drugs at family planning
clinics. Dispensing practices must follow clinical guidelines for
appropriate prescribing and dispensing to ensure the health of the
patient while maximizing access to effective contraceptive drugs.
(((49))) (46)(a) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014 and $75,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for preparing options with an expert
consultant for possible implementation of a targeted premium assistance
program and possible implementation of the federal basic health option.
$75,000 of the amounts appropriated in this subsection is provided
solely for the development of options related to the targeted premium
assistance program. The authority shall develop options for a waiver
request to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services to
implement a targeted premium assistance program for the expansion
adults, identified in section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the social
security act, with incomes above one hundred percent of the federal
poverty level, and for children covered in the children's health
insurance program with incomes above two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level, with a goal of providing seamless coverage through the
health benefit exchange and improving opportunities for families to be
covered in the same health plans. The options must include the
possibility of applying premiums for individuals and cost-sharing that
may exceed the five percent of family income cap under federal law, and
the options must include recommendations to make the targeted premium
assistance program cost neutral. The authority shall submit a report
on the options to the legislature and the governor by January 1, 2014.
The authority is encouraged to be creative, use subject matter experts,
and exhaust all possible options to achieve cost neutrality. The
report shall also include a detailed plan and timeline. $75,000 of the
amounts appropriated in this subsection is provided solely for the
development of options related to the federal basic health option. The
authority shall prepare options for implementing the federal basic
health option as federal guidance becomes available. The authority
shall submit a report on the options to the legislature and the
governor by January 1, 2014, or ninety days following the release of
federal guidance. The report must include a comparison of the premiums
and cost-sharing under the federal basic health option with the premium
assistance options described in this subsection, options for
implementing the federal basic health option in combination with a
premium assistance program, a detailed fiscal analysis for each
coverage approach, including the estimated costs for system design and
implementation, and information about impacted populations.
(b) Where possible, the authority shall leverage the same expert
consultants to review each proposal and compare and contrast the
approaches to ensure seamless coordination with the health benefit
exchange.
(c) The authority shall collaborate with the joint select committee
on health care oversight in the development of these options.
(47) Moneys appropriated in this section shall not be used to pay
hospital owned physician practices or clinics a higher payment rate
than the maximum resource based relative value scale fee rate received
by non-hospital owned physician practices or clinics for the same
procedure.
(48) $390,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and $3,510,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for medicaid clients to select the medicaid managed
care organization of their choice within the Washington
healthplanfinder online marketplace.
(49) Within the amounts provided in this section, the authority
shall exercise the state option and open the medicaid breast and
cervical cancer treatment program.
(50) Within the amounts provided in this section, the authority
shall increase the use of value based contracting and other payment
incentives that promote quality, efficiency, cost savings, and health
improvement. The authority shall also implement additional chronic
disease management techniques that reduce the subsequent need for
hospitalization or readmissions. It is the intent of the legislature
that the reforms the authority implements under this subsection are
anticipated to reduce extraneous medical costs when fully phased in by
fiscal year 2017 and as a result achieve a twenty-five million dollar
general fund--state savings in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.
(51) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for a grant to the Yakima valley hearing
and speech center to serve low-income children.
(52) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority
must conduct an actuarial analysis of the differences in claim costs
and utilization of services by enrollees in consumer-directed health
plans offered by the public employees benefits board program as
compared to the claim costs and utilization of services by enrollees in
other state employee health plans. The analysis shall separately
identify the level of savings attributable to the benefit design and
cost-sharing of the consumer-directed health plans versus savings
attributable to differences in the health status of plan enrollees.
(53) $561,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, $2,000 of the general fund--local appropriation, and
$693,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely
for the authority to add autism screenings for children age eighteen
months beginning July 1, 2014.

Sec. 214 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,077,000))
$2,080,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,996,000))
$2,028,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,185,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,258,000))
$6,293,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $218,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation is provided for additional financial resources from the
U.S. department of housing and urban development for the investigation
of discrimination cases involving service animals.

Sec. 215 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,763,000))
$19,775,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,763,000))
$19,775,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,536,000))
$39,560,000

Sec. 216 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,257,000))
$14,522,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,159,000))
$14,859,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,059,000))
$4,351,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,680,000))
$42,937,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, are provided to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency
of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.
(2) $340,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy.
Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training
commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of
ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law
enforcement academy.
(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic
law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a school safety program. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(5) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the school safety center
within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information
dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school
district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities
relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency
agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and
maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training
program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school
safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related
programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law
enforcement and schools.
(6) $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the costs of providing
statewide advanced driving training with the use of a driving
simulator.
(7) $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for crisis intervention training
for peace officers. The commission shall incorporate eight hours of
crisis intervention curriculum into its basic law enforcement academy
and shall offer an eight-hour in-service crisis intervention training
course.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs to establish a grant program to assist local law
enforcement agencies in the support of special enforcement emphasis
targeting metal theft. Funding shall be utilized consistent with
chapter 36.28A RCW.
(9) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the commission to design and initiate,
in partnership with Seattle university criminal justice department, the
first year of a five-year study to research the effectiveness of its
crisis intervention training. By November 1, 2014, the commission
shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that sets
forth the proposed benchmarks and outcomes to be evaluated by the
study. The commission shall provide an annual report of its evaluation
to date by June 30th of each fiscal year during the study.
(10) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely to the commission to provide drug
enforcement and prosecution assistance to counties in the three
enforcement areas identified in chapter 339, Laws of 2006. Funding
shall be divided equally among the three enforcement areas and shall be
used to supplement other fund sources such as federal grant funds for
drug intervention and enforcement efforts. These enforcement areas are
encouraged to continue pursuing funds available through the United
States office of national drug control policy. The counties comprising
a specific area must coordinate with each other to establish and
implement a regional strategy to enforce illegal drug laws. The
commission must allocate the funds to the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs for administration. The Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys is responsible for administration of the funding
and programs for the prosecution of crimes and court proceedings. The
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs is responsible for
administering the funds provided for law enforcement.

Sec. 217 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,158,000))
$17,216,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,733,000))
$17,790,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,876,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $366,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,124,000))
$40,253,000
Farm Labor Contractor Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $903,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,252,000))
$7,230,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($258,440,000))
$260,307,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,626,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($278,697,000))
$280,366,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,732,000))
$1,746,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,193,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($651,667,000))
$659,439,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase elevator fees by up to 13.1 percent during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium. This increase is necessary to support expenditures
authorized in this section, consistent with chapter 70.87 RCW.
(2) $1,336,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5362
(workers' compensation/vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $279,000 of the public works administration account--state
appropriation, $4,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation,
and $4,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1420
(transportation improvement projects). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $104,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $104,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5123 (farm internships). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((6))) (5) $210,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation and $630,000 of the accident account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the contract costs and one staff position at
the department for the purpose of implementing the logging safety
initiative in an effort to reduce the frequency and severity of
injuries in manual, or nonmechanized, logging. The department shall
reduce $840,000 of workers compensation funding used for the safety and
health investment project to maintain cost neutrality. Additional
costs for the implementation of the logging safety initiative shall be
accomplished by the department within existing resources to include the
assignment of two full-time auditors specifically for this purpose.
The department is directed to include $420,000 of these costs in its
calculation of workers' compensation premiums for the forest products
industry for 2014, 2015, and 2016 rates. The department shall report
to the legislature by December 31, 2014, an approach for using a third
party safety certification vendor, accomplishments of the taskforce,
accomplishments on this effort to-date, and future plans. The report
must identify options for future funding and make recommendations for
permanent funding for this program.
(6) $1,459,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$1,459,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5112 (retrospective rating
plan). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $130,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$132,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5360 (unpaid
wage collection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $32,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$176,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5123 (farm
internship program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 218 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,996,000))
$1,995,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,900,000))
$1,899,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,906,000))
$3,904,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,340,000))
$5,337,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,316,000))
$5,311,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,455,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,418,000))
$4,541,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,104,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,633,000))
$19,852,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 ((and)), $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015, and $104,000 of the veterans innovations program
account--state appropriation are provided solely ((to provide)) for
crisis and emergency relief and education, training, and employment
assistance to veterans and their families in their communities through
the veterans innovation program.
(b) The department shall continue its work on developing a proposal
and securing federal and local support for a joint pilot program with
the U.S. department of defense that would increase data sharing between
the federal transition assistance program, the state, and local
agencies serving the communities that service members are transitioning
back into when they return from deployment. The department shall
prepare a detailed proposal for the 2015 legislative session that
includes, but is not limited to:
(i) The forecasted incremental increase in demand for veteran's
services in the state over time;
(ii) Some initial detail on the number and type of local agencies
that will be considered in the feasibility study;
(iii) Detail on the current information technology capability
within the department and among its partners;
(iv) A scope of work describing what the feasibility study is
expected to cover, to include proposed capabilities for the end
solution; and
(v) Options for how this data integration would be paid for both
long term and short term, including, but not limited to, potential
partnering with the U.S. department of defense or other entities.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,000))
$101,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000))
$17,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,981,000))
$69,332,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,355,000))
$25,403,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($108,458,000))
$94,853,000

Sec. 219 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,230,000))
$59,865,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,198,000))
$62,457,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($536,074,000))
$535,553,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,455,000))
$139,260,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,722,000))
$105,292,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,319,000))
$11,198,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,267,000))
$5,255,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,806,000))
$14,745,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,560,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,323,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,949,000))
$3,935,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,737,000))
$4,730,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Dedicated Marijuana Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,236,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $987,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($951,053,000))
$953,586,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The department of health shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless
expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of
health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or
amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities
until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the
legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of
the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The
department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the
federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those
moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any
other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of
any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management
shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this
subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and
other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.
(b) The joint administrative rules review committee shall review
the new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school
facilities under (a) of this subsection. The review committee shall
determine whether (i) the rules are within the intent of the
legislature as expressed by the statute that the rule implements, (ii)
the rule has been adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions
of law, or (iii) that the agency is using a policy or interpretive
statement in place of a rule. The rules review committee shall report
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature the
results of committee's review and any recommendations that the
committee deems advisable.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2014 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to
fees required for newborn screening, and fees associated with the
following professions: Agency affiliated counselors; certified
counselors; and certified advisors.
(3) $150,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide water filtration systems
for low-income households with individuals at high public health risk
from nitrate-contaminated wells in the lower Yakima basin.
(4)(a) $64,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to integrate the
prescription monitoring program into the coordinated care electronic
tracking program developed in response to section 213, chapter 7, Laws
of 2012, 2nd sp. sess., commonly referred to as the seven best
practices in emergency medicine.
(b) The integration must provide prescription monitoring program
data to emergency department personnel when the patient registers in
the emergency department. Such exchange may be a private or public
joint venture, including the use of the state health information
exchange.
(c) As part of the integration, the department shall request
insurers and third-party administrators that provide coverage to
residents of Washington state to provide the following to the
coordinated care electronic tracking program:
(i) Any available information regarding the assigned primary care
provider, and the primary care provider's telephone and fax numbers.
This information is to be used for real-time communication to an
emergency department provider when caring for a patient; and
(ii) Information regarding any available care plans or treatment
plans for patients with higher utilization of services on a regular
basis. This information is to be provided to the treating provider.
(5) (($270,000)) $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014 ((is)) and $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
Washington autism alliance to assist autistic individuals and families
with autistic children during the transition to federal health reform.
(6) $6,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2014 and $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 are provided solely for the department to convene a work
group to study and recommend language for standardized clinical
affiliation agreements for clinical placements associated with the
education and training of physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW,
osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW,
and nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW. The work group shall
develop one recommended standardized clinical affiliation agreement for
each profession or one recommended standardized clinical affiliation
agreement for all three professions.
(a) When choosing members of the work group, the department shall
consult with the health care personnel shortage task force and shall
attempt to ensure that the membership of the work group is
geographically diverse. The work group must, at a minimum, include
representatives of the following:
(i) Two-year institutions of higher education;
(ii) Four-year institutions of higher education;
(iii) The University of Washington medical school;
(iv) The college of osteopathic medicine at the Pacific Northwest
University of Health Sciences;
(v) The health care personnel shortage task force;
(vi) Statewide organizations representing hospitals and other
facilities that accept clinical placements;
(vii) A statewide organization representing physicians;
(viii) A statewide organization representing osteopathic physicians
and surgeons;
(ix) A statewide organization representing nurses;
(x) A labor organization representing nurses; and
(xi) Any other groups deemed appropriate by the department in
consultation with the health care personnel shortage task force.
(b) The work group shall report its findings to the governor and
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than
November 15, 2014.
(7) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program
to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more
than five hundred twenty-five dollars annually for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program.
(8) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, each person subject to
RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to
twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112,
regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.
(9) $654,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5206 (health sciences library). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $35,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1003
(health professions licensees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $10,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1270 (board of denturists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $10,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1271 (denturism). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $11,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1330
(dental hygienists, assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $1,008,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1343 (nurses surcharge). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $34,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1376 (suicide assessment training). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $10,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 1515 (medical assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $2,185,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1518 (disciplinary authorities). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(18) $141,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1525 (birth certificates). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $220,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1534 (impaired dentist program). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $51,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1609 (board
of pharmacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $12,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1629 (home care aide continuing education). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $18,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1737 (physician assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(23) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $38,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to develop a report on state
efforts to prevent and control diabetes. The department, the health
care authority, and the department of social and health services shall
submit a coordinated report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, on the following:
(a) The financial impacts and reach that diabetes of all types and
undiagnosed gestational diabetes are having on the programs
administered by each agency and individuals, including children with
mothers with undiagnosed gestational diabetes, enrolled in those
programs. Items in this assessment must include: (i) The number of
lives with diabetes and undiagnosed gestational diabetes impacted or
covered by the programs administered by each agency; (ii) the number of
lives with diabetes, or at risk for diabetes, and family members
impacted by prevention and diabetes control programs implemented by
each agency; (iii) the financial toll or impact diabetes and its
complications, and undiagnosed gestational diabetes and the
complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs in comparison to other
chronic diseases and conditions; and (iv) the financial toll or impact
diabetes and its complications, and diagnosed gestational diabetes and
the complications experienced during labor to children of mothers with
gestational diabetes places on these programs;
(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented and existing
programs and activities aimed at controlling all types of diabetes and
preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the amount
and source for any funding directed to each agency for the programs and
activities aimed at reaching those with diabetes of all types;
(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
agencies on activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on
managing, treating, or preventing all types of diabetes and its
complications;
(d) The development or revision of detailed policy-related action
plans and budget recommendations for battling diabetes and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes that includes a range of actionable items for
consideration by the legislature. The plans and budget recommendations
must identify proposed action steps to reduce the impact of diabetes,
prediabetes, related diabetes complications, and undiagnosed
gestational diabetes. The plans and budget recommendations must also
identify expected outcomes of the action steps proposed in the
following biennium while also establishing benchmarks for controlling
and preventing all types of diabetes; and
(e) An estimate of savings, efficiencies, costs, and budgetary
savings and resources required to implement the plans and budget
recommendations identified in (d) of this subsection (23).
(24) Within the general fund--state amounts appropriated in this
section, the department of health will develop and administer the
certified home care aide examination translated into at least seven
languages in addition to the languages in which the examination is
available on the effective date of this act. The purpose of offering
the examination in additional languages is to encourage an adequate
supply of certified home care aides to meet diverse long-term care
client needs.
(25) Moneys appropriated in this section are sufficient to maintain
and operate the marine biotoxin information hotline and the department
shall not suspend or reduce its operation.
(26) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and $1,000,000 of the dedicated marijuana account--state
appropriation are provided solely for tobacco, marijuana, and e-cigarette prevention activities that serve youth and populations with
a high incidence of smoking. For activities that serve youth, the
department must partner with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to fund effective tobacco, marijuana, and e-cigarette
prevention programs at middle and high schools. For activities that
serve populations with a high incidence of smoking, the department must
contract with community based organizations that serve populations that
have a high incidence of smoking tobacco, marijuana, or e-cigarettes.
The legislature intends to fund tobacco, marijuana, and e-cigarette
prevention programs in future biennia based on the Washington state
institute for public policy report in section 609 of this act. The
department shall work with the institute and shall develop a budget
request for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium based on the institute's
report.
(27) $2,194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5887 (medical use of cannabis). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(28)(a) Within the appropriations provided in this section, the
department shall update its hepatitis C strategic plan for the state to
include recommended actions pertaining to, at a minimum:
(i) Using prevalence data to determine the number of undiagnosed
hepatitis C patients in the state;
(ii) How to best reach undiagnosed patients, with special
consideration to people born between 1945 and 1965, and new infections;
(iii) The status of more than sixty thousand state residents who
have already been diagnosed with hepatitis C;
(iv) A framework for improving hepatitis C testing and linkage to
medical care; and
(v) A framework for the prevention of hepatitis C.
(b) The department shall present its updated strategic hepatitis C
plan to the health care and appropriation committees of the legislature
by September 15, 2014.
(29) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the department to hire an adverse
event consultant to analyze the adverse events reports that are now
submitted by hospitals to identify areas of concern for adverse event
incidents. The department shall report to the health care and
appropriation committees of the legislature the number and nature of
the events and concerns by December 15, 2014.

Sec. 220 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,437,000))
$56,294,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,779,000))
$55,161,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,249,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($112,465,000))
$112,704,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the support of a statewide
council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its members
representatives of community-based mental health treatment programs,
current or former judicial officers, and directors and commanders of
city and county jails and state prison facilities. The council will
investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the
long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental disorders who have
a history of offending or who are at-risk of offending, including their
mental health, physiological, housing, employment, and job training
needs.
(b) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to contract
with a consultant who can facilitate and provide project expertise on
the implementation of community and prison based offender programming
that follows the risk-needs-responsivity model.
(i) By September 1, 2013, the department shall provide to the
consultant an inventory of all existing programming both in prisons and
in community operations. The department shall consult with the
Washington state institute for public policy (WSIPP) to determine
whether programs are evidence-based or research-based using definitions
provided by WSIPP and shall include this information on the inventory.
(ii) By ((October 1, 2013)) March 1, 2014, the consultant shall
report to the department, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees on the department's current plans and
processes for managing offender programming including processes for
phasing-out ineffective programs and implementing evidence-based or
research-based programs. All department programs should be considered
by the consultant regardless of whether they are included on the most
recent list of WSIPP approved identifiable evidence-based practices in
(b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) The WSIPP, in consultation with the department, shall
systematically review selected programs to determine the effectiveness
of these programs at reducing recidivism or other outcomes. The WSIPP
shall conduct a benefit-cost analysis of these programs when feasible
and shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(iv) Based on the report provided by the consultant and the WSIPP
review of programs, the department shall work collaboratively with the
consultant to develop and complete a written comprehensive
implementation plan by ((January 15, 2014)) June 30, 2014. The
implementation plan must clearly identify the types of programs to be
included, the recommended locations where the programs will be sited,
an implementation timeline, and a phasing of the projected number of
participants needed to meet the threshold of available program funds.
(v) Using the written implementation plan as a guide, the
department must have programs in place and fully phased-in no later
than ((June 30, 2015)) January 1, 2016.
(vi) The department shall hold the consultant on retainer to assist
the department as needed throughout the implementation process. The
consultant shall review quarterly the actual implementation compared to
the written implementation plan and shall provide a report to the
secretary of the department. The department shall provide reports to
the office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees as
follows:
(A) The written comprehensive implementation plan shall be provided
by January 15, 2014; and
(B) Written progress updates shall be provided by July 1, 2014, and
by December 1, 2014.
(c) The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act
must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this
section. However, after May 1, 2014, after approval by the director of
financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act,
the department may transfer general fund--state appropriations for
fiscal year 2014 between programs. The department may not transfer
funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the
transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of
conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state
funds. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations
from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a
narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with
expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both
before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($605,039,000))
$593,109,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($604,704,000))
$599,727,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,322,000))
$3,356,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,585,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,000))
$180,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,221,145,000))
$1,204,347,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, when contracts are
established or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone
services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors:
(i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying
for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to
the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the
costs of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates
and provide sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the
institutional welfare betterment account.
(b) $501,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $501,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the department to maintain the
facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the
maple lane school in Rochester. The department may not house
incarcerated offenders at the maple lane site until specifically
directed to do so by the legislature.
(c) By ((December 1, 2013)) April 1, 2014, the department of
corrections shall provide a report to the office of financial
management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature that evaluates the department's inmate intake processes and
expenditures and makes recommendations for improvements. The
evaluation must include an analysis of lean management processes that,
if adopted, could improve the efficiency and cost effectiveness of
inmate intake.
(d) By December 1, 2013, the department of corrections shall
provide a report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that
evaluates the department's use of partial confinement and work release
programs and makes recommendations for improving public safety and
decreasing recidivism through increasing participation in partial
confinement re-entry and work release programs. In making its
recommendations, the department shall identify:
(i) Options for increasing the capacity of work release beds to
meet the number of eligible offenders;
(ii) Potential cost savings to the state through contracting for or
building new work release capacity;
(iii) Options for expanding eligibility for partial confinement,
including creation of a structured re-entry program that includes
stable housing, mandatory participation in evidence-based programs, and
intensive supervision; and
(iv) Potential cost savings to the state from creation of a
structured re-entry program.
(e) By December 1, 2013, the department of corrections shall
provide a report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature that
evaluates the department's community parenting alternative program, and
makes recommendations for increasing participation in the program with
the goals of increasing public safety and decreasing recidivism. The
evaluation shall include recommendations for increasing the placement
of eligible offenders into the program and increasing eligibility to
other populations. In making its recommendations, the department shall
identify the percent of the eligible population currently entering the
program, outcomes to-date for program participants, and potential cost
savings from increasing placement of offenders into the program.
(f) The department of corrections shall contract with local and
tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house
offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A
contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess of $85 per
day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year increase in
excess of three percent per year. The contracts may include rates for
the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily cost of
incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increase, provided
that medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan,
pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved
by department utilization management staff.
(g)(i) The legislature finds that it has taken several steps to
mitigate the demand for prison capacity including funding evidence-based programming for offenders which is proven to reduce recidivism,
funding evidence-based treatment alternatives to incarceration for
drug-addicted offenders, standardizing inconsistencies in the drug
sentencing grid, and authorizing the department to rent local jail
beds. These steps will also assist the department's implementation of
additional operational efficiencies by reducing costs related to
offender intake, processing, and transportation.
(ii) Up to $1,119,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and up to $1,322,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 may be used by the department to
rent jail capacity for short-term offenders. In contracting for jail
beds for short-term offenders, the department shall rent capacity from
local and tribal governments to house offenders with an earned release
date of less than one hundred twenty days remaining on his or her
sentence at the time the offender would otherwise be transferred to a
state correctional facility. The contracted daily costs for these
offenders shall not exceed $70 per offender including medical costs.
(h) The department of corrections shall issue a competitive
solicitation by August 1, 2013, to contract with local jurisdictions
for the use of inmate bed capacity in lieu of prison beds operated by
the state. The department may contract for up to 300 beds statewide
((to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department)) within
available funds. The department shall calculate and report the average
cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual
basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower
offender costs. The duration of the contracts may be for up to four
years. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $65 per day
per offender for all costs associated with the offender while in the
local correctional facility to include programming and health care
costs, or the equivalent of $65 per day per bed including programming
and health care costs for full units. The capacity provided at local
correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of
corrections defines as medium or lower security offenders. Programming
provided for inmates held in local jurisdictions is included in the
rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any
conditions regarding transferring offenders will be negotiated with the
department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide
health care to offenders that meet standards set by the department.
The local jail will provide all medical care including unexpected
emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to
ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health
needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary
medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility the
jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms
of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to
transfer will be the responsibility of the jail. The department will
report to legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial
management by November 1, 2013, to provide a status update on
implementation.
(i) $816,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the department to contract with local
jurisdictions for the use of female inmate bed capacity in lieu of
prison beds operated by the state. The department shall rent jail beds
through contracts established under (h) of this subsection to house
female offenders beginning no later than July 1, 2014.
(j) The department shall continually review its capacity to house
male offenders within its state operated prison system. Within
available funds, and after all funded units are being fully utilized,
the department determines that its male offender population exceeds one
hundred two percent of its capacity, including the use of all emergency
beds, it shall rent jail beds through contracts established under (h)
of this subsection to keep its prison population below one hundred two
percent.
(k) The department shall convene a work group to develop health
care cost containment strategies at local jail facilities. The work
group shall identify cost containment strategies in place at the
department and at local jail facilities, identify the costs and
benefits of implementing strategies in jail health-care facilities, and
make recommendations on implementing beneficial strategies. The work
group shall submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2013. The work
group shall include jail administrators, representatives from health
care facilities at the local jail level and the state prisons level,
and other representatives as deemed necessary.
(((j) $1,026,000)) (l) $526,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $781,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to expand
the piloted risk-needs-responsivity model to include the use of
cognitive behavioral therapy with evidence-based programming at two
minimum security prison facilities and at the Monroe correctional
complex.
(((k) $23,653,000)) (m) $23,453,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $24,919,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
offender programming. Pursuant to section 220(1) of this act, the
department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for
offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable
outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective
programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities
in the written plan.
(((l))) (n) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5484 (assault in the third-degree). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((m))) (o) $48,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $48,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1383 (stalking protection orders).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((n))) (p) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5149 (crimes against pharmacies). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((o))) (q) $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5669 (trafficking). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((p))) (r) $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5053 (vehicle prowling). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((q))) (s) $96,000 of the county criminal justice assistance--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5105 (rental vouchers for offenders). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,568,000))
$148,645,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($131,973,000))
$152,928,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,249,000
Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($266,990,000))
$306,022,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,906,000 of the county criminal justice assistance account--state appropriation and $2,200,000 of the ignition interlock device
revolving account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
department to contract for additional residential drug offender
sentencing alternative treatment slots. By December 1, 2013, the
department shall provide a report to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the house of representatives and the senate on the use of the
additional treatment slots.
(b) $4,186,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $6,362,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 must be expended on evidence-based programs that
follow the risk-needs-responsivity model. The department is authorized
to use up to ten percent of these funds as necessary to secure physical
space as needed to maximize program delivery of evidence-based
treatment to all high-risk, high-need offenders in community
supervision. Funding may be prioritized by the department to any
program recognized as evidence-based for adult offenders by the
Washington state institute for public policy.
(c) (($16,513,000)) $15,363,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $16,527,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
offender programming. Pursuant to section 220 (1) of this act, the
department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for
offender programming that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable
outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective
programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities
in the written plan.
(d) $107,000 of the county criminal justice--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5105
(rental vouchers for offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(e) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is
sufficient to implement Senate Bill No. 6327 (expanding the categories
of offenses eligible for the community parenting alternative program
within the department of corrections).

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,780,000))
$6,830,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,962,000))
$14,012,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $3,293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the stewardship of McNeil
island. The department shall assume responsibility of all island
maintenance excluding site specific maintenance operations for the
special commitment center and the Pierce county secure transitional
facility. The department shall as part of its industries program
provide job skills to offenders while providing the minimum maintenance
and preservation necessary for the state to remain in compliance with
the federal deed for McNeil island. The department shall report on
efficiencies and potential cost reductions to the office of financial
management and legislative fiscal committees by December 15, 2013.
(b)(i) The department of social and health services shall transfer
the stewardship of McNeil Island to the department of corrections
industries program, effective September 1, 2013. The transferred
responsibilities shall include marine operations, waste water
treatment, water treatment, road maintenance, and any other general
island maintenance that is not site specific to the operations of the
special commitment center or the Pierce county secure community
transition facility. Facility maintenance within the perimeter of the
special commitment center shall remain the responsibility of the
department of social and health services. Capital repairs and
maintenance necessary to maintain the special commitment center on
McNeil Island shall be managed by the department of social and health
services. The legislature directs both departments to enter into an
interagency agreement by August 1, 2013. The office of financial
management shall oversee the negotiations of the interagency agreement.
The interagency agreement must describe equipment that will transfer
between the departments, warehouse space that will be shared by the
departments, and occupancy requirements for any shops outside the
perimeter of the special commitment center. The office of financial
management will make the final determination on any disagreements
between the departments on the details of the interagency agreement.
(ii) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to
the department of corrections industries program under this subsection,
are transferred to the department of corrections.
(iii) All classified employees of department of social and health
services assigned to the department of corrections under this
subsection whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit
description at the department of corrections shall become a part of the
existing bargaining unit at the department of corrections and shall be
considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,345,000))
$40,904,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,115,000))
$37,289,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,460,000))
$78,193,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state prison medical facilities may
use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and
supplies through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when
it is cost effective to do so.

Sec. 221 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,242,000))
$2,221,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,197,000))
$2,210,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,060,000))
$21,028,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,559,000))
$25,519,000

Sec. 222 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($269,977,000))
$269,835,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,206,000))
$34,177,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($320,006,000))
$332,471,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,728,000))
$17,953,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,567,000))
$41,548,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($682,484,000))
$695,984,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This
amount is provided solely for continuing current unemployment insurance
functions and department services to employers and job seekers.
(2) (($12,386,000)) $23,585,000 of the unemployment compensation
administration account -- federal appropriation is from amounts made
available to the state by section 903(g) of the social security act
(Reed act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the
unemployment insurance tax information system for the employment
security department. The amounts provided in this subsection are
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of the
project management oversight standards and policies established by the
office of the chief information officer.
(3) $3,735,000 of the unemployment compensation account--federal
appropriation is from amounts made available to the state by section
903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This amount is provided
solely for the replacement of call center technology to improve the
integration of the telephone and computing systems to increase
efficiency and improve customer service.
(4) $182,000 of the employment services administrative account--state appropriation is provided for costs associated with the second
stage of the review and evaluation of the training benefits program as
directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment
insurance program). This second stage shall be developed and conducted
by the joint legislative audit and review committee and shall consist
of further work on the process study and net-impact/cost-benefit
analysis components of the evaluation.
(5) $240,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the employment security department
to contract with a center for workers in King county. The amount
appropriated in this subsection shall be used by the contracted center
for workers to support initiatives that generate high-skill, high-wage
jobs; improve workforce and training systems; improve service delivery
for dislocated workers; and build alliances with community and
environmental organizations.
(6) The department is prohibited from expending amounts
appropriated in this section for implementation of chapter 49.86 RCW.
(7) $3,809,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903(g) of the social security act (Reed act). This
amount is provided solely for the replacement of the unemployment
insurance benefit system for the employment security department. The
amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(8) $469,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely for elevator repair and replacement at
the department's headquarters in Olympia.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($445,000))
$442,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($446,000))
$449,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $874,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,796,000

Sec. 302 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,929,000))
$25,894,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,506,000))
$25,481,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,230,000))
$103,230,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,912,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,735,000))
$3,994,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,985,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,722,000))
$9,719,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $426,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,748,000))
$44,266,000
Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,701,000
Water Rights Processing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($124,238,000))
$125,240,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $979,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,774,000))
$3,769,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,982,000))
$41,773,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,347,000))
$3,346,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,848,000))
$2,147,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,037,000))
$6,033,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,128,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,684,000))
$6,332,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,132,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,409,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,076,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,505,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Administration
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,000
Radioactive Mixed Waste Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,800,000))
$14,336,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($455,316,000))
$457,296,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase the following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Wastewater discharge permit, not more than 4.55 percent in fiscal year
2014 and 4.63 percent in fiscal year 2015; mixed waste management
service charge authorized in RCW 70.105.280, not more than 1.82 percent
in fiscal year 2014 and 0.62 percent in fiscal year 2015; and
reasonably available control technology fee.
(3) $1,981,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is for the department to provide training regarding the
benefits of low-impact development including, but not limited to, when
the use of low-impact development is appropriate and feasible, and the
design, installation, maintenance, and best practices of low-impact
development. The department will consult with Washington State
University extension low-impact development technical center and others
in the development of the low-impact technical training. As
appropriate, the department may contract with the Washington State
University extension low-impact development technical center, private
sector vendors, associations, and others to deliver the technical
training. The training must be provided free of cost to phase I and
phase II permittees and the private development community including
builders, engineers, and other industry professionals. The training
must be sequenced geographically and provided in time for local
jurisdictions to comply with RCW 90.48.260 and 36.70A.130(5). By
August 1, 2013, the department of ecology shall provide the governor
and appropriate legislative committees a plan for how low-impact
development training funds will be spent during fiscal years 2014
through 2017.
(4) $440,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administering the water pollution
control facilities financial assistance program authorized in chapter
90.50A RCW.
(5) $350,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Spokane river regional toxics
task force to support their efforts to address elevated levels of
polychlorinated biphenyls in the Spokane river. Funding will be used
to determine the extent of the cleanup required, implement cleanup
actions to meet applicable water quality standards, and prevent
recontamination.
(6) $516,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to support an
ultrafine particulate study to determine how, if at all, the biomass
cogeneration facilities in Port Townsend and Port Angeles may impact
air quality and the health of citizens in the region.
(7) $65,000 of the water quality permit account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1245 (derelict and abandoned vessels). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((9) The department shall collaborate with the middle snake river
watershed, WRIA 35 planning unit in implementing its watershed plan.))
(8) $40,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the middle snake river watershed,
WRIA 35 planning unit in implementing its watershed plan in
collaboration with the department.
(((10))) (9)(a) $14,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $14,000,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are for activities
within the water resources program.
(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 is provided
solely for processing water right permit applications only if the
department of ecology issues at least five hundred water right
decisions in fiscal year 2014, and if the department of ecology does
not issue at least five hundred water right decisions in fiscal year
2014 the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse and remain
unexpended. The department of ecology shall submit a report to the
office of financial management and the state treasurer by June 30,
2014, that documents whether five hundred water right decisions were
issued in fiscal year 2014. For the purposes of this subsection,
applications that are voluntarily withdrawn by an applicant do not
count towards the five hundred water right decision requirement. For
the purposes of water budget-neutral requests under chapter 173-539A
WAC, multiple domestic connections authorized within a single water
budget-neutral decision are considered one decision for the purposes of
this subsection.
(((11))) (10) The department of ecology, in consultation with the
office of financial management, shall prepare a facilities plan to
reduce the agency's facilities obligation and the agency's cost per FTE
for its facilities by 2017 to align with comparable state agencies.
The plan must be submitted to the office of financial management and
the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by November 1, 2013. The
plan must include: (a) An inventory of all currently owned and leased
buildings, consistent with the data provided through the state's
facilities inventory process prescribed by the office of financial
management annually by September 1st; (b) a list of facilities
solutions that will reduce costs with an emphasis on consolidation,
collocation, and alternative space solutions such as shared workspace
and mobile work; and (c) a department-wide coordinated process and plan
for regularly evaluating facility needs.
(11) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the protection of groundwater aquifers
that are the sole drinking water source as prescribed in RCW 90.54.140
specifically for the protection of artesian groundwater aquifers in a
county with a population greater than one million five hundred thousand
that are being detrimentally impacted by development. If the amount
provided in this subsection is not sufficient for this purpose, the
department must use existing funds to implement this subsection.
(12) $100,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account--state appropriation is provided solely to fund the Bertrand watershed
improvement district's development of a conceptual groundwater model
for water right permitting and mitigation efforts in the Lynden,
Everson, Nooksack, and Sumas (LENS) aquifer study area. The conceptual
groundwater model shall be developed in cooperation with the WRIA 1
watershed planning joint board.

Sec. 303 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,254,000))
$4,271,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,254,000))
$4,387,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,014,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,065,000))
$2,465,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,859,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,065,000))
$105,889,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($127,089,000))
$130,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest weather and avalanche center.
(2) Prior to closing any state park, the commission must notify all
affected local governments and relevant nonprofit organizations of the
intended closure and provide an opportunity for the notified local
governments and nonprofit organizations to elect to acquire, or enter
into, a maintenance and operating contract with the commission that
would allow the park to remain open.
(3) The commission shall prepare a report on its efforts to
increase revenue from all sources, including the discover pass. The
report shall also include a status update on the fiscal health of the
state parks system, and shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October
28, 2013.
(4)(a) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the state
parks and recreation commission must continue its ongoing efforts to
evaluate the agency's mission and options to improve the efficiency and
effectiveness of the agency, which may include the evaluation of
options relating to organizational structure, administrative processes,
land and facility ownership and management, and provision of services.
(b) The evaluation must include development of specific performance
measures relating to the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency,
which may include measures relating to data collection necessary for
future analysis consistent with the purposes of this subsection.
(c) In developing the performance measures required by (b) of this
subsection, the state parks and recreation commission must produce and
consider the following:
(i) An inventory of land and facilities owned and managed by the
commission and a process to upgrade the inventory to one capable of
describing primary land and facility uses;
(ii) An evaluation of the lands and facilities identified under
(c)(i) of this subsection for lands and facilities surplus to state
park needs and actions taken or planned to dispose of or more
advantageously position these assets;
(iii) Current annual visitation data categorized by state park and
a process to upgrade the system for collecting parks visitation data to
better understand existing and potential markets for park services;
(iv) A process to systematically assess and prioritize the state
parks and recreation commission's capital needs, including a financial
analysis;
(v) An inventory of and progress developing ongoing partnerships
with entities including the state parks foundation, state park friends
groups, and other appropriate public and nonprofit entities;
(vi) An inventory of existing enterprise activities and agreements
at state parks, including those relating to product sales, concessions,
sponsorships, and advertising, and a process for identifying and
evaluating additional potential enterprise opportunities for generating
revenue or cost savings;
(vii) A summary of actions taken and planned for application of
lean management philosophies and tools throughout the agency; and
(viii) A summary of actions taken and planned towards continued
development of a sustained, strategic approach to marketing state
parks.
(d) The outcomes of the evaluation under (a) of this subsection,
the performance measures required under (b) of this subsection, and the
information to be produced and considered under (c) of this subsection
must be provided to the office of financial management and appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by September 1,
2014.

Sec. 304 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($823,000))
$828,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($815,000))
$898,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,425,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,000))
$124,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000
Park Land Trust Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Wildlife Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,086,000))
$3,153,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $964,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,654,000))
$10,009,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $34,000 of the park land trust revolving
fund--state appropriation, $33,000 of the state parks renewal and
stewardship account--state appropriation, and $33,000 of the state
wildlife account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
recreation and conservation office to contract with a consultant to
provide a study that quantifies the economic contribution to the state
economy from the state's public lands and that quantifies the economic
contribution from statewide outdoor recreation to the state's economy.
A report is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2015.

Sec. 305 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,227,000))
$2,205,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,147,000))
$2,169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,374,000

Sec. 306 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,841,000))
$6,818,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,738,000))
$6,759,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,301,000
State Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,880,000))
$16,978,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
conservation commission, in consultation with conservation districts,
must submit to the office of financial management and legislative
fiscal committees by December 10, 2013, a report outlining
opportunities to minimize districts' overhead costs, including
consolidation of conservation districts within counties in which there
is more than one district. The report must include details on the
anticipated future savings that could be expected from implementing
these efficiencies starting on July 1, 2014.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to implement the voluntary
stewardship program in Thurston and Chelan counties. These amounts may
not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.
(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely to implement the voluntary stewardship program
statewide. The commission shall place the appropriation in this
subsection in unallotted status, and may not allot any of these funds
until the federal government has provided funding to the commission for
the purpose of implementing the voluntary stewardship program.
(4) The conservation commission must evaluate the current system
for the election of conservation district board supervisors and
recommend improvements to ensure the highest degree of public
involvement in these elections. The commission must engage with
stakeholder groups and conservation districts to gather a set of
options for improvement to district elections, which must include an
option aligning district elections with state and local general
elections. The commission must submit a report detailing the options
to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 10, 2013.
(5) $100,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Whatcom agricultural district
coalition to educate and inform agricultural landowners on regulatory
compliance issues relating to groundwater quality issues including
nitrates, fecal coliform, and pesticide contamination within WRIA 1 and
to organize watershed improvement districts to implement environmental
regulatory compliance strategies.

Sec. 307 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,321,000))
$30,650,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,999,000))
$30,599,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,585,000))
$107,998,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,784,000))
$58,721,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $397,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,919,000))
$15,941,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,590,000))
$2,617,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,224,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,507,000))
$2,509,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($209,000))
$431,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($737,000))
$1,070,000
State Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,460,000))
$104,268,000
Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,405,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,446,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
Hydraulic Project Approval Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($674,000))
$966,000
Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $773,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($367,556,000))
$371,541,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($130,000)) $545,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014 and $130,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to pay for
emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to
fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.
(2) Prior to submitting its 2015-2017 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(3) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to
keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to
maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on
state operating funds.
(5) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department must
retain ownership and continue to occupy the downtown Olympia office
building at 600 Capitol Way.
(6) $1,000,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to the department for resources that serve to
promote and engage nonlethal deterrence methods relating to wolf and
livestock interaction with a priority given to funding cooperative
agreements with livestock producers, and of this amount, $250,000 in
fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for compensation for injury or loss
of livestock caused by wolves as prescribed in chapter 77.36 RCW.
(7) $100,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the transfer of trout from the Clarks creek
hatchery to the Lakewood hatchery.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the production of steelhead,
coho, and Chinook salmon at the Clarks creek hatchery.
(9) $200,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation,
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014,
and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2015 are provided solely for the department to increase production of
juvenile fall Chinook on the Cowlitz river. The funds provided may be
used to match or leverage funds from private or public sources for the
same purpose.
(10) $596,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $596,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for weed assessments and for
payments in lieu of real property taxes to counties that elect to
receive the payments for department owned game lands within the county.
(11) $10,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for development of an aquatic invasive
species passport program to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of
watercraft inspections by expediting aquatic invasive species
watercraft inspections for watercraft at low risk of transmitting
invasive species and prioritizing the use of available resources for
the inspection of high risk vessels.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department must deploy additional wildlife conflict specialists to
provide landowner assistance and address wildlife conflicts, with at
least one additional specialist primarily assigned to each of the
following areas: Administrative region six of the department; Okanogan
and Chelan counties in administrative region two of the department; and
Whatcom and Skagit counties in administrative region four of the
department.
(13) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1112 (science and public policy). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the department
shall work with the regional fisheries enhancement groups to identify
a revenue source or sources capable of providing long-term funding to
support the community-based salmon restoration work of regional
fisheries enhancement groups. The department shall work with the
regional fisheries enhancement group coalition to submit a report to
the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative
committees by December 1, 2013, with the outcomes and recommendations.
(15) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely to conduct a study of the Lake Washington
basin sockeye salmon to evaluate the impact of predation on juvenile
sockeye by several species of fish that inhabit the lake, and develop
management actions by the state to increase the returns of adult
sockeye to the lake.
(16) $202,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account--state appropriation and $303,000 of the aquatic invasive species
prevention account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
purposes of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6040 (invasive
species). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $30,000 of the aquatic invasive species prevention account--state appropriation and $20,000 of the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account--state appropriation are provided solely to the
department for a contract, that includes performance measures and
requires reporting on outcomes, with the Pacific northwest economic
region nonprofit organization to support regional coordination of
invasive species prevention activities in the Pacific northwest.

Sec. 308 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,515,000))
$48,628,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,092,000))
$45,056,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,963,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,372,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,054,000))
$50,630,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,494,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,170,000))
$1,680,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,634,000))
$3,624,000
Snowmobile Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,948,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,073,000))
$116,389,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,972,000))
$3,968,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,759,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($843,000))
$463,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,700,000))
$4,122,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Forest Practices Application Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,697,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $785,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,770,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,712,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($324,717,000))
$337,224,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,389,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,323,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) (($19,099,000)) $25,271,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014, $19,099,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $5,000,000 of the
disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for
emergency fire suppression. None of the general fund and disaster
response account amounts provided in this subsection may be used to
fund agency indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and
administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining
accounts and appropriations. The department of natural resources shall
submit a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based, performance
contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the
forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect
costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost
agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $518,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance
contracts with nongovernmental organizations to participate in the
implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may
only contain indirect cost set at or below a rate of eighteen percent.
(5) $717,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to fund interagency agreements with
the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife as
part of the adaptive management process.
(6) $440,000 of the state general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $440,000 of the state general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp.
(7) $2,382,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is for addressing the growing backlog of expired aquatic
leases and new aquatic lease applications. The department shall
implement a Lean process to improve the lease review process and
further reduce the backlog, and submit a report on its progress in
addressing the backlog and implementation of the Lean process to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October
1, 2013.
(8) $1,948,000 of the environmental legacy stewardship account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department to pay a
portion of the costs to complete remedial investigation work at
Whitmarsh landfill and Mill site A and perform final-year maintenance
of the Olympic view triangle site in Commencement Bay.
(9) $265,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1764 (geoduck diver licenses). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $425,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1245 (derelict and abandoned vessels). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $3,700,000 of the marine resources stewardship trust account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of priority
marine management planning efforts including mapping activities,
ecological assessment, data tools, stakeholder engagement, and all
other work identified in Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5603 (marine
advisory councils) during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department must implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972
(recovery for fire damages to public or private forested lands).

Sec. 309 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,300,000))
$15,257,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,294,000))
$16,045,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,098,000))
$23,028,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,837,000))
$2,835,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,203,000))
$5,201,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,000))
$68,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,994,000))
$62,626,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,308,445 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and (($5,302,905)) $6,102,905 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementing
the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 16.57.220, the department is
authorized to institute livestock inspection fees in the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium for calves less than thirty days old.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and 16.36.150, the department is
authorized to establish a fee for the sole purpose of purchasing and
operating a database and any other technology or software needed to
administer animal disease traceability activities for cattle sold or
slaughtered in the state or transported out of the state.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
of agriculture must convene and facilitate a work group with
appropriate stakeholders to review fees supporting programs within the
department that are also supported with state general fund. In
developing strategies to make the program work more self-supporting,
the workgroup will consider, at minimum, the length of time since the
last fee increase, similar fees that exist in neighboring states, and
fee increases that will ensure reasonable competitiveness in the
respective industries. The workgroup must submit a report containing
recommendations that will make each of the fee supported programs
within the department less reliant on state general fund to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees by December
1, 2013.

Sec. 310 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($987,000))
$1,000,000

Sec. 311 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,416,000))
$2,391,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,318,000))
$2,414,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,570,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,920,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,900,000))
$18,971,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $788,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for coordinating a study of Puget
Sound juvenile steelhead marine survival conducted by the department of
fish and wildlife and based on a study plan developed in cooperation
with federal, tribal, and nongovernmental entities.
(2) By October 1, 2014, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide
the governor a single, prioritized list of state agency 2015-2017
capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound
restoration.
(3) $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the Puget Sound partnership to
collaborate with interested parties to review the roles of local
watershed and salmon recovery organizations implementing the action
agenda and provide legislative, budgetary, and administrative
recommendations to streamline and strengthen Puget Sound recovery
efforts. In conducting this work, the partnership must coordinate with
the following interested parties, the Hood Canal coordinating council,
marine resources committees, including the Northwest straits
initiative, regional fisheries enhancement groups, local integrating
organizations, lead entities, and other county watershed councils, as
well as representatives of federal, state, tribal, and local government
agencies. Recommendations must be provided to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2014.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,103,000))
$1,114,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,341,000))
$1,729,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $902,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,558,000))
$3,545,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,929,000))
$9,935,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,154,000))
$3,145,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,703,000))
$1,705,000
Business and Professions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,454,000))
$17,484,000
Funeral and Cemetery Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Landscape Architects' License Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Appraisal Management Company Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Wildlife Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,963,000))
$40,378,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $566,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1552 (scrap metal theft reduction). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $166,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation in fiscal year 2014 only is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1779 (esthetics). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $592,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1822 (debt collection practices). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $32,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5193 (wolf conflict management). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) $409,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for seven temporary staff to eliminate the firearm transfer
backlog of 144,000 documents by June 30, 2015.
(6) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the purposes of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6040 (invasive species). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,653,000))
$35,702,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,485,000))
$31,725,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,189,000))
$15,882,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,020,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,956,000))
$9,960,000
Enhanced 911 Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,480,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,332,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,351,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,797,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,747,000))
$12,247,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $447,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($134,158,000))
$135,644,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $700,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(4) $3,480,000 of the enhanced 911 account--state appropriation is
provided solely for upgrades to the Washington state identification
system and the Washington crime information center. Amounts provided
in this subsection may not be expended until the office of the chief
information officer approves a plan to move the Washington state
patrol's servers and data center equipment into the state data center
in the 1500 Jefferson building, and the office of the chief information
officer certifies that the Washington state patrol has begun the move.
The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(5) $154,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1612 (firearms offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,264,000))
$27,220,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,041,000))
$26,676,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,826,000))
$71,064,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,005,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($121,336,000))
$129,165,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of (($16,881,000)) $16,943,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($16,602,000))
$17,111,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2015 is for state agency operations.
(a) (($8,846,000)) $8,908,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($8,910,000)) $8,732,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided
solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) Districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction daily student unexcused absence data by school,
using a uniform definition of unexcused absence as established by the
superintendent.
(iii) By September of each year, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall produce an annual status report of the
budget provisos in sections 501 and 513 of this act. The status report
of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following
information: Purpose and objective, number of staff, number of
contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries
by year, list of beneficiaries, and proviso outcomes and achievements.
(iv) The superintendent of public instruction shall update the
program prepared and distributed under RCW 28A.230.150 for the
observation of temperance and good citizenship day to include providing
an opportunity for eligible students to register to vote at school.
(((vi))) (v) Appropriations in this section are sufficient for the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct ongoing
consolidated program reviews of alternative learning experience
programs and dropout reengagement programs established under chapter
20, Laws of 2010. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall include alternative learning education and dropout
reengagement programs in their ongoing consolidated program reviews, as
well as provide outreach and training to school districts regarding
implementation of the programs. Findings from the program reviews will
be used to support and prioritize office of the superintendent outreach
and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the
programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as
to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office
of the state auditor.
(b) $1,017,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,017,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for activities associated with the
implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236,
Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009
(state's education system), including technical staff, systems
reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality
education council and the data governance working group.
(c) $1,012,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and (($1,012,000)) $1,034,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities. Of these amounts, $161,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and $161,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided
for implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools),
and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2015 is provided solely for the state board of education to adopt rules
to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement
proposal adopted under board resolution on November 10, 2010, and
revised on January 9, 2014, to take effect beginning with the
graduating class of 2019 as required by Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6552 (improving student success by modifying
instructional hour and graduation requirements). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided for Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6552 shall lapse.
(d) $1,325,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and (($1,325,000)) $1,453,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the
professional educator standards board for the following:
(i) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2014 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year
2015 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board;
(ii) $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for mentor stipends provided through the
alternative routes to certification program administered by the
professional educator standards board, including the pipeline for
paraeducators program and the retooling to teach conditional loan
programs. Funding within this subsection (1)(d)(ii) is also provided
for the recruiting Washington teachers program; ((and))
(iii) $128,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6129 (paraeducator development). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection (iii) shall
lapse; and
(iv) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the professional educator
standards board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify
interpreter assessments that are available to school districts.
Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A)
Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be
offered by a national organization of professional sign language
interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess
performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board
shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a
minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment
identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments
for school district use.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $133,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil
rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the
education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $45,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children).
(h) $131,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $131,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of
Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).
(i) $1,826,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,802,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive
data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including
development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and
research system (CEDARS).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for project citizen, a program
sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the
center for civic education to promote participation in government by
middle school students.
(k) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for collaborative schools for
innovation and success authorized under chapter 53, Laws of 2012. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award $500,000
per year in funding for each collaborative school for innovation and
success selected for participation in the pilot program during 2012.
(l) $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163,
Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall annually report each December on the
implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to
promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster
youth.
(m) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 178,
Laws of 2012 (open K-12 education resources).
(n) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and (($93,000)) $343,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for chapter 185,
Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention, which requires the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing workgroup on
school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the amounts
provided, (($140,000)) $390,000 is for youth suicide prevention
activities.
(o) $138,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1336
(troubled youth in school). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(p) $68,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1134 (state-tribal education compacts). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(q) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for competitive grants to school districts to
increase the capacity of high schools to offer AP computer science
courses. In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction must give priority to schools and districts in
rural areas, with substantial enrollment of low-income students, and
that do not offer AP computer science. School districts may apply to
receive either or both of the following grants:
(i) A grant to establish partnerships to support computer science
professionals from private industry serving on a voluntary basis as
coinstructors along with a certificated teacher, including via
synchronous video, for AP computer science courses; or
(ii) A grant to purchase or upgrade technology and curriculum
needed for AP computer science, as well as provide opportunities for
professional development for classroom teachers to have the requisite
knowledge and skills to teach AP computer science.
(r) $27,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1556
(cardiac arrest education).
(s) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the development of recommendations for
funding integrated school nursing and outreach services. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with the
health care authority to develop recommendations for increasing federal
financial participation for providing nursing services in schools with
the goals of integrating nursing and outreach services and supporting
one nurse for every four-hundred fifty students in elementary schools
and one nurse for every seven-hundred fifty students in secondary
schools. The recommendations shall include proposals for funding
training and reimbursement for nurses that provide outreach services to
help eligible students enroll in apple health for kids and other social
services programs. The authority and the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall provide these recommendations to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(t) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to contract with an organization to develop a model
plan for evaluating the outcomes of state funded pilot education
programs, including guidelines for standard data that must be gathered
throughout any education pilot program, as well as guidance for data
and evaluation methods depending on the design of the program and the
target population. The contract must also include a provision to
provide guidance for the evaluation of existing pilot programs.
(u) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the superintendent of public
instruction to convene a committee for the selection and recognition of
Washington innovative schools. The committee shall select and
recognize Washington innovative schools based on the selection criteria
established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
in accordance with chapter 202, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools--recognition) and chapter 260, Laws of 2011 (innovation schools and
zones).
(v) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Mobius science center to
expand mobile outreach of science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM) education to students in rural, tribal, and
low-income communities.
(w) $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purpose of developing math and
science equivalency curriculum and course modules for career and
technical education and skill center courses to allow students to
fulfill math and science credit requirements for graduation as required
by Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6552 (improving student
success by modifying instructional hour and graduation requirements).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in
this subsection (w) shall lapse.
(2) $200,000 of the performance audits of government account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a one-time workload increase to
address additional audit resolutions and appeals in the alternative
learning experience programs.
(3) $10,277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $9,565,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are for statewide programs.
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2014 and $1,221,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for contracting with a college
scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to
students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, including the jobs
for America's graduates (JAG) program and the building bridges
statewide program. Starting in school year 2014-15 students in the
foster care system or who are homeless shall be given priority by
districts offering the jobs for America's graduates program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff
representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for
dropout prevention.
(iv) $2,112,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
340, Laws of 2011 and chapter 51, Laws of 2012. This includes the
development and implementation of the Washington kindergarten inventory
of developing skills (WaKIDS).
(v) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to subsidize advanced placement
exam fees and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for
low-income students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be
either enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or
reduced price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the
allowable federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the
advanced placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined
class and exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed
$14.50.
(vi) $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to support ((the dissemination of
the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts)) district
implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs
consistent with RCW 28A.600.045.

Sec. 502 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,395,289,000))
$5,386,820,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,581,336,000))
$5,632,857,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $328,563,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,305,188,000))
$11,348,240,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended.
(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2013-14 and 2014-15 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, except that the allocation for guidance
counselors in a middle school shall be 1.216 and for school year 2013-
14 the allocation for guidance counselors in a high school shall be
2.009, which enhancements are within the program of basic education.
The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on
the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment
in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260 2013-14
School Year 2014-15
School Year

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23 25.23

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for laboratory science,
career and technical education (CTE) and skill center programs average
class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

(A) General education class size in high poverty schools:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260

Grade 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(B) For grades K-1, class size of 20.85 is provided for high
poverty schools for the 2013-14 school year;
(C) For grades K through 1, the superintendent shall, at a minimum,
allocate funding to high-poverty schools for the 2014-15 school year
based on an average class size of 24.10 full-time equivalent students
per teacher. The superintendent shall provide enhanced funding for
class size reduction in grades K through 1 to the extent of, and
proportionate to, the school's demonstrated actual average class size
up to a class size of 20.30 full-time equivalent students per teacher.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules to implement the enhanced funding authorized under (ii)(C) of
this subsection and shall distribute draft rules for review no later
than December 1, 2013. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report the draft rules and proposed methodology to
the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013.
(D) The enhancement in this subsection (2)(c)(ii) is within the
program of basic education.
(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) ((Laboratory science,)) Advanced placement((,)) and
international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size
assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and (a)
of this subsection and is considered certificated instructional staff,
except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 student((s)) full-time equivalent enrollment:

((Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's))

2013-14 School
Year 2014-15 School
Year

Career and
Technical
Education 2.02 2.72

Skill Center 2.36 3.06

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula
generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The
superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the
district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each
grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the
allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other
certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.253

Middle School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.353

High School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of
the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following
factors: Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.025
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade,
except that the allocation for parent involvement coordinators in an
elementary school shall be 0.0825, which enhancement is within the
program of basic education.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be
allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 1.71 percent in the 2013-14
school year and 2.00 percent in the 2014-15 school year for career and
technical education students, and ((21.60)) 21.57 percent in the 2013-14 school year and ((15.98)) 18.20 percent in the 2014-15 school year
for skill center students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 18.68
percent in the 2013-14 school year and 18.68 percent in the 2014-15
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 20.95
percent in the 2013-14 school year and 20.95 percent in the 2014-15
school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2013-14
SCHOOL YEAR 2014-15
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology $77.46 (($82.16)) $125.92

Utilities and Insurance $210.46 $223.23

Curriculum and Textbooks $83.17 $88.21

Other Supplies and Library Materials $176.56 $187.27

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated
and Classified Staff
$12.86
$13.64

Facilities Maintenance $104.27 $110.59

Security and Central Office $72.24 $76.62

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $737.02 (($781.72)) $825.48

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations of $1,244.25 for the 2013-14 school year and
(($1,262.92)) $1,260.41 for the 2014-15 school year.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation of
$1,399.30 for the 2013-14 school year and (($1,420.29)) $1,417.48 for
the 2014-15 school year.
(d) ((Students in laboratory science courses generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.)) Students in
grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to
the allocation provided in (a) of this subsection at the following
rate:
2014-15
SCHOOL YEAR
Technology $36.35
Curriculum and Textbooks $39.02
Other Supplies and Library Materials $82.84
Instructional Professional Development for Certificated
and Classified Staff $6.04
TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $164.25

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2013, to August
31, 2013, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 34, Laws of
2011 1st sp. sess. (allocation of funding for funding for students
enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) Amounts provided in this section beginning September 1, 2013,
are adjusted to reflect modifications to alternative learning
experience courses in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946
(student educational outcomes).
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAM FUNDING
Starting with the 2014-15 school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall require all districts claiming general apportionment
funding for dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW
28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet minimum weekly instructional
contact requirements. The superintendent shall revise its rules
accordingly to implement this subsection. Districts must also provide
separate financial accounting of expenditures for the open door
programs offered in district or with a provider, as well as accurate,
monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education,
including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.

(12) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 43.75 percent of kindergarten enrollment
in the 2013-14 school year and 43.75 percent in the 2014-15 school
year, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.

(((12) INCREASED INSTRUCTIONAL HOURS FOR GRADES SEVEN THROUGH
TWELVE
(a) School districts shall implement the increased instructional
hours for the instructional program of basic education required under
the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220(2)(a) beginning with the 2014-15
school year, which enhancement is within the program of basic
education.
(b) Amounts provided in this section are sufficient to fund
increased instructional hours in grades seven through twelve. For the
2014-15 school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding to
school districts for increased instructional hours. In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(a) Additional instruction of 2.2222 hours per week per full-time
equivalent student in grades seven through twelve in school year 2014-15; (b) the general education average class sizes specified in section
502(2)(c); (c) 36 instructional weeks per year; (d) 900 instructional
hours per teacher; and (e) the district's average staff mix and
compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.))

(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall
add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any
grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs
with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this
subsection;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this
subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent
with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place
for the 2010-11 school year as provided in section 502, chapter 37,
Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted
annually for inflation.
(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following
programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2014
and 2015 as follows:
(a) $605,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $614,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for fire protection for school
districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $436,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(16) $214,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $217,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for school district emergencies as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of
the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts
and the nature of the emergency.
(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6
FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws
of 2007.
(18) Students participating in running start programs may be funded
up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school
district and institution of higher education enrollment. In
calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction may average the participating student's September
through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end
dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education
institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education
data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students
participating in the running start program, including course load
analyses at both the high school and community and technical college
system.
(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved
career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not
exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and
technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 503 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($365,120,000))
$365,048,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($427,408,000))
$428,754,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($792,528,000))
$793,802,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for the
transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192 or
for approved schools and eligible students as provided in RCW
28A.710.220(3). Students are considered eligible only if meeting the
definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160. Funding in this section for
school year 2014-15 constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192,
which enhancement is within the program of basic education.
(b) From July 1, 2013 to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of
students as provided in section 505, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended.
(3) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2014 appropriation
and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2015 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus
purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction
determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process
based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to
those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax
five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus.
In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus
category for that school year.
(6) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the
state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW
28A.305.141.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.

Sec. 504 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($473,326,000))
$501,326,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,548,000))
$515,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $7,111,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for state matching money for
federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids
program through the following allowable uses:
(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school
students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades
kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced price
lunch;
(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and
private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service
programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income
areas;
(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served
to students eligible for free and reduced price lunch, pursuant to
chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and
(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding
school breakfast programs.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report
annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual
expenditures in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.

Sec. 505 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($702,149,000))
$693,894,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($738,043,000))
$739,998,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($462,022,000))
$476,122,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,151,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,948,365,000))
$1,956,165,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for special
education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the
calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations ((for
increased instructional hours for grades seven through twelve as))
provided under section 502(((12)(b))) (2)(a) and (4), which enhancement
is within the program of basic education.
(b) From July 1, 2013 to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school district programs for special education
students as provided in section 507, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended.
(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions
for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW
28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund -- state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW
28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this
subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.
(7) (($22,263,000)) $17,578,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($34,392,000)) $29,948,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $29,574,000
of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special
education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this
section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal
eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this
subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all
available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At
the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover
safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which
districts were not subsequently eligible.
(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as
provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of
each school year. Determinations on school district eligibility for
state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual
expenditure data from the current school year.
(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(11) $252,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $252,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015, and $100,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 506 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,143,000))
$8,121,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,151,000))
$8,124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,294,000))
$16,245,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional
professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum
and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards
and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed
among the educational service districts in the same proportion as
distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service
district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a
certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate
subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for
travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional
professional development support.
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 507 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($311,174,000))
$311,882,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($335,533,000))
$340,444,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($646,707,000))
$652,326,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the
increase per full-time equivalent student is 4.914 percent from the
2012-13 school year to the 2013-14 school year and 4.914 percent from
the 2013-14 school year to the 2014-15 school year.

Sec. 508 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,291,000))
$13,968,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,493,000))
$13,964,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,784,000))
$27,932,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) (($1,070,000)) $569,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($1,070,000)) $569,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided
solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and
related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment
is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated
instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following
types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the
department of social and health services for developmentally disabled
juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections,
programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county
jails.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 509 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,555,000))
$9,539,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,677,000))
$9,685,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,232,000))
$19,224,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable
students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i)
Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly
capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students
per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable
students as provided in section 511, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $85,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

Sec. 510 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS -- NO
CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,052,000))
$4,302,000

Sec. 511 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($121,840,000))
$114,798,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,524,000))
$99,558,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,234,000))
$217,834,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,002,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,599,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($438,199,000))
$437,791,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) (($44,575,000)) $38,031,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($27,134,000)) $22,806,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, $1,350,000 of
the education legacy trust account--state appropriation, and
$15,868,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for development and implementation of the Washington state
assessment system, including: (i) Development and implementation of
retake assessments for high school students who are not successful in
one or more content areas and (ii) development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the
certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public
instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures.
Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract for the early return of 10th grade student assessment results,
on or around June 10th of each year. State funding to districts shall
be limited to one collection of evidence payment per student, per
content-area assessment.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall modify the
statewide student assessment system and implement assessments developed
with a multistate consortium beginning in the 2014-15 school year to
assess student proficiency on the standards adopted under RCW
28A.655.071 and including the provisions of House Bill No. 1450.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent
of public instruction shall develop and administer the biology
collection of evidence.
(d) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent
of public instruction shall create an alternative assessment for
students with the most significant cognitive challenges that is aligned
to the common core state standards.
(2) $356,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $356,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
(3) $5,851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,935,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of a new
performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other
activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform)
and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).
(4)(a) (($45,263,000)) $44,879,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($49,673,000)) $48,746,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided
solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,090 per
teacher in the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner. All bonuses in
(a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection will be paid in July of each school
year. Bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to
reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are
certified; and
(iv) During the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, and within
available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the
eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward
the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front
candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual
bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in
addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200.
Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are
required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the
terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including
applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use
revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure
payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section
in each school year.
(5) $477,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $477,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(6) $950,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $950,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.
(7) $810,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $810,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy
that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the
independent organization shall report on amounts committed by
foundations and others to support the development and implementation of
this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state
level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(8) $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a statewide information
technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will
provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software
training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.
(9) $1,277,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,277,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for secondary career and technical
education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If equally
matched by private donations, $300,000 of the 2014 appropriation and
$300,000 of the 2015 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST
robotics programs. Of the amounts in this subsection, $100,000 of the
fiscal year 2014 appropriation and $100,000 of the fiscal year 2015
appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of statewide
supervision activities for career and technical education student
leadership organizations.
(10) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.
(11) $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $135,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for science, technology,
engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with
chapter 238, Laws of 2010.
(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a beginning educator support
program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for
grant funding. The superintendent shall implement this program in 5 to
15 school districts and/or regional consortia. The program provided by
a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid
orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a
professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with
professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers
to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers.
$250,000 may be used to provide statewide professional development
opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.
(13) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for advanced project lead the way
courses at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding in 2014, a
high school must have offered a foundational project lead the way
course during the 2012-13 school year. The 2014 funding must be used
for one-time start-up course costs for an advanced project lead the way
course, to be offered to students beginning in the 2013-14 school year.
To be eligible for funding in 2015, a high school must have offered a
foundational project lead the way course during the 2013-14 school
year. The 2015 funding must be used for one-time start-up course costs
for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered to students
beginning in the 2014-15 school year. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction and the education research and data center at the
office of financial management shall track student participation and
long-term outcome data.
(14) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for annual start-up grants for
aerospace and manufacturing technical programs housed at four skill
centers. The grants are provided for start-up equipment and curriculum
purchases. To be eligible for funding, the skill center must agree to
provide regional high schools with access to a technology laboratory,
expand manufacturing certificate and course offerings at the skill
center, and provide a laboratory space for local high school teachers
to engage in professional development in the instruction of courses
leading to student employment certification in the aerospace and
manufacturing industries. Once a skill center receives a start-up
grant, it is ineligible for additional start-up funding in the
following school year. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall administer the grants in consultation with the center
for excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing.
(15) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for annual start-up grants to six
high schools to implement the aerospace assembler program.
Participating high schools must agree to offer the aerospace assembler
training program to students by spring semester of school year 2013-14.
Once a high school receives a start-up grant, it is ineligible for
additional start-up funding in the following school year. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction and the education research
and data center at the office of financial management shall track
student participation and long-term outcome data.
(16) $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the
provision of training for teachers in the performance-based teacher
principal evaluation program. Of the amounts appropriated in this
subsection, $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2014 is a one-time
appropriation.
(17) $3,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $6,681,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5329 (persistently failing
schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy
of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial
literacy public-private partnership.
(19) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $99,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to implement a youth dropout
prevention program that incorporates partnerships between community-
based organizations, schools, food banks and farms or gardens. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall select one
school district that must partner with an organization that is
operating an existing similar program and that also has the ability to
serve at least 40 students. Of the amount appropriated in this
subsection, up to $10,000 may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for administration of the program.
(20) (($2,399,000)) $2,285,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 and (($2,035,000)) $1,912,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided
solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946
(strengthening student educational outcomes). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(21) $1,110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,061,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for chapter 184, Laws of 2013
(Second Substitute House Bill No. 1642) (academic acceleration). Of
the amount appropriated in this section, forty-nine thousand is
provided as one-time funding.
(22) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6062 (requiring internet access to public school data and
expenditure information). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(23) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6104 (establishing the interactive gaming in schools public-private
partnership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6074 (enacting provisions to improve educational outcomes for
homeless students). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2014, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $83,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6163 (expanded learning opportunities). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(26) $21,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Senate Bill No. 6424
(state seal of biliteracy for high school students). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 512 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,500,000))
$97,796,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($106,120,000))
$110,084,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,016,000))
$72,116,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($272,636,000))
$279,996,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs
for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the
provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the
superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional
instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program
student in grades kindergarten through twelve in school years 2013-14
and 2014-15; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in
school year 2013-14 for the head count number of students who have
exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the
previous school year based on their performance on the English
proficiency assessment; (iii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours
per week in school year 2014-15 for the head count number of students
who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within
the previous two years based on their performance on the English
proficiency assessment; (iv) fifteen transitional bilingual program
students per teacher; (v) 36 instructional weeks per year; (vi) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (vii) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 50, Laws of
2011 1st sp. sess., as amended.
(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts
in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of
assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the
following amounts: ((1.76)) 1.69 percent for school year 2013-14 and
((1.59)) 1.52 percent for school year 2014-15.
(4) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is for
migrant education under Title I Part C and English language
acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the
elementary and secondary education act.
(5) $35,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $35,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to track current and former
transitional bilingual program students.

Sec. 513 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($196,356,000))
$194,728,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($218,335,000))
$214,877,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($448,434,000))
$450,534,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($863,125,000))
$860,139,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b)(i) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a), except that the
allocation for the additional instructional hours shall be enhanced as
provided in this section, which enhancements are within the program of
the basic education. In calculating the allocations, the
superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional
instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance
program student for the 2013-14 school year and the 2014-15 school
year; (B) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (C)
36 instructional weeks per year; (D) 900 instructional hours per
teacher; and (E) the district's average staff mix and compensation
rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.
(ii) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in section 515, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent
enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the
district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12
eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year.
Starting with the allocation for the 2014-15 school year, the prior
school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced price
lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and
research system.
(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through
the annual income verification process required by the national school
lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the
learning assistance program dated February, 2010.
(3) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under this
program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

Sec. 514 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through
part V of this act are for allocations purposes only, unless specified
by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district,
district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has
been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the
requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict
exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act
explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts
provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by
Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic
education unless clearly stated by this act.
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised
rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part
V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative
approval through the budget request process.
(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as
expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2014, unless
specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director
of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may
transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2014 among
the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a
specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment;
employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special
education programs; institutional education programs; transitional
bilingual programs; highly capable; and learning assistance programs.
(5) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.
(6) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall transfer the charter school
authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the
charter school oversight fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $466,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $555,000
Charter School Oversight Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,038,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided solely for the office of
the attorney general costs related to League of Women Voters v. State
of Washington.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this act and chapter 1, Laws
of 2013 3rd sp. sess. (aerospace industry appropriations), each
institution of higher education is expected to enroll and educate at
least the following numbers of full-time equivalent state-supported
students per academic year:

2013-14
Annual Average 2014-15
Annual Average

University of Washington 37,162 ((37,162)) 39,081

Washington State University 22,228 ((22,228)) 23,642

Central Washington University 9,105 ((9,105)) 8,808

Eastern Washington University 8,734 ((8,734)) 9,523

The Evergreen State College ((4,335)) 4,213 ((4,335)) 4,213

Western Washington University ((12,710)) 11,762 ((12,710)) 11,762

State Board for Community &
Technical Colleges

Adult Students 139,237 ((139,237)) 139,927

Running Start Students 11,558 11,558

(2) In achieving or exceeding these enrollment targets, each
institution shall seek to:
(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at branch campuses;
(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that
enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college
campuses; and
(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is
limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core
academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs
duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.
(3) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment,
the University of Washington and Washington State University shall
notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time
student equivalent enrollments budgeted for each of their campuses.

Sec. 602 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS
(1) In order to operate within the state funds appropriated in this
act, the governing boards of the state research universities, the state
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College are authorized
to adopt and adjust tuition and fees for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
academic years as provided in this section.
(2) For the purposes of chapter 28B.15 RCW, the omnibus
appropriations act assumes no increase of tuition levels for resident
undergraduate students over the amounts charged to resident
undergraduate students for the prior year.
(3) Appropriations in sections 606 through 611 of this act are
sufficient to maintain resident undergraduate tuition levels at the
levels charged to resident undergraduate students during the 2012-13
academic year. As a result, for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic
years, the institutions of higher education shall not adopt resident
undergraduate tuition levels that are greater than the tuition levels
assumed in subsection (2) of this section. ((For the 2014-15 academic
year, the institutions of higher education are authorized to adopt
tuition levels for resident undergraduate students that are less than,
equal to, or greater than tuition levels assumed in the omnibus
appropriations act in subsection (2) of this section. However, to the
extent that tuition levels exceed the tuition levels assumed in
subsection (2) of this section, the institution of higher education
shall be subject to the conditions and limitations provided in RCW
28B.15.102.))
(4) Each governing board is authorized to increase tuition charges
to graduate and professional students, and to nonresident undergraduate
students, by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing
board.
(5) Each governing board is authorized to increase summer quarter
or semester tuition fees for resident and nonresident undergraduate,
graduate, and professional students pursuant to RCW 28B.15.067.
(6) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase charges
for fee-based, self-sustaining degree programs, credit courses,
noncredit workshops and courses, and special contract courses by
amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(7) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
services and activities fees for all categories of students as provided
in RCW 28B.15.069.
(8) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
technology fees as provided in RCW 28B.15.069.
(9) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase special
course and lab fees, and health and counseling fees, to the extent
necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost of the
course or service.
(10) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
administrative fees such as, but not limited to, those charged for
application, matriculation, special testing, and transcripts by amounts
judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(11) The state universities, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level
courses taken by running start students if a student seeking a transfer
of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university,
the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the
college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting
institution of higher education.
(12) Appropriations in sections 606 through 611 of this act are
sufficient to implement 2013-2015 collective bargaining agreements at
institutions of higher education negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW.
The institutions may also use these funds for any other purpose
including restoring prior compensation reductions, increasing
compensation, and implementing other collective bargaining agreements.

Sec. 603 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
(1) In order to operate within the state funds appropriated in this
act, the state board is authorized to adopt and adjust tuition and fees
for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years as provided in this section.
(2) For the purposes of chapter 28B.15 RCW, appropriations in the
omnibus appropriations act assumes no increase in tuition levels for
resident undergraduate students over the amounts charged to resident
undergraduate students for the prior year. ((For the 2014-15 academic
year, the state board is authorized to adopt tuition levels for
resident undergraduate students that are less than, equal to, or
greater than tuition levels assumed in the omnibus appropriations act
in this subsection. However, to the extent that tuition levels exceed
the tuition levels assumed in this subsection, the state board shall
retain an additional one percent of operating fees above what is
already retained pursuant to RCW 28B.15.031 for the purposes of RCW
28B.15.820. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, when expending this
additional retained amount, the community and technical colleges are
subject to the conditions and limitations in RCW 28B.15.102.))
Appropriations in section 604 of this act are sufficient to maintain
resident undergraduate tuition levels at the levels charged to resident
undergraduate students during the 2012-13 academic year.
(3) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years, the state board may
increase tuition fees charged to resident undergraduates enrolled in
upper division applied baccalaureate programs as specified in
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Appropriations in section 605 include the restoration of the
three percent reduction in compensation costs taken in the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium. This funding is sufficient to implement 2013-2015
collective bargaining agreements at institutions of higher education
negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW. The colleges may also use the
restored funds for any other purpose including restoring prior
compensation reductions, increasing compensation, and implementing
other collective bargaining agreements.
(5) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
nonresident students by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the
board.
(6) The trustees of the technical colleges are authorized to either
(a) increase operating fees by no more than the percentage increases
authorized for community colleges by the state board; or (b) fully
adopt the tuition fee charge schedule adopted by the state board for
community colleges.
(7) For academic years 2013-14 and 2014-15, the trustees of the
technical colleges are authorized to increase building fees by an
amount judged reasonable in order to progress toward parity with the
building fees charged students attending the community colleges.
(8) The state board is authorized to increase the maximum allowable
services and activities fees as provided in RCW 28B.15.069. The
trustees of the community and technical colleges are authorized to
increase services and activities fees up to the maximum level
authorized by the state board.
(9) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase charges for fee-based, self-sustaining
programs such as summer session, international student contracts, and
special contract courses by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.
(10) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase special course and lab fees to the
extent necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost
of the course or service.
(11) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase administrative fees such as but not
limited to those charged for application, matriculation, special
testing, and transcripts by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.

Sec. 604 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($570,262,000))
$569,849,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($568,999,000))
$567,160,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,548,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,373,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,252,182,000))
$1,249,930,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $33,261,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $33,261,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2014 and at least 7,170 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2015.
(2) $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the aerospace center of
excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:
(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry
sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges,
and universities;
(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student
accessibility and use of the center's web site; and
(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and
job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the
industry.
(4) $181,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $181,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the opportunity center for
employment and education internet technology integration project at
north Seattle community college.
(5) $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for implementation of a maritime
industries training program at south Seattle community college.
(6) $5,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $5,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the student achievement
initiative.
(7) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5624 (STEM or career and tech ed). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass
mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community
and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as
mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online
information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.
(9) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not
use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate
athletics programs.
(10) In accordance with chapter 321, Laws of 2011, the university
center of north Puget Sound is transferred to Washington State
University from the state board for community and technical colleges.
Beginning in fiscal year 2015, this transfer will reduce the state
board for community and technical college's funding level and
enrollment targets by 310 full-time equivalent students. A
corresponding addition is made to the appropriations to Washington
State University.
(11) $13,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $168,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the purposes of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6129 (paraeducator development). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2014, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $410,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the mathematics engineering science
achievement community college programs.

Sec. 605 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($246,897,000))
$246,895,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($245,200,000))
$245,599,000
Geoduck Aquaculture Research Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,998,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Biotoxin Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,741,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,546,000
Aquatic Land Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
State Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($524,892,000))
$525,289,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the geoduck aquaculture research account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington sea
grant program to commission scientific research studies that examine
possible negative and positive effects, including the cumulative
effects and the economic contribution, of evolving shellfish
aquaculture techniques and practices on Washington's economy and marine
ecosystems. The research conducted for the studies is not intended to
be a basis for an increase in the number of shellfish harvesting
permits available and should be coordinated with any research efforts
related to ocean acidification. The University of Washington must
submit an annual report detailing any findings and outline the progress
of the study, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1st of each year.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.
(3) $4,459,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $4,459,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the expansion of computer
science and engineering enrollments. The university will work with the
education research and data center to establish program baselines and
demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each
September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that
provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the
preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per
student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income
students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are
enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.
(4) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for creation of a clean energy
institute. The institute shall integrate physical sciences and
engineering with a research focus on energy storage and solar energy.
(5) $3,000,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center
for aerospace innovation technology.
(6) Within existing resources the University of Washington may:
(a) Form and implement an integrated innovation institute and research,
planning, and outreach initiatives at the Olympic national resources
center; and (b) accredit a four-year undergraduate forestry program
from the society of American foresters. Accreditation may occur in
conjunction with reaccreditation of the master of forest resources
program.
(7) $700,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation and $1,120,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the center on ocean acidification
and related work necessary to implement the recommendations of the
governor's blue ribbon task force on ocean acidification. The
university shall provide staffing for this purpose.
(8) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.
(9) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the University of Washington-Tacoma to
develop a law school.

Sec. 606 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($156,616,000))
$156,598,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,701,000))
$159,671,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,995,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($348,312,000))
$350,264,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within existing resources, Washington State University shall
establish an accredited forestry program.
(2) $2,856,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,857,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the expansion of computer
science and engineering enrollments. The university will work with the
education research and data center to establish program baselines and
demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each
September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that
provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the
preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per
student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income
students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are
enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the Ruckelshaus center to collaborate
with local governments, the media, and representatives of the public
regarding public record requests made to local government. The center
shall facilitate meetings and discussions and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report shall include information
on:
(a) Recommendations related to balancing open public records with
concerns of local governments related to interfering with the work of
the local government;
(b) Resources necessary to accommodate requests;
(c) Potential harassment of government employees;
(d) Potential safety concerns of people named in the record;
(e) Potentially assisting criminal activity; and
(f) Other issues brought forward by the participants.
The center shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2013.
(4) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington State
University agricultural research center to conduct public outreach and
education related to nonlethal methods of mitigating conflicts between
livestock and large wild carnivores. Of the amounts provided in this
subsection, $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to the center to conduct a
detailed analysis of such methods. The amounts appropriated in this
subsection may not be subject to an administrative fee or charge, and
must be used for costs directly associated with the research and
analysis.
(5) $2,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $3,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expansion of medical education
and biomedical research in Spokane.
(6) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in
this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.
(7)(a) In accordance with chapter 321, Laws of 2011, the university
center of north Puget Sound is transferred to Washington State
University from the state board for community and technical colleges.
Beginning in fiscal year 2015, this transfer will increase Washington
State University's fiscal year funding level by $1,989,000 and
enrollment targets by 310 full-time equivalent students. A
corresponding reduction is made to the appropriations to the state
board for community and technical colleges. Of the $1,989,000 and the
310 full-time equivalent enrollments transferred to Washington State
University, $1,635,000 and 284 full-time equivalent students are
provided solely as follows:
(i) $357,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and 66 full-time equivalent students shall be contracted to
Central Washington University;
(ii) $1,134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and 193 full-time equivalent students shall be contracted to
Western Washington University; and
(iii) $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 and 25 full-time equivalent students shall be contracted to
University of Washington-Bothell for the bachelor of science nursing
program.
(b) Washington State University shall continue to distribute
funding and full-time equivalent students at the levels specified in
this subsection, except as follows:
(i) Programs in which enrollment falls significantly and remains
lower over several years may be reviewed by the university center of
north Puget Sound coordinating and planning council for a level of
funding proportional to enrollment; and
(ii) Programs in which enrollment grows significantly over several
years may be reviewed by the university center of north Puget Sound
coordinating and planning council for a higher level of funding when
new funding becomes available.

Sec. 607 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,674,000))
$31,381,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,619,000))
$32,326,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,470,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,763,000))
$79,177,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 shall be expended on the Northwest
autism center.
(2) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.
(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the expansion of engineering
enrollments. The university will work with the education research and
data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate enrollment
increases. By September 1, 2015, and each September 1st thereafter,
the university shall provide a report that provides the specific detail
on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal year, including
but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and
the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process
changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many
students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs
above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.

Sec. 608 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,719,000))
$29,720,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,533,000))
$30,532,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,076,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,328,000))
$79,328,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the college of education to conduct a
study identifying the duties encompassed in a state-funded teacher's
typical work day. The study must include an estimate of the percent of
a teacher's typical day that is spent on teaching related duties and
the percentage of the teacher's day that is spent on duties that are
not directly related to teaching. The university shall submit a report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(2) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient for the
university to develop a plan to create an online degree granting entity
that awards degrees based on an alternative credit model. The
university shall submit a final plan by December 1, 2013, to the higher
education committees of the legislature.
(3) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.
(4) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the expansion of computer science and
engineering enrollments. The university will work with the education
research and data center to establish program baselines and demonstrate
enrollment increases. By September 1, 2015, and each September 1st
thereafter, the university shall provide a report that provides the
specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding fiscal
year, including but not limited to the cost per student, student
completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in
each program, any process changes or best- practices implemented by the
college, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and
engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.

Sec. 609 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,563,000))
$18,352,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,911,000))
$18,432,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,924,000))
$42,234,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((3))) (1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state
institute for public policy to conduct a comprehensive retrospective
outcome evaluation and return on investment analysis of the early
learning childhood program pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5904 (high
quality early learning). This evaluation is due December 15, 2014. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((4))) (2) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state
institute for public policy to develop a risk assessment instrument for
patients committed for involuntary treatment in Washington state.
(((5))) (3) $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $27,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the Washington state
institute for public policy to prepare an inventory of evidence-based
and research-based effective practices, activities, and programs for
use by school districts in the learning assistance program pursuant to
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946 (student educational
outcomes), including partnerships with community-based organizations
that deliver academic and nonacademic supports to students who are
significantly at-risk of not being successful in school, such as one-to-one services to overcome barriers of success at school and school-wide afterschool academic support. The initial inventory is due by
August 1, 2014, and shall be updated every two years thereafter. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((6))) (4) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to provide expertise to the department of corrections
on the implementation of programming that follows the risk needs
responsivity model. In consultation with the department of
corrections, the institute will systematically review selected programs
for outcome measures.
(5) The Washington state institute for public policy shall examine
the drug offender sentencing alternative (DOSA) for offenders sentenced
to residential treatment in the community. The institute shall examine
its effectiveness on recidivism and conduct a benefit-cost analysis.
The institute shall report its findings to the appropriate committee of
the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(((7))) (6) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The
Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center
and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.
(((9))) (7) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the
board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy
may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2013-2015
work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(((10))) (8) The Evergreen State College shall not use funds
appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics
programs.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for Washington state institute for public
policy to conduct a comprehensive study of tobacco and e-cigarette
prevention programs that will yield the highest public health benefit
and reduce tobacco use. In conducting this study, the institute shall
identify: (a) The most effective population-based approaches and what
targeted populations will yield the greatest return on investment; and
(b) other state models, including the "Friday night light" program in
California, that yield the greatest likelihood of reducing state health
care costs. The institute shall work with the department of health to
determine which programs can be brought to scale most efficiently. The
institute shall report its findings to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 31, 2014.
(10) $154,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6064 (school days/use by districts). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $263,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the purposes of Senate Bill No. 6555
(education investment reviews). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2014, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 610 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,542,000))
$44,518,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,377,000))
$44,351,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,050,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,969,000))
$101,919,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,497,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $1,498,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the expansion of computer
science and engineering enrollments. The university will work with the
education research and data center to establish program baselines and
demonstrate enrollment increases. By September 1, 2014, and each
September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide a report that
provides the specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the
preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to the cost per
student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income
students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the college, and how many students are
enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the 2012-2013 academic year baseline.
(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.

Sec. 611 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,307,000))
$5,297,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,318,000))
$5,432,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,817,000))
$4,816,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,442,000))
$15,545,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The student achievement council is authorized to increase or
establish fees for initial degree authorization, degree authorization
renewal, degree authorization reapplication, new program applications,
and new site applications pursuant to RCW 28B.85.060.
(2) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the student achievement council to
conduct an assessment of the higher education needs of the city of
Covington. In conducting this assessment and making recommendations,
the student achievement council shall ensure that consideration is
given to online education programs as well as programs that coexist
within the community and technical college system.

Sec. 612 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,122,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,674,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,648,000))
$11,655,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,000))
$334,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,036,000))
$73,651,000
Washington Opportunity Pathways Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($684,514,000))
$722,436,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $237,454,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014, $237,455,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation, and $147,000,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways
account--state appropriation are provided solely for student financial
aid payments under the state need grant and state work study programs
including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state
work study program.
(2) Changes made to the state need grant program in the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium are continued in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium
including aligning increases in awards given to private institutions
with the annual tuition increases for public research institutions or
the private institution's average annual tuition increase experience of
3.5 percent per year, whichever is less((, and reducing the awards for
students who first enrolled as a new student in for-profit institutions
as of the 2011-2012 academic year or thereafter by fifty percent,
except that one-half of the fifty percent reduction shall be restored
on July 1, 2013, for students attending regionally accredited for-profit institutions)). For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, it is the
intent of the legislature to reconsider grant awards for students at
private four-year institutions.
(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011
and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of
wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident
student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods
to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student
need.
(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or
below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for
family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five
credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits.
Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the estimated amount by
which Pell grant increases exceed projected increases in the
noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for students with incomes
between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the
following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes
below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family
incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with
family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students
with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for
students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.
(5)(a) Students who are eligible for the college bound scholarship
shall be given priority for the state need grant program if the
students have applied by the institution's priority financial aid
deadline and have completed their financial aid file in a timely
manner. These eligible college bound students whose family incomes are
in the 0-65 median family income ranges shall be awarded the maximum
state need grant for which they are eligible under state policies and
may not be denied maximum state need grant funding due to institutional
policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students.
(b) In calculating the college bound award, public institutions of
higher education shall be subject to the conditions and limitations in
RCW 28B.15.102 and shall not utilize college bound funds to offset
tuition costs from rate increases in excess of levels authorized in
section 603, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 and those assumed in section 603
of this act.
(6) (($36,036,000)) $48,297,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the college bound
scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session.
This amount assumes that college bound scholarship recipients will
receive priority for state need grant awards in fiscal year 2014 and
fiscal year 2015. If this policy of prioritization is not fully
achieved, it is the intent of this legislation to provide supplemental
appropriations in the 2014 supplemental operating budget.
(7) $2,236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $2,236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for the passport to college
program. The maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board
shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support
services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program
and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal
years 2014 and 2015 for this purpose.
(8) In developing the skilled and educated workforce report
pursuant to RCW 28B.77.080(3), the council shall use the bureau of
labor statistics analysis of the education and training requirements of
occupations, in addition to any other method the council may choose to
use, to assess the number and type of higher education and training
credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled and
educated workforce.
(9) $25,354,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to meet state match requirements
associated with the opportunity scholarship program.

Sec. 613 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,582,000))
$1,556,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,478,000))
$1,564,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,260,000))
$54,823,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,320,000))
$57,987,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the board shall not designate
recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence or
recognize them at award ceremonies as provided in RCW 28C.04.535.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely for the board to coordinate and
collaborate with the members of the health care personnel shortage task
force to plan a health care workforce sentinel employer network,
contract for the implementation of that network, and analyze and report
the initial results. This network will provide an early detection
information system to support rapid response of educational and
training institutions to changes in demand for health care occupations,
and the changing responsibilities and skills needed in occupations
across the state's health care sector. The board and the task force
shall consult with other health care system stakeholders in the design
of this network and in prioritization of the initial network data
collection. The board and the task force shall take reasonable
measures to recruit a diverse mix of employers by location, provider
type, unionization of workforce, and size. The data collected will
provide timely information to the board, the task force, health care
industry, education and training providers, professional organizations,
and labor stakeholders, a minimum of one time in fiscal year 2015, and
at minimum, three times per year once the network is fully implemented.

Sec. 614 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,253,000))
$29,738,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,689,000))
$51,792,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($293,652,000))
$299,640,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Opportunity Pathways Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
Home Visiting Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,868,000
Home Visiting Services Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,756,000
Children's Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($482,398,000))
$487,024,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $20,229,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $36,474,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account
appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education
assistance program services. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a
portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars
required to receive federal child care and development fund grant
dollars.
(2) $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, and $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for child care resource and
referral network services.
(3) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.
(4) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to fund the child care
subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on
behalf of the department of early learning.
(5) $1,434,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014, $1,434,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for expenditure into the home
visiting services account. This funding is intended to meet federal
maintenance of effort requirements and to secure private matching
funds.
(6)(a) $153,717,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the working connections child care program under
RCW 43.215.135.
(b) In addition to groups that were given prioritized access to the
working connections child care program effective March 1, 2011, the
department shall also give prioritized access into the program to
families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not
living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a
high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.
(7) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with
the office of financial management and the department of social and
health services shall report quarterly enrollments and active caseload
for the working connections child care program to the legislative
fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight
task force. The report shall also identify the number of cases
participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and
working connections child care.
(8) (($1,025,000)) $1,213,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2014, (($1,025,000)) $1,761,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015, and $13,424,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
seasonal child care program. If federal sequestration cuts are
realized, cuts to the seasonal child care program must be proportional
to other federal reductions made within the department.
(9) $3,572,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014((,)) and $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015((, and $4,304,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation)) are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child
care (MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services
to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment
services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children.
Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the
department of social and health services children's administration. In
addition to referrals made by children's administration, the department
shall authorize services for children referred to the MTCC program, as
long as the children meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in
the Washington state plan for the MTCC program.
(a) Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection, $60,000 per
fiscal year may be used by the department for administering the MTCC
program, if needed.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,050,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 is provided
solely to continue providing services in the event of losing federal
funding for the MTCC program. To the extent that the moneys provided
in this subsection (9)(b) are not necessary for this purpose, the
amounts provided shall lapse.
(10) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and (($150,000)) $250,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for a contract
with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early
literacy for children through pediatric office visits.
(11) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for the department to complete development
work of the electronic benefits transfer system.
(12) (($793,000)) $221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2014 and (($796,000)) $1,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for
implementation of an electronic benefits transfer system. To the
maximum extent possible, the department shall work to integrate this
system with the department of social and health services payment
system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of the project management
oversight standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer.
(13) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5595 (child care reform). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2013, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14)(a)(i) The department of early learning is required to provide
to the education research and data center, housed at the office of
financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood
programs. These programs include the early support for infants and
toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and
the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs
including license exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor
care. The data provided by the department to the education research
data center must include information on children who participate in
these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the
child received services at a particular facility.
(ii) The ECEAP early learning professionals must enter
qualifications into the department's professional development registry
during the 2013-14 school year. By October 2015, the department must
provide ECEAP early learning professional data to the education
research data center.
(iii) The department must request federally funded head start
programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the
education research data center that is equivalent to what is being
provided for state-funded programs.
(iv) The education research and data center must provide a report
on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house
of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and
means committee using available data by November 2013 for the school
year ending in 2012 and again in March 2014 for the school year ending
in 2013.
(b) The department, in consultation with the department of social
and health services, must withhold payment for services to early
childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and
the dates a child received services at a particular facility.

Sec. 615 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,032,000))
$6,036,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,805,000))
$5,810,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,852,000))
$11,861,000

Sec. 616 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,615,000))
$8,746,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,591,000))
$8,649,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,206,000))
$17,395,000

Sec. 617 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,125,000))
$1,093,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,101,000))
$1,120,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,074,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000))
$31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,312,000))
$4,318,000

Sec. 618 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,123,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,150,000))
$2,148,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,273,000))
$4,271,000

Sec. 619 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 620 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,600,000))
$1,611,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,530,000))
$1,699,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,130,000))
$3,310,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($741,362,000))
$842,140,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,060,322,000))
$962,905,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,297,000))
$8,164,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($269,000))
$473,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,000))
$2,621,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,320,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply
Development Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,808,781,000))
$1,818,806,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2014 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2014.

Sec. 702 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,138,000))
$4,139,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,138,000))
$4,139,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,276,000))
$8,278,000

Sec. 703 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,636,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,102,000))
$16,103,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,215,000))
$139,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($181,953,000))
$181,692,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2014 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2014.

Sec. 704 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,726,000))
$1,401,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,726,000))
$1,401,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($867,000))
$2,156,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,000))
$66,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000))
$324,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply
Development Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,421,000))
$5,367,000

Sec. 705 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,100,000))
$3,600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,600,000))
$4,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account for emergency fire
suppression by the department of natural resources and to complete
projects necessary to recover from previously declared disasters.

Sec. 706 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,386,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,386,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,772,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the
appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the
amounts designated to support public health services, including public
health nursing:

Health District FY 2014 FY 2015 2013-15
Biennium

Adams County Health District $121,213 $121,213 $242,426

Asotin County Health District $159,890 $159,890 $319,780

Benton-Franklin Health District $1,614,337 $1,614,337 $3,228,674

Chelan-Douglas Health District $399,634 $399,634 $799,268

Clallam County Health and Human Services
Department $291,401 $291,401 $582,802

Clark County Health District $1,767,341 $1,767,341 $3,534,682

Skamania County Health Department $111,327 $111,327 $222,654

Columbia County Health District $119,991 $119,991 $239,982

Cowlitz County Health Department $477,981 $477,981 $955,962

Garfield County Health District $93,154 $93,154 $186,308

Grant County Health District $297,761 $297,762 $595,523

Grays Harbor Health Department $335,666 $335,666 $671,332

Island County Health Department $255,224 $225,224 $510,448

Jefferson County Health and Human Services $184,080 $184,080 $368,160

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health $10,558,598 (($10,558,598))
$12,685,521 (($21,117,196))
$23,244,119

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District $997,476 $997,476 $1,994,952

Kittitas County Health Department $198,979 $198,979 $397,958

Klickitat County Health Department $153,784 $153,784 $307,568

Lewis County Health Department $263,134 $263,134 $526,268

Lincoln County Health Department $113,917 $113,917 $227,834

Mason County Department of Health Services $227,448 $227,448 $454,896

Okanogan County Health District $169,882 $169,882 $339,764

Pacific County Health Department $169,075 $169,075 $338,150

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department $4,143,169 $4,143,169 $8,286,338

San Juan County Health and Community Services $2,253,493 (($2,253,493))
$126,569 (($4,506,986))
$2,380,062

Skagit County Health Department $449,745 $449,745 $899,490

Snohomish Health District $3,433,291 $3,433,291 $6,866,582

Spokane County Health District $2,877,318 $2,877,318 $5,574,636

Northeast Tri-County Health District $249,303 $249,303 $498,606

Thurston County Health Department $1,046,897 $1,046,897 $2,093,794

Wahkiakum County Health Department $93,181 (($9,180))
$93,181 (($186,361))
$186,362

Walla Walla County-City Health Department $302,173 $302,173 $604,346

Whatcom County Health Department $1,214,301 $1,214,301 $2,428,602

Whitman County Health Department $189,355 $189,355 $378,710

Yakima Health District $1,052,482 $1,052,482 $2,104,964

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $36,386,001 $36,386,001 $72,772,002

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
COSTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,126,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall
distribute $942,000 to Clallam county, $148,000 to Mason county, and
$36,000 to Klickitat county for extraordinary criminal justice costs
pursuant to RCW 43.330.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--ATTORNEY GENERAL EXPENSES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,391,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,797,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,356,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to
provide state agency expenditure authority for increased legal services
from the attorney general's office, including attorney salary
adjustments to address recruitment and retention issues.
(2) The appropriation from dedicated funds and accounts shall be
made in the amounts specified and from the dedicated funds and accounts
specified in LEAP Document . . . . dated February . . ., 2014, which is
hereby incorporated by reference. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in LEAP Document . . . .
and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly. The office of
financial management shall make any further allotment adjustments
necessary to reflect agency mergers or consolidations assumed in this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS EXPENSES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to
provide state agency expenditure authority for funding the replacement
of laptop and desktop computers in the office of administrative
hearings.
(2) The appropriation from dedicated funds and accounts shall be
made in the amounts specified and from the dedicated funds and accounts
specified in LEAP Document . . . . dated February . . ., 2014, which
is hereby incorporated by reference. The office of financial
management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in
the amounts specified and to the state agencies specified in LEAP
Document . . . . and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly. The
office of financial management shall make any further allotment
adjustments necessary to reflect agency mergers or consolidations
assumed in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE
SERVICES--CENTRAL SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $(1,728,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $(1,259,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $(2,987,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to
reduce state agency appropriations to reflect reduced agency
expenditures for central services provided by the department of
enterprise services, including the access Washington web portal,
one-stop business portal, the small agency human resources service,
personnel services, and subsidized printer services.
(2) The reductions in state agency appropriations from the state
general fund and dedicated funds and accounts shall be made in the
amounts and agencies specified and from the funds and accounts
specified in LEAP Document . . . . dated February . . ., 2014, which
is hereby incorporated by reference. The office of financial
management shall adjust appropriation schedules accordingly. The
office of financial management shall make any further allotment
adjustments necessary to reflect agency mergers or consolidations
assumed in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS
The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are
appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2014, unless
otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and
corporations for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be
disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of
enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of
criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to
RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:
(1) Tony M. Noble, claim number 99970075 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,670
(2) Patrick Earl, claim number 99970076 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,799
(3) Stephen J. Felice, claim number 99970076 . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,275
(4) Michael Felice, claim number 99970076 . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,809
(5) Noe Angel Aranda Hernandez, claim number
99970077 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500
(6) Anderson Durham, claim number 99970071 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
(7) Chase Balzer, claim number 99970078 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,953
(8) Kent Wescott, claim number 99970079 . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,447
(9) Tommy Villanueva, claim number 99970080 . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,099

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE EMPLOYEE INSURANCE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $(35,958,000)
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $(5,249,000)
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $(673,000)
Special Insurance Contribution Adjustment
Revolving Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $(8,967,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $(50,847,000)

The appropriation adjustments in this section are made solely to
reduce agency and higher education institution appropriations to
reflect savings resulting from reduced employee insurance benefits
contribution rates, effective July 1, 2014, as provided in part 9 of
this act, in the amounts specified in LEAP Document 2014-GZGO, dated
February 21, 2014, which is hereby incorporated by reference. The
office of financial management shall adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly. The office of financial management shall make any further
allotment adjustments necessary to reflect agency mergers or
consolidations assumed in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--FOR LOCAL LIQUOR EXCISE TAX
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,151,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: If the director of the office of financial
management determines that the amount of $5,151,000 has been deposited
into the general fund--state from the dedicated marijuana account--state created in RCW 69.50.530 in fiscal year 2015, the director shall
notify the treasurer to distribute the funds provided in this section
to the counties, cities, and towns in the following proportions: (a)
Twenty percent of the moneys must be divided among and distributed to
the counties of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW
66.08.200; and (b) eighty percent of the moneys must be divided among
and distributed to the cities and towns of the state in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 66.08.210. If the director does not make a
determination by June 30, 2015, the amount provided in this section
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $444,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for expenditure into the common school construction
account--state on July 1, 2015, for an interest payment pursuant to RCW
90.38.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 4 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--NATURAL RESOURCES REAL
PROPERTY REPLACEMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for expenditure into the natural resources real
property replacement account--state on July 1, 2015, for an interest
payment pursuant to RCW 90.38.130.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,248,000))
$8,591,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,894,000))
$53,709,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,068,000))
$5,985,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation
program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$3,154,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly funded
autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,158,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,120,000))
$76,932,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation.
When making the fiscal year 2015 distribution to
Grant county, the state treasurer shall reduce
the amount by $140,000 and distribute the remainder
to the county. This is the first of three reductions
that will be made to reimburse the state for a
nonqualifying extraordinary criminal justice
act payment made to Grant county in fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,983,000))
$78,721,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,550,000))
$30,519,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,134,000))
$19,584,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,744,000))
$17,191,000
Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account
Appropriation for distribution to local taxing
jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue
redistribution effect of the sourcing law
changes . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,488,000))
$49,420,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Confederated Tribes of the Colville
Reservation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,760,000))
$7,752,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Spokane Tribe of Indians . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,025,000))
$5,011,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,876,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($434,259,000))
$462,814,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,469,000))
$2,409,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 803 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,646,000))
$1,606,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium to
all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office
of financial management. The distributions to any city that
substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1,
1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with
criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the
county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to
cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation
including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk
driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter
208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 804 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control
funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,706,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest
reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,636,000))
$24,446,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,408,000))
$26,218,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 805 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, (($10,100,000)) $10,688,000 for fiscal
year 2014 and (($10,100,000)) $10,956,000 for
fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,200,000))
$21,644,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales
and use tax account, (($25,284,000)) $24,436,000
for fiscal year 2014 and (($25,204,000)) $24,984,000
for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,488,000))
$49,420,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
education legacy trust account, $138,622,000 for
fiscal year 2014 and $138,622,000 for fiscal year
2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,244,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $9,000,000 for fiscal year
2014 and $9,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account: For
transfer to the Columbia River basin taxable bond
water supply development account, an amount not to
exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
Employment Training Finance Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year
2014 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tuition Recovery Trust Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $1,250,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $1,250,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
General Fund: For transfer to the child and family
reinvestment account, (($3,800,000)) $1,656,000 for
fiscal year 2014 and (($2,691,000)) $992,000
for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,491,000))
$2,648,000
Flood Control Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed the actual
amount of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,221,000))
$168,053,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund from the amounts deposited in the
account that are attributable to the annual
strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2014 . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund from the amounts deposited in the
account that are attributable to the annual
strategic contribution payment received in fiscal
year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000
It is the intent of the legislature to transfer the full amounts
received as strategic contribution payments in the tobacco settlement
account to the education legacy trust account in the 2015-2017 fiscal
biennium.
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2014 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,515,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,515,000
The transfer to the life sciences discovery fund is subject to the
following conditions:
(1) ((The life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees
shall begin preparing to become a self-sustaining entity capable of
operating without direct state subsidy by the time the tobacco
strategic contribution supplemental payments end in fiscal year 2017.))
The life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees shall
terminate all funding for contracts by June 30, 2014.
(2) $250,000 of the appropriation in fiscal year 2014 ((and
$250,000 of the appropriation in fiscal year 2015 are)) is provided
solely to promote the development and delivery of global health
technologies and products.
(a) The life sciences discovery fund authority must either
administer a grant application, review, and reward process, or contract
with a qualified nonprofit organization for these services. State
moneys must be provided for grants to entities for the development,
production, promotion, and delivery of global health technologies and
products. Grant award criteria must include:
(i) The quality of the proposed research or the proposed technical
assistance in product development or production process design. Any
grant funds awarded for research activities must be awarded for
nonbasic research that will assist in the commercialization or
manufacture of global health technologies;
(ii) The potential for the grant recipient to improve global health
outcomes;
(iii) The potential for the grant to leverage additional funding
for the development of global health technologies and products;
(iv) The potential for the grant to stimulate, or promote technical
skills training for, employment in the development of global health
technologies in the state; and
(v) The willingness of the grant recipient, when appropriate, to
enter into royalty or licensing income agreements with the authority.
(((b) The authority, or the contractor of the authority, must
report information including the types of products and research funded,
the funding leveraged by the grants, and the number and types of jobs
created as a result of the grants, to the economic development
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.))
Life Sciences Discovery Fund: For transfer to the education legacy
trust account, $34,253,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,253,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to the
geoduck aquaculture research account, $150,000 for
fiscal year 2014 and $150,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Health Benefit Exchange Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,514,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $437,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $2,746,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,183,000
Resources Management Cost Account--Aquatics: For transfer
to the marine resources stewardship trust account,
$1,850,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $1,850,000 for
fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Legal Services Revolving Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $976,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $1,477,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,453,000
Personnel Service Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $733,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$733,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,466,000
Data Processing Revolving Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $4,069,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $4,070,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,139,000
Home Security Fund Account: For transfer to the
transitional housing operating and rent account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
Professional Engineers' Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $956,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$957,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,000
Electrical License Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $1,700,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$1,700,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
Business and Professions Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, (($1,838,000)) $2,838,000 for fiscal
year 2014 and (($1,800,000)) $2,800,000 for fiscal
year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,638,000)) $5,638,000
Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, (($1,000,000)) $2,850,000 for fiscal
year 2014 and (($1,000,000)) $2,850,000 for fiscal
year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000)) $5,700,000
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $2,500,000
for fiscal year 2014 and $2,500,000 for fiscal year
2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Real Estate Commission Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $1,700,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $1,700,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
State Lottery Account: For transfer to the education
legacy trust account, $6,050,000 for fiscal year 2014
and $6,050,000 for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,100,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
radioactive mixed waste account, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2014 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the education savings
account, $387.04 for fiscal year 2014 . . . . . . . . . . . . $387.04

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 901 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 932 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS
No agreement was reached between the governor and the health care
super coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Appropriations in this act for fiscal year
2014 for state agencies, including institutions of higher education are
sufficient to continue the provisions of the 2011-2013 collective
bargaining agreement. An agreement was reached between the governor
and the health care super coalition under the provisions of chapter
41.80 RCW for fiscal year 2015. The agreement includes employer
contributions to premiums at 85 percent of the total weighted average
of the projected health care premiums. Appropriations in this act for
fiscal year 2015 for state agencies, including institutions of higher
education are sufficient to fund the provisions of the fiscal year 2015
collective bargaining agreement, and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, wellness programs, and similar benefits or services for
members of public employee benefits board health plans, public
employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan,
shall not exceed $782 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2014. For
fiscal year 2015 the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed
(($763)) $703 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make
any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with the
collective bargaining agreement and RCW 41.05.065. Beginning July 1,
2014, the board shall add a $25 per month surcharge to the premiums due
from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge of not less than
$50 per month to the premiums due from members who cover a spouse or
domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to
enroll in other employer-based group health insurance that has benefits
and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the
actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the
largest enrollment.
(c) Consistent with the implementation of managed competition, the
public employees benefits board must establish premium rates for
consumer directed health plans at levels that reflect the projected
lower enrollee claim expenses resulting from higher point-of-service
cost sharing in those plans.
(d) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors
identified after September 30, 2013, must be reserved for funding
employee health benefits in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.
(e) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. The subsidy provided for calendar years 2014 and 2015
shall be up to $150 per month.

Sec. 902 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 933 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
represented employees outside the super coalition for health benefits,
and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, wellness programs, and similar benefits or services for
members of public employee benefits board health plans, public
employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan,
shall not exceed $782 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2014. For
fiscal year 2015 the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed
(($763)) $703 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make
any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065. Beginning July 1, 2014, the board shall add a $25 per month
surcharge to the premiums due from members who use tobacco products and
a surcharge of not less than $50 per month to the premiums due from
members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or
domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in other employer-based group
health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value
of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public
employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment.
(c) Consistent with the implementation of managed competition, the
public employees benefits board must establish premium rates for
consumer directed health plans at levels that reflect the projected
lower enrollee claim expenses resulting from higher point-of-service
cost sharing in those plans.
(d) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors
identified after September 30, 2013, must be reserved for funding
employee health benefits in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.
(e) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. The subsidy provided for calendar years 2014 and 2015
shall be up to $150 per month.

Sec. 903 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 937 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES--SEIU LOCAL 925
CHILDCARE WORKERS
(1) An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
service employees international union local 925 under the provisions of
chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. Funding is
provided for increases to health care, scholarship funding and
non-standard hours bonus.
(2) An agreement has been reached between the governor and the
service employees international union local 925 under the provisions of
chapter 41.56 RCW for fiscal year 2015. Funding is provided to
increase the child care subsidy rates for licensed and exempt family
child care providers by four percent on July 1, 2014, and another four
percent on January 1, 2015. Two million dollars is also provided to
fund an early achievers tiered reimbursement pilot project for licensed
family child care providers.

Sec. 904 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 939 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies,
including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, wellness programs, and similar benefits or services for
members of public employee benefits board health plans, public
employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan,
shall not exceed $782 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2014. For
fiscal year 2015 the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed
(($763)) $703 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require or make
any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065. Beginning July 1, 2014, the board shall add a $25 per month
surcharge to the premiums due from members who use tobacco products and
a surcharge of not less than $50 per month to the premiums due from
members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or
domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in other employer-based group
health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value
of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public
employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment.
(c) Consistent with the implementation of managed competition, the
public employees benefits board must establish premium rates for
consumer directed health plans at levels that reflect the projected
lower enrollee claim expenses resulting from higher point-of-service
cost sharing in those plans.
(d) All savings resulting from reduced claim costs or other factors
identified after September 30, 2013, must be reserved for funding
employee health benefits in the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.
(e) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. The subsidy provided for calendar years 2014 and 2015
shall be up to $150 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $64.40 per month beginning
September 1, 2013, and $70.39 beginning September 1, 2014; and
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $64.40 each month beginning September 1, 2013, and
$70.39 beginning September 1, 2014, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection (3) shall not apply to employees of a technical
college, school district, or educational service district who purchase
insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

Sec. 905 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 943 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
ACQUISITION OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS
(1) Financial contracts for the acquisition of the information
technology projects authorized in this section must be approved jointly
by the office of the financial management and the office of the chief
information officer. Information technology projects funded under this
section shall meet the following requirements:
(a) The project reduces costs and achieves economies of scale by
leveraging statewide investments in systems and data and other common
or enterprise-wide solutions within and across state agencies;
(b) The project begins or continues replacement of legacy
information technology systems and replacing these systems with modern
and more efficient information technology systems;
(c) The project improves the ability of an agency to recover from
major disaster;
(d) The project provides future savings and efficiencies for an
agency through reduced operating costs, improved customer service, or
increased revenue collections; and
(e) Preference for project approval must be given to an agency that
has prior approval from the office of the chief information officer, an
approved business plan, and where the primary hurdle to project funding
is the lack of funding capacity.
(2) The following state agencies may enter into financial contracts
to finance expenditures for the acquisition and implementation of the
following information technology projects for up to the respective
amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW:
(a) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, (($10,000,000))
$13,500,000 for the department of enterprise services time, leave, and
attendance pilot project;
(b) $3,867,000 for the Washington state patrol for continuation of
the mobile office platform;
(c) (($8,500,000 for the department of social and health services
conversion to the tenth version of the world health organization's
international classification of diseases;
(d) $5,558,000)) $3,315,000 for the department of early learning
system implementation of electronic benefit transfers;
(((e))) (d) $4,323,000 for the department of corrections for radio
infrastructure upgrades.
(3) The office of financial management with assistance from the
office of the chief information officer will report to the governor and
fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1st of each year on
the status of distributions and expenditures on information technology
projects and improved statewide or agency performance results achieved
by project funding.
(4) If the Washington state department of transportation enters
into financial contracts pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the
acquisition and implementation of a time, leave, and labor distribution
system, the authorization provided to the department of enterprise
services in subsection (2)(a) of this section expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 A new section is added to chapter 28A.710
RCW to read as follows:
The charter schools oversight account is hereby created in the
state treasury. All moneys received by the commission under RCW
28A.710.110 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 907 RCW 41.05.130 and 1988 c 107 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state health care authority administrative account is hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account, including
unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after
appropriation by statute, and may be used only for operating expenses
of the authority, and during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, for health
care related analysis provided to the legislature by the office of the
state actuary.

Sec. 908 RCW 43.43.839 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 922 are each
amended to read as follows:
The fingerprint identification account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from incremental charges of
fingerprint checks requested for noncriminal justice purposes and
electronic background requests shall be deposited in the account.
Receipts for fingerprint checks by the federal bureau of investigation
may also be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the cost of record checks. Only the chief of the
state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW. No appropriation is required for expenditures prior
to July 1, 1997. After June 30, 1997, the account shall be subject to
appropriation. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the fingerprint identification account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
account. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, funds in the account
may be used for expenditures that support the criminal records
management division of the state patrol.

Sec. 909 RCW 43.101.220 and 2009 c 146 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and
municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982,
shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with
standards adopted by the commission. The training shall be
successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the
personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and
shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.
(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room
and board for noncommuting attendees, except during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, when the employing county, municipal corporation, or
state agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of
the cost of training its personnel.
(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the
Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The
Washington state department of corrections is responsible for
identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and
providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it.
In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall
consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals
both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from
labor organizations.
(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the
responsibility of developing and defining training standards and
providing training for community corrections officers employed within
the community corrections division of the department of corrections.

Sec. 910 RCW 43.320.110 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 909 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115, and which shall
be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the
payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of
reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation
of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements
from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial
institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys available in the
financial services regulation fund may be expended on the authorization
of the director of the department of commerce solely for the purpose of
funding local mediation and alternative dispute resolution centers.

Sec. 911 RCW 43.350.070 and 2011 c 5 s 916 are each amended to
read as follows:
The life sciences discovery fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Only the board or the board's designee may authorize
expenditures from the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be made
only for purposes of this chapter. Administrative expenses of the
authority, including staff support, may be paid only from the fund.
Revenues to the fund consist of transfers made by the legislature from
strategic contribution payments deposited in the tobacco settlement
account under RCW 43.79.480, moneys received pursuant to contribution
agreements entered into pursuant to RCW 43.350.030, moneys received
from gifts, grants, and bequests, and interest earned on the fund.
During the ((2009-2011)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer to other state funds or accounts such amounts as represent the
((excess)) balance of the life sciences discovery fund.

Sec. 912 RCW 50.16.010 and 2013 c 189 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund and an administrative contingency fund, which shall
be administered by the commissioner exclusively for the purposes of
this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050 shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304);
(viii) The portion of the additional penalties as provided in RCW
50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of benefits overpaid
or deemed overpaid; and
(ix) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title, except the portion of the additional penalties as
provided in RCW 50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of
benefits overpaid or deemed overpaid;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, moneys available
in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be expended upon the
direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the governor,
whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure is necessary
solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(d)(i) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys available in
the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as
appropriated by the legislature for: (A) The cost of the job skills or
worker retraining programs at the community and technical colleges and
administrative costs at the state board for community and technical
colleges; and (B) reemployment services such as business and project
development assistance, local economic development capacity building,
and local economic development financial assistance at the department
of commerce. The remaining appropriation may be expended as specified
in (c) of this subsection.
(ii) During the ((2009-2011)) 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys
available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in
the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be
expended by the department of social and health services as
appropriated by the legislature for employment and training services
and programs in the WorkFirst program, and for the administrative costs
of state agencies participating in the WorkFirst program. The
remaining appropriation may be expended as specified in (c) of this
subsection.
(4) Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a)
may only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified
in this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 913 RCW 51.44.170 and 2011 c 5 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
The industrial insurance premium refund account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All industrial insurance refunds
earned by state agencies or institutions of higher education under the
state fund retrospective rating program shall be deposited into the
account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures
from the account. Only the executive head of the agency or institution
of higher education, or designee, may authorize expenditures from the
account. No agency or institution of higher education may make an
expenditure from the account for an amount greater than the refund
earned by the agency. If the agency or institution of higher education
has staff dedicated to workers' compensation claims management,
expenditures from the account must be used to pay for that staff, but
additional expenditure from the account may be used for any program
within an agency or institution of higher education that promotes or
provides incentives for employee workplace safety and health and early,
appropriate return-to-work for injured employees. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the industrial
insurance premium refund account to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, an agency or institution of higher education may
make expenditures from the account for payment of industrial insurance
premiums.

Sec. 914 RCW 67.70.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 941 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created and established a separate account, to be
known as the state lottery account. Such account shall be managed,
maintained, and controlled by the commission and shall consist of all
revenues received from the sale of lottery tickets or shares, and all
other moneys credited or transferred thereto from any other fund or
source pursuant to law. The account shall be a separate account
outside the state treasury and shall not maintain a balance in excess
of twelve million dollars at the end of each fiscal year. No
appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from the account. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the state lottery account to the
education legacy trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.

Sec. 915 RCW 77.36.170 and 2013 c 329 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than fifty thousand dollars per
fiscal year from the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170
for claims and assessment costs for injury or loss of livestock caused
by wolves submitted under RCW 77.36.100.
(2) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the
department may also accept and expend money from other sources to
address injury or loss of livestock or other property caused by wolves
consistent with the requirements on that source of funding.
(3) If any wildlife account expenditures authorized under
subsections (1) and (4) of this section are unspent as of June 30th of
a fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer the unspent amount to
the wolf-livestock conflict account created in RCW 77.36.180.
(4) During the 2014 fiscal year, the department may pay no more
than two hundred and fifty thousand dollars from the state wildlife
account created in RCW 77.12.170 for claims and assessment costs for
injury or loss of livestock caused by wolves submitted under RCW
77.36.100.

Sec. 916 RCW 82.08.160 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1003 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) On or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, all taxes
collected under RCW 82.08.150 during the preceding month must be
remitted to the state department of revenue, to be deposited with the
state treasurer. Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4)
of this section, upon receipt of such moneys the state treasurer must
credit sixty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) and one hundred percent of the sums collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (3) and (4) to the state general fund and
thirty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) to a fund which is hereby created to be known as
the "liquor excise tax fund."
(2) During the 2012 fiscal year, 66.19 percent of the sums
collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be
deposited in the state general fund and the remainder collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the
liquor excise tax fund.
(3) During fiscal year 2013, all funds collected under RCW
82.08.150 (1), (2), (3), and (4) must be deposited into the state
general fund.
(4) During ((the 2013-2015)) fiscal ((biennium, eighty two)) year
2014, seventy seven and one-half percent of the sums collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the state
general fund, and the remainder collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the liquor excise tax fund.
The legislature intends for the 2014 amendments in this subsection to
be curative, clarifying, and remedial and to apply retroactively to
July 1, 2013.
(5) During fiscal year 2015, eighty-four and four-tenths percent of
the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be
deposited in the state general fund, and the remainder collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be deposited in the
liquor excise tax fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of Bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ACQUISITION OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 261
ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 224
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR NONSTATE EMPLOYEES
SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 259
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 259
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 257
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 256
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 233
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 165
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 93
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 238
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 223
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 225
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
ATTORNEY GENERAL EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 243
COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 247
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES--CENTRAL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 245
DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 241
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 243
NATURAL RESOURCES REAL PROPERTY REPLACEMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 247
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 244
STATE EMPLOYEE INSURANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 246
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 198
PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 214, 216
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 237
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 18, 248
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 239, 240
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 241
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 251
FOR LOCAL LIQUOR EXCISE TAX . . . . . . . . . . . . 246
FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 249
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 250
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 251
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL
OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 229
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 228
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 245
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 169, 210
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 208
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
MISCELLANEOUS -- NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 237
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 237
WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 238
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 227
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 232
--- END ---