BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.960 and 2003 c 405 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) "Chief" means the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) "State fire marshal" means the director of fire protection in
the Washington state patrol.
(3) "Fire chief" includes the chief officer of a statutorily
authorized fire agency, or the fire chief's authorized representative.
Also included are the department of natural resources fire control
chief, and the department of natural resources regional managers.
(4) "Jurisdiction" means state, county, city, fire district,
regional fire protection authority, or port district ((firefighting))
units, or other units covered by this chapter.
(5) "Mobilization" means that ((firefighting)) all risk resources
regularly provided by fire departments, fire districts, and regional
fire protection authorities beyond those available through existing
agreements will be requested and, when available, sent in response to
an emergency or disaster situation that has exceeded the capabilities
of available local resources. During a large scale emergency,
mobilization includes the redistribution of regional or statewide
((firefighting)) risk resources to either direct emergency incident
assignments or to assignment in communities where ((firefighting))
resources are needed. Fire department resources cannot be mobilized to
assist law enforcement with police activities during a civil protest or
demonstration; however, fire departments, fire districts, and regional
fire protection authorities are not restricted from providing medical
care or aid and firefighting when mobilized for any purpose.
When mobilization is declared and authorized as provided in this
chapter, all ((firefighting)) risk resources regularly provided by fire
departments, fire districts, and regional fire protection authorities
including those of the host fire protection authorities, i.e. incident
jurisdiction, shall be deemed as mobilized under this chapter,
including those that responded earlier under existing mutual aid or
other agreement. All nonhost fire protection authorities providing
((firefighting)) resources in response to a mobilization declaration
shall be eligible for expense reimbursement as provided by this chapter
from the time of the mobilization declaration.
This chapter shall not reduce or suspend the authority or
responsibility of the department of natural resources under chapter
76.04 RCW.
(6) "Mutual aid" means emergency interagency assistance provided
without compensation under an agreement between jurisdictions under
chapter 39.34 RCW.
(7) "All risk resources" means those resources regularly provided
by fire departments, fire districts, and regional fire protection
authorities required to respond to incidents, including but not limited
to:
(a) Wild land fires;
(b) Earthquakes;
(c) Floods; and
(d) Contagious diseases.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.961 and 2003 c 405 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Because of the possibility of the occurrence of disastrous fires or
other disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness, the need to
insure that the state is adequately prepared to respond to such a fire
or disaster, the need to establish a mechanism and a procedure to
provide for reimbursement to state agencies and local ((firefighting))
agencies that respond to help others in time of need or to a host fire
district that experiences expenses beyond the resources of the fire
district, and generally to protect the public peace, health, safety,
lives, and property of the people of Washington, it is hereby declared
necessary to:
(1) Provide the policy and organizational structure for large scale
mobilization of ((firefighting)) all risk resources in the state
through creation of the Washington state fire services mobilization
plan;
(2) Confer upon the chief the powers provided herein;
(3) Provide a means for reimbursement to state agencies and local
fire jurisdictions that incur expenses when mobilized by the chief
under the Washington state fire services mobilization plan; and
(4) Provide for reimbursement of the host fire department or fire
protection district when it has: (a) Exhausted all of its resources;
and (b) invoked its local mutual aid network and exhausted those
resources. Upon implementation of state fire mobilization, the host
district resources shall become state fire mobilization resources
consistent with the fire mobilization plan.
It is the intent of the legislature that mutual aid and other
interlocal agreements providing for enhanced emergency response be
encouraged as essential to the public peace, safety, health, and
welfare, and for the protection of the lives and property of the people
of the state of Washington. If possible, mutual aid agreements should
be without stated limitations as to resources available, time, or area.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to limit the
eligibility of any nonhost fire protection authority for reimbursement
of expenses incurred in providing ((firefighting)) all risk resources
for mobilization provided that the mobilization must meet the
requirements identified in the Washington state fire service
mobilization plan.

--- END ---