BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.44.040 and 2006 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of Title 29A RCW relating to elections ((shall))
govern public hospital ((districts)) district elections, except as
provided in this chapter.
(2) A public hospital district shall be created when the ballot
proposition authorizing the creation of the district is approved by a
simple majority vote of the voters of the proposed district voting on
the proposition and the total vote cast upon the proposition exceeds
forty percent of the total number of votes cast in the proposed
district at the preceding state general election.
(3)(a) A public hospital district initially may be created with
three, five, or seven commissioner districts.
(b) At the election at which the proposition is submitted to the
voters as to whether a district shall be formed, three, five, or seven
commissioners shall be elected from either three, five, or seven
commissioner districts, or at-large positions, or both, as determined
by resolution of the county commissioners of the county or counties in
which the proposed public hospital district is located, ((all)) in
accordance with RCW 70.44.054. The election of the initial
commissioners ((shall be)) is null and void if the district is not
authorized ((to be created)) as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(c) No primary ((shall be)) is held. A special filing period
((shall)) must be opened as provided in RCW 29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181.
The person receiving the greatest number of votes for ((the))
commissioner of each commissioner district or at-large position ((shall
be)) is elected as the commissioner of that district or at-large
position.
(d) The terms of office of the initial public hospital district
commissioners ((shall)) must be staggered, with the length of the terms
assigned so that the person or persons who are elected receiving the
greater number of votes ((being)) are assigned a longer term or terms
of office ((and)). Each term of an initial commissioner ((running))
runs until a successor assumes office who is elected at one of the next
three following district general elections the first of which occurs at
least one hundred twenty days after the date of the election where
voters approved the ballot proposition creating the district((,)).
Elections occur as follows:
(((a))) (i) If the public hospital district will have three
commissioners, the successor to one initial commissioner ((shall)) must
be elected at ((such)) the first following district general election,
the successor to one initial commissioner ((shall)) must be elected at
the second following district general election, and the successor to
one initial commissioner ((shall)) must be elected at the third
following district general election;
(((b))) (ii) If the public hospital district will have five
commissioners, the successor to one initial commissioner ((shall)) must
be elected at ((such)) the first following district general election,
the successors to two initial commissioners ((shall)) must be elected
at the second following district general election, and the successors
to two initial commissioners ((shall)) must be elected at the third
following district general election;
(((c))) (iii) If the public hospital district will have seven
commissioners, the successors to two initial commissioners ((shall))
must be elected at ((such)) the first following district general
election, the successors to two initial commissioners ((shall)) must be
elected at the second following district general election, and the
successors to three initial commissioners ((shall)) must be elected at
the third following district general election.
(e) The initial commissioners ((shall)) must take office
immediately when they are elected and qualified. The term of office of
each successor ((shall be)) is six years. Each commissioner ((shall))
serves until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes office in
accordance with RCW 29A.20.040.
(((2))) (4) Only a registered voter who resides in a commissioner
district may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner
((of)) representing the commissioner district. Voters of the entire
public hospital district may vote at a primary or general election to
elect a person as a commissioner ((of the)) representing a commissioner
district, or to elect a person as an at-large commissioner, unless the
public hospital district must establish the election system specified
in section 3 of this act.
(5) If the proposed public hospital district initially will have
three commissioner districts and the public hospital district is
countywide, and if the county has three county legislative authority
districts, the county legislative authority districts ((shall)) must be
used as public hospital district commissioner districts. In all other
instances, the county auditor of the county in which all or the largest
portion of the proposed public hospital district is located ((shall))
must draw the initial public hospital district commissioner districts
and designate at-large positions, if appropriate, as provided in RCW
70.44.054. Each of the commissioner positions ((shall)) must be
numbered consecutively and associated with the commissioner district or
at-large position of the same number.
(6) The commissioners of a public hospital district that is not
coterminous with the boundaries of a county that has three county
legislative authority districts ((shall)) must at the times required in
chapter 29A.76 RCW and may from time to time redraw commissioner
district boundaries in a manner consistent with chapter 29A.76 RCW.
(((3))) (7) No person may hold office as a commissioner while
serving as an employee of the public hospital district.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.44.054 and 1997 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 70.44.040, only a registered voter who
resides in a commissioner district of a public hospital district may be
a candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner representing the
commissioner district. Voters of the entire public hospital district
may vote at a primary or general election to elect a person as a
commissioner representing a commissioner district, or to elect a person
as an at-large commissioner, unless the public hospital district must
establish the election system specified in section 3 of this act.
(2) If the voters of ((the)) a public hospital district approve
((the)) a ballot proposition authorizing ((the)) an increase in the
number of commissioners to either five or seven members, the additional
commissioners ((shall)) must be elected at large from the entire public
hospital district((; provided that)). However, the board of
commissioners of the public hospital district may, by resolution,
redistrict the public hospital district into five commissioner
districts if the district has five commissioners, or seven commissioner
districts if the district has seven commissioners. The board of
commissioners ((shall)) must draw the boundaries of each commissioner
district to include as nearly as possible equal portions of the total
population of the public hospital district.
If the board of commissioners increases the number of commissioner
districts as provided in this section, one commissioner ((shall)) must
be elected from each commissioner district, and no commissioner may be
elected from a commissioner district in which another commissioner
resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of commissioners of a public hospital district with
a population exceeding two hundred ninety thousand persons must:
(a) Establish commissioner districts within the public hospital
district that conform with criteria specified in RCW 29A.76.010; and
(b) Provide that each member of the board of commissioners will be
nominated in a primary and elected in a general election solely by
voters in the member's commissioner district, rather than by voters in
the entire public hospital district.
(2) A resolution adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
may not reduce the term of a commissioner serving in office at the time
that the resolution is adopted. Subsequently, elected commissioners
must be elected from the commissioner districts in which they reside.
One commissioner must be elected from each commissioner district, and
no commissioner may be elected from a commissioner district in which
another commissioner resides.
(3) A public hospital district must comply with subsection (1) of
this section within eight months of the effective date of this section
if the district's population estimate exceeds two hundred ninety
thousand persons as of the effective date of this section.
(4) A public hospital district with a population estimate below two
hundred ninety thousand persons as of the effective date of this
section must comply with subsection (1) of this section by June 1st of
the year following release of a population estimate indicating that the
district's population has risen to exceed two hundred ninety thousand
persons.
(5) For purposes of this section, "population estimate" means a
population estimate annually compiled for each public hospital district
in the state by the office of financial management and posted annually
by October 1st on the office's web site.

--- END ---