BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Actual enumeration data collected under RCW 35.13.260, 35A.14.700,
36.13.030, and chapter 43.62 RCW shall be used and retained only by the
office of financial management and only for the purposes of RCW
35.13.260, 35A.14.700, 36.13.030, and chapter 43.62 RCW. The
enumeration data collected is confidential, is exempt from public
inspection and copying under this chapter, and in accordance with
section 2 of this act, must be destroyed after it is used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The office must destroy enumeration data collected under RCW
35.13.260, 35A.14.700, 36.13.030, and chapter 43.62 RCW after it is
used to produce the required population estimates.

--- END ---