BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town that is wholly or at least eighty percent
located in a county with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand may not assume, under this chapter, the jurisdiction
of all or part of a water-sewer district serving a population greater
than one thousand residents unless voters of the entire water-sewer
district approve a ballot proposition authorizing the assumption under
general election law. The cost of the election must be borne by the
city or town seeking approval to assume jurisdiction of a water-sewer
district.
(2) A city or town that is wholly or at least eighty percent
located in a county with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand may assume jurisdiction over a water-sewer district
located entirely within its boundaries without seeking approval of the
voters, as required under subsection (1) of this section, if the board
of commissioners of the water-sewer district consent to the assumption
of jurisdiction by the city or town. The feasibility study required
under subsection (3) of this section is not required if the board of
commissioners of the water-sewer district consents to the assumption of
jurisdiction by the city or town.
(3) Following the passage of a resolution by a city or town that is
wholly or at least eighty percent located in a county with a population
greater than one million five hundred thousand to assume all or part of
a special purpose water-sewer district under this chapter, a
feasibility study of the assumption must be conducted, unless the board
of commissioners of the water-sewer district consents to the assumption
of jurisdiction by the city or town as provided under subsection (2) of
this section. The study must be jointly and equally funded by the city
or town and the district through a mutually agreed contract with a
qualified independent consultant with professional expertise involving
public water and sewer systems. The study must address the impact of
the proposed assumption on both the city or town and district. Issues
to be considered must be mutually agreed to by the city or town and the
district and must include, but not be limited to, engineering and
operational impacts, costs of the assumption to the city or town and
the district including potential impacts on future water-sewer rates,
bond ratings and future borrowing costs, status of existing water
rights, and other issues jointly agreed to. The findings of the joint
study must be presented as a public record that is available to the
registered voters of the district, both within and without the boundary
of the city or town conducting the assumption, prior to a vote on the
proposed assumption by all the voters in the district. The study must
be completed within six months of the passage of the resolution to
assume the district. No vote may take place until the study has been
completed and the results have been made available to the registered
voters of the district.
(4) Once the voters in a water-sewer district have approved or
disapproved an assumption through the ballot proposition process
required under subsection (1) of this section, a boundary review board
does not have jurisdiction, under chapter 36.93 RCW, to conduct a
review of the assumption where the attempted or completed assumption
involves not more than one city or town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a city or town that is wholly or at least eighty percent
located in a county with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand assumes jurisdiction over a water-sewer district
without seeking approval of the voters pursuant to section 1 of this
act, the assumption is subject to referendum for forty-five days after
its approval by a boundary review board or the superior court under
chapter 36.93 RCW or, in those counties without a boundary review
board, a petition to dissolve the district has been filed in superior
court under RCW 35.13A.080. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient
referendum petition with the board of commissioners, signed by
registered voters in number equal to not less than ten percent of the
registered voters in the area to be assumed who voted in the last
municipal general election, the question of assumption must be
submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose by the board of commissioners in accordance with RCW
29A.04.330. The election must be conducted in accordance with the
general election laws of the state. The assumption is deemed approved
by the voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition
are in opposition thereto.
(2) After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding
the date the assumption has been approved by a boundary review board or
the superior court under chapter 36.93 RCW or, in those counties
without a boundary review board, a petition to dissolve the district
has been filed in superior court under RCW 35.13A.080, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the city or town may
proceed to assume jurisdiction over the water-sewer district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is applicable to assumptions of
jurisdiction of water-sewer districts by cities or towns that is wholly
or at least eighty percent located in a county with a population
greater than one million five hundred thousand that have been initiated
prior to the effective date of this section and that are pending as of
that date, as well as those assumptions of jurisdiction that are
initiated on or after the effective date of this section. Nothing in
this act may be construed to preempt or modify any existing interlocal
agreement, franchise, or contract between a city or town and a water-sewer district in effect on the effective date of this section.

--- END ---