BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The prosecuting attorney may file a special allegation when
sufficient evidence exists to show that the accused is an habitual
property offender.
(2) In a criminal case in which there has been a special allegation
and the accused has been convicted of the underlying crime, the court
shall make a finding of fact prior to sentencing whether the person is
an habitual property offender based on the person's criminal history.
If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the person
is an habitual property offender, the person shall be sentenced in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.533(15).
(3) For purposes of this section, a person is an habitual property
offender if:
(a) The present felony conviction for which the person is being
sentenced is for residential burglary, burglary in the second degree,
theft in the first degree, theft in the second degree, theft of a
firearm, unlawful issuance of checks or drafts, organized retail theft,
theft with special circumstances, or mail theft;
(b) The person has an offender score of nine points or higher; and
(c) At least nine of the points in the person's offender score
result from any combination of the following felony offenses:
Residential burglary, burglary in the second degree, theft in the first
degree, theft in the second degree, theft of a firearm, unlawful
issuance of checks or drafts, organized retail theft, theft with
special circumstances, or mail theft.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2013 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(3);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(3);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055. All enhancements under
this subsection shall be mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions.
(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1,
2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term
is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added
to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless
of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation
enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual
motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall
be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified
under RCW 9A.28.020:
(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both;
(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a
class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or
both;
(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;
(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and
the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii)
of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual
motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be
served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements,
for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not
a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(3);
(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to
all felony crimes;
(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds
the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the
statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence
representing the enhancement may not be reduced;
(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the
offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before
any earned early release time is credited to the offender;
(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from
imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535.
(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the
standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073,
9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on
or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to
engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year
enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for
all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the
enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079,
9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted,
solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage
the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional
one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range
determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this
subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual
contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.
(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any
criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person
compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the
minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence
range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range
defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of
the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection
exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory
maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of
the felony offense is an element of the offense.
(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is
unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will
seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW
9.94A.535.
(11) An additional twelve months and one day shall be added to the
standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a
police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included
a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons
under RCW 9.94A.834.
(12) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW
9.94A.831.
(13) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for
any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony
physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child
passenger under the age of sixteen who is an occupant in the
defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be
served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions. If the addition of a minor child enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(14) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW
9.94A.832.
(15)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range if the court finds that the offender is an
habitual property offender pursuant to section 1 of this act:
(i) Twenty-four months if the offender is being sentenced for a
felony defined as a class B felony;
(ii) Twelve months if the offender is being sentenced for a felony
defined as a class C felony.
(b) A sentence imposed pursuant to this subsection is not to exceed
the statutory maximum for the crime as established in RCW 9A.20.021.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all habitual
property offender enhancements imposed under this section are mandatory
and shall be served in total confinement. However, whether or not the
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(3).

--- END ---