BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.52.060 and 2011 c 336 s 371 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who shall make or mend or cause to be made or
mended, or have in his or her possession, any engine, machine, tool,
false key, pick lock, bit, nippers, or implement adapted, designed, or
commonly used for the commission of burglary under circumstances
evincing an intent to use or employ, or allow the same to be used or
employed in the commission of a burglary, or knowing that the same is
intended to be so used, shall be guilty of making or having burglar
tools.
(2) Making or having burglar tools is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Possession of a minimum of one and up to ten altered or shaved
keys is a gross misdemeanor. Each set of at least one key and up to
ten altered or shaved keys possessed in violation of this subsection
constitutes a separate and distinct crime and is an additional gross
misdemeanor. An altered or shaved key is any key so altered, by
cutting, filing, or other means, to fit multiple locks other than the
lock for which the key was originally manufactured.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.56.063 and 2007 c 199 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who makes or mends, or causes to be made or mended,
uses, or has in his or her possession any motor vehicle theft tool,
that is adapted, designed, or commonly used for the commission of motor
vehicle related theft, under circumstances evincing an intent to use or
employ, or allow the same to be used or employed, in the commission of
motor vehicle theft, or knowing that the same is intended to be so
used, is guilty of making or having motor vehicle theft tools.
(2) For the purpose of this section, motor vehicle theft tool
includes, but is not limited to, the following: Slim jim, false master
key, master purpose key, altered or shaved key, trial or jiggler key,
slide hammer, lock puller, picklock, bit, nipper, any other implement
shown by facts and circumstances that is intended to be used in the
commission of a motor vehicle related theft, or knowing that the same
is intended to be so used.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "False master" or "master key" is any key or other device made
or altered to fit locks or ignitions of multiple vehicles, or vehicles
other than that for which the key was originally manufactured.
(b) "Altered or shaved key" is any key so altered, by cutting,
filing, or other means, to fit multiple vehicles or vehicles other than
the vehicles for which the key was originally manufactured.
(c) "Trial keys" or "jiggler keys" are keys or sets designed or
altered to manipulate a vehicle locking mechanism other than the lock
for which the key was originally manufactured.
(4) Making or having motor vehicle theft tools is a gross
misdemeanor.
(5) Possession of a minimum of one and up to ten altered or shaved
keys is a gross misdemeanor. Each set of at least one key and up to
ten altered or shaved keys possessed in violation of this subsection
constitutes a separate and distinct crime and is an additional gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---