BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.48.130 and 1957 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The annual membership fees for active members shall be payable on
or before February 1st of each year. The board of governors may
establish the amount of such annual membership fee to be effective each
year: PROVIDED, That written notice of any proposed increase in
membership fee shall be sent to active members not less than sixty days
prior to the effective date of such increase: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the board of governors may establish the fee at a reduced rate for
those who have been active members for less than five years in this
state or elsewhere. No fee may be assessed against any full-time
judicial officer who is not an active member of the bar as defined in
RCW 2.48.170. A judicial member who applies to return to active status
shall not be charged any fee for the period in which he or she was a
judicial member, nor any investigation fee.

--- END ---