BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.383 and 2013 c 268 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts and nonpublic schools may maintain at a school
in a designated location a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors based on
the number of students enrolled in the school.
(2)(a) A licensed health professional with the authority to
prescribe epinephrine autoinjectors may prescribe epinephrine
autoinjectors in the name of the school district or school to be
maintained for use when necessary. Epinephrine prescriptions must be
accompanied by a standing order for the administration of school-supplied, undesignated epinephrine autoinjectors for potentially life-threatening allergic reactions.
(b) There are no changes to current prescription or self-administration practices for children with existing epinephrine
autoinjector prescriptions or a guided anaphylaxis care plan.
(c) Epinephrine autoinjectors may be obtained from donation
sources, but must be accompanied by a prescription.
(3)(a) When a student has a prescription for an epinephrine
autoinjector on file, the school nurse or designated trained school
personnel may utilize the school district or school supply of
epinephrine autoinjectors to respond to an anaphylactic reaction under
a standing protocol according to RCW ((28A.210.300)) 28A.210.380.
(b) When a student does not have an epinephrine autoinjector or
prescription for an epinephrine autoinjector on file, the school nurse
may utilize the school district or school supply of epinephrine
autoinjectors to respond to an anaphylactic reaction under a standing
protocol according to RCW 28A.210.300.
(c) Epinephrine autoinjectors may be used on school property,
including the school building, playground, and school bus, as well as
during field trips or sanctioned excursions away from school property.
The school nurse or designated trained school personnel may carry an
appropriate supply of school-owned epinephrine autoinjectors on field
trips or excursions.
(4)(a) If a student is injured or harmed due to the administration
of epinephrine that a licensed health professional with prescribing
authority has prescribed and a pharmacist has dispensed to a school
under this section, the licensed health professional with prescribing
authority and pharmacist may not be held responsible for the injury
unless he or she issued the prescription with a conscious disregard for
safety.
(b) In the event a school nurse or other school employee
administers epinephrine in substantial compliance with a student's
prescription that has been prescribed by a licensed health professional
within the scope of the professional's prescriptive authority, if
applicable, and written policies of the school district or private
school, then the school employee, the employee's school district or
school of employment, and the members of the governing board and chief
administrator thereof are not liable in any criminal action or for
civil damages in their individual, marital, governmental, corporate, or
other capacity as a result of providing the epinephrine.
(c) School employees, except those licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW, who have not agreed in writing to the use of epinephrine
autoinjectors as a specific part of their job description, may file
with the school district a written letter of refusal to use epinephrine
autoinjectors. This written letter of refusal may not serve as grounds
for discharge, nonrenewal of an employment contract, or other action
adversely affecting the employee's contract status.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review the anaphylaxis policy guidelines required under RCW 28A.210.380
and make a recommendation to the education committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013, based on student safety, regarding
whether to designate other trained school employees to administer
epinephrine autoinjectors to students without prescriptions for
epinephrine autoinjectors demonstrating the symptoms of anaphylaxis
when a school nurse is not in the vicinity.

--- END ---