BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The exchange must provide electronic notification to the qualified
health plan before the sixth of the month indicating an enrollee has
not paid the premium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An issuer of a qualified health plan shall provide a notice
to a health care provider or health care facility that an enrollee is
in a grace period if the health care provider or health care facility:
(i)(A) Submits a request to the issuer regarding the enrollee's
eligibility, coverage, or health plan benefits;
(B) Submits a request to the issuer regarding the status of a claim
for services provided to an enrollee; or
(C) Reports a claim in a remittance advice; and
(ii) Request or claim is for a date during the second or third
month of the enrollee's grace period.
(b) The issuer of a qualified health plan shall provide the notice
to the health care provider or health care facility. The notice to the
health care provider or health care facility must include:
(i) The purpose of the notice;
(ii) The enrollee's full legal name and any unique numbers
identifying the enrollee; and
(iii) The name of the qualified health plan and the issuer.
(2) For purposes of this section "grace period" means a period of
three consecutive months if an enrollee receiving advance payments of
the premium tax credit has previously paid at least one full month's
premium during the benefit year.

--- END ---