BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.120 and 2009 c 479 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture:
(1) All visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct.
(2) All raw materials, equipment, and other tangible personal
property of any kind used or intended to be used to manufacture or
process any visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct, and all conveyances, including aircraft,
vehicles, or vessels that are used or intended for use to transport, or
in any manner to facilitate the transportation of, visual or printed
matter in violation of RCW 9.68A.050 or 9.68A.060, but:
(a) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in
charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation
of this chapter;
(b) No property is subject to forfeiture under this section by
reason of any act or omission established by the owner of the property
to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent;
(c) A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured
party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission;
and
(d) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested under this
chapter the conveyance may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is
seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the
owner's arrest.
(3) All personal property, moneys, negotiable instruments,
securities, or other tangible or intangible property furnished or
intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for visual or
printed matter depicting a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct,
or constituting proceeds traceable to any violation of this chapter.
(4) Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized
by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any
superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without
process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter;
(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety;
or
(d) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this
chapter.
(5) In the event of seizure under subsection (4) of this section,
proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure.
The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made
shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the
seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge
thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, of
the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. The notice
may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including
but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt
requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing
within the fifteen day period following the seizure.
(6) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
seized items within forty-five days of the seizure, the item seized
shall be deemed forfeited.
(7) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
seized items within forty-five days of the seizure, the person or
persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to
the claim or right. The hearing shall be before an administrative law
judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person
asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of
competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the article or
articles involved is more than five hundred dollars. The hearing
before an administrative law judge and any appeal therefrom shall be
under Title 34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants
to the article or articles involved, the prevailing party shall be
entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorney's fees. The
burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be
the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to
possession of the seized items. The seizing law enforcement agency
shall promptly return the article or articles to the claimant upon a
determination by the administrative law judge or court that the
claimant is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of the seized
items.
(8) If property is sought to be forfeited on the ground that it
constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of this chapter, the
seizing law enforcement agency must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the property constitutes proceeds traceable to a
violation of this chapter.
(9) When property is forfeited under this chapter the seizing law
enforcement agency may:
(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release the property to that agency
for the exclusive use of enforcing this chapter or chapter 9A.88 RCW;
(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public((. The proceeds and all moneys
forfeited under this chapter shall be used for payment of all proper
expenses of the investigation leading to the seizure, including any
money delivered to the subject of the investigation by the law
enforcement agency, and of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale,
including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising,
actual costs of the prosecuting or city attorney, and court costs.
Fifty percent of the money remaining after payment of these expenses
shall be deposited in the state general fund and fifty percent shall be
deposited in the general fund of the state, county, or city of the
seizing law enforcement agency)); or
(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to
take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in
accordance with law.
(10)(a) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall
remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net
proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of
satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is
subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after
deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions
paid to an independent selling agency.
(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The
value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the
property at the time of seizure determined when possible by reference
to an applicable commonly used index. A seizing agency may use, but
need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to determine the value
of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value of the
property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of
destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.
(11) Forfeited property and net proceeds not required to be paid to
the state treasurer under this chapter shall be used for payment of all
proper expenses of the investigation leading to the seizure, including
any money delivered to the subject of the investigation by the law
enforcement agency, and of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale,
including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising,
actual costs of the prosecuting or city attorney, and court costs.
Money remaining after payment of these expenses shall be retained by
the seizing law enforcement agency for the exclusive use of enforcing
the provisions of this chapter or chapter 9A.88 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.88.150 and 2012 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no
property right exists in them:
(a) Any property or other interest acquired or maintained in
violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070 to the extent of
the investment of funds, and any appreciation or income attributable to
the investment, from a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or
9A.88.070;
(b) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels,
which are used, or intended for use, in any manner to facilitate a
violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, except that:
(i) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in
charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation
of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;
(ii) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by
reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have
been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;
(iii) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide
security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission; and
(iv) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested for a
violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, the conveyance in
which the person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture unless it
is seized or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the
owner's arrest;
(c) Any property, contractual right, or claim against property used
to influence any enterprise that a person has established, operated,
controlled, conducted, or participated in the conduct of, in violation
of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070;
(d) All proceeds traceable to or derived from an offense defined in
RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070 and all moneys, negotiable
instruments, securities, and other things of value significantly used
or intended to be used significantly to facilitate commission of the
offense;
(e) All books, records, and research products and materials,
including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or
intended for use, in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or
9A.88.070;
(f) All moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other
tangible or intangible property of value furnished or intended to be
furnished by any person in exchange for a violation of RCW 9.68A.100,
9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, all tangible or intangible personal property,
proceeds, or assets acquired in whole or in part with proceeds
traceable to an exchange or series of exchanges in violation of RCW
9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, and all moneys, negotiable
instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to facilitate
any violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070. A forfeiture
of money, negotiable instruments, securities, or other tangible or
intangible property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is
subject to the interest of the secured party if, at the time the
security interest was created, the secured party neither had knowledge
of nor consented to the act or omission. No personal property may be
forfeited under this subsection (1)(f), to the extent of the interest
of an owner, by reason of any act or omission, which that owner
establishes was committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent; and
(g) All real property, including any right, title, and interest in
the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or
improvements which are being used with the knowledge of the owner for
a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, or which have
been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an
exchange or series of exchanges in violation of RCW 9.68A.100,
9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070, if a substantial nexus exists between the
violation and the real property. However:
(i) No property may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection
(1)(g), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act
or omission committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent;
(ii) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a bona fide
security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the secured party, at the time the security interest was created,
neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this
section may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon
process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the
property. Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis
pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section
shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after
seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is
later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may be
transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by
foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest.
Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant;
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding; or
(c) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of RCW
9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070.
(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the
seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure
was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following
the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in
charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest
therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and
intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of
seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil
procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with
respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted
service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been
made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the
state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is
incarcerated within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of
property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by
filing a financing statement, or a certificate of title, shall be made
by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at
the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of
title. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any
method authorized by law or court rule including, but not limited to,
service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by
mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen day
period following the seizure.
(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five
days of the service of notice from the seizing agency in the case of
personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property interest
in real property of a person whose spouse or domestic partner committed
a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be
forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.
(5) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five
days of the service of notice from the seizing agency in the case of
personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be
heard as to the claim or right. The notice of claim may be served by
any method authorized by law or court rule including, but not limited
to, service by first-class mail. Service by mail shall be deemed
complete upon mailing within the forty-five day period following
service of the notice of seizure in the case of personal property and
within the ninety day period following service of the notice of seizure
in the case of real property. The hearing shall be before the chief
law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law
enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a
state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be
before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an
administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that
any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court
of competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving personal
property may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil
procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process
against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that
operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in
accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after
the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement
agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The
court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court
when the aggregate value of personal property is within the
jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the
seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW.
In all cases, the burden of proof is upon the law enforcement agency to
establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the property is
subject to forfeiture.
The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the
administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present
lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items
specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where
the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant. In
addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a
judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(7) When property is forfeited under this chapter, the seizing law
enforcement agency ((shall sell the property that is not required to be
destroyed by law and that is not harmful to the public)) may:
(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release the property to that agency
for the exclusive use of enforcing this chapter or chapter 9.68A RCW;
(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public; or
(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to
take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in
accordance with law.
(8)(a) When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a
record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a
description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value
of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds
realized from disposition of the property.
(b) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property
for at least seven years.
(c) Each seizing agency shall file a report including a copy of the
records of forfeited property with the state treasurer each calendar
quarter.
(d) The quarterly report need not include a record of forfeited
property that is still being held for use as evidence during the
investigation or prosecution of a case or during the appeal from a
conviction.
(9)(a) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall
remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net
proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the prostitution prevention and
intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740.
(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of
satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is
subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after
deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions
paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid
landlord's claim for damages under subsection (((11))) (12) of this
section.
(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The
value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property
is zero.
(10) Net proceeds not required to be paid to the state treasurer
shall be used for payment of all proper expenses of the investigation
leading to the seizure, including any money delivered to the subject of
the investigation by the law enforcement agency, and of the proceedings
for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of
custody, advertising, actual costs of the prosecuting or city attorney,
and court costs. Money remaining after payment of these expenses shall
be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency for the exclusive use
of enforcing the provisions of this chapter or chapter 9.68A RCW.
(11) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the
court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county
in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real
property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court
rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in the
county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is
located.
(((11))) (12) A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from
the sale of assets seized and forfeited under subsection (9) of this
section, only if:
(a) A law enforcement officer, while acting in his or her official
capacity, directly caused damage to the complaining landlord's property
while executing a search of a tenant's residence;
(b) The landlord has applied any funds remaining in the tenant's
deposit, to which the landlord has a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to
cover the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer prior to
asserting a claim under the provisions of this section:
(i) Only if the funds applied under (b) of this subsection are
insufficient to satisfy the damage directly caused by a law enforcement
officer, may the landlord seek compensation for the damage by filing a
claim against the governmental entity under whose authority the law
enforcement agency operates within thirty days after the search;
(ii) Only if the governmental entity denies or fails to respond to
the landlord's claim within sixty days of the date of filing, may the
landlord collect damages under this subsection by filing within thirty
days of denial or the expiration of the sixty day period, whichever
occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement agency. The
seizing law enforcement agency must notify the landlord of the status
of the claim by the end of the thirty day period. Nothing in this
section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty day or
thirty day period; and
(c) For any claim filed under (b) of this subsection, the law
enforcement agency shall pay the claim unless the agency provides
substantial proof that the landlord either:
(i) Knew or consented to actions of the tenant in violation of RCW
9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9A.88.070; or
(ii) Failed to respond to a notification of the illegal activity,
provided by a law enforcement agency under RCW 59.18.075, within seven
days of receipt of notification of the illegal activity.
(((12))) (13) The landlord's claim for damages under subsection
(((11))) (12) of this section may not include a claim for loss of
business and is limited to:
(a) Damage to tangible property and clean-up costs;
(b) The lesser of the cost of repair or fair market value of the
damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer;
(c) The proceeds from the sale of the specific tenant's property
seized and forfeited under subsection (9) of this section; and
(d) The proceeds available after the seizing law enforcement agency
satisfies any bona fide security interest in the tenant's property and
costs related to sale of the tenant's property as provided by
subsection (((11))) (12) of this section.
(((13))) (14) Subsections (((11))) (12) and (((12))) (13) of this
section do not limit any other rights a landlord may have against a
tenant to collect for damages. However, if a law enforcement agency
satisfies a landlord's claim under subsection (((11))) (12) of this
section, the rights the landlord has against the tenant for damages
directly caused by a law enforcement officer under the terms of the
landlord and tenant's contract are subrogated to the law enforcement
agency.

--- END ---