BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2015, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Archives Facilities Maintenance Environmental Control (30000028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Library - Archives Building (30000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriation is for a predesign for a new facility for record
retention, archives, and state library space. The legislature finds
that the volume of state records retained in paper format continues to
grow, increasing the records storage costs for the state. These paper
records may duplicate electronic storage of identical documents. As
part of the predesign, the secretary of state must convene a work group
to study methods for retaining and retrieving records in electronic
formats, with the goal of reducing the total volume of stored paper
records by at least ten percent by the end of 2016, and an additional
ten percent by the end of 2018. The following state agencies must
participate in the work group, which must report back to the
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 31,
2014:
(1) Office of the secretary of state;
(2) Office of the attorney general;
(3) Office of the state auditor;
(4) Office of financial management;
(5) Department of corrections;
(6) Department of social and health services;
(7) Department of health;
(8) Employment security department;
(9) Department of licensing; and
(10) Department of transportation.

Appropriation:
Public Records Efficiency, Preservation &
Access Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
TVW - Digital Equipment (92000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,840,000

Sec. 1004 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000189)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1) $4,400,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $4,400,000 for fiscal
year 2015 is provided solely as state match for federal safe drinking
water funds.
(2))) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility
for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the
public works board must require as a contract condition that the
project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The
project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,800,000))
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,800,000))
$204,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($888,800,000))
$884,400,000

Sec. 1005 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1074 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) All expenditures from the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section must be used for projects
that provide a benefit to the public through development,
demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save
energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or
otherwise increase energy independence for the state. All expenditures
must be used for projects that develop and acquire assets that have a
useful life of at least thirteen years. These requirements must be
specified in funding agreements issued by the department.
(2) For any project funded from the state taxable building
construction account--state appropriation in this section, state funds
must not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and
funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher
percentage of nonstate match funds.
(3)(a) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely to
create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven
building energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now
inhibited by lack of access to capital.
(b) To create the loan fund, the department shall provide grant
funds to a competitively selected nonprofit lender that will provide
matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The
department must select the loan fund administrator through a
competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified
experts, applying criteria specified by the department.
(c) The department must establish guidelines for the lender related
to applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and
selection criteria. The criteria must include requiring evidence of
support for the proposed project from the impacted community and
consistency with economic growth strategies and plans of the affected
local governments. Applications for loans from the revolving fund must
disclose all sources of public funding to be provided for a project.
The nonprofit lender must use the revolving loan fund to make
affordable loans for projects including, but not limited to:
Residential and commercial energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and
organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass
as a fuel source.
(d) The department must conduct due diligence activities associated
with the use of public funds, including oversight of the project
selection process and project monitoring.
(e) Projects seeking financing of solar installations under this
section must agree in contract to not participate in the cost-recovery
program under RCW 82.16.120.
(4) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely for
grants to advance renewable energy technologies by public and private
electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. The
department shall work with utilities to offer matching grants for
projects that demonstrate new smart grid technologies. The department
shall develop a grant application process to competitively select
projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of
qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the
department. Applications for grants must disclose all sources of
public funding to be provided for a project. The grant funds must be
used to fund projects that demonstrate how to: Integrate intermittent
renewables through energy storage and information technology, dispatch
energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use the thermal
properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district
energy systems to store energy, or otherwise improve the reliability
and reduce the costs of intermittent or distributed renewable energy.
(5) $6,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to
match federal funds used to develop and demonstrate clean energy
technologies. The department shall work with the University of
Washington, Washington State University, and the Pacific Northwest
National Laboratory to offer matching funds for projects including, but
not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, and
federal manufacturing innovation centers related to use of light-weight
carbon fiber components to advance energy efficiency in the
aeronautical, automotive, and marine sectors.
(6) The department must report on number and results of projects
funded through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours
created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor
and the legislature, by November 1, 2014.
(7) The energy recovery act account--federal appropriation in this
section is provided solely for loans, loan guarantees, and grants that
encourage the establishment of innovative and sustainable industries
for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology, consistent with
provisions of RCW 43.325.040 (energy freedom account).

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
Energy Recovery Act Account--((Federal)) State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Sec. 1006 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1077 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Projects for Jobs and Economic Development (92000151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the appropriations are released for design costs only.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriations are provided solely for the following list
of projects:

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development

City of Bremerton Puget Sound Naval Safety Project $1,300,000

Fairchild Airforce Base $2,700,000

City of Lynnwood Main Street Improvements $250,000

Port of Everett: Roll-On/Roll-Off Cargo Berth $1,500,000

Kittitas County Infrastructure and Facilities $5,000,000

City of Kennewick Industrial Land $1,000,000

Perry Tech Institute Building $1,000,000

City of Buckley Drinking Water Improvements $350,000

((Coronado)) Carbonado Reservoir Replacement $525,000

Hopelink Cleveland Street Project $1,000,000

Redmond Connector $1,300,000

Washougal ((Storm Water Decant Facility)) Wastewater Treatment Plant $1,000,000

Roslyn Renaissance Northwest Improvement Company Building $500,000

Everett/Tulalip Water Pipeline Construction $1,000,000

((Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction $5,000,000))

Renton Riverview Bridge Replacement $1,100,000

Omak City Sewer, Collection System, and Treatment Plant $2,000,000

Harper Pier Replacement $800,000

University Place Main Street Redevelopment $975,000

Sultan Alder Avenue Water/Sewer Line Replacement $185,000

Quincy Industrial Water Reclamation & Reuse $700,000

NW Medical School $136,000

Ione - 8th St Lift Station Replacement $165,000

Stevens PUD Projects $532,000

Port Orchard Bay St. Pedestrian Path - Phase 2 $336,000

Dekalb Pier - Phase 2 $255,000

Kenmore Village $300,000

South Kirkland TOD/Cross Kirkland Corridor $1,300,000

Washington Agriculture Discovery Center $100,000

Mountlake Terrace Mainstreet Grant $2,000,000

Issaquah - North Roadway Network Improvement $5,000,000

TRIDEC Development of Small Modular Reactor Proposal $500,000

City of Shelton Wastewater $1,500,000

Port of Moses Lake Firefighting System $300,000

Seattle Chinatown/ID Development $500,000

Moses Lake North Dam Replacement Project $2,000,000

TOTAL (($42,109,000))
$37,109,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,009,000))
$32,009,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,109,000))
$39,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,109,000))
$39,109,000

Sec. 1007 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1078 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Projects That Strengthen Communities and Quality of Life (92000230)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the
appropriation is released for design costs only.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section from the state
building construction account--state is provided solely for design
development to align ongoing planning for the replacement of the
Seattle multimodal terminal at Colman dock with the creation of a
public park. The scope of work must provide a design plan that
includes an elevated park and corresponding amenities above the
terminal. Design development shall be delivered through the city of
Seattle. The scope of this project does not preclude any current plans
for Colman dock to replace or seismically upgrade the facility, nor
does it reduce the amount of general and commercial traffic, high
occupancy vehicles, transit, bicyclist and pedestrian movement.
(8) $500,000 of the appropriation from the environmental legacy
stewardship account--state is provided solely for an investigation of
possible contaminated soils around the Colman dock.
(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life

Ft. Vancouver - Mother Joseph Academy & Infantry Barracks $1,000,000

LaConner Boardwalk $1,600,000

Kent Interurban Trail Connector $750,000

Town of Concrete Public Safety Building $785,000

Complete Development of Ashford Park Facilities $1,000,000

Jackson Park Renovation $1,000,000

South Whatcom Library Construction $90,000

Guemes Channel Trail Project $700,000

Seabrook Trail $437,000

Vashon Island Allied Arts $2,000,000

Federal Way Performing Arts $2,000,000

Japanese Gulch Land Acquisition $1,000,000

Milton - Triangle Park ADA Upgrades $225,000

Langston Hughes Performing Arts Center - Storage $150,000

Wood Pellet Heat in Schools Pilot $500,000

Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct $1,000,000

Ravensdale Park $650,000

Worthington Park $210,000

Eastside Tacoma Community Center $400,000

((228th Street Trail $500,000))

Institute for Community Leadership $275,000

FISH of Vancouver/Nonprofit Community Service Center $1,000,000

Yelm Community Center $1,000,000

Ellensburg Depot $500,000

Roslyn City Hall $400,000

Northwest Carriage Museum $375,000

People's Community Center and Pool $500,000

((Town of Concrete Fire and Life Safety Facility $500,000))

Chehalis Pool $250,000

Mount Rainier Park Ranger Memorial $60,000

McAllister Air Museum $500,000

Repairs to Stevenson Grange $50,000

Meydenbauer Park Improvements $3,000,000

Sixty Acres Park Enhancements $750,000

Covington Community Park Phase 2 $2,100,000

Johnson Farm Museum - Anderson Island $250,000

Nikolai Project $40,000

Ft. Steilacoom Building Preservation $250,000

Plaza Roberto Maestas - Building the Beloved Community $1,000,000

Seattle Multimodal Terminal at Colman Dock/Public Park $2,000,000

Confluence Project $747,000

Castle Rock Citywide Residential Street Project $504,000

UWAVE $30,000

Transit-Community Center $800,000

Mt. Spokane Lodge $250,000

TOTAL (($33,128,000))
$32,128,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,628,000))
$31,628,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,128,000))
$32,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,128,000))
$32,128,000

Sec. 1008 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1038 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy Partnership (30000175)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the recommendations of the clean energy leadership council by providing
state matching funds for projects that:
(a) Integrate energy efficiency and renewable energy in buildings;
(b) Integrate renewable energy into the regional electrical grid;
(c) Advance bioenergy in the state.
(2) State funding must not exceed fifty percent of the total
program or project funds.
(3) Eligible projects must:
(a) Involve a majority of companies that are located in Washington
state;
(b) Represent a substantially new solution that is not widely
available today; and
(c) Be designed to generate solutions that are applicable both
inside and outside of the state.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,499,000))
$499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,500,000))
$500,000

Sec. 1009 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1070 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000190)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the
community economic revitalization board may make loans to
municipalities to finance public facilities projects that will improve
opportunities for revitalizing existing retail, industrial, or
commercial properties located within incorporated areas. These
properties must have either been abandoned, or have more than seventy-five percent of their square footage vacant.
(1) Municipalities include: Cities, towns, counties, port
districts, and housing authorities of this state.
(2) Public facilities projects include: Planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of: Bridges; roads; research, testing, training, and
incubation facilities in areas designated as innovation partnership
zones under RCW 43.330.270; buildings or structures; domestic and
industrial water; earth stabilization; sanitary sewer; storm sewer;
railroad; electricity; telecommunications; transportation; natural gas;
and port facilities.
(3) The board may make a revitalization loan only for a public
facilities project approved by a municipality that demonstrates
convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is
ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement
is made.
(4) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
project.
(5) An application for a revitalization loan must be made in the
form and manner prescribed by the board. When evaluating and
prioritizing projects, the board must give consideration, at a minimum,
to the following factors:
(a) The project's value to the community, including evidence of
support from affected local businesses and government;
(b) The project's feasibility, using standard economic principles;
(c) Commitment of local matching resources and local participation;
(d) The project's inclusion in a capital facilities plan,
comprehensive plan, or local economic development plan consistent with
applicable state planning requirements;
(e) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance plan for
employees that includes an option for dependents of employees; and
(f) The project's readiness to proceed.
(6) In making revitalization loans, the board must conform to the
following requirements:
(a) The board must provide reasonable terms and conditions for
repayment for loans;
(b) The board must not make loans that exceed twenty years in
duration;
(c) A municipality must begin repayment of a loan five years after
receiving it; and
(d) One or a combination of loans made to a municipality for a
specific project must not exceed two million dollars.
(7) The board must not provide financing for any public facilities
project that:
(a) Has the primary purpose of facilitating or promoting a retail
shopping development with a floor exceeding ten thousand square feet;
(b) Will result in a development or expansion that would displace
existing jobs in any other community in the state;
(c) Has the primary purpose of facilitating or promoting gambling;
(d) Is located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant; or
(e) Will result in a development or expansion of a professional
sports arena.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,000,000))
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$50,000,000

Sec. 1010 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1064 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Homeless Veterans" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed
April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP
list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if
the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may reallocate the funding to a
project in another category in the LEAP list, or to the highest
((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the alternate list in
LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The
department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,367,000

Sec. 1011 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Farmworkers" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10,
2013. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP list and
allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and
43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if the department
determines that a project is not eligible or is not ready to proceed,
the department may reallocate the funding to a project in another
category on the LEAP list, or to the highest ((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the alternate list in LEAP capital document No.
2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall, at its
discretion, determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to
each project, provided that the total allocation does not exceed the
appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,050,000

Sec. 1012 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Developmental Disabilities" in LEAP capital document No.
2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate
projects on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the
requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a
completed application, if the department determines that a project is
not eligible or is not ready to proceed, the department may reallocate
the funding to a project in another category on the LEAP list, or to
the highest ((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the
alternate list in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April
10, 2013. The department shall, at its discretion, determine the
actual amount of funding to be allocated to each project, provided that
the total allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this
section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,019,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,019,000

Sec. 1013 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1067 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000459)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Chronic Mental Illness" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate projects
on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of
RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application,
if the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may reallocate the funding to a
project in another category in the LEAP list, or to the highest
((ranking)) ranked, ready-to-proceed project on the alternate list in
LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The
department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,064,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Preserve/Recover Vashon Island Historic Property (92000242)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Sec. 1015 2013 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction (((92000151)))
(30000724)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for construction of the Renton aerospace training
center. This funding is in addition to funding provided in section
1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. (uncodified).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$10,000,000

Sec. 1016 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1084 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $9,200,000 of the appropriation is for design
alternatives for large capital flood damage reduction projects,
including basin-level water retention and Interstate 5 protection
projects.
(2) Up to $15,092,000 of the appropriation is for construction of
priority local flood protection projects, including multipurpose
projects that reduce flood damage and benefit fish habitat.
(3) Up to $1,750,000 of the appropriation is for projects to reduce
damage to residential and other structures in the floodplain, through
flood proofing and buyouts.
(4) Up to $2,160,000 of the appropriation is for state agency
technical assistance, stakeholder project management, project support,
and coordination.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,202,000))
$33,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,687,000))
$42,687,000

Sec. 1017 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1089 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Emergency Repair Pool for K-12 Public Schools (91000399)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address
unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public
schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day- to-day
operations of the school facility. To be eligible for funds from the
emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration must be signed by the
school district board of directors and the superintendent of public
instruction, and submitted to the office of financial management for
consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of
the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed
scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and
identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants
of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written
commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay
the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be
awarded, if applicable. The office of financial management must notify
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the
house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee
as emergency projects are approved for funding.
(2) $1,116,000 of the appropriation is provided for the Skykomish
school boiler replacement project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$8,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$8,116,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Reduce Cost of Private Market Capital for Local Infrastructure
(92000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriation is provided solely for the design of a state
program to reduce the cost of private capital to finance local
government infrastructure improvements. The program objective is to
provide assistance to jurisdictions that would otherwise face
significantly higher capital costs due to their smaller size and
infrequent access of the capital bond market. It is not the objective
of the program to reduce the cost of capital for reasons not associated
with size and infrequent access to the bond market, such as poor
maintenance of existing infrastructure, inadequate rates to support
sufficient capital and operating reserves, and other financial and
management practices that contribute to poorer bond ratings. The
program is not intended to subsidize borrowing below market rates.
Rather the program is to improve the efficiency of accessing market
rate capital. The program must be designed to coordinate with the
federally financed state revolving funds for safe drinking water and
clean water in the departments of health and ecology which are intended
to provide below market rate capital. The office of financial
management must work with the state treasurer's office in the design of
the program, and may explore the viability of options such as a state
bond bank, state contingent loan agreements, and other options other
than the use of state tax revenue for the principal of loans. A report
that recommends a program design, including draft legislation, must be
submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2014.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Sec. 1019 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1102 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resources Building Garage Fire Suppression System Repairs
(30000578)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department must delay the project
until sufficient revenues are projected in the state vehicle parking
account to support the appropriation either through efficiencies in
other uses of this account or through an increase in parking fees for
state employees and state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,238,000

Sec. 1020 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1109 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
1063 Block Replacement (91000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for predesign and bridging documents, design,
competition honoraria, project management, demolition, and other
planning activities including permits. The predesign must specify the
tenants of the building as directed by the office of financial
management. The predesign must indicate the estimated annual cost
increase for state agency tenants compared to the cost of their
existing leases. The estimated cost increase may take into account
estimated cost savings in staff costs and other costs that may result
in more efficient building design and layout of office space. The
director of the office of financial management must review these cost
estimates and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature indicating the budget increase that would be required sixty
days prior to executing any construction contracts for the building.
The lease for any prospective tenant may not be extended beyond the
anticipated occupancy date of the building. The building will be
alternatively financed as authorized in section 7014 of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000,000))
$1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000,000))
$1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Predesign for New State Patrol Building (92000008)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign for a new
facility for the headquarters of the state patrol. The predesign must
describe a project scope that meets all or most of the facility needs
of the state patrol in Thurston county while minimizing the budgetary
impacts. The predesign must consider a variety of sites, excluding
sites on the West capital campus.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
Predesign for Relocation of Industrial Hygiene Lab and Safety
Training (30000015)

Appropriation:
Medical Aid Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Accident Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building
(20081319)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Before completing design for the new
building the department must consult with industrial food service and
centralized pharmacy experts to determine the benefits and costs of the
following three possible modifications in the program for the new
facility:
(1) Consolidating and centralizing the department's institutional
pharmacy operations at the new facility;
(2) Consolidating and centralizing the department's institutional
pharmacy operations and the department of correction's centralized
pharmacy operations at the new facility; and
(3)(a) Consolidating and centralizing all the department's
institutional food service operations at the new facility to reduce
meal preparation costs, including, but not limited to:
(i) Consistent daily meals across institutions;
(ii) Off-site meal preparations and cook-chill meals;
(iii) Improved technology or equipment; and
(iv) Use of the department of correction's correctional industries
institutional food service.
(b) Any proposals for food service improvements must account for
special diets and consistency with established dietary intakes of the
food and nutrition board of the national research council.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $828,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Lakeland Village Chiller Replacement (30002569)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Fircrest School Electrical Service Repairs (30002570)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 2005 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 2009 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital and Western State Hospital - All Wards:
Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,774,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,574,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,800,000))
$9,574,000

Sec. 2006 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Department of Corrections Centralized Pharmacy Westside (92000034)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall collaborate with the
department of social and health services on a long-term option to
consolidate pharmacy operations for state institutions into one new
facility on the grounds of western state hospital. To facilitate this
review, the department shall contribute information on its current
pharmacy operations including, but not limited to, the demand for and
volume of pharmaceuticals, proposed purchasing and packaging options,
operational staffing, and distribution cycles.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex Contaminated Soil Remediation
(30000994)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3002 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,885,000
Appropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,354,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,548,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,433,000))
$18,787,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean-Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000395)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding is provided solely for the clean- up of contaminated
sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half mile of Puget Sound.
Clean-ups must include orphaned and abandoned sites that pose a threat
to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites being cleaned up first.
The department must provide the Puget Sound partnership the opportunity
to review and provide comment on proposed projects and activities
recommended for funding. This review must be consistent with the
funding schedule for the program.
(2) By October 1, 2014, the department must submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature showing the requested clean-up projects that fit the definition of large complex multi-biennial
projects under RCW 70.105D.030(5). The report must show a description
of the project, the amount requested over the ten-year period, the
amount requested for the 2015-2017 biennium, and the estimated jobs
created by the 2015-2017 proposed appropriation.

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,880,000

Sec. 3003 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3067 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1) $7,750,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $7,750,000 for fiscal
year 2015 of the state building construction account--state is provided
solely as state match for federal clean water funds.
(2))) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of
ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor
undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor
may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution
control loan program ((loan)).

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000))
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($184,500,000))
$200,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $510,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (30000394)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,149,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,547,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000393)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
condition and limitation: For projects involving repair, replacement,
or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works
facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable,
the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the
project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The
project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
pollution control loan program.

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000417)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (92000125)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account--state appropriation shall be deposited in the state drought
preparedness account.
(2) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
response to the statewide drought that was declared pursuant to chapter
43.83B RCW. The department of ecology may provide funding or
compensation for purchase or lease of water rights and to public bodies
as defined in RCW 43.83B.050 in connection with projects and measures
designed to alleviate drought conditions that may affect: Public
health and safety; drinking water supplies; agricultural activities; or
fish and wildlife survival.
(3) Projects or measures for which funding or compensation will be
provided must be connected with a water system, water source, or water
body that is receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than
seventy-five percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural
drought conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that
it is causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish
or wildlife depending on the water supply. General criteria for
guidelines to be established by the department of ecology for
distribution of funds must include: A balanced and equitable
distribution of the funds among the different sectors affected by
drought; a funding process that ensures funds are available for drought
impacts that arise both early and later during the course of the
drought; and preference for projects that leverage other federal and
local funds.

Appropriation:
State Drought Preparedness Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Sec. 3008 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3066 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of
ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor
undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor
may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial clean
water program grant.
(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the Port of Walla Walla/Burbank school district septic
system replacement project.

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$50,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($290,000,000))
$290,750,000

Sec. 3009 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3081 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $81,081,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for grants to cities and counties to perform project-specific
planning, design, and construction of projects that reduce storm water
impacts from existing infrastructure and development. The grants are
intended to build on and expand a city's or county's storm water
program.
(a) In consultation with storm water stakeholders, the department
shall develop and implement a competitive grant program by July 1,
2014, that is designed to fund storm water projects and activities that
have been proven effective at reducing environmental degradation from
storm water.
(b) In order to receive funding, projects must have a high water
quality or ecological benefit and address pollution from existing
development.
(c) A project that relies on low-impact development retrofit
techniques to reduce storm water impacts that is otherwise rated
equally to a project that does not rely on low-impact development
retrofit techniques must be given priority for grant funding.
(d) Projects required by court or administrative order or for
mitigation purposes are not eligible for funding.
(e) Up to $15,000,000 of the appropriation provided in this
subsection may be allocated to cities or counties covered by a phase I
or II national pollutant discharge elimination system permit for
project-specific planning and design activities that prepare projects
for application to the competitive grant program to be implemented
under subsection (1)(a) of this section. As a condition for funding,
cities or counties shall prepare low-impact development retrofit
projects for the competitive grant program. Cities or counties may
also use project-specific planning and design funds for other projects
that have high water quality and ecological benefits that address
pollution from existing development. The department must provide
notice to all cities and counties that are eligible for planning and
design grants. The notice of eligibility must also include information
on grant requirements so that those who elect to participate understand
the requirements for funding.
(2)(a) $150,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely to the department to develop an ongoing comprehensive, statewide
storm water financial assistance program to be implemented beginning no
later than July 1, 2015. The program will provide grants to local
governments for the protection and improvement of statewide water
quality and to improve watershed functionality by reducing the
transport of toxics and other pollutants through storm water runoff,
and by reducing uncontrolled runoff flows.
(b) The department must collaborate with storm water stakeholders
to develop the funding criteria for the storm water financial
assistance program, and include the new statewide storm water financial
assistance program into the department's integrated water quality
funding cycle process.
(c) The storm water financial assistance program may include, but
not be limited to: Funding for retrofit capital improvement projects;
low-impact development; research and development components and
investments in learning; pass-through funding for local government
storm water permit implementation, education, and outreach; prioritized
watershed basin retrofit strategies; purchase of pooled equipment for
local government use; and preconstruction awards solely for the
planning and design of either new storm water facilities or a retrofit
of existing storm water facilities.
(3) (($18,769,000)) $20,469,000 of the appropriation in this
section is provided solely for the following list of projects.

Storm Water Improvements

Bellingham Shipping Terminal Storm Water Project $1,500,000

Camas Storm Water Projects $2,000,000

Centralia Station Storm Water Project $750,000

Clark County Storm Water Projects $1,531,000

Kennewick Storm Water Projects $1,780,000

Tacoma Regional Stormwater Facility $3,000,000

Port of Bellingham Marine Trades Storm Water Project $1,000,000

15th Street Water Quality Infrastructure Project $2,184,000

Richland Storm Water Projects $900,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan $400,000

Spokane Storm Water Projects $2,000,000

Sunnyside Storm Water Project $455,000

Union Gap Storm Water Project $495,000

West Richland Yakima River Outfall Elimination $124,000

Zillah Storm Water Project $650,000

Lake Forest Park Highway 522 Flooding $1,700,000

TOTAL (($18,769,000))

$20,469,000

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000,000))
$101,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000,000))
$101,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Hazard Reduction Grants (91000239)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $15,000,000 of the appropriation in this
section is provided solely for a statewide competitive grant program
for flood hazard reduction projects that also protect or restore
floodplain ecosystem functions.
(1) Grants may be distributed on a competitive basis to the
following eligible entities: Counties, cities, federally recognized
Indian tribes; port districts; flood control districts; conservation
districts; and diking and drainage districts.
(2) Applicants must provide a twenty percent match from nonstate
sources. The nonstate match may include cash on hand, the value of
real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, the
proceeds of a letter of credit or other binding loan commitment, a
pledge commitment, and in-kind contributions. Applicants may receive
credit for properly documented nonstate matching funds that were
contributed no earlier than ten years prior to the grant solicitation
round and that are related to the needs identified in the project
application. The department may develop additional requirements
related to documenting the value of the nonstate match.
(3) The department, in consultation with the office of financial
management, must evaluate, score, and rank applications based on the
following criteria, in descending order of priority:
(a) Projects that achieve multiple benefits, including, but not
limited to, cost-effective flood hazard reduction to people, property,
critical facilities, and transportation corridors, flood risk
reduction, salmon recovery, water quality improvements, habitat
restoration, agricultural viability, public access, and channel
migration zone protection. Projects must address both reduction and
prevention of flood risks, and protection or restoration of floodplain
ecosystem functions. For the Chehalis river basin, projects may also
include, but not be limited to, an upstream water retention facility.
(i) Priority must first be given to projects that:
(A) Are located in a county or counties covered by ten or more
state emergency flood proclamations from 1996 to 2012; and
(B) Are part of a basin-wide strategy created by a governor's work
group in close collaboration with an Indian tribe and a multicounty
flood authority.
(ii) Priority must next be given to projects in counties that have
historically been and are projected to continue to be at greatest risk
and most vulnerable to flooding;
(b) Projects that are consistent with and recommended by a
collaborative planning and approval process that includes public
comment, such as a comprehensive flood hazard management plan, a hazard
mitigation plan, a comprehensive plan, a watershed plan, or other
applicable plans;
(c) Projects that minimize or eliminate future costs for
maintenance, operation, or emergency response; and
(d) Projects that are ready to proceed with the scope of work, and
whose sponsors have the capacity to complete the project successfully.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the financing of flood control projects
requires a careful analysis of the options for funding projects using
best practices with sources of money that do not impair the general
fund. The legislature intends to accomplish that analysis through the
task force created in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6516. The department
of ecology must not expend any funds provided to the department in this
act for flood control until that task force completes its work and the
legislature acts on the recommendations of the task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Marblemount Hatchery Culverts (30000657)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Reduce Agricultural Toxic Pollution - Voluntary Stewardship Program
(92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
implement voluntary stewardship program planning in the counties that
have opted into the program that have yet to receive funding. County
funding levels must be determined by the conservation commission, in
consultation with the voluntary stewardship program statewide advisory
committee, and must be consistent with the provisions of chapter 360,
Laws of 2011 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1886).

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Replace Barrier Culverts on Department of Natural Resources Land
(30000232)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Olympic Region Shop Fire Recovery (30000226)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department must deposit all insurance
payments received since July 1, 2013, for replacement of the building
in the resource management cost account. The appropriation from the
resource management cost account is the estimate of those expected
insurance payments. The department must notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature what the final insurance settlement is.
If the final amount is less than the expected amount the department
must submit a supplemental capital budget adjustment to reflect that
change.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,427,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $683,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Teanaway Community Forest Trust (30000230)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to correct
barriers and meet road maintenance and abandonment planning (RMAP)
responsibilities, upgrade outhouses and fire rings, install gates,
signs and other mechanisms to control unauthorized use of the community
forest, and conduct forest health and high-risk wildfire fuels
treatments near high-risk communities.
(2) The state continues to purchase land for recreation, fish and
wildlife habitat management, long term water supplies, and timber
production and needs a long term strategy to control management costs.
The Yakima basin integrated plan is important for watershed, wildlife,
recreation and timber management. The Teanaway community forest is an
essential element of that plan. Managing that land and achieving the
goals of the Yakima basin integrated plan will be more difficult with
checkerboard ownership of private, state, federal, and tribal lands.
The department of natural resources must develop recommendations to the
legislature for possible land acquisitions within the Yakima basin
integrated plan area that would improve road access to isolated
parcels, reduces management costs by eliminating checkerboard ownership
patterns, and increase the potential to produce revenue for the state
to cover management costs within the Teanaway community forest.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station (30000229)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,535,000

Sec. 3018 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3239 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
State Forest Land Replacement (30000223)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to the
department to transfer from state forest land status to natural
resources conservation area status certain state forest lands in
counties with a population of twenty-five thousand or less which are
subject to timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to
the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened
under the federal endangered species act. The total appropriation is
to be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forest lands in
the qualifying counties.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management
or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed
under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and
other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in
RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in
the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy
replacement state forest land, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.
(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties
identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that
restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. The department will identify
eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsection (1) of
this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and will
not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide
interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources
conservation area program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$3,000,000

Sec. 3019 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3240 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Hazard Reduction (30000224)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
forest health hazard reduction treatments on state, federal, and
private lands. The appropriation may be used for mechanical
treatments, project planning, site preparation, permitting, or
prescribed burning. The department, in consultation with the forest
health technical advisory group, shall provide a report to the governor
and the legislature by October 1, 2014, on its work to reduce forest
health hazards from fiscal year 2010 through fiscal year 2014. This
report must include an estimate of work needed through fiscal year 2020
on state, federal, and private lands and recommended mechanisms to fund
this work.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$4,773,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,000,000))
$24,773,000

(End of part)

PART 4
EDUCATION
Sec. 4001 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5019 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Capital Program Administration (30000128)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction will publish to its
web site and report to the office of financial management, the
appropriate committees of the legislature, and the legislative
evaluation and accountability program a list of local school district
projects submitted for approval for school construction assistance
within seven business days of the school district deadline to submit
items for approval. The report must be updated within seven days
following approval of the school district submissions by the
superintendent of public instruction. The report must include, but not
be limited to:
(a) School district;
(b) Project name;
(c) Estimated square footage by proposed project type;
(d) Estimated total of all project costs and estimated total
construction contract cost;
(e) Funding sources and election dates, if applicable; and
(f) Intent to front-fund the project.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction will provide to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee in
electronic database form the following:
(a) Study and survey information beginning with grants awarded July
1, 2014; and
(b) All available inventory and condition of schools data.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,854,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,246,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
remediation and removal of poor soils at the building site and for
infrastructure and utility work in preparation of the new skills center
buildings.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,891,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,891,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,391,000

Sec. 4003 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Spokane Valley Tech (91000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
Lloyd Auditorium Emergency Repairs (30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000

Sec. 4005 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5042 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000494)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,539,000))
$1,629,000
University of Washington Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,215,000))
$45,125,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,754,000

Sec. 4006 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
2013-2015 Minor Works - Preservation, Safety, and Infrastructure
(30000849)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,214,000))
$6,380,000
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,350,000))
$22,184,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,564,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,564,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4007 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington Animal Disease Diagnostic and Research Facility (GAHBII)
(30000498)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,300,000

Sec. 4008 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5062 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Eastern Washington University Minor Works Preservation (30000468)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,434,000))
$295,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,066,000))
$8,205,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4009 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Buried Oil Storage Tank Remediation (30000681)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4010 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Predesign and BEST Study for ROTC Facility (92000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the state building
construction account--state is provided solely for Central Washington
University to prepare a predesign and to enter into an interagency
agreement with the office of financial management for a budget
evaluation study to analyze that predesign to determine the best course
of action for providing a facility that will meet the current and
future needs of the reserve officer training corps (ROTC). The budget
evaluation study shall be submitted to the governor and the legislature
no later than November 1, 2014, and shall include an examination of
previous capital budget requests for renovation of Peterson hall and
the chimpanzee and human communication institute facility as well as
the ten-year capital plan for the campus.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Sec. 4011 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5072 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Facility Preservation (30000084)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,580,000))
$725,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,120,000))
$5,975,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $212,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,912,000

Sec. 4012 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5078 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,374,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,531,000))
$68,531,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,905,000

Sec. 4013 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5086 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Performing Arts Exterior Renewal (30000428)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,947,000))
$2,395,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $552,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,947,000

Sec. 4014 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5131 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (30000723)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,236,000))
$16,375,000
State Higher Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,000
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $582,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,792,000))
$20,931,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,792,000))
$20,931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4015 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
History Museum Membrane System Replacement (30000220)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000

Sec. 4016 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5117 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,517,000
Community/Technical College Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,162,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,679,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,075,000))
$26,587,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,592,000))
$32,266,000

(End of part)

PART 5
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Taxable Building Construction Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account, $4,400,000
for fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account: For transfer
to the water pollution control revolving account,
$7,750,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $7,750,000 for
fiscal year 2015 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000

Sec. 5002 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7014 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula College
for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate or replace the Forks
satellite building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound
Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the
downtown Lacey campus.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to forty
acres of land.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a
replacement facility for the student life center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community
College for up to $11,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
recreation center.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $3,100,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the
student services building.
(g) Enter into a long-term lease on behalf of Spokane Community
College at Felts Field suitable for the aerospace training center
program, subject to the approval of the office of financial management
as required by chapter 43.82 RCW.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia
College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia
College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase interest in a mixed
use building for student housing.
(2) Department of enterprise services:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the modifications to the Yakima office building in preparation for
the department of social and health services use of the building.
(b) ((Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.
The building will be delivered using design build, as defined by
chapter 39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations and
maintenance performance. The term for performance validation must not
be less than five years. The state may use state employees for
services not related to building performance. Criteria for selecting
a contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs or energy use
index. The scope of the building shall be between two hundred thousand
and two hundred twenty-five thousand square feet of office space based
on the office of financial management's direction for square feet and
tenants identified in the programming phase including the Washington
State Patrol. Tenant lease costs for the building may not exceed $26
per gross square foot including debt services and operating expenses.
Proposals must be received by January 31, 2014. This is phase one of
a two-phase process that includes future demolition of the current
general administration building and construction of a similar facility
which may include the state library as a tenant.)) Enter into a
financing contract for up to $750,000 financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the department of ecology
headquarters building energy conservation and HVAC replacement.
(c) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,968,000 financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the
department of ecology headquarters emergency generator replacement.
(3) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $19,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to improve and expand recreational and
athletic facilities on the Cheney campus.
(4) The Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $12,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the currently leased
facilities for the Tacoma program.
(5) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $8,461,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a welcome center.

Sec. 5003 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7033 and 2013
2nd sp.s. c 4 s 992 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as
follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under
subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local
toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the
cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics
control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal
year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the
moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in
RCW 70.105D.170.
(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW
82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.
(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection,
the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control
account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this
chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered
under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or
transferred to the account by the legislature.
(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to
the following activities:
(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this
chapter;
(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;
(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or
disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small
businesses, and agriculture;
(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness,
training, and response activities;
(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(j) A public participation program;
(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards
under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use,
reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;
(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that
protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous
clean-up sites;
(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under
the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);
(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure
to toxic air pollution;
(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the
costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:
(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone
designated under RCW 70.105D.150;
(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a
settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and
(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional
criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a
substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise
occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup
commensurate with the scope of the public funding;
(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;
(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if
the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed
available funds in those accounts;
(t) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the department of
ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment,
administration, and air quality programs;
(u) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the state
conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish; ((and))
(v) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the University
of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;
(w) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics
control account may be spent on projects in section ((3159)) 3160,
chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. projects in sections 2007 and
4009 of this act, and for transfer to the local toxics control account;
and
(x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics
control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste
account.
(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local
toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (((c)[(e)]))
(e)(i) of this subsection;
(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of
properties as provided for under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv) of this
subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions
at:
(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high
hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan
or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;
(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone
if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and
there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent
document under the federal cleanup law;
(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in
conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial
actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up
sites;
(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and
(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if
the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed
available funds in those accounts.
(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.
(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government storm water planning and
implementation activities.
(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general
fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may
use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments
under this subsection:
(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government
conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend
over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions
exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the
following limitations:
(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten
years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement
upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at
the facility;
(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the
total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and
(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended
grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the
department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous
biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been
entered into to substantially expend the funds;
(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government
conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement
of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the
agreement;
(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to
it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct
remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local
government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance
with a schedule specified in the agreement;
(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to
fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield
properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation.
Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental
site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments;
feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and
regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic
and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter
43.21C RCW;
(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions
related to areawide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding,
the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or
be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially
liable person;
(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities
that would not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that
would not otherwise occur;
(vii) When pending grant applications under (((c)[(e)])) (e)(iv)
and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available,
designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for
distribution of available funds.
(((d) [(f)])) (f) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the
department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the
2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account
may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059,
chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.
(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no
hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid
waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction,
maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects
designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a
competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However,
this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics
control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with
the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.
(7) Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-
profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty
thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated
for public participation that are not expended at the close of any
biennium revert to the state toxics control account.
(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery,
the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to
implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited
procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award
of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of
rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may
administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive
guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.
(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this
section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. effects
[affects] the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public
funding.
(10) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the local toxics control
account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for
storm water grants.

Sec. 5004 RCW 43.160.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public
facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of
all moneys collected under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to
it by law. Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on
authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction
loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW. During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the public
facilities construction loan revolving account may be used for
community economic revitalization board export assistance grants and
loans in section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. and for
matching funds for the federal energy regional innovation cluster in
section 1017, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the public facilities construction loan
revolving account may be used for the animal disease traceability
project in section 3247, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.,
administered by the department of agriculture.

Sec. 5005 RCW 70.105D.170 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 28 s 1, 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 19 s 7042, and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 991 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The environmental legacy stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Beginning July 1, 2013, and every fiscal year
thereafter, the annual amount received from the tax imposed by RCW
82.21.030 that exceeds one hundred forty million dollars must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account. The state
treasurer may make periodic deposits into the environmental legacy
stewardship account based on forecasted revenue. Moneys in the account
may only be spent after appropriation.
(2) Moneys in the environmental legacy stewardship account may be
spent on:
(a) Grants or loans to local governments for performance and
outcome-based projects, model remedies, demonstration projects,
procedures, contracts, and project management and oversight that result
in significant reductions in the time to complete compared to baseline
averages;
(b) Purposes authorized under RCW 70.105D.070 (3) and (4);
(c) Grants or loans awarded through a competitive grant program
administered by the department to fund design and construction of low-impact development retrofit projects and other high quality projects
that reduce storm water pollution from existing infrastructure. The
competitive grant program must apply criteria to review, rank, and
prioritize projects for funding based on their water quality benefits,
ecological benefits, and effectiveness at reducing environmental
degradation; and
(d) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(3) Except as provided under RCW 70.105D.070(3) (k) and (q),
nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. expands the ability of
a potentially liable person to receive public funding.
(4) Moneys in the environmental legacy stewardship account may also
be used as follows:
(a) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, shoreline update technical
assistance and for local government shoreline master program update
grants;
(b) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, solid and hazardous waste
compliance at the department of corrections;
(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, activities at the
department of fish and wildlife concerning water quality monitoring,
hatchery water quality regulatory compliance, and technical assistance
to local governments on growth management and shoreline management;
(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, forest practices
regulation and aquatic land investigation and cleanup activities at the
department of natural resources;
(e) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, implementation of the
voluntary stewardship program established in chapter 360, Laws of 2011.
(5) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the environmental
legacy stewardship account may be transferred to the local toxics
control account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee
shall develop a new K-12 capital budget model in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial
management, the caseload forecast council and legislative fiscal staff
for use in forecasting biennial appropriations to support the school
construction assistance program. The model must include improved
forecasting of the school construction assistance program through
analysis of existing data including, but not limited to:
(1) Local school district bond and levy elections and bond sales;
(2) Actual pace of state assistance reimbursement including front-funded projects and other conditions that contribute to variations in
reimbursements;
(3) Local school district study and survey results specific to
estimated capital costs, cost/benefit analyses on the need to modernize
and/or replace existing school facilities, timelines for completing
school facilities projects, and ability to provide capital funds by
local efforts; and
(4) Analysis of actual inventory and condition of schools.
(5) State population forecasts of school-aged children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of
state funds from the state building construction account, or from any
other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital
project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from
the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures
for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the
applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those
bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7004 (uncodified); and
(2) 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7013 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
--- END ---