BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that both the
federal and state Constitutions contain certain sacred protections
against warrantless searches by law enforcement. Federal and state
courts have recognized certain reasonable exceptions to the warrant
requirement consistent with common sense and public safety. The
supreme court of the United States recognized the "school search
exception" to the warrant requirement in the due process clause of the
fourth amendment of the United States Constitution in the case New
Jersey v. T.L.O., 469 U.S. 325, 105 S. Ct. 733, 83 L. Ed. 2d 720
(1985). The school search exception provides that reasonable suspicion
standard shall apply when school officials, including teachers,
teachers' aides, school administrators, school police officers, and
local police school liaison officers, conduct a search acting on their
own authority of a student on school grounds. The Washington state
supreme court also recognized the school search exception as valid in
Washington state under Article I, section 7 of the state Constitution.
York v. Wahkiakum Sch. Dist. No. 200, 163 Wn.2d 297, 303, 178 P.3d 995
(2008) State v. McKinnon, 88 Wn.2d 75, 558 P.2d 781 (1977). In a
recent opinion, the Washington state supreme court overruled previous
case law and determined that a school resource officer could no longer
conduct searches of students for drugs or weapons under the school
search exception. Washington v. Meneese, Case No. 86203–6, August 2,
2012. The court's analysis raised the issue of whether school resource
officers were clearly authorized as school officials to conduct
searches to enforce school rules. It is the intent of the legislature
to allow for the school search exception to the warrant requirement by
providing clear authorization for school police officers and school
resource officers to conduct searches of students on school grounds to
enforce school rules and create a safe learning environment for
students and school employees.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.600.230 and 1999 c 167 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A school resource officer, local police school liaison officer,
principal, vice principal, or principal's designee may search a
student, the student's possessions, and the student's locker, if the
resource officer, local police school liaison officer, principal, vice
principal, or principal's designee has reasonable grounds to suspect
that the search will yield evidence of the student's violation of the
law or school rules. A search is mandatory if there are reasonable
grounds to suspect a student has illegally possessed a firearm in
violation of RCW 9.41.280.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the scope
of the search is proper if the search is conducted as follows:
(a) The methods used are reasonably related to the objectives of
the search; and
(b) Is not excessively intrusive in light of the age and sex of the
student and the nature of the suspected infraction.
(3) A school resource officer, local police school liaison officer,
principal, or vice principal or anyone acting under their direction may
not subject a student to a strip search or body cavity search as those
terms are defined in RCW 10.79.070.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.240 and 1990 c 33 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the provisions in RCW 28A.600.230, the school
resource officer, local police school liaison officer, principal, vice
principal, or principal's designee may search all student lockers at
any time without prior notice and without a reasonable suspicion that
the search will yield evidence of any particular student's violation of
the law or school rule.
(2) If the school resource officer, local police school liaison
officer, principal, vice principal, or principal's designee, as a
result of the search, develops a reasonable suspicion that a certain
container or containers in any student locker contain evidence of a
student's violation of the law or school rule, the resource officer,
local police school liaison officer, principal, vice principal, or
principal's designee may search the container or containers according
to the provisions of RCW 28A.600.230(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
At the point that a school resource officer makes an actual,
lawful, custodial arrest, the school resource officer is no longer
acting under school authority to enforce violations of school rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---