BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
address the decision of the Washington court of appeals in Landis &
Landis Constr. LLC v. Nation, 171 Wn. App. 157 (2012) and its
interpretation of the Washington supreme court case Foisy v. Wyman, 83
Wn.2d 22 (1973). The decision allows a tenant to state a common law
cause of action for a defective condition at the rental premises. The
tenant may decide to unilaterally walk away from the lease without
putting the landlord on notice regarding the defective condition and
allowing the landlord to remedy it.
By contrast, RCW 59.18.070, a part of the residential
landlord-tenant act, gives the tenant a remedy for defective conditions
at the rental premises, but requires the tenant to notify the landlord
and to afford the landlord varying periods of time to remedy specific
defective conditions.
The court of appeals opinion and its interpretation of Foisy v.
Wyman create an irreconcilable conflict between the judge-created
remedy for defective conditions at the premises and the remedy created
by the legislature in RCW 59.18.070.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish that the remedy
for defective conditions at residential rental premises in Washington
under RCW 59.18.070 is paramount.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.070 and 2010 c 8 s 19018 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If at any time during the tenancy the landlord fails to carry
out the duties required by RCW 59.18.060 or by the rental agreement,
the tenant may, in addition to pursuit of remedies otherwise provided
him or her by law except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
deliver written notice to the person designated in RCW
59.18.060(((14))) (15), or to the person who collects the rent, which
notice shall specify the premises involved, the name of the owner, if
known, and the nature of the defective condition. The landlord shall
commence remedial action after receipt of such notice by the tenant as
soon as possible but not later than the following time periods, except
where circumstances are beyond the landlord's control:
(((1))) (a) Not more than twenty-four hours, where the defective
condition deprives the tenant of hot or cold water, heat, or
electricity, or is imminently hazardous to life;
(((2))) (b) Not more than seventy-two hours, where the defective
condition deprives the tenant of the use of a refrigerator, range and
oven, or a major plumbing fixture supplied by the landlord; and
(((3))) (c) Not more than ten days in all other cases.
In each instance the burden shall be on the landlord to see that
remedial work under this section is completed promptly. If completion
is delayed due to circumstances beyond the landlord's control,
including the unavailability of financing, the landlord shall remedy
the defective condition as soon as possible.
(2) The remedies provided under subsection (1) of this section
supersede those provided under an implied warranty of habitability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to all causes of action
commenced on or after the effective date of this section, regardless of
when the cause of action arose. To this extent, this act applies
retroactively, but in all other respects it applies prospectively.

--- END ---