BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.10.030 and 2012 c 229 s 576 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal
organizations ((sponsoring)) conducting educational programs primarily
for that organization's membership or offered by that organization on
a no-fee basis;
(2) Entities offering education that is exclusively avocational or
recreational;
(3) Education not requiring payment of money or other consideration
if this education is not advertised or promoted as leading toward
educational credentials;
(4) Entities that are established, operated, and governed by this
state or its political subdivisions under Title 28A((,)) or 28B((, or
28C)) RCW or this title;
(5) Degree-granting programs in compliance with the rules of the
student achievement council;
(6) Any other entity to the extent that it has been exempted from
some or all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 28C.10.100;
(7) Entities not otherwise exempt that are of a religious
character, but only as to those educational programs exclusively
devoted to religious or theological objectives and represented
accurately in institutional catalogs or other official publications;
(8) Entities offering only courses certified by the federal
aviation administration;
(9) Barber and cosmetology schools licensed under chapter 18.16
RCW;
(10) Entities which only offer courses approved to meet the
continuing education requirements for licensure under chapter 18.04,
18.79, or 48.17 RCW; and
(11) Entities not otherwise exempt offering only workshops or
seminars lasting no longer than three calendar days.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.10.050 and 2013 c 39 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency shall adopt by rule minimum standards for entities
operating private vocational schools. The minimum standards shall
include, but not be limited to, requirements to assess whether a
private vocational school is eligible to obtain and maintain a license
in this state.
(2) The requirements adopted by the agency shall, at a minimum,
require a private vocational school to:
(a) Disclose to the agency information about its ownership and
financial position and to demonstrate to the agency that the school is
financially viable and responsible and that it has sufficient financial
resources to fulfill its commitments to students. Financial
disclosures provided to the agency shall not be subject to public
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW;
(b) Follow a uniform statewide cancellation and refund policy as
specified by the agency;
(c) Disclose through use of a school catalog, brochure, or other
written material, necessary information to students so that students
may make informed enrollment decisions. The agency shall specify what
information is required;
(d) Use an enrollment contract or agreement that includes: (i) The
school's cancellation and refund policy, (ii) a brief statement that
the school is licensed under this chapter and that inquiries, concerns,
or complaints may be made to the agency, and (iii) other necessary
information as determined by the agency;
(e) Describe accurately and completely in writing to students
before their enrollment prerequisites and requirements for (i)
completing successfully the programs of study in which they are
interested and (ii) qualifying for the fields of employment for which
their education is designed;
(f) Comply with the requirements of RCW 28C.10.084;
(g) Assess the basic skills and relevant aptitudes of each
potential student to determine that a potential student has the basic
skills and relevant aptitudes necessary to complete and benefit from
the program in which the student plans to enroll, including but not
limited to administering a United States department of education-approved English as a second language exam before enrolling students
for whom English is a second language unless the students provide proof
of graduation from a United States high school or proof of completion
of a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536
in English or results of another academic assessment determined
appropriate by the agency. Guidelines for such assessments shall be
developed by the agency, in consultation with the schools;
(h) Discuss with each potential student the potential student's
obligations in signing any enrollment contract and/or incurring any
debt for educational purposes. The discussion shall include the
inadvisability of acquiring an excessive educational debt burden that
will be difficult to repay given employment opportunities and average
starting salaries in the potential student's chosen occupation;
(i) Ensure that any enrollment contract between the private
vocational school and its students has an attachment in a format
provided by the agency. The attachment shall be signed by both the
school and the student. The attachment shall stipulate that the school
has complied with (h) of this subsection and that the student
understands and accepts his or her responsibilities in signing any
enrollment contract or debt application. The attachment shall also
stipulate that the enrollment contract shall not be binding for at
least five days, excluding Sundays and holidays, following signature of
the enrollment contract by both parties; and
(j) Comply with the requirements related to qualifications of
administrators and instructors.
(3) The agency may deny a private vocational school's application
for licensure if the school fails to meet the requirements in this
section.
(4) The agency may determine that a licensed private vocational
school or a particular program of a private vocational school is at
risk of closure or termination if:
(a) There is a pattern or history of substantiated student
complaints filed with the agency pursuant to RCW 28C.10.120; or
(b) The private vocational school fails to meet minimum licensing
requirements and has a pattern or history of failing to meet the
minimum requirements.
(5) If the agency determines that a private vocational school or a
particular program is at risk of closure or termination, the agency
shall require the school to take corrective action.

Sec. 3 RCW 28C.10.060 and 1987 c 459 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any entity desiring to operate a private vocational school shall
apply for a license to the agency on a form provided by the agency.
The agency shall issue a license if the school:
(1) Files a completed application with information satisfactory to
the agency. Misrepresentation by an applicant shall be grounds for the
agency, at its discretion, to deny or revoke a license.
(2) Complies with the requirements for the tuition recovery trust
fund under RCW 28C.10.084.
(3) Pays the required fees.
(4) Meets the minimum standards adopted by the agency under RCW
28C.10.050.
Licenses shall be valid for one year from the date of issue unless
revoked or suspended. If a school fails to file a completed renewal
application at least thirty days before the expiration date of its
current license the school shall be subject to payment of a late filing
fee fixed by the agency.

Sec. 4 RCW 28C.10.082 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 965 are each
amended to read as follows:
The tuition recovery trust fund is hereby established in the
custody of the state treasurer. The agency shall deposit in the fund
all moneys received under RCW 28C.10.084. Moneys in the fund may be
spent only for the purposes under RCW 28C.10.084. Disbursements from
the fund shall be on authorization of the agency. Disbursements from
the fund shall only be used to reimburse students who are Washington
state residents, or agencies or businesses that pay tuition and fees on
behalf of Washington students. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the tuition recovery trust fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
in the fund. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
disbursements.

Sec. 5 RCW 28C.10.084 and 2001 c 23 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency shall establish, maintain, and administer a tuition
recovery trust fund. All funds collected for the tuition recovery
trust fund are payable to the state for the benefit and protection of
any student or enrollee of a private vocational school licensed under
this chapter, ((or,)) in the case of a minor, his or her parents or
guardian, or an agency or business that paid tuition and fees on behalf
of Washington state students, for purposes including but not limited to
the settlement of claims related to school closures under subsection
(10) of this section and the settlement of claims under RCW 28C.10.120.
The fund shall be liable for settlement of claims and costs of
administration but shall not be liable to pay out or recover penalties
assessed under RCW 28C.10.130 or 28C.10.140. No liability accrues to
the state of Washington from claims made against the fund.
(2) By June 30, 1998, a minimum operating balance of one million
dollars shall be achieved in the fund and maintained thereafter. If
disbursements reduce the operating balance below two hundred thousand
dollars at any time before June 30, 1998, or below one million dollars
thereafter, each participating owner shall be assessed a pro rata share
of the deficiency created, based upon the incremental scale created
under subsection (6) of this section for each private vocational
school. The agency shall adopt schedules of times and amounts for
effecting payments of assessment.
(3) In order for a private vocational school to be and remain
licensed under this chapter each owner shall, in addition to other
requirements under this chapter, make cash deposits on behalf of the
school into a tuition recovery trust fund as a means to assure payment
of claims brought under this chapter.
(4) The amount of liability that can be satisfied by this fund on
behalf of each private vocational school licensed under this chapter
shall be the amount of unearned prepaid tuition ((in possession of the
owner)) and fees. If the claimant provides evidence to the agency of
the lack of availability to continue his or her program of study at
another institution, the agency's executive director or the executive
director's designee has the authority to reimburse the student, agency,
or business up to the full value of tuition and fees paid to date,
subject to subsection (10) of this section. The agency may use the
fund to pay for prior learning assessments for students who choose to
attend another institution.
(5) The fund's liability with respect to each participating private
vocational school commences on the date of the initial deposit into the
fund made on its behalf and ceases one year from the date the school is
no longer licensed under this chapter.
(6) The agency shall adopt by rule a matrix for calculating the
deposits into the fund on behalf of each vocational school. Proration
shall be determined by factoring the school's share of liability in
proportion to the aggregated liability of all participants under the
fund by grouping such prorations under the incremental scale created by
subsection (4) of this section. Expressed as a percentage of the total
liability, that figure determines the amount to be contributed when
factored into a fund containing one million dollars. The total amount
of its prorated share, minus the amount paid for initial
capitalization, shall be payable in up to twenty increments over a ten-year period, commencing with the sixth month after the initial
capitalization deposit has been made on behalf of the school.
Additionally, the agency shall require deposits for initial
capitalization, under which the amount each owner deposits is
proportionate to the school's share of two hundred thousand dollars,
employing the matrix developed under this subsection.
(7) No vested right or interests in deposited funds is created or
implied for the depositor, either at any time during the operation of
the fund or at any such future time that the fund may be dissolved.
All funds deposited are payable to the state for the purposes described
under this section. The agency shall maintain the fund, serve
appropriate notices to affected owners when scheduled deposits are due,
collect deposits, and make disbursements to settle claims against the
fund. When the aggregated deposits total five million dollars and the
history of disbursements justifies such modifications, the agency may
at its own option reduce the schedule of deposits whether as to time,
amount, or both and the agency may also entertain proposals from among
the licensees with regard to disbursing surplus funds for such purposes
as vocational scholarships.
(8) Based on annual financial data supplied by the owner, the
agency shall determine whether the increment assigned to that private
vocational school on the incremental scale established under subsection
(6) of this section has changed. If an increase or decrease in gross
annual tuition income has occurred, a corresponding change in the
school's incremental position and contribution schedule shall be made
before the date of the owner's next scheduled deposit into the fund.
Such adjustments shall only be calculated and applied annually.
(9) If the majority ownership interest in a private vocational
school is conveyed through sale or other means into different
ownership, all contributions made to the date of transfer remain in the
fund. The new owner shall continue to make contributions to the fund
until the original ten-year cycle is completed. All tuition recovery
trust fund contributions shall remain with the private vocational
school transferred, and no additional cash deposits may be required
beyond the original ten-year contribution cycle.
(10)(a) To settle claims adjudicated under RCW 28C.10.120 and
claims resulting when a private vocational school ceases to provide
educational services, the agency may make disbursements from the fund.
Students enrolled under a training contract executed between a school
and a public or private agency or business are not eligible to make a
claim against the fund until January 1, 2016.
(b) In addition to the processes described for making
reimbursements related to claims under RCW 28C.10.120, the following
procedures are established to deal with reimbursements related to
school closures:
(((a))) (i) The agency shall attempt to notify all potential
claimants. The unavailability of records and other circumstances
surrounding a school closure may make it impossible or unreasonable for
the agency to ascertain the names and whereabouts of each potential
claimant but the agency shall make reasonable inquiries to secure that
information from all likely sources. The agency shall then proceed to
settle the claims on the basis of information in its possession. The
agency is not responsible or liable for claims or for handling claims
that may subsequently appear or be discovered.
(((b))) (ii) Thirty days after identified potential claimants have
been notified, if a claimant refuses or neglects to file a claim
verification as requested in such notice, the agency ((shall)) may be
relieved of further duty or action on behalf of the claimant under this
chapter. The executive director of the agency or the executive
director's designee will determine if an exemption to the thirty days
shall be granted if the claimant furnishes proof of an extraordinary or
exigent circumstance.
(((c))) (iii) After verification and review, the agency may
disburse funds from the tuition recovery trust fund to settle or
compromise the claims for an amount up to the value of unearned prepaid
tuition and fees. If the claimant provides evidence to the agency of
the lack of availability to continue his or her program of study at
another institution, the agency's executive director or the executive
director's designee has the authority to reimburse the student, agency,
or business up to the full value of tuition and fees paid to date,
subject to (a) of this subsection. The agency may use the fund to pay
for prior learning assessments for students who choose to attend
another institution. ((However, the liability of the fund for claims
against the closed school shall not exceed the amount of unearned
prepaid tuition in the possession of the owner.
(d))) (iv) In the instance of claims against a closed school, the
agency shall seek to recover such disbursed funds from the assets of
the defaulted owner, including but not limited to asserting claims as
a creditor in bankruptcy proceedings.
(11) When funds are disbursed to settle claims against a licensed
private vocational school, the agency shall make demand upon the owner
for recovery. The agency shall adopt schedules of times and amounts
for effecting recoveries. An owner's failure to perform subjects the
school's license to suspension or revocation under RCW 28C.10.050 in
addition to any other available remedies.
(12) For purposes of this section, "owner" includes, but is not
limited to, a person, company, firm, society, association, partnership,
corporation, or trust having a controlling ownership interest in a
private vocational school.

Sec. 6 RCW 28C.10.110 and 2001 c 23 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter for an entity operating a
private vocational school to engage in an unfair business practice.
The agency may deny, revoke, or suspend the license of any entity that
is found to have engaged in a substantial number of unfair business
practices or that has engaged in significant unfair business practices.
(2) It is an unfair business practice for an entity operating a
private vocational school or an agent employed by a private vocational
school to:
(((1))) (a) Fail to comply with the terms of a student enrollment
contract or agreement;
(((2))) (b) Use an enrollment contract form, catalog, brochure, or
similar written material affecting the terms and conditions of student
enrollment other than that previously submitted to the agency and
authorized for use;
(((3))) (c) Advertise in the help wanted section of a newspaper or
otherwise represent falsely, directly or by implication, that the
school is an employment agency, is making an offer of employment or
otherwise is attempting to conceal the fact that what is being
represented are course offerings of a school;
(((4))) (d) Represent falsely, directly or by implication, that an
educational program is approved by a particular industry or that
successful completion of the program qualifies a student for admission
to a labor union or similar organization or for the receipt of a state
license in any business, occupation, or profession;
(((5))) (e) Represent falsely, directly or by implication, that a
student who successfully completes a course or program of instruction
may transfer credit for the course or program to any institution of
higher education;
(((6))) (f) Represent falsely, directly or by implication, in
advertising or in any other manner, the school's size, location,
facilities, equipment, faculty qualifications, number of faculty, or
the extent or nature of any approval received from an accrediting
association;
(((7))) (g) Represent that the school is approved, recommended, or
endorsed by the state of Washington or by the agency, except the fact
that the school is authorized to operate under this chapter may be
stated;
(((8))) (h) Provide prospective students with any testimonial,
endorsement, or other information which has the tendency to mislead or
deceive prospective students or the public regarding current practices
of the school, current conditions for employment opportunities, or
probable earnings in the occupation for which the education was
designed;
(((9))) (i) Designate or refer to sales representatives as
"counselors," "advisors," or similar terms which have the tendency to
mislead or deceive prospective students or the public regarding the
authority or qualifications of the sales representatives;
(((10))) (j) Make or cause to be made any statement or
representation in connection with the offering of education if the
school or agent knows or reasonably should have known the statement or
representation to be false, substantially inaccurate, or misleading;
(((11))) (k) Engage in methods of advertising, sales, collection,
credit, or other business practices which are false, deceptive,
misleading, or unfair, as determined by the agency by rule; or
(((12))) (l) Attempt to recruit students in or within forty feet of
a building that contains a welfare or unemployment office. Recruiting
includes, but is not limited to canvassing and surveying. Recruiting
does not include leaving materials at or near an office for a person to
pick up of his or her own accord, or handing a brochure or leaflet to
a person provided that no attempt is made to obtain a name, address,
telephone number, or other data, or to otherwise actively pursue the
enrollment of the individual.
((It is a violation of this chapter for an entity operating a
private vocational school to engage in an unfair business practice.
The agency may deny, revoke, or suspend the license of any entity that
is found to have engaged in a substantial number of unfair business
practices or that has engaged in significant unfair business
practices.))

Sec. 7 RCW 28C.10.120 and 2007 c 462 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints may be filed under this chapter only by a ((person
claiming loss of tuition or fees as a result of)) current student or
exiter of a program or training affected by an unfair business
practice. The complaint shall set forth the alleged violation and
shall contain information required by the agency on forms provided for
that purpose. A complaint may also be filed with the agency by an
authorized staff member of the agency or by the attorney general.
(2) The agency shall investigate any complaint under this section
and shall first attempt to bring about a negotiated settlement. The
agency director or the director's designee may conduct an informal
hearing with the affected parties in order to determine whether a
violation has occurred.
(3) If the agency finds that the private vocational school or its
agent engaged in or is engaging in any unfair business practice, the
agency shall issue and cause to be served upon the violator an order
requiring the violator to cease and desist from the act or practice and
may impose the penalties provided under RCW 28C.10.130. If the agency
finds that the complainant has suffered loss as a result of the act or
practice, the agency may order the violator to pay full or partial
restitution of any amounts lost. The loss may include any money paid
for tuition, required or recommended course materials, and any
reasonable living expenses incurred by the complainant during the time
the complainant was enrolled at the school.
(4) The complainant is not bound by the agency's determination of
restitution. The complainant may reject that determination and may
pursue any other legal remedy.
(5) The violator may, within twenty days of being served any order
described under subsection (3) of this section, file an appeal under
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Timely filing
stays the agency's order during the pendency of the appeal. If the
agency prevails, the appellant shall pay the costs of the
administrative hearing.
(6) If a private vocational school closes without providing
adequate notice to its enrolled students, the agency shall provide
transition assistance to the school's students including, but not
limited to, information regarding: (a) Transfer options available to
students; (b) financial aid discharge eligibility and procedures; (c)
the labor market, job search strategies, and placement assistance
services; and (d) other support services available to students.

--- END ---