BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.40.010 and 1965 ex.s. c 85 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every owner or operator of any recreational device designed and
operated for the conveyance of persons which aids in promoting
entertainment, pleasure, play, relaxation, or instruction, specifically
including devices generally associated with winter sports activities
such as ((ski lifts, ski tows, j-bars, t-bars, ski mobiles, chair))
aerial lifts, surface lifts, and similar devices and equipment, shall
construct, furnish, maintain, and provide safe and adequate facilities
and equipment with which safely and properly to receive and transport
all persons offered to and received by the owner or operator of such
devices, and to promote the safety of such owner's or operator's
patrons, employees and the public. The owner or operator of the
devices and equipment covered by this section shall be deemed not to be
a common carrier.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.40.020 and 2000 c 11 s 87 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful after June 10, 1959, to construct or
install any such recreational device as set forth in RCW 79A.40.010
without first submitting plans and specifications for such device to
the state parks and recreation commission and receiving the approval of
the commission for such construction or installation.
(2) The plans and specifications must be submitted to the
commission in a manner provided by the commission accompanied by a
certification by a qualified engineer. The certification must indicate
that the conveyance was designed by a qualified engineer and that the
conveyance, if properly installed as provided in the plan, will be
safe. Upon completion of the installation, the operator or owner shall
submit further certification by a qualified engineer to the commission
that the conveyance has been installed in accordance with the plan.
The qualified engineer submitting a certification as provided in this
chapter must be formally approved to submit such a certification by the
commission. The commission shall establish the necessary
qualifications for any engineer seeking the ability to certify
equipment pursuant to this chapter.
(3) Violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.40.050 and 1959 c 327 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks and recreation commission shall employ or retain a
person qualified in engineering experience and training who shall be
designated as the inspector of recreational devices, and may employ
such additional employees as are necessary to properly administer this
chapter. The inspector and such additional employees may be hired on
a temporary basis or borrowed from other state departments, or the
commission may contract with individuals or firms for such inspecting
service on an independent basis. ((The commission shall prescribe the
salary or other remuneration for such service.))

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.40.060 and 2000 c 11 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
The inspector of recreational devices and his or her assistants
shall inspect all equipment and appliances connected with the
recreational devices set forth in RCW 79A.40.010 and make such reports
of his or her inspection to the commission as may be required. He or
she shall, on discovering any defective equipment, or appliances
connected therewith, rendering the use of the equipment dangerous,
immediately report the same to the owner or operator of the device on
which it is found, and in addition report it to the commission. If in
the opinion of the inspector the continued operation of the defective
equipment constitutes an immediate danger to the safety of the persons
operating or being conveyed by such equipment, the inspector may
condemn such equipment and shall immediately notify the commission of
his or her action in this respect: PROVIDED, That inspection required
by this chapter must be conducted at least once each year, prior to
each use season.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.40.070 and 1997 c 137 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The program authorized by this chapter and chapter 79A.45 RCW must
be funded by fees charged to the owners or operators of ski areas. The
expenses incurred in connection with making inspections and reviewing
plans and specifications under this chapter shall be paid by the owner
or operator of such recreational devices ((either)) by reimbursing the
commission for the costs it incurred ((or by paying directly such
individuals or firms that may be engaged by the commission to
accomplish the inspection service. Payment shall be made only upon
notification by the commission of the amount due)) to hire an engineer
to complete an inspection or perform plan review. The commission shall
maintain accurate and complete records of the costs incurred for each
inspection and plan review for construction approval and shall assess
the respective owners or operators of ((said)) the recreational devices
((only for the actual costs incurred by the commission for such safety
inspections and plan review for construction approval)) an
administrative fee associated with the review or service provided by
the commission, which amount may vary based on the service or level of
review required. The commission shall adopt a fee schedule for the
services provided under this chapter, subject to RCW 43.135.055, by
rule. The costs as assessed by the commission shall be a lien on the
equipment of the owner or operator of the recreational devices so
inspected or installed. Such moneys collected by the commission under
this section shall be paid into the state parks renewal and stewardship
account.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.45.060 and 1977 ex.s. c 139 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every ((tramway, ski lift, or commercial skimobile)) operator
of an aerial lift, surface lift, or similar device shall maintain
liability insurance of not less than one ((hundred thousand)) million
dollars per ((person per accident and of not less than two hundred
thousand dollars per accident)) occurrence.
(2) ((Every operator of a rope tow, wire rope tow, j-bar, t-bar, or
similar device shall maintain liability insurance of not less than
twenty-five thousand dollars per person per accident and of not less
than fifty thousand dollars per accident.
(3))) This section shall not apply to operators of tramways that
are not open to the general public and that are operated without
charge, except that this section shall apply to operators of tramways
that are operated by schools, ski clubs, or similar organizations.

--- END ---