BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
recognize that the parks and recreation commission currently has the
authority to manage numerous public recreation trails throughout the
state. The intent of this act is to authorize the parks and recreation
commission to manage the Milwaukee Road corridor in the same manner and
with the same authority as the commission manages all other recreation
trails currently under its jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 79A.05.315 (Milwaukee Road corridor -- Transfer of management
control to commission) and 1989 c 129 s 1 & 1984 c 174 s 2;
(2) RCW 79A.05.320 (Milwaukee Road corridor -- Duties) and 2000 c 11
s 39, 1987 c 438 s 39, & 1984 c 174 s 3;
(3) RCW 79A.05.325 (Milwaukee Road corridor -- Additional duties) and
1989 c 129 s 3 & 1984 c 174 s 4; and
(4) RCW 79A.05.330 (Recreation trail on Milwaukee Road corridor)
and 1984 c 174 s 5.

--- END ---