BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The use of unsafe practices and work in violation of this chapter
can cause serious and preventable injury to employees and the public in
addition to property damage. It is the policy of the legislature that
employees should be protected from workplace reprisal or retaliatory
action for the opposition to or reporting in good faith of practices
that may violate the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted
hereunder, or of the safety, installation, repair, or maintenance
policies of their employers. The legislature intends to protect
employees by authorizing investigations of whistleblower complaints.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.006 and 2013 c 23 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) "Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical
contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance
with the rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) "Basic electrical work" means the work classified in (a) and
(b) of this subsection as class A and class B basic electrical work:
(a) "Class A basic electrical work" means the like-in-kind
replacement of a: Contactor, relay, timer, starter, circuit board, or
similar control component; household appliance; circuit breaker; fuse;
residential luminaire; lamp; snap switch; dimmer; receptacle outlet;
thermostat; heating element; luminaire ballast with an exact same
ballast; ten horsepower or smaller motor; or wiring, appliances,
devices, or equipment as specified by rule.
(b) "Class B basic electrical work" means work other than class A
basic electrical work that requires minimal electrical circuit
modifications and has limited exposure hazards. Class B basic
electrical work includes the following:
(i) Extension of not more than one branch electrical circuit
limited to one hundred twenty volts and twenty amps each where:
(A) No cover inspection is necessary; and
(B) The extension does not supply more than two outlets;
(ii) Like-in-kind replacement of a single luminaire not exceeding
two hundred seventy-seven volts and twenty amps;
(iii) Like-in-kind replacement of a motor larger than ten
horsepower;
(iv) The following low voltage systems:
(A) Repair and replacement of devices not exceeding one hundred
volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low voltage systems
in one and two-family dwellings;
(B) Repair and replacement of the following devices not exceeding
one hundred volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low
voltage systems in other buildings, provided the equipment is not for
fire alarm or nurse call systems and is not located in an area
classified as hazardous by the national electrical code; or
(v) Wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule.
(3) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.
(4) "Chapter" or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter
number is referenced.
(5) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's designee.
(7) "Electrical construction trade" includes, but is not limited
to, installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are
used for light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining remote
control, signaling, power limited, or communication circuits or
systems.
(8) "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes,
submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining wires
or equipment that convey electrical current.
(9) "Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly
uses, conducts, insulates, or is operated by electricity but does not
mean: Plug-in appliances; or plug-in equipment as determined by the
department by rule.
(10) "Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired
assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers,
switches, relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes,
transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect
means and motor branch circuit protective devices.
(11) "Journey level electrician" means a person who has been issued
a journey level electrician certificate of competency by the
department.
(12) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as
voltage requirements, current draw, and function, and being in the same
location.
(13) "Master electrician" means either a master journey level
electrician or master specialty electrician.
(14) "Master journey level electrician" means a person who has been
issued a master journey level electrician certificate of competency by
the department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(15) "Master specialty electrician" means a person who has been
issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(16) "Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a
specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.
(17) "Whistleblower" means any employee who in good faith reports
practices or opposes practices that may violate the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted hereunder, or of the safety, installation,
repair, or maintenance policies of his or her employer. The term also
means (a) an employee who is believed to have reported such practices
but who, in fact, has not reported such practices or (b) an employee
who has assisted in the reporting of practices or has provided
testimony or information in connection with the reporting of practices.
(18) "Workplace reprisal or retaliatory action" includes actions
such as discharge or in any manner discrimination against any employee
who has reported or filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be
instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or has
testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding or because of
the exercise by such employee on behalf of himself or herself or others
of any right or responsibility afforded by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employee who is a whistleblower and who as a result of being
a whistleblower has been subjected to workplace reprisal or retaliatory
action has a right to the protections, procedures, and remedies
provided under chapter 49.60 RCW.
(2) The identity of a whistleblower who reports, in good faith, to
the department or to a political subdivision that regulates electrical
installations, practices that may violate the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted hereunder must remain confidential. The
provisions of RCW 4.24.500 through 4.24.520, providing certain
protections to persons who communicate to government agencies, apply to
such reports.

--- END ---