BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that a robust
public postsecondary educational system benefits Washingtonians
throughout the state, and that the individual and combined success of
the people of Washington, and in turn the vitality of business across
the state, rely overwhelmingly on the quality and efficiency of the
state's higher education system.
(2) The legislature recognizes that there is currently an estimated
gap of twenty-five thousand skilled workers in Washington, eighty
percent of whom are in high-demand fields, and that this gap is
projected to double by 2017. The legislature further recognizes that
filling the job skills gap by 2017 could result in one hundred sixty
thousand new jobs in the state. As a result, the legislature finds
that the statewide goals of public institutions of higher education are
to: (a) Increase total degree production; (b) increase degree
production in high-demand fields of study; and (c) increase degree
production for underrepresented student populations.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to create an
incentive funding structure that encourages student success through the
postsecondary educational system. To do this, it is the intent of the
legislature that an initial state funding enhancement equal to no less
than twenty-five million dollars be available for distribution to the
public four-year institutions of higher education for the purposes of
incentive funding.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that this funding
enhancement be an addition to the baseline budgets of public four-year
institutions of higher education and that, in subsequent fiscal years,
additional amounts allocated for this purpose will be distributed to
the public four-year institutions of higher education and subsequently
built into their carry-forward budgets based on their performance on
institutional specific performance metrics that contribute to the three
statewide goals.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.101 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1) To ensure institutional quality, promote access, and advance
the public mission of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College, the authority to
increase or decrease tuition rates shall be considered within the
context of performance-based measures and goals for each state
university, regional university, and The Evergreen State College. By
September 1, 2011, and September 1st every two years thereafter, the
state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College shall each negotiate an institutional performance plan with the
office of financial management that includes expected outcomes that
must be achieved by each institution in the subsequent biennium.
(2) At a minimum, an individual institutional performance plan must
include but is not limited to the following expected outcomes:
(a) Time and credits to degree;
(b) Retention and success of students from low-income, diverse, or
underrepresented communities;
(c) Baccalaureate degree production for resident students; and
(d) Degree production in high-employer demand programs of study and
critical state need areas.)) Subject to funds appropriated for this
purpose in the omnibus appropriations act, incentive funding shall be
distributed to the public four-year institutions of higher education as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act and shall be based on an
institution's performance in relation to its own past performance using
a three-year average in the following metrics:
(1) Number of degrees produced;
(2) Number of high-demand degrees produced; and
(3) Number of degrees awarded to underrepresented students.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.102 and 2013 c 23 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, any four-year
institution of higher education that increases tuition beyond levels
assumed in the omnibus appropriations act is subject to the financial
aid requirements included in this section and shall remain subject to
these requirements through the 2018-19 academic year.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, each four-year institution of higher
education that raises tuition beyond levels assumed in the omnibus
appropriations act shall, in a manner consistent with the goal of
enhancing the quality of and access to their institutions, provide
financial aid to offset full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students as follows:
(a) Subtract from the full-time tuition fees an amount that is
equal to the maximum amount of a state need grant award that would be
given to an eligible student with a family income at or below fifty
percent of the state's median family income as determined by the
student achievement council; and
(b) Offset the remainder as follows:
(i) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
below fifty percent of the state's median family income shall receive
financial aid equal to one hundred percent of the remainder if an
institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate
students is five percent or greater of the state's median family income
for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council;
(ii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are
greater than fifty percent and no more than seventy percent of the
state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to
seventy-five percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is ten percent or
greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as
provided by the student achievement council;
(iii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes exceed
seventy percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's
median family income shall receive financial aid equal to fifty percent
of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for
resident undergraduate students is fifteen percent or greater of the
state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the
student achievement council; and
(iv) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
exceed one hundred percent and are no more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid
equal to twenty-five percent of the remainder if an institution's
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is twenty
percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of
four as provided by the student achievement council.
(3) The financial aid required in subsection (2) of this section
shall:
(a) Be reduced by the amount of other financial aid awards, not
including the state need grant;
(b) Be prorated based on credit load; and
(c) Only be provided to students up to demonstrated need.
(4) Financial aid sources and methods may be:
(a) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;
(b) Tuition waivers created by a four-year institution of higher
education for the specific purpose of serving low and middle-income
students; or
(c) Local financial aid programs.
(5) Use of tuition waivers as specified in subsection (4)(b) of
this section shall not be included in determining total state tuition
waiver authority as defined in RCW 28B.15.910.
(6) By ((August 15, 2012, and August 15th)) December 31st every
year ((thereafter)), four-year institutions of higher education that
increase tuition beyond levels assumed in the omnibus appropriations
act after January 1, 2011, shall report to the governor and relevant
committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the various
sources and methods of financial aid in mitigating tuition increases.
A key purpose of these reports is to provide information regarding the
results of the decision to grant tuition-setting authority to the four-year institutions of higher education and whether tuition setting
authority should continue to be granted to the institutions or revert
back to the legislature after consideration of the impacts on students,
including educational access, affordability, and ((quality))
completion. These reports shall include:
(a) The amount of ((additional)) financial aid provided to middle-income and low-income resident students with demonstrated need in the
aggregate and per student;
(b) An itemization of the sources and methods of financial aid
provided by the four-year institution of higher education in the
aggregate and per student for resident undergraduate students;
(c) An analysis of the combined impact of federal tuition tax
credits and financial aid provided by the institution of higher
education on the net cost to students and their families resulting from
tuition increases;
(d) In cases where tuition increases are greater than those assumed
in the omnibus appropriations act at any four-year institution of
higher education, the institution must include an explanation in its
report of why this increase was necessary and how the institution will
mitigate the effects of the increase. The institution must include in
this section of its report a plan and specific timelines; and
(e) An analysis of changes in resident student enrollment patterns,
participation rates, graduation rates, and debt load, by race and
ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic
status, and a plan to mitigate effects of reduced diversity due to
tuition increases. This analysis shall include disaggregated data for
resident students in the following income brackets:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income.
(7) Beginning in the 2012-13 academic year, the University of
Washington shall enroll during each academic year at least the same
number of resident first-year undergraduate students at the Seattle
campus, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012, as enrolled during the 2009-10
academic year. This requirement shall not apply to nonresident
undergraduate and graduate and professional students.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.77.090 and 2013 c 23 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) An accountability monitoring and reporting system is
established as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) To provide consistent, easily understood data among the public
four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in
other states, the following data must be reported to the education data
center annually by December 1st, and at a minimum include data
recommended by a national organization representing state chief
executives. The education data center in consultation with the council
may change the data requirements to be consistent with best practices
across the country. This data must, to the maximum extent possible, be
disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of
origin, age, and socioeconomic status, and include the following for
the four-year institutions of higher education:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Graduate and professional degrees awarded;
(c) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(d) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(e) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(f) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(g) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive
academic years;
(h) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(i) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(j) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(k) Program participation and degree completion rates in bachelor
and advanced degree programs in the sciences, which includes
agriculture and natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences,
computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering
technologies, health professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and
statistics, and physical sciences and science technologies, including
participation and degree completion rates for students from
traditionally underrepresented populations;
(l) Annual enrollment: Annual unduplicated number of students
enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher education
including by student level;
(m) Annual first-time enrollment: Total first-time students
enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education;
(n) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in expected length,
awarded per one hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students at
the state level;
(o) Market penetration: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in program length,
awarded relative to the state's population age eighteen to twenty-four
years old with a high school diploma;
(p) Student debt load: Median three-year distribution of debt
load, excluding private loans or debts incurred before coming to the
institution;
(q) Data related to enrollment, completion rates, participation
rates, and debt load shall be disaggregated for students in the
following income brackets to the maximum extent possible:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income; and
(r) Yearly percentage increases in the average cost of
undergraduate instruction.
(3) Four-year institutions of higher education must count all
students when collecting data, not only first-time, full-time first-year students.
(4) In conjunction with the office of financial management, all
four-year institutions of higher education must display the data
described in subsection (2) of this section in a uniform dashboard
format on the office of financial management's web site no later than
December 1, 2011, and updated thereafter annually by December 1st. To
the maximum extent possible, the information must be viewable by race
and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and
socioeconomic status. The information may be tailored to meet the
needs of various target audiences such as students, researchers, and
the general public.
(5))) The council shall use performance data from the education
data center for the purposes of strategic planning, to report on
progress toward achieving statewide goals, and to develop priorities
proposed in the ten-year plan for higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To provide consistent, easily understood data among the public
four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in
other states, the following data must be reported to the education data
center annually by December 1st, and at a minimum include data
recommended by a national organization representing state chief
executives. The education data center, in consultation with the
student achievement council, may change the data requirements to be
consistent with best practices across the country. This data must, to
the maximum extent possible, be disaggregated by race and ethnicity,
gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic status, and
include the following for the four-year institutions of higher
education:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Graduate and professional degrees awarded;
(c) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(d) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(e) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(f) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(g) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level mathematics and English courses within the first two
consecutive academic years;
(h) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(i) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(j) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(k) Program participation and degree completion rates in bachelor
and advanced degree programs in the sciences, which includes
agriculture and natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences,
computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering
technologies, health professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and
statistics, and physical sciences and science technologies, including
participation and degree completion rates for students from
traditionally underrepresented populations;
(l) Annual enrollment: Annual unduplicated number of students
enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher education
including by student level;
(m) Annual first-time enrollment: Total first-time students
enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education;
(n) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in expected length,
awarded per one hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students at
the state level;
(o) Market penetration: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in program length,
awarded relative to the state's population age eighteen to twenty-four
years old with a high school diploma;
(p) Student debt load: Median three-year distribution of debt
load, excluding private loans or debts incurred before coming to the
institution;
(q) Data related to enrollment, completion rates, participation
rates, and debt load, disaggregated for students in the following
income brackets to the maximum extent possible:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income; and
(r) Yearly percentage increases in the average cost of
undergraduate instruction.
(2) Four-year institutions of higher education must count all
students when collecting data, not only first-time, full-time first-year students.
(3) In conjunction with the office, all four-year institutions of
higher education must display the data described in subsection (2) of
this section in a uniform dashboard format on the office's web site no
later than December 1, 2011, and updated thereafter annually by
December 1st. To the maximum extent possible, the information must be
viewable by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin,
age, and socioeconomic status. The information may be tailored to meet
the needs of various target audiences such as students, researchers,
and the general public.

--- END ---