BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A legislative task force on resident
undergraduate tuition is established. The task force shall consist of
the following members:
(i) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. At least one member from each caucus shall be a
member of the house of representatives higher education committee; and
(ii) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate appointed by the president of the senate. At least one member
from each caucus shall be a member of the senate higher education
committee.
(b) All members must be appointed by June 30, 2014.
(c) The task force shall serve without additional compensation, but
shall be reimbursed in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending
meetings of the task force.
(d) The task force shall appoint its own chair and vice chair and
shall meet at least twice.
(2) The task force shall provide recommendations to the governor
and relevant committees of the legislature on resident undergraduate
tuition policy by December 1, 2014.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be jointly provided by
the senate committee services and the house of representatives office
of program research.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2014.

--- END ---