BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the commission has completed the investigation of a
complaint alleging workplace reprisal or retaliatory action against a
whistleblower as defined in chapter 70.87 RCW, the commission must
notify the complainant of the completion of the investigation. The
commission must issue written findings of fact and a finding that there
is or there is not reasonable cause for believing an unfair practice
has been or is being committed as required by RCW 49.60.240 within
ninety days of notification of the completed investigation.
(2) If the individual filing a complaint alleging workplace
reprisal or retaliatory action against a whistleblower under chapter
70.87 RCW is represented by a labor union, the commission must notify
the union of the complaint and the results of the investigation.
(3) If, after a finding is made that there is reasonable cause for
believing that an unfair practice has been or is being committed
against a whistleblower under chapter 70.87 RCW, no agreement is
reached for the elimination of the unfair practice within six months,
a finding to that effect must be made and reduced to writing, with a
copy provided to the complainant, the complainant's labor union, and
the respondent. The commission, in the exercise of discretion, may
grant additional time to seek agreement for the elimination of the
unfair practice based on extenuating facts and circumstances.

--- END ---