BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in sections 2
and 3 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be
used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not
intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to
determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers and create or retain
jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (a) and (c).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
provide employment for unemployed veterans. It is the legislature's
intent to provide employers a credit against the business and
occupation tax or public utility tax for hiring unemployed veterans
which would reduce an employer's tax burden thereby inducing employers
to hire and create jobs for unemployed veterans. Pursuant to chapter
43.136 RCW, the joint legislative audit and review committee must
review the business and occupation tax and public utility tax credit
established under sections 2 and 3 of this act by December 31, 2021.
(3) If a review finds that the number of unemployed veterans
decreased by thirty percent, then the legislature intends for the
legislative auditor to recommend extending the expiration date of the
tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee should refer to the veteran unemployment rates available from
the employment security department and the bureau of labor statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is allowed a credit against the tax due under this
chapter as provided in this section. The credit equals twenty percent
of wages and benefits paid up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred
dollars for each qualified employee hired on or after October 1, 2015.
(2) No credit may be claimed under this section until a qualified
employee has been employed for at least two consecutive full calendar
quarters.
(3) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department
must keep a running total of all credits allowed under this section and
section 3 of this act during each fiscal year. The department may not
allow any credits that would cause the total credits allowed under this
section and section 3 of this act to exceed one million dollars in any
fiscal year. If all or part of a claim for credit is disallowed under
this subsection, the disallowed portion is carried over to the next
fiscal year. However, the carryover into the next fiscal year is only
permitted to the extent that the cap for the next fiscal year is not
exceeded. Priority must be given to credits carried over from a
previous fiscal year. The department must provide written notice to
any person who has claimed tax credits in excess of the limitation in
this subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and
provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of the
notice. The department may not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice
if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof.
(4) The credit may be used against any tax due under this chapter,
and may be carried over until used, except as provided in subsection
(10) of this section. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(5) If an employer discharges a qualified employee for whom the
employer has claimed a credit under this section, the employer may not
claim a new credit under this section for a period of one year from the
date the qualified employee was discharged. However, this subsection
(5) does not apply if the qualified employee was discharged for
misconduct, as defined in RCW 50.04.294, connected with his or her work
or discharged due to a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.
(6) Credits earned under this section may be claimed only on
returns filed electronically with the department using the department's
online tax filing service or other method of electronic reporting as
the department may authorize. No application is required to claim the
credit, but the taxpayer must keep records necessary for the department
to determine eligibility under this section including records
establishing the person's status as a veteran and status as unemployed
when hired by the taxpayer.
(7) No person may claim a credit against taxes due under both
chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for the same qualified employee.
(8) No employer may claim a credit under this section for a person
whom any employer has previously claimed a credit for under this
section.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Qualified employee" means an unemployed veteran who is
employed in a permanent full-time position for at least two consecutive
full calendar quarters. For seasonal employers, "qualified employee"
also includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for
two consecutive full calendar quarters.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (9)(a), "full time" means a
normal work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(b) "Unemployed" means that the veteran was unemployed as defined
in RCW 50.04.310 for at least thirty days immediately preceding the
date that the veteran was hired by the person claiming credit under
this section for hiring the veteran.
(c) "Veteran" means every person who has received an honorable
discharge or received a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable
record or is currently serving honorably, and who has served as a
member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States,
including the national guard and armed forces reserves.
(10) Credits allowed under this section can be earned for tax
reporting periods through June 30, 2021. No credits can be claimed
after June 30, 2022.
(11) This section expires July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is allowed a credit against the tax due under this
chapter as provided in this section. The credit equals twenty percent
of wages and benefits paid up to a maximum of one thousand five hundred
dollars for each qualified employee hired on or after October 1, 2015.
(2) No credit may be claimed under this section until a qualified
employee has been employed for at least two consecutive full calendar
quarters.
(3) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department
must keep a running total of all credits allowed under this section and
section 2 of this act during each fiscal year. The department may not
allow any credits that would cause the total credits allowed under this
section and section 2 of this act to exceed one million dollars in any
fiscal year. If all or part of a claim for credit is disallowed under
this subsection, the disallowed portion is carried over to the next
fiscal year. However, the carryover into the next fiscal year is only
permitted to the extent that the cap for the next fiscal year is not
exceeded. Priority must be given to credits carried over from a
previous fiscal year. The department must provide written notice to
any person who has claimed tax credits in excess of the limitation in
this subsection. The notice must indicate the amount of tax due and
provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of the
notice. The department may not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice
if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof.
(4) The credit may be used against any tax due under this chapter,
and may be carried over until used, except as provided in subsection
(10) of this section. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(5) If an employer discharges a qualified employee for whom the
employer has claimed a credit under this section, the employer may not
claim a new credit under this section for a period of one year from the
date the qualified employee was discharged. However, this subsection
(5) does not apply if the qualified employee was discharged for
misconduct, as defined in RCW 50.04.294, connected with his or her work
or discharged due to a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.
(6) Credits earned under this section may be claimed only on
returns filed electronically with the department using the department's
online tax filing service or other method of electronic reporting as
the department may authorize. No application is required to claim the
credit, but the taxpayer must keep records necessary for the department
to determine eligibility under this section including records
establishing the person's status as a veteran and status as unemployed
when hired by the taxpayer.
(7) No person may claim a credit against taxes due under both
chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for the same qualified employee.
(8) No employer may claim a credit under this section for a person
whom any employer has previously claimed a credit for under this
section.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Qualified employee" means an unemployed veteran who is
employed in a permanent full-time position for at least two consecutive
full calendar quarters. For seasonal employers, "qualified employee"
also includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for
two consecutive full calendar quarters.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (9)(a), "full time" means a
normal work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(b) "Unemployed" means that the veteran was unemployed as defined
in RCW 50.04.310 for at least thirty days immediately preceding the
date that the veteran was hired by the person claiming credit under
this section for hiring the veteran.
(c) "Veteran" means every person who has received an honorable
discharge or received a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable
record or is currently serving honorably, and who has served as a
member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States,
including the national guard and armed forces reserves.
(10) Credits allowed under this section can be earned for tax
reporting periods through June 30, 2021. No credits can be claimed
after June 30, 2022.
(11) This section expires July 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect October 1, 2015.

--- END ---