BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.122 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may:
(((1))) (a) Contain union security provisions: PROVIDED, That
nothing in this section shall authorize a closed shop provision:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That agreements involving union security provisions
must safeguard the right of nonassociation of public employees based on
bona fide personal religious beliefs or the religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee
is a member. Such public employee shall pay an amount of money
equivalent to ((regular union dues and initiation fee)) or by agreement
less than the agency shop fee required by the union security agreement
to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization
mutually agreed upon by the public employee affected and the bargaining
representative to which such public employee would otherwise pay the
((dues and initiation)) agency shop fee. The public employee shall
furnish written proof that such payment has been made. If the public
employee and the bargaining representative do not reach agreement on
such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization. When there is a conflict between any collective
bargaining agreement reached by a public employer and a bargaining
representative on a union security provision and any charter,
ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted by the public employer or its
agents, including but not limited to, a civil service commission, the
terms of the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail.
(((2))) (b) Provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute
arising from the application or the interpretation of the matters
contained in a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The amount of an agency shop fee required by a union security
provision must be equivalent to or less than a pro rata share of
estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.76.045 and 2002 c 356 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit faculty member under this chapter,
the employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have
deducted from the salary of the bargaining unit faculty member the
periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. Such employee authorization shall not be irrevocable
for a period of more than one year. Such dues and fees shall be
deducted from the pay of all faculty members who have given
authorization for such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the
employer to the employee organization or to the depository designated
by the employee organization.
(2)(a) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit faculty
members affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(b) The amount of an agency shop fee required by a union security
provision must be equivalent to or less than a pro rata share of
estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment.
(3) A faculty member who is covered by a union security provision
and who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or the religious tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which such faculty member is a member shall pay to
a nonreligious charity or other charitable organization an amount of
money equivalent to ((the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
exclusive bargaining representative)) or by agreement less than the
agency shop fee required by the union security clause. The charity
shall be agreed upon by the faculty member and the employee
organization to which such faculty member would otherwise pay the
((dues and fees)) fee. The faculty member shall furnish written proof
that such payments have been made. If the faculty member and the
employee organization do not reach agreement on such matter, the
dispute shall be submitted to the commission for determination.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.52.045 and 1987 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the
employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have deducted from the
salary of the bargaining unit employee the periodic dues and initiation
fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. Such employee
authorization ((shall not)) may be ((irrevocable for a period of more
than one year)) revoked at any time. Such dues and fees shall be
deducted from the pay of all employees who have given authorization for
such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the employer to the
employee organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit employees
affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) The amount of an agency shop fee required by a union security
provision shall be equivalent to or less than a pro rata share of
estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment.
(4) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or the religious tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which such employee is a member shall pay to a
nonreligious charity or other charitable organization an amount of
money equivalent to ((the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
exclusive bargaining representative)) or by agreement less than the
agency shop fee required by the union security agreement. The charity
shall be agreed upon by the employee and the employee organization to
which such employee would otherwise pay the ((dues and fees)) fee. The
employee shall furnish written proof that such payments have been made.
If the employee and the employee organization do not reach agreement on
such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.39.090 and 2010 c 6 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may:
(1) Contain union security provisions. However, nothing in this
section authorizes a closed shop provision. The amount of an agency
shop fee required by a union security provision shall be equivalent to
or less than a pro rata share of estimated expenditures for purposes
germane to the collective bargaining process, to contract
administration, or to pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and
other conditions of employment. Agreements involving union security
provisions must safeguard the right of nonassociation of employees
based on bona fide personally held religious beliefs or the religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which the symphony
musician is a member. The symphony musician must pay an amount of
money equivalent to ((regular union dues and initiation fee to a
nonreligious charity)) or by agreement less than the agency shop fee to
another charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the symphony
musician affected and the bargaining representative to which the
symphony musician would otherwise pay the ((dues and initiation)) fee.
The symphony musician must furnish written proof that the payment has
been made. If the symphony musician and the bargaining representative
do not reach agreement on this matter, the commission must designate
the charitable organization;
(2) Provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute arising from
the application or the interpretation of the matters contained in a
collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.64.160 and 1983 c 15 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to ((such dues)) or less than
a pro rata share of estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the
collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment. All union security provisions shall safeguard the right of
nonassociation of employees based on bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the religious tenets or teachings of a church or
religious body of which such employee is a member. Such employee shall
pay an amount of money equivalent to ((regular dues and fees)) or by
agreement less than the agency shop fee to a nonreligious charity or to
another charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the employee
affected and the bargaining representative to which such employee would
otherwise pay the ((dues and fees)) fee. The employee shall furnish
written proof that such payment has been made. If the employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security
provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment, no later
than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or July 1,
2004, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative for the
bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount of the
fee shall be equal to ((the amount required to become a member in good
standing of the employee organization. Each employee organization
shall establish a procedure by which any employee so requesting may pay
a representation fee no greater than the part of the membership fee
that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment)) or less than a pro rata share of estimated expenditures
for purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, to contract
administration, or to pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and
other conditions of employment.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or the religious tenets((,)) or teachings of a
church or religious body of which the employee is a member((,))
shall((, as a condition of employment, make payments to the employee
organization, for purposes within the program of the employee
organization as designated by the employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the payments
shall be equal to the periodic dues and fees uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization minus any included monthly premiums for insurance programs
sponsored by the employee organization. The employee shall not be a
member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization)) pay an
amount of money equivalent or by agreement less than the agency shop
fee to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization
mutually agreed upon by the employee affected and the bargaining
representative to which the employee would otherwise pay the fee.
(3) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit
shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the
employee an amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from
the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement
between the employer and the employee organization.
(4) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were entitled
to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these
benefits.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.59.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to ((such dues)) or less than
a pro rata share of estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the
collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment. All union security provisions must safeguard the right of
nonassociation of employees based on bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the religious tenets or teachings of a church or
religious body of which such employee is a member. Such employee shall
pay an amount of money equivalent to ((regular dues and fees)) or by
agreement less than the agency shop fee to a nonreligious charity or to
another charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the employee
affected and the bargaining representative to which such employee would
otherwise pay the ((dues and fees)) fee. The employee shall furnish
written proof that such payment has been made. If the employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.56.113 and 2010 c 296 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This subsection (1) applies only if the state makes the
payments directly to a provider.
(a) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider, a
family child care provider, an adult family home provider, or a
language access provider within the bargaining unit and after the
certification or recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive
bargaining representative, the state as payor, but not as the employer,
shall, subject to (c) of this subsection, deduct from the payments to
an individual provider, a family child care provider, an adult family
home provider, or a language access provider the monthly amount of dues
as certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining
representative and shall transmit the same to the treasurer of the
exclusive bargaining representative.
(b) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers, family child care providers,
adult family home providers, or language access providers enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that:
(i) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to (c) of this subsection, enforce the agreement by deducting from the
payments to bargaining unit members the dues required for membership in
the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for nonmembers thereof, a
fee equivalent to ((the dues)) or less than a pro rata share of
estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment; or
(ii) Includes requirements for deductions of payments other than
the deduction under (((a)))(b)(i) of this subsection, the state, as
payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject to (c) of this
subsection, make such deductions upon written authorization of the
individual provider, family child care provider, adult family home
provider, or language access provider.
(c)(i) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions from the payments to individual providers, family child care
providers, adult family home providers, and language access providers
under this section shall be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and
reimbursed to the state by the exclusive bargaining representative.
(ii) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions from the payments to individual providers, family
child care providers, adult family home providers, or language access
providers under this section shall be an appropriate subject of
collective bargaining between the exclusive bargaining representative
and the governor unless prohibited by another statute. If no
collective bargaining agreement containing a provision allocating the
ongoing additional cost is entered into between the exclusive
bargaining representative and the governor, or if the legislature does
not approve funding for the collective bargaining agreement as provided
in RCW 74.39A.300, 41.56.028, 41.56.029, or 41.56.510, as applicable,
the ongoing additional costs to the state in making deductions from the
payments to individual providers, family child care providers, adult
family home providers, or language access providers under this section
shall be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the
state by the exclusive bargaining representative.
(d) The governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of family child care providers may not enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that contains a union security
provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be administered
by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for license-exempt family child care providers who are also temporary assistance
for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.
(2) This subsection (2) applies only if the state does not make the
payments directly to a provider.
(a) Upon the written authorization of a language access provider
within the bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition
of the bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the state
shall require through its contracts with third parties that:
(i) The monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the
exclusive bargaining representative be deducted from the payments to
the language access provider and transmitted to the treasurer of the
exclusive bargaining representative; and
(ii) A record showing that dues have been deducted as specified in
(a)(i) of this subsection be provided to the state.
(b) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
the bargaining unit of language access providers enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that includes a union security
provision authorized in RCW 41.56.122, the state shall enforce the
agreement by requiring through its contracts with third parties that:
(i) The monthly amount of dues required for membership in the
exclusive bargaining representative as certified by the secretary of
the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for nonmembers thereof, a
fee equivalent to ((the dues)) or less than a pro rata share of
estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment, be deducted
from the payments to the language access provider and transmitted to
the treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative; and
(ii) A record showing that dues or fees have been deducted as
specified in (a)(i) of this subsection be provided to the state.

Sec. 9 RCW 49.66.010 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
It is the public policy of the state to expedite the settlement of
labor disputes arising in connection with health care activities, in
order that there may be no lessening, however temporary, in the quality
of the care given to patients. It is the legislative purpose by this
chapter to promote collective bargaining between health care activities
and their employees, to protect the right of employees of health care
activities to organize and select collective bargaining units of their
own choosing.
It is further determined that any agreements involving union
security including an all-union agreement or agency agreement must
safeguard the rights of nonassociation of employees, based on bona fide
personally held religious beliefs or the religious tenets or teachings
of a church or religious body of which such employee is a member. Such
employee must pay an amount of money equivalent to ((regular union dues
and initiation fees and assessments, if any,)) or by agreement less
than the agency shop fee to a nonreligious charity or to another
charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the employee affected
and the representative of the labor organization to which such employee
would otherwise pay ((dues)) the fee. The employee shall furnish
written proof that this has been done. If the employee and
representative of the labor organization do not reach agreement on the
matter, the department shall designate such organization.
The amount of an agency shop fee required by a union security
provision shall be equivalent to or less than a pro rata share of
estimated expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment.

--- END ---