BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.280 and 2012 c 229 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
collaboration with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the student
achievement council, the public baccalaureate institutions, and the
education data center, shall report by ((September 1, 2010)) December
15, 2014, and annually thereafter to the education and higher education
committees of the legislature regarding participation in dual credit
programs. The report shall include:
(a) Data about student participation rates and academic performance
including but not limited to running start, college in the high school,
tech prep, international baccalaureate, advanced placement, and running
start for the trades;
(b) Data on the total unduplicated head count of students enrolled
in at least one dual credit program course; and
(c) The percentage of students who enrolled in at least one dual
credit program as percent of all students enrolled in grades nine
through twelve.
(2) Data on student participation shall be disaggregated by race,
ethnicity, gender, and receipt of free or reduced-price lunch.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.657.020 and 2013 c 159 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2010, and each year thereafter through December 1,
2012, the superintendent of public instruction shall annually identify
schools as one of the state's persistently lowest-achieving schools if
the school is a Title I school, or a school that is eligible for but
does not receive Title I funds, that is among the lowest-achieving five
percent of Title I or Title I eligible schools in the state.
(2) The criteria for determining whether a school is among the
persistently lowest-achieving five percent of Title I schools, or Title
I eligible schools, under subsection (1) of this section shall be
established by the superintendent of public instruction. The criteria
must meet all applicable requirements for the receipt of a federal
school improvement grant under the American recovery and reinvestment
act of 2009 and Title I of the elementary and secondary education act
of 1965, and take into account both:
(a) The academic achievement of the "all students" group in a
school in terms of proficiency on the state's assessment, and any
alternative assessments, in reading and mathematics combined; and
(b) The school's lack of progress on the mathematics and reading
assessments over a number of years in the "all students" group.
(3)(a) Beginning ((December 1, 2013)) February 1, 2014, and each
((December)) February thereafter, the superintendent of public
instruction shall annually identify challenged schools in need of
improvement and a subset of such schools that are the persistently
lowest-achieving schools in the state.
(b) The criteria for determining whether a school is a challenged
school in need of improvement shall be adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction in rule. The criteria must meet all applicable
federal requirements under Title I of the elementary and secondary
education act of 1965 and other federal rules or guidance, including
applicable requirements for the receipt of federal school improvement
funds if available, but shall apply equally to Title I, Title I-eligible, and non-Title I schools in the state. The criteria must take
into account the academic achievement of the "all students" group and
subgroups of students in a school in terms of proficiency on the state
assessments in reading or English language arts and mathematics and a
high school's graduation rate for all students and subgroups of
students. The superintendent may establish tiered categories of
challenged schools based on the relative performance of all students,
subgroups of students, and other factors.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall also adopt
criteria in rule for determining whether a challenged school in need of
improvement is also a persistently lowest-achieving school for purposes
of the required action district process under this chapter, which shall
include the school's lack of progress for all students and subgroups of
students over a number of years. The criteria for identifying
persistently lowest-achieving schools shall also take into account the
level of state or federal resources available to implement a required
action plan.
(d) If the Washington achievement index is approved by the United
States department of education for use in identifying schools for
federal purposes, the superintendent of public instruction shall use
the approved index to identify schools under (b) and (c) of this
subsection.

--- END ---