BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 2 of
this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for
subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to
create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers and create or retain
jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (a) and (c).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
provide employment for individuals with developmental disabilities. It
is the legislature's intent to provide employers a credit against the
business and occupation tax for hiring individuals with developmental
disabilities which would reduce an employer's tax burden thereby
inducing employers to hire and create jobs for individuals with
developmental disabilities. Pursuant to chapter 43.136 RCW, the joint
legislative audit and review committee must review the business and
occupation tax credit established under section 2 of this act.
(3) If a review finds that employment of individuals with
developmental disabilities has increased by five percent since the
enactment of this tax preference, then the legislature intends for the
legislative auditor to recommend extending the expiration date of the
tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee should refer to employment and wage data available from the
department of social and health services, the employment security
department, and other sources as needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a person is
allowed a credit against the tax due. The credit is equal to two
hundred fifty dollars per calendar quarter for each full-time
employment position filled by an individual with a developmental
disability, and one hundred twenty-five dollars per calendar quarter
for each part-time employment position filled by an individual with a
developmental disability. The credit is earned for each calendar
quarter the position is continuously maintained for the entire calendar
quarter.
(b) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
must maintain a running total of all credits claimed under this section
during each calendar year. The department may not allow any credit, or
portion thereof, which would cause the total amount of credit claimed
by all persons under this section to exceed five hundred thousand
dollars in any calendar year. The department must provide written
notice to any person who has claimed tax credits in excess of the five
hundred thousand dollar limitation in this subsection. The notice must
indicate the amount of tax due and provide that the tax be paid within
thirty days from the date of such notice. The notice must also advise
the person that the unused credit can be claimed in the next calendar
year, subject to the five hundred thousand dollar limit. The
department may not assess penalties and interest as provided in chapter
82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice, if the amount due is
paid by the due date specified in the notice, or any extension thereof.
(c)(i) A person may claim the credit under this section only
against taxes originally due and reported to the department on or after
the date that the employment position is filled by an individual with
a developmental disability. If a person claims a credit for an
employment position that is not continuously maintained for a full
calendar quarter as required by this section, the person must repay the
credit. However, if credit is claimed for filling a full-time
employment position that was later converted to a part-time employment
position before the credit was earned for a calendar quarter and that
converted employment position was continuously filled by an individual
with a developmental disability for the full calendar quarter, fifty
percent of the credit claimed must be repaid.
(ii) Taxes imposed under (c)(i) of this subsection are due by the
due date of the person's next tax return for reporting the taxes due
under this chapter.
(iii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(c)(iii),
penalties and interest apply to taxes due under this subsection (1)(c)
as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW. However, no penalties may be
assessed on taxes due under this subsection (1)(c) if the person was
initially eligible to claim the credit and such taxes are paid by the
date due as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) The amount of credit claimed for a reporting period may not
exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for that reporting
period. Persons unable to claim their credit, or any portion thereof,
in the calendar year for which the credit was earned may carry the
unused credit over to subsequent calendar years until used. However,
the carryover into subsequent calendar years is only permitted to the
extent that the five hundred thousand dollar limit for any calendar
year is not exceeded. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(e) The department of social and health services must work with the
department of revenue to develop a process to verify that an individual
with a developmental disability has been hired into a position that
qualifies for the credit provided in this section. Only those
businesses that hire individuals that the department of social and
health services has identified as developmentally disabled qualify for
the credit.
(f) To claim a credit under this section, a person must comply with
the electronic filing and payment requirements in RCW 82.32.080.
(g) Credit is authorized only for an employee with a developmental
disability hired for an employment position where the hiring takes
place on or after July 1, 2014. Employment positions filled by
existing employees are eligible for the credit under this section only
if the position vacated by the existing employee is filled by a new
hire, and both the existing employee and the new hire are individuals
with a developmental disability.
(h) A person may not claim the credit under this section if the
person has claimed a credit against the tax due under this chapter,
under any other provision of law, with respect to the same employment
position.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Calendar quarter" means a period of three consecutive calendar
months ending on March 31st, June 30th, September 30th, or December
31st.
(b) "Full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four
hundred fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred
twenty hours a year.
(c) "Individual with a developmental disability" means an
individual with a developmental disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020.
(d) "Part-time" means less than full-time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---