BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.120 and 2005 c 483 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No fee shall be charged for the inspection of public records. No
fee shall be charged for locating public documents and making them
available for copying or scanning. A reasonable charge may be imposed
for providing copies of public records and for the use by any person of
agency equipment or equipment of the office of the secretary of the
senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives
to copy or scan public records, which charges shall not exceed the
amount necessary to reimburse the agency, the office of the secretary
of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives for its actual costs directly incident to such copying
or scanning. Agency charges for photocopies or scanned copies shall be
imposed in accordance with the actual per page cost or other costs
established and published by the agency. In no event may an agency
charge a per page cost greater than the actual per page cost as
established and published by the agency. To the extent the agency has
not determined the actual per page cost for photocopies or scanning of
public records, the agency may not charge in excess of fifteen cents
per page. An agency may require a deposit in an amount not to exceed
ten percent of the estimated cost of providing copies for a request.
If an agency makes a request available on a partial or installment
basis, the agency may charge for each part of the request as it is
provided. If an installment of a records request is not claimed or
reviewed, the agency is not obligated to fulfill the balance of the
request.

--- END ---