BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.195 and 2013 c 184 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2014, each school district board of directors
((is encouraged to)) must adopt an academic acceleration policy for
high school students as provided under this section.
(2) Under an academic acceleration policy:
(a) The district automatically enrolls any student who meets the
state standard on the high school statewide student assessment in the
next most rigorous level of advanced courses offered by the high
school. Students who successfully complete such an advanced course are
then enrolled in the next most rigorous level of advanced course, with
the objective that students will eventually be automatically enrolled
in courses that offer the opportunity to earn dual credit for high
school and college.
(b) The subject matter of the advanced courses in which the student
is automatically enrolled depends on the content area or areas of the
statewide student assessment where the student has met the state
standard. Students who meet the state standard on both end-of-course
mathematics assessments are considered to have met the state standard
for high school mathematics. Students who meet the state standard in
both reading and writing are eligible for enrollment in advanced
courses in English, social studies, humanities, and other related
subjects.
(c) The district must notify students and parents or guardians
regarding the academic acceleration policy and the advanced courses
available to students.
(d) The district must provide a parent or guardian with an
opportunity to opt out of the academic acceleration policy and enroll
a student in an alternative course.

--- END ---