BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the legislature's intent to provide
the public and the legislature easy access to public school data. No
public centralized database exists with information regarding school
collective bargaining information. The information communicated
through school collective bargaining information will provide valuable
feedback to the public and the legislature as additional basic
education investments are provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement, maintain, and create rules for an internet-based portal that
provides public access to public school collective bargaining
agreements and data elements provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) For each public school-approved and renewed collective
bargaining agreement, the public school shall provide the office of the
superintendent of public instruction with information on the agreement
within sixty days of its approval. The agreement information must be
provided on a form prescribed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and must include but is not limited to:
(a) The term of the agreement;
(b) The total supplemental salary amount and average supplemental
salary per employee;
(c) The total number of in-service days;
(d) The total number of sick leave days, personal leave days, and
holidays;
(e) The maximum contracted class size by grade and overload
concessions;
(f) Additional compensation provided for time, responsibility,
incentives, or other purposes;
(g) Annual percentage of change in total salary from prior year;
(h) District-wide average hours of student instructional time per
school year by grade;
(i) Provisions addressing actions taken specifically to eliminate
the opportunity gap;
(j) Beginning September 15, 2015, any items, terms, policies,
practices, customs, or conditions in the agreement, that were not
included in information provided to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in any prior year; and
(k) Whether the agreement contains a no strike clause.

--- END ---