BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the opportunity
gap is demonstrated by the difference between the highest performing
subgroups of students and all other subgroups of students. The
legislature recognizes that there is strong research that shows that
the opportunity gap can lead to higher dropout rates, negative impacts
on the economy, and elevates stress in the community in the areas of
crime, violence, and poverty. The legislature intends to sharpen the
focus of school districts on the opportunity gap by requiring each
collective bargaining agreement to address actions to be taken to close
and eliminate the opportunity gap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
Each collective bargaining agreement entered, reopened, and renewed
after the effective date of this section must specifically address
actions to be taken in accordance with the agreement to close and
eliminate the opportunity gap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Each collective bargaining agreement entered, reopened, and renewed
after the effective date of this section must specifically address
actions to be taken in accordance with the agreement to close and
eliminate the opportunity gap.

--- END ---