BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct an analysis of how school districts use
school days. The analysis must include:
(a) How school districts define classroom time, nonclassroom time,
instructional time, noninstructional time, and any other definitions of
how the school day is divided or used;
(b) Estimates of time in each category;
(c) When noninstructional hours occur;
(d) How noninstructional hours are used including how much of the
noninstructional time is devoted to professional development for the
purposes of teacher and principal evaluation training or common core
state standards training;
(e) A review of student achievement data and, to the extent
possible, a determination of whether there is a causal link between
improvement in student achievement and the amount of quality
professional development teachers receive; and
(f) The extent to which the use of each category of time is
identified or defined in collective bargaining agreements.
(2) To the extent data is not available at the statewide level, the
Washington state institute for public policy may use case studies or
other methods to conduct the analysis.
(3) The Washington state institute for public policy shall submit
an initial report of its findings to the education committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2014, and a final report by December 1,
2015.

--- END ---