BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Tanning facility" means any location, place, area, structure,
or business that provides persons access to any ultraviolet tanning
device for a fee.
(2) "Ultraviolet tanning device" means equipment that emits
electromagnetic radiation with wavelengths in the air between two
hundred and four hundred nanometers used for tanning of the skin
including, but not limited to, a sunlamp, tanning booth, or tanning
bed. An ultraviolet tanning device does not mean a phototherapy device
which may be used by or under the direct supervision of a licensed
physician who is trained in the use of phototherapy devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Persons under eighteen years of age are
prohibited from using an ultraviolet tanning device.
(2) Proof of age must be satisfied with a driver's license or other
government-issued identification containing the date of birth and a
photograph of the individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The owner of a tanning facility that
violates this chapter is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two
hundred fifty dollars per violation in addition to any other penalty
established by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---