BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 There are several early learning, child
care, and parent support programs that comprise the early learning and
child care system in Washington. Each program has unique objectives,
eligibility requirements, processes for enrollment, hours of operation,
licensing or performance standards, and funding streams. The multiple
disparate components of each program may create barriers for early
learning and child care practitioners wishing to offer high quality
full-day learning and care opportunities that both meet the needs of
working parents and promote meaningful outcomes for children. To the
extent possible, it is the intent of the legislature to streamline and
align licensing and performance standards in order to facilitate
integration of these early learning programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No later than July 1, 2015, the
department of early learning shall adopt a single set of licensing
standards for child care and the early childhood education and
assistance program. The new licensing standards must:
(a) Use the early achievers program as a foundational framework and
eliminate additional burdensome regulations for providers who
demonstrate higher levels of quality care;
(b) Take into account the separate needs of family care providers
and child care centers; and
(c) Ensure for the continued health and safety of child care
settings.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---