BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.135 and 2013 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability and quality
of care for children from low-income households. Policies for the
expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care
program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to
promote continuity of care for children.
(2) ((Beginning in fiscal year 2013, authorizations for the working
connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve months
unless a change in circumstances necessitates reauthorization sooner
than twelve months. The twelve-month certification applies only if the
enrollments in the child care subsidy or working connections child care
program are capped.)) A child is eligible for working connections child
care for a twelve-month enrollment period and may not be deemed
ineligible for any change in circumstance including but not limited to:
(a) A change in family composition;
(b) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's employment status;
(c) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's employment status due
to health, maternity or paternity leave, or other family leave
condition provided for in chapter 49.78 RCW; or
(d) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's income.
(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, beginning September 1, 2013, working connections
child care providers shall receive a five percent increase in the
subsidy rate for enrolling in level 2 in the early achievers programs.
Providers must complete level 2 and advance to level 3 within thirty
months in order to maintain this increase.

--- END ---