BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.120 and 2000 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall investigate the habits, supply, and economic
use of food fish and shellfish in state and offshore waters.
(2) The director shall make an annual report to the governor on the
operation of the department and the statistics of the fishing industry.
(3) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036 and within existing resources,
the department shall provide a biennial report on forage fish,
including anchovy, herring, sand lance, sardine, and smelt, to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives by
June 30th of each odd-numbered year. The report must include, at
minimum: A status report on current state and federal forage fish
population assessment efforts; a profile of the relevant recreational
and commercial fisheries; economic data for these fisheries, including
identification of significant markets as well as any known potential
risks to these markets relating to declining forage fish populations;
the status of known research efforts intending to determine the impact
of forage fish removal on marine ecosystems, on endangered marine
species, and on marine mammal and marine bird populations; a summary
identifying any known gaps in existing research efforts; and the status
of the department's forage fish conservation efforts.
(4) Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the director shall provide a
comprehensive biennial report of all departmental operations to the
chairs of the committees on natural resources of the senate and house
of representatives, the senate ways and means committee, and the house
of representatives appropriations committee, including one copy to the
staff of each of the committees, to reflect the previous fiscal period.
The format of the report shall be similar to reports issued by the
department from 1964-1970 and the report shall include, but not be
limited to, descriptions of all department activities including:
Revenues generated, program costs, capital expenditures, personnel,
special projects, new and ongoing research, environmental controls,
cooperative projects, intergovernmental agreements, and outlines of
ongoing litigation, recent court decisions and orders on major issues
with the potential for state liability. The report shall describe the
status of the resource and its recreational, commercial, and tribal
utilization. The report shall be made available to the public.

--- END ---