BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health benefit plan issued or renewed after December 31,
2015, must offer benefits or coverage for medically necessary elemental
formula, regardless of delivery method, when a licensed physician or
other health care provider with prescriptive authority:
(a) Diagnoses a patient with an eosinophilic gastrointestinal
associated disorder; and
(b) Orders and supervises the use of the elemental formula.
(2) The cost-sharing for medically necessary elemental formula must
be included in the expenses that count toward the enrollee's annual
out-of-pocket maximum, unless prohibited by the federal patient
protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the
federal health care and education reconciliation act of 2010, P.L. 111-152, or federal regulations or guidance issued under the affordable
care act.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a health benefit plan from
requiring prior authorization or imposing other appropriate utilization
controls in approving coverage for medically necessary elemental
formula.

--- END ---