BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.240 and 2005 c 449 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Conservation futures are a useful tool for counties to preserve
lands of public interest for future generations. Counties are
encouraged to use some conservation futures as one tool for salmon
preservation purposes.
(1) Any board of county commissioners may establish by resolution
a special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to which
it may credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts
placed in this fund may be used for the purpose of acquiring rights and
interests in real property pursuant to the terms of RCW 84.34.210 and
84.34.220, and for the maintenance and operation of any property
acquired with these funds. Revenues from this tax may not be used to
supplant existing maintenance and operation funding.
(2)(a) Generally, the amount of revenue used for maintenance and
operations of parks and recreational land may not exceed fifteen
percent of the total amount collected from the tax levied under RCW
84.34.230 in the preceding calendar year. ((Revenues from this tax may
not be used to supplant existing maintenance and operation funding.))
(b) A county may use up to twenty-five percent of the total amount
for maintenance and operations of parks and recreational land if it
has:
(i) Acquired rights and interests in one thousand or more acres of
real property under RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220; and
(ii) Collected a conservations futures levy for ten or more years.
(c) A county may use up to thirty percent of the total amount for
maintenance and operations of parks and recreational land if it has:
(i) Acquired rights and interests in four thousand or more acres of
real property under RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220;
(ii) Collected a conservation futures levy for twenty or more
years; and
(iii) Assessed the maximum levy authorized by RCW 84.34.230 for six
or more months.
(3) Any board of county commissioners that uses the tax levied
under RCW 84.34.230 for maintenance and operations of parks and
recreation land under subsection (2) of this section may do so only
after an affirmative vote by the commission.
(4) Any rights or interests in real property acquired under this
section must be located within the assessing county. ((Further,)) The
county must determine if the rights or interests in real property
acquired with these funds would reduce the capacity of land suitable
for development necessary to accommodate the allocated housing and
employment growth, as adopted in the countywide planning policies.
When actions are taken that reduce capacity to accommodate planned
growth, the jurisdiction shall adopt reasonable measures to increase
the capacity lost by such actions.
(((2))) (5) In counties greater than one hundred thousand in
population, the board of county commissioners or county legislative
authority shall develop a process to help ensure distribution of the
tax levied under RCW 84.34.230, over time, throughout the county.
(((3))) (6)(a) Between July 24, 2005, and July 1, 2008, the county
legislative authority of a county with a population density of fewer
than four persons per square mile may enact an ordinance offering a
ballot proposal to the people of the county to determine whether or not
the county legislative authority may make a one-time emergency
reallocation of unspent conservation futures funds to pay for other
county government purposes, where such conservation futures funds were
originally levied under RCW 84.34.230 but never spent to acquire rights
and interests in real property.
(b) Upon adoption by the county legislative authority of a ballot
proposal ordinance under (a) of this subsection the county auditor
shall: (i) Confer with the county legislative authority and review any
proposal to the people as to form and style; (ii) give the ballot
proposal a number, which thereafter shall be the identifying number for
the proposal; (iii) transmit a copy of the proposal to the prosecuting
attorney; and (iv) submit the proposal to the people at the next
general or special election that is not less than ninety days after the
adoption of the ordinance by the county legislative authority.
(c) The county prosecuting attorney shall within fifteen working
days of receipt of the proposal compose a concise statement, posed as
a positive question, not to exceed twenty-five words, which shall
express and give a true and impartial statement of the proposal. Such
concise statement shall be the ballot title.
(d) If the measure is affirmed by a majority voting on the issue it
shall become effective ten days after the results of the election are
certified.
(((4))) (7) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting
in any manner methods and funds otherwise available to a county for
financing the acquisition of such rights and interests in real
property.

--- END ---