BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington state legislature finds
that:
(a) Native Americans have long inhabited the area now known as
Washington state, living in sustainable cultures based on cooperation
and respect for the land and all creatures;
(b) Native Americans suffered many grave injustices when nontribal
people settled in Washington state, but endured to preserve remarkable
American Indian cultures;
(c) Native Americans have contributed immeasurably to Washington
state and the United States as scholars, artists, entrepreneurs, and
leaders in all realms of society;
(d) Native Americans have served with honor and distinction in the
United States armed forces, and many made the ultimate sacrifice in
that service;
(e) Many states have designated days, weeks, or months honoring
Native American heritage, and on October 21, 2013, President Barack
Obama proclaimed November 2013 as National Native American Heritage
Month and called upon all Americans to celebrate November 29, 2013, as
Native American Heritage Day; and
(f) More than one hundred eighty federally acknowledged Native
American tribes in the United States, including many Washington state
tribes, support recognizing a day honoring Native American heritage.
(2) The Washington state legislature therefore intends to recognize
and honor Washington state's proud and resonant Native American
heritage by designating the Friday immediately following the fourth
Thursday in November, currently a state legal and school holiday, as
"Native American Heritage Day."

Sec. 2 RCW 1.16.050 and 2013 c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following are state legal holidays:
(a) Sunday;
(b) The first day of January, commonly called New Year's Day;
(c) The third Monday of January, ((being)) celebrated as the
anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther King, Jr.;
(d) The third Monday of February, to be known as Presidents' Day
and ((to be)) celebrated as the anniversary of the births of Abraham
Lincoln and George Washington;
(e) The last Monday of May, commonly known as Memorial Day;
(f) The fourth day of July, ((being)) the anniversary of the
Declaration of Independence;
(g) The first Monday in September, to be known as Labor Day;
(h) The eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans' Day;
(i) The fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Thanksgiving
Day;
(j) The ((day)) Friday immediately following ((Thanksgiving)) the
fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Native American Heritage
Day; and
(k) The twenty-fifth day of December, commonly called Christmas
Day.
(2) Employees of the state and its political subdivisions, except
employees of school districts and except those nonclassified employees
of institutions of higher education who hold appointments or are
employed under contracts to perform services for periods of less than
twelve consecutive months, ((shall be)) are entitled to one paid
holiday per calendar year in addition to those specified in this
section. Each employee of the state or its political subdivisions may
select the day on which the employee desires to take the additional
holiday provided for ((herein)) in this section after consultation with
the employer pursuant to guidelines to be promulgated by rule of the
appropriate personnel authority, or in the case of local government by
ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority.
(3) If any of the ((above specified)) state legal holidays
specified in this section are also federal legal holidays but observed
on different dates, only the state legal holidays ((shall be)) are
recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees of the state and its
political subdivisions ((except that for)). However, for port
districts and the law enforcement and public transit employees of
municipal corporations, either the federal or the state legal holiday
is recognized as a paid legal holiday, but in no case may both((, may))
holidays be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees.
(4) Whenever any state legal holiday((,)):
(a) Other than Sunday, falls upon a Sunday, the following Monday
((shall be)) is the legal holiday((.
Whenever any legal holiday)); or
(b) Falls upon a Saturday, the preceding Friday ((shall be)) is the
legal holiday.
(5) Nothing in this section ((shall)) may be construed to have the
effect of adding or deleting the number of paid holidays provided for
in an agreement between employees and employers of political
subdivisions of the state or as established by ordinance or resolution
of the local government legislative authority.
(6) The legislature declares that the following days are recognized
as provided in this subsection, but may not be considered legal
holidays for any purpose:
(a) The thirteenth day of January ((shall be)), recognized as
Korean-American day ((but shall not be considered a legal holiday for
any purposes.
The legislature declares that));
(b) The twelfth day of October ((shall be)), recognized as Columbus
day ((but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that));
(c) The ninth day of April ((shall be)), recognized as former
prisoner of war recognition day ((but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that));
(d) The twenty-sixth day of January ((shall be)), recognized as
Washington army and air national guard day ((but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that));
(e) The seventh day of August ((shall be)), recognized as purple
heart recipient recognition day ((but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that));
(f) The second Sunday in October ((be)), recognized as Washington
state children's day ((but shall not be considered a legal holiday for
any purposes.
The legislature declares that));
(g) The sixteenth day of April ((shall be)), recognized as Mother
Joseph day ((and));
(h) The fourth day of September, recognized as Marcus Whitman
day((, but neither shall be considered legal holidays for any purpose.
The legislature declares that));
(i) The seventh day of December ((be)), recognized as Pearl Harbor
remembrance day ((but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any
purpose.
The legislature declares that));
(j) The twenty-seventh day of July ((be)), recognized as national
Korean war veterans armistice day ((but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purpose.
The legislature declares that));
(k) The nineteenth day of February ((be)), recognized as civil
liberties day of remembrance ((but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purpose.
The legislature declares that));
(l) The nineteenth day of June ((be)), recognized as Juneteenth, a
day of remembrance for the day the slaves learned of their freedom((,
but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purpose.
The legislature declares that)); and
(m) The thirtieth day of March ((be)), recognized as welcome home
Vietnam veterans day ((but shall not be considered a legal holiday for
any purpose)).

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.050 and 1989 c 233 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following are school holidays, and school ((shall)) may not
be taught on these days:
(a) Sunday;
(b) The first day of January, commonly called New Year's Day;
(c) The third Monday of January, ((being)) celebrated as the
anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther King, Jr.;
(d) The third Monday in February, to be known as Presidents' Day
and ((to be)) celebrated as the anniversary of the births of Abraham
Lincoln and George Washington;
(e) The last Monday in May, commonly known as Memorial Day;
(f) The fourth day of July, ((being)) the anniversary of the
Declaration of Independence;
(g) The first Monday in September, to be known as Labor Day;
(h) The eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans'
Day((,));
(i) The fourth Thursday in November, commonly known as Thanksgiving
Day;
(j) The ((day)) Friday immediately following ((Thanksgiving)) the
fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Native American Heritage
Day; and
(k) The twenty-fifth day of December, commonly called Christmas
Day((: PROVIDED, That)).
(2) No reduction from ((the)) a teacher's time or salary ((shall))
may be made by reason of the fact that a school day happens to be one
of the days referred to in this section as a day on which school
((shall not be)) is not taught.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---