BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.36.551 and 2010 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied on all milk processed in this state an
assessment not to exceed fifty-four one-hundredths of one cent per
hundredweight. The director shall determine, by rule, an assessment,
that with contribution from the general fund, will support an
inspection program to maintain compliance with the provisions of the
pasteurized milk ordinance of the national conference on interstate
milk shipment. All assessments shall be levied on the operator of the
first milk processing plant receiving the milk for processing. This
shall include milk processing plants that produce their own milk for
processing and milk processing plants that receive milk from other
sources. Milk processing plants whose monthly assessment for receipt
of milk totals less than twenty dollars in any given month are exempted
from paying this assessment for that month. All moneys collected under
this section shall be paid to the director by the twentieth day of the
succeeding month for the previous month's assessments. The director
shall deposit the funds into the dairy inspection account hereby
created within the agricultural local fund established in RCW
43.23.230. The funds shall be used only to provide inspection services
to the dairy industry. If the operator of a milk processing plant
fails to remit any assessments, that sum shall be a lien on any
property owned by him or her, and shall be reported by the director and
collected in the manner and with the same priority over other creditors
as prescribed for the collection of delinquent taxes under chapters
84.60 and 84.64 RCW.
(2) This section expires June 30, ((2015)) 2020.

--- END ---