BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that efforts to
improve science, technology, engineering, and mathematics literacy, and
phase in state-funded all-day kindergarten are impeded by the lack of
adequate school facilities. The legislature also finds that an
unanticipated drop in requests for the school construction assistance
grant program reduces the need for appropriations in the 2013-2015
capital budget by over fifty million dollars. The legislature intends
to create grant programs to assist school districts with their need for
such facilities and fund the initial round of grants for such
facilities from the savings in the school construction assistance
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.188
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that to achieve improvements in
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics literacy specialized
school plant facilities are required. Adequate STEM facilities are
necessary to support interactive, project-based STEM curricula and are
necessary to support STEM teachers who are attempting to deliver
interactive, project-based STEM curricula. The legislature also
recognizes that to achieve expected improvements in STEM literacy the
development and modernization of specialized STEM facilities must occur
at a faster pace than the typical thirty to fifty-year cycle of
modernizing or replacing school plant facilities. The legislature
intends to speed up the development and modernization of specialized
STEM facilities through the competitive grant program described in this
section.
(2) The specialized STEM facility grant program must be
administered by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance specified in
RCW 28A.188.030 and the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW
28A.188.050. The superintendent of public instruction must develop
grant application materials in consultation with the statewide STEM
organization, must review applications for accuracy and financial
reasonableness, and must administer awarded grants. With funds
specifically appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of
public instruction must contract with the statewide STEM organization
specified in RCW 28A.188.050 to evaluate applications against the
criteria specified in subsection (4) of this section and recommend a
single rank-ordered list of grant applications. The superintendent of
public instruction may modify the rank-ordered list received by the
statewide STEM organization for inclusion in the office's capital
budget request, but must also submit to the governor and fiscal
committees of the legislature the original ranking by the statewide
STEM organization with explanations for any changes made to the
ranking. The governor may use the original list prepared by the
statewide STEM organization or may consider any changes recommended by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction in preparing the
governor's capital budget request.
(3) One hundred percent of project costs are eligible for grants
under this program for:
(a) Facilities owned by public school districts or public charter
schools used for grades nine through twelve;
(b) Facilities built or modernized more than ten years prior to the
grant application; and
(c) Project costs for design, construction, project management,
capitalized and noncapitalized equipment and fixtures, and necessary
utility and information technology systems upgrades to support the
specialized STEM facilities.
(4) The criteria listed in this subsection must be used to rank
grant requests. In applying these criteria, the statewide STEM
organization should seek to recommend funding for projects that
modernize the most inadequate facilities, to be used by the most
qualified STEM teachers, expected to result in the greatest gains in
STEM literacy for the greatest number of students for the aggregate
amount of proposed grant funding, while improving specialized STEM
facilities in rural, suburban, and urban districts in all parts of the
state. The criteria are:
(a) The extent that existing STEM facilities are inadequate
including the lack of adequate STEM facilities to meet graduation
requirements in RCW 28A.150.220;
(b) A demonstration that existing STEM faculty are in place and are
qualified to deliver an interactive, project-based STEM curriculum in
the proposed specialized STEM facilities, or a plan and budget are in
place to recruit or train such STEM faculty;
(c) The expected gains in STEM literacy that are expected from the
proposed specialized STEM facilities in comparison to the proposed
project costs; and
(d) A broad distribution of grants across the state benefiting
rural, suburban, and urban districts.
(5) For the first round of grant applications to be considered for
inclusion in the governor's capital budget request for the 2015-2017
biennium, an expedited grant application and review process must be
conducted by the superintendent of public instruction and the statewide
STEM organization. The first rank-ordered list must consider, in
addition to the criteria in subsection (4) of this section, projects
that demonstrate innovative approaches to the design and construction
of specialized STEM facilities, including facilities for smaller
schools that are flexible and convertible to support education in a
variety of STEM disciplines. The first rank-ordered list of proposed
grants must be submitted to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by October 30, 2014.
Following that first submission, the superintendent of public
instruction must prepare a biennial grant application cycle for
subsequent biennia.
(6) Modernized spaces funded with this grant program in the prior
ten years are not eligible to receive state funding for modernization
through this grant program or the school construction assistance
program for the space that has been modernized with this grant program.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall write
rules to ensure new space added with funding provided by this grant is
included in the eligible inventory for the school construction
assistance program.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance, must prepare
a plan for evaluating the student performance outcomes resulting from
the STEM facility grant program. The evaluation plan and estimated
cost must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by January 1, 2015. The evaluation plan must provide an initial
evaluation report on student outcomes by January 1, 2019. The report
must also consider options for expanding the grant program to improve
specialized STEM facilities for middle and elementary schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that insufficient classroom space
has impeded the phase-in of state-funded all-day kindergarten specified
in this section even though the school construction assistance program
under chapter 28A.525 RCW has included all-day kindergarten in the
calculation of necessary classroom space since 2001. The legislature
intends to assist school districts in the phase-in of all-day
kindergarten with the grant program described in this section.
(2) The all-day kindergarten facility grant program must be
administered by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with an advisory committee. The advisory committee must
include three school district facility managers, one each from an
urban, suburban, and rural school district, selected by the
superintendent of public instruction, and four community members
selected by the governor representing parents and organizations
concerned with early education and student academic performance. The
superintendent of public instruction must develop grant application
materials in consultation with the advisory committee, must review
applications for accuracy and financial reasonableness, and must
administer awarded grants. The advisory committee must review
applications against the criteria specified in subsection (4) of this
section and recommend a single rank-ordered list. The superintendent
of public instruction may modify the rank-ordered list received by the
advisory committee for inclusion in the agency's capital budget
request, but must also submit to the governor and fiscal committees of
the legislature the original ranking by the advisory committee with
explanations for any changes made to the ranking. The governor may use
the original list prepared by the advisory committee or may consider
any changes recommended by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction in preparing the governor's capital budget request.
(3) One hundred percent of project costs necessary to provide
additional classroom space at existing elementary schools are eligible
for kindergarten classroom grants under this program for:
(a) Facilities owned by public school districts or public charter
schools;
(b) Facilities built or modernized prior to 2003; and
(c) Project costs for design, construction, purchase and
installation of modular buildings, project management, capitalized
equipment, and fixtures. Costs for purchase or lease of portables or
other facilities not installed on permanent foundations are not
eligible.
(4) The criteria listed in this subsection must be used to rank
grant requests. In applying these criteria, the advisory committee
should seek to recommend funding for projects that provide necessary
classroom space in districts furthest behind in implementing
state-funded all-day kindergarten, or for districts that have
implemented state-funded all-day kindergarten in temporary spaces, with
the highest enrollment percentages of students eligible for free and
reduced-price school lunches, in districts least able to provide the
necessary classroom space from local sources. The criteria are:
(a) The extent that implementing state-funded all-day kindergarten
is impeded by the lack of classroom space in the district as verified
by site visits by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. School districts that have implemented state-funded all-day kindergarten in temporary spaces must be ranked as high as schools
not having implemented state-funded all-day kindergarten due to a lack
of space. For the purposes of this subsection, temporary spaces mean
spaces that are not designed as a classroom nor typically used as a
classroom, such as the library, auditorium, gymnasium, or in
neighboring community facilities not owned by the district;
(b) The kindergarten classroom space is needed in schools with the
highest free and reduced-price school lunch enrollment percentages; and
(c) Economic conditions within the district that limit the ability
of the district to finance the necessary classroom space from local
sources.
(5) For the first round of grant applications to be considered for
inclusion in the governor's capital budget request for the 2015-2017
biennium, an expedited grant application and review process must be
conducted by the superintendent of public instruction and the advisory
committee. The first rank-ordered list of proposed grants must be
submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 30, 2014. Following that
first submission, the superintendent of public instruction must prepare
a biennial grant application cycle for subsequent biennia.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
write rules to ensure new space added with funding provided by this
grant is included in the eligible inventory for the school construction
assistance program. Grant funds provided under this section must not
be counted as local match for the school construction assistance
program. The all-day kindergarten program is not intended to replace
the school construction assistance program for providing state
assistance for the construction of new schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c
19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 Specialized STEM Facility Grant Program (92000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation is for grants for the following
list of STEM facility improvement projects:

Franklin Pierce - Washington High School . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
University Place - Curtis High School . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
Zillah School District - Expand Engineering Facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Enumclaw - Stem Computer Lab . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

(2) $15,750,000 of the appropriation is for the top ranked projects
under the process specified in section 2 of this act.

(3) $250,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in section 2 of
this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s. c
19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 State-Funded All-Day Kindergarten Grant Program
(92000027)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $24,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the top
ranked projects under the process specified in section 2 of this act.
(2) $250,000 of the appropriation is for administrative costs for
implementing the grant program specified in section 3 of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000,000

Sec. 6 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 5020 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance
(30000145)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,340,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) $933,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
improve web-based access by taxpayers to school capacity and actual
enrollment in order to understand possible opportunities to increase
efficiency through consolidation. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction must post this capacity and enrollment information
on its web site.
(4) Funds from this appropriation may be used to match federal
dollars provided by the office of economic adjustment for school
replacement facilities located on military bases.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the
school construction assistance grant program to the Evergreen (Clark
County) School District to address the school construction emergency
resulting from the fire that destroyed the Crestline School.
(6) The space allocations for state funding assistance purposes for
districts with senior or four-year high schools with fewer than four
hundred students, as outlined in WAC 392-343-035, must be computed in
accordance with the following formula:

Number of Headcount
Student-Grades 9-12 Maximum Space
Allocation Per Facility

0-200 42,000 square feet

201-300 48,000 square feet

301-or more 52,000 square feet

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($285,355,000))
$227,461,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,232,000))
$188,096,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($495,087,000))
$417,057,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,099,310,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,594,397,000))
$3,516,367,000

--- END ---