BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
State universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College may use multiple measures to determine whether a student must
enroll in a precollege course including, but not limited to, placement
tests, the SAT, high school transcripts, college transcripts, or
initial class performance. Additionally, state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College must post all the
available options for course placement on their web sites and in their
admissions materials.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.77.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Aligned with the state's biennial budget and policy cycles, the
council shall propose educational attainment goals and priorities to
meet the state's evolving needs. The council shall identify strategies
for meeting the goals and priorities by means of a short-term strategic
action plan and a ten-year plan that serves as a roadmap.
(a) The goals must address the needs of Washington residents to
reach higher levels of educational attainment and Washington's
workforce needs for certificates and degrees in particular fields of
study.
(b) The council shall identify the resources it deems appropriate
to meet statewide goals and also recognize current state economic
conditions and state resources.
(c) In proposing goals, the council shall collaborate with the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, the state board of education, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher
education, independent colleges and degree-granting institutions,
certificate-granting institutions, and the workforce training and
education coordinating board.
(2) The council shall update the strategic action plan every two
years with the first strategic action plan to be submitted to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2012. The ten-year roadmap
must be updated every two years with the first roadmap to be submitted
to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013. The council
must provide regular updates to the joint higher education committee
created in RCW 44.04.360 as needed.
(3) In order to develop the ten-year roadmap, the council shall
conduct strategic planning in collaboration with agencies and
stakeholders and include input from the legislature. The council must
also consult with the STEM education innovation alliance established
under RCW 28A.188.030 in order to align strategies under the roadmap
with the STEM framework for education and accountability developed by
the alliance. The roadmap must encompass all sectors of higher
education, including secondary to postsecondary transitions. The
roadmap must outline strategies that address:
(a) Strategic planning, which includes setting benchmarks and goals
for long-term degree production generally and in particular fields of
study;
(b) Expanding access, affordability, quality, efficiency, and
accountability among the various institutions of higher education;
(c) Higher education finance planning and strategic investments
including budget recommendations necessary to meet statewide goals;
(d) System design and coordination;
(e) Improving student transitions;
(f) Higher education data and analysis, in collaboration with the
education data center, which includes outcomes for recruitment,
retention, and success of students;
(g) College and career access preparedness, in collaboration with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state
board of education;
(h) Expanding participation and success for racial and ethnic
minorities in higher education;
(i) Development and expansion of innovations in higher education
including innovations to increase attainment of postsecondary
certificates, and associate, baccalaureate, graduate, and professional
degrees; and innovations to improve precollege education in terms of
cost-effectiveness and transitions to college-level education;
(j) Strengthening the education pipeline and degree production in
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics fields, and aligning
strategies under the roadmap with the STEM framework for action and
accountability developed under RCW 28A.188.030; and
(k) Relevant policy research.
(4) As needed, the council must conduct system reviews consistent
with RCW 28B.77.080.
(5) The council shall facilitate the development and expansion of
innovative practices within, between, and among the sectors to increase
educational attainment and assess the effectiveness of the innovations.
(6) The council shall use the data and analysis produced by, and in
consultation with, the education data center created in RCW 43.41.400
in developing policy recommendations and proposing goals. In
conducting research and analysis the council at a minimum must:
(a) Identify barriers to increasing educational attainment,
evaluate effectiveness of various educational models, identify best
practices, and recommend methods to overcome barriers;
(b) Analyze data from multiple sources including data from academic
research and from areas and agencies outside of education including but
not limited to data from the department of health, the department of
corrections, and the department of social and health services to
determine best practices to remove barriers and to improve educational
attainment;
(c) Assess educational achievement disaggregated by income level,
age, gender, race and ethnicity, country of origin, and other relevant
demographic groups working with data from the education data center;
(d) Track progress toward meeting the state's goals;
(e) Communicate results and provide access to data analysis to
policymakers, the superintendent of public instruction, institutions of
higher education, students, and the public; and
(f) Use data from the education data center wherever appropriate to
conduct duties in (a) through (e) of this subsection.
(7) The council shall collaborate with the appropriate state
agencies and stakeholders, including the state board of education, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education
coordinating board, and the four-year institutions of higher education
to improve student transitions and success including but not limited
to:
(a) Setting minimum college admission standards for four-year
institutions of higher education, including:
(i) A requirement that coursework in American sign language or an
American Indian language satisfies any requirement for instruction in
a language other than English that the council or the institutions may
establish as a general undergraduate admissions requirement; and
(ii) Encouragement of the use of multiple measures to determine
whether a student must enroll in a precollege course, such as placement
tests, the SAT, high school transcripts, college transcripts, or
initial class performance;
(b) Proposing comprehensive policies and programs to encourage
students to prepare for, understand how to access, and pursue
postsecondary college and career programs, including specific policies
and programs for students with disabilities;
(c) Recommending policies that require coordination between or
among sectors such as dual high school-college programs, awarding
college credit for advanced high school work, and transfer between two
and four-year institutions of higher education or between different
four-year institutions of higher education; and
(d) Identifying transitions issues and solutions for students, from
high school to postsecondary education including community and
technical colleges, four-year institutions of higher education,
apprenticeships, training, or workplace education; between two-year and
four-year institutions of higher education; and from postsecondary
education to career. In addressing these issues the council must
recognize that these transitions may occur multiple times as students
continue their education.
(8) The council directs the work of the office, which includes
administration of student financial aid programs under RCW 28B.76.090,
including the state need grant and other scholarships, the Washington
advanced college tuition payment program, and work-study programs.
(9) The council may administer state and federal grants and
programs including but not limited to those programs that provide
incentives for improvements related to increased access and success in
postsecondary education.
(10) The council shall protect higher education consumers
including:
(a) Approving degree-granting postsecondary institutions consistent
with existing statutory criteria;
(b) Establishing minimum criteria to assess whether students who
attend proprietary institutions of higher education shall be eligible
for the state need grant and other forms of state financial aid.
(i) The criteria shall include retention rates, completion rates,
loan default rates, and annual tuition increases, among other criteria
for students who receive state need grant as in chapter 28B.92 RCW and
any other state financial aid.
(ii) The council may remove proprietary institutions of higher
education from eligibility for the state need grant or other form of
state financial aid if it finds that the institution or college does
not meet minimum criteria.
(iii) The council shall report by December 1, 2014, to the joint
higher education committee in RCW 44.04.360 on the outcomes of students
receiving state need grants, impacts on meeting the state's higher
education goals for educational attainment, and options for
prioritization of the state need grant and possible consequences of
implementing each option. When examining options for prioritizing the
state need grant the council shall consider awarding grants based on
need rather than date of application and making awards based on other
criteria selected by the council.
(11) The council shall adopt residency requirements by rule.
(12) The council shall arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions of higher education and the state board for community
and technical colleges at the request of one or more of the
institutions involved, or at the request of the governor, or from a
resolution adopted by the legislature. The decision of the council
shall be binding on the participants in the dispute.
(13) The council may solicit, accept, receive, and administer
federal funds or private funds, in trust, or otherwise, and contract
with foundations or with for-profit or nonprofit organizations to
support the purposes and functions of the council.
(14) The council shall represent the broad public interest above
the interests of the individual institutions of higher education.

--- END ---