BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Polychlorinated biphenyls, commonly known as
PCBs, are a family of human-made organic chemicals that were used in
many industrial and commercial products such as insulating fluids for
electric transformers and capacitors, hydraulic fluids, plasticizers,
paint additives, lubricants, inks, caulk, and carbonless copy paper.
PCBs were used because of their fire resistance, chemical stability,
and electrical insulating properties. PCBs are also found in products
as an unintentional by-product of manufacturing processes. PCBs are
ubiquitous in the environment because of their stability, extensive
previous use, by-production in manufacturing, inadvertent release, and
the inability to control and eliminate them through current waste
management practices. PCBs are persistent, bioaccumulative, and toxic,
and they cycle between the air, soil, and water. PCBs have been shown
to cause cancer and affect the human immune, reproductive, nervous, and
endocrine systems. The United States toxic substances control act
prohibited the commercial production of PCBs in 1979. However, the
United States environmental protection agency rules implementing the
ban provides exemptions for certain products containing PCBs at
concentrations of fifty parts per million or less as a result of
manufacturing processes and therefore the continued manufacture,
processing, distribution, and use of products containing PCBs remains
permitted.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.26.010 and 2012 c 224 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive
and judicial branches of state government, including state agencies,
departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and correctional and
other types of institutions.
(2) "Bid" means an offer, proposal, or quote for goods or services
in response to a solicitation issued for such goods or services by the
department or an agency of Washington state government.
(3) "Bidder" means an individual or entity who submits a bid,
quotation, or proposal in response to a solicitation issued for such
goods or services by the department or an agency of Washington state
government.
(4) "Businesses owned and operated by persons with disabilities"
means any for-profit business certified under chapter 39.19 RCW as
being owned and controlled by persons who have been either:
(a) Determined by the department of social and health services to
have a developmental disability, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;
(b) Determined by an agency established under Title I of the
federal vocational rehabilitation act to be or have been eligible for
vocational rehabilitation services;
(c) Determined by the federal social security administration to be
or have been eligible for either social security disability insurance
or supplemental security income; or
(d) Determined by the United States department of veterans affairs
to be or have been eligible for vocational rehabilitation services due
to service-connected disabilities, under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 3100 et seq.
(5) "Client services" means services provided directly to agency
clients including, but not limited to, medical and dental services,
employment and training programs, residential care, and subsidized
housing.
(6) "Community rehabilitation program of the department of social
and health services" means any entity that:
(a) Is registered as a nonprofit corporation with the secretary of
state; and
(b) Is recognized by the department of social and health services,
division of vocational rehabilitation as eligible to do business as a
community rehabilitation program.
(7) "Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to bidders and culminating in
a selection based on predetermined criteria.
(8) "Contractor" means an individual or entity awarded a contract
with an agency to perform a service or provide goods.
(9) "Debar" means to prohibit a contractor, individual, or other
entity from submitting a bid, having a bid considered, or entering into
a state contract during a specified period of time as set forth in a
debarment order.
(10) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.
(11) "Director" means the director of the department of enterprise
services.
(12) "Estimated useful life" of an item means the estimated time
from the date of acquisition to the date of replacement or disposal,
determined in any reasonable manner.
(13) "Goods" means products, materials, supplies, or equipment
provided by a contractor.
(14) "In-state business" means a business that has its principal
office located in Washington.
(15) "Life-cycle cost" means the total cost of an item to the state
over its estimated useful life, including costs of selection,
acquisition, operation, maintenance, and where applicable, disposal, as
far as these costs can reasonably be determined, minus the salvage
value at the end of its estimated useful life.
(16) "Master contracts" means a contract for specific goods or
services, or both, that is solicited and established by the department
in accordance with procurement laws and rules on behalf of and for
general use by agencies as specified by the department.
(17) "Microbusiness" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(b) has a gross revenue of less than one million dollars annually as
reported on its federal tax return or on its return filed with the
department of revenue.
(18) "Minibusiness" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(b) has a gross revenue of less than three million dollars, but one
million dollars or more annually as reported on its federal tax return
or on its return filed with the department of revenue.
(19) "Purchase" means the acquisition of goods or services,
including the leasing or renting of goods.
(20) "Services" means labor, work, analysis, or similar activities
provided by a contractor to accomplish a specific scope of work.
(21) "Small business" means an in-state business, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Certifies, under penalty of perjury, that it is owned and
operated independently from all other businesses and has either:
(i) Fifty or fewer employees; or
(ii) A gross revenue of less than seven million dollars annually as
reported on its federal income tax return or its return filed with the
department of revenue over the previous three consecutive years; or
(b) Is certified with the office of women and minority business
enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(22) "Sole source" means a contractor providing goods or services
of such a unique nature or sole availability at the location required
that the contractor is clearly and justifiably the only practicable
source to provide the goods or services.
(23) "Washington grown" has the definition in RCW 15.64.060.
(24) "Polychlorinated biphenyls" means any polychlorinated biphenyl
congeners and homologs.
(25) "Practical quantification limit" means the lowest
concentration that can be reliably measured within specified limits of
precision, accuracy, representativeness, completeness, and
comparability during routine laboratory operating conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish purchasing and procurement
policies that provide a preference for products and products in
packaging that does not contain polychlorinated biphenyls.
(2) No agency may knowingly purchase products or products in
packaging containing polychlorinated biphenyls above the practical
quantification limit except when it is not cost-effective or
technically feasible to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not require the department to test every
product procured. However, the department may accept from businesses,
manufacturers, organizations, and individuals results obtained from an
accredited laboratory or testing facility documenting product or
product packaging polychlorinated biphenyl levels.
(2) The department may request suppliers of products to provide
testing data from an accredited laboratory or testing facility
documenting product or product packaging polychlorinated biphenyl
levels.

--- END ---