BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
thirty-nine thousand five hundred farms and ranches generate one
hundred sixty thousand jobs, forty-nine billion dollars in revenue, and
thirteen percent of the state's economy, powering a diverse food and
agricultural economy that is critical to maintaining a strong state
economy. The legislature also finds that Washington is at risk of
losing its base of working agricultural lands, and that the cumulative
impact of nonpoint water quality regulations can impair the economic
viability of agricultural operations and cause open space agricultural
land to be converted to nonagricultural development.
(2) Therefore, the legislature declares that the protection of
normal and customary agricultural practices upon agricultural land is
essential to maintaining the public welfare in its highest state,
supporting the farm and ranch capacity to produce good local food, and
preserving open spaces. The legislature further declares that state
and federal agencies, in working to achieve nonpoint agricultural water
quality improvements, must also take precautions to protect the
economic viability of agricultural operations and minimize the
conversion of agricultural land to other uses.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends that normal and customary
agricultural activities protected from over-regulation under federal
law be granted equivalent protection from over-regulation under state
law. The legislature directs government agencies tasked with
protecting water quality to work cooperatively with agricultural
landowners and conservation districts in order to fully utilize new and
existing voluntary incentives and promote nonpoint agricultural water
quality solutions to the maximum extent practicable prior to taking any
nonpoint water quality enforcement action.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.080 and 1987 c 109 s 126 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to throw, drain, run, or
otherwise discharge into any of the waters of this state, or to cause,
permit or suffer to be thrown, run, drained, allowed to seep or
otherwise discharged into such waters any organic or inorganic matter
that shall cause or tend to cause pollution of such waters according to
the determination of the department, as provided for in this chapter.
The extent of the department's regulatory authority over nonpoint
agricultural activities under this chapter must be consistent with the
extent of the pertinent federal agency's regulatory authority under the
following federal statutory provisions:
(a) The federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and
the national pollution discharge elimination system point source permit
requirements of the federal clean water act, which shall have the same
meaning and be subject to the same exemptions and conditions as in the
federal act, including:
(i) Agricultural storm water discharges; and
(ii) Return flows from irrigated agriculture;
(b) The dredge and fill permit requirements of the federal clean
water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., which shall have the same
meaning and be subject to the same exemptions and conditions as in the
federal act, including:
(i) Normal and customary farming and ranching activities such as
plowing, seeding, cultivating, minor drainage, harvesting for the
production of food and fiber, or upland soil and water conservation
practices;
(ii) Construction or maintenance of farm or stock ponds or
irrigation districts, or the maintenance of drainage ditches;
(iii) Construction or maintenance of farm roads where the roads are
constructed and maintained, in accordance with best management
practices, to ensure that flow and circulation patterns and chemical
and biological characteristics of the navigable waters are not
impaired, that the reach of the navigable waters is not reduced, and
that any adverse effect on the aquatic environment will be otherwise
minimized; and
(iv) Maintenance, including emergency reconstruction of recently
damaged parts, of currently serviceable structures such as dikes, dams,
levees, groins, riprap, breakwaters, causeways, and bridge abutments or
approaches, and transportation structures;
(c) The federal food security act of 1985, 99 Stat. 1354; P.L. 99-198, which shall have the same meaning and be subject to the same
exemptions and conditions as in the federal act, including provisions
for croplands converted to agricultural use prior to December 23, 1985;
and
(d) The department's regulation of nonpoint agricultural activities
under this chapter must also be consistent with the following
legislative directives to:
(i) Minimize the conversion of agricultural land to nonagricultural
uses, as provided under RCW 90.48.450;
(ii) Base regulatory decisions on sound science, as provided under
RCW 34.05.272;
(iii) Ensure that regulation is based on credible water quality
data, as provided under RCW 90.48.570 through 90.48.590;
(iv) Promote regional equity by ensuring that the department's
regulation of nonpoint agricultural activities does not impose
significantly greater costs or burdens on Washington agricultural
operations than regulation of similar operations and activities in
states bordering Washington.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "agricultural activities" has
the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.58.065.

--- END ---