BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.04.070 and 1909 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
When a vacancy on the supreme court occurs by death, resignation,
or otherwise after the effective date of this section, it may not be
filled until the number of judges on that court has been reduced to
seven. Thereafter, the supreme court((, from and after February 26,
1909,)) shall consist of ((nine)) seven judges.
A vacancy can occur by resignation, retirement, death, or
otherwise.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.04.071 and 1971 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
((At the next general election, and at each biennial general
election thereafter, there shall be elected three justices of the
supreme court, to hold for the full term of six years, and until their
successors are elected and qualified)) Upon the reduction in size of
the supreme court from nine to seven justices, no fewer than two and no
more than three judges may be elected at each biennial general election
to serve six-year terms, commencing with the second Monday in January
succeeding their election.

--- END ---