BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.48.100 and 1990 c 3 s 130 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A department of corrections or chief law enforcement officer
responsible for the operation of a jail shall maintain a jail register,
open to the public, into which shall be entered in a timely basis:
(a) The name of each person confined in the jail with the hour,
date and cause of the confinement; and
(b) The hour, date and manner of each person's discharge.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section the
records of a person confined in jail shall be held in confidence and
shall be made available only to criminal justice agencies as defined in
RCW 43.43.705; or
(a) For use in inspections made pursuant to RCW 70.48.070;
(b) In jail certification proceedings;
(c) For use in court proceedings upon the written order of the
court in which the proceedings are conducted; ((or))
(d) To the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(e) To the Washington institute for public policy, research and
data analysis division of the department of social and health services,
higher education institutions of Washington state, Washington state
health care authority, state auditor's office, caseload forecast
council, office of financial management, or the successor entities of
these organizations, for the purpose of research in the public
interest. Data disclosed for research purposes must comply with
relevant state and federal statutes; or
(f) Upon the written permission of the person.
(3)(a) Law enforcement may use booking photographs of a person
arrested or confined in a local or state penal institution to assist
them in conducting investigations of crimes.
(b) Photographs and information concerning a person convicted of a
sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 may be disseminated as provided
in RCW 4.24.550, 9A.44.130, 9A.44.140, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 43.43.745,
46.20.187, 70.48.470, 72.09.330, and section 401, chapter 3, Laws of
1990.

--- END ---