BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.130 and 2013 c 254 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If, after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has
been proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is
dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 after consideration of
the social study prepared pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a
disposition hearing has been held pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court
shall enter an order of disposition pursuant to this section.
(1) The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the
case:
(a) Order a disposition that maintains the child in his or her
home, which shall provide a program designed to alleviate the immediate
danger to the child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child has
already suffered, and to aid the parents so that the child will not be
endangered in the future. In determining the disposition, the court
should choose services to assist the parents in maintaining the child
in the home, including housing assistance, if appropriate, that least
interfere with family autonomy and are adequate to protect the child.
(b)(i) Order the child to be removed from his or her home and into
the custody, control, and care of a relative or other suitable person,
the department, or a supervising agency for supervision of the child's
placement. If the court orders that the child be placed with a
caregiver over the objections of the parent or the department, the
court shall articulate, on the record, his or her reasons for ordering
the placement. The court may not order an Indian child, as defined in
RCW 13.38.040, to be removed from his or her home unless the court
finds, by clear and convincing evidence including testimony of
qualified expert witnesses, that the continued custody of the child by
the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional
or physical damage to the child.
(ii) The department or supervising agency has the authority to
place the child, subject to review and approval by the court (A) with
a relative as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), (B) in the home of
another suitable person if the child or family has a preexisting
relationship with that person, and the person has completed all
required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to
the department or supervising agency to be suitable and competent to
provide care for the child((,)): PROVIDED, That if such relative or
other suitable person appears otherwise suitable and competent to
provide care and treatment, the fingerprint-based background check need
not be completed before placement, but as soon as possible after
placement. The department must not automatically disqualify a relative
or other suitable person based upon standards that are more extensive
than guidelines provided by the federal government in the adoption and
safe families act of 1997. The state and its officers, agents, and
employees may not be held criminally or civilly liable for a placement
decision under this subsection (1)(b)(ii)(B) unless the state or its
officers, agents, and employees acted with reckless disregard; or (C)
in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW.
(iii) The department may also consider placing the child, subject
to review and approval by the court, with a person with whom the
child's sibling or half-sibling is residing or a person who has adopted
the sibling or half-sibling of the child being placed as long as the
person has completed all required criminal history background checks
and otherwise appears to the department or supervising agency to be
competent to provide care for the child.
(2) Absent good cause, the department or supervising agency shall
follow the wishes of the natural parent regarding the placement of the
child in accordance with RCW 13.34.260.
(3) The department or supervising agency may only place a child
with a person not related to the child as defined in RCW
74.15.020(2)(a), including a placement provided for in subsection
(1)(b)(iii) of this section, when the court finds that such placement
is in the best interest of the child. Unless there is reasonable cause
to believe that the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that efforts to reunite the parent and child will be
hindered, the child shall be placed with a person who is willing,
appropriate, and available to care for the child, and who is: (I)
Related to the child as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) with whom the
child has a relationship and is comfortable; or (II) a suitable person
as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The court shall
consider the child's existing relationships and attachments when
determining placement.
(4) When placing an Indian child in out-of-home care, the
department or supervising agency shall follow the placement preference
characteristics in RCW 13.38.180.
(5) Placement of the child with a relative or other suitable person
as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be given
preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be
made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's
home and to make it possible for the child to return home, specifying
the services, including housing assistance, that have been provided to
the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and
that preventive services have been offered or provided and have failed
to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health,
safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the
home, and that:
(a) There is no parent or guardian available to care for such
child;
(b) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take
custody of the child; or
(c) The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a
manifest danger exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or
neglect if the child is not removed from the home and an order under
RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the child from danger.
(6) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court shall consider
whether it is in a child's best interest to be placed with, have
contact with, or have visits with siblings.
(a) There shall be a presumption that such placement, contact, or
visits are in the best interests of the child provided that:
(i) The court has jurisdiction over all siblings subject to the
order of placement, contact, or visitation pursuant to petitions filed
under this chapter or the parents of a child for whom there is no
jurisdiction are willing to agree; and
(ii) There is no reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of any child subject to the order of placement,
contact, or visitation would be jeopardized or that efforts to reunite
the parent and child would be hindered by such placement, contact, or
visitation. In no event shall parental visitation time be reduced in
order to provide sibling visitation.
(b) The court may also order placement, contact, or visitation of
a child with a stepbrother or stepsister provided that in addition to
the factors in (a) of this subsection, the child has a relationship and
is comfortable with the stepsibling.
(7) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section and placed into
nonparental or nonrelative care, the court shall order a placement that
allows the child to remain in the same school he or she attended prior
to the initiation of the dependency proceeding when such a placement is
practical and in the child's best interest.
(8) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that
a petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be
filed if the requirements of RCW 13.34.132 are met.
(9) If there is insufficient information at the time of the
disposition hearing upon which to base a determination regarding the
suitability of a proposed placement with a relative or other suitable
person, the child shall remain in foster care and the court shall
direct the department or supervising agency to conduct necessary
background investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report
the results of such investigation to the court within thirty days.
However, if such relative or other person appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment, the criminal history
background check need not be completed before placement, but as soon as
possible after placement. Any placements with relatives or other
suitable persons, pursuant to this section, shall be contingent upon
cooperation by the relative or other suitable person with the agency
case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders
regarding parent-child contacts, sibling contacts, and any other
conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance with the case plan or
court order shall be grounds for removal of the child from the
relative's or other suitable person's home, subject to review by the
court.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.842 and 2007 c 387 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary of social and health services and the
secretary of health shall adopt additional requirements for the
licensure or relicensure of agencies, facilities, and licensed
individuals who provide care and treatment to vulnerable adults,
including nursing pools registered under chapter 18.52C RCW. These
additional requirements shall ensure that any person associated with a
licensed agency or facility having unsupervised access with a
vulnerable adult shall not be the respondent in an active protective
order under RCW 74.34.130, nor have been: (i) Convicted of a crime
against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830, except as provided in this
section; (ii) convicted of crimes relating to financial exploitation as
defined in RCW 43.43.830, except as provided in this section; or (iii)
found in any disciplinary board final decision to have abused a
vulnerable adult under RCW 43.43.830.
(b) A person associated with a licensed agency or facility who has
unsupervised access with a vulnerable adult shall make the disclosures
specified in RCW 43.43.834(2). The person shall make the disclosures
in writing, sign, and swear to the contents under penalty of perjury.
The person shall, in the disclosures, specify all crimes against
children or other persons, all crimes relating to financial
exploitation, and all crimes relating to drugs as defined in RCW
43.43.830, committed by the person.
(2) The rules adopted under this section shall permit the licensee
to consider the criminal history of an applicant for employment in a
licensed facility when the applicant has one or more convictions for a
past offense and:
(a) The offense was simple assault, assault in the fourth degree,
or the same offense as it may be renamed, and three or more years have
passed between the most recent conviction and the date of application
for employment;
(b) The offense was prostitution, or the same offense as it may be
renamed, and three or more years have passed between the most recent
conviction and the date of application for employment;
(c) The offense was theft in the third degree, or the same offense
as it may be renamed, and three or more years have passed between the
most recent conviction and the date of application for employment;
(d) The offense was theft in the second degree, or the same offense
as it may be renamed, and five or more years have passed between the
most recent conviction and the date of application for employment;
(e) The offense was forgery, or the same offense as it may be
renamed, and five or more years have passed between the most recent
conviction and the date of application for employment;
(f) The department of social and health services reviewed the
employee's otherwise disqualifying criminal history through the
department of social and health services' background assessment review
team process conducted in 2002, and determined that such employee could
remain in a position covered by this section; or
(g) The otherwise disqualifying conviction or disposition has been
the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure.
The offenses set forth in (a) through (((e))) (g) of this
subsection do not automatically disqualify an applicant from employment
by a licensee. Nothing in this section may be construed to require the
employment of any person against a licensee's judgment.
(3) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary
of social and health services and the secretary of health shall
investigate, or cause to be investigated, the conviction record and the
protection proceeding record information under this chapter of the
staff of each agency or facility under their respective jurisdictions
seeking licensure or relicensure. An individual responding to a
criminal background inquiry request from his or her employer or
potential employer shall disclose the information about his or her
criminal history under penalty of perjury. The secretaries shall use
the information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for
licensure or relicensure. Criminal justice agencies shall provide the
secretaries such information as they may have and that the secretaries
may require for such purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.20A.710 and 2012 c 164 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall investigate the conviction records, pending
charges and disciplinary board final decisions of:
(a) Any current employee or applicant seeking or being considered
for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised
access to children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental
illness or developmental disabilities. This includes, but is not
limited to, positions conducting comprehensive assessments, financial
eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities,
investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions
otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards;
(b) Individual providers who are paid by the state and providers
who are paid by home care agencies to provide in-home services
involving unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or
developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services
provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW; and
(c) Individuals or businesses or organizations for the care,
supervision, case management, or treatment of children, persons with
developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults, including but not
limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20, 70.127, 70.128,
72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW.
(2) The secretary shall require a fingerprint-based background
check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau
of investigation as provided in RCW 43.43.837. Unless otherwise
authorized by law, the secretary shall use the information solely for
the purpose of determining the character, suitability, and competence
of the applicant.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, an
individual provider or home care agency provider who has resided in the
state less than three years before applying for employment involving
unsupervised access to a vulnerable adult as defined in chapter 74.34
RCW must be fingerprinted for the purpose of investigating conviction
records through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau
of investigation. This subsection applies only with respect to the
provision of in-home services funded by medicaid personal care under
RCW 74.09.520, community options program entry system waiver services
under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services under RCW 74.39A.110. However,
this subsection does not supersede RCW 74.15.030(2)(b).
(4) Long-term care workers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, who are
hired after January 7, 2012, are subject to background checks under RCW
74.39A.056, except that the department may require a background check
at any time under RCW 43.43.837. For the purposes of this subsection,
"background check" includes, but is not limited to, a fingerprint check
submitted for the purpose of investigating conviction records through
both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation.
(5) An individual provider or home care agency provider hired to
provide in-home care for and having unsupervised access to a vulnerable
adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must have no conviction for a
disqualifying crime under RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842. An individual
or home care agency provider must also have no conviction for a crime
relating to drugs as defined in RCW 43.43.830. This subsection applies
only with respect to the provision of in-home services funded by
medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520, community options program
entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services
under RCW 74.39A.110.
(6) The secretary shall provide the results of the state background
check on long-term care workers, including individual providers, to the
persons hiring them or to their legal guardians, if any, for their
determination of the character, suitability, and competence of the
applicants. If the person elects to hire or retain an individual
provider after receiving notice from the department that the applicant
has a conviction for an offense that would disqualify the applicant
from having unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or
developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, then the secretary shall deny payment
for any subsequent services rendered by the disqualified individual
provider.
(7) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such
information as they may have and that the secretary may require for
such purpose.
(8) Any person whose criminal history would otherwise disqualify
the person under this section from a position which will or may have
unsupervised access to children, vulnerable adults, or persons with
mental illness or developmental disabilities shall not be disqualified
if the department of social and health services reviewed the person's
otherwise disqualifying criminal history through the department of
social and health services' background assessment review team process
conducted in 2002 and determined that such person could remain in a
position covered by this section, or if the otherwise disqualifying
conviction or disposition has been the subject of a pardon, annulment,
or other equivalent procedure.

--- END ---