BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that at a time of
unlimited independent expenditures in elections, when special interests
have increasing influence over the outcomes of elections in the state
of Washington, more should be done to encourage a wider base of
political participation by facilitating small donations in political
campaigns and updating Washington state's campaign finance laws to
match new technologies.
The legislature finds that many individuals already make charitable
contributions via text messages for various causes. According to a
recent study by the Pew Charitable Trusts, more than thirty million
Americans have made a charitable contribution by text message.
The legislature also finds that increasing the number of
individuals who participate in the electoral process will result in a
stronger and more inclusive democracy.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to modernize
campaign contribution options and increase participation in the
election process by facilitating contributions via text message to
political campaigns.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17A.005 and 2011 c 145 s 2 and 2011 c 60 s 19 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency before its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has been recognized as a minor political
party by the secretary of state;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(8) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(9) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(10) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW
42.17A.100.
(11) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind. For the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17A.710,
"compensation" does not include per diem allowances or other payments
made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official
business of the governmental entity.
(12) "Connection aggregator" means a third party intermediary
between a wireless provider and a candidate or authorized committee
that receives and processes text messages by common short codes.
(13) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(((13))) (14)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this subsection, means services or labor for which
the individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17A.205; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(((13))) (14)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or
committee as long as he or she has no authority to authorize
expenditures or make decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(((14))) (15) "Depository" means a bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, or credit union doing business in this
state.
(((15))) (16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a
general or special election to any public office, and any person
appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.
(((16))) (17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special
election for public office and any election in which a ballot
proposition is submitted to the voters. An election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(((17))) (18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of
or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(((18))) (19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the
first day of January after the date of the last previous general
election for the office that the candidate seeks and ending on December
31st after the next election for the office. In the case of a special
election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the
period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December
31st after the special election.
(((19))) (20)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any
broadcast, cable, or satellite television or radio transmission, United
States postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical
that:
(i) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(ii) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(iii) Either alone, or in combination with one or more
communications identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the
sixty days before an election, has a fair market value of one thousand
dollars or more.
(b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(i) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(ii) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(iii) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(A) Of primary interest to the general public;
(B) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(C) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(iv) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(v) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(A) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (B) written about a candidate;
(vi) Public service announcements;
(vii) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited
to the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(viii) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized
committee of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(ix) Any other communication exempted by the commission through
rule consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(((20))) (21) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution,
subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or
anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement,
whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure.
"Expenditure" also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer
of anything of value in exchange for goods, services, property,
facilities, or anything of value for the purpose of assisting,
benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or assisting
in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of
this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises
to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is
made. "Expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete
repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(((21))) (22) "Final report" means the report described as a final
report in RCW 42.17A.235(2).
(((22))) (23) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405
means the election that results in the election of a person to a state
or local office. It does not include a primary.
(((23))) (24) "Gift" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.
(((24))) (25) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic
partner, dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living
in the household. For the purposes of the definition of "intermediary"
in this section, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse or
domestic partner, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the
individual and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person
and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse or domestic partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of
any such person.
(((25))) (26) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present
possession of an elected office.
(((26))) (27) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that
has each of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of eight hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under eight hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is eight hundred dollars or more.
(((27))) (28)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family,
or an association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((28))) (29) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((29))) (30) "Legislative office" means the office of a member of
the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the
state senate.
(((30))) (31) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((31))) (32) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((32))) (33) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((33))) (34) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried
out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise
of personal judgment or discretion.
(((34))) (35) "Participate" means that, with respect to a
particular election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate before contributions are made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed before a contribution is made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((35))) (36) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((36))) (37) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((37))) (38) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((38))) (39) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means
the procedure for nominating a candidate to state or local office under
chapter 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in
large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((39))) (40) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial,
county, city, town, school district, port district, special district,
or other state political subdivision elective office.
(((40))) (41) "Public record" has the definition in RCW 42.56.010.
(((41))) (42) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and
ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((42))) (43)(a) "Sponsor" for purposes of an electioneering
communications, independent expenditures, or political advertising
means the person paying for the electioneering communication,
independent expenditure, or political advertising. If a person acts as
an agent for another or is reimbursed by another for the payment, the
original source of the payment is the sponsor.
(b) "Sponsor," for purposes of a political committee, means any
person, except an authorized committee, to whom any of the following
applies:
(i) The committee receives eighty percent or more of its
contributions either from the person or from the person's members,
officers, employees, or shareholders;
(ii) The person collects contributions for the committee by use of
payroll deductions or dues from its members, officers, or employees.
(((43))) (44) "Sponsored committee" means a committee, other than
an authorized committee, that has one or more sponsors.
(((44))) (45) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((45))) (46) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((46))) (47) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate with respect to that election. In the case of
a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17A.255.
(((47))) (48) "Text message" means an electronic communication via
the short message service (SMS) that may only be sent and received
through a mobile device.
(49) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17A.210, to perform the duties specified in that section.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17A.125 and 2011 c 60 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the beginning of each even-numbered calendar year, the
commission shall increase or decrease the dollar amounts in RCW
42.17A.005(((26))) (27), 42.17A.405, 42.17A.410, 42.17A.445(3),
42.17A.475, and 42.17A.630(1) based on changes in economic conditions
as reflected in the inflationary index recommended by the office of
financial management. The new dollar amounts established by the
commission under this section ((shall)) must be rounded off to amounts
as judged most convenient for public understanding and so as to be
within ten percent of the target amount equal to the base amount
provided in this chapter multiplied by the increase in the inflationary
index since July 2008.
(2) The commission may revise, at least once every five years but
no more often than every two years, the monetary reporting thresholds
and reporting code values of this chapter. The revisions ((shall))
must be only for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as
reflected by an inflationary index recommended by the office of
financial management. The revisions ((shall)) must be guided by the
change in the index for the period commencing with the month of
December preceding the last revision and concluding with the month of
December preceding the month the revision is adopted. As to each of
the three general categories of this chapter, reports of campaign
finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and reports of the financial
affairs of elected and appointed officials, the revisions ((shall))
must equally affect all thresholds within each category. The revisions
authorized by this subsection ((shall)) must reflect economic changes
from the time of the last legislative enactment affecting the
respective code or threshold.
(3) Revisions made in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of
this section ((shall)) must be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.17A.220 and 2010 c 205 s 3 and 2010 c 204 s 405 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All monetary contributions received by a candidate or political
committee shall be deposited by the treasurer or deputy treasurer in a
depository in an account established and designated for that purpose.
Such deposits shall be made within five business days of receipt of the
contribution. A contribution via text message is received when the
candidate or political committee obtains actual possession of the
contribution.
(2) Political committees that support or oppose more than one
candidate or ballot proposition, or exist for more than one purpose,
may maintain multiple separate bank accounts within the same designated
depository for such purpose only if:
(a) Each such account bears the same name;
(b) Each such account is followed by an appropriate designation
that accurately identifies its separate purpose; and
(c) Transfers of funds that must be reported under RCW
42.17A.240(((1)(e))) (5) are not made from more than one such account.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a candidate or political
committee from investing funds on hand in a depository in bonds,
certificates, or tax-exempt securities, or in savings accounts or other
similar instruments in financial institutions, or in mutual funds other
than the depository but only if:
(a) The commission ((are [is])) is notified in writing of the
initiation and the termination of the investment; and
(b) The principal of such investment, when terminated together with
all interest, dividends, and income derived from the investment, is
deposited in the depository in the account from which the investment
was made and properly reported to the commission before any further
disposition or expenditure.
(4) Accumulated unidentified contributions, other than those made
by persons whose names must be maintained on a separate and private
list by a political committee's treasurer pursuant to RCW
42.17A.240(((1)(b))) (2), in excess of one percent of the total
accumulated contributions received in the current calendar year, or
three hundred dollars, whichever is more, may not be deposited, used,
or expended, but shall be returned to the donor if his or her identity
can be ascertained. If the donor cannot be ascertained, the
contribution shall escheat to the state and shall be paid to the state
treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.17A.235 and 2011 c 60 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the information required under RCW 42.17A.205
and 42.17A.210, on the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate
or political committee must file with the commission a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) Each treasurer shall file with the commission a report
containing the information required by RCW 42.17A.240 at the following
intervals:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held;
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section only if the committee has
received a contribution or made an expenditure in the preceding
calendar month and either the total contributions received or total
expenditures made since the last such report exceed two hundred
dollars.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of one
business day before the date of the report. The report filed seven
days before the election shall report all contributions received and
expenditures made as of the end of one business day before the date of
the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made from the closing date
of the last report filed through the last day of the month preceding
the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date of the special election, or for the period beginning
the first day of the fifth month before the date of the general
election, and ending on the date of that special or general election,
each Monday the treasurer shall file with the commission a report of
each bank deposit made during the previous seven calendar days. The
report shall contain the name of each person contributing the funds and
the amount contributed by each person. However, persons who contribute
no more than fifty dollars in the aggregate via text message or no more
than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate via other means are not
required to be identified in the report. A copy of the report shall be
retained by the treasurer for his or her records. In the event of
deposits made by a deputy treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded to the
treasurer for his or her records. Each report shall be certified as
correct by the treasurer or deputy treasurer making the deposit.
(4) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17A.205,
the books of account must be open for public inspection by appointment
at the designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m.
on any day from the eighth day immediately before the election through
the day immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday,
or a legal holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate
or political committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for
an inspection to be conducted during these authorized times and days.
The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for such
inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and day that
is requested for the inspection.
(5) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection by appointment, pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section, at the principal headquarters or, if
there is no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other
place as may be authorized by the commission.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects or in the
case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function and
has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there is no obligation to make any further reports.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.17A.240 and 2010 c 204 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each report required under RCW 42.17A.235 (1) and (2) must be
certified as correct by the treasurer and the candidate and ((shall))
must disclose the following:
(1) The funds on hand at the beginning of the period;
(2) The name and address of each person who has made one or more
contributions during the period, together with the money value and date
of each contribution and the aggregate value of all contributions
received from each person during the campaign, or in the case of a
continuing political committee, the current calendar year, with the
following exceptions:
(a) Pledges in the aggregate of less than one hundred dollars from
any one person need not be reported;
(b) Income that results from a fund-raising activity conducted in
accordance with RCW 42.17A.230 may be reported as one lump sum, with
the exception of that portion received from persons whose names and
addresses are required to be included in the report required by RCW
42.17A.230;
(c) Contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the
aggregate from any one person during the election campaign may be
reported as one lump sum if the treasurer maintains a separate and
private list of the name, address, and amount of each such contributor;
((and))
(d) Text message contributions processed in accordance with the
rules adopted under section 9 of this act may be reported as one lump
sum per reporting period if the treasurer maintains a separate and
private list of the account holder's name, phone number, and amount of
each such contributor; and
(e) The money value of contributions of postage shall be the face
value of the postage;
(3) Each loan, promissory note, or security instrument to be used
by or for the benefit of the candidate or political committee made by
any person, including the names and addresses of the lender and each
person liable directly, indirectly or contingently and the date and
amount of each such loan, promissory note, or security instrument;
(4) All other contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;
(5) The name and address of each candidate or political committee
to which any transfer of funds was made, including the amounts and
dates of the transfers;
(6) The name and address of each person to whom an expenditure was
made in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars during the
period covered by this report, the amount, date, and purpose of each
expenditure, and the total sum of all expenditures;
(7) The name and address of each person directly compensated for
soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative or referendum
petition, the amount of the compensation to each person, and the total
expenditures made for this purpose. Such expenditures shall be
reported under this subsection in addition to what is required to be
reported under subsection (6) of this section;
(8) The name and address of any person and the amount owed for any
debt, obligation, note, unpaid loan, or other liability in the amount
of more than two hundred fifty dollars or in the amount of more than
fifty dollars that has been outstanding for over thirty days;
(9) The surplus or deficit of contributions over expenditures;
(10) The disposition made in accordance with RCW 42.17A.430 of any
surplus funds; and
(11) Any other information required by the commission by rule in
conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.17A.405 and 2013 c 311 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The contribution limits in this section apply to:
(a) Candidates for legislative office;
(b) Candidates for state office other than legislative office;
(c) Candidates for county office;
(d) Candidates for special purpose district office if that district
is authorized to provide freight and passenger transfer and terminal
facilities and that district has over two hundred thousand registered
voters;
(e) Candidates for city council office;
(f) Candidates for mayoral office;
(g) Candidates for school board office;
(h) Candidates for public hospital district board of commissioners
in districts with a population over one hundred fifty thousand;
(i) Persons holding an office in (a) through (h) of this subsection
against whom recall charges have been filed or to a political committee
having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall
of a person holding the office;
(j) Caucus political committees;
(k) Bona fide political parties.
(2) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for a
legislative office, county office, city council office, mayoral office,
school board office, or public hospital district board of commissioners
that in the aggregate exceed eight hundred dollars or to a candidate
for a public office in a special purpose district or a state office
other than a legislative office that in the aggregate exceed one
thousand six hundred dollars for each election in which the candidate
is on the ballot or appears as a write-in candidate. Contributions to
candidates subject to the limits in this section made with respect to
a primary may not be made after the date of the primary. However,
contributions to a candidate or a candidate's authorized committee may
be made with respect to a primary until thirty days after the primary,
subject to the following limitations: (a) The candidate lost the
primary; (b) the candidate's authorized committee has insufficient
funds to pay debts outstanding as of the date of the primary; and (c)
the contributions may only be raised and spent to satisfy the
outstanding debt. Contributions to candidates subject to the limits in
this section made with respect to a general election may not be made
after the final day of the applicable election cycle.
(3) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a state official, a
county official, a city official, a school board member, a public
hospital district commissioner, or a public official in a special
purpose district against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a
political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in
support of the recall of the state official, county official, city
official, school board member, public hospital district commissioner,
or public official in a special purpose district during a recall
campaign that in the aggregate exceed eight hundred dollars if for a
legislative office, county office, school board office, public hospital
district office, or city office, or one thousand six hundred dollars if
for a special purpose district office or a state office other than a
legislative office.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a candidate during an election cycle that in the aggregate exceed (i)
eighty cents multiplied by the number of eligible registered voters in
the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor
is a caucus political committee or the governing body of a state
organization, or (ii) forty cents multiplied by the number of
registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is
elected if the contributor is a county central committee or a
legislative district committee.
(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed forty cents times the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a state official, county official, city official, school board member,
public hospital district commissioner, or a public official in a
special purpose district against whom recall charges have been filed,
or to a political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the state official, county official, city
official, school board member, public hospital district commissioner,
or a public official in a special purpose district during a recall
campaign that in the aggregate exceed (i) eighty cents multiplied by
the number of eligible registered voters in the jurisdiction entitled
to recall the state official if the contributor is a caucus political
committee or the governing body of a state organization, or (ii) forty
cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction
from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county
central committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No official holding an office specified in subsection (1) of
this section against whom recall charges have been filed, no authorized
committee of the official, and no political committee having the
expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the
official may accept contributions from a county central committee or a
legislative district committee during an election cycle that when
combined with contributions from other county central committees or
legislative district committees would in the aggregate exceed forty
cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction
from which the candidate is elected.
(6) For purposes of determining contribution limits under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the number of eligible
registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time of the
most recent general election in the jurisdiction.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section, no
person other than an individual, bona fide political party, or caucus
political committee may make contributions reportable under this
chapter to a caucus political committee that in the aggregate exceed
eight hundred dollars in a calendar year or to a bona fide political
party that in the aggregate exceed four thousand dollars in a calendar
year. This subsection does not apply to loans made in the ordinary
course of business.
(8) For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.125, 42.17A.405 through
42.17A.415, 42.17A.450 through 42.17A.495, 42.17A.500, 42.17A.560, and
42.17A.565, a contribution to the authorized political committee of a
candidate or of an official specified in subsection (1) of this section
against whom recall charges have been filed is considered to be a
contribution to the candidate or official.
(9) A contribution received within the twelve-month period after a
recall election concerning an office specified in subsection (1) of
this section is considered to be a contribution during that recall
campaign if the contribution is used to pay a debt or obligation
incurred to influence the outcome of that recall campaign.
(10) The contributions allowed by subsection (3) of this section
are in addition to those allowed by subsection (2) of this section, and
the contributions allowed by subsection (5) of this section are in
addition to those allowed by subsection (4) of this section.
(11) RCW 42.17A.125, 42.17A.405 through 42.17A.415, 42.17A.450
through 42.17A.495, 42.17A.500, 42.17A.560, and 42.17A.565 apply to a
special election conducted to fill a vacancy in an office specified in
subsection (1) of this section. However, the contributions made to a
candidate or received by a candidate for a primary or special election
conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not be counted toward any of the
limitations that apply to the candidate or to contributions made to the
candidate for any other primary or election.
(12) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
corporation or business entity not doing business in Washington state,
no labor union with fewer than ten members who reside in Washington
state, and no political committee that has not received contributions
of ten dollars or more from at least ten persons registered to vote in
Washington state during the preceding one hundred eighty days may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a state office
candidate, to a state official against whom recall charges have been
filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the recall of the official. This subsection
does not apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.
(13) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
county central committee or legislative district committee may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate specified in
subsection (1) of this section, or an official specified in subsection
(1) of this section against whom recall charges have been filed, or
political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in
support of the recall of an official specified in subsection (1) of
this section if the county central committee or legislative district
committee is outside of the jurisdiction entitled to elect the
candidate or recall the official.
(14) No person may accept contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations provided in this section.
(15) The following contributions are exempt from the contribution
limits of this section:
(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter
registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses,
for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for
sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or
political advertising for individual candidates;
(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal
organization or fund-raising without direct association with individual
candidates; ((or))
(c) An expenditure or contribution for independent expenditures as
defined in RCW 42.17A.005 or electioneering communications as defined
in RCW 42.17A.005; or
(d) A contribution made via text message made in accordance with
rules adopted under section 9 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17A.410 and 2010 c 204 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person may make contributions to a candidate for judicial
office that in the aggregate exceed one thousand six hundred dollars
for each election in which the candidate is on the ballot or appears as
a write-in candidate. Contributions made with respect to a primary may
not be made after the date of the primary. However, contributions to
a candidate or a candidate's authorized committee may be made with
respect to a primary until thirty days after the primary, subject to
the following limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the
candidate's authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts
outstanding as of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions
may only be raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt.
Contributions made with respect to a general election may not be made
after the final day of the applicable election cycle.
(2) This section through RCW 42.17A.490 apply to a special election
conducted to fill a vacancy in an office. However, the contributions
made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a primary or special
election conducted to fill such a vacancy will not be counted toward
any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or to contributions
made to the candidate for any other primary or election.
(3) No person may accept contributions that exceed the contribution
limitations provided in this section.
(4) A contribution made via text message made in accordance with
rules adopted under section 9 of this act is exempt from the
contribution limits provided in this section.
(5) The dollar limits in this section must be adjusted according to
RCW 42.17A.125.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 31, 2015, the commission must adopt rules regarding
contributions made to campaigns via text message. The rules regarding
contributions received via text message must include provisions that,
at a minimum, require the following:
(a) After a contributor has initiated a contribution via text
message, the connection aggregator is required to send an opt-in
disclosure notice to the contributor that must be affirmatively
responded to by the contributor to complete the transaction. The opt-in disclosure notice must ask the contributor to affirmatively agree
with the following statements:
(i) I am a United States citizen or lawfully permanent resident of
the United States and will be at least eighteen years old by election
day;
(ii) I am an authorized user of this account and I have not
contributed more than fifty dollars via text message to this campaign;
and
(iii) This contribution is made from me as an individual and is not
made from funds from a corporation, labor organization, bank, or
political action committee;
(b) No individual may make and no individual or political committee
may accept any contribution made via text message that exceeds ten
dollars;
(c) A candidate's authorized committee may not accept more than
fifty dollars in contributions through text message from an individual
phone number per election cycle;
(d) Political committees organized in support of or in opposition
to a given ballot proposition may not accept more than fifty dollars in
contributions via text message from an individual phone number per
election campaign;
(e) A continuing political committee may not accept more than fifty
dollars in contributions via text message from an individual phone
number per calendar year; and
(f) All contributions received via text message are subject to
disclosure to the commission under RCW 42.17A.235(3) and
42.17A.240(2)(d).
(2) A candidate, the candidate's authorized committee, or a
political committee organized in support of or in opposition to a
ballot proposition may enter into an agreement with the connection
aggregator on terms that are consistent with the ordinary course of
business.
(3) A candidate or authorized committee must receive all text
message contributions through a single common short code per election
cycle.
(4) A political committee organized in support of or in opposition
to a ballot proposition must receive all text message contributions
through a single common short code per election campaign.
(5) A continuing political committee must receive all text message
contributions through a single common short code per calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 8 of this act take
effect January 31, 2015.

--- END ---