BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the public has
the right to know who is contributing to election campaigns in
Washington state and that campaign finance disclosure deters
corruption, increases public confidence in Washington state elections,
and strengthens our representative democracy.
The legislature finds that campaign finance disclosure is
overwhelmingly supported by the citizens of Washington state as
evidenced by the two initiatives that largely established Washington's
current campaign finance system. Both passed with over seventy-two
percent of the popular vote, as well as winning margins in every county
in the state.
The legislature finds that nonprofit organizations are increasingly
engaging in campaign activities in Washington state and across the
country, including taking a more active role in contributing to
candidate and ballot proposition campaigns. In some cases, these
activities are occurring without adequate public disclosure due to
loopholes in campaign finance regulations.
Therefore, the legislature intends to increase transparency and
accountability, deter corruption, and strengthen confidence in the
election process by closing campaign finance disclosure loopholes and
requiring the disclosure of contributions and expenditures by nonprofit
organizations that participate significantly in Washington state
elections.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17A.005 and 2011 c 145 s 2 and 2011 c 60 s 19 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency before its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has been recognized as a minor political
party by the secretary of state;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(8) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(9) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(10) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW
42.17A.100.
(11) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind. For the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17A.710,
"compensation" does not include per diem allowances or other payments
made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official
business of the governmental entity.
(12) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(13)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this subsection, means services or labor for which
the individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17A.205; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(13)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or committee as
long as he or she has no authority to authorize expenditures or make
decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(14) "Depository" means a bank, mutual savings bank, savings and
loan association, or credit union doing business in this state.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters. An election in which the qualifications for
voting include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI,
section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington
((shall)) is not ((be)) considered an election for purposes of this
chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of January after the date of the last previous general election for the
office that the candidate seeks and ending on December 31st after the
next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December 31st
after the special election.
(19)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable,
or satellite television or radio transmission, United States postal
service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(i) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office or a ballot proposition either by specifically naming the
candidate or ballot proposition, or identifying the candidate without
using the candidate's name;
(ii) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within ((sixty)) ninety days before any election
for that office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking
election, during the period between the primary and general elections
for that office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking
election, or ninety days before the election in which the ballot
proposition will appear on the ballot; and
(iii) Either alone, or in combination with one or more
communications identifying the candidate or ballot proposition by the
same sponsor during the ((sixty)) ninety days before an election or, if
the communications refer to a candidate, during the ninety days before
an election period between the primary and general elections, has a
fair market value of one thousand dollars or more.
(b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(i) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(ii) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(iii) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(A) Of primary interest to the general public;
(B) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(C) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(iv) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(v) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(A) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (B) written about a candidate;
(vi) Public service announcements;
(vii) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited
to the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(viii) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized
committee of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(ix) Any other communication exempted by the commission through
rule consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(20) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. "Expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made.
"Expenditure" ((shall)) does not include the partial or complete
repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(21) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17A.235(2).
(22) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means
the election that results in the election of a person to a state or
local office. It does not include a primary.
(23) "Gift" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.
(24) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic partner,
dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the
household. For the purposes of the definition of "intermediary" in
this section, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse or
domestic partner, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the
individual and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person
and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse or domestic partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of
any such person.
(25)(a) "Incidental committee" means a person, except a candidate
or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property, not
otherwise classified as a political committee but that may incidentally
become a political committee by making a contribution or an expenditure
in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot
proposition in Washington, directly or through another political
committee.
(b) "Incidental committee" may include, but is not limited to, any
organization under section 501(c) or 527 of the internal revenue code
of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the
United States, as amended from time to time.
(26) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an
elected office.
(((26))) (27) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that
has each of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of eight hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under eight hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is eight hundred dollars or more.
(((27))) (28)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family,
or an association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((28))) (29) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((29))) (30) "Legislative office" means the office of a member of
the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the
state senate.
(((30))) (31) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((31))) (32) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((32))) (33) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((33))) (34) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried
out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise
of personal judgment or discretion.
(((34))) (35) "Participate" means that, with respect to a
particular election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate before contributions are made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed before a contribution is made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((35))) (36) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((36))) (37) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((37))) (38) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property), organized or located inside or outside the state, having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition
in Washington. "Political committee" includes incidental committees as
defined in this section.
(((38))) (39) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means
the procedure for nominating a candidate to state or local office under
chapter 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in
large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((39))) (40) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial,
county, city, town, school district, port district, special district,
or other state political subdivision elective office.
(((40))) (41) "Public record" has the definition in RCW 42.56.010.
(((41))) (42) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and
ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((42))) (43)(a) "Sponsor" for purposes of an electioneering
communications, independent expenditures, or political advertising
means the person paying for the electioneering communication,
independent expenditure, or political advertising. If a person acts as
an agent for another or is reimbursed by another for the payment, the
original source of the payment is the sponsor.
(b) "Sponsor," for purposes of a political committee, means any
person, except an authorized committee, to whom any of the following
applies:
(i) The committee receives eighty percent or more of its
contributions either from the person or from the person's members,
officers, employees, or shareholders;
(ii) The person collects contributions for the committee by use of
payroll deductions or dues from its members, officers, or employees.
(((43))) (44) "Sponsored committee" means a committee, other than
an authorized committee, that has one or more sponsors.
(((44))) (45) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((45))) (46) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((46))) (47) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate with respect to that election. In the case of
a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17A.255.
(((47))) (48) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the
individuals appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant
to RCW 42.17A.210, to perform the duties specified in that section.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17A.125 and 2011 c 60 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the beginning of each even-numbered calendar year, the
commission shall increase or decrease the dollar amounts in RCW
42.17A.005(((26))) (27), 42.17A.405, 42.17A.410, 42.17A.445(3),
42.17A.475, and 42.17A.630(1) based on changes in economic conditions
as reflected in the inflationary index recommended by the office of
financial management. The new dollar amounts established by the
commission under this section ((shall)) must be rounded off to amounts
as judged most convenient for public understanding and so as to be
within ten percent of the target amount equal to the base amount
provided in this chapter multiplied by the increase in the inflationary
index since July 2008.
(2) The commission may revise, at least once every five years but
no more often than every two years, the monetary reporting thresholds
and reporting code values of this chapter. The revisions ((shall))
must be only for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as
reflected by an inflationary index recommended by the office of
financial management. The revisions ((shall)) must be guided by the
change in the index for the period commencing with the month of
December preceding the last revision and concluding with the month of
December preceding the month the revision is adopted. As to each of
the three general categories of this chapter, reports of campaign
finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and reports of the financial
affairs of elected and appointed officials, the revisions shall equally
affect all thresholds within each category. The revisions authorized
by this subsection ((shall)) must reflect economic changes from the
time of the last legislative enactment affecting the respective code or
threshold.
(3) Revisions made in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of
this section ((shall)) must be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.17A.205 and 2011 c 145 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every political committee except for incidental committees
shall file a statement of organization with the commission. The
statement must be filed within two weeks after organization or within
two weeks after the date the committee first has the expectation of
receiving contributions or making expenditures in any election
campaign, whichever is earlier.
(b) A political committee other than an incidental committee
organized within the last three weeks before an election and having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures during
and for that election campaign shall file a statement of organization
within three business days after its organization or when it first has
the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
the election campaign.
(2)(a) An incidental committee must file a statement of
organization with the commission within two weeks after the effective
date of this section or two weeks after the date the committee first
has the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures
of at least the following amounts: One hundred thousand dollars in an
election campaign for statewide office or a statewide ballot
proposition in Washington or twenty thousand dollars in any other
election campaign in Washington.
(b) If, in the last three weeks before an election, an incidental
committee first has the expectation of receiving contributions or
making expenditures of the amounts specified in (a) of this subsection
or greater, then it must file a statement of organization within three
business days.
(c) An incidental committee that does not receive contributions or
make expenditures in the amounts specified in (a) of this subsection is
not required to file a statement of organization with the commission.
(3) The statement of organization shall include but not be limited
to:
(a) The name and address of the committee;
(b) The names and addresses of all related or affiliated committees
or other persons, and the nature of the relationship or affiliation;
(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers; or if it has
no officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible
leaders;
(d) The name and address of its treasurer and depository;
(e) A statement whether the committee is a continuing one;
(f) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each
candidate whom the committee is supporting or opposing, and, if the
committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the
party;
(g) The ballot proposition concerned, if any, and whether the
committee is in favor of or opposed to such proposition;
(h) What distribution of surplus funds will be made, in accordance
with RCW 42.17A.430, in the event of dissolution;
(i) The street address of the place and the hours during which the
committee will make available for public inspection its books of
account and all reports filed in accordance with RCW 42.17A.235;
(j) Such other information as the commission may by regulation
prescribe, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter;
(k) The name, address, and title of any person who authorizes
expenditures or makes decisions on behalf of the candidate or
committee; and
(l) The name, address, and title of any person who is paid by or is
a volunteer for a candidate or political committee to perform
ministerial functions and who performs ministerial functions on behalf
of two or more candidates or committees.
(((3))) (4) No two political committees may have the same name.
(((4))) (5) Any material change in information previously submitted
in a statement of organization shall be reported to the commission
within the ten days following the change.
(((5))) (6) As used in this section, the "name" of a sponsored
committee must include the name of the person that is the sponsor of
the committee. If more than one person meets the definition of
sponsor, the name of the committee must include the name of at least
one sponsor, but may include the names of other sponsors. A person may
sponsor only one political committee for the same elected office or
same ballot measure per election cycle.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.17A.220 and 2010 c 205 s 3 and 2010 c 204 s 405 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All monetary contributions received by a candidate or political
committee ((shall)) must be deposited by the treasurer or deputy
treasurer in a depository in an account established and designated for
that purpose. Such deposits ((shall)) must be made within five
business days of receipt of the contribution.
(2) Political committees that support or oppose more than one
candidate or ballot proposition, or exist for more than one purpose,
may maintain multiple separate bank accounts within the same designated
depository for such purpose only if:
(a) Each such account bears the same name;
(b) Each such account is followed by an appropriate designation
that accurately identifies its separate purpose; and
(c) Transfers of funds that must be reported under RCW
42.17A.240(((1)(e))) (5) are not made from more than one such account.
(3) Incidental committees may maintain separate bank accounts
within the same depository for contributions to the committee that are
designated by the contributor as not to be used in support of or
opposition to a candidate or ballot proposition so that those
contributions do not need to be reported to the commission under RCW
42.17A.240(2)(d).
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a candidate or political
committee from investing funds on hand in a depository in bonds,
certificates, or tax-exempt securities, or in savings accounts or other
similar instruments in financial institutions, or in mutual funds other
than the depository but only if:
(a) The commission ((are [is])) is notified in writing of the
initiation and the termination of the investment; and
(b) The principal of such investment, when terminated together with
all interest, dividends, and income derived from the investment, is
deposited in the depository in the account from which the investment
was made and properly reported to the commission before any further
disposition or expenditure.
(((4))) (5) Accumulated unidentified contributions, other than
those made by persons whose names must be maintained on a separate and
private list by a political committee's treasurer pursuant to RCW
42.17A.240(((1)(b))) (2), in excess of one percent of the total
accumulated contributions received in the current calendar year, or
three hundred dollars, whichever is more, may not be deposited, used,
or expended, but ((shall)) must be returned to the donor if his or her
identity can be ascertained. If the donor cannot be ascertained, the
contribution ((shall)) escheats to the state and ((shall)) must be paid
to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.17A.235 and 2011 c 60 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the information required under RCW 42.17A.205
and 42.17A.210, on the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate
or political committee must file with the commission a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) Each treasurer of a political committee or incidental committee
required to file a statement of organization under RCW 42.17A.205 shall
file with the commission a report containing the information required
by RCW 42.17A.240 at the following intervals:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held;
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section only if the committee has
received a contribution or made an expenditure in the preceding
calendar month and either the total contributions received or total
expenditures made since the last such report exceed two hundred
dollars.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of one
business day before the date of the report. The report filed seven
days before the election shall report all contributions received and
expenditures made as of the end of one business day before the date of
the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made from the closing date
of the last report filed through the last day of the month preceding
the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date of the special election, or for the period beginning
the first day of the fifth month before the date of the general
election, and ending on the date of that special or general election,
each Monday the treasurer shall file with the commission a report of
each bank deposit made during the previous seven calendar days. The
report shall contain the name of each person contributing the funds and
the amount contributed by each person. However, persons who contribute
no more than twenty-five dollars in the aggregate are not required to
be identified in the report. A copy of the report shall be retained by
the treasurer for his or her records. In the event of deposits made by
a deputy treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded to the treasurer for
his or her records. Each report shall be certified as correct by the
treasurer or deputy treasurer making the deposit.
(4) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17A.205,
the books of account must be open for public inspection by appointment
at the designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m.
on any day from the eighth day immediately before the election through
the day immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday,
or a legal holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate
or political committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for
an inspection to be conducted during these authorized times and days.
The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for such
inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and day that
is requested for the inspection.
(5) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection by appointment, pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section, at the principal headquarters or, if
there is no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other
place as may be authorized by the commission.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects or in the
case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function and
has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there is no obligation to make any further reports.
(9) By December 31, 2014, the commission shall adopt rules for the
dissolution of incidental committees.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.17A.240 and 2010 c 204 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each report required under RCW 42.17A.235 (1) and (2) must be
certified as correct by the treasurer and the candidate and shall
disclose the following:
(1) The funds on hand at the beginning of the period;
(2) The name and address of each person who has made one or more
contributions during the period, together with the money value and date
of each contribution and the aggregate value of all contributions
received from each person during the campaign, or in the case of a
continuing political committee, the current calendar year, with the
following exceptions:
(a) Pledges in the aggregate of less than one hundred dollars from
any one person need not be reported;
(b) Income that results from a fund-raising activity conducted in
accordance with RCW 42.17A.230 may be reported as one lump sum, with
the exception of that portion received from persons whose names and
addresses are required to be included in the report required by RCW
42.17A.230;
(c) Contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the
aggregate from any one person during the election campaign may be
reported as one lump sum if the treasurer maintains a separate and
private list of the name, address, and amount of each such contributor;
((and))
(d) Contributions to an incidental committee that satisfy all of
the following requirements need not be reported:
(i) The contribution is designated by the contributor as not to be
used for campaign purposes;
(ii) The contribution is maintained in a separate bank account from
any accounts used to receive contributions or make expenditures in
support of or opposition to a candidate or ballot proposition; and
(iii) The contribution is not commingled with any bank accounts
used to receive contributions or make expenditures in support of or
opposition to a candidate or ballot proposition;
(e) The commission may suspend or modify reporting requirements for
contributions to an incidental committee in cases of manifestly
unreasonable hardship under RCW 42.17A.120; and
(f) The money value of contributions of postage ((shall be)) is the
face value of the postage;
(3) Each loan, promissory note, or security instrument to be used
by or for the benefit of the candidate or political committee made by
any person, including the names and addresses of the lender and each
person liable directly, indirectly or contingently and the date and
amount of each such loan, promissory note, or security instrument;
(4) All other contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;
(5) The name and address of each candidate or political committee
to which any transfer of funds was made, including the amounts and
dates of the transfers;
(6) The name and address of each person to whom an expenditure was
made in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars during the
period covered by this report, the amount, date, and purpose of each
expenditure, and the total sum of all expenditures;
(7) The name and address of each person directly compensated for
soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative or referendum
petition, the amount of the compensation to each person, and the total
expenditures made for this purpose. Such expenditures ((shall)) must
be reported under this subsection in addition to what is required to be
reported under subsection (6) of this section;
(8) The name and address of any person and the amount owed for any
debt, obligation, note, unpaid loan, or other liability in the amount
of more than two hundred fifty dollars or in the amount of more than
fifty dollars that has been outstanding for over thirty days;
(9) The surplus or deficit of contributions over expenditures;
(10) The disposition made in accordance with RCW 42.17A.430 of any
surplus funds; and
(11) Any other information required by the commission by rule in
conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17A.250 and 2010 c 204 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) An out-of-state)) A political committee ((organized for the
purpose of supporting or opposing candidates or ballot propositions in
another state that is not otherwise required to report under RCW
42.17A.205 through 42.17A.240 shall report as required in this section
when it makes an expenditure supporting or opposing a Washington state
candidate or political committee. The committee shall file with the
commission a statement disclosing:
(a) Its name and address;
(b) The purposes of the out-of-state committee;
(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers or, if it has
no officers, the names, addresses, and the titles of its responsible
leaders;
(d) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each
candidate in the state of Washington whom the out-of-state committee is
supporting or opposing and, if the committee is supporting or opposing
the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;
(e) The ballot proposition supported or opposed in the state of
Washington, if any, and whether the committee is in favor of or opposed
to that proposition;
(f) The name and address of each person residing in the state of
Washington or corporation that has a place of business in the state of
Washington who has made one or more contributions in the aggregate of
more than twenty-five dollars to the out-of-state committee during the
current calendar year, together with the money value and date of the
contributions;
(g) The name, address, and employer of each person or corporation
residing outside the state of Washington who has made one or more
contributions in the aggregate of more than two thousand five hundred
fifty dollars to the out-of-state committee during the current calendar
year, together with the money value and date of the contributions.
Annually, the commission must modify the two thousand five hundred
fifty dollar limit in this subsection based on percentage change in the
implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the
United States as published for the most recent twelve-month period by
the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce;
(h) The name and address of each person in the state of Washington
to whom an expenditure was made by the out-of-state committee with
respect to a candidate or political committee in the aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars, the amount, date, and purpose of the
expenditure, and the total sum of the expenditures; and
(i) Any other information as the commission may prescribe by rule
in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter.
(2) Each statement shall be filed no later than the tenth day of
the month following any month in which a contribution or other
expenditure reportable under subsection (1) of this section is made.
An out-of-state committee incurring an obligation to file additional
statements in a calendar year may satisfy the obligation by timely
filing reports that supplement previously filed information)) or
incidental committee organized outside the state of Washington is
subject to the same requirements under this chapter as a political
committee or incidental committee organized in the state of Washington.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.17A.300 and 2010 c 204 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Timely disclosure to voters of the identity and sources of
funding for electioneering communications is vitally important to the
integrity of ((state, local, and judicial)) elections.
(b) Electioneering communications that identify political
candidates for state, local, or judicial office or ballot propositions,
and that are distributed ((sixty)) ninety days before an election ((for
those offices)) or, in candidate elections, in the ninety days before
an election or the period between the primary and general elections are
intended to influence voters and the outcome of those elections.
(c) The state has a compelling interest in providing voters
information about electioneering communications in political campaigns
((concerning candidates for state, local, or judicial office)) so that
voters can be fully informed as to the: (i) Source of support or
opposition to those candidates or propositions; and (ii) identity of
persons attempting to influence the outcome of ((state, local, and
judicial candidate)) elections.
(d) Nondisclosure of financial information about advertising that
masquerades as relating only to issues and not to candidate campaigns
fosters corruption or the appearance of corruption. These consequences
can be substantially avoided by full disclosure of the identity and
funding of those persons paying for such advertising.
(e) The United States supreme court held in McConnell et al. v.
Federal Elections Commission, 540 U.S. 93, 124 S.Ct. 619, 157 L.Ed.2d
491 (2003) that speakers seeking to influence elections do not possess
an inviolable free speech right to engage in electioneering
communications regarding elections, including when issue advocacy is
the functional equivalent of express advocacy. Therefore, such
election campaign communications can be regulated and the source of
funding disclosed.
(f) The state has a sufficiently compelling interest in preventing
corruption in political campaigns to justify and restore contribution
limits and restrictions on the use of soft money in RCW 42.17A.405.
Those interests include restoring restrictions on the use of such funds
for electioneering communications, as well as the laws preventing
circumvention of those limits and restrictions.
(2) Based upon the findings in this section, chapter 445, Laws of
2005 is narrowly tailored to accomplish the following and is intended
to:
(a) Improve the disclosure to voters of information concerning
persons and entities seeking to influence state, local, and judicial
campaigns through reasonable and effective mechanisms, including
improving disclosure of the source, identity, and funding of
electioneering communications concerning state, local, and judicial
candidate campaigns;
(b) Regulate electioneering communications that mention state,
local, and judicial candidates and that are broadcast, mailed, erected,
distributed, or otherwise published right before the election so that
the public knows who is paying for such communications;
(c) Reenact and amend the contribution limits in RCW 42.17A.405 (7)
and (15) and the restrictions on the use of soft money, including as
applied to electioneering communications, as those limits and
restrictions were in effect following the passage of chapter 2, Laws of
1993 (Initiative Measure No. 134) and before the state supreme court
decision in Washington State Republican Party v. Washington State
Public Disclosure Commission, 141 Wn.2d 245, 4 P.3d 808 (2000). The
commission is authorized to fully restore the implementation of the
limits and restrictions of RCW 42.17A.405 (7) and (15) in light of
McConnell et al. v. Federal Elections Commission, 540 U.S. 93, 124
S.Ct. 619, 157 L.Ed.2d 491 (2003). The United States supreme court
upheld the disclosure and regulation of electioneering communications
in political campaigns, including but not limited to issue advocacy
that is the functional equivalent of express advocacy; and
(d) Authorize the commission to adopt rules to implement chapter
445, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---