BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.105D.170 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 28 s 1, 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 19 s 7042, and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 991 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The environmental legacy stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Beginning July 1, 2013, and every fiscal year
thereafter, the annual amount received from the tax imposed by RCW
82.21.030 that exceeds one hundred forty million dollars must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account. The state
treasurer may make periodic deposits into the environmental legacy
stewardship account based on forecasted revenue. Moneys in the account
may only be spent after appropriation.
(2) Subject to RCW 46.68.070, moneys in the environmental legacy
stewardship account may be spent on:
(a) Grants or loans to local governments for performance and
outcome-based projects, model remedies, demonstration projects,
procedures, contracts, and project management and oversight that result
in significant reductions in the time to complete compared to baseline
averages;
(b) Purposes authorized under RCW 70.105D.070 (3) and (4);
(c) Grants or loans awarded through a competitive grant program
administered by the department to fund design and construction of low-impact development retrofit projects and other high quality projects
that reduce storm water pollution from existing infrastructure. The
competitive grant program must apply criteria to review, rank, and
prioritize projects for funding based on their water quality benefits,
ecological benefits, and effectiveness at reducing environmental
degradation; ((and))
(d) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment; and
(e) Storm water permit compliance activities at the department of
transportation.
(3) Except as provided under RCW 70.105D.070(3) (k) and (q),
nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. expands the ability of
a potentially liable person to receive public funding.
(4) Subject to RCW 46.68.070, moneys in the environmental legacy
stewardship account may also be used as follows:
(a) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, shoreline update technical
assistance and for local government shoreline master program update
grants;
(b) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, solid and hazardous waste
compliance at the department of corrections;
(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, activities at the
department of fish and wildlife concerning water quality monitoring,
hatchery water quality regulatory compliance, and technical assistance
to local governments on growth management and shoreline management;
(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, forest practices
regulation and aquatic land investigation and cleanup activities at the
department of natural resources.
(5) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the environmental
legacy stewardship account may be transferred to the local toxics
control account.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.68.070 and 1972 ex.s. c 103 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created in the state treasury a permanent fund to be
known as the motor vehicle fund to the credit of which shall be
deposited all moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This
fund shall be for the use of the state, and through state agencies, for
the use of counties, cities, and towns for proper road, street, and
highway purposes, including the purposes of RCW 47.30.030.
(2)(a) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer
shall annually transfer five million dollars from the environmental
legacy stewardship account to the motor vehicle fund to be used solely
for the purposes identified in RCW 70.105D.170(2)(e).
(b) Beginning July 1, 2017, the state treasurer shall annually
transfer thirty million dollars from the environmental legacy
stewardship account to the motor vehicle fund to be used solely for the
purposes identified in RCW 70.105D.170(2)(e).

--- END ---