BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.267 and 2013 c 332 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to facilitate the delivery of extended foster care
services, the court, upon the agreement of the youth to participate in
the extended foster care program, shall maintain the dependency
proceeding for any youth who is dependent in foster care at the age of
eighteen years and who, at the time of his or her eighteenth birthday,
is:
(a) Enrolled in a secondary education program or a secondary
education equivalency program;
(b) Enrolled and participating in a postsecondary academic or
postsecondary vocational program, or has applied for and can
demonstrate that he or she intends to timely enroll in a postsecondary
academic or postsecondary vocational program; ((or))
(c) Participating in a program or activity designed to promote
employment or remove barriers to employment;
(d) Engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month; or
(e) Not able to engage in any of the activities described in (a)
through (d) of this subsection due to a documented medical condition.
(2) If the court maintains the dependency proceeding of a youth
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the youth is eligible to
receive extended foster care services pursuant to RCW 74.13.031,
subject to the youth's continuing eligibility and agreement to
participate.
(3) A dependent youth receiving extended foster care services is a
party to the dependency proceeding. The youth's parent or guardian
must be dismissed from the dependency proceeding when the youth reaches
the age of eighteen.
(4) The court shall dismiss the dependency proceeding for any youth
who is a dependent in foster care and who, at the age of eighteen
years, does not meet any of the criteria described in subsection (1)(a)
through (((c))) (e) of this section or does not agree to participate in
the program.
(5) The court shall order a youth participating in extended foster
care services to be under the placement and care authority of the
department, subject to the youth's continuing agreement to participate
in extended foster care services. The department may establish foster
care rates appropriate to the needs of the youth participating in
extended foster care services. The department's placement and care
authority over a youth receiving extended foster care services is
solely for the purpose of providing services and does not create a
legal responsibility for the actions of the youth receiving extended
foster care services.
(6) The court shall appoint counsel to represent a youth, as
defined in RCW 13.34.030(2)(b), in dependency proceedings under this
section.
(7) The case plan for and delivery of services to a youth receiving
extended foster care services is subject to the review requirements set
forth in RCW 13.34.138 and 13.34.145, and should be applied in a
developmentally appropriate manner, as they relate to youth age
eighteen to twenty-one years. Additionally, the court shall consider:
(a) Whether the youth is safe in his or her placement;
(b) Whether the youth continues to be eligible for extended foster
care services;
(c) Whether the current placement is developmentally appropriate
for the youth;
(d) The youth's development of independent living skills; and
(e) The youth's overall progress toward transitioning to full
independence and the projected date for achieving such transition.
(8) Prior to the review hearing, the youth's attorney shall
indicate whether there are any contested issues and may provide
additional information necessary for the court's review.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.020 and 2013 c 332 s 8 and 2013 c 162 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Case management" means convening family meetings, developing,
revising, and monitoring implementation of any case plan or individual
service and safety plan, coordinating and monitoring services needed by
the child and family, caseworker-child visits, family visits, and the
assumption of court-related duties, excluding legal representation,
including preparing court reports, attending judicial hearings and
permanency hearings, and ensuring that the child is progressing toward
permanency within state and federal mandates, including the Indian
child welfare act.
(2) "Child" means:
(a) A person less than eighteen years of age; or
(b) A person age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to
receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW
74.13.031.
(3) "Child protective services" has the same meaning as in RCW
26.44.020.
(4) "Child welfare services" means social services including
voluntary and in-home services, out-of-home care, case management, and
adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or substitute for,
parental care and supervision for the purpose of:
(a) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of
problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect,
abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;
(b) Protecting and caring for dependent, abused, or neglected
children;
(c) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and
assisting parents who are in conflict with their children, with
services designed to resolve such conflicts;
(d) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the
strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;
(e) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in
foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or
facilities.
"Child welfare services" does not include child protection
services.
(5) "Committee" means the child welfare transformation design
committee.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other
support services the department is authorized to provide to foster
children. These services include, but are not limited to, placement in
licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised
independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs;
independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or
treatment.
(8) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child
safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths
and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family
assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse
or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to
address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent
maltreatment.
(9) "Measurable effects" means a statistically significant change
which occurs as a result of the service or services a supervising
agency is assigned in a performance-based contract, in time periods
established in the contract.
(10) "Medical condition" means, for the purposes of qualifying for
extended foster care services, a short-term or long-term physical or
mental health condition as verified and documented by any licensed
health care provider regulated by a disciplining authority under RCW
18.130.040.
(11) "Nonminor dependent" means any individual age eighteen to
twenty-one years who is participating in extended foster care services
authorized under RCW 74.13.031.
(((11))) (12) "Out-of-home care services" means services provided
after the shelter care hearing to or for children in out-of-home care,
as that term is defined in RCW 13.34.030, and their families, including
the recruitment, training, and management of foster parents, the
recruitment of adoptive families, and the facilitation of the adoption
process, family reunification, independent living, emergency shelter,
residential group care, and foster care, including relative placement.
(((12))) (13) "Performance-based contracting" means the structuring
of all aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the
work to be performed and the desired results with the contract
requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with
measurable outcomes. Contracts shall also include provisions that link
the performance of the contractor to the level and timing of
reimbursement.
(((13))) (14) "Permanency services" means long-term services
provided to secure a child's safety, permanency, and well-being,
including foster care services, family reunification services, adoption
services, and preparation for independent living services.
(((14))) (15) "Primary prevention services" means services which
are designed and delivered for the primary purpose of enhancing child
and family well-being and are shown, by analysis of outcomes, to reduce
the risk to the likelihood of the initial need for child welfare
services.
(((15))) (16) "Supervised independent living" includes, but is not
limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or
university dormitories, and shared roommate settings. Supervised
independent living settings must be approved by the children's
administration or the court.
(((16))) (17) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian
tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into
a performance-based contract with the department to provide case
management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare
services, as defined in this section. This definition is applicable on
or after December 30, 2015.
(((17))) (18) "Unsupervised" has the same meaning as in RCW
43.43.830.
(((18))) (19) "Voluntary placement agreement" means, for the
purposes of extended foster care services, a written voluntary
agreement between a nonminor dependent who agrees to submit to the care
and authority of the department for the purposes of participating in
the extended foster care program.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.13.031 and 2013 c 332 s 10 and 2013 c 32 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department and supervising agencies shall develop,
administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and comprehensive plan
that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for the protection and
care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, the department and supervising
agencies shall recruit an adequate number of prospective adoptive and
foster homes, both regular and specialized, i.e. homes for children of
ethnic minority, including Indian homes for Indian children, sibling
groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed, teens, pregnant and
parenting teens, and the department shall annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's and
supervising agency's success in: (a) Meeting the need for adoptive and
foster home placements; (b) reducing the foster parent turnover rate;
(c) completing home studies for legally free children; and (d)
implementing and operating the passport program required by RCW
74.13.285. The report shall include a section entitled "Foster Home
Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) The department shall investigate complaints of any recent act
or failure to act on the part of a parent or caretaker that results in
death, serious physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or
exploitation, or that presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on
the basis of the findings of such investigation, offer child welfare
services in relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians,
or persons serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the
attention of an appropriate court, or another community agency. An
investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are
clearly not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's
parents, legal custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the
investigation reveals that a crime against a child may have been
committed, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement
agency.
(4) As provided in RCW 26.44.030(11), the department may respond to
a report of child abuse or neglect by using the family assessment
response.
(5) The department or supervising agencies shall offer, on a
voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to families who are in
conflict.
(6) The department or supervising agencies shall monitor placements
of children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies to assure the
safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is within the
scope of the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW 74.13.010 and
74.15.010. Under this section children in out-of-home care and in-home
dependencies and their caregivers shall receive a private and
individual face-to-face visit each month. The department and the
supervising agencies shall randomly select no less than ten percent of
the caregivers currently providing care to receive one unannounced
face-to-face visit in the caregiver's home per year. No caregiver will
receive an unannounced visit through the random selection process for
two consecutive years. If the caseworker makes a good faith effort to
conduct the unannounced visit to a caregiver and is unable to do so,
that month's visit to that caregiver need not be unannounced. The
department and supervising agencies are encouraged to group monthly
visits to caregivers by geographic area so that in the event an
unannounced visit cannot be completed, the caseworker may complete
other required monthly visits. The department shall use a method of
random selection that does not cause a fiscal impact to the department.
The department or supervising agencies shall conduct the monthly
visits with children and caregivers to whom it is providing child
welfare services.
(7) The department and supervising agencies shall have authority to
accept custody of children from parents and to accept custody of
children from juvenile courts, where authorized to do so under law, to
provide child welfare services including placement for adoption, to
provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental, and mental
health care, or necessary emergency care of the children, and to
provide for the physical care of such children and make payment of
maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(8) The department and supervising agency shall have authority to
provide temporary shelter to children who have run away from home and
who are admitted to crisis residential centers.
(9) The department and supervising agency shall have authority to
purchase care for children.
(10) The department shall establish a children's services advisory
committee with sufficient members representing supervising agencies
which shall assist the secretary in the development of a partnership
plan for utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and
advise on all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child
care agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one
member shall represent the adoption community.
(11)(a) The department and supervising agencies shall provide
continued extended foster care services to nonminor dependents who are:
(i) Enrolled in a secondary education program or a secondary
education equivalency program;
(ii) Enrolled and participating in a postsecondary academic or
postsecondary vocational education program; ((or))
(iii) Participating in a program or activity designed to promote
employment or remove barriers to employment;
(iv) Engaged in employment for eighty hours or more per month; or
(v) Not able to engage in any of the activities described in (a)(i)
through (iv) of this subsection due to a documented medical condition.
(b) To be eligible for extended foster care services, the nonminor
dependent must have been dependent and in foster care at the time that
he or she reached age eighteen years. If the dependency case of the
nonminor dependent was dismissed pursuant to RCW 13.34.267, he or she
may receive extended foster care services pursuant to a voluntary
placement agreement under RCW 74.13.336 or pursuant to an order of
dependency issued by the court under RCW 13.34.268. A nonminor
dependent whose dependency case was dismissed by the court must have
requested extended foster care services before reaching age nineteen
years.
(c) The department shall develop and implement rules regarding
youth eligibility requirements.
(12) The department shall have authority to provide adoption
support benefits, or relative guardianship subsidies on behalf of youth
ages eighteen to twenty-one years who achieved permanency through
adoption or a relative guardianship at age sixteen or older and who
meet the criteria described in subsection (11) of this section.
(13) The department shall refer cases to the division of child
support whenever state or federal funds are expended for the care and
maintenance of a child, including a child with a developmental
disability who is placed as a result of an action under chapter 13.34
RCW, unless the department finds that there is good cause not to pursue
collection of child support against the parent or parents of the child.
Cases involving individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be
referred to the division of child support unless required by federal
law.
(14) The department and supervising agencies shall have authority
within funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase care for
Indian children who are in the custody of a federally recognized Indian
tribe or tribally licensed child-placing agency pursuant to parental
consent, tribal court order, or state juvenile court order. The
purchase of such care is exempt from the requirements of chapter 74.13B
RCW and may be purchased from the federally recognized Indian tribe or
tribally licensed child-placing agency, and shall be subject to the
same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department under subsections (4), (7),
and (8) of this section, subject to the limitations of these
subsections, may be provided by any program offering such services
funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the federal juvenile justice
and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(15) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the
supervising agency or department shall provide preventive services to
families with children that prevent or shorten the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(16) The department and supervising agencies shall have authority
to provide independent living services to youths, including individuals
who have attained eighteen years of age, and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been in foster care.
(17) The department and supervising agencies shall consult at least
quarterly with foster parents, including members of the foster parent
association of Washington state, for the purpose of receiving
information and comment regarding how the department and supervising
agencies are performing the duties and meeting the obligations
specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and 74.13.320 regarding the
recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates,
providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a
coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the
protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and
statewide levels.
(18)(a) The department shall, within current funding levels, place
on its public web site a document listing the duties and
responsibilities the department has to a child subject to a dependency
petition including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) Reasonable efforts, including the provision of services, toward
reunification of the child with his or her family;
(ii) Sibling visits subject to the restrictions in RCW
13.34.136(2)(b)(ii);
(iii) Parent-child visits;
(iv) Statutory preference for placement with a relative or other
suitable person, if appropriate; and
(v) Statutory preference for an out-of-home placement that allows
the child to remain in the same school or school district, if practical
and in the child's best interests.
(b) The document must be prepared in conjunction with a community-based organization and must be updated as needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect March 1, 2015.

--- END ---