BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state sales and use taxes paid with funds appropriated to
the department of transportation for state highway projects must be
transferred from the general fund to the connecting Washington account
created in section 2 of this act.
(2) The transfer required under this section applies to:
(a) Between the effective date of this section and June 30, 2017,
state highway projects funded from the connecting Washington account;
and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2017, all state highway projects.
(3) Quarterly, beginning in the calendar quarter immediately
following the calendar quarter that this section is enacted into law,
the department of transportation must submit a report to the department
detailing the amount of state sales and use tax paid during the
previous calendar quarter on state highway projects for which this
section is applicable. The quarterly reports must contain such other
information as required by the department to administer this section;
are due by the tenth day of March, June, September, and December; and
must be provided in a form and manner acceptable to the department.
The department must notify the state treasurer of the amount of the
transfer by the last working day of each calendar quarter.
(4) The following definitions apply throughout this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "State highway project" means a capital improvement or
preservation authorized by the legislature and specifically referenced
in a line-item project appropriation for the department of
transportation. "State highway project" does not include a project
that is primarily for recreational purposes, such as parks, hiking
trails, and off-road vehicle trails.
(b) "State sales and use tax" means the taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020 and 82.12.020, not reduced by any sales or use taxes imposed
under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW that are deducted from or
credited against the taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020 and 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The connecting Washington account is created in the motor vehicle
fund. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account must be used only for projects or
improvements identified as connecting Washington projects or
improvements in a transportation appropriations act, including any
principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or
improvements.

--- END ---