BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.160.030 and 1999 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person engaged in the selling, delivery, or solicitation of cut
flowers, flower arrangements, or floral products may misrepresent his,
her, or its geographic location by:
(1) Listing a local telephone number in a local telephone directory
or on an internet web site if:
(a) Calls to the telephone number are routinely forwarded or
otherwise transferred to a business location that is outside the
calling area covered by the local telephone directory or outside the
local calling area for the local telephone number listed on an internet
web site; and
(b) The listing fails to conspicuously disclose the locality and
state in which the business is located; or
(2) Listing a business name in a local telephone directory or on an
internet web site if:
(a) The name misrepresents the business's geographic location; and
(b) The listing fails to disclose the locality and state in which
the business is located.

--- END ---