BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The interactive gaming in schools public-private partnership is
established, composed of the following members:
(a) Four members of the legislature, with one member from each
caucus of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, and one member from each caucus of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) Four experts in the integration of interactive technology or
gaming into education, with one expert nominated by each caucus of the
house of representatives and submitted for appointment by the speaker
of the house of representatives, and one expert nominated by each
caucus of the senate and submitted for appointment by the president of
the senate;
(c) A representative of the department of early learning, appointed
by the director of the department of early learning;
(d) A representative of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, appointed by the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) The chair of the partnership shall be selected by the members
of the partnership from among the legislative members.
(3) To the extent funds are appropriated or are made available for
this purpose, the partnership may hire a staff person who shall reside
in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Additional technical and logistical support
may be provided by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the organizations concerning the partnership, and other
participants in the interactive gaming in schools public-private
partnership.
(4) The members of the partnership shall be appointed by August 1,
2014.
(5) Legislative members of the partnership shall receive per diem
and travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) This section shall be implemented to the extent funds are
available.
(7) This section expires January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The purpose of the interactive gaming in
schools public-private partnership is to examine how interactive games
may be integrated into primary and secondary education to increase
student involvement and achievement.
(2) In carrying out its task, and to the extent funds are
available, the interactive gaming in schools public-private partnership
shall:
(a) Consider how interactive games and advances in technology may
be integrated into Washington's education system from early learning
through grade twelve, with a focus on improving student engagement and
achievement;
(b) Develop a proposal for a pilot program that integrates
interactive games into the early learning and K-12 curriculum in
Washington;
(c) Submit the pilot program proposal to the legislature by
December 1, 2015.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2016.

--- END ---