BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.710.040 and 2013 c 2 s 204 (Initiative Measure No.
1240) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) A charter school must operate according to the terms of its
charter contract and the provisions of this chapter.
(2) All charter schools must:
(a) Comply with local, state, and federal health, safety, parents'
rights, civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws applicable to school
districts and to the same extent as school districts, including but not
limited to chapter 28A.642 RCW (discrimination prohibition) and chapter
28A.640 RCW (sexual equality);
(b) Provide basic education, as provided in RCW 28A.150.210,
including instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
and participate in the statewide student assessment system as developed
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(c) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.025: PROVIDED, That charter schools may hire noncertificated
instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as
specified in RCW 28A.150.203(7);
(d) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(e) Implement the four-level evaluation systems for classroom
teachers and principals as required under RCW 28A.405.100;
(f) Adhere to generally accepted accounting principles and be
subject to financial examinations and audits as determined by the state
auditor, including annual audits for legal and fiscal compliance;
(((f))) (g) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(((g))) (h) Be subject to the performance improvement goals adopted
by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130;
(((h))) (i) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter
42.30 RCW and public records requirements in chapter 42.56 RCW; and
(((i))) (j) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after
December 6, 2012, governing the operation and management of charter
schools.
(3) Public charter schools must comply with all state statutes and
rules made applicable to the charter school in the school's charter
contract and are subject to the specific state statutes and rules
identified in subsection (2) of this section. Charter schools are not
subject to and are exempt from all other state statutes and rules
applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors,
for the purpose of allowing flexibility to innovate in areas such as
scheduling, personnel, funding, and educational programs in order to
improve student outcomes and academic achievement. Charter schools are
exempt from all school district policies except policies made
applicable in the school's charter contract.
(4) No charter school may engage in any sectarian practices in its
educational program, admissions or employment policies, or operations.
(5) Charter schools are subject to the supervision of the
superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education,
including accountability measures, to the same extent as other public
schools, except as otherwise provided in chapter 2, Laws of 2013.

--- END ---