BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.165.005 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 201 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter is designed to: (a) Promote the use of data when
developing programs to assist underachieving students and reduce
disruptive behaviors in the classroom; and (b) guide school districts
in providing the most effective and efficient practices when
implementing supplemental instruction and services to assist
underachieving students and reduce disruptive behaviors in the
classroom.
(2) School districts implementing a learning assistance program
((shall)) may determine whether the district will focus first on
addressing the needs of students who need remediation to pass the
statewide assessments required for high school graduation in RCW
28A.655.070 or the needs of students in grades kindergarten through
four who are deficient in reading or reading readiness skills to
improve reading literacy.

--- END ---