BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.270 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in this title which occur on
federal installations within this state, shall immediately forward to
the department a forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure
the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of a fine, penalty, or
court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or a finding of guilt,
or a finding that any person has committed a traffic infraction an
abstract of the court record in the form prescribed by rule of the
supreme court, showing the conviction of any person or the finding that
any person has committed a traffic infraction in said court for a
violation of any said laws other than regulations governing standing,
stopping, parking, and pedestrian offenses.
(2) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, parking, or civil penalties issued under RCW
46.63.160 has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing to
explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record in
the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding by
such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing
standing, stopping, and parking or one or more civil penalties issued
under RCW 46.63.160 have been committed and indicating the nature of
the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or infractions may not
have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the registered owner
((or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial vehicle lease or
rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the business of leasing
vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's registered owner)). The
department may enter into agreements of reciprocity with the duly
authorized representatives of the states for reporting to each other
violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking.
(3) For the purposes of this title and except as defined in RCW
46.25.010, "conviction" means a final conviction in a state or
municipal court or by any federal authority having jurisdiction over
offenses substantially the same as those set forth in this title which
occur on federal installations in this state, an unvacated forfeiture
of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant's appearance in
court, the payment of a fine or court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge,
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are
deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a
deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW.
(4) Perfection of a notice of appeal shall stay the execution of
the sentence pertaining to the withholding of the driving privilege.
(5) For the purposes of this title, "finding that a traffic
infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a notice
of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to this
chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.073 and 2007 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event a traffic infraction is based on a vehicle's
identification, and the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction may be issued, provide a written notice to the rental car
business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car
business if the rental car business does not, within thirty days of
receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return
mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the
vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable
penalty. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under (a) of this subsection is responsible for an infraction. For the
purpose of this subsection, a "traffic infraction based on a vehicle's
identification" includes, but is not limited to, parking infractions((,
high occupancy toll lane violations, and violations recorded by
automated traffic safety cameras)).
(2) In the event a parking infraction is issued by a private
parking facility and is based on a vehicle's identification, and the
registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the parking
facility shall, before a notice of infraction may be issued, provide a
written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction
may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business
does not, within thirty days of receiving the written notice, provide
to the parking facility by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the parking facility relieves
a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the
notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the
rental car business may pay the applicable penalty. For the purpose of
this subsection, a "parking infraction based on a vehicle's
identification" is limited to parking infractions occurring on a
private parking facility's premises.

--- END ---