BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.28.010 and 1947 c 79 s .28.01 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever by law or by rule of any court, public official, or public
body, any surety bond, recognizance, obligation, stipulation or
undertaking is required or is permitted to be given, any such bond,
recognizance, obligation, stipulation, or undertaking which is
otherwise proper and the conditions of which are guaranteed by an
authorized surety insurer, or by an unauthorized surety insurer as a
surplus line pursuant to chapter 48.15 RCW of this code, shall be
approved and accepted and shall be deemed to fulfill all requirements
as to number of sureties, residence or status of sureties, and other
similar requirements, and no justification by such surety shall be
necessary. This section applies to any and all surety bonds executed,
filed, posted, furnished, or otherwise given as security pursuant to
any statute of this state or any law or ordinance of any public body.

Sec. 2 RCW 60.28.011 and 2013 c 113 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, public
improvement contracts must provide, and public bodies must reserve, a
contract retainage not to exceed five percent of the moneys earned by
the contractor as a trust fund for the protection and payment of: (i)
The claims of any person arising under the contract; and (ii) the state
with respect to taxes, increases, and penalties imposed pursuant to
Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW which may be due from such contractor.
(b) Public improvement contracts funded in whole or in part by
federal transportation funds must rely upon the contract bond as
referred to in chapter 39.08 RCW for the protection and payment of:
(i) The claims of any person or persons arising under the contract to
the extent such claims are provided for in RCW 39.08.010; and (ii) the
state with respect to taxes, increases, and penalties incurred on the
public improvement project under Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW which may be
due. The contract bond must remain in full force and effect until, at
a minimum, all claims filed in compliance with chapter 39.08 RCW are
resolved.
(2) Every person performing labor or furnishing supplies toward the
completion of a public improvement contract has a lien upon moneys
reserved by a public body under the provisions of a public improvement
contract. However, the notice of the lien of the claimant must be
given within forty-five days of completion of the contract work, and in
the manner provided in RCW 39.08.030.
(3) The contractor at any time may request the contract retainage
be reduced to one hundred percent of the value of the work remaining on
the project.
(a) After completion of all contract work other than landscaping,
the contractor may request that the public body release and pay in full
the amounts retained during the performance of the contract, and sixty
days thereafter the public body must release and pay in full the
amounts retained (other than continuing retention of five percent of
the moneys earned for landscaping) subject to the provisions of
chapters 39.12 and 60.28 RCW.
(b) Sixty days after completion of all contract work the public
body must release and pay in full the amounts retained during the
performance of the contract subject to the provisions of chapters 39.12
and 60.28 RCW.
(4) The moneys reserved by a public body under the provisions of a
public improvement contract, at the option of the contractor, must be:
(a) Retained in a fund by the public body;
(b) Deposited by the public body in an interest bearing account in
a bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association. Interest
on moneys reserved by a public body under the provision of a public
improvement contract must be paid to the contractor;
(c) Placed in escrow with a bank or trust company by the public
body. When the moneys reserved are placed in escrow, the public body
must issue a check representing the sum of the moneys reserved payable
to the bank or trust company and the contractor jointly. This check
must be converted into bonds and securities chosen by the contractor
and approved by the public body and the bonds and securities must be
held in escrow. Interest on the bonds and securities must be paid to
the contractor as the interest accrues.
(5) The contractor or subcontractor may withhold payment of not
more than five percent from the moneys earned by any subcontractor or
sub-subcontractor or supplier contracted with by the contractor to
provide labor, materials, or equipment to the public project. Whenever
the contractor or subcontractor reserves funds earned by a
subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier, the contractor or
subcontractor must pay interest to the subcontractor or sub-subcontractor or supplier at a rate equal to that received by the
contractor or subcontractor from reserved funds.
(6) A contractor may submit a bond for all or any portion of the
contract retainage in a form acceptable to the public body and from ((a
bonding company meeting standards established by the public body)) an
authorized surety insurer with a financial strength rating from A.M.
Best Co. of "A-" or higher. The public body must ((accept a bond
meeting these requirements unless the public body can demonstrate good
cause for refusing to accept it)) comply with the provisions of RCW
48.28.010. This bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all
claims and liens and in the same manner and priority as set forth for
retained percentages in this chapter. The public body must release the
bonded portion of the retained funds to the contractor within thirty
days of accepting the bond from the contractor. Whenever a public body
accepts a bond in lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the
contractor must accept like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers
from which the contractor has retained funds. The contractor must then
release the funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the
subcontractor or supplier within thirty days of accepting the bond from
the subcontractor or supplier.
(7) If the public body administering a contract, after a
substantial portion of the work has been completed, finds that an
unreasonable delay will occur in the completion of the remaining
portion of the contract for any reason not the result of a breach
thereof, it may, if the contractor agrees, delete from the contract the
remaining work and accept as final the improvement at the stage of
completion then attained and make payment in proportion to the amount
of the work accomplished and in this case any amounts retained and
accumulated under this section must be held for a period of sixty days
following the completion. In the event that the work is terminated
before final completion as provided in this section, the public body
may thereafter enter into a new contract with the same contractor to
perform the remaining work or improvement for an amount equal to or
less than the cost of the remaining work as was provided for in the
original contract without advertisement or bid. The provisions of this
chapter are exclusive and supersede all provisions and regulations in
conflict herewith.
(8) Whenever the department of transportation has contracted for
the construction of two or more ferry vessels, sixty days after
completion of all contract work on each ferry vessel, the department
must release and pay in full the amounts retained in connection with
the construction of the vessel subject to the provisions of RCW
60.28.021 and chapter 39.12 RCW. However, the department of
transportation may at its discretion condition the release of funds
retained in connection with the completed ferry upon the contractor
delivering a good and sufficient bond with two or more sureties, or
with a surety company, in the amount of the retained funds to be
released to the contractor, conditioned that no taxes may be certified
or claims filed for work on the ferry after a period of sixty days
following completion of the ferry; and if taxes are certified or claims
filed, recovery may be had on the bond by the department of revenue,
the employment security department, the department of labor and
industries, and the material suppliers and laborers filing claims.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
reservation by a public body for any purpose from the moneys earned by
a contractor by fulfilling its responsibilities under public
improvement contracts is prohibited.
(10) Contracts on projects funded in whole or in part by farmers
home administration and subject to farmers home administration
regulations are not subject to subsections (1) through (9) of this
section.
(11) This subsection applies only to a public body that has
contracted for the construction of a facility using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure, as defined under RCW
39.10.210. If the work performed by a subcontractor on the project has
been completed within the first half of the time provided in the
general contractor/construction manager contract for completing the
work, the public body may accept the completion of the subcontract.
The public body must give public notice of this acceptance. After a
forty-five day period for giving notice of liens, and compliance with
the retainage release procedures in RCW 60.28.021, the public body may
release that portion of the retained funds associated with the
subcontract. Claims against the retained funds after the forty-five
day period are not valid.
(12) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Contract retainage" means an amount reserved by a public body
from the moneys earned by a person under a public improvement contract.
(b) "Person" means a person or persons, mechanic, subcontractor, or
materialperson who performs labor or provides materials for a public
improvement contract, and any other person who supplies the person with
provisions or supplies for the carrying on of a public improvement
contract.
(c) "Public body" means the state, or a county, city, town,
district, board, or other public body.
(d) "Public improvement contract" means a contract for public
improvements or work, other than for professional services, or a work
order as defined in RCW 39.10.210.

--- END ---