BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a methodology to provide personal
protective equipment for individual providers to use in the course of
providing services to clients who do not receive such equipment under
medical assistance. The personal protective equipment must be made
available on a monthly basis in a cost-effective and easy to access
manner. The amount of personal protective equipment provided must be
based on the number of clients that do not have coverage for personal
protective equipment and the reasonably anticipated equipment needs
that may be expected for the types of hazards that are typically
encountered with such clients. The department shall seek federal
reimbursement for the cost of personal protective equipment.
(2) As used in this section, "personal protective equipment" means
both sterile and nonsterile gloves worn or used by an individual to
protect him or her from the potential transmission of infectious
diseases through contact with the bodily fluids of another person.
Nonlatex, nonpowdered gloves will be provided where there is a
demonstrable need, including those relating to allergic reactions to
latex or powder by either the individual provider or his or her client.

--- END ---