BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.29.020 and 1999 c 18 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county treasurer shall keep all moneys belonging to the
state((,)) or to any county, and public funds as defined in RCW
39.58.010, in his or her own possession until disbursed according to
law. The county treasurer shall not place the same in the possession
of any person to be used for any purpose; nor shall he or she loan or
in any manner use or permit any person to use the same; but it shall be
lawful for a county treasurer to deposit any such moneys in any
regularly designated qualified public depositary. Any municipal
corporation may by action of its governing body authorize any of its
funds which are not required for immediate expenditure, and which are
in the custody of the county treasurer or other municipal corporation
treasurer, to be invested by such treasurer. The county treasurer may
invest in savings or time accounts in designated qualified public
depositaries or in certificates, notes, or bonds of the United States,
or other obligations of the United States or its agencies, or of any
corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States; in
bankers' acceptances purchased on the secondary market, in federal home
loan bank notes and bonds, federal land bank bonds and federal national
mortgage association notes, debentures and guaranteed certificates of
participation, or the obligations of any other government sponsored
corporation whose obligations are or may become eligible as collateral
for advances to member banks as determined by the board of governors of
the federal reserve system or deposit such funds or any portion thereof
in investment deposits as defined in RCW 39.58.010 secured by
collateral in accordance with the provisions of chapters 39.58 and
39.59 RCW: PROVIDED, Five percent of the earnings, with an annual
maximum of fifty dollars, on each transaction authorized by the
governing body shall be paid as an investment service fee to the office
of the county treasurer or other municipal corporation treasurer when
the earnings become available to the governing body: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That if such investment service fee amounts to five dollars or less the
county treasurer or other municipal corporation treasurer may waive
such fee.
If in the judgment of the governing body of the municipal
corporation or the county treasurer it is necessary to redeem or to
sell any of the purchased securities before their ultimate maturity
date, the governing body may, by resolution, direct the county
treasurer pursuant to RCW 36.29.010(8) to cause such redemption to be
had at the redemption value of the securities or to sell the securities
at not less than market value and accrued interest.
Whenever the funds of any municipal corporation which are not
required for immediate expenditure are in the custody or control of the
county treasurer, and the governing body of such municipal corporation
has not taken any action pertaining to the investment of any such
funds, the county finance committee shall direct the county treasurer,
under the investment policy of the county finance committee, to invest,
to the maximum prudent extent, such funds or any portion thereof in
savings or time accounts in designated qualified public depositaries or
in certificates, notes, or bonds of the United States, or other
obligations of the United States or its agencies, or of any corporation
wholly owned by the government of the United States, in bankers'
acceptances purchased on the secondary market, in federal home loan
bank notes and bonds, federal land bank bonds and federal national
mortgage association notes, debentures and guaranteed certificates of
participation, or the obligations of any other government sponsored
corporation whose obligations are or may become eligible as collateral
for advances to member banks as determined by the board of governors of
the federal reserve system or deposit such funds or any portion thereof
in investment deposits as defined in RCW 39.58.010 secured by
collateral in accordance with the provisions of chapters 39.58 and
39.59 RCW: PROVIDED, That the county treasurer shall have the power to
select the specific qualified financial institution in which the funds
may be invested. The interest or other earnings from such investments
or deposits shall be deposited in the current expense fund of the
county and may be used for general county purposes. The investment or
deposit and disposition of the interest or other earnings therefrom
authorized by this paragraph shall not apply to such funds as may be
prohibited by the state Constitution from being so invested or
deposited.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.29.022 and 1986 c 294 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the request of one or several units of local government that
invest their money with the county under the provisions of RCW
36.29.020, the treasurer of that county may combine those units' moneys
for the purposes of investment. In order to perform the daily
investment activities of an investment pool, the treasurer or any
person who is authorized by the treasurer to manage an investment pool
must obtain at least twenty-four hours of continuing education annually
in the field related to investments and at least eight hours must
relate to fixed income investing. An employee who holds a chartered
financial analyst designation may meet the continuing education
requirement by completing the continuing education program sponsored by
the chartered financial analyst institute or any successor
organization. An employee who does not hold a chartered financial
analyst designation may meet the continuing education requirement by
tracking the hours he or she spends completing investment-related
courses or training sponsored by professional organizations and
associations, universities or other educational providers, investment
firms, credit rating agencies, investment software vendors, and through
self-study using online programs, or reading investment-related books
or articles. An employee must submit documentation to the treasurer
of his or her compliance with the continuing education requirement
subject to the treasurer's approval of the employee's compliance with
the continuing education requirement.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.29.190 and 2003 c 23 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
County treasurers are authorized to accept credit cards, charge
cards, debit cards, smart cards, stored value cards, federal wire, and
automatic clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic
communication, for any payment of any kind including, but not limited
to, taxes, fines, interest, penalties, special assessments, fees,
rates, charges, or moneys due counties. A payer desiring to pay by a
credit card, charge card, debit card, smart card, stored value card,
federal wire, automatic clearinghouse system, or other electronic
communication shall bear the cost of processing the transaction in an
amount determined by the treasurer((, unless)) for taxes, interest
associated with taxes, and penalties associated with taxes. The
treasurer's cost determination must be based upon costs incurred by the
treasurer and may not, in any event, exceed the additional direct costs
incurred by the county to accept the specific form of payment utilized
by the payer. Payment of taxes, interest associated with taxes, and
penalties associated with taxes may be made by automatic clearinghouse
system, or federal wire or other electronic communication. Any fee
must be absorbed within the county treasurer's banking services budget,
if the county legislative authority or the legislative authority of a
district where the county treasurer serves as ex officio treasurer
finds that it is in the best interests of the county or district to not
charge transaction processing costs for all payment transactions made
for a specific category of nontax payments received by the county
treasurer((,)) including, but not limited to, fines, interest not
associated with taxes, penalties not associated with taxes, special
assessments, fees, rates, and charges, or moneys due counties.
Interest associated with such transaction and penalties associated with
such transaction may be absorbed by the county department or taxing
district assessing the payment transactions. The treasurer's cost
determination shall be based upon costs incurred by the treasurer and
may not, in any event, exceed the additional direct costs incurred by
the county to accept the specific form of payment utilized by the
payer.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.72.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 77 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In case of the loss or destruction of a warrant for the payment
of money, or any bond or other instrument or evidence of indebtedness,
issued by any county, city or town, district or other political
subdivision or municipal corporation of the state of Washington,
hereinafter referred to as a municipal corporation, or by any
department or agency of such municipal corporation, such municipal
corporation may cause a duplicate to be issued in lieu thereof, subject
to the same requirements and conditions, and according to the same
procedure, as prescribed for the issuance of duplicate state
instruments in RCW 43.08.064 and 43.08.066 as now or hereafter amended:
PROVIDED, That the requirements of RCW 43.08.066(2) shall not be
applicable to instruments received by employees of the above issuers
for the payment of salary or wages or as other compensation for work
performed nor shall those requirements be applicable to instruments
received by former employees or their beneficiaries for the payment of
pension benefits.
(2)(a) In case of the loss or destruction of a warrant for the
payment of money, or any bond or other instrument or evidence of
indebtedness, issued by any local government officer or agency, the
officer or the agency through its appropriate officer may issue or
cause to be issued a duplicate in lieu thereof, bearing the same
designation and for the same amount as the original. The duplicate
instrument is subject in all other respects to the same provisions of
law as the original instrument.
(b) Before a duplicate instrument is issued, the issuing officer
shall require the person making application for its issue to file in
his or her office a written affidavit specifically alleging on oath
that he or she is the proper owner, payee, or legal representative of
such owner or payee of the original instrument, giving the date of
issue, the number, amount, and for what services or claim or purpose
the original instrument or series of instruments of which it is a part
was issued, and that the same has been lost or destroyed, and has not
been paid, or has not been received by him or her: PROVIDED, That in
the event that an original and its duplicate instrument are both
presented for payment as a result of forgery or fraud, the issuing
officer shall be the office responsible for endeavoring to recover any
losses suffered by the local government.

--- END ---