BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.180.010 and 2010 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
who serves legal process for a fee in the state of Washington shall:
(a) Be eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Be a resident of the state of Washington; and
(c) Register as a process server with the auditor of the county in
which the process server resides or operates his or her principal place
of business.
(2) The requirements under subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this
section do not apply to any of the following persons:
(a) A sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, constable, or government
employee who is acting in the course of employment;
(b) An attorney or the attorney's employees, who are not serving
process on a fee basis;
(c) A person who is court appointed to serve the court's process;
(d) A person who does not receive a fee or wage for serving
process;
(e) A private investigator licensed under chapter 18.165 RCW.

--- END ---