BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.525 and 2005 c 319 s 140 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The rate charged by a local government utility to the
department of transportation with respect to state highway right-of-way
or any section of state highway right-of-way for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of storm water control facilities under
chapters 35.67, 35.92, 36.89, 36.94, 57.08, and 86.15 RCW, shall be
thirty percent of the rate for comparable real property, except as
otherwise provided in this section. The rate charged to the department
with respect to state highway right-of-way or any section of state
highway right-of-way within a local government utility's jurisdiction
shall not, however, exceed the rate charged for comparable city street
or county road right-of-way within the same jurisdiction. The
legislature finds that the aforesaid rates are presumptively fair and
equitable because of the traditional and continuing expenditures of the
department of transportation for the construction, operation, and
maintenance of storm water control facilities designed to control
surface water or storm water runoff from state highway rights-of-way.
(2) ((Charges paid under subsection (1) of this section by the
department of transportation must be used solely for storm water
control facilities that directly reduce state highway runoff impacts or
implementation of best management practices that will reduce the need
for such facilities. By January 1st of each year, beginning with
calendar year 1997, the local government utility, in coordination with
the department, shall develop a plan for the expenditure of the charges
for that calendar year. The plan must be consistent with the
objectives identified in RCW 90.78.010. In addition, beginning with
the submittal for 1998, the utility shall provide a progress report on
the use of charges assessed for the prior year. No charges may be paid
until the plan and report have been submitted to the department.
(3))) The utility imposing the charge and the department of
transportation may, however, agree to either higher or lower rates with
respect to the construction, operation, or maintenance of any specific
storm water control facilities ((based upon the annual plan prescribed
in subsection (2) of this section)). If, after mediation, the local
government utility and the department of transportation cannot agree
upon the proper rate, either may commence an action in the superior
court for the county in which the state highway right-of-way is located
to establish the proper rate. The court in establishing the proper
rate shall take into account the extent and adequacy of storm water
control facilities constructed by the department and the actual
benefits to the sections of state highway rights-of-way from storm
water control facilities constructed, operated, and maintained by the
local government utility. Control of surface water runoff and storm
water runoff from state highway rights-of-way shall be deemed an actual
benefit to the state highway rights-of-way. The rate for sections of
state highway right-of-way as determined by the court shall be set
forth in terms of the percentage of the rate for comparable real
property, but shall in no event exceed the rate charged for comparable
city street or county road right-of-way within the same jurisdiction.
(((4))) (3) The legislature finds that the federal clean water act
(national pollutant discharge elimination system, 40 C.F.R. parts 122-124), the state water pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW, and the
highway runoff program under chapter 90.71 RCW, mandate the treatment
and control of storm water runoff from state highway rights-of-way
owned by the department of transportation. Appropriations made by the
legislature to the department of transportation for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of storm water control facilities are
intended to address applicable federal and state mandates related to
storm water control and treatment. This section is not intended to
limit opportunities for sharing the costs of storm water improvements
between cities, counties, and the state.

--- END ---