BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that Washington has a compelling state
interest in protecting citizens and lawful residents within its borders
from the application of a foreign law when the application of the
foreign law would result in the violation of any right guaranteed by
the Constitution of this state or of the United States, including but
not limited to the rights of due process, freedom of religion, speech,
and press, and the rights to privacy, property, and to bear arms in the
defense of self or others.
(2) A court, arbitrator, administrative agency, and any other
adjudicative, mediation, or enforcement authority shall not enforce a
foreign law if doing so would violate any right guaranteed by the
Constitution of this state or of the United States.
(3)(a) If any contractual provision or agreement provides for the
choice of a foreign law to govern its interpretation or the resolution
of any dispute between the parties, and if the enforcement or
interpretation of the contractual provision or agreement would result
in a violation of any right guaranteed by the Constitution of this
state or of the United States, the agreement or contractual provision
shall be modified or amended to the extent necessary to preserve the
constitutional rights of the parties.
(b) If any contractual provision or agreement provides for the
choice of venue or forum outside of the states or territories of the
United States, and if the enforcement or interpretation of the contract
or agreement applying that choice of venue or forum provision would
result in a violation of any right guaranteed by the Constitution of
this state or of the United States, that contractual provision or
agreement shall be interpreted or construed to preserve the
constitutional rights of the natural person against whom enforcement is
sought. Similarly, if a natural person subject to personal
jurisdiction in this state seeks to maintain litigation, arbitration,
administrative, or similarly binding proceedings in this state, and if
a court of this state finds that granting a claim of forum non
conveniens or a related claim would violate any constitutional right of
the nonclaimant in the foreign forum with respect to the matter in
dispute, the claim shall be denied.
(c) Any contractual provision or agreement incapable of being
modified or amended in order to preserve the constitutional rights of
the parties pursuant to the provisions of this section is null and void
and unenforceable as against the public policy of this state.
(4) Without prejudice to any other legal right, this section shall
not apply when an entity other than a natural person is a party to the
contract or agreement.
(5) The public policies expressed in this section shall apply only
if the application of foreign law would violate or would more likely
than not violate any constitutional right of a natural person.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Foreign law" means any law, rule, or legal code or system
established and used or applied in a jurisdiction outside of the states
or territories of the United States.
(b) "Natural person" means a human being.

--- END ---