BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.040 and 2003 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall create a
transportation policy board. Transportation policy boards shall
provide policy advice to the regional transportation planning
organization and shall allow representatives of major employers within
the region, the department of transportation, transit districts, port
districts, and member cities, towns, and counties within the region to
participate in policy making. Any member((s)) of the ((house of
representatives or the state senate)) legislature whose district((s
are)) is wholly or partly within the boundaries of the regional
transportation planning organization ((are)) is considered an ex
officio, ((nonvoting)) voting policy board member((s)) of the regional
transportation planning organization. ((This does not preclude
legislators from becoming full-time, voting board members.))

Sec. 2 RCW 36.57A.050 and 2010 c 278 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the
public transportation benefit area the members of the county
legislative authority and the elected representative of each city
within the area shall provide for the selection of the governing body
of such area, the public transportation benefit area authority, which
shall consist of elected officials selected by and serving at the
pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area
and the county legislative authority of each county within the area.
If at the time a public transportation benefit area authority assumes
the public transportation functions previously provided under the
interlocal cooperation act (chapter 39.34 RCW) there are citizen
positions on the governing board of the transit system, those positions
may be retained as positions on the governing board of the public
transportation benefit area authority. Any member of the legislature
whose district is wholly or partly within the boundaries of the public
transportation benefit area is considered an ex officio, voting member
of the governing body.
Within such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its
legislative body withdraw from participation in the public
transportation benefit area. The county legislative authority and each
city remaining in the public transportation benefit area may disapprove
and prevent the establishment of any governing body of a public
transportation benefit area if the composition thereof, not including
members of the legislature, does not meet its approval.
In no case shall the governing body of a single county public
transportation benefit area be greater than nine voting members and in
the case of a multicounty area, fifteen voting members. However, the
numerical limitations regarding the composition of the governing body
do not apply to members of the legislature eligible to serve on the
governing body. Those cities within the transportation benefit area
and excluded from direct membership on the authority are hereby
authorized to designate a member of the authority who shall be entitled
to represent the interests of such city which is excluded from direct
membership on the authority. The legislative body of such city shall
notify the authority as to the determination of its authorized
representative on the authority.
There is one nonvoting member of the public transportation benefit
area authority. The nonvoting member is recommended by the labor
organization representing the public transportation employees within
the local public transportation system. If the public transportation
employees are represented by more than one labor organization, all such
labor organizations shall select the nonvoting member by majority vote.
The nonvoting member shall comply with all governing bylaws and
policies of the authority. The chair or cochairs of the authority
shall exclude the nonvoting member from attending any executive session
held for the purpose of discussing negotiations with labor
organizations. The chair or cochairs may exclude the nonvoting member
from attending any other executive session. The requirement that a
nonvoting member be appointed to the governing body of a public
transportation benefit area authority does not apply to an authority
that has no employees represented by a labor union.
Each member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation, as set by the authority, in an amount not to
exceed forty-four dollars for each day during which the member attends
official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed duties
approved by the chair of the authority. Except that the authority may,
by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to each
member from forty-four dollars up to ninety dollars per day or portion
of a day for actual attendance at board meetings or for performance of
other official services or duties on behalf of the authority. In no
event may a member be compensated in any year for more than seventy-five days, except the chair who may be paid compensation for not more
than one hundred days: PROVIDED, That compensation shall not be paid
to an elected official or employee of federal, state, or local
government who is receiving regular full-time compensation from such
government for attending meetings and performing prescribed duties of
the authority.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.57A.055 and 1991 c 318 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
After a public transportation benefit area has been in existence
for four years, members of the county legislative authority and the
elected representative of each city within the boundaries of the public
transportation benefit area shall review the composition of the
governing body of the benefit area and change the composition of the
governing body if the change is deemed appropriate. However, members
of the legislature eligible to serve on the governing body may not be
removed from the composition of the governing body. The review shall
be at a meeting of the designated representatives of the component
county and cities, and the majority of those present shall constitute
a quorum at such meeting. Twenty days notice of the meeting shall be
given by the chief administrative officer of the public transportation
benefit area authority. After the initial review, a review shall be
held every four years.
If an area having a population greater than fifteen percent, or
areas with a combined population of greater than twenty-five percent of
the population of the existing public transportation benefit area as
constituted at the last review meeting, annex to the public
transportation benefit area, or if an area is added under RCW
36.57A.140(2), the representatives of the component county and cities
shall meet within ninety days to review and change the composition of
the governing body, if the change is deemed appropriate. This meeting
is in addition to the regular four-year review meeting and shall be
conducted pursuant to the same notice requirement and quorum provisions
of the regular review.

--- END ---