BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the education legacy trust
account created in RCW 83.100.230 from July 1, 2013, through June 30,
((2019)) 2017, and thereafter in the public works assistance account
created in RCW 43.155.050.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.060 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at
the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling
price. Beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, ((2019)) 2017, an
amount equal to two percent of the proceeds of this tax must be
deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW
43.155.050, and an amount equal to four and one-tenth percent must be
deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW
83.100.230. Thereafter, an amount equal to six and one-tenth percent
of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must be deposited in
the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, an amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer must
be deposited in the city-county assistance account created in RCW
43.08.290.

--- END ---