BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students enrolled
in alternative learning experience courses benefit from career and
technical education courses as much as students enrolled in traditional
courses. Alternative learning experience courses may be offered on-site in a classroom, remotely, or partially or completely online, and
may include courses in career and technical education. Funding for
career and technical education courses is allocated at an enhanced rate
compared to other courses to reflect the higher costs of training and
equipment associated with career and technical education courses and
hands-on vocational education. It is the intent of the legislature
that the enhanced funding allocation for career and technical education
courses only apply to those alternative learning experience courses in
career and technical education that offer a sufficiently hands-on
vocational education experience to students and require specialized
equipment or training to offer to students, to be determined by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.232.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 503 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated under RCW 28A.150.260 to
school districts for each full-time equivalent student enrolled in an
alternative learning experience course. The calculation for
alternative learning experience courses other than those in career and
technical education shall be based on the estimated statewide annual
average allocation per full-time equivalent student in grades nine
through twelve in general education, excluding small high school
enhancements, and including applicable rules and provisions of the
omnibus appropriations act.
(2)(a) For students enrolled in approved alternative learning
experience courses in career and technical education besides online
courses as defined in RCW 28A.250.010, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction may determine that the alternative learning
experience course in career and technical education requires
specialized equipment or training to offer that justifies an enhanced
funding allocation rate. In that case, the funding calculation shall
be based on the estimated statewide annual average allocation per full-time equivalent student in grades nine through twelve in career and
technical education, excluding small high school enhancements, and
including applicable rules and provisions of the omnibus appropriations
act.
(b) Funding for online and other alternative learning experience
courses in career and technical education that do not qualify for an
enhanced funding allocation rate shall be calculated based on the
estimated statewide annual average allocation per full-time equivalent
student in grades nine through twelve in general education, excluding
small high school enhancements, and including applicable rules and
provisions of the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

--- END ---