BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following findings
based on the July 31, 2013, state auditor's report:
(1) Over twenty thousand five hundred individuals with
developmental disabilities receive services from the state, while an
additional fifteen thousand who meet financial and physical eligibility
requirements do not currently receive any services from the state (no
paid services caseload);
(2) Families are the major care provider of their family member
with a developmental disability;
(3) Washington has a complex, severely underfunded service system;
(4) Washington serves fewer people who have a developmental
disability than the national average and is ranked thirty-eighth in the
nation for the state fiscal effort for funding of developmental
disabilities services;
(5) The majority of people who have the highest activities of daily
living, behavioral, and medical needs live at home with their family;
(6) Washington spends less per person on home and community-based
waivers than the national average;
(7) Washington needs to expand its community capacity for respite,
crisis stabilization, and peer support networks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By January 1, 2015, the developmental
disabilities administration of the department of social and health
services shall identify stakeholders to participate in work groups, at
their own expense, to complete the following and report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on issues raised in the July
31, 2013, state auditor's report which includes:
(1) Providing various community funding scenarios to phase in
serving the fifteen thousand people on the no paid services waitlist
caseload;
(2) Developing strategies to expand data gathered during the
initial developmental disabilities application process to improve
waitlist management;
(3) Identifying ways to streamline the eligibility and assessment
processes that ensure fairness for services provided by the
developmental disabilities administration;
(4) Providing different options that address the need for more
community crisis and respite support for individuals and families;
(5) Identifying the resources and models needed to expand community
peer support networks so that they can provide greater support to
people receiving limited services or waiting for services;
(6) Reviewing how other states use shared support hours for
community living;
(7) Identifying additional community residential options;
(8) Identifying strategies to increase employment hours and wages
for individuals employed;
(9) Reviewing current community access rules and identifying ways
to increase hours of service;
(10) Developing strategies to address retaining an adequate
workforce;
(11) Identifying ways to streamline the developmental disabilities
system to make it easier and more accessible to navigate;
(12) Identifying mechanisms for improved contract monitoring and
quality assurance;
(13) Researching and analyzing moving the developmental
disabilities system to a managed care approach and to more self-direction;
(14) Identifying the various medicaid waiver and state plan options
that could make better use of state funds while making the service
delivery system more accessible to people in need of the services.

--- END ---