BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
All health plans offered or renewed on or after January 1, 2015,
and that provide coverage for physical therapy services, may not charge
a covered person a copayment or coinsurance, or any combination of a
copayment and coinsurance, for services rendered by a physical
therapist licensed under chapter 18.74 RCW that is greater than the
copayment or coinsurance charged to the covered person for an office
visit for the service of his or her licensed primary care provider.

--- END ---