BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 8.25 RCW
to read as follows:
No private property shall be taken or damaged for public or private
use that is to be transferred for use or possession by a governmental
agency of another state. In the event of conflict between the
provisions of this chapter and any other act, the provisions of this
chapter shall govern.

--- END ---