BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that quality
early care and education builds the foundation for a child's success in
school and in life. The legislature acknowledges that quality is a
necessary underpinning of the early care and education system in
Washington. The legislature recognizes that empirical evidence supports
the conclusion that high quality programs consistently yield more
positive outcomes for children, with the strongest positive impacts on
the most vulnerable children. The legislature further understands that
the proper dosage, duration of programming, and stability of care are
critical to enhancing program quality and improving child outcomes.
The legislature intends to prioritize the integration of child care and
preschool in an effort to promote full-day programming. The
legislature further intends to reward quality and create incentives for
providers to participate in a quality rating and improvement system
that will also provide valuable information to parents regarding the
quality of care available in their communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.100 and 2013 c 323 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose,)) The department, in collaboration with community and
statewide partners, shall implement a voluntary quality rating and
improvement system, called the early achievers program, that is
applicable to licensed or certified child care centers and homes and
early education programs. The early achievers program establishes the
framework for strengthening the quality of the early care and education
system in Washington. The early achievers program shall continue to
integrate health in early learning and may do so by working with key
health partners to develop training in level 2 focused on foundational
health topics, and is encouraged to plan for the integration of health
consultation within the coaching and mentoring system.
(2) The ((purpose)) objectives of the early achievers program
((is)) are to:
(a) ((To)) Improve short-term and long-term outcomes for children
as measured by assessments including, but not limited to, the
Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills;
(b) Give parents clear and easily accessible information about the
quality of child care and early education programs((,));
(c) Support improvement in early learning and care programs
throughout the state((,));
(d) Increase the readiness of children for school((, and));
(e) Close the disparity in access to quality care;
(f) Provide professional development opportunities to early care
and education providers; and (((b) to))
(g) Establish a common set of expectations and standards that
define, measure, and improve the quality of early learning and care
settings.
(3) Participation in the early achievers program is voluntary for
licensed or certified child care centers and homes.
(4) ((By fiscal year 2015, Washington state preschool programs
receiving state funds must enroll in the early achievers program and
maintain a minimum score level.
(5))) There are five levels in the early achievers program.
Participants are expected to actively engage in the program and
continually advance from level one, or the foundation level, to level
five.
(5)(a) Effective July 1, 2015, the department shall publish on the
department's web site or offer a link on its web site the early
achievers program rating levels one through five for all child care
programs, early childhood education and assistance programs, and
Washington head start programs.
(b) The early achievers program ratings must be published on the
department's web site or have a link on the department's web site
within thirty days from the time a program becomes licensed or
certified or receives a rating.
(c) The early achievers program rating levels must be published on
the department's web site or have a link on the department's web site
in a manner that is easily accessible to parents and caregivers.
(6)(a) The department must charge a fee for additional reratings
requests made by program participants.
(b) Fees charged are based on, but may not exceed, the cost to the
department for the class of activities associated with the early
achievers program.
(c) The director shall establish the fees charged for the early
achievers rerating process by rule.
(7)(a) The department shall create a professional development
pathway for early achievers participants to obtain a high school
diploma or higher education credential in early childhood education,
early childhood studies, child development, or an academic field
related to early care and education.
(b) The professional development pathway must include opportunities
for scholarships and grants to assist early achievers participants with
the costs associated with obtaining an educational degree.
(8) Before final implementation of the early achievers program, the
department shall report on program progress, as defined within the race
to the top federal grant award, and expenditures to the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. Nothing in this
section changes the department's responsibility to collectively bargain
over mandatory subjects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
THE EARLY ACHIEVERS PROGRAM DATA COLLECTION AND EVALUATION. (1)
The department shall collect longitudinal, student-level data on all
children attending a working connections child care program or an early
childhood education and assistance program. Data reported must be
disaggregated in the smallest units allowable by law that do not
identify an individual student. Data must be disaggregated by distinct
ethnic categories within racial subgroups that align with categories
established by the education data center established in RCW 43.41.400.
Data collected should capture at a minimum the following
characteristics:
(a) Daily program attendance;
(b) Identification of classroom and teacher;
(c) Early achievers program quality level rating;
(d) Program hours;
(e) Program duration; and
(f) Child cognitive and developmental gains.
(2) Data collected pursuant to this section shall be provided to
the education data center established in RCW 43.41.400.
(3) Data collected pursuant to this section shall be provided to
the Washington state institute for public policy.
(4)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct a longitudinal analysis examining relationships between the
early achievers program quality ratings levels and outcomes for
children participating in subsidized early care and education programs.
(b) The institute shall submit the first report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2017. The institute
shall submit subsequent reports annually to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 31st, with the final report due December
31, 2020. The final report shall include a cost-benefit analysis.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.215.135 and 2013 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability ((and)),
quality of care for children from low-income households, and support
school readiness for young learners. Policies for the expenditure of
funds constituting the working connections child care program must be
consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410 and the
standards established in this section intended to promote quality early
care and education programming, and stability and continuity of care
for children.
(2) ((Beginning in fiscal year 2013,)) Authorizations for the
working connections child care subsidy ((shall be)) are effective for
twelve months ((unless a change in circumstances necessitates
reauthorization sooner than twelve months. The twelve-month
certification applies only if the enrollments in the child care subsidy
or working connections child care program are capped.
(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, beginning September 1, 2013, working connections
child care providers shall receive a five percent increase in the
subsidy rate for enrolling in level 2 in the early achievers programs.
Providers must complete level 2 and advance to level 3 within thirty
months in order to maintain this increase)). A child is eligible for
working connections child care for a twelve-month enrollment period and
may not be deemed ineligible due to any change in circumstance
including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) A change in family composition;
(b) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's employment status;
(c) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's employment status due
to health, maternity or paternity leave, or other family leave
condition as provided for in chapter 49.78 RCW; or
(d) A change in a parent's or a caregiver's income.
(3) The department shall adopt rules pertaining to the working
connections child care program that outline the following:
(a) Allowable periods of child absences;
(b) Required contact with parents or caregivers to discuss child
absences and encourage regular program attendance; and
(c) A deenrollment procedure when allowable child absences are
exceeded.
(4) Child care providers serving nonschool age children and
receiving state subsidy payments must enroll in the early achievers
program and complete level two activities by July 1, 2017.
(5) Child care providers serving nonschool age children and
receiving state subsidy payments must be rated at level three in the
early achievers program by July 1, 2019.
(6) Effective July 1, 2015, a new child care provider serving
nonschool age children and receiving state subsidy payments must:
(a) Enroll in the early achievers program within thirty days;
(b) Complete the early achievers program quality level two
activities within twelve months from receiving a state subsidy; and
(c) Rate as an early achievers program quality level three within
thirty months from receiving a state subsidy payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
CONTRACTED CHILD CARE SLOTS. (1) The department shall employ a
combination of vouchers and contracted slots for the subsidized child
care program in RCW 43.215.135. Child care vouchers preserve parental
choice. Child care contracted slots promote access to continuous
quality care for children, provide parents and caregivers stable child
care that supports employment, and allow providers to have predictable
funding.
(2) The department's duties relating to child care contracted slots
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Contracting at least twenty percent of the working connections
child care program slots by January 1, 2016;
(b) Awarding contracted slots via a competitive process and
prioritizing child care programs with at least one of the following
characteristics:
(i) Programs offering full workday early care and education
opportunities;
(ii) Programs located in a high-need geographic area;
(iii) Programs partnering with elementary schools to offer
transitional planning and support to children as they advance to
kindergarten; or
(iv) Programs serving children involved in the child welfare system
or children diagnosed with a special need;
(c) Paying a provider for each contracted slot, unless a contracted
slot is not used for thirty days;
(d) Charging a child care copayment for each contracted slot; and
(e) Establishing a copayment fee by rule.
(3) Only a child care provider who participates in the early
achievers program and rates at a level three, four, or five is eligible
to be awarded a contracted slot.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.215.425 and 1994 c 166 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for
the administration of the early childhood education and assistance
program. Approved early childhood education and assistance programs
shall conduct needs assessments of their service area, identify any
targeted groups of children, to include but not be limited to children
of seasonal and migrant farmworkers and native American populations
living either on or off reservation, and provide to the department a
service delivery plan, to the extent practicable, that addresses these
targeted populations.
(2) The department, in developing rules for the early childhood
education and assistance program, shall consult with the advisory
committee, and shall consider such factors as coordination with
existing head start and other early childhood programs, the preparation
necessary for instructors, qualifications of instructors, adequate
space and equipment, and special transportation needs. The rules shall
specifically require the early childhood programs to provide for
parental involvement in participation with their child's program, in
local program policy decisions, in development and revision of service
delivery systems, and in parent education and training.
(3) The department shall adopt rules pertaining to the early
childhood education and assistance program that outline allowable
periods of child absences, required contact with parents or caregivers
to discuss child absences and encourage regular attendance, and a
deenrollment procedure when allowable child absences are exceeded.
(4) The department shall adopt rules requiring all employees and
volunteers of early childhood education and assistance programs to
submit to a fingerprint background check. Fingerprint background check
procedures for the early childhood education and assistance program
shall be the same as the background check procedures in RCW 43.215.215.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.215.415 and 1994 c 166 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Approved early childhood programs shall receive state-funded
support through the department. Public or private nonsectarian
organizations, including, but not limited to school districts,
educational service districts, community and technical colleges, local
governments, or nonprofit organizations, are eligible to participate as
providers of the state early childhood program.
(2) Funds appropriated for the state program shall be used to
continue to operate existing programs or to establish new or expanded
early childhood programs((, and shall not be used to supplant federally
supported head start programs)).
(3) Funds obtained by providers through voluntary grants or
contributions from individuals, agencies, corporations, or
organizations may be used to expand or enhance preschool programs so
long as program standards established by the department are
maintained((, but shall not be used to supplant federally supported
head start programs or state-supported early childhood programs)).
(4) Persons applying to conduct the early childhood program shall
identify targeted groups and the number of children to be served,
program components, the qualifications of instructional and special
staff, the source and amount of grants or contributions from sources
other than state funds, facilities and equipment support, and
transportation and personal care arrangements.
(5) Early childhood education and assistance providers must enroll
in the early achievers program and be rated at a level three by July 1,
2015.
(6) Early childhood education and assistance providers must be
rated at a level four in the early achievers program by July 1, 2019.
(7) Effective January 1, 2014, new early childhood education and
assistance program slots are only available to early achievers program
participants rated at a level three, four, or five.
(8) Effective July 1, 2017, any provider administering an early
childhood education and assistance program must institute a working
connections child care program and maintain an optional full workday
program.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.215.455 and 2010 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, an early learning program to
provide voluntary preschool opportunities for children three and four
years of age shall be implemented according to the funding and
implementation plan in RCW ((43.215.142)) 43.215.456. The program must
be a comprehensive program providing early childhood education and
family support, options for parental involvement, and health
information, screening, and referral services, as family need is
determined. Participation in the program is voluntary. On a space
available basis, the program may allow enrollment of children who are
not otherwise eligible by assessing a fee.
(2) The first phase of the program shall be implemented by
utilizing the program standards and eligibility criteria in the early
childhood education and assistance program in RCW 43.215.400 through
43.215.450.
(3) The program implementation in this section shall prioritize
programs meeting at least one of the following characteristics:
(a) Programs located in a high-need geographical area;
(b) Programs offering services to children diagnosed with a special
need or children involved in the child welfare system; or
(c) Programs that receive a working connections child care subsidy
pursuant to RCW 43.215.135.
(4) Only providers meeting both of the following requirements are
eligible for the program implementation in this section:
(a) Providers participating in the early achievers program and
rated at a level 3, 4, or 5; and
(b) Providers offering full workday early care and education
programming.
(5) The director shall adopt rules for the following program
components, as appropriate and necessary during the phased
implementation of the program:
(a) Minimum program standards, including lead teacher, assistant
teacher, and staff qualifications;
(b) Approval of program providers; and
(c) Accountability and adherence to performance standards.
(((4))) (6) The department has administrative responsibility for:
(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules
developed by the director under this section;
(b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program
quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible
children;
(c) Assuring that program providers work cooperatively with school
districts to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten
so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported;
and
(d) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
SINGLE SET OF LICENSING STANDARDS. No later than July 1, 2015, the
department shall implement a single set of licensing standards for
child care and the early childhood education and assistance program.
The new licensing standards must:
(1) Use the early achievers program as a foundational framework and
eliminate additional burdensome regulations for providers who
demonstrate higher levels of quality care;
(2) Take into account the separate needs of family care providers
and child care centers; and
(3) Promote the continued safety of child care settings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
INTEGRATION WITH LOCAL GOVERNMENT EFFORTS. (1) The foundation of
the early care and education system in Washington is the quality rating
and improvement system entitled the early achievers program. In an
effort to build on the existing quality framework, enhance access to
quality care for children, and strengthen the entire early care and
education system in the state, it is important to integrate the efforts
of local government.
(2) Local government is encouraged to collaborate with the
department when establishing early learning programs for residents.
(3) Local government may contribute funds to the department for the
following purposes:
(a) Initial investments to build capacity and quality in local
early care and education programming; and
(b) Reductions in copayments charged to parents or caregivers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 2013 2nd sp.s. c 16 s 2 (uncodified) is
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
Chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (this act) may be known and cited as
the early start act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2014, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---