BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Students in public schools are bringing more
health conditions to school at the same time school districts are
reducing nursing services. As a result, school districts are becoming
more dependent upon unlicensed, minimally trained, and many times
unwilling classified employees to provide these services.
Over the years, unlicensed employees have sought and received
legislative approval for protections from employer reprisal if they
refuse to deliver nursing services and liability protections if they
provide nursing services that harm a student. It is clear that
unlicensed employees will be expected to deliver new medications and
nursing services not currently recognized in state law to students in
the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2014, a school district employee not licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW who is asked to administer medications or
perform nursing services not previously recognized in law shall at the
time he or she is asked to administer the medication or perform the
nursing service file, without coercion by the employer, a voluntary
written, current, and unexpired letter of intent stating the employee's
willingness to administer the new medication or nursing service. It is
understood that the letter of intent will expire if the conditions of
acceptance are substantially changed. If a school employee who is not
licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW chooses not to file a letter under
this section, the employee is not subject to any employer reprisal or
disciplinary action for refusing to file a letter.
(2) In the event a school employee provides the medication or
service to a student in substantial compliance with (a) rules adopted
by the state nursing care quality assurance commission and the
instructions of a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse
practitioner issued under such rules, and (b) written policies of the
school district or private school, then the employee, the employee's
school district or school of employment, and the members of the
governing board and chief administrator thereof are not liable in any
criminal action or for civil damages in his or her individual, marital,
governmental, corporate, or other capacity as a result of providing the
medication or service.
(3) The board of directors shall designate a professional person
licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.57, or 18.79 RCW as it applies to
registered nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners to
consult and coordinate with the student's parents and health care
provider, and train and supervise the appropriate school district
personnel in proper procedures to ensure a safe, therapeutic learning
environment. School employees must receive the training provided under
this subsection before they are authorized to deliver the service or
medication. Such training must be provided, where necessary, on an
ongoing basis to ensure that the proper procedures are not forgotten
because the services or medication are delivered infrequently.

--- END ---