BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature acknowledges that
paraeducators have become a significant resource to students who need
additional education assistance. School districts have come to rely
upon paraeducators who, for instance, provided more than half of the
hours of instruction in the 2012-13 school year to students in the
learning assistance program, the transitional bilingual instruction
program, the federal disadvantaged program, head start, and the federal
limited English proficiency program. Paraeducators are often the
primary caretakers in the classroom for students with special needs and
provided more than half of the hours of instruction in the 2012-13
school year to students in special education.
The legislature further recognizes that there is significant
variability in paraeducator standards. In some situations,
paraeducators are expected to provide services for which they are not
trained or qualified. In other situations, their knowledge, skills,
and commitment to education are underused. A clear definition of the
differentiated knowledge, skills, and abilities associated with
different jobs will ensure that students receive the education services
they need and deserve.
Paraeducator training and professional development varies
significantly dependent upon school district and program. With few
exceptions, paraeducator training has been significantly reduced over
the last several years due to state and school district budget cuts.
A carefully constructed paraeducator development program is
intended to place the highest qualified paraeducators working with the
highest need students. Such a program when combined with a career
ladder will offer paraeducators real opportunities for upward mobility.
Since paraeducators more closely reflect the cultural diversity of the
student population, a development program and career ladder is likely
to encourage more paraeducators to become teachers. Training teachers
how to work with a paraeducator in their classrooms will increase
paraeducators' ability to teach students who need additional
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The professional educator standards
board shall convene a work group to design program specific minimum
employment standards for paraeducators, professional development and
education opportunities that support the standards, a paraeducator
career ladder, an articulated pathway for teacher preparation and
certification, and teacher professional development on how to maximize
the use of paraeducators in the classroom.
(b) The work group must include representatives of the professional
educator standards board; the Green River Community College center of
excellence for careers in education; educational service districts;
community and technical college paraeducator apprenticeship and
certificate programs; colleges of education; teacher, paraeducator,
principal, and administrator associations; career and technical
education; special education parents and advocacy organizations;
community-based organizations representing immigrant and refugee
communities; community-based organizations representing communities of
color; the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability
committee; and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) By January 10, 2015, the work group shall submit a report to
the education committees of the legislature that recommends:
(a) Appropriate minimum employment standards and professional
development opportunities for paraeducators who work in:
(i) English language learner programs, transitional bilingual
instruction programs, and federal limited English proficiency programs;
and
(ii) The learning assistance program and federal disadvantaged
program;
(b) A career ladder that encourages paraeducators to pursue
advanced education and professional development as well as increased
instructional ability and responsibility;
(c) An articulated pathway for teacher preparation that includes:
(i) Paraeducator certificate and apprenticeship programs that offer
course credits that apply to transferrable associate degrees and are
aligned with the standards and competencies for teachers adopted by the
professional educator standards board;
(ii) Associate degree programs that build on and do not duplicate
the courses and competencies of paraeducator certificate programs,
incorporate field experiences, are aligned with the standards and
competencies for teachers adopted by the professional educator
standards board, and are transferrable to bachelor's degree in
education programs and teacher certification programs;
(iii) Bachelor's degree programs that lead to teacher certification
that build on and do not duplicate the courses and competencies of
transferrable associate degrees;
(iv) Incorporation of the standards for cultural competence
developed by the professional educator standards board under RCW
28A.410.270 throughout the courses and curriculum of the pathway,
particularly focusing on multicultural education and principles of
language acquisition; and
(v) Comparing the current status of pathways for teacher
certification to the elements of the articulated pathway, highlighting
gaps and recommending strategies to address the gaps;
(d) Professional development for certificated employees that
focuses on maximizing the success of paraeducators in the classroom.
(3) The work group must submit a final report of its
recommendations to the education committees of the legislature by
January 10, 2016, concerning:
(a) Minimum employment standards for basic education and special
education paraeducators; and
(b) Appropriate professional development and training to help
paraeducators meet the employment standards.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board and the state board for
community and technical colleges may exercise their respective
authorities regarding program approval to implement the articulated
pathway for teacher preparation and certification recommended pursuant
to section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section 2 of this act) in
approved teacher certification programs and certificate and degree
programs offered by community and technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year, any community or
technical college that offers an apprenticeship program or certificate
program for paraeducators must provide candidates the opportunity to
earn transferrable course credits within the program. The programs
must also incorporate the standards for cultural competence, including
multicultural education and principles of language acquisition,
developed by the professional educator standards board under RCW
28A.410.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015, from the general fund to the
professional educator standards board to convene a work group in
accordance with section 2 of this act.

--- END ---