BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.380 and 2012 c 2 s 112 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is a retailer's license to be designated as a special
occasion license to be issued to a not-for-profit society or
organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving
for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such as at picnics or
other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee sixty
dollars per day.
(1) The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales
of no more than twelve calendar days per year. For the purposes of
this subsection, special occasion licensees that are "agricultural area
fairs" or "agricultural county, district, and area fairs," as defined
by RCW 15.76.120, that receive a special occasion license may, once per
calendar year, count as one event fairs that last multiple days, so
long as alcohol sales are at set dates, times, and locations, and the
board receives prior notification of the dates, times, and locations.
The special occasion license applicant will pay the sixty dollars per
day for this event.
(2) The licensee may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine in original,
unopened containers for off-premises consumption if permission is
obtained from the board prior to the event.
(3) In addition to offering the sale of wine by the individual
serving for on-premises consumption, the licensee may sell wine in
original, unopened containers for on-premises consumption if permission
is obtained from the board prior to the event.
(4) Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to
be confined to specified premises or designated areas only.
(((4))) (5) Liquor sold under this special occasion license must be
purchased from a licensee of the board.
(((5))) (6) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil
infraction having a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars as
provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---