BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.360 and 2012 c 2 s 104 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is a grocery store license to sell wine and/or beer,
including without limitation strong beer at retail in original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold.
(2) There is a wine retailer reseller endorsement of a grocery
store license, to sell wine at retail in original containers to
retailers licensed to sell wine for consumption on the premises, for
resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of the
license. However, no single sale may exceed twenty-four liters, unless
the sale is made by a licensee that was a contract liquor store manager
of a contract-operated liquor store at the location from which such
sales are made. For the purposes of this title, a grocery store
license is a retail license, and a sale by a grocery store licensee
with a reseller endorsement is a retail sale only if not for resale.
(3) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may
also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding
less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
(4) The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred
fifty dollars for each store.
(5) The annual fee for the wine retailer reseller endorsement is
one hundred sixty-six dollars for each store.
(6) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee may also
receive an endorsement to permit the sale of beer to a purchaser in a
sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser, or
provided by the licensee or manufacturer, and fill at the tap by the
licensee at the time of sale.
(7) The board must issue a restricted grocery store license
authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board
finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong
beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In
determining the public interest, the board must consider at least the
following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
must issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(((7))) (8) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain
a minimum three thousand dollar inventory of food products for human
consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.
(((8))) (9) A grocery store licensee with a wine retailer reseller
endorsement may accept delivery of wine at its licensed premises or at
one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which
facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from
which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to
sales permitted by this title, to other licensed premises, to other
registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state.
Facilities may be registered and utilized by associations,
cooperatives, or comparable groups of grocery store licensees.
(((9))) (10) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee
may also receive an endorsement to permit the international export of
beer, strong beer, and wine.
(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed
to do business within the state of Washington.
(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement
must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and
the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the
licensee.
(c) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
be sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the
holder of the license.
(d) The annual cost of this endorsement is five hundred dollars and
is in addition to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery
store license.
(((10))) (11) A grocery store licensee holding a snack bar license
under RCW 66.24.350 may receive an endorsement to allow the sale of
confections containing more than one percent but not more than ten
percent alcohol by weight to persons twenty-one years of age or older.
(12) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---