BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.260.090 and 2007 c 269 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall issue an initial credential or renewal
credential to an applicant who has met the requirements for a
credential or deny an initial credential or renewal credential based
upon failure to meet the requirements for a credential or
unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by chapter 18.130 RCW.
(2) The commission may adopt rules for renewal requirements for a
credential, including continuing education requirements for expanded
function dental auxiliary licenses.

--- END ---