BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.205.040 and 2008 c 135 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the use
of the title)) (1) A person credentialed as a "certified chemical
dependency professional" or a "certified chemical dependency
professional trainee" ((when treating)) may treat patients only in
((settings other than)) programs approved under chapter 70.96A RCW.
(2) A person credentialed as a "certified chemical dependency
professional" or a "certified chemical dependency professional trainee"
who also holds a license as an advanced registered nurse practitioner
under chapter 18.79 RCW, marriage and family therapist, mental health
counselor, advanced social worker, or independent clinical social
worker under chapter 18.225 RCW, psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW,
osteopathic physician under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physician
assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, physician under chapter 18.71 RCW,
or a physician assistant under 18.71A RCW may treat patients in
settings other than programs approved under chapter 70.96A RCW.

--- END ---