BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Ostrea lurida is the only oyster native
to Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The Ostrea lurida is hereby designated the official oyster of the
state of Washington. This native oyster species plays an important
role in the history and culture that surrounds shellfish in Washington
state and along the west coast of the United States. Some of the
common tribal and other names used for this species are Native,
Western, and Olympia.

--- END ---