BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.34.380 and 2011 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An association is encouraged to establish a reserve account
with a financial institution to fund major maintenance, repair, and
replacement of common elements, including limited common elements that
will require major maintenance, repair, or replacement within thirty
years. If the association establishes a reserve account, the account
must be in the name of the association. The board of directors is
responsible for administering the reserve account.
(2) Unless doing so would impose an unreasonable hardship, an
association with significant assets shall prepare and update a reserve
study, in accordance with the association's governing documents and RCW
64.34.224(1). The initial reserve study must be based upon a visual
site inspection conducted by a reserve study professional.
(3) Unless doing so would impose an unreasonable hardship, the
association shall update the reserve study annually. At least every
three years, an updated reserve study must be prepared and based upon
a visual site inspection conducted by a reserve study professional.
After an association has had one reserve study conducted by a reserve
study professional, the association is exempt from the requirements of
this subsection if: (a) The association has fewer than fifty units;
(b) the units in the association are limited to residents fifty-five
years of age or older; and (c) all units in the association are owner-occupied.
(4) This section and RCW 64.34.382 through 64.34.392 apply to
condominiums governed by chapter 64.32 RCW or this chapter and intended
in whole or in part for residential purposes. These sections do not
apply to condominiums consisting solely of units that are restricted in
the declaration to nonresidential use. An association's governing
documents may contain stricter requirements.

--- END ---