BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.350 and 1997 c 321 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license to be designated
as a snack bar license to sell beer by the opened bottle or can at
retail and wine by the individual glass, for consumption upon the
premises in an area approved by the board only((,)). Such license to
be issued to places where the sale of beer and wine is not the
principal business conducted; fee one hundred twenty-five dollars per
year.

--- END ---