BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The cultural organizations of the state provide numerous public
benefits. Providing support for the state's cultural organizations is
in the public interest and will serve multiple public purposes
including, among others, enhancing and extending the educational reach
and offerings of cultural organizations; ensuring continued and
expanded access to the facilities and programs of cultural
organizations by economically and geographically underserved
populations; and providing financial stability to the organizations to
enable them to focus on core missions as well as to continue and extend
the numerous public benefits they provide.
(b) Economic impact studies consistently confirm that cultural
institutions represent a multibillion dollar segment of the state's
overall economy and are directly responsible for tens of thousands of
jobs.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to authorize the cultural access
program, under which cultural access authorities authorize funding for
public school cultural access programs and support cultural
organizations, subject to voter approval.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrative costs" means all operating, administrative, and
maintenance expenses of an authority, a designated public agency, or a
designated entity.
(2) "Attendance" means the total number of visits by persons in
physical attendance during a year at cultural organization facilities
located or cultural organization programs provided within an authority
service area, including attendance for which admission was paid,
discounted, or free, consistent with and verifiable under guidelines
adopted by the appropriate authority.
(3) "Authority" means a cultural access authority under the
cultural access program.
(4) "Authority board" means the board of directors of an authority.
(5) "Cultural organization" means a nonprofit corporation
incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington and recognized
by the internal revenue service as described in section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, with its principal
location or locations and conducting a majority of its activities
within the state, not including: Any agency of the state or any of its
political subdivisions; any municipal corporation; any organization
that raises funds for redistribution to multiple cultural
organizations; or any radio or television broadcasting network or
station, cable communications system, internet-based communications
venture or service, newspaper, or magazine. The primary purpose of the
organization must be the advancement and preservation of science or
technology, the visual or performing arts, zoology, botany,
anthropology, heritage, or natural history and any organization shall
directly provide programming or experiences available to the general
public. Any organization with the primary purpose of advancing and
preserving zoology such as zoos and aquariums must be or support a
facility that is accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums or
its functional successor. A state-related cultural organization may be
a cultural organization.
(6) "Designated entity" means the entity designated by the
legislative authority of a county creating the authority, as required
under section 601(1)(d) of this act. The entity may be a public
agency, including the state arts commission established under chapter
43.46 RCW, or a Washington nonprofit corporation that is not a cultural
organization eligible for funding under this chapter.
(7) "Designated public agency" means the public agency designated
by the legislative authority of a county creating the authority, as
required under section 601(2)(h) of this act.
(8) "Revenues" means revenues from all sources generated by a
cultural organization, consistent with generally accepted accounting
practices and any authority guidelines, excluding: (a) Revenues
associated with capital projects other than major maintenance projects
including, but not limited to, capital campaign expenses; (b) funds
provided under this chapter; (c) revenue that would be considered
unrelated business taxable income under the internal revenue code of
1986, as amended; and (d) with respect to a state-related cultural
organization, state funding received by it or for the institution it
supports. Revenues include transfers from an organization's endowment
or reserves and may include the value of in-kind goods and services to
the extent permitted under any authority guidelines.
(9) "Service area" means the area included within the boundaries of
a cultural access authority.
(10) "State-related cultural organization" means an organization
incorporated as a nonprofit corporation under the laws of the state of
Washington and recognized by the internal revenue service as described
in section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended,
with a primary purpose and directly providing programming or
experiences available to the general public consistent with the
requirements for recognition as a cultural organization under this
chapter operating in a facility owned and supported by the state, a
state agency, or state educational institution.

PART III
CULTURAL ACCESS PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 CREATION. (1) Any county may create an
authority by resolution of the county legislative authority.
(2) The boundaries of an authority service area may be coextensive
with the boundaries of the county that created the authority, including
incorporated areas, or, in the discretion of the county that created
the authority, encompass only portions of such county, as determined by
such county.
(3) A cultural access authority is not a special purpose district
for purposes of chapter 36.93 RCW. Neither the creation of a cultural
access authority by a county nor the establishment of or change in the
boundaries of a cultural access authority is subject to review by a
boundary review board.
(4)(a) An authority created by a county with a population less than
one million five hundred thousand must be governed by either a three-member or a five-member authority board appointed by the county
legislative authority.
(b) An authority created by a county with a population of more than
one million five hundred thousand must be governed by a five-member
authority board consisting of three members appointed by the
legislative authority of the county; and one member appointed by the
legislative authority of each of the two largest cities by population
as of formation of the authority. The members of the authority board
shall serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be
appointed for a one-year initial term, one must be appointed for a two-year initial term, one must be appointed for a three-year initial term,
and the remainder must be appointed for four-year terms.
(c)(i) Authority board members may not be members of the
legislative authority of a county creating the authority or of any city
or town located in such county.
(ii) In any county creating the authority with an elected county
executive, authority board members appointed by the county legislative
authority must be nominated by the county executive, subject to
confirmation by the county legislative authority.
(iii) A vacancy on an authority board must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment was made, and the person appointed
to fill a vacancy shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term
of the office for the position to which he or she was appointed.
(iv) Any board member may be removed from office by action of at
least two-thirds of the members of the legislative authority that made
the appointment.
(v) Authority board members may serve up to two full consecutive
terms, in addition to serving one shorter initial term upon the
formation of an authority or one shorter unexpired term filling a board
vacancy.
(5) Any contiguous group of counties may create an authority by
entering into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, approved
by resolution of the county legislative authorities. Such interlocal
agreement shall provide for the composition of such an authority's
board, the manner in which authority board members are appointed, and
such other governance matters as the counties forming such an authority
may determine. In all other respects, an authority formed by a
contiguous group of counties under such an interlocal agreement
constitutes an authority established or created under this chapter.
(6) An authority is a municipal corporation, a political
subdivision, an independent taxing authority, and a taxing district.
(7) An authority constitutes a body corporate and possesses all the
usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other
powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute.
(8) An authority board must adopt ethics policies consistent with
applicable law and generally recognized best practices for comparable
entities addressing disclosure and management of potential conflicts of
interest, among other matters. The policies must apply to authority
board members, officers, and employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 START-UP FUNDING AND CONDITIONAL
FORMATION. (1) The county creating an authority may provide for such
county to advance to the authority funding for up to four years for its
administrative costs, including the cost of informing the public about
the formation of the authority, how it is proposed to be funded, and
the public benefits to be realized if it is successful. However, this
subsection does not authorize the preparation and distribution of
information to the general public for the purpose of influencing the
outcome of an authority election.
(2) The county creating an authority must require repayment of any
start-up funding advanced to an authority from the proceeds of taxes
authorized under sections 401 through 403 of this act and approved by
voters after the taxes are first collected. The funds must be repaid
to such county with interest at the internal rate of return on the
invested funds of such county.
(3)(a) An authority must be dissolved four years after its
formation unless it has secured voter approval of one of the taxes
authorized under sections 401 through 403 of this act. Upon
dissolution of an authority after three years without securing voter
approval of a proposed tax, an authority may not again be formed under
this chapter by the same county for three years following the
dissolution of a predecessor.
(b) A county that created a dissolved authority may form another
authority under this chapter without delay if the boundaries of the
service area of the new authority differ from the boundaries of the
service area of the dissolved authority.
(c) Any expended funds of the county creating the authority
advanced to an authority that is dissolved as provided under this
section need not be repaid to such county. Any remaining funds on hand
upon dissolution must be returned to such county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 NONSUPPLANTATION. In creating an
authority under this chapter or appointing members of the board of the
authority, any county creating the authority or city appointing board
members shall affirm that any funding such county or city usually and
customarily provides to cultural organizations similar to funding that
would be available to those organizations under this chapter may not be
replaced or materially diminished as a result of funding becoming
available under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 ADVISORY COUNCILS. Each authority
established under this chapter may establish an advisory council, the
membership of which must include citizen representatives of
constituencies and organizations with interests relevant to the work of
the authority including, but not limited to, leaders in the business,
educational, and cultural communities. Advisory council members should
be residents of the service area of the authority. Policies concerning
the size and operation of any advisory council must be established by
the authority that forms the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 POWERS AND PURPOSES. In addition to
accomplishing the cultural organization support activities specifically
authorized under this chapter, an authority may:
(1) Maintain an office or offices;
(2) Sue and be sued in its own name, and plead and be impleaded;
(3) Engage consultants, agents, attorneys, and advisers, contract
with state and local governmental entities for services, and hire as
provided in sections 309 and 310 of this act such employees, agents,
and other personnel as the authority deems necessary, useful, or
convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(4) Establish procurement policies by resolution, including
procedures for competitive procurement of services when required under
its established policies;
(5) Make and execute all manner of contracts, agreements, and
documents with public and private parties as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(6) Acquire and hold real or personal property, or any interest
therein, in the name of the authority, and sell, assign, lease,
encumber, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the same in the manner as
the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes. Any county legislative authority may transfer property, with
or without consideration, to an authority created under this chapter;
(7) Open and maintain accounts in qualified public depositaries and
otherwise provide for the investment of any funds not required for
immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments;
(8) Appear in its own behalf before boards, commissions,
departments, or agencies of federal, state, or local government;
(9) Procure insurance in amounts and from insurers as the authority
deems desirable including, but not limited to, insurance against any
loss or damage to its property or other assets, public liability
insurance for injuries to persons or property, and liability insurance
with limits an authority board deems reasonable for the purpose of
protecting and holding personally harmless board members, officers, and
employees of the authority against liability arising from their acts or
omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their
official duties;
(10) Apply for and accept grants, loans, advances, and
contributions from any source of money, property, labor, or other
things of value, to be held, used, and applied as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes, without
competing with cultural organizations as defined under this chapter or
private organizations that raise funds for distribution to cultural
organizations;
(11) Make expenditures as are appropriate for paying the
administrative costs and expenses of the authority in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter;
(12) Establish reserves and special funds, and controls on deposits
to and disbursements from them, as the authority deems necessary,
useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(13) Prepare, publish, and distribute, with or without charge,
studies, reports, bulletins, and other material as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(14) Conduct meetings at which members participating through the
use of any means of communication by which all board members
participating can hear each other during the meeting are deemed to be
present in person at the meeting for all purposes;
(15) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(16) Adopt rules and guidelines as may be necessary to implement
this chapter; and
(17) Exercise any other power the authority deems necessary,
useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes and exercise the
powers expressly granted in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 EXPENSE REIMBURSEMENT PROCEDURES. The
authority board shall adopt a resolution that may be amended from time
to time governing methods and amounts of reimbursement payable to board
members, officers, and employees for travel and other business expenses
incurred on behalf of the authority. The resolution must, among other
things, establish procedures for approving expenses, the form of travel
and expense vouchers, and requirements governing the use of credit
cards issued in the name of the authority. Board members, officers,
and employees may be advanced sufficient sums to cover their
anticipated expenses in accordance with rules adopted by the state
auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 PER DIEM COMPENSATION. Each member of the
authority board may receive compensation of fifty dollars per day for
attending meetings or conferences on behalf of the authority, not to
exceed three thousand dollars per year. A board member may waive all
or a portion of his or her compensation under this section during his
or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the authority.
The compensation provided in this section is in addition to
reimbursement for expenses paid to board members by the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 DEFENSE AND INDEMNITY. Whenever an
action, claim, or proceeding is instituted against a person who is or
was a board member, officer, or employee of an authority arising out of
the performance of duties for or employment with the authority, the
authority may grant a request by the person that the attorney of the
authority's choosing be authorized to defend the claim, suit, or
proceeding, and the costs of defense, attorneys' fees, and obligation
for payments arising from the action may be paid from the authority's
funds. Costs of defense, judgment, or settlement against the person
may not be paid in a case where the court has found that the person was
not acting in good faith within the scope of employment with or duties
for the authority. No board member or officer of the authority may be
personally liable for acts done or omitted in good faith while
performing duties as a board member or officer on behalf of the
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 EMPLOYEES, SALARIES, AND BENEFITS. An
authority may create and fill positions; fix reasonable wages and
salaries; pay costs involved in hiring employees; and establish
reasonable benefits for employees, including holiday pay, vacations or
vacation pay, retirement benefits, and medical, life, accident, or
health disability insurance, as approved by the board. Authority board
members, at their own expense, may be included under any authority
policy for medical, life, accident, or health disability insurance.
Insurance for employees and board members may not be considered
compensation. Coverage for the board under any authority policy is not
to exceed that provided authority employees. An authority is a
political subdivision for purposes of participation in the state public
employees' retirement system under RCW 41.40.062 and for other
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 ALTERNATIVE ADMINISTRATIVE ARRANGEMENTS.
The board of an authority with a service area population of less than
one million five hundred thousand may contract with the state arts
commission formed under chapter 43.46 RCW for the provision of
consulting, management, or other administrative services. The board of
any authority may, with the consent of the county creating such
authority, elect to consolidate administration of such an authority
with that of the entity or public agency designated by the county
creating such authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 TREASURER. At the request of the
authority, the treasurer of any county creating the authority may serve
as the ex officio treasurer of the authority.

PART IV
FUNDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 AUTHORITY TO IMPOSE TAX. (1) An authority
established under this chapter may impose sales and use taxes under
section 402 of this act or regular property tax levies under section
403 of this act within the authority service area for the purposes
authorized under section 601 of this act.
(2) If an authority imposes sales and use taxes under section 402
of this act, the authority may not impose a regular property tax levy
under section 403 of this act so long as such sales and use taxes are
in effect.
(3) If an authority imposes a regular property tax levy under
section 403 of this act, the authority may not impose sales and use
taxes under section 402 of this act so long as such property tax levy
is in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
VOTED SALES AND USE TAXES. (1) The authority board may impose a
sales and use tax of up to one-tenth of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax, within the authority service area when specifically
authorized to do so by a majority of the voters voting on a proposition
submitted at a special election held after June 30, 2015. The ballot
proposition may provide for the tax to apply for a period of up to
seven consecutive years.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the authority service area.
(3) The authority board may reimpose a tax imposed under this
section for one or more additional periods of up to seven consecutive
years, in each case when specifically authorized to reimpose the tax by
a majority of the voters voting on a proposition submitted at any
special election.
(4) Moneys collected under this section may only be used for the
purposes set forth in section 601 of this act.
(5) The department must perform the collection of taxes under this
section on behalf of an authority at no cost to the authority, and the
state treasurer must distribute those taxes as available on a monthly
basis to the authority or, upon the direction of the authority, to its
treasurer or a fiscal agent, paying agent, or trustee for obligations
issued or incurred by the authority.
(6) The definitions in section 201 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 84.52
RCW to read as follows:
VOTED PROPERTY TAX. (1) The authority board may impose annual
regular property tax levies within the authority service area when
specifically authorized to do so by a majority of the voters voting on
a proposition submitted at a special election held after June 30, 2015.
The ballot proposition must set forth the total dollar amount to be
collected in the first year of the levy and may provide for a levy for
a period of up to seven consecutive years. The total dollar amount to
be set forth in the ballot proposition may not exceed an amount equal
to: (a) The total taxable retail sales and taxable uses within the
authority service area for the most recent calendar year as reported by
the department; multiplied by (b) one-tenth of one percent.
(2) The authority board may reimpose a tax imposed under subsection
(1) of this section for one or more additional periods of up to seven
consecutive years, in each case when specifically authorized to
reimpose the tax by a majority of the voters voting on a proposition
submitted at any special election. The ballot proposition must set
forth the total dollar amount to be collected in the first year of the
extended levy, which dollar amount may not exceed an amount equal to:
(a) The total number of taxable retail sales and taxable uses within
the authority service area for the most recent calendar year as
reported by the department; multiplied by (b) one-tenth of one percent.
(3) In the event an authority is levying property taxes that, in
combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts exceed
the limitations in RCW 84.52.043 and 84.52.050, the authority's
property tax levy must be reduced or eliminated consistent with RCW
84.52.010.
(4) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first
levy imposed under this section following the approval of the levy by
the voters under subsection (1) of this section or to the first levy
imposed under this section following the approval of an extension of
the tax by the voters under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Moneys collected under this section may only be used for the
purposes set forth in section 601 of this act.
(6) The definitions in section 201 of this act apply to this
section.

Sec. 404 RCW 84.52.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes,
and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax
levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in
RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either
of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may
not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, the portion
of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under
RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, 84.52.140, and the protected
portion of the levy under RCW 86.15.160 by flood control zone districts
in a county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or
more that are coextensive with a county, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies must be reduced as follows:
(i) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that
has a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand and is located
in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value
of any property or must be eliminated;
(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the protected portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 86.15.160 by a flood control zone district in a
county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more
that is coextensive with a county must be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated;
(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, and any portion of the
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or must be eliminated; and
(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated.
(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW
84.52.815 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis
or eliminated.

Sec. 405 RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, the portion
of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under
RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the combined rate
of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then these levies shall be reduced as follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(f) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, section 403 of this act, and any portion of the
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and
(g) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

PART V
PUBLIC BENEFITS AND PUBLIC SCHOOL CULTURAL ACCESS PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 PUBLIC BENEFITS. (1) An authority
established under this chapter shall provide or continue to provide
funding authorized under this chapter only to cultural organizations
that provide discernible public benefits. Each authority established
under this chapter shall identify a range of public benefits that
cultural organizations within its service area may provide or continue
to provide in satisfaction of this requirement for eligibility to
receive funding authorized under this chapter. The public benefits
include, without limitation: Reasonable opportunities for access to
facilities, programs, and services on a reduced or no admission fee
basis, particularly for diverse and underserved populations and
communities; providing, through technological and other means, services
or programs in locations other than an organization's own facilities;
providing educational programs and experiences both at an
organization's own facilities and in schools and other venues;
broadening cultural programs, performances, and exhibitions for the
enlightenment and entertainment of the public; supporting collaborative
relationships with other cultural organizations in order to extend the
reach and impact of the collaborating organizations for the benefit of
the public; and, in the case of community-based cultural organizations,
organizational capacity-building projects or activities that an
organization can demonstrate, to the reasonable satisfaction of the
county-designated public agency, will enhance the ability of the
organization to provide or continue to provide meaningful public
benefits not otherwise achievable.
(2) Each authority established under this chapter shall adopt
guidelines establishing a baseline standard of continuous performance
with respect to the provision of public benefits required under this
chapter and for evaluating the eligibility of any cultural organization
to receive funds under this chapter based on the continuous performance
of the organization in the provision of the public benefits. The
guidelines must include: (a) Procedures for notifying any organization
at risk of losing its eligibility to receive funds under this chapter
for failure to achieve the authority's baseline standard of performance
with respect to the continuous provision of public benefits; and (b)
measures or procedures available to the organization for either
retaining or recovering eligibility, as appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 PUBLIC SCHOOL CULTURAL ACCESS PROGRAM.
(1) An authority established under this chapter shall develop and
provide a public school cultural access program within its service
area, as provided in section 601 of this act.
(2) As determined by the authority board and to the extent
practicable consistent with available resources, the public school
cultural access program of an authority described in section 601(2) of
this act must include the following attributes:
(a) Provide benefits designed to increase public school student
access to the programming offered and facilities operated by regional
and community-based cultural organizations receiving funding under this
chapter;
(b) Offer benefits to every public school in the authority's
service area while scaling the range of benefits available to and the
frequency of opportunities to participate by any particular school to
coincide with the relative percentage of students attending the school
who participate in the national free or reduced-price school meals
program;
(c) Benefits provided under the public school cultural access
program must include, without limitation:
(i) Establishment and operation, within funding provided to support
the public school cultural access program under this subsection, of a
centralized service available to regional and community-based cultural
organizations receiving funding under this chapter and public schools
in the authority's service area to coordinate opportunities for public
school student access to the programs and activities offered by the
organizations both at the facilities and venues operated by the
organizations and through programs and experiences provided by the
organizations at schools and elsewhere;
(ii) Providing directly or otherwise funding and arranging for
transportation for public school students to attend and participate in
the programs and activities offered by such organizations;
(iii) In consultation with cultural organizations located within a
service area, preparing and maintaining a readily accessible and
current guide cataloging access opportunities and facilitating
scheduling;
(iv) Coordinating closely with cultural organizations to maximize
student utilization of available opportunities in a cost-efficient
manner including possible scheduling on a single day opportunities for
different grade levels at any one school and participation in multiple
programs or activities in the same general area for which authority-funded transportation is provided;
(v) Supporting the development of tools, materials, and media by
cultural organizations to ensure that school access programs and
activities correlate with school curricula and extend the reach of
access programs and activities for classroom use with or without direct
on-site participation, to the extent practicable;
(vi) Building meaningful partnerships with public schools and
cultural organizations in order to maximize participation in school
access programs and activities and ensure their relevance and
effectiveness;
(d) When an authority board determines that its program established
and operated as required under (c)(i) through (vi) of this subsection
has achieved sufficient scale and participation among public schools
located within its boundaries and that it has resources remaining to
devote to additional public school cultural access programs without
diminishing such participation, the authority may develop and
financially support other public school cultural access activities in
conjunction with cultural organizations receiving funds under this
chapter; public school districts; and other public or nonprofit
organizations that support cultural access. Any funding for
development and support of such activities provided to cultural
organizations receiving funds under this subsection must only be used
to supplement the public benefits provided by such organizations as
required under this chapter and may not be used by such organizations
to replace or diminish funding for such required public benefits;
(e) Preparing an annual public school cultural access plan for
authority board review and adoption prior to implementation; and
(f) Compiling an annual report documenting the reach and evaluating
the effectiveness of authority-funded public school cultural access
efforts, including recommendations to the authority board for
improvements.

PART VI
USE OF FUNDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 ALLOCATION. (1) An authority, other than
an authority described in subsection (2) of this section, must allocate
the proceeds of taxes authorized under sections 402 and 403 of this act
as follows:
(a) If any start-up funding has been provided to the authority
under section 302 of this act, the authority must annually reserve from
total funds available funding sufficient to provide for repayment of
such start-up funding until any such start-up funding has been fully
repaid;
(b) Such funding determined by the county forming such an authority
to be reserved for authority costs, including direct administrative
costs, and repaying any start-up funding provided under section 303 of
this act. Information disclosing the amount of funding to be reserved
for authority administrative costs shall be included in any proposition
submitted to authority service area voters under section 402 or 403 of
this act;
(c) The authority board must determine the percentage of total
funds available annually to be reserved for a public school cultural
access program established and managed by the authority to increase
access to cultural activities and programming for public school
students resident in the authority's service area. The activities and
programming need not be located or provided within the authority's
service area. In developing its program, the authority may consider
the attributes prescribed for a public school cultural access program
required to be undertaken under section 502(2) of this act;
(d) Remaining funds available annually, including all funds not
initially reserved under (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection as well
as funds not distributed by the authority from the reserved funds must
be distributed by the board of an authority to the entity designated by
the legislative authority of the county creating such authority. The
board of such authority shall determine:
(i) Guidelines, consistent with the requirements of this chapter,
it deems necessary or appropriate for determining the eligibility of
cultural organizations to receive funding under this chapter;
(ii) Criteria for the award of funds to eligible cultural
organizations, including the public benefits to be derived from
projects submitted for funding;
(iii) The amount of funding to be allocated to support designated
entity administrative costs;
(iv) Criteria for the identification by the authority or, if so
directed by the authority, by the designated entity of any cultural
organization or organizations that would receive annual distributions
of funds in such amounts determined by the authority or, if so directed
by the authority, the designated entity; and
(v) Procedures to be used by the designated entity in awarding
funding to other cultural organizations that may, but are not required
to include a periodic competitive process for awarding funds for
particular purposes or projects proposed by eligible cultural
organizations;
(e) In evaluating requests for funding authorized under this
chapter, the designated entity responsible for the distribution of the
funds shall consider the public benefits that any cultural
organizations represented will be derived from proposed projects. At
the conclusion of a project approved for funding, such organization is
required to report to the designated entity on the public benefits
realized;
(f) Funds distributed to cultural organizations may be used to
support cultural and educational activities, programs, and initiatives;
public benefits and communications; and basic operations. Funds may
also be used for: (i) Capital expenditures or acquisitions including,
but not limited to, the acquisition of or construction of improvements
to real property; and (ii) technology, equipment, and supplies
reasonably related to or necessary for a project otherwise eligible for
funding under this chapter. Authority guidelines may also determine
the circumstances under which funds may be used to fund start-up
expenses of new community-based cultural organizations; and
(g) If the authority board or designated entity determine the
eligibility of a cultural organization to receive funding or the
relative magnitude of the funding it receives on the basis of its
budget, revenues, or expenses, any determination with respect to a
qualifying state-related cultural organization must exclude any state
funding received by the organization or for the institution it
supports.
(2) An authority with a service area population of more than one
million five hundred thousand must allocate the proceeds of the taxes
authorized under sections 402 and 403 of this act as follows:
(a) If any start-up funding has been provided to the authority
under section 302 of this act, the authority must annually reserve from
total funds available annually funding sufficient to provide for
repayment of such start-up funding until any such start-up funding has
been fully repaid;
(b) After allocating any funds as required in (a) of this
subsection, up to one and one-fourth percent of total funds available
annually may be used for authority administrative costs;
(c) After allocating funds as required in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, ten percent of remaining funds available annually must be
used to fund a public school cultural access program to be administered
by the authority;
(d) Seventy-five percent of total remaining funds available
annually excluding funds initially reserved under (a), (b), and (c) of
this subsection must be reserved for distribution by the authority
board to regional cultural organizations that are cultural
organizations that own, operate, or support cultural facilities or
provide performances, exhibits, educational programs, experiences, or
entertainment that widely benefit and are broadly attended by the
public within the authority service area, subject to further definition
under guidelines adopted by the authority. A regional cultural
organization may also generally be characterized under authority
guidelines as a financially stable, substantial organization with full-time support and program staff, maintaining a broad-based membership
within the authority service area, having year-round or enduring
seasonal operations, being a substantial financial contributor to the
development, operation, and maintenance of the organization's principal
venue or venues, and providing substantial public benefits within the
authority service area. Such funding may be provided only to those
regional cultural organizations that the authority board determines, on
an annual basis, to have met the following guidelines:
(i) For at least the preceding three years, the organization has
been continuously in good standing as a nonprofit corporation under the
laws of the state of Washington;
(ii) The organization has its principal location or locations and
conducts the majority of its activities within the authority service
area primarily for the benefit of authority residents;
(iii) The organization has not declared bankruptcy or suspended or
substantially curtailed operations for a period longer than six months
during the preceding two years;
(iv) The organization has provided to the authority audited annual
financial statements for at least its two most recent fiscal years;
(v) Over the three preceding years, the organization has minimum
average annual revenues of at least one million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars. The authority board shall annually and cumulatively
adjust the minimum revenues by the annual percentage change in the
consumer price index for the prior year for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bellevue, Washington metropolitan statistical area for all urban
consumer, all goods, as published by the United States department of
labor, bureau of labor statistics. The minimum revenues requirement,
adjusted for inflation as provided in this section, remains effective
through the date on which the initial tax authorized by the voters
under section 402 or 403 of this act expires. Thereafter, the
authority board must, at the beginning of each subsequent period of
funding as approved by the voters, establish initial minimum average
annual revenues of not less than the amount of the minimum revenues
required during the final year of the immediately preceding period of
funding;
(vi) For purposes of determining the eligibility of a cultural
organization to receive funding or the relative magnitude of the
funding it receives on the basis of its revenues, any determination
with respect to a qualifying state-related cultural organization must
exclude any state funding received by the organization or for the
institution it supports; and
(vii) Any additional guidelines, consistent with section 201 of
this act and this section, as the authority board deems necessary or
appropriate for determining the eligibility of prospective regional
cultural organizations to receive funding under this section and for
establishing the amount of funding any organization may receive;
(e) Funds available under (d) of this subsection must be
distributed among eligible regional cultural organizations based on an
annual ranking of eligible organizations by the combined size of their
average annual revenues and their average annual attendance, both over
the three preceding years. However, an organization's attendance must
have twice the weight of the organization's revenues in determining its
relative ranking. Available funds must be distributed proportionally
among eligible organizations, consistent with the ranking, such that
the organization with the largest combined revenues and weighted
attendance would receive the most funding and the organization with the
smallest combined revenues and weighted attendance would receive the
least funding. However, no organization may receive funds in excess of
fifteen percent of its average annual revenues over the three preceding
years. Any funds available under (d) of this subsection not
distributed to regional cultural organizations as a result of
application of the formula provided under this subsection (2)(e) must
be allocated by the authority board for distribution under (h) of this
subsection;
(f) Funds distributed to regional cultural organizations under (d)
of this subsection must be used to support cultural and educational
activities, programs and initiatives, public benefits and
communications, and basic operations. No funds distributed to regional
cultural organizations under (d) of this subsection may be used for
capital expenditures or acquisitions including, but not limited to, the
acquisition of or the construction of improvements to real property;
(g) In addition to providing or continuing to provide public
benefits identified by the authority under this section, regional
cultural organizations receiving funding under this subsection (2)
shall participate in good faith in the authority's public school
cultural access program required under section 502 of this act. The
regional cultural organizations shall provide or continue to provide
public benefits under this section in addition to participating in the
public school cultural access program. Each regional cultural
organization receiving funds authorized under this chapter pursuant to
an authority allocation formula shall annually, prior to year end,
preview for the authority public benefits the organization's plans to
provide or continue to provide in the following year and report on
public benefits it provided or continued to provide during the current
year;
(h) Remaining funds available annually, including funds not
initially reserved under (a) through (d) of this subsection as well as
funds not distributed by the authority from the reserved funds must be
distributed by the authority board to the public agency designated by
the legislative authority of the county creating such an authority;
(i) Funds distributed by the designated public agencies under (h)
of this subsection must be applied as follows:
(i) Not more than eight percent of such funds must be used for
administrative costs of the public agency designated by a county
creating the authority; and
(ii) The balance must be used to fund community-based cultural
organizations that are cultural organizations or a community
preservation and development authority formed under chapter 43.167 RCW
prior to January 1, 2011, that primarily function, focus their
activities, and are supported or patronized within a local community
and are not a regional cultural organization, subject to further
definition under guidelines adopted by the designated public agency.
Designated public agencies shall adopt:
(A) Guidelines, consistent with the requirements of this chapter,
it deems necessary or appropriate for determining the eligibility of
community-based cultural organizations to receive funding under this
chapter and for establishing the amount of funding any organization may
receive;
(B) Criteria for the award of funds to eligible community-based
cultural organizations, including the public benefits to be derived
from projects submitted for funding; and
(C) Procedures for conducting, at least annually, a competitive
process for the award of available funding;
(j) Funds distributed to community-based cultural organizations may
be used to support cultural and educational activities, programs, and
initiatives; public benefits and communications; and basic operations.
Funds may also be used for: (i) Capital expenditures or acquisitions
including, but not limited to, the acquisition of or construction of
improvements to real property; and (ii) technology, equipment, and
supplies reasonably related to or necessary for a project otherwise
eligible for funding under this chapter. Authority guidelines may also
determine the circumstances under which funds may be used to fund
start-up expenses of new community-based cultural organizations.

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 701 RCW 36.96.010 and 1999 c 153 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter((,)) unless the context requires otherwise((:)).
(1) "Special purpose district" means every municipal and quasi-municipal corporation other than counties, cities, and towns. Such
special purpose districts shall include, but are not limited to, water-sewer districts, fire protection districts, port districts, public
utility districts, county park and recreation service areas, flood
control zone districts, diking districts, drainage improvement
districts, cultural access authorities, and solid waste collection
districts, but shall not include industrial development districts
created by port districts, and shall not include local improvement
districts, utility local improvement districts, and road improvement
districts;
(2) "Governing authority" means the commission, council, or other
body which directs the affairs of a special purpose district;
(3) "Inactive" means that a special purpose district, other than a
public utility district, is characterized by either of the following
criteria:
(a) Has not carried out any of the special purposes or functions
for which it was formed within the preceding consecutive five-year
period; or
(b) No election has been held for the purpose of electing a member
of the governing body within the preceding consecutive seven-year
period or, in those instances where members of the governing body are
appointed and not elected, where no member of the governing body has
been appointed within the preceding seven-year period.
A public utility district is inactive when it is characterized by
both criteria (a) and (b) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 APPLICABILITY OF PUBLIC LAWS. The
authority, its officers, and the board of directors, created under this
chapter, are subject to the general laws regulating local governments
and local governmental officials including, but not limited to, the
requirement to be audited by the state auditor and various accounting
requirements under chapter 43.09 RCW, the public records act
requirements under chapter 42.56 RCW, the prohibition against using its
facilities for campaign purposes under RCW 42.17A.555, the open public
meetings law under chapter 42.30 RCW, the code of ethics for municipal
officers under chapter 42.23 RCW, and the local government
whistleblower law under chapter 42.41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 No direct or collateral attack on any
authority purported to be authorized or created in conformance with
this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after creation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 Sections 101 through 311, 401, 501, 502,
601, 702, and 703 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 The provisions of this act shall be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 Section 404 of this act expires January 1,
2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 Section 405 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2018.

--- END ---