BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Every person under the age of twenty-one
who purchases or attempts to purchase marijuana is guilty of a
violation of this section. This section does not apply to persons
between the age of eighteen and twenty-one who are participating in a
controlled purchase program conducted by the liquor control board or
other law enforcement agencies.
(2) A person between the ages of eighteen and twenty, inclusive,
who violates this section commits a class 2 civil infraction under
chapter 7.80 RCW and is subject to a fine as set out in chapter 7.80
RCW, or participation in up to four hours of community restitution, or
both. The court may also require participation in a drug diversion
program or other appropriate rehabilitation service.
(3) A person under the age of eighteen who violates this section
commits a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is
subject to a fine as set out in chapter 7.80 RCW, or participation in
up to four hours of community restitution, or both. The court may also
require participation in a drug diversion program or other appropriate
rehabilitation service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Any person who invites a minor into a public
place where marijuana is sold and treats, gives, or purchases marijuana
for such minor, or permits a minor to treat, give, or purchase
marijuana for an adult, or holds out the minor to be twenty-one years
of age or older to the owner or employee of the marijuana
establishment, a law enforcement officer, or a liquor enforcement
officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) It is unlawful for any person under the
age of twenty-one years to:
(a) Enter or remain in any marijuana licensed premises; and
(b) Represent his or her age as being twenty-one or more years for
the purpose of purchasing marijuana, or entering or remaining in a
marijuana licensed premises.
(2) A person between the ages of eighteen and twenty, inclusive,
who violates this section commits a class 2 civil infraction under
chapter 7.80 RCW and is subject to a fine as set out in chapter 7.80
RCW, or participation in up to four hours of community restitution, or
both. The court may also require participation in a drug diversion
program or other appropriate rehabilitation service.
(3) A person under the age of eighteen who violates this section
commits a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is
subject to a fine as set out in chapter 7.80 RCW, or participation in
up to four hours of community restitution, or both. The court may also
require participation in a drug diversion program or other appropriate
rehabilitation service.
(4) The liquor control board has the power and the duty to classify
marijuana licensed premises as off-limits to persons under the age of
twenty-one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any person who transfers in any manner an
identification of age to a minor the purpose of permitting such minor
to obtain marijuana, usable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except
that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars is imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution must require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution: PROVIDED, That
corroborative testimony of a witness other than the minor is a
condition precedent to conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The following are acceptable forms of
identification to verify a person's age for the purpose of selling or
allowing a person access to a marijuana licensed premises:
(a) Driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card of
any state, province of Canada, from a U.S. territory or the District of
Columbia, or identicard issued by the Washington state department of
licensing under RCW 46.20.117;
(b) United States armed forces identification card issued to active
duty, reserve, and retired personnel and the personnel's dependents
that may include an embedded, digital signature in lieu of a visible
signature;
(c) Passport;
(d) Merchant marine identification card issued by the United States
coast guard; and
(e) Enrollment card issued by the governing authority of a
federally recognized Indian tribe located in Washington, if the
enrollment card incorporates security features comparable to those
implemented by the department of licensing for Washington driver's
licenses.
(2) If the form of identification has an expiration date, a person
may not use the document after the expiration date to verify his or her
age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) No person may forge, alter, counterfeit,
otherwise prepare, or acquire and supply to a person under the age of
twenty-one a facsimile of any of the officially issued forms of
identification that are acceptable for proof of age.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable
as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two
thousand five hundred dollars is imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 69.50 RCW.

--- END ---