BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.12.110 and 2012 c 117 s 272 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person twenty-one years of age or over may bring into the state
from without the United States, free of tax and markup, for his or her
personal or household use such alcoholic beverages as have been
declared and permitted to enter the United States duty free under
federal law.
Such entry of alcoholic beverages in excess of that herein provided
may be authorized by the board upon payment of an equivalent ((markup
and)) tax as would be applicable to the purchase of the same or similar
liquor at retail ((from a Washington state liquor store)). The board
shall adopt appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section. The board
may issue a spirits, beer, and wine private club license to a
charitable or nonprofit corporation of the state of Washington, the
majority of the officers and directors of which are United States
citizens and the minority of the officers and directors of which are
citizens of the Dominion of Canada, and where the location of the
premises for such spirits, beer, and wine private club license is not
more than ten miles south of the border between the United States and
the province of British Columbia.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.12.120 and 1995 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of Title 66 RCW, a person
twenty-one years of age or over may, free of tax ((and markup)), for
personal or household use, bring into the state of Washington from
another state no more than once per calendar month up to two liters of
spirits or wine or two hundred eighty-eight ounces of beer.
Additionally, such person may be authorized by the board to bring into
the state of Washington from another state a reasonable amount of
alcoholic beverages in excess of that provided in this section for
personal or household use only upon payment of an equivalent ((markup
and)) tax as would be applicable to the purchase of the same or similar
liquor at retail ((from a state liquor store)). The board shall adopt
appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose
of carrying into effect the provisions of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.12.240 and 2009 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this title applies to or prevents a wedding boutique
or art gallery from offering or supplying without charge wine or beer
by the individual glass to a customer for consumption on the premises.
However, the customer must be at least twenty-one years of age and may
only be offered one glass of wine or beer, and wine or beer served or
consumed shall be purchased from a Washington state licensed retailer
((or a Washington state liquor store or agency)) at full retail price.
A wedding boutique or art gallery offering wine or beer without charge
may not advertise the service of complimentary wine or beer and may not
sell wine or beer in any manner. Any employee involved in the service
of wine or beer must complete a board-approved limited alcohol server
training program.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Art gallery" means a room or building devoted to the
exhibition and/or sale of the works of art.
(b) "Wedding boutique" means a business primarily engaged in the
sale of wedding merchandise.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.20.010 and 2013 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee
authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the
prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the
applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee
must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as
may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as
follows:
(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or
dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly
conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill
health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any
private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the
purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to
purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as
may be fixed by the board;
(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special
permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of
time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;
(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer
to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other
materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor,
or other products, a special permit;
(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be
thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized
representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the
armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such
military installation;
(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that
manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented
to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of
a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said
liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor
so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display
room during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a
spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;
(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption
at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the
convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding.
Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or
distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW
82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;
(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an
international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices
of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and
promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the
contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased
from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and
66.24.210;
(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a
person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or
serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility
if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility.
"Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means
a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to
travelers and guests;
(12) Where the application is for a special permit to allow tasting
of alcohol by persons at least eighteen years of age under the
following circumstances:
(a) The application is from a community or technical college as
defined in RCW 28B.50.030;
(b) The person who is permitted to taste under this subsection is
enrolled as a student in a required or elective class that is part of
a culinary, wine technology, beer technology, or spirituous technology-related degree program;
(c) The alcohol served to any person in the degree-related programs
under (b) of this subsection is tasted but not consumed for the
purposes of educational training as part of the class curriculum with
the approval of the educational provider;
(d) The service and tasting of alcoholic beverages is supervised by
a faculty or staff member of the educational provider who is twenty-one
years of age or older. The supervising faculty or staff member shall
possess a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit under the provisions of
RCW 66.20.310;
(e) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages
does not purchase the alcoholic beverages; and
(f) The permit fee for the special permit provided for in this
subsection (12) shall be waived by the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.20.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
A card of identification may for the purpose of this title and for
the purpose of procuring liquor, be accepted as an identification card
by any licensee ((or store employee)) and as evidence of legal age of
the person presenting such card, provided the licensee ((or store
employee)) complies with the conditions and procedures prescribed
herein and such regulations as may be made by the board.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.20.180 and 2005 c 151 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A card of identification shall be presented by the holder thereof
upon request of any licensee, ((store employee, contract liquor store
manager, contract liquor store employee,)) peace officer, or
enforcement officer of the board for the purpose of aiding the
licensee, ((store employee, contract liquor store manager, contract
liquor store employee,)) peace officer, or enforcement officer of the
board to determine whether or not such person is of legal age to
purchase liquor when such person desires to procure liquor from a
licensed establishment ((or state liquor store or contract liquor
store)).

Sec. 7 RCW 66.20.190 and 2012 c 117 s 280 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the presentation by the holder and verification by
the licensee ((or store employee)) of such card of identification, the
licensee ((or store employee)) who is still in doubt about the true age
of the holder shall require the person whose age may be in question to
sign a certification card and record an accurate description and serial
number of his or her card of identification thereon. Such statement
shall be upon a five-inch by eight-inch file card, which card shall be
filed alphabetically by the licensee ((or store employee)) at or before
the close of business on the day on which the statement is executed, in
the file box containing a suitable alphabetical index and the card
shall be subject to examination by any peace officer or agent or
employee of the board at all times. The certification card shall also
contain in bold-face type a statement stating that the signer
understands that conviction for unlawful purchase of alcoholic
beverages or misuse of the certification card may result in criminal
penalties including imprisonment or fine or both.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.20.200 and 2003 c 53 s 295 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for the owner of a card of identification
to transfer the card to any other person for the purpose of aiding such
person to procure alcoholic beverages from any licensee ((or store
employee)). Any person who shall permit his or her card of
identification to be used by another or transfer such card to another
for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic beverages
from a licensee ((or store employee)) or gain admission to a premises
or portion of a premises classified by the board as off-limits to
persons under twenty-one years of age, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of
two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring
community restitution shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of
community restitution.
(2) Any person not entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or has
issued or transferred to him or her a card of identification, and any
person who possesses a card of identification not issued to him or her,
and any person who makes any false statement on any certification card
required by RCW 66.20.190, to be signed by him or her, shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that
a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.20.210 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
No licensee or the agent or employee of the licensee((, or store
employee,)) shall be prosecuted criminally or be sued in any civil
action for serving liquor to a person under legal age to purchase
liquor if such person has presented a card of identification in
accordance with RCW 66.20.180, and has signed a certification card as
provided in RCW 66.20.190.
Such card in the possession of a licensee may be offered as a
defense in any hearing held by the board for serving liquor to the
person who signed the card and may be considered by the board as
evidence that the licensee acted in good faith.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.24.210 and 2012 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors ((and the Washington state liquor control board,))
within the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per
liter. Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as
a distributor of its own production shall pay taxes imposed by this
section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine
distributors ((and the Washington state liquor control board)) within
the state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths
cents per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery
to another winery shall not be subject to such tax.
(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by
direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every
person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section shall on or
before the twentieth day of each month report to the board all
purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon
such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report
shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless
the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose
applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following
the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two
percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every
such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond to be
approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing
the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when
due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license until all
taxes are paid.
(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
domestic winery shall make monthly reports to the liquor control board
on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and
upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and
eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.
(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries shall
pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to
Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements
of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this
section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the
resident purchaser.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any
domestic winery or wine certificate of approval holder acting as a
distributor of its own production that had total taxable sales of wine
in Washington state of six thousand gallons or less during the calendar
year preceding the date on which the tax would otherwise be due is not
required to pay taxes under this section more often than annually.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.28.030 and 2012 c 2 s 113 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every domestic distillery, brewery, and microbrewery, domestic
winery, certificate of approval holder, licensed ((liquor)) spirits
importer, licensed wine importer, and licensed beer importer is
responsible for the conduct of any licensed spirits, beer, or wine
distributor in selling, or contracting to sell, to retail licensees,
spirits, beer, or wine manufactured by such domestic distillery,
brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, manufacturer holding a
certificate of approval, sold by an authorized representative holding
a certificate of approval, or imported by such ((liquor)) spirits,
beer, or wine importer. Where the board finds that any licensed
spirits, beer, or wine distributor has violated any of the provisions
of this title or of the regulations of the board in selling or
contracting to sell spirits, beer, or wine to retail licensees, the
board may, in addition to any punishment inflicted or imposed upon such
distributor, prohibit the sale of the brand or brands of spirits, beer,
or wine involved in such violation to any or all retail licensees
within the trade territory usually served by such distributor for such
period of time as the board may fix, irrespective of whether the
distiller manufacturing such spirits or the ((liquor)) spirits importer
importing such spirits, brewer manufacturing such beer or the beer
importer importing such beer, or the domestic winery manufacturing such
wine or the wine importer importing such wine or the certificate of
approval holder manufacturing such spirits, beer, or wine or acting as
authorized representative actually participated in such violation.

Sec. 12 RCW 66.28.035 and 2012 c 39 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By the ((15th)) 20th day of each month, all spirits certificate
of approval holders must file with the board, in a form and manner
required by the board, a report of all spirits delivered to purchasers
in this state during the preceding month ((along with a copy)). Copies
of the invoices for all such purchases or other information required by
the board that would disclose the identity of the purchasers must be
made available upon request.
(2) A spirits certificate of approval holder may not ship or cause
to be transported into this state any spirits unless the purchaser to
whom the spirits are to be delivered is:
(a) Licensed by the board to sell spirits in this state, and the
license is in good standing; or
(b) Otherwise legally authorized to sell spirits in this state.
(3) The liquor control board must maintain on its web site a list
of all purchasers that meet the conditions of subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) A violation of this section is grounds for suspension of a
spirits certificate of approval license in accordance with RCW
66.08.150, in addition to any punishment as may be authorized by RCW
66.28.030.

Sec. 13 RCW 66.28.040 and 2012 c 2 s 116 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any
person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305
prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and
66.24.210; nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval
holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor
for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge,
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, to a nonprofit
charitable corporation or association exempt from taxation under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue code of 1986 for
use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such
exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery or
microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the brewery premises;
nothing in this section prevents donations of wine for the purposes of
RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a domestic winery from
serving wine without charge, on the winery premises; and nothing in
this section prevents a craft distillery from serving spirits without
charge, on the distillery premises subject to RCW 66.24.145.

Sec. 14 RCW 66.44.350 and 1999 c 281 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding provisions of RCW 66.44.310, employees of
businesses holding beer and/or wine restaurant; beer and/or wine
private club; snack bar; spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits,
beer, and wine private club; and sports entertainment facility licenses
who are ((licensees)) between eighteen and twenty-one years of age
((and over)) may take orders for, serve and sell liquor in any part of
the licensed premises except cocktail lounges, bars, or other areas
classified by the Washington state liquor control board as off-limits
to persons under twenty-one years of age: PROVIDED, That such
employees may enter such restricted areas to perform work assignments
including picking up liquor for service in other parts of the licensed
premises, performing clean-up work, setting up and arranging tables,
delivering supplies, delivering messages, serving food, and seating
patrons: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such employees shall remain in the
areas off-limits to minors no longer than is necessary to carry out
their aforementioned duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such employees
shall not be permitted to perform activities or functions of a
bartender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 RCW 66.24.440 (Liquor by the drink,
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine private
club, hotel, spirits, beer, and wine nightclub, sports entertainment
facility, and VIP airport lounge license -- Purchase of liquor by
licensees -- Discount) and 2011 c 325 s 3, 2009 c 271 s 8, 2007 c 370 s
20, 1998 c 126 s 8, 1997 c 321 s 29, & 1949 c 5 s 5 are each repealed.

--- END ---