BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.325 and 2013 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce
marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other
marijuana producers, regulated by the state liquor control board and
subject to annual renewal. The production, possession, delivery,
distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and
enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a
criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana
producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall
specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to
operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The
application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred
fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana
producer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license
shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer
intends to produce marijuana.
(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process,
package, and label marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and marijuana
retailers, regulated by the state liquor control board and subject to
annual renewal. The processing, packaging, possession, delivery,
distribution, and sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws
of 2013 and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly
licensed marijuana processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense
under Washington state law. Every marijuana processor's license shall
be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at
which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state
of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person
to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana processor's
license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for
issuance and renewal of a marijuana processor's license shall be one
thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each
location at which a marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.
(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at retail
in retail outlets, regulated by the state liquor control board and
subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and
sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules
adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana
retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington
state law. Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the
name of the applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet
the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of
Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to
use the license. The application fee for a marijuana retailer's
license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for
issuance and renewal of a marijuana retailer's license shall be one
thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each
location at which a marijuana retailer intends to sell marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.354 and 2013 c 3 s 13 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
There may be licensed, in no greater number in each of the counties
of the state than as the state liquor control board shall deem
advisable, retail outlets established for the purpose of making
marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products available
for sale to adults aged twenty-one and over. Retail sale of marijuana,
useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 and the rules adopted to
implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer or
retail outlet employee, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under
Washington state law.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.357 and 2013 c 3 s 14 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Retail outlets shall sell no products or services other than
marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, or
paraphernalia intended for the storage or use of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.
(2) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not employ persons under
twenty-one years of age or allow persons under twenty-one years of age
to enter or remain on the premises of a retail outlet.
(3) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display any signage in
a window, on a door, or on the outside of the premises of a retail
outlet that is visible to the general public from a public right-of-way, other than a single sign no larger than one thousand six hundred
square inches identifying the retail outlet by the licensee's business
or trade name.
(4) Licensed marijuana retailers shall not display useable
marijuana or marijuana-infused products in a manner that is visible to
the general public from a public right-of-way.
(5) No licensed marijuana retailer or employee of a retail outlet
shall open or consume, or allow to be opened or consumed, any
marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product on the
outlet premises.
(6) The state liquor control board shall fine a licensee one
thousand dollars for each violation of any subsection of this section.
Fines collected under this section must be deposited into the dedicated
marijuana fund created under RCW 69.50.530.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.360 and 2013 c 3 s 15 (Initiative Measure No.
502) are each amended to read as follows:
The following acts, when performed by a validly licensed marijuana
retailer or employee of a validly licensed retail outlet in compliance
with rules adopted by the state liquor control board to implement and
enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013, shall not constitute criminal or civil
offenses under Washington state law:
(1) Purchase and receipt of marijuana, useable marijuana, or
marijuana-infused products that have been properly packaged and labeled
from a marijuana processor validly licensed under chapter 3, Laws of
2013;
(2) Possession of quantities of marijuana, useable marijuana, or
marijuana-infused products that do not exceed the maximum amounts
established by the state liquor control board under RCW 69.50.345(5);
and
(3) Delivery, distribution, and sale, on the premises of the retail
outlet, of any combination of the following amounts of marijuana,
useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product to any person twenty-one years of age or older:
(a) One ounce of useable marijuana;
(b) Sixteen ounces of marijuana-infused product in solid form;
((or))
(c) Seventy-two ounces of marijuana-infused product in liquid form;
or
(d) Seven grams of extract product.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.270 and 2013 c 305 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, marijuana license, gambling license, or lottery retail
license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4).

--- END ---