BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that studies have
documented that many students experience learning losses when they do
not engage in educational activities during the summer. The
legislature further finds that research shows that summer learning loss
contributes to the educational opportunity gaps between students in
Washington's schools and that falling behind in academics can be a
predictor of whether a student will drop out of school. The
legislature recognizes that such academic regression has a
disproportionate impact on low-income students. The legislature
acknowledges that access to quality expanded learning opportunities
during the school year and summer helps mitigate summer learning loss
and improves academic performance, attendance, on-time grade
advancement, and classroom behaviors.
(2) The legislature intends to increase expanded learning
opportunities by identifying ten schools to participate in a pilot
program to combat summer learning loss and provide an opportunity to
evaluate the effectiveness of an extended school year to improve
student achievement, close the educational opportunity gap, and provide
successful models for other districts to follow. The pilot schools may
participate with a community-based organization to provide the expanded
learning opportunities. The legislature further intends to build
capacity, identify best practices, leverage local resources, and
promote a sustainable expanded learning opportunities system for
students in early elementary through secondary schools by providing an
ongoing work group and infrastructure that helps coordinate expanded
learning opportunity efforts throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter, "expanded learning
opportunities" means:
(1) Culturally responsive enrichment and learning activities, which
may focus on academic and nonacademic areas; arts; civic engagement;
service-learning and science; technology, engineering, and mathematics;
and competencies for college and career readiness;
(2) School-based programs that provide extended learning and
enriching experiences for students beyond the traditional school day,
week, or calendar; and
(3) Structured, intentional, and creative learning environments
outside the traditional school day that build partnerships with
schools, align in-school and out-of-school learning, and create
enriching experiences for youth using activities that complement
classroom-based instruction. The opportunities may be provided before
or after school, during the summer, or as extended day, week, or year
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The expanded learning opportunities
council is established to advise the governor, state legislature, and
the superintendent of public instruction regarding an expanded learning
opportunities system with particular attention paid to solutions to
summer learning loss.
(2) The council shall also provide a vision, guidance, assistance,
and advice related to potential improvement and expansion of summer
learning opportunities, school-year calendar modifications that will
help reduce summer learning loss, and support of an expanded learning
opportunities system, as well as other current or proposed programs and
initiatives across the spectrum of early elementary through secondary
education so that the needs and demands for a statewide coordinated
system of expanded learning opportunities are identified and an
expanded learning opportunities system is developed.
(3) The council shall identify fiscal, resource, and partnership
opportunities, coordinate policy development, set quality standards,
and develop a comprehensive expanded learning opportunities action plan
designed to implement expanded learning opportunities, address summer
learning loss, provide academic supports, build strong school-community-based organization partnerships, and track performance of
expanded learning opportunities in closing the opportunity gap, so that
students receive maximum and direct benefit.
(4) When making recommendations regarding best practices, the
council shall consider the best practices on the state menus developed
in accordance with RCW 28A.165.035 and 28A.655.235.
(5) The governor's office, in consultation with the superintendent
of public instruction, shall convene the expanded learning
opportunities council. The members of the council must have experience
in expanded learning opportunities, and include groups and agencies
representing diverse student interests and geographical locations
across the state. Up to fifteen participants, agencies, organizations,
or individuals may be invited to participate in the expanded learning
opportunities council but the membership shall include the following:
(a) Three representatives from nonprofit community-based
organizations;
(b) One representative from regional work force development
councils;
(c) One representative from each of the following organizations or
agencies:
(i) The Washington state school directors' association;
(ii) The state-level association of school administrators;
(iii) The state-level association of school principals;
(iv) The state board of education;
(v) The statewide association representing certificated classroom
teachers and educational staff associates;
(vi) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(vii) The state-level parent–teacher association;
(viii) Higher education; and
(ix) A nonprofit organization with statewide experience in expanded
learning opportunities frameworks.
(6) Staff support for the expanded learning opportunity council
shall be provided by the superintendent of public instruction and other
state agencies as necessary. Appointees of the council shall be
selected by May 30, 2014. The council shall hold its first meeting
before August 1, 2014. At the first meeting, the council shall
determine regularly scheduled meeting times and locations. The council
shall provide a report to the governor and the legislature by December
1, 2014, and by December 1st annually thereafter.
(7) The first report submitted by December 1, 2014, shall include
recommendations for a framework and action plan for a pilot program,
including identification of ten potential pilot schools, for the
legislature to consider implementing in the 2015-2017 biennium. The
pilot program shall provide state funding for three years for twenty
additional student learning days for up to ten schools. The intent of
the pilot program is to combat summer learning loss; provide an
opportunity to evaluate the effectiveness of additional time outside
the regular school calendar to improve student achievement and close
educational opportunity gaps; and provide successful models for other
districts to follow. An eligible school is one that includes at least
any two grade levels within kindergarten through grade five, and where
seventy-five percent or more of the students qualify for the free and
reduced-price lunch program. School districts must solicit input on
the design of the plan from staff at the school, parents, and the
community, including at an open meeting, and may subsequently adopt a
plan for the additional twenty days at a public hearing. The pilot
schools may participate with a community-based organization to provide
the expanded learning opportunities. The pilot program must include an
evaluation of the effectiveness of the program, an examination of
student academic progress, and a recommendation of whether twenty days
is the optimal number of days to be provided as additional support.
(8) The council shall encourage any school district, including one
identified in subsection (7) of this section, to implement a pilot
program such as the one described in subsection (7) of this section on
a faster timeline using local or grant funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---