BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17A.110 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 448 and 2011 c 60
s 20 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to
carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, which rules shall
be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to campaign
finance, political advertising, or related forms that would otherwise
take effect after June 30th of a general election year shall take
effect no earlier than the day following the general election in that
year;
(2) Appoint an executive director and set, within the limits
established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028,
the executive director's compensation. The executive director shall
perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may
prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this chapter
efficiently and effectively. The commission shall not delegate its
authority to adopt, amend, or rescind rules nor may it delegate
authority to determine whether an actual violation of this chapter has
occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;
(3) Prepare and publish reports and technical studies as in its
judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this chapter, including
reports and statistics concerning campaign financing, lobbying,
financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement of this
chapter;
(4) Conduct, as it deems appropriate, audits and field
investigations, including annual audits or investigations of the
expenditures, receipts, debts, and obligations of each caucus political
committee. Any documents, records, reports, computer files, papers, or
materials provided to the commission for use in conducting audits or
investigations under this subsection must be returned to the committee
or candidate from which they were received within one week of the
commission's completion of the audit or investigation;
(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to
determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions
to be considered, and the results thereof;
(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any records
relevant to any investigation authorized under this chapter, or any
other proceeding under this chapter;
(7) Adopt a code of fair campaign practices;
(8) Adopt rules relieving candidates or political committees of
obligations to comply with the election campaign provisions of this
chapter, if they have not received contributions nor made expenditures
in connection with any election campaign of more than five thousand
dollars;
(9) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping
accounts of, and reporting on a quarterly basis, costs incurred by
state agencies, counties, cities, and other municipalities and
political subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and distributing
legislative information. For the purposes of this subsection,
"legislative information" means books, pamphlets, reports, and other
materials prepared, published, or distributed at substantial cost, a
substantial purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of
any legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination
of each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules,
accounts, and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and
recommendations concerning those agencies; and
(10) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of
reports required under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile
or electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is
contingent on the availability of funds.

--- END ---