BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17A.210 and 2010 c 205 s 2 and 2010 c 204 s 403 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Each candidate, within two weeks after becoming a candidate,
and each political committee, at the time it is required to file a
statement of organization, shall designate and file with the commission
the name and address of one legally competent individual, who may be
the candidate, to serve as a treasurer.
(2) A candidate, a political committee, or a treasurer may appoint
as many deputy treasurers as is considered necessary and shall file the
names and addresses of the deputy treasurers with the commission.
(3)(a) A candidate or political committee may at any time remove a
treasurer or deputy treasurer.
(b) In the event of the death, resignation, removal, or change of
a treasurer or deputy treasurer, the candidate or political committee
shall designate and file with the commission the name and address of
any successor.
(4) No treasurer or deputy treasurer may be deemed to be in
compliance with the provisions of this chapter until his or her name
and address is filed with the commission.
(5) On the day the treasurer is designated pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, each candidate must declare whether he or she will
use a credit card for campaign expenditures.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17A.240 and 2010 c 204 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each report required under RCW 42.17A.235 (1) and (2) must be
certified as correct by the treasurer and the candidate and shall
disclose the following:
(1) The funds on hand at the beginning of the period;
(2) The name and address of each person who has made one or more
contributions during the period, together with the money value and date
of each contribution and the aggregate value of all contributions
received from each person during the campaign, or in the case of a
continuing political committee, the current calendar year, with the
following exceptions:
(a) Pledges in the aggregate of less than one hundred dollars from
any one person need not be reported;
(b) Income that results from a fund-raising activity conducted in
accordance with RCW 42.17A.230 may be reported as one lump sum, with
the exception of that portion received from persons whose names and
addresses are required to be included in the report required by RCW
42.17A.230;
(c) Contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the
aggregate from any one person during the election campaign may be
reported as one lump sum if the treasurer maintains a separate and
private list of the name, address, and amount of each such contributor;
and
(d) The money value of contributions of postage shall be the face
value of the postage;
(3) Each loan, promissory note, or security instrument to be used
by or for the benefit of the candidate or political committee made by
any person, including the names and addresses of the lender and each
person liable directly, indirectly or contingently and the date and
amount of each such loan, promissory note, or security instrument;
(4) All other contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;
(5) The name and address of each candidate or political committee
to which any transfer of funds was made, including the amounts and
dates of the transfers;
(6) The name and address of each person to whom an expenditure was
made in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars during the
period covered by this report, the amount, date, and purpose of each
expenditure, whether a credit card was used to make each expenditure,
and the total sum of all expenditures;
(7) The name and address of each person directly compensated for
soliciting or procuring signatures on an initiative or referendum
petition, the amount of the compensation to each person, and the total
expenditures made for this purpose. Such expenditures shall be
reported under this subsection in addition to what is required to be
reported under subsection (6) of this section;
(8) The name and address of any person and the amount owed for any
debt, obligation, note, unpaid loan, or other liability in the amount
of more than two hundred fifty dollars or in the amount of more than
fifty dollars that has been outstanding for over thirty days;
(9) The credit card balance for campaign expenditures paid during
the period and sources of funds used to pay the credit card balance,
which shall be reported under this subsection in addition to what is
required to be reported under subsection (8) of this section;
(10) The surplus or deficit of contributions over expenditures;
(((10))) (11) The disposition made in accordance with RCW
42.17A.430 of any surplus funds; and
(((11))) (12) Any other information required by the commission by
rule in conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17A.425 and 2010 c 204 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No expenditures may be made or incurred by any candidate or
political committee unless authorized by the candidate or the person or
persons named on the candidate's or committee's registration form. A
record of all such expenditures shall be maintained by the treasurer.
(2) No expenditure of more than fifty dollars may be made in
currency unless a receipt, signed by the recipient and by the candidate
or treasurer, is prepared and made a part of the campaign's or
political committee's financial records.
(3) No expenditures may be made by any candidate by credit card
unless the credit card balance for all campaign-related expenditures is
paid off in full within thirty days. Failure by a candidate or
committee to comply with this subsection is a violation of this
chapter.

--- END ---