BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "disciplining authority" means
the regulatory entities identified in RCW 18.130.040 and authorized to
establish continuing education requirements for the health care
professions governed by those regulatory entities.
(2)(a) By July 1, 2016, a disciplining authority must adopt rules
requiring a person authorized to practice the profession regulated by
the disciplining authority to receive cultural competency continuing
education training. A disciplining authority may consult with
individuals or organizations having expertise in health disparities or
with the department of health in the development of these rules.
(b) Cultural competency continuing education courses may be taken
in addition to or, if a disciplining authority determines a cultural
competency continuing education course fulfills existing continuing
education requirements, in place of other continuing education
requirements imposed by the disciplining authority.
(3)(a) By July 1, 2015, the department of health must approve,
develop, and make available to each disciplining authority a list of
continuing education opportunities related to cultural competency. The
continuing education opportunities may include, but are not limited to,
the following:
(i) Courses delivered either in person or electronically;
(ii) Experiential learning such as cultural or linguistic
immersion;
(iii) Service learning; or
(iv) Specially designed cultural experiences.
(b) The continuing education opportunities must teach attitudes,
knowledge, and skills that enable a health care professional to care
effectively for patients from diverse cultures, groups, and communities
including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) Applying linguistic skills to communicate effectively with
patients from diverse cultures, groups, and communities; and
(ii) Using cultural information to establish therapeutic
relationships; and
(iii) Eliciting, understanding, and applying cultural and ethnic
data in the process of clinical care.
(c) The department of health may collaborate with or award grant
funding to a public or private entity with an expertise in cultural
competency or health disparities to develop the list of or offer
approved continued education opportunities related to cultural
competency.
(4) The department of health may accept gifts, grants, or
contributions from any public or private source to carry out this
section. The department must deposit moneys received under this
subsection into the health professions account created in RCW
43.70.320.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.615 and 2006 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "multicultural health" means
the provision of health care services with the knowledge and awareness
of the causes and effects of the determinants of health that lead to
disparities in health status between different genders and racial and
ethnic populations and the practice skills necessary to respond
appropriately.
(2) The department, in consultation with the disciplining
authorities as defined in RCW 18.130.040, shall establish, within
available department general funds, an ongoing multicultural health
awareness and education program as an integral part of its health
professions regulation. The purpose of the education program is to
raise awareness and educate health care professionals regarding the
knowledge, attitudes, and practice skills necessary to care for diverse
populations to achieve a greater understanding of the relationship
between culture and health. ((The disciplining authorities having the
authority to offer continuing education may provide training in the
dynamics of providing culturally competent, multicultural health care
to diverse populations.)) Any such education shall be developed in
collaboration with education programs that train students in that
health profession. ((A disciplining authority may require that
instructors of continuing education or continuing competency programs
integrate multicultural health into their curricula when it is
appropriate to the subject matter of the instruction.)) No funds from
the health professions account may be utilized to fund activities under
this section unless the disciplining authority authorizes expenditures
from its proportions of the account. ((A disciplining authority may
defray costs by authorizing a fee to be charged for participants or
materials relating to any sponsored program.))
(3) By July 1, 2008, each education program with a curriculum to
train health professionals for employment in a profession credentialed
by a disciplining authority under chapter 18.130 RCW shall integrate
into the curriculum instruction in multicultural health as part of its
basic education preparation curriculum. The department may not deny
the application of any applicant for a credential to practice a health
profession on the basis that the education or training program that the
applicant successfully completed did not include integrated
multicultural health curriculum as part of its basic instruction.

--- END ---