BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.57A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A governing body of a public transportation benefit area may
establish one or more passenger-only ferry service districts within all
or a portion of the boundaries of the public transportation benefit
area establishing the passenger-only ferry service district. A
passenger-only ferry service district may include all or a portion of
a city or town as long as all or a portion of the city or town
boundaries are within the boundaries of the establishing public
transportation benefit area. The members of the public transportation
benefit area governing body proposing to establish the passenger-only
ferry service district, acting ex officio and independently,
constitutes the governing body of the passenger-only ferry service
district.
(2) A passenger-only ferry service district may establish, finance,
and provide passenger-only ferry service, and associated services to
support and augment passenger-only ferry service operation, within its
boundaries in the same manner as authorized for public transportation
benefit areas under this chapter.
(3) A passenger-only ferry service district constitutes a body
corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may be conferred by
statute including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees,
staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to acquire, hold, and
dispose of real and personal property, and to sue and be sued. Public
works contract limits applicable to the public transportation benefit
area that established the passenger-only ferry service district apply
to the district. For purposes of this section, "passenger-only ferry
service district" means a quasi-municipal corporation and independent
taxing authority within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the
state Constitution, and a taxing district within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution, created by the legislative
body of a public transportation benefit area.
(4) Before a passenger-only ferry service district may provide
passenger-only ferry service, it must develop a passenger-only ferry
investment plan, including elements: To operate or contract for the
operation of passenger-only ferry services; to purchase, lease, or rent
ferry vessels and dock facilities for the provision of transit service;
and to identify other activities necessary to implement the plan. The
plan must set forth terminal locations to be served, projected costs of
providing services, and revenues to be generated from tolls, locally
collected tax revenues, and other revenue sources. The plan must
ensure that services provided under the plan are for the benefit of the
residents of the passenger-only ferry service district. The passenger-only ferry service district may use any of its powers to carry out this
purpose, unless otherwise prohibited by law. In addition, the
passenger-only ferry service district may enter into: Contracts and
agreements to operate passenger-only ferry service; public-private
partnerships; and design-build, general contractor/construction
management, or other alternative procurement processes substantially
consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW.
(5) A passenger-only ferry service district may be dissolved by a
majority vote of the governing body when all obligations under any
general obligation bonds issued by the passenger-only ferry service
district have been discharged and any other contractual obligations of
the passenger-only ferry service district have either been discharged
or assumed by another governmental entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.57A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A passenger-only ferry service district may, as part of a
passenger-only ferry investment plan, recommend some or all of the
following revenue sources as provided in this chapter:
(a) A sales and use tax, as authorized in section 3 of this act;
(b) A parking tax, as authorized in section 4 of this act;
(c) Tolls for passengers, packages, and, where applicable, parking;
and
(d) Charges or licensing fees for advertising, leasing space for
services to ferry passengers, and other revenue generating activities.
(2) Taxes may not be imposed without an affirmative vote of the
majority of the voters within the boundaries of the passenger-only
ferry service district voting on a single ballot proposition to both
approve a passenger-only ferry investment plan and to approve taxes to
implement the plan. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used
only to implement the plan and must be used for the benefit of the
residents of the passenger-only ferry service district. A district
must contract with the department of revenue for the administration and
collection of a sales and use tax as authorized in section 3 of this
act. A district may contract with other appropriate entities for the
administration and collection of any of the other taxes or charges
authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Passenger-only ferry service districts providing passenger-only
ferry service as provided in section 1 of this act may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved by a majority of
persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing
passenger-only ferry service and associated services to support and
augment passenger-only ferry service operation.
The tax authorized under this section is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of a taxable event within the taxing district. The maximum
rate of the tax must be approved by the voters and may not exceed six-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax
or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions of this section, a passenger-only
ferry service district located in a county with a population of one
million or less as of January 1, 2015, may fix and impose a parking tax
on all persons engaged in a commercial parking business within its
respective jurisdiction.
(2) In lieu of the tax in subsection (1) of this section, a
passenger-only ferry service district located in a county with a
population of one million or less as of January 1, 2015, may fix and
impose a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor vehicle in a
facility operated by a commercial parking business. The passenger-only
ferry service district may provide that:
(a) The tax is paid by the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;
(b) The tax applies to all parking for which a fee is paid, whether
paid or leased, including parking supplied with a lease of
nonresidential space;
(c) The tax is collected by the operator of the facility and
remitted to the city, county, or passenger-only ferry service district;
(d) The tax is a fee per vehicle or is measured by the parking
charge;
(e) The tax rate varies with zoning or location of the facility,
the duration of the parking, the time of entry or exit, the type or use
of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors; and
(f) Tax exempt carpools, vehicles with special license plates and
parking placards for persons with disabilities, or government vehicles
are exempt from the tax.
(3) The rate of the tax under subsection (1) of this section may be
based either upon gross proceeds or the number of vehicle stalls
available for commercial parking use. The rates charged must be
uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking business.
(4) The passenger-only ferry service district levying the tax
provided for in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may provide for
its payment on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis.
(5) The proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a passenger-only
ferry service district under subsection (1) or (2) of this section must
be used as provided in section 2 of this act.
(6) "Commercial parking business" as used in this section, means
the ownership, lease, operation, or management of a commercial parking
lot in which fees are charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a
covered or uncovered area with stalls for the purpose of parking motor
vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.57A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, a passenger-only
ferry service district may issue general obligation bonds, not to
exceed an amount, together with any other outstanding nonvoter-approved
general obligation indebtedness, equal to one and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property within the area, as the term "value
of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A passenger-only
ferry service district may also issue general obligation bonds for
capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general obligation
indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to five percent of the
value of the taxable property within the area, as the term "value of
the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by
the voters of the area pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state
Constitution.
(2) General obligation bonds with a maturity in excess of twenty-five years may not be issued. The governing body of the passenger-only
ferry service district must by resolution determine for each general
obligation bond issue the amount, date, terms, conditions,
denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates,
maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges,
manner of execution, manner of sale, callable provisions, if any,
covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and
interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration
may include, but not be limited to: (a) A book entry system of
recording the ownership of a bond whether or not physical bonds are
issued, or (b) recording the ownership of a bond together with the
requirement that the transfer of ownership may only be effected by the
surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance of the old bond or
the issuance of a new bond to the new owner. Facsimile signatures may
be used on the bonds and any coupons. Refunding general obligation
bonds may be issued in the same manner as general obligation bonds are
issued.
(3) Whenever general obligation bonds are issued to fund specific
projects or enterprises that generate revenues, charges, user fees, or
special assessments, the passenger-only ferry service district may
specifically pledge all or a portion of the revenues, charges, user
fees, or special assessments to refund the general obligation bonds.
The passenger-only ferry service district may also pledge any other
revenues that may be available to the district.
(4) In addition to general obligation bonds, a passenger-only ferry
service district may issue revenue bonds to be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---