BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
standard of care protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) As health system reform is implemented at both the federal and
state levels, health care providers may face additional liability
exposure related to federal guidelines in state civil actions.
(2) Such federal guidelines include:
(a) Health care quality measures;
(b) Payment adjustments for health care-acquired conditions;
(c) Hospital value-based purchasing;
(d) Value-based payment modifier under the health care provider fee
schedule;
(e) Hospital readmissions;
(f) Clinical and community preventive services;
(g) Payment adjustments under federal programs, including, but not
limited to, the meaningful use of electronic health records, health
care provider quality reporting system, including maintenance of
certification program, and e-prescribing.
(3) Additional liability exposure could lead to more civil actions
against health care providers, increased medical liability insurance
premiums, and reduced access to health care for patients.
(4) There are efforts at the federal level to prevent these
provisions from leading to additional health care provider liability
exposure, but the legislation has not been enacted to date.
(5) States have the constitutional authority to amend their
statutes to prevent the use of such provisions in medical liability
actions brought under state law and should do so in order to prevent
their liability climate from deteriorating for health care providers,
which would have a negative effect for patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In any medical liability case in the state
of Washington, a health care provider's lack of compliance with or a
health care provider's breach of any federal statute, regulation,
program, guideline, or other provision is not admissible to determine
the standard of care and may not be the legal basis for a presumption
of negligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 7.70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---