BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.135 and 2013 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability and quality
of care for children from low-income households. Policies for the
expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care
program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to
promote continuity of care for children.
(2) The department shall establish and implement policies to train
staff on child care subsidy fraud, including:
(a) Methods to detect suspected child care subsidy fraud;
(b) The department's procedures for reporting suspected child care
subsidy fraud to the office of fraud and accountability; and
(c) The office of fraud and accountability's procedures for
reporting child care subsidy fraud anonymously.
(3) To incentivize a working connections child care subsidy
applicant or recipient to seek child support enforcement services from
the department of social and health services, division of child
support, the department of social and health services shall waive the
child care copayment for one month for applicants or recipients who
seek child support enforcement services for the first time and have not
already done so as required by other public assistance programs.
(4) Beginning in fiscal year 2013, authorizations for the working
connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve months
unless a change in circumstances necessitates reauthorization sooner
than twelve months. Seeking child support enforcement services for the
first time under subsection (3) of this section constitutes a change in
circumstances. The twelve-month certification applies only if the
enrollments in the child care subsidy or working connections child care
program are capped.
(((3))) (5) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for
this specific purpose, beginning September 1, 2013, working connections
child care providers shall receive a five percent increase in the
subsidy rate for enrolling in level 2 in the early achievers programs.
Providers must complete level 2 and advance to level 3 within thirty
months in order to maintain this increase.

--- END ---