BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This section is the tax preference performance statement for the
tax preference contained in section 2 of this act. This performance
statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the
tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action
by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax
treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to create or retain jobs, and to provide an incentive to employers to
increase the number and type of apprenticeship participants and
programs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (c) and (f).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
increase the number and types of apprenticeship participants and
programs in Washington state. It is the legislature's intent to offer
a business and occupation tax credit for employers that increase
participation in and expand the number and types of apprenticeship
programs, thereby inducing some businesses to hire more apprentices
than they might otherwise, thereby meeting the demand for employers of
skilled workers, and increasing the number of skilled jobs in
Washington state.
(3) If a review finds that the number of new apprenticeship
participants and programs increase by five percent over the baseline,
then the legislature intends for the legislative auditor to recommend
extending the expiration date of the tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee should refer to the department of labor and industries
apprenticeship program and the United States department of labor
registered apprenticeship national results.
(5) The legislature finds that the registered apprenticeship
program provides a cost-effective method for employers to obtain
skilled workers and for employees to receive valuable training and
credentials. The legislature further finds that apprenticeship
programs are concentrated in the building trades industry, and
providing incentives to expand the apprenticeship program to additional
sectors where there are not sufficient skilled workers would retain and
create skilled jobs and benefit the economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a person is
allowed a credit as provided in this section. The credit is based on
new apprenticeship positions created by employers participating in the
Washington apprenticeship program approved by the apprenticeship
council created in RCW 49.04.010. The credit is earned for the
calendar year in which actual wages are paid for each new
apprenticeship position. The credit is calculated as follows:
(a) The lesser of one thousand dollars or fifty percent of the
actual wages and benefits paid for each new apprenticeship position
established in an existing, approved apprenticeship program, if the
apprentice is a veteran, the lesser of two thousand dollars or fifty
percent of the actual wages and benefits paid;
(b) The lesser of two thousand dollars or fifty percent of the
actual wages and benefits paid for each new apprenticeship position
established in a new apprenticeship program, if the apprentice is a
veteran, the lesser of three thousand dollars or fifty percent of the
actual wages and benefits paid; or
(c) The lesser of three thousand dollars or fifty percent of the
actual wages and benefits paid for each new apprenticeship position
established in a new apprenticeship program where the workforce
training and education coordinating board has identified a gap in the
supply of skilled workers, including but not limited to the aerospace
industry, manufacturing industry, and medical industry, if the
apprentice is a veteran, the lesser of four thousand dollars or fifty
percent of the actual wages and benefits paid.
(2) The credit may be used against any tax due under this chapter,
and may be carried over until used, up to four tax years after the tax
year during which the credit was earned. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(3) Credits earned under this section may be claimed only on
returns filed electronically with the department using the department's
online tax filing service or other method of electronic reporting as
the department may authorize. The taxpayer must keep records necessary
for the department to determine eligibility under this section
including copies of military service records and records establishing
the veteran's status when hired by the taxpayer.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "New apprenticeship position" means an additional person
participating in an approved apprenticeship program that is in addition
to the number of apprenticeship positions filled by an employer prior
to July 30, 2014. A new apprenticeship position created after August
1, 2014, remains annually eligible for a tax credit under subsection
(1) of this section if the apprenticeship position is in addition to
the number of apprenticeship positions established by the employer
before August 1, 2014.
(b) "New apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship program
that did not exist before August 1, 2014, that is approved by the
apprenticeship council created in RCW 49.04.010.
(c) "Veteran" means every person who has received an honorable
discharge or received a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable
record or is currently serving honorably, and who has served as a
member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States,
including the national guard and armed forces reserves.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for a tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used are immediately due. The department must
assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest must be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, must be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and must
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board must annually identify and report to the department of
revenue the approved apprenticeship programs that qualify for a tax
credit under section 2(1)(c) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2014.

--- END ---