BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.115 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The residential use of floating houses, as defined under WAC
332-30-106(23) as existing on the effective date of this section, is an
allowable use of aquatic lands within a harbor area, subject to the
limitations of this section.
(2) The department shall allow the residential use of floating
houses on aquatic lands in a harbor area:
(a) Where residential use of floating houses is compatible with
existing navigational or commercial uses in the harbor area; and
(b) In the same manner and subject to the same rules, guidelines,
and other department policies that apply to the use of floating houses
on aquatic lands outside of a harbor area.
(3) Upon expiration of a relevant lease or other aquatic lands use
authorization document and with at least six-months notice to the owner
of any affected floating house, the department may require that
residential use of a floating house yield to a newly authorized and
conflicting navigational or commercial use in the harbor area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.115 RCW
to read as follows:
The residential use of any floating house, as defined under WAC
332-30-106(23) as existing on the effective date of this section,
located on aquatic lands in a harbor area on the effective date of this
section is deemed authorized by the department and such a floating
house may remain in the harbor area subject to section 1(3) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.115 RCW
to read as follows:
The department and, if applicable, the holder of a lease or other
aquatic lands use authorization document must ensure that the owner of
any floating house, as defined under WAC 332-30-106(23) as existing on
the effective date of this section, in a harbor area has written
notification of the effect of sections 1 and 2 of this act on the
effective date of this section or at the time the use of the floating
house in the harbor area commences, whichever is later. The written
notification must specifically include information about the potential
for residential use of a floating house to yield to future conflicting
navigational or commercial uses consistent with the circumstances and
processes provided under section 1(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By December 31, 2014, the department of
natural resources must update applicable rules, guidelines, and any
other department policy consistent with sections 1 through 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act specifically authorizes residential
floating houses on aquatic lands within a harbor area under specified
circumstances and establishes associated conditions and implementing
provisions. This act does not affect the application of any other
applicable permit or authority, including waste disposal requirements
and application of local shoreline master programs under chapter 90.58
RCW.

--- END ---