BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.320 and 2009 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection,
from January 1, 2005, and thereafter, for all public works estimated to
cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that
no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by
apprentices.
(b)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before July 1, 2007, for any public works by the department of
transportation.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2007, and
before July 1, 2008, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost five million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2008,
and before July 1, 2009, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the
labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2009, for
all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost
((two)) four million dollars or more, all specifications shall require
that no less than ((fifteen)) twelve percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(c)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before January 1, 2008, for any public works by a school district, or
to any project funded in whole or in part by bond issues approved
before July 1, 2007.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2008,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost three
million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less
than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2009,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost two million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost one million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(d)(i) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1,
2010, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher
education estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications must require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2011,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2012,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(2) Awarding entities may adjust the requirements of this section
for a specific project for the following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas;
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation;
(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort
to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.310 and this
section; or
(d) Other criteria the awarding entity deems appropriate, which are
subject to review by the office of the governor.
(3) The secretary of the department of transportation shall adjust
the requirements of this section for a specific project for the
following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas; or
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation.
(4) This section applies to public works contracts awarded by the
state, to public works contracts awarded by school districts, and to
public works contracts awarded by state four-year institutions of
higher education. However, this section does not apply to contracts
awarded by state agencies headed by a separately elected public
official.
(5)(a) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services must provide information and technical assistance to affected
agencies and collect the following data from affected agencies for each
project covered by this section:
(i) The name of each apprentice and apprentice registration number;
(ii) The name of each project;
(iii) The dollar value of each project;
(iv) The date of the contractor's notice to proceed;
(v) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them,
categorized by trade or craft;
(vi) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by
them, categorized by trade or craft; and
(vii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted
under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The department of labor and industries shall assist the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in
providing information and technical assistance.
(6) ((The secretary of transportation shall establish an
apprenticeship utilization advisory committee, which shall include
statewide geographic representation and consist of equal numbers of
representatives of contractors and labor. The committee must include
at least one member representing contractor businesses with less than
thirty-five employees. The advisory committee shall meet regularly
with the secretary of transportation to discuss implementation of this
section by the department of transportation, including development of
the process to be used to adjust the requirements of this section for
a specific project. The committee shall provide a report to the
legislature by January 1, 2008, on the effects of the apprentice labor
requirement on transportation projects and on the availability of
apprentice labor and programs statewide.
(7))) At the request of the senate labor, commerce, research and
development committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor
committee, or their successor committees, and the governor, the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the
department of labor and industries shall compile and summarize the
agency data and provide a joint report to both committees. The report
shall include recommendations on modifications or improvements to the
apprentice utilization program and information on skill shortages in
each trade or craft.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.026 and 2003 c 363 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In establishing the prevailing rate of wage under RCW
39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020, all data collected by the
department of labor and industries may be used only in the county for
which the work was performed.
(2) ((This section applies only to prevailing wage surveys
initiated on or after August 1, 2003.)) The department of labor and
industries must provide registered contractors with the option of
completing a wage survey electronically.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics((,
upon)) employed directly on the site of all public works and under all
public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any
county, municipality or political subdivision created by its laws,
shall be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work
in the same trade or occupation in the locality within the state where
such labor is performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand
dollars, a contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall
post in a location readily visible to workers at the job site:
PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission
line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office
is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing,
concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:
(1) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(2) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician
of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry
concerning prevailing wages may be made.
This chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly
employed by the state, or any county, municipality, or political
subdivision created by its laws. The provision in this section
limiting the payment of prevailing wage to laborers, workers, or
mechanics employed directly on the site of all public works shall be
interpreted consistent with federal law governing the application of
prevailing rate of wage.

--- END ---