BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall supervise the following offenders who are
sentenced to probation in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060,
9.95.204, or 9.95.210:
(a) Offenders convicted of:
(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;
(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;
(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and
(iv) Violation of RCW 9A.44.132(2) (failure to register); and
(b) Offenders who have:
(i) A current conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense
where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August 1, 2011;
and
(ii) A prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense
or domestic violence felony offense where domestic violence has been
plead and proven after August 1, 2011.
(2) Misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenders supervised by the
department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community
custody.
(3) The department shall supervise every felony offender sentenced
to community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 or 9.94A.702 whose risk
assessment classifies the offender as one who is at a high risk to
reoffend.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody
regardless of risk classification if the offender:
(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent
offense and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.701, 9.94A.702, or 9.94A.507;
(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally
ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;
(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant
to RCW 9.95.017;
(d) Has a current conviction for violating RCW 9A.44.132(1)
(failure to register) and was sentenced to a term of community custody
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701;
(e)(i) Has a current conviction for a domestic violence felony
offense where domestic violence has been plead and proven after August
1, 2011, and a prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence
offense or domestic violence felony offense where domestic violence
((has been)) was plead and proven after August 1, 2011. This
subsection (4)(e)(i) applies only to offenses committed prior to the
effective date of this section;
(ii) Has a conviction for a domestic violence felony offense where
domestic violence was plead and proven and that was committed after the
effective date of this section. The state and its officers, agents,
and employees shall not be held criminally or civilly liable for its
supervision of an offender under this subsection (4)(e)(ii) unless the
state and its officers, agents, and employees acted with reckless
disregard;
(f) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, or
9.94A.670;
(g) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745; or
(h) Was convicted and sentenced under RCW 46.61.520 (vehicular
homicide), RCW 46.61.522 (vehicular assault), RCW 46.61.502(6) (felony
DUI), or RCW 46.61.504(6) (felony physical control).
(5) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer
unless the offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is
required under this section or RCW 9.94A.5011.
(6) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every felony
offender sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to
supervision under this section or RCW 9.94A.5011.

--- END ---