BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.670 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning July 1, 2011, the department, after soliciting
recommendations from the public, shall select the design for the
migratory bird stamp.
(2))) All revenue derived from the sale of migratory bird ((license
validations or stamps)) permits by the department to ((any)) persons
hunting waterfowl ((or to any stamp collector shall be deposited in the
state wildlife account and shall be used only for that portion of the
cost of printing and production of the stamps for migratory waterfowl
hunters)), as determined by subsection (((4))) (3) of this section,
((and for those)) must be deposited in the state wildlife account and
may only be used for migratory waterfowl projects specified by the
director of the department for the acquisition and development of
migratory waterfowl habitat in the state and for the enhancement,
protection, and propagation of migratory waterfowl in the state.
((Migratory bird license validation and stamp funds may not be used on
lands controlled by private hunting clubs or on private lands that
charge a fee for public access. Migratory bird license validation and
stamp funds may be used for migratory waterfowl projects on private
land where public hunting is provided by written permission or on areas
established by the department as waterfowl hunting closures.
(3))) (2) All revenue derived from the sale of ((the license
validation and stamp)) migratory bird permits by the department to
persons hunting solely nonwaterfowl migratory birds ((shall be
deposited in the state wildlife account and shall be used only for that
portion of the cost of printing and production of the stamps for
nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters)), as determined by subsection
(((4))) (3) of this section, ((and for those)) must be deposited in the
state wildlife account and may only be used for nonwaterfowl migratory
bird projects specified by the director for the acquisition and
development of nonwaterfowl migratory bird habitat in the state and for
the enhancement, protection, and propagation of nonwaterfowl migratory
birds in the state.
(((4) With regard to the revenue from license validation and stamp
sales that is not the result of sales to stamp collectors,)) (3) The
department shall determine the proportion of migratory waterfowl
hunters and solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters by using the
yearly migratory bird hunter harvest information program survey results
or, in the event that these results are not available, other similar
survey results. A two-year average of the most recent survey results
((shall)) must be used to determine the proportion of the revenue
attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and the proportion attributed
to solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters for each fiscal year.
((For fiscal year 1998-99 and for fiscal year 1999-2000, ninety-six
percent of the stamp revenue shall be attributed to migratory waterfowl
hunters and four percent of the stamp revenue shall be attributed to
solely nonwaterfowl migratory game hunters.
(5) Acquisition shall include but not be)) (4)(a) Acquisition
projects under this section may include but are not limited to the
acceptance of gifts of real estate or any interest therein or the
rental, lease, or purchase of real estate or any interest therein.
(b) If the department acquires any fee interest, leasehold, or
rental interest in real property under this section, it shall allow the
general public, including consumptive users, reasonable access to that
property and shall, if appropriate, ensure that the deed or other
instrument creating the interest allows such access to the general
public.
(c) If the department obtains a covenant in real property in its
favor or an easement or any other interest in real property under this
section, it shall exercise its best efforts to ensure that the deed or
other instrument creating the interest grants to the general public
((in the form of a covenant running with the land)), including
consumptive users, reasonable access to the property. The private
landowner from whom the department obtains such a covenant or easement
((shall)) retains the right of granting access to the lands by written
permission, but may not charge a fee for access.
(((6) The department may produce migratory bird stamps in any given
year in excess of those necessary for sale in that year. The excess
stamps may be sold to the public.))
(5) Migratory bird permit funds may not be used on lands controlled
by private hunting clubs or on private lands that charge a fee for
public access. These funds may be used for migratory bird projects on
private land where public hunting is provided by written permission or
on areas established by the department as waterfowl hunting closures.
(6) The state auditor shall audit the department's use of revenue
derived from the sale of migratory bird permits each biennium for
compliance with the requirements of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.690 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The director is responsible for the selection of the annual
migratory bird stamp design. The department shall create collector art
prints and related artwork, utilizing the same design.)) The selection
of the annual migratory bird stamp design and the administration, sale,
distribution, and other matters relating to ((the prints and sales of
stamps with prints and related artwork shall be)) stamps and prints and
artwork is the responsibility of the department. The department may
contract with an appropriate individual or nonprofit organization for
selection of the annual migratory bird stamp design and the
administration, sale, distribution, and other matters relating to the
stamps and prints and artwork.
(2) ((The total amount brought in from the sale of prints and
related artwork shall be deposited in the state wildlife account
created in RCW 77.12.170.)) (a) The costs of producing and marketing
of stamps and prints and ((related)) artwork ((shall)) may be paid out
of the total amount brought in from sales of those same items. ((Net
funds derived from the sale of prints and related artwork shall be used
by the director))
(b) The remaining amount may only be used to contract with one or
more appropriate individuals or nonprofit organizations for the
development of waterfowl propagation projects within Washington which
specifically provide waterfowl for the Pacific flyway. The department
((shall)) may not contract with any individual or organization that
obtains compensation for allowing waterfowl hunting except if the
individual or organization does not permit hunting for compensation on
the subject property.

--- END ---