BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.040 and 2000 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that has both a population of fifty thousand or
more and, until May 16, 1995, has had its population increase by more
than ten percent in the previous ten years or, on or after May 16,
1995, has had its population increase by more than seventeen percent in
the previous ten years, and the cities located within such county, and
any other county regardless of its population that has had its
population increase by more than twenty percent in the previous ten
years, and the cities located within such county, shall conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter. However, the county
legislative authority of such a county with a population of less than
fifty thousand population may adopt a resolution removing the county,
and the cities located within the county, from the requirements of
adopting comprehensive land use plans and development regulations under
this chapter if this resolution is adopted and filed with the
department by December 31, 1990, for counties initially meeting this
set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the office of
financial management certifies that a county meets this set of criteria
under subsection (5) of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, a county not currently planning under this chapter is not
required to include in its population count those persons confined in
a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections that is located in the county.
Once a county meets either of these sets of criteria, the
requirement to conform with all of the requirements of this chapter
remains in effect, even if the county no longer meets one of these sets
of criteria.
(2)(a) The county legislative authority of any county that does not
meet either of the sets of criteria established under subsection (1) of
this section may adopt a resolution indicating its intention to have
subsection (1) of this section apply to the county. Each city, located
in a county that chooses to plan under this subsection, shall conform
with all of the requirements of this chapter. Once such a resolution
has been adopted, the county and the cities located within the county
remain subject to all of the requirements of this chapter, unless the
county subsequently adopts a removal resolution pursuant to (b)(i) of
this subsection.
(b)(i) Until December 31, 2015, the legislative authority of a
county may adopt a resolution removing the county, and the cities
located within the county, from the requirements to plan under this
section if:
(A) The county has a population of twenty thousand or fewer
inhabitants at any time between January 1, 2010, and December 31, 2015;
(B) The county has previously adopted a resolution indicating its
intention to have subsection (1) of this section apply to the county;
(C) At least sixty days prior to adopting the removal resolution,
the county provides written notification to the legislative body of
each city within the county of its intent to consider adopting a
removal resolution; and
(D) The legislative bodies of at least sixty percent of those
cities having an aggregate population of at least seventy-five percent
of the incorporated county population have not adopted resolutions
opposing the removal action by the county and provided written
notification of the resolutions to the county.
(ii) Upon adoption of a removal resolution under (b)(i) of this
subsection, the county and the cities within the county are no longer
obligated to plan under this section.
(iii) Upon adoption of a resolution under (b)(i) of this
subsection, the county may not, for at least ten years from the date of
adoption of the removal resolution, adopt another resolution indicating
its intention to have subsection (1) of this section apply to the
county.
(3) Any county or city that is initially required to conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter under subsection (1) of this
section shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The
county legislative authority shall adopt a countywide planning policy
under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located within the
county shall designate critical areas, agricultural lands, forest
lands, and mineral resource lands, and adopt development regulations
conserving these designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands and protecting these designated critical areas,
under RCW 36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the county shall designate and
take other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110;
(d) if the county has a population of fifty thousand or more, the
county and each city located within the county shall adopt a
comprehensive plan under this chapter and development regulations that
are consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan on or before
July 1, 1994, and if the county has a population of less than fifty
thousand, the county and each city located within the county shall
adopt a comprehensive plan under this chapter and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive
plan by January 1, 1995, but if the governor makes written findings
that a county with a population of less than fifty thousand or a city
located within such a county is not making reasonable progress toward
adopting a comprehensive plan and development regulations the governor
may reduce this deadline for such actions to be taken by no more than
one hundred eighty days. Any county or city subject to this subsection
may obtain an additional six months before it is required to have
adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter notifying
the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a
comprehensive plan and development regulations.
(4) Any county or city that is required to conform with all the
requirements of this chapter, as a result of the county legislative
authority adopting its resolution of intention under subsection (2) of
this section, shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a)
The county legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide planning
policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city that is
located within the county shall adopt development regulations
conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands
it designated under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of the date the
county legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention; (c)
the county shall designate and take other actions related to urban
growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city
that is located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan and
development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan not later than four years from the date the county
legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention, but a county
or city may obtain an additional six months before it is required to
have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce of its need prior to the deadline for adopting
both a comprehensive plan and development regulations.
(5) If the office of financial management certifies that the
population of a county that previously had not been required to plan
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section has changed sufficiently to
meet either of the sets of criteria specified under subsection (1) of
this section, and where applicable, the county legislative authority
has not adopted a resolution removing the county from these
requirements as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the county
and each city within such county shall take actions under this chapter
as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a
countywide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and
each city located within the county shall adopt development regulations
under RCW 36.70A.060 conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands it designated within one year of the
certification by the office of financial management; (c) the county
shall designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas
under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city located within
the county shall adopt a comprehensive land use plan and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive
plan within four years of the certification by the office of financial
management, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months
before it is required to have adopted its development regulations by
submitting a letter notifying the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce of its need prior to the deadline for
adopting both a comprehensive plan and development regulations.
(6) A copy of each document that is required under this section
shall be submitted to the department at the time of its adoption.
(7) Cities and counties planning under this chapter must amend the
transportation element of the comprehensive plan to be in compliance
with this chapter and chapter 47.80 RCW no later than December 31,
2000.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701,)) Each county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city
within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest,
and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally
existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in
effect until the county or city adopts development regulations pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands
adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(c) Each county that adopts a resolution of removal under RCW
36.70A.040(2)(b), and each city within such county, shall adopt
development regulations within one year after the adoption of the
removal resolution to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest,
and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally
existing on any parcel prior to their adoption. Such regulations shall
assure that the use of lands adjacent to the designated agricultural,
forest, or mineral resource lands shall not interfere with the
continued use, in the accustomed manner and in accordance with best
management practices, of these designated lands for the production of
food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the extraction of
minerals.
(d)(i) Any county that adopts a resolution of removal under RCW
36.70A.040(2)(b) that is not in compliance with the planning
requirements of RCW 36.70A.060, 36.70A.170, 36.70A.172, 36.70A.060(1),
36.70A.070, 36.70A.040(4), and 36.70A.070(5) at the time the resolution
is adopted shall have until June 30, 2017, to obtain approval from the
department of commerce of critical areas ordinances, development
regulations, and comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.060, 36.70A.170,
36.70A.172, 36.70A.060(1), 36.70A.070, 36.70A.040(4), and
36.70A.070(5).
(ii) Counties described in (d)(i) of this subsection that do not
receive approval by the department of commerce by June 30, 2017, shall
return to the planning requirements of RCW 36.70A.040.
(iii) Approval decisions by the department of commerce under this
subsection may be appealed to the growth management hearings board.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

--- END ---