BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.080 and 2011 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state
shall pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance
with administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted
as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(b) The commission shall request licensees to submit information
about their current professional practice at the time of license
renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This
information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board
certification, or other relevant data determined by the commission.
(c) A physician who resides and practices in Washington and obtains
or renews a retired active license shall be exempt from licensing fees
imposed under this section. The commission may establish rules
governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be
met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. The rules shall
provide that mandatory continuing education requirements may be met in
part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of approved
activities relating to professional liability risk management. The
number of hours of continuing education for a physician holding a
retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours per year.
(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the
commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to
licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's web site;
including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings
attended by organization members; or another distribution method
determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the
office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to
distribute information under this subsection.
(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant
who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without
examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the
requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in
the practice of medicine.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71A.020 and 2011 c 178 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and
the educational and training requirements for licensure as a physician
assistant or for those enrolled in any physician assistant training
program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited
physician assistant training program approved by the commission and
within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by
the commission, if the examination tests subjects substantially
equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant
training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department
of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other
requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board of medical
examiners, or the medical quality assurance commission as of July 1,
1999, shall continue to be licensed.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to
which:
(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during
training; and
(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion
of a physician assistant training course.
(b) Such rules shall provide:
(i) That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to
the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and
(ii) That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only
under the supervision and control of a physician licensed in this
state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to
necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physician
or physicians at the place where services are rendered.
(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the
commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the
commission, detailing the education, training, and experience of the
physician assistant and such other information as the commission may
require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by
the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge
of fifty dollars per year shall be charged on each license renewal or
issuance of a new license to be collected by the department and
deposited into the impaired physician account for physician assistant
participation in the impaired physician program. Each applicant shall
furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:
(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician
assistant program approved by the commission and is eligible to take
the examination approved by the commission;
(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and
(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of
practicing medicine as a physician assistant with reasonable skill and
safety. The commission may require an applicant to submit to such
examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an
applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to safely practice
as a physician assistant.
(4)(a) The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary
action upon the application for license as provided in the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW.
(b) The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280. The commission shall request licensees to submit
information about their current professional practice at the time of
license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested.
This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, or
other relevant data determined by the commission.
(c) The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors
who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.
(5) All funds in the impaired physician account shall be paid to
the contract entity within sixty days of deposit.

--- END ---