BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
through this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or
instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(2) "Service outage" means loss of a telecommunications service
resulting from equipment failure not caused by the customer.
(3) "Telecommunications service" means video, voice, music, or data
delivered for retail sale to the general public within the state by
coaxial cable, fiber optic cable, wireless transmission, or direct
broadcast satellite.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Every person providing a telecommunications
service must provide pro rata credits to customers for service outages
whenever that service is not available for a total of four hours or
more in a monthly billing cycle. The minimum amount of pro rata credit
a company must provide is the monthly cost of service divided by
thirty, then multiplied by the number of days or portions of days
during which service was not provided. This section does not prevent
a person from providing pro rata credits for service outages that total
less than four hours in a monthly billing cycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A failure to provide a credit under this chapter is
not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of
business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an
unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. In addition to any other penalties
or remedies available under chapter 19.86 RCW, a person injured by a
violation of this chapter may bring an action for recovery of
liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars per violation,
plus court costs and attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to contracts or franchise
agreements issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---