BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.34.330 and 2006 c 371 s 232 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state historical society shall establish a
competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage
capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget.
The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and
evaluation criteria. Application for funding of specific heritage
projects may be made to the society by local governments, public
development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments,
and other entities, as determined by the society. The society, with
the advice of ((leaders in the heritage field)) an advisory panel,
including but not limited to leaders in the fields of heritage,
architecture, and finance, representatives from the office of the
secretary of state, the department of enterprise services, the eastern
Washington state historical society, and the department of archaeology
and historic preservation, shall establish and submit a prioritized
list of heritage capital projects to the governor and the legislature
in the society's biennial capital budget request. The list shall
include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state
funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the
project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on
a biennial project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. The
prioritized list shall be developed through open and public meetings
and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three and one-third percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion
of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property
when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind
contributions. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants
authorized under this section, the society shall include provisions
requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant. No more than six
percent of funds appropriated for the grant program may be retained and
used by the society for administrative costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.34.395 and 2007 c 138 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature affirms that the Washington state historical
society is the state's designated partner representative for the
Vancouver national historic reserve. Accordingly, the Washington state
historical society shall:
(1) Participate in the regularly scheduled coordination meetings of
the Vancouver national historic reserve partners;
(2) Participate in the development of management, education, and
interpretive plans and policies associated with the Vancouver national
historic reserve;
(3) Partner with ((Washington State University and other agencies
for purposes of managing the center for Columbia river history,
headquartered on the Vancouver national historic reserve, and with))
the department for preservation and rehabilitation of the site; and
(4) Develop and submit to the office of financial management and
the legislature operating and capital budget requests concurrent with
the biennial cycle and oversee the management of all funds appropriated
by the state for the Vancouver national historic reserve.

Sec. 3 RCW 27.34.900 and 1993 c 101 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The building and grounds designated as Block 2, Grainger's Addition
to the City of Olympia, County of Thurston, acquired by the state under
senate joint resolution No. 18, session of 1939, is hereby designated
a part of the state capitol, to be known as the state capital
historical museum. This structure is to be used to ((house and
interpret the collection)) support the mission of the Washington state
historical society((. This section does not limit the society's use of
other structures)), including but not limited to leasing of the
building, the proceeds of which shall be retained by the society as a
source of funding for mission-related activities.

--- END ---