BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:
(1) At the time of retirement, plan 2 members may purchase an
optional actuarially equivalent life annuity benefit from the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2
retirement fund established in RCW 41.50.075. A minimum payment of
twenty-five thousand dollars is required.
(2) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing
an annuity under this section must pay all of the cost with an eligible
rollover, direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an
eligible retirement plan.
(a) The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all eligible
rollovers and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal
revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service.
The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a
rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information
necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any
transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment
under federal income tax law.
(b) "Eligible retirement plan" means a tax qualified plan offered
by a governmental employer.

--- END ---