BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning September 1, 2014, the director or the director's
designee may begin:
(1) Selling internet advertisements for display on the state
lottery web site subject to the following conditions:
(a) The web site must include a disclaimer indicating the inclusion
of advertisements does not imply endorsement by the state;
(b) Prior to selling advertisements, the commission must establish
policy, style, and content guidelines for advertisements;
(c) Revenue generated from the sale of internet advertisements must
be deposited in the state lottery account created in RCW 67.70.230;
(2) Charging for the use of the state lottery logo and trademark
subject to the following conditions:
(a) Charges for use of the state lottery logo or trademark must be
conducted pursuant to commission established policies and content
guidelines; and
(b) Revenue generated from charges under this subsection must be
deposited in the state lottery account created in RCW 67.70.230.

--- END ---