BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The state lottery may provide as a promotional activity, free or
for a charge, scratch tickets to persons otherwise eligible to purchase
lottery tickets, and to licensed retailers for distribution to persons
otherwise eligible to purchase lottery tickets. Only scratch tickets
with a retail price of one or two dollars may be used under this
section. The state lottery shall limit promotional scratch tickets to
no more than one percent of the annual sales of one or two dollar
scratch tickets. Promotional scratch tickets provided under this
section must be conducted in accordance with rules established for
promotional activities. Rules adopted under this section must include
audit and reporting provisions.
If the projected revenue from the state lottery as outlined by the
revenue forecast council is lower than ten percent, then the commission
must review the use of promotional scratch tickets and may suspend the
use of promotional scratch tickets.

--- END ---