BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.040 and 2006 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:
(1) To adopt rules governing the establishment and operation of a
state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a
lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and
in order that such lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues
for the state consonant with the dignity of the state and the general
welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares, but such tickets or shares may not be
sold over the internet. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or
video terminals which allow for individual play against such devices or
terminals shall be prohibited. An affirmative vote of sixty percent of
both houses of the legislature is required before offering any game
allowing or requiring a player to become eligible for a prize or to
otherwise play any portion of the game by interacting with any device
or terminal involving digital, video, or other electronic
representations of any game of chance, including scratch tickets, pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice, roulette, keno, or slot
machines. Approval of the legislature shall be required before
entering any agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared
games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares, except
as limited by (a) of this subsection;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any online game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, except as
limited by (a) of this subsection;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general
fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance
with RCW 43.01.050;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, ((on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion)) there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of
the probability of purchasing a winning ticket on the lottery ticket or
share and in any advertising or promotion.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.050 and 2012 c 117 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the office of director of the state lottery. The
director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and
shall receive such salary as is determined by the governor, but in no
case may the director's salary be more than ninety percent of the
salary of the governor. The director shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the operation of the lottery in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and with the rules of
the commission.
(2) Appoint such deputy and assistant directors as may be required
to carry out the functions and duties of his or her office: PROVIDED,
That the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW,
shall not apply to such deputy and assistant directors.
(3) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants
and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter: PROVIDED, That the provisions of the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW, shall not apply to such employees as are engaged in
undercover audit or investigative work or security operations but shall
apply to other employees appointed by the director, except as provided
for in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) In accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules
of the commission, license as agents to sell or distribute lottery
tickets such persons as in his or her opinion will best serve the
public convenience and promote the sale of tickets or shares. The
director may require a bond from any licensed agent, in such amount as
provided in the rules of the commission. Every licensed agent shall
prominently display his or her license, or a copy thereof, as provided
in the rules of the commission. License fees may be established by the
commission, and, if established, shall be deposited in the state
lottery account created by RCW 67.70.230.
(5) Confer regularly as necessary or desirable with the commission
on the operation and administration of the lottery; make available for
inspection by the commission, upon request, all books, records, files,
and other information and documents of the lottery; and advise the
commission and recommend such matters as the director deems necessary
and advisable to improve the operation and administration of the
lottery.
(6) Subject to the applicable laws relating to public contracts,
enter into contracts for the operation of the lottery, or any part
thereof, and into contracts for the promotion of the lottery. No
contract awarded or entered into by the director may be assigned by the
holder thereof except by specific approval of the commission:
PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter authorizes the director to enter
into public contracts for the regular and permanent administration of
the lottery after the initial development and implementation.
(7) Certify ((quarterly)) annually to the state treasurer and the
commission a full and complete statement of lottery revenues, prize
disbursements, and other expenses for the preceding ((quarter)) year.
(8) Carry on a continuous study and investigation of the lottery
throughout the state: (a) For the purpose of ascertaining any defects
in this chapter or in the rules issued thereunder by reason whereof any
abuses in the administration and operation of the lottery or any
evasion of this chapter or the rules may arise or be practiced, (b) for
the purpose of formulating recommendations for changes in this chapter
and the rules promulgated thereunder to prevent such abuses and
evasions, (c) to guard against the use of this chapter and the rules
issued thereunder as a cloak for the carrying on of professional
gambling and crime, and (d) to ensure that this chapter and rules shall
be in such form and be so administered as to serve the true purposes of
this chapter.
(9) Make a continuous study and investigation of: (a) The
operation and the administration of similar laws which may be in effect
in other states or countries, (b) the operation of an additional game
or games for the benefit of a particular program or purpose, (c) any
literature on the subject which from time to time may be published or
available, (d) any federal laws which may affect the operation of the
lottery, and (e) the reaction of the citizens of this state to existing
and potential features of the lottery with a view to recommending or
effecting changes that will tend to serve the purposes of this chapter.
(10) Have all enforcement powers granted in chapter 9.46 RCW.
(11) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.340 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the fund most
impacted by this potential event is the Washington opportunity pathways
account. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to use some of
the proceeds from the shared game lottery to make up the difference
that the potential state lottery revenue loss would have on the
Washington opportunity pathways account. The legislature further
intends to use some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to
fund programs and services related to problem and pathological
gambling.
(2) The Washington opportunity pathways account is expected to
receive one hundred two million dollars annually from state lottery
games other than the shared game lottery. For fiscal year 2011 and
thereafter, if the amount of lottery revenues earmarked for the
Washington opportunity pathways account is less than one hundred two
million dollars, the commission, after making the transfer required
under subsection (3) of this section, must transfer sufficient moneys
from revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the Washington
opportunity pathways account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars.
(3)(a) The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the
shared game lottery, to the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892, an amount equal to the percentage specified in (b) of this
subsection of net receipts. For purposes of this subsection, "net
receipts" means the difference between (i) revenue received from the
sale of lottery tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of
shared game lottery tickets or shares; and (ii) the sum of payments
made to winners.
(b) In fiscal year 2006, the percentage to be transferred to the
problem gambling account is one-tenth of one percent. In fiscal year
2007 and subsequent fiscal years, the percentage to be transferred to
the problem gambling account is thirteen one-hundredths of one percent.
(4) ((The commission shall transfer the remaining net revenues, if
any, derived from the shared game lottery "Powerball" authorized in RCW
67.70.044(1) after the transfers pursuant to this section into the
state general fund for support for the program of basic education under
RCW 28A.150.200.
(5))) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game
lottery account after the transfers pursuant to this section shall be
deposited into the Washington opportunity pathways account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 67.70.042 (Scratch games -- Baseball
stadium construction) and 1997 c 220 s 207 & 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 104
are each repealed.

--- END ---