BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.635 and 2013 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW, the name
or address of an individual vehicle owner shall not be released by the
department, county auditor, or agency or firm authorized by the
department except under the following circumstances:
(a) The requesting party is a business entity that requests the
information for use in the course of business;
(b) The request is a written request that is signed by the person
requesting disclosure that contains the full legal name and address of
the requesting party, that specifies the purpose for which the
information will be used; and
(c) The requesting party enters into a disclosure agreement with
the department in which the party promises that the party will use the
information only for the purpose stated in the request for the
information; and that the party does not intend to use, or facilitate
the use of, the information for the purpose of making any unsolicited
business contact with a person named in the disclosed information. The
term "unsolicited business contact" means a contact that is intended to
result in, or promote, the sale of any goods or services to a person
named in the disclosed information. The term does not apply to
situations where the requesting party and such person have been
involved in a business transaction prior to the date of the disclosure
request and where the request is made in connection with the
transaction.
(2) Where both a mailing address and residence address are recorded
on the vehicle record and are different, only the mailing address will
be disclosed. Both addresses will be disclosed in response to requests
for disclosure from courts, law enforcement agencies, or government
entities with enforcement, investigative, or taxing authority and only
for use in the normal course of conducting their business.
(3) The disclosing entity shall retain the request for disclosure
for three years.
(4)(a) Whenever the disclosing entity grants a request for
information under this section by an attorney or private investigator,
the disclosing entity shall provide notice to the vehicle owner, to
whom the information applies, that the request has been granted. The
notice must only include: (i) That the disclosing entity has disclosed
the vehicle owner's name and address pursuant to a request made under
this section; (ii) the date that the disclosure was made; and (iii)
that the vehicle owner has five days from receipt of the notice to
contact the disclosing entity to determine the occupation of the
requesting party.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the only
information about the requesting party that the disclosing entity may
disclose in response to a request made by a vehicle owner under (a) of
this subsection is whether the requesting party was an attorney or
private investigator. The request by the vehicle owner must be
submitted to the disclosing entity within five days of receipt of the
original notice.
(c) In the case of a vehicle owner who submits to the disclosing
entity a copy of a valid court order restricting another person from
contacting the vehicle owner or his or her family or household member,
the disclosing entity shall provide the vehicle owner with the name and
address of the requesting party.
(5) Any person who is furnished vehicle owner information under
this section shall be responsible for assuring that the information
furnished is not used for a purpose contrary to the agreement between
the person and the department.
(6) This section shall not apply to requests for information by
governmental entities or requests that may be granted under any other
provision of this title expressly authorizing the disclosure of the
names or addresses of vehicle owners.
(7) This section shall not apply to title history information under
RCW 19.118.170.
(8) Except for business entities licensed under chapter 46.80 RCW,
the department shall charge a fee of two dollars for each record
returned pursuant to a request made by a business entity under
subsection (1) of this section and deposit the fee into the highway
safety account.

--- END ---