BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.400 and 2000 c 238 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Telecommunications backbone cabling systems" means a system
that provides interconnections between telecommunications closets,
equipment rooms, and entrance facilities in the telecommunications
cabling system structure. Backbone cabling consists of the backbone
cables, intermediate and main cross-connects, mechanical terminations,
and patch cords or jumpers used for backbone to backbone cross-connection. Backbone cabling also includes cabling between buildings.
(2) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's designee.
(5) "Telecommunications horizontal cabling systems" means the
portions of the telecommunications cabling system that extend((s
[extend])) from the work area telecommunications outlet or connector to
the telecommunications closet. The horizontal cabling includes the
horizontal cables, the telecommunications outlet or connector in the
work area, the mechanical termination, and horizontal cross-connections
located in the telecommunications closet.
(6) "Telecommunications network demarcation point" means the point
or interconnection between the service provider's communications
cabling, terminal equipment, and protective apparatus and the
customer's premises telecommunications cabling system. The location of
this point for regulated carriers is determined by federal and state
regulations. The carrier should be contacted to determine the location
policies in effect in the area.
(7) "Telecommunications scope of work" means the work of a
telecommunications contractor. This includes the installation,
maintenance, and testing of telecommunications systems, equipment, and
associated hardware, pathway systems, and cable management systems,
which excludes cable tray and conduit raceway systems. The scope also
includes installation of open wiring systems of telecommunications
cables, surface nonmetallic raceways designated and used exclusively
for telecommunications, optical fiber innerduct raceway, underground
raceways designated and used exclusively for telecommunications and
installed for additions or extensions to existing telecommunications
systems not to exceed fifty feet inside the building, and incidental
short sections of circular or surface metal raceway, not to exceed ten
feet, for access or protection of telecommunications cabling and
installation of cable trays and ladder racks in telecommunications
service entrance rooms, spaces, or closets.
(8) A "telecommunications structured cabling system" is the
complete collective configuration of cabling and associated hardware at
a given site and installed to perform specific telecommunications
functions.
(9) "Telecommunications administrator" means a person designated by
a telecommunications contractor to supervise the installation of
telecommunications systems in accordance with rules adopted under this
chapter.
(10) "Telecommunications closet" means a room for housing
telecommunications equipment, cable terminations, and cross-connect
wiring that serve that particular floor. The closet is the recognized
transition point between the backbone and horizontal cabling systems.
(11) "Telecommunications contractor" means a person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity that advertises, offers to
undertake, undertakes, submits a bid for, or does the work of
installing or maintaining telecommunications systems.
(12) "Telecommunications service entrance room or space" means a
room or space used as the building serving facility in which the
joining of inter-building and intra-building backbone facilities takes
place. The service entrance room may also house electronic equipment
serving any telecommunications function.
(13) "Telecommunications systems" means structured cabling systems
that begin at the demarcation point between the local service provider
and the customer's premises structured cabling system.
(a) Telecommunications systems encompass all forms of information
generation, processing, and transporting of signals conveyed
electronically or optically within or between buildings, including
voice, data, video, and audio.
(b) Telecommunications systems include structured cabling systems,
compatible connecting hardware, telecommunications equipment, premises
switching equipment providing operational power to the
telecommunications device, infrared, fiber optic, radio-frequency,
power distribution associated with telecommunications systems, and
other limited-energy interconnections associated with
telecommunications systems or appliances.
(c) Telecommunications systems do not include horizontal cabling
used for fire protection signaling systems, intrusion alarms, access
control systems, patient monitoring systems, energy management control
systems, industrial and automation control systems, HVAC/refrigeration
control systems, lighting or lighting control systems, and stand-alone
amplified sound or public address systems.
(d) Telecommunications systems may interface with other building
signal systems including security, alarms, and energy management at
cross-connection junctions within telecommunications closets or at
extended points of demarcation. Horizontal cabling for a
telecommunications outlet, necessary to interface with any of these
systems outside of a telecommunications closet, is the work of the
telecommunications contractor. Telecommunications systems do not
include the installation or termination of premises line voltage
service, feeder, or branch circuit conductors or equipment.
(14) "Telecommunications worker" means a person primarily and
regularly engaged in the installation and/or maintenance of
telecommunications systems, equipment, and infrastructure as defined in
this chapter.
(15) "Telecommunications workstation" means a building space where
the occupant normally interacts with telecommunications equipment. The
telecommunications outlet in the work area is the point at which end-user equipment plugs into the building telecommunications utility
formed by the pathway, space, and building wiring system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---