BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that research
shows that summer learning loss contributes to the academic opportunity
gaps between students in Washington's schools and that falling behind
in academics can be a predictor of whether a student will drop out of
school. The legislature further finds that access to quality expanded
learning opportunities during the school year and summer helps mitigate
summer learning loss and improves academic performance, attendance, on-time grade advancement, and classroom behaviors.
(2) The legislature intends to increase expanded learning
opportunities to improve educational outcomes and close the persistent
academic opportunity gaps between students. The legislature further
intends to build capacity, identify best practices, leverage local
resources, and promote a sustainable expanded learning opportunities
system for students in early elementary through secondary schools by
providing an ongoing work group and infrastructure that helps
coordinate expanded learning opportunity efforts throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) "Expanded learning opportunities" means
structured, intentional, and creative learning environments outside the
traditional school day that build partnerships with schools, align in-school and out-of-school learning, and create enriching experiences for
youth using activities that complement classroom-based instruction.
The opportunities may be provided before or after school, during the
summer, or as extended day, week, or year programs.
(2) Expanded learning opportunities are provided by community-based
organizations, which may include school-based, after school, youth
development, or faith-based organizations. The organizations shall
provide a range of culturally responsive enrichment and learning
activities, which may focus on academic and nonacademic areas; arts;
civic engagement; service-learning and science; technology,
engineering, and mathematics; and competencies for college and career
readiness and global citizenship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The expanded learning opportunities
council is established to advise the governor, state legislature, and
the superintendent of public instruction regarding an expanded learning
opportunities system.
(2) The council shall also provide a vision, guidance, assistance,
and advice to support an expanded learning opportunities system, as
well as other current or proposed programs and initiatives across the
spectrum of early elementary through secondary education so that the
needs and demands for a statewide coordinated system of expanded
learning opportunities are identified and an expanded learning
opportunities system is developed.
(3) The council shall identify fiscal, resource, and partnership
opportunities, coordinate policy development, set quality standards,
and develop a comprehensive expanded learning opportunities action plan
designed to implement expanded learning opportunities, address summer
learning loss, provide academic supports, build strong school-community-based organization partnerships, and track performance of
expanded learning opportunities in closing the opportunity gap, so that
students receive maximum and direct benefit.
(4) When making recommendations regarding best practices, the
council shall consider the best practices on the state menus developed
in accordance with RCW 28A.165.035 and 28A.655.235.
(5) The governor's office, in consultation with the superintendent
of public instruction, shall convene the expanded learning
opportunities council. The members of the council must have experience
in expanded learning opportunities, and include groups and agencies
representing diverse student interests and geographical locations
across the state. Up to eighteen participants, agencies,
organizations, or individuals may be invited to participate in the
expanded learning opportunities council but the membership shall
include the following:
(a) Three representatives from nonprofit community-based
organizations;
(b) Two representatives from regional work force development
councils;
(c) One representative from each of the following organizations or
agencies:
(i) A nonprofit organization with statewide intermediary experience
in expanded learning opportunities frameworks;
(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(iii) Twenty-first century community learning centers;
(iv) A Washington state parent–teacher association;
(v) School district community partnerships;
(vi) The Washington state institute for public policy or a state
public policy center with working knowledge of expanded learning
opportunities; and
(vii) Community and technical colleges; and
(d) A representative of four-year institutions of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(6) Staff support for the expanded learning opportunity council
shall be provided by the governor's office and the office of financial
management with support from the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and other state agencies as necessary. Appointees of the
council shall be selected by May 30, 2014. The council shall hold its
first meeting before August 1, 2014. At the first meeting, the council
shall determine regularly scheduled meeting times and locations. The
council shall provide a report to the governor and the legislature by
December 1, 2014, and by December 1st annually thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---