BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.69.030 and 2009 c 350 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, no orders for a refund
under this chapter ((shall)) may be made except on a claim:
(((1))) (a) Verified by the person who paid the tax, the person's
guardian, executor or administrator; and
(((2))) (b) Filed with the county treasurer within three years
after the due date of the payment sought to be refunded; and
(((3))) (c) Stating the statutory ground upon which the refund is
claimed.
(2) No claim for an order of refund is required for a refund that
is based upon:
(a) An order of the board of equalization, state board of tax
appeals, or court of competent jurisdiction justifying a refund under
RCW 84.69.020 (9) through (12);
(b) A decision by the treasurer or assessor that is rendered within
three years after the due date of the payment to be refunded,
justifying a refund under RCW 84.69.020; or
(c) A decision by the assessor or department approving an exemption
application that is filed under chapter 84.36 RCW within three years
after the due date of the payment to be refunded.

--- END ---