BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a basic food recipient in a one-person household becomes
an incarcerated person, the department shall take appropriate actions
to terminate the incarcerated person's benefits. Appropriate action
includes, but is not limited to, deactivating the electronic benefit
card provided under the Washington basic food program.
(2) When an incarcerated person is included in the assistance unit
of a multiple person household, the department shall adjust the basic
food benefits of the assistance unit to exclude the incarcerated
person.
(3) When the incarcerated person is released from custody it is his
or her responsibility to contact the department to apply for basic food
benefits lost under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
(4) The department shall enter into an agreement with the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the department
of corrections to allow the department to data-match the basic food
recipient database with the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs' jail booking and reporting system and database of
incarcerated persons with the department of corrections. Data matches
must be conducted at least every five days.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Basic food benefits" means federal food stamp program benefits
provided through the Washington basic food program.
(b) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(c) "Incarcerated person" means (i) any person committed to the
custody of: (A) A department of corrections facility; (B) a county
jail; or (C) a municipal jail; and (ii) the period of incarceration
lasts for thirty consecutive days or more.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.48.100 and 1990 c 3 s 130 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A department of corrections or chief law enforcement officer
responsible for the operation of a jail shall maintain a jail register,
open to the public, into which shall be entered in a timely basis:
(a) The name of each person confined in the jail with the hour,
date and cause of the confinement; and
(b) The hour, date and manner of each person's discharge.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section the
records of a person confined in jail shall be held in confidence and
shall be made available only to criminal justice agencies as defined in
RCW 43.43.705; or
(a) For use in inspections made pursuant to RCW 70.48.070;
(b) In jail certification proceedings;
(c) For use in court proceedings upon the written order of the
court in which the proceedings are conducted; ((or))
(d) To the department of social and health services; or
(e) Upon the written permission of the person.
(3)(a) Law enforcement may use booking photographs of a person
arrested or confined in a local or state penal institution to assist
them in conducting investigations of crimes.
(b) Photographs and information concerning a person convicted of a
sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 may be disseminated as provided
in RCW 4.24.550, 9A.44.130, 9A.44.140, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 43.43.745,
46.20.187, 70.48.470, 72.09.330, and section 401, chapter 3, Laws of
1990.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2015.

--- END ---