BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.44.060 and 2003 c 334 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the chief administrative officer of an agency of state
government is satisfied that an assessing district has complied with
all the conditions precedent to the levy of assessments for district
purposes, pursuant to this chapter against lands occupied, used, or
under the jurisdiction of the officer's agency, he or she shall pay
them, together with any interest thereon from any funds specifically
appropriated to the agency therefor or from any funds of the agency
which under existing law have been or are required to be expended to
pay assessments on a current basis. ((In all other cases, the chief
administrative officer shall certify to the director of financial
management that the assessment is one properly chargeable to the state.
The director of financial management shall pay such assessments from
funds available or appropriated for this purpose.))
Except as provided in RCW 79.44.190 no lands of the state shall be
subject to a lien for unpaid assessments, nor shall the interest of the
state in any land be sold for unpaid assessments where assessment liens
attached to the lands prior to state ownership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---