BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to investigate the
various economic opportunities and industrial uses associated with
industrial hemp cultivation and production as a farm product in the
state of Washington. Through conducting a study, the legislature
intends to assess whether the state's growing conditions and economic
potential are favorable for the production of industrial hemp so that
growers and other businesses in Washington's agricultural industry may
take advantage of this market opportunity. Furthermore, should the
study find favorable growing conditions, it is the intent of the
legislature to encourage the development of an industrial hemp industry
as a fecund addition to our state's cornucopia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agribusiness" means the processing of raw agricultural
products, including but not limited to timber and industrial hemp, or
the performance of value-added functions with regard to raw
agricultural products.
(2) "Grower" means any person or business entity growing industrial
hemp.
(3) "Hemp products" includes all products made from industrial hemp
including, but not limited to, cloth, cordage, fiber, food, fuel,
paint, paper, particle board, plastics, seed, seed meal and seed oil
for consumption, and certified seed for cultivation, if the seeds
originate from industrial hemp varieties.
(4) "Industrial hemp" means all parts and varieties of the plant
cannabis sativa, cultivated or possessed by a grower, whether growing
or not, that contain a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of point
three percent or less by weight, except that the THC concentration
limit of point three percent may be exceeded for licensed industrial
hemp seed research.
(5) "Tetrahydrocannabinol" or "THC" means synthetic equivalents of
the substances contained in cannabis sativa, or in the resinous
extractives of, cannabis, or synthetic substances, compounds, salts, or
derivatives of cannabis sativa or chemicals and their isomers with
similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity.
(6) "THC concentration" means percent of total THC, which is the
combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and
tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis,
regardless of moisture content.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Industrial hemp is an agricultural product
that may be grown, produced, possessed, and commercially traded in the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to receiving federal or private
funds for this purpose, Washington State University shall study the
feasibility and desirability of industrial hemp production in
Washington state. In conducting the study, the university shall gather
information from agricultural and scientific literature, consulting
with experts and the public, and reviewing the best practices of other
states and countries worldwide regarding the development of markets for
industrial hemp and hemp products. The study must include an analysis
of:
(a) The market economic conditions affecting the development of an
industrial hemp industry in the state;
(b) The estimated value-added benefit that Washington's economy
would reap from having a developed industrial hemp industry in the
state;
(c) Whether Washington soils and growing conditions are appropriate
for economically viable levels of industrial hemp production;
(d) The agronomy research being conducted worldwide relating to
industrial hemp varieties, production, and use; and
(e) Other legislative acts, experiences, and outcomes around the
world regarding industrial hemp production.
(2)(a) The university shall report its findings to the legislature
by January 14, 2015.
(b) The report must include recommendations for any legislative
actions necessary to encourage and support the development of an
industrial hemp industry in the state of Washington.
(3) This section expires August 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---