BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.240 and 2013 c 315 s 2, 2013 c 190 s 7, and 2013
c 183 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies;
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator;
(6) The statewide gang database referenced in RCW 43.43.762;
(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in
RCW 69.43.165;
(8) Information submitted to the statewide unified sex offender
notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040(6) by a
person for the purpose of receiving notification regarding a registered
sex offender, including the person's name, residential address, and e-mail address;
(9) Personally identifying information collected by law enforcement
agencies pursuant to local security alarm system programs and vacation
crime watch programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted
so as to prohibit the legal owner of a residence or business from
accessing information regarding his or her residence or business;
((and))
(10) The felony firearm offense conviction database of felony
firearm offenders established in RCW 43.43.822; ((and))
(11) The identity of a state employee or officer who has in good
faith filed a complaint with an ethics board, as provided in RCW
42.52.410, or who has in good faith reported improper governmental
action, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, to the auditor or other public
official, as defined in RCW 42.40.020; ((and))
(12) The following security threat group information collected and
maintained by the department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.745:
(a) Information that could lead to the identification of a person's
security threat group status, affiliation, or activities; (b)
information that reveals specific security threats associated with the
operation and activities of security threat groups; and (c) information
that identifies the number of security threat group members,
affiliates, or associates; and
(13) The global positioning system data that shows the residence of
an employee or worker of a criminal justice agency as defined in RCW
10.97.030. However, any information in a public record related to the
employee or worker arriving at an incident is not exempt from
disclosure under this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection,
"data that shows the residence" includes a three mile distance from the
employee or worker's residential address.

--- END ---