BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.105 and 2011 c 234 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon request by a peace officer's employer or on its own
initiative, the commission may deny or revoke certification of any
peace officer, after written notice and hearing, if a hearing is timely
requested by the peace officer under RCW 43.101.155, based upon a
finding of one or more of the following conditions:
(a) The peace officer has failed to timely meet all requirements
for obtaining a certificate of basic law enforcement training, a
certificate of basic law enforcement training equivalency, or a
certificate of exemption from the training;
(b) The peace officer has knowingly falsified or omitted material
information on an application for training or certification to the
commission;
(c) The peace officer has been convicted at any time of a felony
offense under the laws of this state or has been convicted of a federal
or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony under the laws of this
state; except that if a certified peace officer was convicted of a
felony before being employed as a peace officer, and the circumstances
of the prior felony conviction were fully disclosed to his or her
employer before being hired, the commission may revoke certification
only with the agreement of the employing law enforcement agency;
(d) The peace officer has been discharged for disqualifying
misconduct, the discharge is final, and some or all of the acts or
omissions forming the basis for the discharge proceedings occurred on
or after January 1, 2002;
(e) The peace officer has a sustained finding for untruthfulness
that is an intentional and knowing misstatement of a material fact in
an official proceeding that alters, or could reasonably alter, the
outcome of the proceeding or decisions of others; or felony level
criminal activity or gross misdemeanor activity while on duty, or any
felony criminal activity and the following gross misdemeanor crimes:
Assault in the fourth degree, theft in the third degree or malicious
mischief in the third degree while off duty, and some or all of the
acts or omissions forming the basis for the finding occurred on or
after July 1, 2014;
(f) The peace officer's certificate was previously issued by
administrative error on the part of the commission; or
(((f))) (g) The peace officer has interfered with an investigation
or action for denial or revocation of certificate by: (i) Knowingly
making a materially false statement to the commission; or (ii) in any
matter under investigation by or otherwise before the commission,
tampering with evidence or tampering with or intimidating any witness.
(2) After July 24, 2005, the commission shall deny certification to
any applicant who has lost his or her certification as a result of a
break in service of more than twenty-four consecutive months if that
applicant failed to comply with the requirements set forth in RCW
43.101.080(19) and 43.101.095(2).

--- END ---