BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.75.300 and 1985 c 369 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of each county may by resolution classify
and designate portions of the county roads as primitive roads where the
designated road portion:
(1) Is not classified as part of the county primary road system, as
provided for in RCW 36.86.070;
(2) Has a gravel or earth driving surface; and
(3) Has an average annual daily traffic of one hundred or fewer
vehicles.
Any road designated as a primitive road shall be marked with signs
indicating that it is a primitive road, as provided in the manual of
uniform traffic control devices, at all places where the primitive road
portion begins or connects with a highway other than another primitive
road. No design or signing or maintenance standards or requirements,
other than the requirement that warning signs be placed as provided in
this section, apply to primitive roads.
The design of a primitive road, any discretionary maintenance, and
the location, placing, or failing to place road signs, other than the
requirement that warning signs be placed as provided in this section,
shall not be considered in any action for damages brought against a
county, or against a county employee or county employees, or both,
arising from vehicular traffic on the primitive road.

--- END ---