BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning on the effective date of this section, the license
issuance fee under RCW 66.24.630(4) does not apply to any spirits
retail licensee with respect to sales of spirits in original containers
to retailers licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.055 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is a license for spirits distributors to (a) sell spirits
purchased from manufacturers, distillers, or suppliers including,
without limitation, licensed Washington distilleries, licensed spirits
importers, other Washington spirits distributors, or suppliers of
foreign spirits located outside of the United States, to spirits
retailers including, without limitation, spirits retail licensees,
special occasion license holders, interstate common carrier license
holders, restaurant spirits retailer license holders, spirits, beer,
and wine private club license holders, hotel license holders, sports
entertainment facility license holders, and spirits, beer, and wine
nightclub license holders, and to other spirits distributors; and (b)
export the same from the state.
(2) By January 1, 2012, the board must issue spirits distributor
licenses to all applicants who, upon December 8, 2011, have the right
to purchase spirits from a spirits manufacturer, spirits distiller, or
other spirits supplier for resale in the state, or are agents of such
supplier authorized to sell to licensees in the state, unless the board
determines that issuance of a license to such applicant is not in the
public interest.
(3)(a) As limited by (b) and (c) of this subsection and subject to
(((c))) (d) of this subsection, each spirits distributor licensee must
pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license
issuance fee calculated as follows:
(i) In each of the first twenty-seven months of licensure, ten
percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits
made during the month for which the fee is due, respectively; and
(ii) In the twenty-eighth month of licensure and each month
thereafter, five percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's
sales of spirits made during the month for which the fee is due,
respectively.
(b) The fee required under this subsection (3) is calculated only
on sales of items which the licensee was the first spirits distributor
or other licensee in the state to have received:
(i) In the case of spirits manufactured in the state, from the
distiller; or
(ii) In the case of spirits manufactured outside the state, from an
authorized out-of-state supplier.
(c) The fee required under this subsection (3) is only required to
be paid by the spirits distributor that is the first in the state to
possess the spirits.
(d) By March 31, 2013, all persons holding spirits distributor
licenses on or before March 31, 2013, must have paid collectively one
hundred fifty million dollars or more in spirits distributor license
fees. If the collective payment through March 31, 2013, totals less
than one hundred fifty million dollars, the board must, according to
rules adopted by the board for the purpose, collect by May 31, 2013, as
additional spirits distributor license fees the difference between one
hundred fifty million dollars and the actual receipts, allocated among
persons holding spirits distributor licenses at any time on or before
March 31, 2013, ratably according to their spirits sales made during
calendar year 2012. Any amount by which such payments exceed one
hundred fifty million dollars by March 31, 2013, must be credited to
future license issuance fee obligations of spirits distributor
licensees according to rules adopted by the board.
(((d))) (e) A retail licensee selling for resale must pay a
distributor license fee under the terms and conditions in this section
on resales of spirits the licensee has purchased on which no other
distributor license fee has been paid. The board must establish rules
setting forth the frequency and timing of such payments and reporting
of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with payments due quarterly in
arrears.
(((e))) (f) No spirits inventory may be subject to calculation of
more than a single spirits distributor license issuance fee.
(4) In addition to the payment set forth in subsection (3) of this
section, each spirits distributor licensee renewing its annual license
must pay an annual license renewal fee of one thousand three hundred
twenty dollars for each licensed location.
(5) There is no minimum facility size or capacity for spirits
distributor licenses, and no limit on the number of such licenses
issued to qualified applicants. License applicants must provide
physical security of the product that is substantially as effective as
the physical security of the distribution facilities currently operated
by the board with respect to preventing pilferage. License issuances
and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations
promulgated thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities,
towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools,
and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local
liquor licenses. However, existing distributor premises licensed to
sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under
RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for
spirits distributor licenses.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.630 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 401 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a spirits retail license to: Sell spirits in original
containers to consumers for consumption off the licensed premises and
to permit holders; sell spirits in original containers to retailers
licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises, for resale at
their licensed premises according to the terms of their licenses,
although ((no single sale may exceed twenty-four)) sales by a single
spirits retail licensee to a single retailer licensed to sell for
consumption on the premises on any business day may not exceed sixty
liters, unless the sale is by a licensee that was a contract liquor
store manager of a contract liquor store at the location of its spirits
retail licensed premises from which it makes such sales; and export
spirits. Until July 1, 2016, sales made to retailers licensed to sell
spirits for consumption on the premises must be made at the location of
the spirits retail licensed premises and may not be delivered to a
retailer licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises.
(2) For the purposes of this title, a spirits retail license is a
retail license, and a sale by a spirits retailer is a retail sale only
if not for resale. Nothing in this title authorizes sales by on-sale
licensees to other retail licensees. The board must establish by rule
an obligation of on-sale spirits retailers to:
(a) Maintain a schedule by stock-keeping unit of all their
purchases of spirits from spirits retail licensees, indicating the
identity of the seller and the quantities purchased; and
(b) Provide, not more frequently than quarterly, a report for each
scheduled item containing the identity of the purchasing on-premise
licensee and the quantities of that scheduled item purchased since any
preceding report to:
(i) A distributor authorized by the distiller to distribute a
scheduled item in the on-sale licensee's geographic area; or
(ii) A distiller acting as distributor of the scheduled item in the
area.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, the
board may issue spirits retail licenses only for premises comprising at
least ten thousand square feet of fully enclosed retail space within a
single structure, including storerooms and other interior auxiliary
areas but excluding covered or fenced exterior areas, whether or not
attached to the structure, and only to applicants that the board
determines will maintain systems for inventory management, employee
training, employee supervision, and physical security of the product
substantially as effective as those of stores currently operated by the
board with respect to preventing sales to or pilferage by underage or
inebriated persons.
(b) License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and
the regulations promulgated thereunder, including without limitation
rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public,
churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent
issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing grocery premises
licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now
licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing
applications for spirits retail licenses.
(c) The board may not deny a spirits retail license to an otherwise
qualified contract liquor store at its contract location or to the
holder of former state liquor store operating rights sold at auction
under RCW 66.24.620 on the grounds of location, nature, or size of the
premises to be licensed. The board may not deny a spirits retail
license to applicants that are not contract liquor stores or operating
rights holders on the grounds of the size of the premises to be
licensed, if such applicant is otherwise qualified and the board
determines that:
(i) There is no retail spirits license holder in the trade area
that the applicant proposes to serve;
(ii) The applicant meets, or upon licensure will meet, the
operational requirements established by the board by rule; and
(iii) The licensee has not committed more than one public safety
violation within the three years preceding application.
(d) A retailer authorized to sell spirits for consumption on or off
the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits at its licensed
premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the
board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor
items, and from which the retailer may deliver to its own licensed
premises and, pursuant to sales permitted under subsection (1) of this
section:
(i) To other retailer premises licensed to sell spirits for
consumption on the licensed premises;
(ii) To other registered facilities; or
(iii) To lawful purchasers outside the state. The facilities may
be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable
groups of retailers, including at least one retailer licensed to sell
spirits.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, each
spirits retail licensee must pay to the board, for deposit into the
liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee equivalent to seventeen
percent of all spirits sales revenues under the license, exclusive of
taxes collected by the licensee and of sales of items on which a
license fee payable under this section has otherwise been incurred.
The board must establish rules setting forth the timing of such
payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with
payments required quarterly in arrears. The first payment is due
October 1, 2012.
(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to craft distilleries.
(5) In addition to the payment required under subsection (4) of
this section, each licensee must pay an annual license renewal fee of
one hundred sixty-six dollars. The board must periodically review and
adjust the renewal fee as may be required to maintain it as comparable
to annual license renewal fees for licenses to sell beer and wine not
for consumption on the licensed premises. If required by law at the
time, any increase of the annual renewal fee becomes effective only
upon ratification by the legislature.
(6) As a condition to receiving and renewing a retail spirits
license the licensee must provide training as prescribed by the board
by rule for individuals who sell spirits or who manage others who sell
spirits regarding compliance with laws and regulations regarding sale
of spirits, including without limitation the prohibitions against sale
of spirits to individuals who are underage or visibly intoxicated. The
training must be provided before the individual first engages in the
sale of spirits and must be renewed at least every five years. The
licensee must maintain records documenting the nature and frequency of
the training provided. An employee training program is presumptively
sufficient if it incorporates a "responsible vendor program"
promulgated by the board.
(7) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020
through 314-29-040 relating to fines and suspensions are doubled for
violations relating to the sale of spirits by retail spirits licensees.
(8)(a) The board must promulgate regulations concerning the
adoption and administration of a compliance training program for
spirits retail licensees, to be known as a "responsible vendor
program," to reduce underage drinking, encourage licensees to adopt
specific best practices to prevent sales to minors, and provide
licensees with an incentive to give their employees ongoing training in
responsible alcohol sales and service.
(b) Licensees who join the responsible vendor program under this
section and maintain all of the program's requirements are not subject
to the doubling of penalties provided in this section for a single
violation in any period of twelve calendar months.
(c) The responsible vendor program must be free, voluntary, and
self-monitoring.
(d) To participate in the responsible vendor program, licensees
must submit an application form to the board. If the application
establishes that the licensee meets the qualifications to join the
program, the board must send the licensee a membership certificate.
(e) A licensee participating in the responsible vendor program must
at a minimum:
(i) Provide ongoing training to employees;
(ii) Accept only certain forms of identification for alcohol sales;
(iii) Adopt policies on alcohol sales and checking identification;
(iv) Post specific signs in the business; and
(v) Keep records verifying compliance with the program's
requirements.

--- END ---