BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the process
for obtaining alcoholic beverages related permits and licenses is
administratively complex and unnecessarily confusing to applicants,
licensees, members of the business community, and the public.
(2) By December 30, 2014, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
liquor control board must submit recommendations to appropriate
committees of the legislature that detail the statutory changes and
technology upgrades necessary to measurably streamline and simplify the
alcoholic beverage licensing process. The liquor control board must
convene a work group with representation from regulated parties to
provide input to and as the basis for the recommendations submitted.
(3) The recommendations may include, but are not limited to:
Applications for permits and licenses, renewals, appeals of agency
adverse actions, penalties, and categories of permits and licenses.

--- END ---