BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that work-related
musculoskeletal disorders occur with greater frequency and severity
than other forms of industrial injuries and occupational diseases. In
particular, the legislature finds that work-related musculoskeletal
disorders result in a substantial percentage of permanent impairment
and time loss claims.
The legislature recognizes the importance of ensuring fairness for
employers in Washington, and that more needs to be done to ensure fair
treatment of employers in the state. The legislature intends to
protect employers from incurring costs for musculoskeletal disorders
caused primarily by nonwork-related activities. The legislature finds
that responsibility to compensate an injured worker should be
apportioned to an employer only when the work-related activity is a
substantial contributing cause.
In electing the standard of "substantial contributing cause," the
legislature intends to balance the need to compensate injured workers
in Washington with the need to create a fair standard of apportionment
of responsibility for employers. The legislature intends to bring
Washington state into parity with other states that have achieved this
level of fairness through adoption of similar standards.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 37 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, each worker injured
in the course of his or her employment, or his or her family or
dependents in case of death of the worker, shall receive compensation
in accordance with this chapter, and, except as in this title otherwise
provided, such payment shall be in lieu of any and all rights of action
whatsoever against any person whomsoever((: PROVIDED, That)).
(2) No benefits are payable for a musculoskeletal injury or
occupational disease unless employment is a substantial contributing
cause of the injury or occupational disease. For purposes of this
subsection:
(a) "Musculoskeletal injury or occupational disease" means an
injury or disease of the muscles, nerves, tendons, joints, bones,
cartilage, or spinal discs.
(b) "Substantial contributing cause" means at least thirty-five
percent of the causation from all causes combined based on a
preponderance of medical evidence.
(3) If an injured worker((,)) or the surviving spouse of an injured
worker shall not have the legal custody of a child for, or on account
of, whom payments are required to be made under this title, such
payment or payments shall be made to the person or persons having the
legal custody of such child but only for the periods of time after the
department has been notified of the fact of such legal custody, and it
shall be the duty of any such person or persons receiving payments
because of legal custody of any child immediately to notify the
department of any change in such legal custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to dates of injury and
manifestation of occupational disease on or after the effective date of
this section.

--- END ---