BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.20.785 and 2006 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation ((may)) is authorized and
strongly encouraged to use the design-build procedure for public works
projects over ten million dollars ((where)) when:
(a) The construction activities are highly specialized and a
design-build approach is critical in developing the construction
methodology; or
(b) The projects selected provide opportunity for greater
innovation and efficiencies between the designer and the builder; or
(c) Significant savings in project delivery time would be realized.
(2) To test the applicability of the design-build procedure on
smaller projects and specialty projects, the department may conduct up
to five pilot projects on projects that cost between two and ten
million dollars. The department shall evaluate these pilot projects
with respect to cost, time to complete, efficiencies gained, if any,
and other pertinent information to facilitate analysis regarding the
further use of the design-build process on projects of this size. This
subsection expires upon the completion of the five pilot projects
authorized under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of transportation must
convene an expert review panel to examine the department's
implementation and use of design-build contracting under RCW 47.20.785.
(2) The expert review panel must provide a report detailing any
recommended changes or improvements that the department of
transportation should make to the design-build process in order to
maximize cost and schedule efficiencies and ensure that design risk is
borne by the appropriate party. The report is due to the
transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by
December 1, 2014.
(3) The expert review panel must be comprised of five members, two
of which are nationally recognized experts in the field of design-build
project delivery, a representative from the association of general
contractors, a representative from the American council of engineering
companies of Washington, and a representative from the department of
transportation. The two nationally recognized experts must be selected
cooperatively by the chairs and ranking members of the senate and house
transportation committees from of a list of five to seven proposed
candidates provided by the secretary of transportation and the
governor. The chair of the expert review panel must be designated by
the appointing authorities. The two experts serving on the panel must
be compensated at a rate commensurate with their experience, including
reimbursement for expenses according to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
The department of transportation must provide all staff support that
the expert review panel requires.

--- END ---