BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that cell phones
can be a benefit to an individual's convenience and efficiency but are
a dangerous distraction when driving a vehicle. The legislature
further recognizes that under the federal funding authorization, moving
ahead for progress in the 21st century act, funds have been set aside
to combat the emerging national problem of distracted driving, and that
distracted driving is one of the top three causes of fatal teen
collisions. The legislature further recognizes that for Washington
state to enhance public safety and qualify for these federal funds, the
existing cell phone laws must be amended to meet the new requirements.
As such, it is the intent of the legislature that our state's existing
cell phone laws are brought in line with federal grant criteria to
ensure that the maximum amount of federal funds are made available to
these important safety programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.668 and 2013 c 224 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section,))
A person operating a ((moving noncommercial)) motor vehicle (i) while
holding a personal wireless communications device in his or her hand or
hands or (ii) who((, by means of an electronic)) uses a personal
wireless communications device((, sends, reads, or writes a text
message)) to read or manually enter data including, but not limited to,
short message service, texting, e-mailing, instant messaging, or
engaging in any other form of electronic data retrieval or electronic
data communication, is guilty of a traffic infraction.
(b) ((Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, a
person driving a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.25.010,
including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic
control device, or other momentary delays, who, by means of an
electronic wireless communications device, sends, reads, or writes a
text message, is guilty of a traffic infraction. For purposes of this
subsection, "driving" does not include operating a commercial motor
vehicle with or without the motor running when the driver has moved the
vehicle to the side of, or off, a highway and has stopped in a location
where the vehicle can safely remain stationary.
(c) A person does not send, read, or write a text message when he
or she reads, selects, or enters a phone number or name in a wireless
communications device for the purpose of making a phone call)) The
holder of an intermediate license under RCW 46.20.075 or driver's
instruction permit under RCW 46.20.055 may not use a personal wireless
communications device in any manner while operating a motor vehicle.
(2)(((a))) Subsection (1)(((a))) of this section does not apply to
((a person operating)):
(((i) An authorized emergency vehicle;
(ii) A voice-operated global positioning or navigation system that
is affixed to the vehicle and that allows the user to send or receive
messages without diverting visual attention from the road or engaging
the use of either hand; or
(iii) A moving motor vehicle while using an electronic wireless
communications device to:
(A) Report illegal activity;
(B) Summon medical or other emergency help;
(C) Prevent injury to a person or property; or
(D) Relay information that is time sensitive between a transit or
for-hire operator and that operator's dispatcher, in which the device
is permanently affixed to the vehicle.
(b) Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to a person
operating a commercial motor vehicle when necessary to communicate with
law enforcement officials or other emergency services.
(3) Infractions under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall not
become part of the driver's record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.
Additionally, a finding that a person has committed a traffic
infraction under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall not be made
available to insurance companies or employers)) (a) A driver who uses
a personal wireless communications device to contact emergency
services; or
(b) Emergency services personnel who use a personal wireless
communications device while (i) operating an emergency services vehicle
and (ii) engaged in the performance of their duties as emergency
services personnel.
(3) For purposes of this section: (a) "Operating a motor vehicle"
includes the operation of a motor vehicle while it is moving and while
it is temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic light, or a
stop sign, and does not include when the vehicle has pulled over to the
side of, or off, the roadway and has stopped in a location where it can
safely remain stationary; and (b) "personal wireless communications
device" includes a device through which personal wireless services, as
defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 332(c)(7)(C)(i), are transmitted, and does
not include a global navigation satellite system receiver used for
positioning, emergency notification, or navigation purposes.
(4) A person found to have committed more than one violation of
this section within a five-year period must be assessed a monetary
penalty equal to twice the penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110. Fifty
percent of the moneys collected under this subsection must be deposited
into the highway safety fund under RCW 46.68.060.
(5) This section does not prohibit the use of a system that is
physically or electronically integrated into a motor vehicle and
provides the user with services such as emergency notification and
navigation.
(6) The state preempts the field of regulating the use of personal
wireless communications devices in motor vehicles, and this section
supersedes any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or regulations
enacted by any political subdivision or municipality to regulate the
use of personal wireless communications devices by the operator of a
motor vehicle.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.055 and 2012 c 80 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid an application fee of twenty-five dollars, and meets
the following requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the
department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice
driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280.
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) ((The person is not using a wireless communications device,
unless the person is using the device to report illegal activity,
summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person
or property; and
(c))) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least
five years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying for an additional instruction permit must
submit the application to the department in person and pay an
application fee of twenty-five dollars for each issuance.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.075 and 2011 c 60 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor
vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant
for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:
(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not
less than six months;
(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the
department;
(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with
the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;
(d) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or
employer to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at
least fifty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at night,
during which the driver was supervised by a person at least twenty-one
years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three
years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of
traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at
the time of the application for the intermediate license;
(e) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
violation within the last six months before the application for the
intermediate license; and
(f) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of
alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction
permit.
(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate
license or until the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever
occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle
that is carrying any passengers under the age of twenty who are not
members of the holder's immediate family as defined in RCW 42.17A.005.
For the remaining period of the intermediate license, the holder may
not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than three passengers
who are under the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's
immediate family.
(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor
vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the holder
is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who is at
least twenty-five years of age.
(4) ((The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a
moving motor vehicle while using a wireless communications device
unless the holder is using the device to report illegal activity,
summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person
or property.
(5))) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate
license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions
imposed under this section.
(((6) Except for a violation of subsection (4) of this section,))
(5) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(((7))) (6) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary
for agricultural purposes.
(((8))) (7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the
twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license,
he or she:
(a) Has not been involved in an accident involving only one motor
vehicle;
(b) Has not been involved in an accident where he or she was cited
in connection with the accident or was found to have caused the
accident;
(c) Has not been involved in an accident where no one was cited or
was found to have caused the accident; and
(d) Has not been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed
on an intermediate licensee under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.25.010 and 2013 c 224 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol,
including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and
isopropanol.
(2) "Alcohol concentration" means:
(a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of
blood; or
(b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath.
(3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means a license issued to
an individual under chapter 46.20 RCW that has been endorsed in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter to authorize the
individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.
(4) The "commercial driver's license information system" (CDLIS) is
the information system established pursuant to 49 U.S.C. Sec. 31309 to
serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the
licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.
(5) "Commercial learner's permit" (CLP) means a permit issued under
RCW 46.25.052 for the purposes of behind-the-wheel training.
(6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle or combination
of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport passengers or property
if the motor vehicle:
(a) Has a gross combination weight rating or gross combination
weight of 11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or more), whichever
is greater, inclusive of ((a [any])) any towed unit (([or units])) or
units with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of
more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds or more), whichever is
greater; or
(b) Has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of
11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or more), whichever is greater;
or
(c) Is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including
the driver; or
(d) Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous
materials as defined in this section; or
(e) Is a school bus regardless of weight or size.
(7) "Conviction" means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a
determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the
law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized
administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the person's appearance in court, a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or
court cost, entry into a deferred prosecution program under chapter
10.05 RCW, or violation of a condition of release without bail,
regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or
probated.
(8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition against driving a
commercial motor vehicle.
(9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of
a motor vehicle in any place open to the general public for purposes of
vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW 46.25.100, 46.25.110, and
46.25.120, "drive" includes operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle anywhere in the state.
(10) "Drugs" are those substances as defined by RCW 69.04.009,
including, but not limited to, those substances defined by 49 C.F.R.
Sec. 40.3.
(11) "Employer" means any person, including the United States, a
state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a
commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial
motor vehicle.
(12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR) means the value specified
by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single vehicle.
The GVWR of a combination or articulated vehicle, commonly referred to
as the "gross combined weight rating" or GCWR, is the GVWR of the power
unit plus the GVWR of the towed unit or units. If the GVWR of any unit
cannot be determined, the actual gross weight will be used. If a
vehicle with a GVWR of less than 11,794 kilograms (26,001 pounds or
less) has been structurally modified to carry a heavier load, then the
actual gross weight capacity of the modified vehicle, as determined by
RCW 46.44.041 and 46.44.042, will be used as the GVWR.
(13) "Hazardous materials" means any material that has been
designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and is required to be
placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. Part 172 or any quantity of a
material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. Part 73.
(14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or
any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this
state, but does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail.
(15) "Out-of-service order" means a declaration by an authorized
enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local
jurisdiction that a driver, a commercial motor vehicle, or a motor
carrier operation is out-of-service pursuant to 49 C.F.R. Secs. 386.72,
392.5, 395.13, 396.9, or compatible laws, or the North American uniform
out-of-service criteria.
(16) "Positive alcohol confirmation test" means an alcohol
confirmation test that:
(a) Has been conducted by a breath alcohol technician under 49
C.F.R. Part 40; and
(b) Indicates an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.
A report that a person has refused an alcohol test, under
circumstances that constitute the refusal of an alcohol test under 49
C.F.R. Part 40, will be considered equivalent to a report of a positive
alcohol confirmation test for the purposes of this chapter.
(17) "School bus" means a commercial motor vehicle used to
transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home
to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.
School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.
(18) "Serious traffic violation" means:
(a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per hour or more
in excess of the posted limit;
(b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;
(c) Driving while ((using)) holding a ((hand-held)) personal
wireless communications device (([hand-held mobile telephone])),
defined as a violation of RCW ((46.61.667(1)(b))) 46.61.668(1)(a)(i) or
an equivalent administrative rule or local law, ordinance, rule, or
resolution;
(d) Texting, defined as a violation of RCW 46.61.668(1)(a)(ii) or
an equivalent administrative rule or local law, ordinance, rule, or
resolution;
(e) A violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection
with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person;
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a
commercial driver's license;
(g) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial
driver's license in the driver's possession; however, any individual
who provides proof to the court by the date the individual must appear
in court or pay any fine for such a violation, that the individual held
a valid CDL on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of a
"serious traffic violation";
(h) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of
commercial driver's license endorsement or endorsements for the
specific vehicle group being operated or for the passenger or type of
cargo being transported; and
(i) Any other violation of a state or local law relating to motor
vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, that the
department determines by rule to be serious.
(19) "State" means a state of the United States and the District of
Columbia.
(20) "Substance abuse professional" means an alcohol and drug
specialist meeting the credentials, knowledge, training, and continuing
education requirements of 49 C.F.R. Sec. 40.281.
(21) "Tank vehicle" means any commercial motor vehicle that is
designed to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank or
tanks having an individual rated capacity of more than one hundred
nineteen gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of one thousand
gallons or more that is either permanently or temporarily attached to
the vehicle or the chassis. A commercial motor vehicle transporting an
empty storage container tank, not designed for transportation, with a
rated capacity of one thousand gallons or more that is temporarily
attached to a flatbed trailer is not considered a tank vehicle.
(22) "Type of driving" means one of the following:
(a) "Nonexcepted interstate," which means the CDL or CLP holder or
applicant operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, is
both subject to and meets the qualification requirements under 49
C.F.R. Part 391 as it existed on July 8, 2014, or such subsequent date
as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the
purposes of this section, and is required to obtain a medical
examiner's certificate under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45 as it existed on
July 8, 2014, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section;
(b) "Excepted interstate," which means the CDL or CLP holder or
applicant operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, but
engages exclusively in transportation or operations excepted under 49
C.F.R. Secs. 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.68, or 398.3, as they existed on July
8, 2014, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department
by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, from all or
parts of the qualification requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 391 as it
existed on July 8, 2014, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section,
and is therefore not required to obtain a medical examiner's
certificate under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45 as it existed on July 8, 2014,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section;
(c) "Nonexcepted intrastate," which means the CDL or CLP holder or
applicant operates only in intrastate commerce and is therefore subject
to state driver qualification requirements; or
(d) "Excepted intrastate," which means the CDL or CLP holder or
applicant operates in intrastate commerce, but engages exclusively in
transportation or operations excepted from all or parts of the state
driver qualification requirements.
(23) "United States" means the fifty states and the District of
Columbia.
(24) "Verified positive drug test" means a drug test result or
validity testing result from a laboratory certified under the authority
of the federal department of health and human services that:
(a) Indicates a drug concentration at or above the cutoff
concentration established under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 40.87; and
(b) Has undergone review and final determination by a medical
review officer.
A report that a person has refused a drug test, under circumstances
that constitute the refusal of a federal department of transportation
drug test under 49 C.F.R. Part 40, will be considered equivalent to a
report of a verified positive drug test for the purposes of this
chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.130 and 2006 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall prescribe the content of the driver
licensing examination and the manner of conducting the examination,
which shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) A test of the applicant's eyesight and ability to see,
understand, and follow highway signs regulating, warning, and directing
traffic;
(b) A test of the applicant's knowledge of traffic laws and ability
to understand and follow the directives of lawful authority, orally or
graphically, that regulate, warn, and direct traffic in accordance with
the traffic laws of this state. The director shall incorporate
questions on distracted driving in this portion of the examination;
(c) An actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to operate
a motor vehicle without jeopardizing the safety of persons or property.
If the applicant is deaf or hearing impaired, the applicant may be
accompanied by an interpreter to assist the applicant during the
demonstration. The interpreter will be of the applicant's choosing
from a list provided by the department of licensing; and
(d) Such further examination as the director deems necessary:
(i) To determine whether any facts exist that would bar the
issuance of a vehicle operator's license under chapters 46.20, 46.21,
and 46.29 RCW; and
(ii) To determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor
vehicle safely on the highways.
(2) If the applicant desires to drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle, he or she must qualify for a motorcycle endorsement under
RCW 46.20.500 through 46.20.515.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 46.61.667 (Using a wireless
communications device or hand-held mobile telephone while driving) and
2013 c 224 s 15, 2010 c 223 s 3, & 2007 c 417 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect August 1, 2014.

--- END ---