BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Consumers face a challenge finding reliable,
consumer friendly information on health care pricing and quality.
Greater transparency of health care prices and quality leads to
engaged, activated consumers. Research indicates that engaged and
educated consumers help control costs and improve quality with lower
costs per patient, lower hospital readmission rates, and the use of
higher quality providers. Washington is a leader in efforts to develop
and publish provider quality information.
Although data is available today, research indicates the existing
information is not user friendly, consumers do not know which measures
are most relevant, and quality ratings are inconsistent or
nonstandardized. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure
consumer tools are available to educate and engage patients in managing
their care and understanding the costs and quality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each carrier offering a health benefit plan offered or renewed
on or after January 1, 2016, must offer member transparency tools with
certain price and quality information to enable the member to make
treatment decisions based on cost, quality, and patient experience.
The transparency tools must aim for best practices and, at a minimum:
(a) Must display cost data for common treatments within the
following categories:
(i) In-patient treatments;
(ii) Outpatient treatments;
(iii) Diagnostic treatments; and
(iv) Office visits;
(b) Recognizing integrated health care delivery systems focus on
total cost of care, carrier's operating integrated care delivery
systems may meet the requirement of (a) of this subsection by providing
meaningful consumer data based on the total cost of care. This
subsection applies only to the portion of enrollment a carrier offers
pursuant to chapter 48.46 RCW and as part of an integrated delivery
system, and does not exempt from (a) of this subsection coverage
offered pursuant to chapter 48.21, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW if not part of
an integrated delivery system;
(c) Are encouraged to display the cost for prescription medications
on their member web site or through a link to a third party that
manages the prescription benefits;
(d) Must include a patient review option or method for members to
provide a rating or feedback on their experience with the medical
provider that allows other members to see the patient review, the
feedback must be monitored for appropriateness and validity, and the
site may include independently compiled quality of care ratings of
providers and facilities;
(e) Must allow members to access the estimated cost of the
treatment, or the total cost of care, as set forth in (a) and (b) of
this subsection on a portable electronic device while sitting in the
doctor's office;
(f) Must display options based on the selected search criteria for
members to compare;
(g) Must display the estimated cost of the treatment, or total cost
of the care episode, and the estimated out-of-pocket costs of the
treatment for the member and display the application of personalized
benefits such as deductibles and cost-sharing;
(h) Must display quality information on providers when available;
and
(i) Are encouraged to display alternatives that are more cost-effective when there are alternatives available, such as the use of an
ambulatory surgical center when one is available or medical versus
surgical alternatives as appropriate.
(2) In addition to the required features on cost and quality
information, the member transparency tools must include information to
allow a provider search of in-network providers with information
including specialists, distance from patient, the provider's contact
information, the provider's education, board certification and other
credentials, malpractice history and disciplinary actions, affiliated
hospitals and other providers in a clinic, and maps and driving
directions.
(3) Each carrier offering a health benefit plan offered or renewed
on or after January 1, 2016, must, within thirty days from the offer or
renewal date, attest to the office of the insurance commissioner that
the member transparency tools meet the requirements in this section and
access to the tools is available on the home page within the health
plan's secured member web site.
(4) The commissioner may not expand the requirements of this act by
rule.

--- END ---