BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that an estimated
fifteen million Americans may now have food allergies. According to
the United States centers for disease control and prevention, food
allergies among children increased fifty percent between 1997 to 2011,
affecting approximately one in every thirteen children. The
legislature also finds that food allergens cause thirty percent of
fatal cases of anaphylaxis annually and are responsible for three
hundred thousand emergency room visits by children under eighteen. The
legislature further finds that twenty-four percent of anaphylactic
reactions occurred in children with no prior history of life-threatening allergies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "epinephrine autoinjector" means an
epinephrine autoinjector of any brand prescribed by a health care
provider licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW for the treatment of
anaphylaxis.
(2) A person who uses an epinephrine autoinjector at the scene of
an emergency and all other persons and entities providing services
under this section are immune from civil liability for any personal
injury that results from any act or omission in the use of the
epinephrine autoinjector in an emergency setting.
(3) The immunity from civil liability does not apply if the acts or
omissions amount to gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(4) The epinephrine autoinjector user shall call 911 or its local
equivalent as soon as possible after the emergency use of the
epinephrine autoinjector and shall assure that appropriate follow-up
data is made available as requested by emergency medical service or
other health care providers.

--- END ---