BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The federal patient protection and
affordable care act, section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, provides
states the option to establish a federal basic health program for
individuals with incomes between one hundred thirty-three percent and
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level who would otherwise be
eligible for coverage through the health benefit exchange. States
electing to operate a basic health program may receive federal funding
equal to ninety-five percent of the amount of the premium tax credits
and cost-sharing reductions that would have been available had the
eligible individual obtained coverage through the exchange.
(2) The United States department of health and human services has
proposed regulations for the development of the basic health program,
including the development of a basic health blueprint for certification
by the centers for medicare and medicaid services that will grant
states operational authority for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority must develop a blueprint for the
establishment of a federal basic health program, consistent with
requirements established in 42 C.F.R. Part 144. In preparation for the
blueprint, the authority must begin the necessary econometric modeling
to analyze the program enrollment, and the costs and impacts to the
state, the enrollees, and the insurance marketplace. The blueprint
must be submitted to the governor for signature and submission to the
centers for medicare and medicaid services for review and
certification.
(2) The blueprint is the policy framework for the program and must
identify the standards and requirements in 42 C.F.R. Part 144. At a
minimum, the blueprint must address the following:
(a) The program eligibility as established in federal law;
(b) The essential health benefits under the federal basic health
plan;
(c) Assurance that enrollee premiums and cost sharing will not
exceed the amounts basic health plan enrollees would have paid in the
exchange;
(d) Core administrative procedures such as eligibility
determinations using the single streamlined applications, enrollment,
disenrollment and nonpayment of premiums, eligibility appeals, consumer
assistance, data collection and reporting, and extending essential
protections to American Indians and Alaska Natives;
(e) Fiscal policies and accountability procedures;
(f) A competitive process to contract with standard health plans;
(g) Basic health plan trust fund trustees;
(h) The operational agency responsible for program administration,
operations, and financial oversight;
(i) A funding plan that identifies the funding sources, if any
beyond the basic health plan trust fund, and that identifies the
enrollment and cost projections for the first twelve months of
operation and the funding sources; and
(j) Other requirements articulated in a final regulation.
(3) The blueprint must be developed with stakeholder engagement,
including tribal consultation and public comment.
(4) In tandem with the program design, the authority, in
consultation with the health benefit exchange and other impacted
programs, must identify the system design requirements to implement and
operate a federal basic health program, and develop an initial system
project timeline and funding estimate. The initial timeline and
funding estimate must be shared with the fiscal committees of the
legislature. Subject to appropriation, the system design work may
begin with preliminary certification from the centers for medicare and
medicaid services.
(5) Upon certification by the federal centers for medicare and
medicaid services, the blueprint for the federal basic health program
is the operational authority for the program, documenting all program
requirements and obligations. The authority is authorized to operate
the program in accordance with the federal law and regulations captured
in 42 C.F.R. Part 144.

--- END ---