BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The federal affordable care act created
numerous changes to health insurance products. Some small groups that
purchased health insurance in 2013 have been adversely impacted by the
increase in the premiums for the new insurance plans that meet all the
requirements of the federal affordable care act. It is the intent of
the legislature to provide some assistance to those self-employed small
business owners, often known as groups of one, that have been adversely
impacted by the premium increases with a transitional business and
occupations tax credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax under this section, a credit is allowed
for a qualifying purchase of small group health insurance by a self-employed business owner.
(2) The credit may only be taken for qualifying purchases of small
group health insurance made between January 1, 2014, and December 31,
2014.
(3) Prior to claiming the credit the department must approve of the
qualifying purchase of health insurance, and the department may
coordinate with the office of the insurance commissioner for
verification of the premium rates and available products, and may write
rules to administer this program.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Qualifying purchase of small group health insurance" means a
new insurance plan that was purchased by a self-employed business owner
as a result of the federal affordable care act that was twenty-five
percent over the previous health insurance premiums paid by the
business owner and that no other health insurance policies were
available with a less than twenty-five percent increase. The
qualifying purchase credit amount is the amount of the difference
between the previous health insurance premium payments and the new
health insurance premium payments.
(b) "Self-employed business owner" means a self-employed individual
or sole proprietor as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---