BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.310.030 and 2013 c 51 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2014, it is unlawful to manufacture,
wholesale, or distribute for sale an asbestos-containing building
material that is not labeled as required by RCW 70.310.040 or as
required under federal law, 40 C.F.R. part 763, subpart I, Sec. 173.171
(1994). The labeling requirement also applies to stock-on-hand,
meaning any asbestos-containing building material in their possession
or control after December 31, 2013, must be labeled. Retailers that do
not manufacture((, wholesale,)) or distribute asbestos-containing
building materials are exempt from ((this chapter)) the requirements
under this section.
(2)(a) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to asbestos-containing building materials that have already been installed,
applied, or used by the consumer.
(b) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to asbestos-containing building materials used solely for United States military
purposes.
(3) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor may submit a
written request for an exemption from the labeling requirements of this
chapter, and the department may grant such an exemption if it
determines that the labeling requirements are technically infeasible or
create an undue economic hardship. Each exemption is in effect for a
period not to exceed three years from the date issued and is subject to
the terms and conditions prescribed by the department.

--- END ---