BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) By December 1, 2014, the reports in this
section shall be submitted to the legislative education committees.
(2) The joint audit and review committee shall review all annual
compliance reports required of school districts and make
recommendations to the legislative education committees regarding
reports that should be:
(a) Discontinued;
(b) Integrated into the comprehensive education data and research
system, which is the longitudinal data system in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction; or
(c) Maintained in their current form.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the legislative education committees on the actions taken in
accordance with the federal waiver of the elementary and secondary
education act, which requires a reduction in duplication and
unnecessary administrative and reporting requirements on school
districts by the state, and which of the requirements were:
(a) Discontinued;
(b) Integrated into the comprehensive education data and research
system, which is the longitudinal data system in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction; or
(c) Maintained in their current form.
(4) This section expires August 1, 2015.

--- END ---