BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.070 and 2012 c 117 s 83 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event the commission elects to conduct an election to
ascertain the exclusive bargaining representative, and upon the request
of a prospective bargaining representative showing written proof of at
least thirty percent representation of the public employees within the
unit, the commission shall hold an election by secret ballot to
determine the issue. The ballot shall contain the name of such
bargaining representative and of any other bargaining representative
showing written proof of at least ten percent representation of the
public employees within the unit, together with a choice for any public
employee to designate that he or she does not desire to be represented
by any bargaining agent. Where more than one organization is on the
ballot and neither of the three or more choices receives a majority
vote of the public employees within the bargaining unit, a run-off
election shall be held. The run-off ballot shall contain the two
choices which received the largest and second-largest number of votes.
No question concerning representation may be raised within one year of
a certification or attempted certification. Where there is a valid
collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question of
representation may be raised except during the period not more than
((ninety)) one hundred fifty days nor less than sixty days prior to the
expiration date of the agreement. Any agreement which contains a
provision for automatic renewal or extension of the agreement shall not
be a valid agreement; nor shall any agreement be valid if it provides
for a term of existence for more than three years, except that any
agreement entered into between school districts, cities, counties, or
municipal corporations, and their respective employees, may provide for
a term of existence of up to six years.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.59.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any employee organization may file a request with the
commission for recognition as the exclusive representative. Such
request shall allege that a majority of the employees in an appropriate
collective bargaining unit wish to be represented for the purpose of
collective bargaining by such organization, shall describe the grouping
of jobs or positions which constitute the unit claimed to be
appropriate, shall be supported by credible evidence demonstrating that
at least thirty percent of the employees in the appropriate unit desire
the organization requesting recognition as their exclusive
representative, and shall indicate the name, address, and telephone
number of any other interested employee organization, if known to the
requesting organization.
(2) The commission shall determine the exclusive representative by
conducting an election by secret ballot, except under the following
circumstances:
(a) In instances where a serious unfair labor practice has been
committed which interfered with the election process and precluded the
holding of a fair election, the commission shall determine the
exclusive bargaining representative by an examination of organization
membership rolls or a comparison of signatures on organization
bargaining authorization cards.
(b) In instances where there is then in effect a lawful written
collective bargaining agreement between the employer and another
employee organization covering any employees included in the unit
described in the request for recognition, the request for recognition
shall not be entertained unless it shall be filed within the time
limits prescribed in subsection (3) of this section for decertification
or a new recognition election.
(c) In instances where within the previous twelve months another
employee organization has been lawfully recognized or certified as the
exclusive bargaining representative of any employees included in the
unit described in the request for recognition, the request for
recognition shall not be entertained.
(d) In instances where the commission has within the previous
twelve months conducted a secret ballot election involving any
employees included in the unit described in the request for recognition
in which a majority of the valid ballots cast chose not to be
represented by any employee organization, the request for recognition
shall not be entertained.
(3) Whenever the commission conducts an election to ascertain the
exclusive bargaining representative, the ballot shall contain the name
of the proposed bargaining representative and of any other bargaining
representative showing written proof of at least ten percent
representation of the educational employees within the unit, together
with a choice for any educational employee to designate that he or she
does not desire to be represented by any bargaining agent. Where more
than one organization is on the ballot and neither of the three or more
choices receives a majority of the valid ballots cast by the
educational employees within the bargaining unit, a run-off election
shall be held. The run-off ballot shall contain the two choices which
receive the largest and second largest number of votes. No question
concerning representation may be raised within one year of a
certification or attempted certification. Where there is a valid
collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question of
representation may be raised except during the period not more than
((ninety)) one hundred fifty days nor less than sixty days prior to the
expiration date of the agreement. In the event that a valid collective
bargaining agreement, together with any renewals or extensions thereof,
has been or will be in existence for three years, then the question of
representation may be raised not more than ((ninety)) one hundred fifty
days nor less than sixty days prior to the third anniversary date of
the agreement or any renewals or extensions thereof as long as such
renewals and extensions do not exceed three years; and if the exclusive
bargaining representative is removed as a result of such procedure, the
then existing collective bargaining agreement shall be terminable by
the new exclusive bargaining representative so selected within sixty
days after its certification or terminated on its expiration date,
whichever is sooner, or if no exclusive bargaining representative is so
selected, then the agreement shall be deemed to be terminated at its
expiration date or as of such third anniversary date, whichever is
sooner.
(4) Within the time limits prescribed in subsection (3) of this
section, a petition may be filed signed by at least thirty percent of
the employees of a collective bargaining unit, then represented by an
exclusive bargaining representative, alleging that a majority of the
employees in that unit do not wish to be represented by an employee
organization, requesting that the exclusive bargaining representative
be decertified, and indicating the name, address and telephone number
of the exclusive bargaining representative and any other interested
employee organization, if known. Upon the verification of the
signatures on the petition, the commission shall conduct an election by
secret ballot as prescribed by subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.76.020 and 2002 c 356 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall certify exclusive bargaining representatives
in accordance with the procedures specified in this section.
(1) No question concerning representation may be raised within one
year following issuance of a certification under this section.
(2) If there is a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect,
no question concerning representation may be raised except during the
period not more than ((ninety)) one hundred fifty days nor less than
sixty days prior to the expiration date of the agreement: PROVIDED,
That in the event a valid collective bargaining agreement, together
with any renewals or extensions thereof, has been or will be in
existence for more than three years, then a question concerning
representation may be raised not more than ((ninety)) one hundred fifty
days nor less than sixty days prior to the third anniversary date or
any subsequent anniversary date of the agreement; and if the exclusive
bargaining representative is removed as the result of such procedure,
the collective bargaining agreement shall be deemed to be terminated as
of the date of the certification or the anniversary date following the
filing of the petition, whichever is later.
(3) An employee organization seeking certification as exclusive
bargaining representative of a bargaining unit, or faculty members
seeking decertification of their exclusive bargaining representative,
must make a confidential showing to the commission of credible evidence
demonstrating that at least thirty percent of the faculty in the
bargaining unit are in support of the petition. The petition must
indicate the name, address, and telephone number of any employee
organization known to claim an interest in the bargaining unit.
(4) A petition filed by an employer must be supported by credible
evidence demonstrating the good faith basis on which the employer
claims the existence of a question concerning the representation of its
faculty.
(5) Any employee organization which makes a confidential showing to
the commission of credible evidence demonstrating that it has the
support of at least ten percent of the faculty in the bargaining unit
involved is entitled to intervene in proceedings under this section and
to have its name listed as a choice on the ballot in an election
conducted by the commission.
(6) The commission shall determine any question concerning
representation by conducting a secret ballot election among the faculty
members in the bargaining unit, except under the following
circumstances:
(a) If only one employee organization is seeking certification as
exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit for which
there is no incumbent exclusive bargaining representative, the
commission may, upon the concurrence of the employer and the employee
organization, determine the question concerning representation by
conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's
membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the
employment records of the employer; or
(b) If the commission determines that a serious unfair labor
practice has been committed which interfered with the election process
and precludes the holding of a fair election, the commission may
determine the question concerning representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(7) The representation election ballot must contain a choice for
each employee organization qualifying under subsection (3) or (5) of
this section, together with a choice for no representation. The
representation election shall be determined by the majority of the
valid ballots cast. If there are three or more choices on the ballot
and none of the three or more choices receives a majority of the valid
ballots cast, a runoff election shall be conducted between the two
choices receiving the highest and second highest numbers of votes.
(8) The commission shall certify as the exclusive bargaining
representative the employee organization that has been determined to
represent a majority of faculty members in a bargaining unit.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.80.080 and 2002 c 354 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall determine all questions pertaining to
representation and shall administer all elections and be responsible
for the processing and adjudication of all disputes that arise as a
consequence of elections. The commission shall adopt rules that
provide for at least the following:
(a) Secret balloting;
(b) Consulting with employee organizations;
(c) Access to lists of employees, job classification, work
locations, and home mailing addresses;
(d) Absentee voting;
(e) Procedures for the greatest possible participation in voting;
(f) Campaigning on the employer's property during working hours;
and
(g) Election observers.
(2)(a) If an employee organization has been certified as the
exclusive bargaining representative of the employees of a bargaining
unit, the employee organization may act for and negotiate master
collective bargaining agreements that will include within the coverage
of the agreement all employees in the bargaining unit as provided in
RCW 41.80.010(2)(a). However, if a master collective bargaining
agreement is in effect for the exclusive bargaining representative, it
shall apply to the bargaining unit for which the certification has been
issued. Nothing in this section requires the parties to engage in new
negotiations during the term of that agreement.
(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to exclusive bargaining
representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher
education.
(3) The certified exclusive bargaining representative shall be
responsible for representing the interests of all the employees in the
bargaining unit. This section shall not be construed to limit an
exclusive representative's right to exercise its discretion to refuse
to process grievances of employees that are unmeritorious.
(4) No question concerning representation may be raised if:
(a) Fewer than twelve months have elapsed since the last
certification or election; or
(b) A valid collective bargaining agreement exists covering the
unit, except for that period of no more than one hundred ((twenty))
fifty calendar days nor less than ((ninety)) sixty calendar days before
the expiration of the contract.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.39.040 and 2010 c 6 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
If the commission elects to conduct an election to ascertain the
exclusive bargaining representative, and upon the request of a
prospective bargaining representative showing written proof of at least
thirty percent representation of the symphony musicians within the
unit, the commission shall hold an election by secret ballot to
determine the issue. The ballot shall contain the name of the
bargaining representative and of any other bargaining representative
showing written proof of at least ten percent representation of the
symphony musicians within the unit, together with a choice for any
symphony musician to designate that he or she does not desire to be
represented by any bargaining agent. Where more than one organization
is on the ballot and neither of the three or more choices receives a
majority vote of valid ballots cast, a run-off election shall be held.
The run-off ballot shall contain the two choices which received the
largest and second-largest number of votes. No question concerning
representation may be raised within one year of a certification or
attempted certification. Where there is a valid collective bargaining
agreement in effect, no question of representation may be raised except
during the period not more than ((ninety)) one hundred fifty nor less
than sixty days prior to the expiration date of the agreement. Any
agreement which contains a provision for automatic renewal or extension
of the agreement shall not be a valid agreement; nor shall any
agreement be valid if it provides for a term of existence for more than
three years.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.64.135 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 27 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall determine all questions pertaining to
representation and shall administer all elections and be responsible
for the processing and adjudication of all disputes that arise as a
consequence of elections. The commission shall adopt rules that
provide for at least the following:
(a) Secret balloting;
(b) Consulting with employee organizations;
(c) Access to lists of employees, job classification, work
locations, and home mailing addresses;
(d) Absentee voting;
(e) Procedures for the greatest possible participation in voting;
(f) Campaigning on the employer's property during working hours;
and
(g) Election observers.
(2) If an employee organization has been certified as the exclusive
bargaining representative of the employees of a bargaining unit, the
employee organization may act for and negotiate master collective
bargaining agreements that will include within the coverage of the
agreement all employees in the bargaining unit.
(3) The certified exclusive bargaining representative is
responsible for representing the interests of all the employees in the
bargaining unit. This section shall not be construed to limit an
exclusive representative's right to exercise its discretion to refuse
to process grievances of employees that are unmeritorious.
(4) No question concerning representation may be raised if:
(a) Fewer than twelve months have elapsed since the last
certification or election; or
(b) A valid collective bargaining agreement exists covering the
unit, except for that period of no more than one hundred ((twenty))
eighty calendar days and no less than ninety calendar days before the
expiration of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Academic employees may petition the commission for an election to
change or reject their exclusive bargaining representative, subject to
the following conditions:
(1) Petitioners must show written proof of at least thirty percent
representation of the academic employees within the bargaining unit;
and
(2) A question concerning representation may not be raised if:
(a) Fewer than twelve months have elapsed since the last
certification or election; or
(b) A valid collective bargaining agreement exists covering the
unit, except for that period of no more than one hundred fifty calendar
days and no less than sixty calendar days before the expiration of the
contract.

--- END ---