BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The employer shall submit a digital copy of their collective
bargaining agreement to the commission within thirty days of the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW
to read as follows:
The employer shall submit a digital copy of their collective
bargaining agreement to the commission within thirty days of the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.76 RCW
to read as follows:
The employer shall submit a digital copy of their collective
bargaining agreement to the commission within thirty days of the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
The employer shall submit a digital copy of their collective
bargaining agreement to the commission within thirty days of the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.39 RCW
to read as follows:
The employer shall submit a digital copy of their collective
bargaining agreement to the commission within thirty days of the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Employers of academic employees under this chapter shall submit a
digital copy of their collective bargaining agreement to the commission
within thirty days of the effective date of the collective bargaining
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
The employer shall submit a digital copy of their collective
bargaining agreement to the commission within thirty days of the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 49.66 RCW
to read as follows:
The employer shall submit a digital copy of their collective
bargaining agreement to the department within thirty days of the
effective date of the collective bargaining agreement. The department
shall maintain a web site that allows the public to view and download
the collective bargaining agreements submitted by employers pursuant to
this section. The collective bargaining agreements shall be available
in a uniform digital format. Expired collective bargaining agreements
shall be available on the web site for up to ten years following
expiration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 41.58 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall maintain a web site that allows the public to
view and download the collective bargaining agreements submitted by
employers pursuant to sections 1 through 8 of this act. The collective
bargaining agreements shall be available in a uniform digital format.
Expired collective bargaining agreements shall be available on the web
site for up to ten years following expiration.

--- END ---