BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.140 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A holder of a valid certification, license, or registration may
place his or her certification, license, or registration on inactive
status. The holder of an inactive certification, license, or
registration may not act as a state-certified real estate appraiser,
state-licensed real estate appraiser, or state-registered appraiser
trainee in this state without first activating the certification,
license, or registration. The director shall establish rules governing
inactive certifications, licenses, or registrations, and their
maintenance and reactivation.
(2) The director shall establish an inactive renewal fee. Failure
to renew an inactive certification, license, or registration results in
cancellation of the certification, license, or registration.
(3) An inactive certification, license, or registration may be
placed on an active status upon compliance with the rules established
by the director.
(4) No holder of an inactive certification, license, or
registration may maintain his or her certification, license, or
registration on inactive status for a period exceeding two years.
(5) The provisions relating to the denial, suspension, and
revocation of active certifications, licenses, and registrations and
the discipline of its holder apply to inactive certifications,
licenses, and registrations and their holders.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.140.160 and 2007 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action for the following
conduct, acts, or conditions:
(1) Failing to meet the minimum qualifications for state
certification, licensure, or registration established by or pursuant to
this chapter;
(2) Paying money other than the fees provided for by this chapter
to any employee of the director or the commission to procure state
certification, licensure, or registration under this chapter;
(3) Continuing to act as a state-certified real estate appraiser,
state-licensed real estate appraiser, or state-registered appraiser
trainee when his or her certificate, license, or registration is on an
expired or inactive status;
(4) Violating any provision of this chapter or any lawful rule made
by the director pursuant thereto;
(5) Issuing an appraisal report on any real property in which the
appraiser has an interest unless his or her interest is clearly stated
in the appraisal report;
(6) Being affiliated as an employer, independent contractor, or
supervisory appraiser of a state-certified real estate appraiser,
state-licensed real estate appraiser, or state-registered appraiser
trainee whose certification, license, or registration is currently in
a suspended or revoked status;
(7) Failure or refusal without good cause to exercise reasonable
diligence in performing an appraisal practice under this chapter,
including preparing an oral or written report to communicate
information concerning an appraisal practice; and
(8) Negligence or incompetence in performing an appraisal practice
under this chapter, including preparing an oral or written report to
communicate information concerning an appraisal practice.

--- END ---