BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that housing sex
offenders reentering the community from prison presents unique
challenges. It is understandable that residents do not want sex
offenders living near their homes and neighborhoods. Notwithstanding,
the state is faced with a population of offenders who will eventually
be released out into the community. Research shows that the proximity
of an offender's residence to vulnerable populations has little
correlation to recidivism. Further, community safety can be enhanced
when offenders have a stable residence close to supportive resources.
That safety can be frustrated by laws and policies that effectively
eliminate any viable residence within city limits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sex offender policy board is
directed to review policies relating to the release and housing of sex
offenders in the community, including, but not limited to:
(a) The process of identifying and approving housing providers for
participation in the housing voucher program with the department of
corrections;
(b) Guidelines and restrictions on the placement or residence of
sex offenders depending on the offender's crime of conviction or risk
level; and
(c) The impact of city and county ordinances.
(2) The board shall make recommendations that balance the need to
find housing for offenders, improved public safety, and the general
public's need to feel safe in their communities.
(3) The board shall invite representatives from the Washington
state association of counties and the association of Washington cities
to participate and must provide an opportunity to receive public
comment.
(4) The board shall submit its report and recommendations to the
governor and the relevant committees of the legislature no later than
December 1, 2014.

--- END ---