BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.530 and 2009 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful:
(a) For any person to operate a motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven
cycle not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides which shall
be so located as to give the driver a complete view of the highway for
a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the motorcycle,
moped, or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be
required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years
old originally manufactured without mirrors and which has been restored
to its original condition and which is being ridden to or from or
otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle contest,
show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is
required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;
(b) For any person to operate a motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven
cycle which does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles,
or a face shield of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state
patrol;
(c) For any person to operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state highway, county road, or city street
unless wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle helmet except when the
vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or when the vehicle is
equipped with all of the following:
(i) Steering wheel;
(ii) Seat belts that conform to standards prescribed under 49
C.F.R. Part 571; and
(iii) Partially or completely enclosed seating area for the driver
and passenger that is certified by the manufacturer as meeting the
standards prescribed under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.216.
The motorcycle helmet neck or chin strap must be fastened securely
while the motorcycle, moped, or motor-driven cycle is in motion.
Persons operating electric-assisted bicycles and motorized foot
scooters shall comply with all laws and regulations related to the use
of bicycle helmets;
(d) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle;
(e) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet
that does not meet the requirements established by this section.
(2) The state patrol may adopt and amend rules concerning standards
for glasses, goggles, and face shields.
(3) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet" means a
protective covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell,
padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin
strap type retention system, with the manufacturer's certification
((applied in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.218 indicating that the
motorcycle helmet meets standards established by the United States
department of transportation)).

--- END ---