BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88C.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 28 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council shall develop and maintain a
computerized adult and juvenile sentencing information system
consisting of offender, offense, history, and sentence information
entered from the judgment and sentence forms for all adult felons.
(2) As part of its duties in maintaining the sentencing information
system, the caseload forecast council shall:
(a) On an annual basis, publish a statistical summary of adult
felony sentencing and juvenile dispositions;
(b) On an annual basis, publish a summary of racial
disproportionality in adult felony sentencing and juvenile
dispositions;
(c) Publish and maintain an adult felony sentencing manual; and
(((c))) (d) Publish and maintain a juvenile sentencing manual.
(3) The sentencing manuals are intended only as a guide to assist
practitioners in determining appropriate sentencing ranges. The
manuals are not a substitute for the actual statutes, which list the
sentencing ranges, or for any other information contained within this
chapter. The caseload forecast council is not liable for errors or
omissions in the manual, for sentences that may be inappropriately
calculated as a result of a practitioner's or court's reliance on the
manual, or for any other written or verbal information provided by the
caseload forecast council or its staff related to adult or juvenile
sentencing.
(4) In publishing materials required by this section, the caseload
forecast council shall make the materials available on its web site.
The caseload forecast council may charge a reasonable cost for
producing and distributing hard copies of any materials.

--- END ---