BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in sections 2
and 3 of this act. This performance statement is only intended to be
used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not
intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to
determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to provide tax relief for certain businesses or individuals, as
indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
support the forest products industry due in part to the industry's
efforts to support the local economy by focusing on Washington state
based resources thereby reducing global environmental impacts through
the manufacturing and use of wood. It is the legislature's intent to
provide the forest products industry permanent tax relief by lowering
the public utility tax rate attributable to log transportation
businesses. Because this reduced public utility rate is intended to be
permanent, the reduced rate established in this act is not subject to
the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.010 and 2009 c 535 s 1110 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(2) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(3) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(4) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(5) "Log transportation business" means the business of
transporting logs by truck, other than exclusively upon private roads.
(6) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle
by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and
includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled
vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation
business), common carrier, or contract carrier as defined by RCW
81.68.010 and 81.80.010. However, "motor transportation business" does
not mean or include: (a) A log transportation business; or (b) the
transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon
private roads or private highways.
(((6))) (7)(a) "Public service business" means any of the
businesses defined in subsections (1), (2), (4), (((5), (7),)) (6),
(8), (9), (((11), and)) (10), (12), and (13) of this section or any
business subject to control by the state, or having the powers of
eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or any business
hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public service nature,
except telephone business and low-level radioactive waste site
operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It includes, among
others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane transportation,
boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging road, water
transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (((6))) (7)(b) apply
throughout this subsection (((6))) (7).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(((7))) (8) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(((8))) (9) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating
stock cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry
cars, tank cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars,
or any other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or
persons upon the line of any railroad operated in this state when such
railroad is not owned or leased by the person engaging in such
business.
(((9))) (10) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(((10))) (11) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating
tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or
pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(((11))) (12) "Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between
cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles
apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof.
Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business
of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or
destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such
collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or
interstate line-haul of such property.
(((12))) (13) "Water distribution business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or
sale.
(((13))) (14) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent. The reduced rate established in this subsection
(1)(h) is not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW
82.32.805(1)(a).
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses ((shall)) must be deposited in the education
legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 from July 1, 2013,
through June 30, 2019, and thereafter in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---