BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.02.290 and 2013 c 200 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to RCW 70.02.050 and 70.02.200 through 70.02.240
that are not health care facilities or providers shall adopt rules
establishing their record acquisition, retention, destruction, and
security policies that are consistent with this chapter.
(2) State and local agencies that are not health care facilities or
providers that have not requested health care information and are not
authorized to receive this information under this chapter:
(a) Must not use or disclose this information unless permitted
under this chapter; and
(b) Must destroy the information in accordance with the policy
developed under subsection (1) of this section or return the
information to the entity that provided the information to the state or
local agency if the entity is a health care facility or provider and
subject to this chapter.
(3) A person who has health care information disclosed in violation
of subsection (2)(a) of this section, must be informed of the
disclosure by the state or local agency improperly making the
disclosure. State and local agencies that are not health care
facilities or providers must develop a policy to establish a reasonable
notification period and what information must be included in the
notice, including whether the name of the entity that originally
provided the information to the agency must be included.
(4) Rules or policies adopted under this section must be available
through each agency's web site.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.052 and 2012 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To promote the public interest consistent with the purposes of
chapter 492, Laws of 1993 as amended by chapter 267, Laws of 1995, the
department shall continue to require hospitals to submit hospital
financial and patient discharge information, which shall be collected,
maintained, analyzed, and disseminated by the department. The
department shall, if deemed cost-effective and efficient, contract with
a private entity for any or all parts of data collection. Data
elements shall be reported in conformance with a uniform reporting
system established by the department. This includes data elements
identifying each hospital's revenues, expenses, contractual allowances,
charity care, bad debt, other income, total units of inpatient and
outpatient services, and other financial and employee compensation
information reasonably necessary to fulfill the purposes of this
section. Data elements relating to use of hospital services by
patients shall be the same as those currently compiled by hospitals
through inpatient discharge abstracts. The department shall encourage
and permit reporting by electronic transmission or hard copy as is
practical and economical to reporters.
(2) In identifying financial reporting requirements, the department
may require both annual reports and condensed quarterly reports from
hospitals, so as to achieve both accuracy and timeliness in reporting,
but shall craft such requirements with due regard of the data reporting
burdens of hospitals.
(3)(a) Beginning with compensation information for 2012, unless a
hospital is operated on a for-profit basis, the department shall
require a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW to annually submit
employee compensation information. To satisfy employee compensation
reporting requirements to the department, a hospital shall submit
information as directed in (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection. A
hospital may determine whether to report under (a)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection for purposes of reporting.
(i) Within one hundred thirty-five days following the end of each
hospital's fiscal year, a nonprofit hospital shall file the appropriate
schedule of the federal internal revenue service form 990 that
identifies the employee compensation information with the department.
If the lead administrator responsible for the hospital or the lead
administrator's compensation is not identified on the schedule of form
990 that identifies the employee compensation information, the hospital
shall also submit the compensation information for the lead
administrator as directed by the department's form required in (b) of
this subsection.
(ii) Within one hundred thirty-five days following the end of each
hospital's calendar year, a hospital shall submit the names and
compensation of the five highest compensated employees of the hospital
who do not have any direct patient responsibilities. Compensation
information shall be reported on a calendar year basis for the calendar
year immediately preceding the reporting date. If those five highest
compensated employees do not include the lead administrator for the
hospital, compensation information for the lead administrator shall
also be submitted. Compensation information shall include base
compensation, bonus and incentive compensation, other payments that
qualify as reportable compensation, retirement and other deferred
compensation, and nontaxable benefits.
(b) To satisfy the reporting requirements of this subsection (3),
the department shall create a form and make it available no later than
August 1, 2012. To the greatest extent possible, the form shall follow
the format and reporting requirements of the portion of the internal
revenue service form 990 schedule relating to compensation information.
If the internal revenue service substantially revises its schedule, the
department shall update its form.
(4) The health care data collected, maintained, and studied by the
department shall only be available for retrieval in original or
processed form to public and private requestors pursuant to subsection
(7) of this section and shall be available within a reasonable period
of time after the date of request. The cost of retrieving data for
state officials and agencies shall be funded through the state general
appropriation. The cost of retrieving data for individuals and
organizations engaged in research or private use of data or studies
shall be funded by a fee schedule developed by the department that
reflects the direct cost of retrieving the data or study in the
requested form.
(5) The department shall, in consultation and collaboration with
the federally recognized tribes, urban or other Indian health service
organizations, and the federal area Indian health service, design,
develop, and maintain an American Indian-specific health data,
statistics information system. ((The department rules regarding
confidentiality shall apply to safeguard the information from
inappropriate use or release.))
(6) All persons subject to the data collection requirements of this
section shall comply with departmental requirements established by rule
in the acquisition of data.
(7) The department must maintain the confidentiality of patient
discharge data it collects under subsection (1) of this section.
Patient discharge data that includes direct and indirect identifiers is
not subject to public inspection and the department may only release
such data as allowed for in this section. Any agency that receives
patient discharge data under (a) or (b) of this subsection must also
maintain the confidentiality of the data and may not release the data
except as consistent with subsection (8)(b) of this section. The
department may release the data as follows:
(a) Data that includes direct and indirect patient identifiers, as
specifically defined in rule, may be released to:
(i) Federal, state, and local government agencies upon receipt of
a signed data use agreement with the department; and
(ii) Researchers with approval of the Washington state
institutional review board upon receipt of a signed confidentiality
agreement with the department.
(b) Data that does not contain direct patient identifiers but may
contain indirect patient identifiers may be released to agencies,
researchers, and other persons upon receipt of a signed data use
agreement with the department.
(c) Data that does not contain direct or indirect patient
identifiers may be released on request.
(8) Recipients of data under subsection (7)(a) and (b) of this
section must agree in a written data use agreement, at a minimum, to:
(a) Take steps to protect direct and indirect patient identifying
information as described in the data use agreement; and
(b) Not re-disclose the data except as authorized in their data use
agreement consistent with the purpose of the agreement.
(9) Recipients of data under subsection (7)(b) and (c) of this
section must not attempt to determine the identity of persons whose
information is included in the data set or use the data in any manner
that identifies individuals or their families.
(10) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Direct patient identifier" means information that identifies
a patient; and
(b) "Indirect patient identifier" means information that may
identify a patient when combined with other information.
(11) The department must adopt rules necessary to carry out its
responsibilities under this section. The department must consider
national standards when adopting rules.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.71.075 and 2012 c 87 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person or entity functioning as a navigator consistent with
the requirements of section 1311(i) of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as
amended, shall not be considered soliciting or negotiating insurance as
stated under chapter 48.17 RCW.
(2)(a) A person or entity functioning as a navigator may only
request health care information that is relevant to the specific
assessment and recommendation of health plan options. Any health care
information received by a navigator may not be disclosed to any third
party that is not part of the enrollment process and must be destroyed
after enrollment has been completed.
(b) If a person's health care information is received and disclosed
to a third party in violation of (a) of this subsection, the navigator
must notify the person of the breach. The exchange must develop a
policy to establish a reasonable notification period and what
information must be included in the notice. This policy and
information on the exchange's confidentiality policies must be made
available on the exchange's web site.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "health care information" has
the meaning provided in RCW 70.02.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---