BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax credit and tax deferral contained in
sections 2 and 3 of this act. This performance statement is only
intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preferences.
It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or
be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes these tax preferences as intended
to improve industry competitiveness and create or retain jobs, as
indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (b) and (c).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
improve industry competitiveness and create or retain more jobs. It is
the legislature's intent to provide a business and occupation tax
credit for high-technology companies performing research and
development and a sales and use tax deferral for certain construction
and equipment purchases for new and expanding high-technology companies
conducting research and development in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, or environmental technology, in order to reduce the
business costs of performing research and development in specified
areas and to reduce the cost of certain construction and equipment
purchases used for research and development, thereby encouraging
investments in research and development, thereby increasing the number
of firms in the industry performing research and development
activities, thereby increasing the number of jobs performing research
and development in the high-technology industry.
(3) If a review finds that the number of businesses participating
in the credit and deferral programs, and the overall number of jobs for
businesses participating in the credit and deferral programs performing
research and development, have increased compared to the number at the
time of enactment, then the legislature intends to extend the
expiration date of the tax preferences.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee may refer to: (a) Employment data available from the
employment security department; and (b) the North American industrial
code system (NAICS) from the department of revenue.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2010 c 114 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, must be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year may not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount of
tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department must declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department must assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the
credit was claimed, and accrues until the taxes against which the
credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a result of this
section may be claimed by the person who performed the qualified
research and development subject to the limitations set forth in
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(7) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" ((shall have)) has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(8) This section expires January 1, ((2015)) 2016.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.63.030 and 2008 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department ((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 RCW or this chapter,
except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) This section ((shall)) expires January 1, ((2015)) 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The high-technology research and
development investment working group is established. The working group
consists of the following members:
(a) The director of the department of commerce who must serve as
chair of the working group;
(b) The director of the department of revenue or his or her
designee;
(c) The presidents of the University of Washington and Washington
State University or their designees;
(d)(i) One representative from each of the following industries
appointed by the governor:
(A) Advanced computing;
(B) Advanced materials;
(C) Biotechnology;
(D) Electronic device technology; and
(E) Environmental technology.
(ii) A statewide organization representing each of the industries
listed in this subsection (1)(d) must submit a list of three names to
the governor. The governor must make each appointment from each list
submitted or request the statewide organization to submit a new list
with up to three additional names.
(2)(a) The working group must develop recommendations for the
legislature that integrates high-technology research and development
activities with investments in higher education. At minimum, the
recommendations must include provisions addressing the following:
(i) Ways to improve the coordination of research and development
spending with higher education institutions, including:
(A) Developing and integrating technology in new or enhanced
products and services, and launching those products and services in
sustainable businesses in Washington state; and
(B) Attracting new high-technology research and development
investment at higher education institutions.
(ii) The design, size, and scope of high-technology research and
development tax preference programs after January 1, 2016.
(b) In developing these recommendations, the working group must
reprioritize current resources devoted to high-technology research and
development tax preferences to provide additional funding for higher
education institutions with a focus on science, technology,
engineering, and math programs of study.
(c) The working group must submit its proposal to the governor and
fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2015.

--- END ---