BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that one of its most
important roles is oversight of state agencies, particularly when it
comes to tortious conduct of the agency that results in harm to
vulnerable Washington citizens.
This act requires legislative hearings on tort payouts exceeding
one million dollars. It is the intent of this act that such hearings
will provide an opportunity for legislative review of the agency's
actions, including an examination of what changes could be made to
prevent such harm in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.92 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever a payment of one million dollars or more is made from the
liability account under RCW 4.92.130 for a settlement or judgment for
the tortious conduct of the state's officers, employees, or volunteers,
the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives shall, within twelve months of the payment, conduct a
joint hearing for the purposes of:
(1) Receiving a report from the attorney general, the office of
risk management, and the agency on which behalf the payment was made.
The report shall describe the factual events and legal context that
resulted in the payment; and
(2) Considering potential modifications to state practices and
policies to prevent or reduce future state liability for tortious
conduct.
The information presented at the hearing shall be consistent with
the protections afforded by the attorney/client privilege and the
confidentiality of attorney work product.

--- END ---