BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that American
Indians and Alaska Natives have very limited access to health care
services and are disproportionately affected by oral health
disparities. These disparities are directly attributed to the lack of
dental health professionals in Indian communities. This has caused a
serious access issue and backlog of dental treatment among American
Indian and Alaska Natives. The legislature also finds that tribal
leaders face a significant challenge in recruiting dental health
professionals to work in Indian communities that results in further
challenges in ensuring oral health care for tribal members.
(2) The legislature finds further that there is a strong history of
government-to-government efforts with tribes in Washington to improve
oral health among tribal members and to reduce the disproportionate
number of American Indians and Alaska Natives affected by oral disease.
One of the goals in the 2010-2013 American Indian health care delivery
plan developed jointly by the department of health and the American
Indian health commission is to improve the oral health of tribal
members and the ability of tribes to provide comprehensive dental
services in their communities. A critical objective to achieving that
goal is "to explore options for the use of trained/certified expanded
function personnel in order to increase oral health care services in
tribal communities."
(3) The legislature finds further that sovereign tribal governments
are in the best position to determine which strategies can effectively
extend the ability of dental health professionals to provide care for
children and others at risk of oral disease and increase access to oral
health care for tribal members. The legislature therefore intends to
authorize dental health aide services, including those of dental health
aide therapists, by Indian tribes, tribal organizations, and urban
Indian organizations to promote increased dental care access for
persons served in these practice settings in accord with the Indian
health care improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A federally recognized Indian tribe, tribal organization, or
urban Indian organization is authorized to train, employ, or contract
with or for the services of a dental health aide, including a dental
health aide therapist. Any dental health aide, including a dental
health aide therapist, employed or contracted to perform services under
this section must be certified by either a federal community health
aide program certification board or an Indian tribe that has adopted
equivalent or higher standards than those imposed by a federal
community health aide program certification board regarding curriculum,
training, scope of practice, continuing education, and supervision
requirements. A federally recognized Indian tribe, tribal
organization, or urban Indian organization is also authorized to
supervise a dental health aide, including a dental health aide
therapist, trained, employed, or contracted to perform services under
this section.
(2) A dental health aide, including a dental health aide therapist,
employed or contracted to perform services under this section may
perform only those procedures permitted under standards adopted by a
federal community health aide program certification board or an Indian
tribe that has adopted equivalent or higher standards than those
imposed by a federal community health aide program certification board
regarding scope of practice, continuing education, and supervision
requirements. A dental health aide, including a dental health aide
therapist, is subject to any service limitations provided by the Indian
health care improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l). A dental health
aide, including a dental health aide therapist, is also subject to any
applicable limitations written by the supervising dentist of the dental
health aide in standing orders.
(3) A dental health aide, including a dental health aide therapist,
employed or contracted to perform services under this section may do so
only in practice settings operated by an Indian health program or an
urban Indian organization.
(4) For purposes of this section, the terms "Indian tribe," "Indian
health program," "tribal organization," and "urban Indian organization"
shall have the meaning given them in the Indian health care improvement
act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care authority is directed to coordinate with the
centers for medicare and medicaid services to ensure the dental health
aide services authorized in section 2 of this act are eligible for
maximum federal funding of up to one hundred percent. It is the intent
of the legislature to ensure dental health aide services, including
those of dental health aide therapists, by Indian tribes, tribal
organizations, and urban Indian organizations are eligible for medicaid
funding to promote increased dental care access for persons served in
these practice settings in accord with the Indian health care
improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l).

--- END ---