BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All enlisted members of grade E1 through E5 of the Washington
national guard who enlist after August 1, 2014, for a minimum period of
three years, are eligible for additional compensation from the state of
Washington in the form of a payment of the monthly premium for the
eligible member for a qualified premium-based dental plan provided for
active duty service members, national guard and reserve members, and
other eligible persons. The state of Washington shall select the
qualified premium-based dental plan that applies pursuant to this
section.
(2) The compensation described in subsection (1) of this section
must be paid for the period of the enlistment.

--- END ---