BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.410 and 2012 c 176 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of big game in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses big game and the person does not
have and possess all licenses, tags, or permits required under this
title; or
(b) Violates any department rule regarding seasons, bag or
possession limits, closed areas including game reserves, closed times,
or any other rule governing the hunting, taking, or possession of big
game.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of big game in the first
degree if the person commits the act described in subsection (1) of
this section and:
(a) The person hunts for, takes, or possesses three or more big
game animals within the same course of events; or
(b) The act occurs within five years of the date of a prior
conviction under this title involving unlawful hunting, killing,
possessing, or taking big game.
(3)(a) Unlawful hunting of big game in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction of an offense involving killing or
possession of big game taken during a closed season, closed area,
without the proper license, tag, or permit using an unlawful method, or
in excess of the bag or possession limit, the department shall revoke
all of the person's hunting licenses and tags and order a suspension of
the person's hunting privileges for two years.
(b) Unlawful hunting of big game in the first degree is a class C
felony. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke all of the
person's hunting licenses or tags and order the person's hunting
privileges suspended for ten years.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "same course of events" means
within one twenty-four hour period, or a pattern of conduct composed of
a series of acts that are unlawful under subsection (1) of this
section, over a period of time evidencing a continuity of purpose.
(5)(a) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(b) of this section if the hunter kills big game due to a mistaken
belief about the sex of the animal and:
(i) The killing occurred during an open season for the species;
(ii) The hunter had all licenses, tags, or permits necessary to
lawfully hunt the species; and
(iii) The hunter follows the procedural requirements defined in (b)
of this subsection.
(b) Any hunter claiming the affirmative defense provided by this
subsection (5) must:
(i) Immediately remove all of the entrails of any edible big game
and tag the animal in the manner prescribed by the department;
(ii) Within twenty-four hours after the killing, report the kill to
the department by telephone or electronic communication;
(iii) Within twenty-four hours after the killing, deliver the
entire carcass, less entrails, to any fish and wildlife officer within
the county the kill occurred for disposition and provide a written,
sworn statement to the officer explaining when, where, and how the
mistake occurred; and
(iv) Within ten days of the killing, provide the department full
payment of restitution. Restitution is the same as the fee for the
license proscribed for the species killed pursuant to RCW 77.32.450.
(c) The affirmative defense provided by this subsection (5) does
not apply to the killing of a bear, elk, or threatened or endangered
species as designated by the commission.

--- END ---