BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent decisions
of the United States supreme court and the Washington state supreme
court require law enforcement to obtain the review of a neutral and
disinterested magistrate and the issuance of a search warrant more
frequently before proceeding with a criminal investigation. The
legislature intends to accommodate this requirement by creating
effective and timely access to magistrates for purposes of reviewing
search warrant applications across the state of Washington. This act
does not change the legal standards for issuing a search warrant or the
legal standards for review of an issued search warrant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any district or municipal court judge may issue a search warrant
for any person or evidence located anywhere within the county in which
that court is located or an adjoining county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any magistrate as defined by RCW 2.20.010, when satisfied that
there is probable cause, may upon application supported by oath or
affirmation, issue a search warrant to search for and seize any: (a)
Evidence of a crime; (b) contraband, the fruits of crime, or things
otherwise criminally possessed; (c) weapons or other things by means of
which a crime has been committed or reasonably appears about to be
committed; or (d) person for whose arrest there is probable cause or
who is unlawfully restrained.
(2) The application may be provided or transmitted to the
magistrate by telephone, e-mail, or any other reliable method.
(3) If the magistrate finds that probable cause for the issuance of
a warrant exists, the magistrate must issue a warrant or direct an
individual whom the magistrate authorizes to affix the magistrate's
signature to a warrant identifying the property or person and naming or
describing the person, place, or thing to be searched. The magistrate
may communicate permission to affix the magistrate's signature to the
warrant by telephone, e-mail, or any other reliable method.
(4) The evidence in support of the finding of probable cause and a
record of the magistrate's permission to affix the magistrate's
signature to the warrant shall be preserved and shall be filed with the
issuing court as required by CrRLJ 2.3 or CrR 2.3.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.72.085 and 1981 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever, under any law of this state or under any rule, order,
or requirement made under the law of this state, any matter in an
official proceeding is required or permitted to be supported,
evidenced, established, or proved by a person's sworn written
statement, declaration, verification, certificate, oath, or affidavit,
the matter may with like force and effect be supported, evidenced,
established, or proved in the official proceeding by an unsworn written
statement, declaration, verification, or certificate, which:
(((1))) (a) Recites that it is certified or declared by the person
to be true under penalty of perjury;
(((2))) (b) Is subscribed by the person;
(((3))) (c) States the date and place of its execution; and
(((4))) (d) States that it is so certified or declared under the
laws of the state of Washington.
(2) The certification or declaration may be in substantially the
following form:

(3) For purposes of this section, a person subscribes to an unsworn
written statement, declaration, verification, or certificate by:
(a) Affixing or placing his or her signature as defined in RCW
9A.04.110 on the document;
(b) Attaching or logically associating his or her digital signature
or electronic signature as defined in RCW 19.34.020 to the document;
(c) Affixing or logically associating his or her signature in the
manner described in general rule 30 to the document if he or she is a
licensed attorney; or
(d) Affixing or logically associating his or her full name,
department or agency, and badge or personnel number to any document
that is electronically submitted to a court, a prosecutor, or a
magistrate from an electronic device that is owned, issued, or
maintained by a criminal justice agency if he or she is a law
enforcement officer.
(4) This section does not apply to writings requiring an
acknowledgment, depositions, oaths of office, or oaths required to be
taken before a special official other than a notary public.

--- END ---