BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.32.080 and 2011 c 171 s 77 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol is responsible for enforcement of
safety requirements for commercial motor vehicles including, but not
limited to, safety audits and compliance reviews. Those motor carriers
that have operations in this state are subject to the patrol's safety
audits and compliance review programs. Compliance reviews may result
in the initiation of an enforcement action, which may include monetary
penalties. The utilities and transportation commission is responsible
for adoption and enforcement of safety requirements for vehicles
operated by entities holding authority under chapters 81.66, 81.68,
81.70, and 81.77 RCW, and by household goods carriers holding authority
under chapter 81.80 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, motor vehicles
owned and operated by farmers in the transportation of their own farm,
orchard, or dairy products, including livestock and plant or animal
wastes, from point of production to market or disposal, or supplies or
commodities to be used on the farm, orchard, or dairy, must have a
department of transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, but
are exempt from safety audits and compliance reviews.
(b) Motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than
11,794 kilograms (26,001 pounds) that are owned and operated by farmers
in the intrastate transportation of their own farm, orchard, or dairy
products, including livestock and plant or animal wastes, from point of
production to market or disposal, or supplies or commodities to be used
on the farm, orchard, or dairy, are exempt from the department of
transportation number requirement in (a) of this subsection.
(3) All records and documents required of motor carriers with
operations in this state must be available for review and inspection
during normal business hours. Duly authorized agents of the state
patrol conducting safety audits and compliance reviews may enter the
motor carrier's place of business, or any location where records or
equipment are located, at reasonable times and without advanced notice.
Motor carriers who do not permit duly authorized agents to enter their
place of business, or any location where records or equipment are
located, for safety audits and compliance reviews are subject to
enforcement action, including a monetary penalty.
(4)(a) All motor carriers with a commercial motor vehicle, as
defined in RCW 46.16A.010, that operate in this state must apply for a
department of transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, by
January 1, 2008. All entities with authority under chapters 81.66,
81.68, 81.70, and 81.77 RCW, and all household goods carriers with
authority under chapter 81.80 RCW, must apply for a department of
transportation number by January 1, 2010.
(b) All motor carriers operating in this state who (i) have not
applied under (a) of this subsection for a department of transportation
number, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and (ii) have a commercial motor
vehicle that has a gross vehicle weight rating of 7,258 kilograms
(16,001 pounds) or more, must apply for a department of transportation
number by January 1, 2011.
(c) The state patrol may deny an application if the applicant does
not meet the requirements and standards under this chapter. The state
patrol shall not issue a department of transportation number to an
applicant who at the time of application has been placed out of service
by the federal motor carrier safety administration. Commercial motor
vehicles must be marked as prescribed by the state patrol. Those
applicants with a current United States department of transportation
number are exempt from applying for a department of transportation
number.
(d) The state patrol may (i) place a motor carrier out of service
or (ii) refuse to issue or recognize as valid a department of
transportation number to an applicant who: (A) Formerly held a
department of transportation number that was placed out of service for
cause, and where cause has not been removed; (B) is a subterfuge for
the real party in interest whose department of transportation number
was placed out of service for cause, and where cause has not been
removed; (C) as an individual licensee, or officer, director, owner, or
managing employee of a nonindividual licensee, had a department of
transportation number and was placed out of service for cause, and
where cause has not been removed; or (D) has an unsatisfied debt to the
state assessed under this chapter.
(e) Upon a finding by the chief of the state patrol or the chief's
designee that a motor carrier is an imminent hazard or danger to the
public health, safety, or welfare, the state patrol shall notify the
department, and the department shall revoke the registrations for all
commercial motor vehicles that are owned by the motor carrier subject
to ((RCW 46.32.080)) this section. In determining whether a motor
carrier is an imminent hazard or danger to the public health, safety,
or welfare, the chief or the chief's designee shall consider safety
factors.

--- END ---