BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 2013 c 23 s 243 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age
of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in: (i) The safe handling of
firearms((,)); (ii) safety((,)); (iii) conservation((,)); and (iv)
sporting/hunting behavior. All persons purchasing any hunting license
for the first time, if born after January 1, 1972, shall present such
certification.
(b)(i) The director ((may)) shall establish and maintain a program
for training persons in: (A) The safe handling of firearms((,)); (B)
safety; (C) conservation((,)); and (D) sporting/hunting behavior and
shall prescribe the type of instruction and the qualifications of the
instructors.
(ii) The director shall, as part of establishing the training
program, exempt members of the United States military from the firearms
skills portion of any instruction course completed over the internet.
(((ii))) (iii) The director may cooperate with the national rifle
association, organized sports/outdoor enthusiasts' groups, or other
public or private organizations when establishing the training program.
(c) Upon the successful completion of a course established under
this section, the trainee shall receive a hunter education certificate
signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of
compliance with this section.
(d) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(2) In carrying out the program established under subsection
(1)(b)(i) of this section, a hunter education instructor may, at the
instructor's discretion, require live-fire training for all students
enrolled in their class. The instructor will indicate to the department
whether live fire is required in the class, and the department will
indicate that requirement when advertising open classes.
(3)(a) The director may authorize a once in a lifetime, one license
year deferral of hunter education training for individuals who are
accompanied by a nondeferred Washington-licensed hunter who has held a
Washington hunting license for the prior three years and is over
eighteen years of age. The commission shall adopt rules for the
administration of this subsection to avoid potential fraud and abuse.
(b) The director is authorized to collect an application fee, not
to exceed twenty dollars, for obtaining the once in a lifetime, one
license year deferral of hunter education training from the department.
This fee must be deposited into the fish and wildlife enforcement
reward account and must be used exclusively to administer the deferral
program created in this subsection.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "accompanied" means to go
along with another person while staying within a range of the other
person that permits continual unaided visual and auditory
communication.
(((3))) (4) To encourage the participation of an adequate number of
instructors for the training program, the commission shall develop
nonmonetary incentives available to individuals who commit to serving
as an instructor. The incentives may include additional hunting
opportunities for instructors.

--- END ---