BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2009 c 389 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(f) The end of the standard sentence range for the current offense
is greater than one year; and
(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a special drug offender sentencing alternative may
be made by the court, the offender, or the state.
(3) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is
eligible for an alternative sentence under this section and that the
alternative sentence is appropriate, the court shall waive imposition
of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a sentence
consisting of either a prison-based alternative under RCW 9.94A.662 or
a residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under RCW
9.94A.664. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based
alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is
((twenty-four)) thirty-six months or less.
(4) To assist the court in making its determination, the court may
order the department to complete either or both a risk assessment
report and a chemical dependency screening report as provided in RCW
9.94A.500.
(5)(a) If the court is considering imposing a sentence under the
residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative, the court
may order an examination of the offender by the department. The
examination shall, at a minimum, address the following issues:
(i) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(ii) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(iii) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(iv) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(b) The examination report must contain:
(i) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(ii) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(6) When a court imposes a sentence of community custody under this
section:
(a) The court may impose conditions as provided in RCW 9.94A.703
and may impose other affirmative conditions as the court considers
appropriate. In addition, an offender may be required to pay thirty
dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of
monitoring for alcohol or controlled substances.
(b) The department may impose conditions and sanctions as
authorized in RCW 9.94A.704 and 9.94A.737.
(7)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this
section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate
the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations
of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c)
of this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current
offense, followed by a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.701,
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the
offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) ((An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement
under (c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time
previously served under this section)) For an offender revoked from a
drug offender sentencing alternative, if the court orders an offender
to serve a term of total confinement under (c) of this subsection, the
department shall credit such confinement term with any total
confinement time or in-patient treatment time previously served under
this section. The department shall not credit time spent on community
custody pursuant to the drug offender sentence alternative towards a
term of total confinement ordered by the sentencing court following a
revocation pursuant to (c) of this subsection absent an order by the
sentencing court that some or all of the community custody shall be
credited towards total confinement in the court's discretion.
(e) Time spent on community custody pursuant to the drug offender
sentencing alternative before a revocation that is not credited towards
total confinement pursuant to (d) of this subsection shall be credited
towards any community custody following a term of total confinement
ordered by the sentencing court upon revocation.
(8) ((In serving a term of community custody imposed upon failure
to complete, or administrative termination from, the special drug
offender sentencing alternative program, the offender shall receive no
credit for time served in community custody prior to termination of the
offender's participation in the program.
(9))) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to
all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period
served in total confinement.
(((10))) (9) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans
under a special drug offender sentencing alternative may be paid, at
the option of the county, from funds provided to the county from the
criminal justice treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.664 and 2009 c 389 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentence for a residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative shall include a term of community custody equal to
one-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range or two years,
whichever is greater, conditioned on the offender entering and
remaining in residential chemical dependency treatment certified under
chapter 70.96A RCW for a period set by the court between three and six
months.
(2)(a) The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody,
treatment and other conditions as proposed in the examination report
completed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.
(b) If the court imposes a term of community custody, the
department shall, within available resources, make chemical dependency
assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the
term of community custody.
(3)(a) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the
treatment provider must send the treatment plan to the court within
thirty days of the offender's arrival to the residential chemical
dependency treatment program.
(b) Upon receipt of the plan, the court shall schedule a progress
hearing during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment,
and schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before
the expiration of the term of community custody.
(c) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing,
the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports
to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with
treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding
termination from treatment.
(4) At a progress hearing or treatment termination hearing, the
court may:
(a) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under subsection (1)
of this section;
(b) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(c) ((Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.701)) Consider revocation of the drug
offender treatment alternative pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.
(5) If the court imposes a term of total confinement, the
department shall, within available resources, make chemical dependency
assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the
term of total confinement and subsequent term of community custody.

--- END ---