BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Water is vital to the survival of life on the planet and is
limited in supply. One way to help extend Washington's water supply is
by promoting water efficiency and enhancing the market for water
efficient products, programs, and practices;
(2) Bathrooms are, by far, the largest user of water inside the
home, responsible for about one-half of total indoor water use;
(3) Toilets account for approximately thirty percent of residential
indoor water consumption. Toilets are a major source of wasted water
due to leaks or inefficiencies. Under federal and state law, toilets
sold in the United States must not exceed 1.6 gallons per flush. High
efficiency toilets go beyond the standard and use less than 1.3 gallons
per flush. Power assist and pressure assist toilets use even less
water, some even less than one gallon of water per flush. Tests and
research demonstrate that high efficiency toilets work as well or
better than high volume toilets. If every home in the United States
replaced old toilets with new high efficiency toilets, the savings
would be more than twenty billion gallons of water a year in Washington
state; and
(4) Besides saving water and reducing a customer's costs, water
efficiency offers many other benefits:
(a) Less water withdrawn from rivers, lakes, and aquifers, which
keeps these water bodies healthy;
(b) Improved water quality due to increased river flows;
(c) Less energy required to pump and treat the water and
wastewater, therefore less greenhouse gas emissions;
(d) Less wastewater that requires collection, treatment, and
disposal; and
(e) Less pollution from treated wastewater in our streams and
waterways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2016, all toilets, other than institutional and
commercial toilets, toilets used by children in day care facilities,
and toilets used in bariatric applications, sold, offered for sale, or
distributed in this state must be high efficiency toilets.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Commercial toilet" means a model that uses a nontank
pressurized flushing device, which means a device where a valve is
attached to a pressurized water supply pipe and designed that when
actuated, it opens the line for direct flow into the fixture at a rate
and quantity to properly operate the fixture and gradually closes in
order to avoid water hammer. The pipe to which this device is
connected is of sufficient size that, when open, the device delivers
water at a sufficient rate of flow for flushing purposes.
(b) "High efficiency toilet" means a toilet that meets the
performance, testing, and labeling requirements prescribed by American
society of mechanical engineers A112.19.2/Canadian standards
association B45.1-2008 standard ceramic plumbing fixtures and, if
applicable, American society of mechanical engineers A112.19.14-2006
standard six liter water closets equipped with a dual flushing device
and is either of the following:
(i) A dual flush toilet with an effective flush volume that does
not exceed 1.28 gallons as determined by American society of mechanical
engineers A112.19.14-2006 standard six liter water closets equipped
with a dual flushing device, where effective flush volume is defined as
the composite, average flush volume of two reduced flushes and one full
flush; or
(ii) A single flush toilet where the effective flush volume may not
exceed 1.28 gallons as determined by the test procedures contained in
American society of mechanical engineers A112.19.2/Canadian standards
association B45.1-2008 standard ceramic plumbing fixtures.
(c) "Institutional toilet" means any toilet fixture with a design
not typically found in residential or commercial applications or that
is designed for a specialized application, including, but not limited
to, wall-mounted wall outlet toilets, toilets used in jails or prisons,
toilets used in bariatrics applications, and child toilets used in day
care facilities.

--- END ---