BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The department, in cooperation and
collaboration with the county legislative authorities of Ferry,
Stevens, Pend Oreille, Chelan, Okanogan, and Klickitat counties, shall
recommend rules to establish a five-year pilot program within select
game management units of these counties, to pursue or kill cougars with
the aid of dogs.
(b) Dangerous wildlife task teams must be developed in each county
comprised of representatives from the county and the department. A
pursuit season and a kill season with the aid of dogs must be
established through the commission's rule-making process, utilizing
local dangerous wildlife task teams. The dangerous wildlife task teams
shall also develop a more effective and accurate dangerous wildlife
reporting system to ensure a timely response.
(c) The pilot program's primary goals are to provide for public
safety, to protect property, and to assess, conserve, and manage cougar
populations.
(2) Rules adopted by the commission to establish a pilot project
allowing for the pursuit or hunting of cougars with the aid of dogs
under this section must ensure that all pursuits or hunts are:
(a) Designed to protect public safety or property;
(b) Reflective of the most current cougar population data;
(c) Designed to generate data that is necessary for the department
to satisfy the reporting requirements of section 3 of this act;
(d) Consistent with any applicable recommendations emerging from
research on cougar population dynamics in a multiprey environment
funded in whole or in part by the department; and
(e) Designed to minimize the harvest of healthy, dominant males and
breeding females in order to promote stability in the social structure
of cougar populations.
(3) The department may authorize five seasons in which cougars may
be pursued or killed with dogs, subject to the other conditions of the
pilot program. The seasons are authorized to aid the department in the
gathering of information necessary to formulate a recommendation to the
legislature regarding whether a permanent program is warranted and, if
so, what constraints, goals, and objectives should be included in a
permanent program.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A county legislative authority may
request inclusion in the pilot project authorized by section 1 of this
act after taking the following actions:
(a) Adopting a resolution that requests inclusion in the pilot
project;
(b) Documenting the need to participate in the pilot program by
identifying the number of cougar/human encounters and livestock and pet
depredations;
(c) Developing and agreeing to the implementation of an education
program designed to disseminate to landowners and other citizens
information about predator exclusion techniques and devices and other
nonlethal methods of cougar management; and
(d) Demonstrating that existing cougar depredation permits, public
safety cougar hunts, or other existing wildlife management tools have
not been sufficient to deal with cougar incidents in the county.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By September 1, 2018, the department
must deliver to the legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, a
progress report summarizing the pilot program authorized in section 1
of this act. The report must include information relating to how the
program has been used to assess cougar population levels and protect
public safety and property. The report may also include any
recommendations as to how cougar management policies may be changed in
the future to achieve more effective or efficient management.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 77.12 RCW.

--- END ---