BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.120 and 1992 c 73 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever((, in the opinion of)) the department((,)) determines
that any person ((shall violate or creates)) has violated or created a
substantial potential to violate the provisions of this chapter or
chapter 90.56 RCW, or fails to control the polluting content of waste
discharged or to be discharged into any waters of the state, the
department shall notify such person of its determination by registered
mail. Such determination shall not constitute an order or directive
under RCW 43.21B.310. Within thirty days from the receipt of notice of
such determination, such person shall file with the department a full
report stating what steps have been and are being taken to control such
waste or pollution or to otherwise comply with the determination of the
department. Whereupon the department shall issue such order or
directive as it deems appropriate under the circumstances, and shall
notify such person thereof by registered mail.
(2) Whenever the department ((deems)) determines that immediate
action is necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter or
chapter 90.56 RCW, it may issue such order or directive, as appropriate
under the circumstances, without first issuing a notice or
determination pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. An order or
directive issued pursuant to this subsection shall be served by
registered mail or personally upon any person to whom it is directed.
(3) All determinations by the department under this section must be
based on a preponderance of actual site-based, source-specific
environmental testing.

--- END ---