BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) All the citizens of the state of Washington should have an
equal opportunity to access state-managed recreation lands, including
state parks, without regards to their income level, knowledge of
applicable pass or permitting requirements, or other factors that may
affect their ability to obtain any required pass or permit;
(2) The ability to enjoy state-managed recreation lands is a
valuable resource to the state's citizens and should be supported by a
balanced portfolio of funding that includes both agency user fees,
including continued purchase of the discover pass on a voluntary basis,
as well as other state revenue sources; and
(3) In addition to balanced and stable funding, the state park
system will benefit from continued analysis and implementation of
appropriate measures to ensure efficient and effective operations.

Part One: Making the Discover Pass Voluntary
Sec. 101 RCW 79A.80.010 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" or "agencies" means the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the parks and
recreation commission.
(2) (("Annual natural investment permit" means the annual permit
issued by the parks and recreation commission for the purpose of
launching boats from the designated state parks boat launch sites.
(3) "Camper registration" means proof of payment of a camping fee
on recreational lands managed by the parks and recreation commission.
(4))) "Day-use permit" means the permit created in RCW 79A.80.030.
(((5))) (3) "Discover pass" means the annual pass created in RCW
79A.80.020.
(((6) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.04.320 and which are required to be registered under chapter 46.16A
RCW. "Motor vehicle" does not include those motor vehicles exempt from
registration under RCW 46.16A.080, wheeled all-terrain vehicles
registered for use under RCW 46.09.442, and state and publicly owned
motor vehicles as provided in RCW 46.16A.170.
(7) "Recreation site or lands" means a state park, state lands and
state forest lands as those terms are defined in RCW 79.02.010, natural
resources conservation areas as that term is defined in RCW 79.71.030,
natural area preserves as that term is defined in RCW 79.70.020, and
fish and wildlife conservation sites including water access areas, boat
ramps, wildlife areas, parking areas, roads, and trailheads.
(8) "Sno-park seasonal permit" means the seasonal permit issued by
the parks and recreation commission for providing access to winter
recreational facilities for the period of November 1st through March
31st.
(9) "Vehicle access pass" means the pass created in RCW
79A.80.040.))

Sec. 102 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,)) A discover
pass ((is required for any motor vehicle to:
(a) Park at any recreation site or lands; or
(b) Operate on any recreation site or lands)) may be purchased on
a voluntary basis to support the maintenance and operation of
recreation on lands managed by the agencies.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.80.110, the cost of a discover
pass is thirty dollars. Every four years, beginning October 1, 2018,
the office of financial management must review the cost of the discover
pass and, if necessary, recommend to the legislature an adjustment to
the cost of the discover pass to account for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is ((valid)) effective for one year beginning
from the date that the discover pass is marked for activation. The
activation date may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any
policies developed by the agencies.
(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(5) The agencies must establish the form and design of the discover
pass ((must contain space for two motor vehicle license plate numbers.
A discover pass is valid only for those vehicle license plate numbers
written on the pass. However, the agencies may offer for sale a family
discover pass that is fully transferable among vehicles and does not
require the placement of a license plate number on the pass to be
valid. The agencies must collectively set a price for the sale of a
family discover pass that is no more than fifty dollars. A discover
pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle at any one time)).
(6) One complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 103 RCW 79A.80.030 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A ((person may purchase a)) day-use permit ((to meet the
requirements of RCW 79A.80.080)) may be purchased on a voluntary basis
to support the maintenance and operation of recreation on lands managed
by the agencies. Except as provided in RCW 79A.80.110, a day-use
permit is ten dollars per day and must be available for purchase from
each agency. A day-use permit is ((valid)) effective for one calendar
day.
(2) ((The agencies may provide short-term parking under RCW
79A.80.070 where a day-use permit is not required.
(3))) Every four years, beginning September 1, 2018, the office of
financial management must review the cost of the day-use permit and, if
necessary, recommend to the legislature an adjustment to the cost of
the day-use permit to account for inflation.
(((4))) (3) Sales of day-use permits must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(4) The agencies must establish the form and design of the day-use
permit.

Sec. 104 RCW 79A.80.090 and 2011 c 320 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The recreation access pass account is created in the state
treasury. All moneys received from the sale of discover passes and
day-use permits or otherwise directed to the account must be deposited
into the account.
(2) Each fiscal biennium, the first seventy-one million dollars in
revenue must be distributed to the agencies in the following manner:
(a) Eight percent to the department of fish and wildlife and
deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170;
(b) Eight percent to the department of natural resources and
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund created in RCW
43.30.385; and
(c) Eighty-four percent to the state parks and recreation
commission and deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship
account created in RCW 79A.05.215.
(3) Each fiscal biennium, revenues in excess of seventy-one million
dollars must be distributed equally among the agencies to the accounts
identified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 105 RCW 79A.80.100 and 2012 c 261 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Discover passes and day-use permits may be made available for
purchase:
(a) Through vendors under contract with one or more of the
agencies. The agencies may provide vendors with discover passes and
day-use permits at the sales price established under RCW 79A.80.020 and
79A.80.030 to sell at retail;
(b) Directly from the state parks and recreation commission((,
both)) through that agency's parks reservation system, directly from
agency employees or volunteers at staffed state parks, or as otherwise
provided in RCW 79A.05.070;
(c) From the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090
and 46.01.370;
(d) From other outlets authorized by law to sell state licenses,
permits, or passes; and
(e) Consistent with RCW 77.32.050, through the department of fish
and wildlife's automated licensing system.
(2) The agencies must maintain a policy to address conditions
related to ((return, replacements, and for providing the full year of
recreational lands access that the discover pass provides to
individuals who are required by the department of licensing to change
license plate numbers during the effective dates of a discover pass
tied to the affected vehicle)) the acquisition of replacement discover
passes and day-use permits.
(3) For discover passes and day-use permits purchased through the
department of licensing, county auditors, or other agents or subagents
appointed by the director of the department of licensing, the selling
entity is not responsible for delivering the purchased discover pass to
the purchaser. The responsibility for delivering the discover pass
belongs to the agencies.

Sec. 106 RCW 3.62.020 and 2012 c 262 s 1, 2012 c 136 s 4, and
2012 c 134 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120, 10.99.080,
((7.84.100(4),)) and this section, the county treasurer shall remit
thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under subsection
(1) of this section except certain costs to the state treasurer.
"Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded
to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040,
or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions
under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes
if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are
awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state
or county in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. With the exception of funds to be transferred to the judicial
stabilization trust account under RCW 3.62.060(2), money remitted under
this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state
general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund. Funds deposited under this subsection
that are attributable to the county's portion of a surcharge imposed
under RCW 3.62.060(2) must be used to support local trial court and
court-related functions.
(4) ((Except as provided in RCW 7.84.100(4),)) All money collected
for county parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court at least monthly, with the information required under
subsection (1) of this section, to the county treasurer for deposit in
the county current expense fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county
current expense fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 107 RCW 4.24.210 and 2012 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowners, hydroelectric project
owners, or others in lawful possession and control of any lands whether
designated resource, rural, or urban, or water areas or channels and
lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who allow members of the
public to use them for the purposes of outdoor recreation, which term
includes, but is not limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing
of firewood by private persons for their personal use without
purchasing the firewood from the landowner, hunting, fishing, camping,
picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling, skateboarding or other
nonmotorized wheel-based activities, aviation activities including, but
not limited to, the operation of airplanes, ultra-light airplanes, hang
gliders, parachutes, and paragliders, rock climbing, the riding of
horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road
vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, kayaking, canoeing,
rafting, nature study, winter or water sports, viewing or enjoying
historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites, without
charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall not be liable for
unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession
and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or
channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or
allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
(i) A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by
someone other than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial
latent condition and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section
shall not be liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the
condition or use of such an anchor.
(ii) Releasing water or flows and making waterways or channels
available for kayaking, canoeing, or rafting purposes pursuant to and
in substantial compliance with a hydroelectric license issued by the
federal energy regulatory commission, and making adjacent lands
available for purposes of allowing viewing of such activities, does not
create a known dangerous artificial latent condition and hydroelectric
project owners under subsection (1) of this section shall not be liable
for unintentional injuries to the recreational users and observers
resulting from such releases and activities.
(b) Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and this section limits or expands in
any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance.
(c) Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or other
users is permissive and does not support any claim of adverse
possession.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following are not fees:
(a) A license or permit issued for statewide use under authority of
chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW;
(b) A pass or permit issued under RCW 79A.80.020((,)) or
79A.80.030((, or 79A.80.040)); and
(c) A daily charge not to exceed twenty dollars per person, per
day, for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined in RCW
46.09.310, or other public facility accessed by a highway, street, or
nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road vehicle use.

Sec. 108 RCW 7.84.100 and 2012 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed an infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed five hundred
dollars for each offense unless specifically authorized by statute.
(2) The supreme court may prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary
penalties for designated infractions. The legislature requests the
supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.
The maximum penalty imposed by the schedule shall be five hundred
dollars per infraction and the minimum penalty imposed by the schedule
shall be ten dollars per infraction. This schedule may be periodically
reviewed by the legislature and is subject to its revision.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter, it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time, the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid.
(((4) The county treasurer shall remit the money received under RCW
79A.80.080(5) to the state treasurer. Money remitted under this
subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the recreation
access pass account established under RCW 79A.80.090.))

Sec. 109 RCW 43.12.065 and 2011 c 320 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the promotion of the public safety and the protection of
public property, the department of natural resources may, in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW, issue, promulgate, adopt, and enforce rules
pertaining to use by the public of state-owned lands and property which
are administered by the department.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a violation
of any rule adopted under this section is a misdemeanor.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the department
may specify by rule, when not inconsistent with applicable statutes,
that violation of such a rule is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
However, any violation of a rule relating to traffic including parking,
standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses is a traffic infraction.
(c) Violation of such a rule equivalent to those provisions of
Title 46 RCW set forth in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor.
(3) The commissioner of public lands and those employees as the
commissioner may designate shall be vested with police powers when
enforcing:
(a) The rules of the department adopted under this section; or
(b) ((The civil infractions created under RCW 79A.80.080; or
(c))) The general criminal statutes or ordinances of the state or
its political subdivisions where enforcement is necessary for the
protection of state-owned lands and property.
(4) The commissioner of public lands may, under the provisions of
RCW 7.84.140, enter into an agreement allowing employees of the state
parks and recreation commission and the department of fish and wildlife
to enforce certain civil infractions created under this title.

Sec. 110 RCW 77.15.750 and 2011 c 320 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a department permit if
the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.
(2)(a) Permits covered under subsection (1) of this section
include, but are not limited to, master hunter permits, crab pot
removal permits and shellfish pot removal permits under RCW 77.70.500,
depredation permits, landowner hunting permits, commercial carp license
permits, permits to possess or dispense beer or malt liquor pursuant to
RCW 66.28.210, and permits to hold, sponsor, or attend an event
requiring a banquet permit from the liquor control board.
(b) Permits excluded from subsection (1) of this section include
((the discover pass created in RCW 79A.80.020, the vehicle access pass
created in RCW 79A.80.040, the day-use permit created in RCW
79A.80.030,)) commercial use or activity permits, noncommercial use or
activity permits, parking permits, experimental fishery permits, trial
commercial fishery permits, and scientific collection permits.
(3) Unlawful use of a department permit is a misdemeanor.
(4) A person is guilty of unlawful use of an experimental fishery
permit or a trial commercial fishery permit if the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the issuance or use of the permit.
(5) Unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial
commercial fishery permit is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Experimental fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
director for either:
(i) An "emerging commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
newly classified species for which the department has determined that
there is a need to limit participation; or
(ii) An "expanding commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
previously classified species in a new area, by a new method, or at a
new effort level, for which the department has determined that there is
a need to limit participation.
(b) "Trial commercial fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
department for trial harvest of a newly classified species or harvest
of a previously classified species in a new area or by a new means.

Sec. 111 RCW 77.32.010 and 2011 c 320 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) ((A pass or permit issued under RCW 79A.80.020, 79A.80.030, or
79A.80.040 is required to park or operate a motor vehicle on a
recreation site or lands, as defined in RCW 79A.80.010.)) The
department may not impose a mandatory fee or permit requirement for
general public access or parking.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 112 RCW 79A.05.070 and 2012 c 261 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its
duties;
(2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching
requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes
in keeping with the purposes of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests,
devises and endowments for purposes in keeping with such purposes;
enter into cooperative agreements with and provide for private
nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise
money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for
the purposes of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit
group in a cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel
and services, if available. However, none of the moneys raised may
inure to the benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of
its purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this chapter.
The agency and the private nonprofit group must agree on the nature of
any project to be supported by such gift or grant prior to the use of
any agency property or facilities for raising money. Any such gifts
may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built in
part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the
facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;
(3) Require certification by the commission of all parks and
recreation workers employed in state aided or state controlled
programs;
(4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other
state agencies, institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in
order to carry out the objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;
(5) Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on
parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such conditions and
considerations as the commission shall specify;
(6) Charge fees for services, utilities, and use of facilities as
the commission shall deem proper. The commission may ((utilize
unstaffed collection stations to collect any fees or distribute any
permits necessary for access to state parks, including discover passes
and day-use permits as those terms are defined in RCW 79A.80.010)) not
impose a mandatory fee or permit requirement for general public access
or parking. However, the commission may collect fees for and
distribute, including through the use of unstaffed collection stations,
discover passes and day-use permits, as those terms are defined in RCW
79A.80.010, purchased on a voluntary basis;
(7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent
undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral
development purposes upon such terms and conditions as the commission
shall deem proper, for a term not to exceed forty years;
(8) Determine the qualifications of and employ a director of parks
and recreation who must receive a salary as fixed by the governor in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 and determine the
qualifications and salary of and employ such other persons as may be
needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and
(9) Utilize such other powers as in the judgment of a majority of
its members are deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this
chapter. However, the commission does not have power to supervise
directly any local park or recreation district, and no funds shall be
made available for such purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 A new section is added to chapter 79.10
RCW under the subchapter heading "part 2: multiple use" to read as
follows:
The department may not impose a mandatory fee or permit requirement
for general public access or parking on public lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 (1) A state agency may not refund money
for a discover pass issued prior to the effective date of this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "discover pass" has
the same meaning as defined in RCW 79A.80.010.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 Sections 101 through 114 of this act take
effect January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 (1) The state parks and recreation
commission, department of fish and wildlife, and department of natural
resources must, in consultation with the office of financial
management, develop a plan to efficiently and effectively transition
from the current discover pass and day-use permit system, as those
terms are defined in RCW 79A.80.010, to the model established under
this act where those purchases are voluntary.
(2) Elements of the plan must include, at a minimum:
(a) Strategies to market and maximize revenue from the voluntary
purchase of the discover pass and day-use permit;
(b) Incentives to promote the voluntary purchase of the discover
pass and day-use permit. In conducting this analysis, the agencies
must consider concepts including: The style and form of the discover
pass; the receipt of complimentary items with a purchase such as a
decal or bumper sticker; discounts on other agency permits or
reservations; discounts on purchases from private sector partners; and
other concepts identified by the agencies;
(c) Administrative and operating recommendations to facilitate an
efficient and effective transition to the voluntary discover pass and
day-use permit; and
(d) Legislative recommendations to facilitate an efficient and
effective transition to the voluntary discover pass and day-use permit.
(3) The agencies must provide the plan to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by September 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 79A.80.005 (Findings -- Intent -- 2011 c 320) and 2011 c 320 s
1;
(2) RCW 79A.80.040 (Vehicle access pass) and 2012 c 261 s 5 & 2011
c 320 s 5;
(3) RCW 79A.80.050 (Valid camper registration/annual natural
investment permit -- Commission may provide free entry to state parks)
and 2012 c 261 s 6 & 2011 c 320 s 6;
(4) RCW 79A.80.060 (Sno-park seasonal permit) and 2011 c 320 s 7;
(5) RCW 79A.80.070 (Short-term parking) and 2011 c 320 s 8; and
(6) RCW 79A.80.080 (Pass/permit requirements--Penalty) and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 15 s 3, 2012 c 261 s 7, & 2011 c 320 s 9.

Part Two: Providing Funding for Operation and
Maintenance of State Recreation Lands
Sec. 201 RCW 36.18.010 and 2007 c 523 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
County auditors or recording officers shall collect the following
fees for their official services:
(1) For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page
eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar. The fee for
recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be
calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required
under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document;
the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may
be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or
transaction;
(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight
and one-half by fourteen inches or less, three dollars; for each
additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one
dollar;
(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or
without seal, two dollars;
(5) For issuing a marriage license, eight dollars, (this fee
includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and
transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital
statistics) plus an additional five dollar fee for use and support of
the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund
plus an additional ten dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the
state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The
legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the
revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced
homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;
(6) For searching records per hour, eight dollars;
(7) For recording plats, fifty cents for each lot except cemetery
plats for which the charge shall be twenty-five cents per lot; also one
dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED,
That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five dollars per plat;
(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for
the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five
dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches
or less, one dollar;
(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing
system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170;
(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in
RCW 65.04.047, fifty dollars, in addition to all other applicable
recording fees;
(11) For recording instruments, a two-dollar surcharge to be
deposited into the Washington state heritage center account created in
RCW 43.07.129 until June 30, 2015, and beginning July 1, 2015,
deposited into the recreation access pass account created in RCW
79A.80.090;
(12) For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.178; and
(13) For recording instruments, except for documents recording a
birth, marriage, divorce, or death or any documents otherwise exempted
from a recording fee under state law, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.179.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.07.128 and 2007 c 523 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to other required filing fees, the secretary of
state shall collect a fee of five dollars at the time of filing for:
(a) Articles of incorporation for domestic corporations or
applications for certificates of authority for foreign corporations
under Title 23B RCW;
(b) Certificates of formation for domestic limited liability
companies or registrations of foreign limited liability companies under
chapter 25.15 RCW;
(c) Registrations of foreign and domestic partnerships and limited
liability partnerships under chapter 25.05 RCW;
(d) Certificates of limited ((partnership[s])) partnerships and
((registration[s])) registrations of foreign limited partnerships under
chapter 25.10 RCW; and
(e) Registrations of trademarks under chapter 19.77 RCW.
(2) Moneys received under subsection (1) of this section must be
deposited into the Washington state heritage center account until June
30, 2015, and beginning July 1, 2015, deposited into the recreation
access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090.

Sec. 203 RCW 36.22.179 and 2012 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178, and
except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, an
additional surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge allowed by law. From July 1, 2009, through August 31,
2012, and from July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2017, the surcharge shall
be thirty dollars. From September 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015, the
surcharge shall be forty dollars. The funds collected pursuant to this
section are to be distributed and used as follows:
(a) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of the fee,
and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county to be
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities
and towns to accomplish the purposes of chapter 484, Laws of 2005, six
percent of which may be used by the county for administrative costs
related to its homeless housing plan, and the remainder for programs
which directly accomplish the goals of the county's local homeless
housing plan, except that for each city in the county which elects as
authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local homeless housing
program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under this section
equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate
excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at least
quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county
administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which
directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing
plan; of the funds received by the city, it may use six percent for
administrative costs for its homeless housing program.
(b) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the state
treasurer for deposit in the home security fund account. The
department may use twelve and one-half percent of this amount for
administration of the program established in RCW 43.185C.020, including
the costs of creating the statewide homeless housing strategic plan,
measuring performance, providing technical assistance to local
governments, and managing the homeless housing grant program. The
remaining eighty-seven and one-half percent is to be used by the
department to:
(i) Provide housing and shelter for homeless people including, but
not limited to: Grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters; grants
to operate transitional housing; partial payments for rental
assistance; consolidated emergency assistance; overnight youth
shelters; grants and vouchers designated for victims of human
trafficking and their families; and emergency shelter assistance; and
(ii) Fund the homeless housing grant program.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2015, in addition to the surcharges
authorized in RCW 36.22.178 and subsection (1) of this section, and
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an additional
surcharge of ten dollars must be charged by the county auditor for each
document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. The auditor must retain two percent for collection of
the fee and remit the remaining funds to the state treasurer for
deposit in the recreation access pass account created in RCW
79A.80.090.
(3) The surcharge imposed in this section applies to documents
required to be recorded or filed under RCW 65.04.030(1) including, but
not limited to: Full reconveyance; deeds of trust; deeds; liens
related to real property; release of liens related to real property;
notice of trustee sales; judgments related to real property; and all
other documents pertaining to real property as determined by the
department. However, the surcharge does not apply to (a) assignments
or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust, or (b)
documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death or any
documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee under state law.
(((3))) (4) By August 31, 2012, the department shall submit to each
county auditor a list of documents that are subject to the surcharge
established in subsection (1) of this section.
(((4) If section 2, chapter 90, Laws of 2012 is not enacted into
law by July 31, 2012, section 1, chapter 90, Laws of 2012 is null and
void.))

Sec. 204 RCW 79A.15.050 and 2007 c 241 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the outdoor recreation
account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than thirty percent to the state parks and recreation
commission for the ((acquisition and development)) renovation and
repair of state parks((, with at least fifty percent of the money for
acquisition costs)) facilities;
(b) Not less than thirty percent for the acquisition, development,
and renovation of local parks, with at least fifty percent of this
money for acquisition costs;
(c) Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition, renovation,
or development of trails;
(d) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition, renovation,
or development of water access sites, with at least seventy-five
percent of this money for acquisition costs; and
(e) Not less than five percent for development and renovation
projects on state recreation lands. Only the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife may apply for these
funds to be used on their existing recreation lands.
(2)(a) In distributing these funds, the board retains discretion to
meet the most pressing needs for state and local parks, trails, and
water access sites, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(b) If not enough project applications are submitted in a category
within the outdoor recreation account to meet the percentages described
in subsection (1) of this section in any biennium, the board retains
discretion to distribute any remaining funds to the other categories
within the account.
(3) Only local agencies may apply for acquisition, development, or
renovation funds for local parks under subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(4) Only state and local agencies may apply for funds for trails
under subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(5) Only state and local agencies may apply for funds for water
access sites under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 Section 204 of this act expires June 30,
2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 The legislature recognizes that making the
discover pass voluntary beginning January 1, 2015, may result in a
temporary funding gap for state recreational land management prior to
the accrual of revenue under RCW 36.18.010, 43.07.128, 36.22.179, and
79A.15.050, and that projections as to revenue levels are under
continued analysis. The legislature intends to address any funding gap
resulting from making the discover pass voluntary in the 2014
supplemental operating budget.

Part Three: State Parks Efficiency
and Effectiveness Measures
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 43.41
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office, in consultation with the state parks and recreation
commission, must establish and conduct a competitive procurement
process for the selection of one or more private sector entities to
increase revenue from more efficient and effective management of state
camping areas and their related facilities. The competitive
procurement process must be designed to encourage the greatest
participation of the private sector. The competitive procurement
process must be conducted in a manner that any contract executed under
this section will take effect by November 1, 2017.
(2)(a) To implement the competitive procurement process required
under subsection (1) of this section, the office must, after
consultation with the chair of the state parks and recreation
commission, request proposals for one or more contracts to manage the
state's camping areas and their related facilities, including but not
limited to: The renting, leasing, and reservation of camping areas and
facilities; issuing of commercial use permits; establishing rates,
fees, and other charges for rents, leases, and services; promotional
and marketing activities; developing and managing new and existing
concessions and other amenities; and providing other products and
services intended to maximize revenue. The request for proposals must
be solicited by November 1, 2016.
(b) The request for proposals must include without limitation:
(i) The option of managing all or portions of the state's camping
areas and their related facilities;
(ii) The option of proposing alternative rates, fees, and charges
such as differential, demand, or variable pricing, lotteries and
auctions, and other creative self-financing models;
(iii) The option of subcontracting work to other vendors;
(iv) A requirement that proposals demonstrate to the satisfaction
of the office relevant previous experience as well as the financial
capacity to perform obligations under the contract; and
(v) Measurable standards for the performance of the contract.
(c) Prior to conducting the competitive process outlined in this
section, the request for proposals developed by the office must be
reviewed by the house and senate fiscal committees.
(d) If the office determines that through the competitive
procurement process that entering into one or more contracts will
result in a net financial benefit to the state, the state parks and
recreation commission must enter into the contract or contracts as
determined by the office. If, in the determination of the office,
there is no proposal or combination of proposals that will result in a
net financial benefit to the state, the office must notify the state
parks and recreation commission to not accept any of the proposals.
(e) The office must publicly disclose an analysis of the net
financial benefit to the state of each of the proposals made in the
procurement process.
(3) The competitive procurement process must not include services
related to security and enforcement, construction, or repair of camping
areas or their related facilities.
(4) Any challenge to or protest of the determination of the office
must be filed by a respondent that submitted a proposal with the office
within five days after the determination. The grounds for such a
challenge or protest are limited to claims that the recommendation and
acceptance were arbitrary and capricious. The office must, within five
days, render its decision on the protest. The respondent that filed
the protest may, within five days after such a decision, appeal to the
superior court of Thurston county by petition setting forth objections
to the decision. A copy of the petition on appeal together with a
notice that an appeal has been taken must be served upon the secretary
of state, the attorney general, the office, the state parks and
recreation commission, and the respondent that submitted the
recommended and accepted proposal. The court must accord first
priority to examining the objections, may hear arguments, and must,
within ten days, render its decision. The decision of the superior
court is final.
(5) Any contract executed under this section must include
enforceable performance standards and minimum financial returns to the
state. The state parks and recreation commission, in consultation with
the office, must establish a contract monitoring process to measure
contract performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other
contract standards. The contract must provide a provision that allows
the state to terminate the contract should specific performance
standards or financial returns to the state not be realized. The
contract must provide for a reasonable termination notification process
as well as financial terms of termination should termination of the
contract take place.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Camping areas and their related facilities" include, but are
not limited to, campsites, yurts, cabins, rustic structures, vacation
houses, group camps, or other facilities and structures intended for
overnight or day use on lands managed by the state parks and recreation
commission.
(b) "Net financial benefit to the state" means increased revenue to
the state or increased services and efficiencies from the proposal when
compared to services provided and revenues generated from camping areas
and their related facilities.
(i) Increases in rates, fees, or charges for camping areas and
their related facilities or permits that can be accomplished by the
state parks and recreation commission without additional services,
management, or strategies contained in the proposal must not be
considered increased revenue.
(ii) Greater weight must be given to proposals that generate
revenue through increased use, services, and amenities of camping areas
and their related facilities.
(iii) Greater weight must be given to proposals that improve
services and amenities or increase the use of camping areas and their
related facilities located in geographically remote areas of the state.
(iv) Costs or savings from a proposal's change to the state parks
and recreation commission management and operations of camping areas
and their related facilities must be considered when determining the
net financial benefit to the state.
(v) Both direct and indirect costs of the state parks and
recreation commission must be included when determining services
provided and projected revenues generated from camping areas and their
related facilities.

Sec. 302 RCW 79A.05.030 and 2005 c 373 s 1 and 2005 c 360 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease,
it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights-of-way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.
(9) Within allowable resources, maintain policies that increase the
number of people who have access to free or low-cost recreational
opportunities for physical activity, including noncompetitive physical
activity.
(10) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal
history record information search for the following: Job applicants,
volunteers, and independent contractors who have unsupervised access to
children or vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for
collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card
transactions. These background checks will be done through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include
a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall
be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the
commission, employed as of July 24, 2005, is exempt from the provisions
of this subsection.
(11) Enter into contracts from the competitive procurement process
created in section 301 of this act. Until November 1, 2017, the
commission may not enter into, renew, or extend any contract for
services subject to the competitive process created in section 301 of
this act beyond November 1, 2017, without prior approval of the
director of the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall continue its ongoing efforts to evaluate
the agency's mission and options to improve the efficiency and
effectiveness of the agency, which may include the evaluation of
options relating to organizational structure, administrative processes,
land and facility ownership and management, and provision of services.
(2) The evaluation must include development of specific performance
measures relating to the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency,
which may include measures relating to data collection necessary for
future analysis consistent with the purposes of this section.
(3) By September 1st of each even-numbered year, the commission
shall, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, provide the office of financial
management and appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives with an analysis of the commission's progress in
achieving the performance measures during the current biennium and
performance measures for the next biennium that are informed by, and
build on, the commission's previous efforts under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 (1) In developing the performance measures
required by section 303 of this act that are due by September 1, 2014,
the state parks and recreation commission shall produce and consider
the following:
(a) An inventory of land and facilities owned and managed by state
parks and a process to upgrade the inventory to one capable of
describing primary land and facility uses;
(b) An evaluation of the lands and facilities identified under (a)
of this subsection for lands and facilities surplus to state park needs
and actions taken or planned to dispose of or more advantageously
position these assets;
(c) Current annual visitation categorized by state park and a
process to upgrade the system for collecting parks visitation data to
better understand existing and potential markets for park services;
(d) A process to systematically assess and prioritize the state
parks and recreation commission's capital needs, including a financial
analysis;
(e) An inventory of and progress developing ongoing partnerships
with entities including the state parks foundation, state park friends
groups, and other appropriate public and nonprofit entities;
(f) An inventory of existing enterprise activities and agreements
at state parks, including those relating to product sales, concessions,
sponsorships, and advertising, and a process for identifying and
evaluating additional potential enterprise opportunities for generating
revenue or cost savings;
(g) A summary of actions taken and planned for application of lean
management philosophies and tools throughout the agency; and
(h) A summary of actions taken and planned towards continued
development of a sustained, strategic approach to marketing state
parks.
(2) The information to be produced and considered under subsection
(1) of this section must be provided to the office of financial
management and appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives, concurrently with the performance measures required
under section 303 of this act, by September 1, 2014.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 Sections 301 and 302 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---