BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop and make available resources for
pregnant women regarding recommended childhood immunizations. The
resources are intended to be provided to pregnant women by their health
care providers to encourage discussion on childhood immunizations and
postnatal care and must incorporate information about flexible
approaches to vaccinations that reflect the perspective of the family
and the impact on the individual child.

--- END ---