BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop and make available educational
resources for pregnant women regarding prenatal nutrition best
practices to promote infant health. The educational resources may
include, but are not limited to, courses delivered in-person or
electronically and pamphlets printed on paper or made available on the
department's web site. The educational resources are intended to
provide pregnant women knowledge of healthy foods and essential daily
nutrients needed to promote infant growth and development.

--- END ---