BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the labor
management reporting and disclosure act, passed by the United States
congress in 1959, serves as an important protection of the rights of
private sector union members by requiring labor organizations to
publicly report information related to union finances, membership,
leadership, and governance. The legislature finds that Washington
public employees who are members of a labor organization lack the same
rights to disclosure from their union as their private sector
counterparts.
The legislature intends for increased transparency and financial
disclosure to provide public sector workers with more complete, timely,
and comprehensible information about their union's financial practices,
investments, solvency, and expenditures to empower them to protect
their personal financial interests and exercise their democratic rights
of self-governance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each employee organization must file with the commission a
report signed by its president and secretary or corresponding principal
officers, and the report must contain the following information:
(a) The name of the employee organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers; and
(c) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the employee
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transactions of the employee organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and agents;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members, including the
grounds for such actions and any provision made for notice, hearing,
judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(2) Any change in the information required by subsection (1) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
employee organization files with the commission the annual financial
report required in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Each employee organization representing one hundred or more
employees must annually, not more than ninety days after the end of its
fiscal year, file with the commission a financial report signed by its
president or treasurer or corresponding principal officers containing
the following information in such detail as may be necessary to
accurately disclose its financial condition and operations for its
preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Receipts of any kind and the sources thereof;
(c) Salary, allowances, and other direct or indirect disbursements
including reimbursed expenses, to each officer and also to each
employee who, during such fiscal year, received more than ten thousand
dollars in the aggregate from such labor organization and any other
labor organization affiliated with it or with which it is affiliated,
or which is affiliated with the same national or international labor
organization;
(d) Direct and indirect loans made to any officer, employee, or
member, which aggregated more than two hundred fifty dollars during the
fiscal year, together with a statement of the purpose, security, if
any, and arrangements for repayment;
(e) Direct and indirect loans to any business enterprise, together
with a statement of the purpose, security, if any, and arrangements for
repayment; and
(f) Other disbursements made by it including the purposes thereof,
all in such categories as the commission may prescribe.
(4) The commission has rule-making authority to ensure that the
reports required under subsections (1) and (3) of this section are
consistent with the reporting requirements established by the labor
management reporting and disclosure act of 1959 and the regulations
adopted under that act.
(5) The employee organization must make copies of reports or other
documents filed under subsections (1) and (3) of this section available
to every employee in the bargaining unit, and must annually notify
every employee in the bargaining unit that the reports are available on
the web site maintained by the commission.
(6) The commission shall preserve the statements or reports filed
under subsections (1) and (3) of this section for a minimum of ten
years. The contents of the reports and documents filed with the
commission under subsections (1) and (3) of this section are public
information and must be made available to the public in the following
manner: By ninety days after the effective date of this section, the
commission shall operate a web site or contract for the operation of a
web site that allows public access to reports, copies of reports, or
copies of data and information submitted in reports, filed with the
commission under subsections (1) and (3) of this section.
(7) The commission may determine whether a violation of this
section has occurred. The commission may issue and enforce an order
subject to the following:
(a) If the commission finds that an employee organization has
violated this section by failing or refusing to prepare the reports as
required in subsections (1) and (3) of this section or by preparing an
incomplete or inaccurate report, the commission shall issue an order
compelling compliance and assess a fifty dollar fine for each day each
report is overdue.
(b) The commission may make determinations and issue and enforce
orders at its own discretion or as a response to a petition filed by
the employer, any employee in the bargaining unit, or any member of the
general public. The commission may refer matters of compliance to the
state attorney general or other enforcement agency.
(8) Any person who willfully violates this section must be fined an
amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars.
(9) Any person who knowingly makes a false statement or
representation of a material fact or who knowingly fails to disclose a
material fact, in any document, report, or other information required
under this section must be fined an amount not exceeding ten thousand
dollars.
(10) Any person who willfully makes a false entry in or willfully
conceals, withholds, or destroys any books, records, reports, or
statements required to be kept by this section must be fined not more
than ten thousand dollars.
(11) Each individual required to sign reports under subsections (1)
and (3) of this section is personally responsible for the filing of
those reports and for any false statement that the individual knows is
false contained in the reports.
(12) An employee organization may satisfy the reporting
requirements under subsections (1) and (3) of this section by filing
with the commission copies of the reports required to be filed with the
United States department of labor under the labor management reporting
and disclosure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to ferry employee organizations under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The requirements applicable to employee organizations under section
2 of this act apply to bargaining representatives under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.76 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 49.39 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to bargaining representatives under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---