BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bicycle" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.04.071.
(2) "Bicycle operator identification number" means a unique number
identifying the operator of a bicycle that must be displayed by the
operator when using a bicycle on any public street, road, highway,
trail, sidewalk, or other recreation facility. The number must be at
least six inches in height and be comprised of a material that has
reflective properties such that it is visible in both day and nighttime
operating conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person age eighteen or older that
operates a bicycle in the state must have and display a current bicycle
operator identification number when operating a bicycle. Exceptions to
this requirement may be made by the department for races or other
events where the display of the operator identification number would
interfere with identification for race or event purposes.
(2) A bicycle owner must apply for an original bicycle operator
identification number to the department, county auditor or other agent,
or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished by the
department. The application must contain:
(a) The name and residence address of the applicant;
(b) Any other information that the department may require.
(3) The applicant must sign the application for an original bicycle
operator identification number. The application for an original
bicycle operator identification number must be accompanied by a fee of
twenty dollars. The fee must be deposited into the bicycle safety and
education account created in section 4 of this act.
(4) The annual bicycle identification number is valid for one year
and may be renewed each subsequent year.
(5) The department must issue an original or renewal bicycle
operator identification number upon receipt of:
(a) A properly completed application for an original bicycle
operator identification number; and
(b) The payment of twenty dollars that is due at the time of
application.
(6) The bicycle operator identification number must be displayed on
the bicycle operator at all times during the operation of a bicycle in
this state. A bicycle operator must display the identification number
in a manner that makes the entire identification number visible as
directed by the department.
(7) Any operator of a bicycle, whose primary residence address is
outside of the state, when operating a bicycle in this state, must
comply with this chapter. The out-of-state operator must obtain a
bicycle operator identification number.
(8) The department may adopt rules to implement the bicycle
operator identification number program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Failure to operate a bicycle in
compliance with section 2 of this act is a traffic infraction with a
penalty of twenty dollars for the first offense. The court may dismiss
the infraction or reduce the penalty if the person provides sufficient
proof that the person has obtained a valid bicycle operator
identification number.
(2) The penalty for a second infraction is thirty dollars.
(3) The penalty for a third infraction is forty dollars.
(4) The penalty for a fourth or subsequent infraction is equal to
the penalty prescribed for other traffic infractions as provided in the
penalty schedule adopted pursuant to RCW 46.63.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The bicycle safety and education account is
created in the multimodal transportation account. All receipts from
bicycle operator identification numbers collected pursuant to section
2 of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for grants administered by the department of
transportation in the following manner: (1) Seventy-five percent to
support the construction, preservation, and maintenance of bicycle
lanes and other bicycle-related capital facilities; and (2) twenty-five
percent to bicycle safety-related education programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2016.

--- END ---