BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.093 and 1997 c 231 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When conducting a review of the necessity and appropriateness
of emergency services or making a benefit determination for emergency
services:
(a) A health carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to
screen and stabilize a covered person if a prudent layperson acting
reasonably would have believed that an emergency medical condition
existed. In addition, a health carrier shall not require prior
authorization of such services ((provided prior to the point of
stabilization if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would have
believed that an emergency medical condition existed)). With respect
to care obtained from a nonparticipating hospital emergency department,
a health carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to screen and
stabilize a covered person if a prudent layperson would have reasonably
believed that use of a participating hospital emergency department
would result in a delay that would worsen the emergency, or if a
provision of federal, state, or local law requires the use of a
specific provider or facility, on the same basis that coverage would
apply for a participating hospital emergency department. In addition,
a health carrier shall not require prior authorization of such services
((provided prior to the point of stabilization if a prudent layperson
acting reasonably would have believed that an emergency medical
condition existed and that use of a participating hospital emergency
department would result in a delay that would worsen the emergency.
(b) If an authorized representative of a health carrier authorizes
coverage of emergency services, the health carrier shall not
subsequently retract its authorization after the emergency services
have been provided, or reduce payment for an item or service furnished
in reliance on approval, unless the approval was based on a material
misrepresentation about the covered person's health condition made by
the provider of emergency services)).
(((c))) (b) Coverage of emergency services may be subject to
applicable copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles((, and a health
carrier may impose reasonable differential cost-sharing arrangements
for emergency services rendered by nonparticipating providers, if such
differential between cost-sharing amounts applied to emergency services
rendered by participating provider versus nonparticipating provider
does not exceed fifty dollars)). Differential cost sharing for
emergency services rendered by a nonparticipating provider may not be
applied ((when a covered person presents to a nonparticipating hospital
emergency department rather than a participating hospital emergency
department when the health carrier requires preauthorization for
postevaluation or poststabilization emergency services if:
(i) Due to circumstances beyond the covered person's control, the
covered person was unable to go to a participating hospital emergency
department in a timely fashion without serious impairment to the
covered person's health; or
(ii) A prudent layperson possessing an average knowledge of health
and medicine would have reasonably believed that he or she would be
unable to go to a participating hospital emergency department in a
timely fashion without serious impairment to the covered person's
health)).
(c) Providers may not balance a bill or attempt to recover excess
funds from the covered person beyond the cost sharing, coinsurance, or
deductible required in the health plan contract.
(d) If a health carrier requires preauthorization for
postevaluation or poststabilization services, the health carrier shall
provide access to an authorized representative twenty-four hours a day,
seven days a week, to facilitate review. In order for postevaluation
or poststabilization services to be covered by the health carrier, the
provider or facility must make a documented good faith effort to
contact the covered person's health carrier within thirty minutes of
stabilization, if the covered person needs to be stabilized. The
health carrier's authorized representative is required to respond to a
telephone request for preauthorization from a provider or facility
within thirty minutes. Failure of the health carrier to respond within
thirty minutes constitutes authorization for the provision of
immediately required medically necessary postevaluation and
poststabilization services, unless the health carrier documents that it
made a good faith effort but was unable to reach the provider or
facility within thirty minutes after receiving the request.
(e) A health carrier shall immediately arrange for an alternative
plan of treatment for the covered person if a nonparticipating
emergency provider and health plan cannot reach an agreement on which
services are necessary beyond those immediately necessary to stabilize
the covered person consistent with state and federal laws.
(2) Nothing in this section is to be construed as prohibiting the
health carrier from requiring notification within the time frame
specified in the contract for inpatient admission or as soon thereafter
as medically possible but no less than twenty-four hours. Nothing in
this section is to be construed as preventing the health carrier from
reserving the right to require transfer of a hospitalized covered
person upon stabilization. Follow-up care that is a direct result of
the emergency must be obtained in accordance with the health plan's
usual terms and conditions of coverage. All other terms and conditions
of coverage may be applied to emergency services.

--- END ---