BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.131 and 2011 c 349 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy
at any time before the close of business on the Monday following the
last day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with
the officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed
request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot. There shall
be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed during
special filing periods held under this title. No filing fee may be
refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of
the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not
refundable shall be given to each candidate at the time he or she
files.
(2) If an incumbent officeholder who has filed for reelection
pursuant to RCW 29A.24.050 later withdraws his or her candidacy
pursuant to this section, the last day for filing declarations of
candidacy for that office must be extended by an additional seventy-two
hours beyond the close of business on the Monday following the last day
for candidates to withdraw described in subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---