BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health plan may not impose a per visit cost sharing amount
that requires the covered person to pay more than fifty percent of the
amount the plan allows for coverage for the visit.
(2) A health carrier may not directly, indirectly through
contracted networks, or otherwise:
(a) Require a covered person to obtain prior authorization for
routine health care services for which a person may self refer;
(b) Require a health care provider to participate in one plan,
program, or health care arrangement as a condition for participating in
any of the carrier's other plans, programs, or arrangements.
Violations of this subsection include, but are not limited to,
requiring a provider who has agreed to furnish care to enrollees of a
health plan to also participate in a discount program for uninsured
health care services or to participate in a workers' compensation
program;
(c) Require a provider to provide a discount from usual and
customary rates for health care services not covered under a health
plan, policy, or other agreement, to which the provider is a party; or
(d) Terminate the network participation agreement or provider
agreement or impose penalties upon a provider based solely upon the
provider's efforts to enforce his or her rights or the rights of his or
her patient under this section.
(3) A carrier, whether directly or indirectly through subcontracted
networks, shall disclose:
(a) Its criteria and methods for establishing limits on access to
network providers, including, but not limited to, the carrier's method
used to determine that a network provider may provide care to a covered
person without prior authorization while imposing prior authorization
requirements on other network providers; and
(b) Its methods and clinical protocols for authorizing coverage of
health care services, including, but not limited to, the carrier's
method for determining initial visit limits for a particular health
care service.
(4)(a) A health care provider with whom a carrier consults
regarding a decision to deny, limit, or terminate a person's covered
health care services must hold a license, certification, or
registration, in good standing in Washington and must be actively
practicing in the same health field or specialty as the health care
provider being reviewed.
(b) If a covered person is being treated by more than one provider,
the review shall be completed by a provider who holds a license,
certification, or registration, in good standing in Washington and who
is actively practicing in the same health field or specialty as the
principal prescribing or diagnosing provider, unless otherwise agreed
to by the covered person and the carrier. This subsection (4)(b) does
not prohibit the carrier from providing additional reviews of other
categories of providers.

--- END ---