BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 2 of
this act. This performance statement is only intended to be used for
subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to
create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to provide tax relief for fire districts that have small budgets.
(3) The legislature's specific public policy goal is to reduce the
cost of purchasing necessary vehicles for low revenue fire districts
that meet the criteria in section 2(2) of this act.
(4) The department of licensing must provide the data necessary to
perform a review to the joint legislative audit and review committee
during the year in which the review will be conducted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of vehicles, by a qualified fire district, that are necessary to
perform the duties and mission of the fire district.
(2) A "qualified fire district" means a fire district that meets
the following criteria:
(a) The fire district must be publicly owned; and
(b) The fire district must have an annual budget that receives less
than one thousand dollars per square mile served.
(3) The county assessor of the qualified fire district's county
must provide certification of the agencies qualifying criteria in
subsection (2) of this section at the time of registration of the
vehicle.
(4) The one thousand dollar threshold in subsection (2)(b) of this
section must be annually adjusted by the consumer price index for all
urban consumers, all items, for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton
metropolitan area as calculated by the United States bureau of labor
statistics. The department must make this calculation using the year-over-year change in the consumer price index each October. The
department must notify the counties of the new dollar threshold by
December 31st of each year for adjustments for the following calendar
year.

--- END ---