BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Article II, section 25 of the state Constitution generally
prohibits granting extra compensation to a public officer or employee
after services have been rendered; and
(b) Article VIII, sections 5 and 7 of the state Constitution
generally prohibit state agencies and local governments from making a
gift of public funds.
(2) The legislature further finds that these provisions bar state
agencies and local governments from paying an employee a bonus after
services have been rendered unless the bonus is paid pursuant to a
preexisting policy or contract authorizing a bonus as an incentive for
performing services exceeding normal job expectations.
(3) The legislature further finds that while chapter 41.60 RCW
authorizes payment of limited bonuses to state employees for
suggestions reducing costs or generating additional revenue, or for
outstanding achievements or service, safety performance, or longevity,
Washington lacks clear statutory standards for payment of bonuses to
local government employees.
(4) The legislature, therefore, intends to provide clear guidance
to local governments by enacting standards for payment of bonuses to
local government employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A local government may pay a nonelective officer or employee a
bonus for previously rendered services if, prior to the rendering of
services, the local government legislative authority adopted an
ordinance or executed a contract:
(a) Authorizing payment of a bonus as an incentive for performing
services exceeding normal expectations for the position;
(b) Setting clearly identified and measurable service performance
goals for which a bonus could be paid; and
(c) Specifying the maximum amount of a bonus that could be paid.
(2) Payment of any bonus must be authorized by the local government
legislative authority in a resolution adopted in an open public
meeting, recorded in minutes, specifically describing the employee
receiving the bonus, the service performance goal for which the bonus
is paid, and the amount of the bonus.
(3) Nothing in this section supersedes any contract executed prior
to the effective date of this section.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Bonus" means any monetary sum not included in regular
compensation or in termination or pension benefits; and
(b) "Local government" means any county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district.

--- END ---