BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.30.040 and 2007 c 431 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An aggrieved party has the right to file a complaint with the
attorney general alleging a violation of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(2) Upon receiving a complaint under this chapter, the attorney
general must:
(a) Inform the complainant of any notification requirements under
RCW 59.20.080 for tenant violations or RCW 59.20.200 for landlord
violations and encourage the complainant to appropriately notify the
respondent of the complaint; and
(b) If a statutory time period is applicable, inform the
complainant of the time frame that the respondent has to remedy the
complaint under RCW 59.20.080 for tenant violations or RCW 59.20.200
for landlord violations.
(3) After receiving a complaint under this chapter, the attorney
general shall initiate the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution
program by investigating the alleged violations at its discretion and,
if appropriate, facilitating negotiations between the complainant and
the respondent.
(4)(a) Complainants and respondents shall cooperate with the
attorney general in the course of an investigation by (i) responding to
subpoenas issued by the attorney general, which may consist of
providing access to papers or other documents, and (ii) providing
access to the manufactured/mobile home facilities relevant to the
investigation. Complainants and respondents must respond to attorney
general subpoenas within thirty days.
(b) Failure to cooperate with the attorney general in the course of
an investigation is a violation of this chapter.
(5) If after an investigation the attorney general determines that
an agreement cannot be negotiated between the parties, the attorney
general shall make a written determination on whether a violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW has occurred.
(a) If the attorney general finds by a written determination that
a violation of chapter 59.20 RCW has occurred, the attorney general
shall deliver a written notice of violation to the respondent who
committed the violation by certified mail. The notice of violation
must specify the violation, the corrective action required, the time
within which the corrective action must be taken, the penalties
including fines, other penalties, and actions that will result if
corrective action is not taken within the specified time period, and
the process for contesting the determination, fines, penalties, and
other actions included in the notice of violation through an
administrative hearing. The attorney general must deliver to the
complainant a copy of the notice of violation by certified mail.
(b) If the attorney general finds by a written determination that
a violation of chapter 59.20 RCW has not occurred, the attorney general
shall deliver a written notice of nonviolation to both the complainant
and the respondent by certified mail. The notice of nonviolation must
include the process for contesting the determination included in the
notice of nonviolation through an administrative hearing.
(6) Corrective action must take place within fifteen business days
of the respondent's receipt of a notice of violation, except as
required otherwise by the attorney general, unless the respondent has
submitted a timely request for an administrative hearing to contest the
notice of violation as required under subsection (8) of this section.
If a respondent, which includes either a landlord or a tenant, fails to
take corrective action within the required time period and the attorney
general has not received a timely request for an administrative
hearing, the attorney general may impose a fine, up to a maximum of two
hundred fifty dollars per violation per day, for each day that a
violation remains uncorrected. The attorney general must consider the
severity and duration of the violation and the violation's impact on
other community residents when determining the appropriate amount of a
fine or the appropriate penalty to impose on a respondent. If the
respondent shows upon timely application to the attorney general that
a good faith effort to comply with the corrective action requirements
of the notice of violation has been made and that the corrective action
has not been completed because of mitigating factors beyond the
respondent's control, the attorney general may delay the imposition of
a fine or penalty.
(7) The attorney general may issue an order requiring the
respondent, or its assignee or agent, to cease and desist from an
unlawful practice and take affirmative actions that in the judgment of
the attorney general will carry out the purposes of this chapter. The
affirmative actions may include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Refunds of rent increases, improper fees, charges, and
assessments collected in violation of this chapter;
(b) Filing and utilization of documents that correct a statutory or
rule violation; and
(c) Reasonable action necessary to correct a statutory or rule
violation.
(8) A complainant or respondent may request an administrative
hearing before an administrative law judge under chapter 34.05 RCW to
contest:
(a) A notice of violation issued under subsection (5)(a) of this
section or a notice of nonviolation issued under subsection (5)(b) of
this section;
(b) A fine or other penalty imposed under subsection (6) of this
section; or
(c) An order to cease and desist or an order to take affirmative
actions under subsection (7) of this section.
The complainant or respondent must request an administrative
hearing within fifteen business days of receipt of a notice of
violation, notice of nonviolation, fine, other penalty, order, or
action. If an administrative hearing is not requested within this time
period, the notice of violation, notice of nonviolation, fine, other
penalty, order, or action constitutes a final order of the attorney
general and is not subject to review by any court or agency.
(9) ((If an administrative hearing is initiated, the respondent and
complainant shall each bear the cost of his or her own legal expenses.
(10))) The administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12
RCW shall:
(a) Hear and receive pertinent evidence and testimony;
(b) Decide whether the evidence supports the attorney general
finding by a preponderance of the evidence; and
(c) Enter an appropriate order within thirty days after the close
of the hearing and immediately mail copies of the order to the affected
parties.
The order of the administrative law judge constitutes the final
agency order of the attorney general and may be appealed to the
superior court under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(((11))) (10) When the attorney general imposes a fine, refund, or
other penalty against a respondent, the respondent may not seek any
recovery or reimbursement of the fine, refund, or other penalty from a
complainant or from other manufactured/mobile home tenants.
(((12))) (11) All receipts from the imposition of fines or other
penalties collected under this section other than those due to a
complainant must be deposited into the manufactured/mobile home dispute
resolution program account created in RCW 59.30.070.
(((13))) (12) This section is not exclusive and does not limit the
right of landlords or tenants to take legal action against another
party as provided in chapter 59.20 RCW or otherwise. Exhaustion of the
administrative remedy provided in this chapter is not required before
a landlord or tenants may bring a legal action. This section does not
apply to unlawful detainer actions initiated under RCW 59.20.080 prior
to the filing and service of an unlawful detainer court action;
however, a tenant is not precluded from seeking relief under this
chapter if the complaint claims the notice of termination violates RCW
59.20.080 prior to the filing and service of an unlawful detainer
action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.30 RCW
to read as follows:
In any administrative or judicial review of any notice of violation
issued by the attorney general under RCW 59.30.040, the prevailing
party is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

--- END ---