BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is prohibited for a governmental entity to destroy
biological material collected or work product generated by law
enforcement, during or in connection with a criminal investigation or
case relating to a felony offense. The governmental entity in
possession of the biological material has discretion to determine how
the biological material or work product is retained pursuant to this
section, provided that the biological material or work product
collected by law enforcement is retained in a condition suitable for
deoxyribonucleic acid testing.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Biological material" means the contents of a sexual assault
examination kit or any blood, semen, hair, saliva, skin tissue,
fingerprints, or any other identifiable human biological material or
physical evidence that may reasonably be used to incriminate or
exculpate any person in a felony criminal investigation, whether that
material is catalogued separately on a slide or swab, in a test tube,
or some other similar method, or is present on any item of evidence,
including those that are alleged to have been touched or worn by the
perpetrator of the felony offense; and
(b) "Governmental entity" means any general law enforcement agency
or any person or organization acting on behalf of the state or any
political subdivision of the state, involved in the collection,
examination, tracking, packaging, storing, or disposition of biological
material collected in connection with a criminal investigation relating
to a felony offense.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes an evidence technician or
other person trained in handling biological material and acting on
behalf of a governmental entity from documenting the location of
biological material and then removing representative samples from large
items of evidence and retaining only the parts containing biological
material.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A work group on preservation of evidence
for criminal justice purposes is established to study and make
recommendations relating to establishing statewide standards for
preserving biological material in felony cases in Washington state.
(2) The work group shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's
designee;
(d) The executive director of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs or the executive director's designee;
(e) One member representing the superior court judges' association;
(f) One member representing the district and municipal court
judges' association;
(g) One member representing the Washington state association of
counties;
(h) One member representing the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(i) One member representing the Washington defender's association
or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;
(j) One member representing the Washington state association of
cities; and
(k) One member representing the Washington association of county
officials;
(l) One member representing the Washington state forensic
investigations council; and
(m) Two members, appointed by the governor, who represent the
community from the innocence network in Washington state.
(3) Members of the work group shall select a chair.
(4) At a minimum, the work group shall research, review, and make
recommendations on whether to:
(a) Preserve all items of biological material relating to felony
offenses;
(b) Ensure biological material is not lost, destroyed, or
contaminated;
(c) Determine consistent specified time periods that biological
material be retained and secured in connection with a felony criminal
investigation;
(d) Develop a model policy for the collection, tracking, packaging,
storing, and disposition of biological material, including the length
of time biological material should be retained by a governmental
entity; and
(e) Develop a statewide policy that provides clear direction for
the disposal of recovered property from misdemeanor criminal
investigations when storage of evidence is an issue for felony criminal
investigations.
(5) The work group shall compile its findings and recommendations
for the retention and disposition of biological material into a final
report and provide its report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and governor by December 1, 2014.
(6) The work group shall function within existing resources and no
specific budget may be provided to complete the report. The
participants are encouraged to donate their time to offset any costs.
(7) This section expires January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2014.

--- END ---