BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.04.023 and 1997 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A less than countywide port district with an assessed valuation of
at least one hundred fifty million dollars may be created: (1) In a
county that already has a less than countywide port district located
within its boundaries; or (2) under the provisions of section 2 of this
act. Except as provided in this section, such a port district shall be
created in accordance with the procedure to create a countywide port
district.
The effort to create such a port district is initiated by the
filing of a petition with the county auditor calling for the creation
of such a port district, describing the boundaries of the proposed port
district, designating either three or five commissioner positions,
describing commissioner districts if the petitioners propose that the
commissioners represent districts, and providing a name for the
proposed port district. The petition must be signed by voters residing
within the proposed port district equal in number to at least ten
percent of such voters who voted at the last county general election.
A public hearing on creation of the proposed port district shall be
held by the county legislative authority if the county auditor
certifies that the petition contained sufficient valid signatures.
Notice of the public hearing must be published in the county's official
newspaper at least ten days prior to the date of the public hearing.
After taking testimony, the county legislative authority may make
changes in the boundaries of the proposed port district if it finds
that such changes are in the public interest and shall determine if the
creation of the port district is in the public interest. No area may
be added to the boundaries unless a subsequent public hearing is held
on the proposed port district.
The county legislative authority shall submit a ballot proposition
authorizing the creation of the proposed port district to the voters of
the proposed port district, at any special election date provided in
RCW ((29.13.020)) 29A.04.330, if it finds the creation of the port
district to be in the public interest.
The port district shall be created if a majority of the voters
voting on the ballot proposition favor the creation of the port
district. The initial port commissioners shall be elected at the same
election, from districts or at large, as provided in the petition
initiating the creation of the port district. The election shall be
otherwise conducted as provided in RCW 53.12.172, but the election of
commissioners shall be null and void if the port district is not
created.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Prior to December 31, 2020, a port district
comprising territory less than the entire county may be created in a
county with no port district. In the creation of such a port district,
the initial port commissioners may be elected at the next general
election after approval of the ballot proposition submitted to the
voters authorizing the creation of a port district. In the creation of
a less than countywide port district, all procedures outlined in RCW
53.04.023 must be followed, except the requirement to elect
commissioners at the same election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act expires December 31,
2020.

--- END ---