BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.495 and 1997 c 321 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license to be designated as a nonprofit arts
organization license. This shall be a special license to be issued to
any nonprofit arts organization which sponsors and presents productions
or performances of an artistic or cultural nature in a specific theater
or other appropriate designated indoor premises approved by the board.
The license shall permit the licensee to sell liquor to patrons of
productions or performances for consumption on the premises at these
events. The fee for the license shall be two hundred fifty dollars per
annum.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "nonprofit arts
organization" means an organization which is organized and operated for
the purpose of providing artistic or cultural exhibitions,
presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs,
as defined in subsection (3) of this section, for viewing or attendance
by the general public. The organization must be a not-for-profit
corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and managed by a governing board of
not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the
organization or by a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In
addition, the corporation must satisfy the following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the license is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The proceeds derived from sales of liquor, except for
reasonable operating costs, must be used in furtherance of the purposes
of the organization;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The liquor control board shall have access to its books in
order to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a license.
(3) The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances or cultural or art education programs" includes and is
limited to:
(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of
cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed
in art or history museums;
(b) A live or recorded musical, nonmusical, comedic, or dramatic
performance or series of performances; or
(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs,
offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic,
cultural, or historical subject.

--- END ---