BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.010 and 2011 c 189 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable to an owner by an
association in accordance with RCW 64.38.020.
(2) "Baseline funding plan" means establishing a reserve funding
goal of maintaining a reserve account balance above zero dollars
throughout the thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.38.065.
(3) "Board of directors" or "board" means the body, regardless of
name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.
(4) "Common areas" means property owned, or otherwise maintained,
repaired or administered by the association.
(5) "Common expense" means the costs incurred by the association to
exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter.
(6) "Contribution rate" means, in a reserve study as described in
RCW ((64.34.380)) 64.38.065, the amount contributed to the reserve
account so that the association will have cash reserves to pay major
maintenance, repair, or replacement costs without the need of a special
assessment.
(7) "Effective age" means the difference between the estimated
useful life and remaining useful life.
(8) "Full funding plan" means setting a reserve funding goal of
achieving one hundred percent fully funded reserves by the end of the
thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.38.065, in which the
reserve account balance equals the sum of the deteriorated portion of
all reserve components.
(9) "Fully funded balance" means the current value of the
deteriorated portion, not the total replacement value, of all the
reserve components. The fully funded balance for each reserve
component is calculated by multiplying the current replacement cost of
the reserve component by its effective age, then dividing the result by
the reserve component's useful life. The sum total of all reserve
components' fully funded balances is the association's fully funded
balance.
(10) "Governing documents" means the articles of incorporation,
bylaws, plat, declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions,
rules and regulations of the association, or other written instrument
by which the association has the authority to exercise any of the
powers provided for in this chapter or to manage, maintain, or
otherwise affect the property under its jurisdiction.
(11) "Homeowners' association" or "association" means a
corporation, unincorporated association, or other legal entity, each
member of which is an owner of residential real property located within
the association's jurisdiction, as described in the governing
documents, and by virtue of membership or ownership of property is
obligated to pay real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance
costs, or for improvement of real property other than that which is
owned by the member. "Homeowners' association" does not mean an
association created under chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW.
(12) "Lot" means a physical portion of the real property located
within an association's jurisdiction designated for separate ownership.
(13) "Owner" means the owner of a lot, but does not include a
person who has an interest in a lot solely as security for an
obligation. "Owner" also means the vendee, not the vendor, of a lot
under a real estate contract.
(14) "Remaining useful life" means the estimated time, in years,
before a reserve component will require major maintenance, repair, or
replacement to perform its intended function.
(15) "Replacement cost" means the current cost of replacing,
repairing, or restoring a reserve component to its original functional
condition.
(16) "Reserve component" means a common element whose cost of
maintenance, repair, or replacement is infrequent, significant, and
impractical to include in an annual budget.
(17) "Reserve study professional" means an independent person who
is suitably qualified by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or
education to prepare a reserve study in accordance with RCW ((64.34.380
and 64.34.382)) 64.38.065 and 64.38.070.
(18) "Residential real property" means any real property, the use
of which is limited by law, covenant or otherwise to primarily
residential or recreational purposes. However, a marina slip that is
incorporated as its own community association, such as, but not limited
to, a separate condominium association, is not considered "residential
real property" for the purposes of this chapter.
(19) "Significant assets" means that the current replacement value
of the major reserve components is seventy-five percent or more of the
gross budget of the association, excluding the association's reserve
account funds.
(20) "Useful life" means the estimated time, between years, that
major maintenance, repair, or replacement is estimated to occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies both retroactively and
prospectively.

--- END ---