BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.50.770 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) "Employee" as used in this section and RCW 41.50.780 includes
all full-time, part-time, and career seasonal employees of the state,
a county, a municipality, or other political subdivision of the state,
whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of the government, including full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; justices of the
supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and of the superior
and district courts; and members of the state legislature or of the
legislative authority of any county, city, or town.
(2) The state, through the department, and any county,
municipality, or other political subdivision of the state acting
through its principal supervising official or governing body is
authorized to contract with an employee to defer a portion of that
employee's income, which deferred portion shall in no event exceed the
amount allowable under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 457, and deposit or invest such
deferred portion in a credit union, savings and loan association, bank,
or mutual savings bank or purchase life insurance, shares of an
investment company, individual securities, or fixed and/or variable
annuity contracts from any insurance company or any investment company
licensed to contract business in this state.
(3) Employees participating in the state deferred compensation plan
administered by the department shall self-direct the investment of the
deferred portion of their income through the selection of investment
options as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The department can provide such plans as it deems are in the
interests of state employees. In addition to the types of investments
described in this section, the state investment board, with respect to
the state deferred compensation plan, shall invest the deferred portion
of an employee's income, without limitation as to amount, in accordance
with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and 41.50.780, and pursuant to
investment policy established by the state investment board for the
state deferred compensation plans. The state investment board, after
consultation with the director regarding any recommendations made
pursuant to RCW 41.50.088(2), shall provide a set of options for
participants to choose from for investment of the deferred portion of
their income. Any income deferred under such a plan shall continue to
be included as regular compensation, for the purpose of computing the
state or local retirement and pension benefits earned by any employee.
(5) Coverage of an employee under a deferred compensation plan
under this section shall not render such employee ineligible for
simultaneous membership and participation in any pension system for
public employees.

--- END ---