BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the state
employment disability parity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that:
(1) People with disabilities occur at seven percent of the state
population;
(2) People with disabilities suffer significantly higher rates of
unemployment and underemployment than the general population;
(3) State government has no means of developing or priority hiring
for people with disabilities comparable to schedule A in the federal
civil service system;
(4) State government human resource managers do not coordinate with
the department of social and health services division of vocational
rehabilitation in matters of disability employment opportunities; and
(5) Representation of people with disabilities in the state
workforce has been declining in recent years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By January 31st of each year, every
state agency employing thirty people or more shall submit a report to
the department of personnel. Copies must be sent to the director of
the division of vocational rehabilitation and the governor's committee
on disability issues and employment.
(2) The report must contain the following elements:
(a) Number of employees as of January 1st and December 31st of that
year;
(b) Number of employees who would be classified priority 1 disabled
by the division of vocational rehabilitation as of January 1st and
December 31st of that year;
(c) Number of employees that separated from the state agency;
(d) Number of employees that were hired by the state agency;
(e) Number of employees that were hired from a division of
vocational rehabilitation program;
(f) Planned hires for the coming year;
(g) Opportunities to design an entry-level position for a division
of vocational rehabilitation client placement;
(h) Opportunities for nonpaid or paid internships for a division of
vocational rehabilitation client placement leading to an entry-level
position placement upon successful completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By January 31st of each year the
division of vocational rehabilitation shall submit a report to the
department of personnel. A copy must be sent to the governor's
committee on disabilities issues and employment.
(2) This report must contain the following elements:
(a) Number of clients that obtained jobs in the private sector;
(b) Number of clients that obtained jobs in state government;
(c) Number of clients that obtained jobs for each major state
agency; and
(d) Local government job placements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) New hires by all state agencies must
equal five percent of all placements by the division of vocational
rehabilitation.
(2) Agencies that show no good faith efforts to hire division of
vocational rehabilitation clients must have their budgets cut by five
percent the following year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 71A RCW.

--- END ---