BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in RCW 84.14.040
and 84.14.060. This performance statement is only intended to be used
for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to
create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended
to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers, as indicated in RCW
82.32.808(2)(a).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
stimulate the construction of new multifamily housing in urban growth
areas located in unincorporated areas of rural counties where housing
options, including affordable housing options, are severely limited.
It is the legislature's intent to provide the value of new housing
construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements qualifying
under chapter 84.14 RCW an exemption from ad valorem property taxation
for eight to twelve years, as provided for in RCW 84.14.020, in order
to provide incentives to developers to construct new multifamily
housing thereby increasing the number of affordable housing units for
low to moderate-income residents in certain rural counties.
(3) If a review finds that at least twenty percent of the new
housing is developed and occupied by households making at or below
eighty percent of the area median income, at the time of occupancy,
adjusted for family size for the county where the project is located or
where the housing is intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the
household may earn up to one hundred fifteen percent of the area median
income, at the time of sale, adjusted for family size for the county
where the project is located, then the legislature intends to extend
the expiration date of the tax preference.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee may refer to data provided by counties in which beneficiaries
are utilizing the preference, the office of financial management, the
department of commerce, the United States department of housing and
urban development, and other data sources as needed by the joint
legislative audit and review committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.14.007 and 2012 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the purpose of this chapter to encourage increased
residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities,
in cities that are required to plan or choose to plan under the growth
management act within urban centers where the governing authority of
the affected city has found there is insufficient housing
opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities. It is
further the purpose of this chapter to stimulate the construction of
new multifamily housing and the rehabilitation of existing vacant and
underutilized buildings for multifamily housing in urban centers having
insufficient housing opportunities that will increase and improve
residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities,
within these urban centers. To achieve these purposes, this chapter
provides for special valuations in residentially deficient urban
centers for eligible improvements associated with multiunit housing,
which includes affordable housing. It is an additional purpose of this
chapter to allow unincorporated areas of rural counties that are within
urban growth areas to stimulate housing opportunities and for certain
counties to stimulate housing opportunities near college campuses to
promote dense, transit-oriented, walkable college communities.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.14.010 and 2012 c 194 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
by a person or household whose monthly housing costs, including
utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the
household's monthly income. For the purposes of housing intended for
owner occupancy, "affordable housing" means residential housing that is
within the means of low or moderate-income households.
(2) "Campus facilities master plan" means the area that is defined
by the University of Washington as necessary for the future growth and
development of its campus facilities for branch campuses authorized
under RCW 28B.45.020.
(3) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at
least fifteen thousand, (b) the largest city or town, if there is no
city or town with a population of at least fifteen thousand, located in
a county planning under the growth management act, or (c) a city or
town with a population of at least five thousand located in a county
subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) "County" means a county with an unincorporated population of at
least three hundred fifty thousand.
(5) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a city or a county having jurisdiction over the property for which an
exemption may be applied for under this chapter.
(6) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(7) "High cost area" means a county where the third quarter median
house price for the previous year as reported by the Washington center
for real estate research at Washington State University is equal to or
greater than one hundred thirty percent of the statewide median house
price published during the same time period.
(8) "Household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together.
(9) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below
eighty percent of the median family income adjusted for family size,
for the county where the project is located, as reported by the United
States department of housing and urban development. For cities located
in high-cost areas, "low-income household" means a household that has
an income at or below one hundred percent of the median family income
adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is located.
(10) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than
eighty percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the
median family income adjusted for family size, for the county where the
project is located, as reported by the United States department of
housing and urban development. For cities located in high-cost areas,
"moderate-income household" means a household that has an income that
is more than one hundred percent, but at or below one hundred fifty
percent, of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the
county where the project is located.
(11) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more
dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not
including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from new
construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized,
or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(12) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(13) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis.
This includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for
a period of at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that
predominately offer rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(14) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made
to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building
codes or modification to existing occupied structures which increase
the number of multifamily housing units.
(15) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban
center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing
authority as a residential targeted area in accordance with this
chapter. With respect to designations after July 1, 2007, "residential
targeted area" may not include a campus facilities master plan.
(16) "Rural county" means a "rural county" as defined in RCW
82.14.370, which has only one incorporated city.
(17) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building
or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(((17))) (18) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district
where urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services.
An urban center must contain:
(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments
that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks,
restaurants, governmental agencies;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.14.040 and 2012 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following criteria must be met before an area may be
designated as a residential targeted area:
(a) The area must be within an urban center, as determined by the
governing authority;
(b) The area must lack, as determined by the governing authority,
sufficient available, desirable, and convenient residential housing,
including affordable housing, to meet the needs of the public who would
be likely to live in the urban center, if the affordable, desirable,
attractive, and livable places to live were available;
(c) The providing of additional housing opportunity, including
affordable housing, in the area, as determined by the governing
authority, will assist in achieving one or more of the stated purposes
of this chapter; and
(d) If the residential targeted area is designated by a county, the
area must be located in an unincorporated area of the county that is
within an urban growth area under RCW 36.70A.110 and the area must be:
(i) In a rural county that has a sewer system in the urban growth area;
or (ii) in a county that includes a campus of an institution of higher
education, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, where at least one thousand
two hundred students live on campus during the academic year.
(2) For the purpose of designating a residential targeted area or
areas, the governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to
so designate an area as generally described in the resolution. The
resolution must state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the
governing authority to consider the designation of the area and may
include such other information pertaining to the designation of the
area as the governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise
the public of the action intended.
(3) The governing authority must give notice of a hearing held
under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two
consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty days
before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation
in the city or county where the proposed residential targeted area is
located. The notice must state the time, date, place, and purpose of
the hearing and generally identify the area proposed to be designated
as a residential targeted area.
(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, the
governing authority may designate all or a portion of the area
described in the resolution of intent as a residential targeted area if
it finds, in its sole discretion, that the criteria in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section have been met.
(5) After designation of a residential targeted area, the governing
authority must adopt and implement standards and guidelines to be
utilized in considering applications and making the determinations
required under RCW 84.14.060. The standards and guidelines must
establish basic requirements for both new construction and
rehabilitation, which must include:
(a) Application process and procedures;
(b) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and
site utilization; and
(c) Building requirements that may include elements addressing
parking, height, density, environmental impact, and compatibility with
the existing surrounding property and such other amenities as will
attract and keep permanent residents and that will properly enhance the
livability of the residential targeted area in which they are to be
located.
(6) The governing authority may adopt and implement, either as
conditions to eight-year exemptions or as conditions to an extended
exemption period under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(B), or both, more
stringent income eligibility, rent, or sale price limits, including
limits that apply to a higher percentage of units, than the minimum
conditions for an extended exemption period under RCW
84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(B). For any multiunit housing located in an
unincorporated area of a county, a property owner seeking tax
incentives under this chapter must commit to renting or selling at
least twenty percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable
housing units to low and moderate-income households. In the case of
multiunit housing intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the minimum
requirement of this subsection (6) may be satisfied solely through
housing affordable to moderate-income households.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.14.060 and 2012 c 194 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the
city or county may approve the application if it finds that:
(a) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the
case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four
additional multifamily units are being developed;
(b) If applicable, the proposed multiunit housing project meets the
affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020;
(c) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion,
in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the
time the application is approved;
(d) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines
adopted by the city or county under this chapter; and
(e) The site is located in a residential targeted area of an urban
center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing
authority in accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW
84.14.040.
(2) An application may not be approved after July 1, 2007, if any
part of the proposed project site is within a campus facilities master
plan, except as provided in RCW 84.14.040(1)(d).

--- END ---