BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.150.010 and 2008 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Self-service storage facility" means any real property
designed and used for the purpose of renting or leasing individual
storage space to occupants who are to have access to the space for the
purpose of storing and removing personal property on a self-service
basis, but does not include a garage or other storage area in a private
residence. No occupant may use a self-service storage facility for
residential purposes.
(2) "Owner" means the owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a
self-service storage facility, his or her agent, or any other person
authorized by him or her to manage the facility, or to receive rent
from an occupant under a rental agreement.
(3) "Occupant" means a person, or his or her sublessee, successor,
or assign, who is entitled to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement, to the exclusion of
others.
(4) "Rental agreement" means any written agreement or lease which
establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, rules or any other
provision concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service storage
facility.
(5) "Personal property" means movable property not affixed to land,
and includes, but is not limited to, goods, merchandise, furniture, and
household items.
(6) "Last known address" means that address provided by the
occupant in the latest rental agreement, or the address provided by the
occupant in a subsequent written notice of a change of address.
(7) "Reasonable manner" means to dispose of personal property by
donation to a not-for-profit charitable organization, removal of the
personal property from the self-service storage facility by a trash
hauler or recycler, or any other method that in the discretion of the
owner is reasonable under the circumstances.
(8) "Commercially reasonable manner" means a public sale of the
personal property in the self-storage space. The personal property may
be sold in the owner's discretion on or off the self-service storage
facility site as a single lot or in parcels. If five or more bidders
are in attendance at a public sale of the personal property, the
proceeds received are deemed to be commercially reasonable.
(9) "Costs of the sale" means reasonable costs directly incurred by
the delivering or sending of notices, advertising, accessing,
inventorying, auctioning, conducting a public sale, removing, and
disposing of property stored in a self-service storage facility.
(10) "Late fee" means a fee or charge assessed by an owner of a
self-service storage facility as an estimate of any loss incurred by an
owner for an occupant's failure to pay rent when due. A late fee is
not a penalty, interest on a debt, nor is a late fee a reasonable
expense that the owner may incur in the course of collecting unpaid
rent in enforcing the owner's lien rights pursuant to RCW 19.150.020 or
enforcing any other remedy provided by statute or contract.
(11) "Verified mail" means any method of mailing that is offered by
the United States postal service that provides evidence of mailing.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.150.040 and 2007 c 113 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When any part of the rent or other charges due from an occupant
remains unpaid for fourteen consecutive days, an owner may terminate
the right of the occupant to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility by sending a preliminary lien notice to the
occupant's last known address, and to the alternative address specified
in RCW 19.150.120(2), by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or
electronic mail address, containing all of the following:
(((1))) (a) An itemized statement of the owner's claim showing the
sums due at the time of the notice and the date when the sums become
due.
(((2))) (b) A statement that the occupant's right to use the
storage space will terminate on a specified date (not less than
fourteen days after ((the mailing of)) the notice is sent) unless all
sums due and to become due by that date are paid by the occupant prior
to the specified date.
(((3))) (c) A notice that the occupant may be denied or continue to
be denied, as the case may be, access to the storage space after the
termination date if the sums are not paid, and that an owner's lien, as
provided for in RCW 19.150.020 may be imposed thereafter.
(((4))) (d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the
owner, or his or her designated agent, whom the occupant may contact to
respond to the notice.
(2) The owner may not send by electronic mail the notice required
under this section to the occupant's last known address or alternative
address unless:
(a) The occupant expressly agrees to notice by electronic mail;
(b) The rental agreement executed by the occupant specifies in bold
type that notices will be given to the occupant by electronic mail;
(c) The owner provides the occupant with the electronic mail
address from which notices will be sent and directs the occupant to
modify his or her e-mail settings to allow electronic mail from that
address to avoid any filtration systems; and
(d) The owner notifies the occupant of any change in the electronic
mail address from which notices will be sent prior to the address
change.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.150.060 and 2007 c 113 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a notice has been sent, as required by RCW 19.150.040, and
the total sum due has not been paid as of the date specified in the
preliminary lien notice, the lien proposed by this notice attaches as
of that date and the owner may deny an occupant access to the space,
enter the space, inventory the goods therein, and remove any property
found therein to a place of safe keeping. The owner ((shall then serve
by personal service or send to the occupant, addressed to the
occupant's last known address and to the alternative address specified
in RCW 19.150.120(2) by certified mail, postage prepaid,)) must provide
the occupant a notice of final lien sale or final notice of disposition
((which shall)) by personal service, verified mail, or electronic mail
to the occupant's last known address and alternative address or
electronic mail address. If the owner sends notice required under this
section to the occupant's last known electronic mail address and does
not receive a reply or receipt of delivery, the owner must send a
second notice to the occupant's last known postal address by verified
mail. The notice required under this section must state all of the
following:
(((1))) (a) That the occupant's right to use the storage space has
terminated and that the occupant no longer has access to the stored
property.
(((2))) (b) That the stored property is subject to a lien, and the
amount of the lien accrued and to accrue prior to the date required to
be specified in ((subsection (3))) (c) of this ((section)) subsection.
(((3))) (c) That all the property, other than personal papers and
personal photographs, may be sold to satisfy the lien after a specified
date which is not less than fourteen days from the last date of
((mailing)) sending of the final lien sale notice, or a minimum of
forty-two days after the date when any part of the rent or other
charges due from the occupants remain unpaid, whichever is later,
unless the amount of the lien is paid. The owner is not required to
sell the personal property within a maximum number of days of when the
rent or other charges first became due. If the total value of property
in the storage space is less than three hundred dollars, the owner may,
instead of sale, dispose of the property in any reasonable manner,
subject to the restrictions of RCW 19.150.080(4). After the sale or
other disposition pursuant to this section has been completed, the
owner shall provide an accounting of the disposition of the proceeds of
the sale or other disposition to the occupant at the occupant's last
known address and at the alternative address.
(((4))) (d) That any stored motor vehicles or boats may be towed or
removed from the self-service storage facility in lieu of sale pursuant
to section 4 of this act.
(e) That any excess proceeds of the sale or other disposition under
RCW 19.150.080(2) over the lien amount and reasonable costs of sale
will be retained by the owner and may be reclaimed by the occupant, or
claimed by another person, at any time for a period of six months from
the sale and that thereafter the proceeds will be turned over to the
state as abandoned property as provided in RCW 63.29.165.
(((5))) (f) That any personal papers and personal photographs will
be retained by the owner and may be reclaimed by the occupant at any
time for a period of six months from the sale or other disposition of
property and that thereafter the owner may dispose of the personal
papers and photographs in a reasonable manner, subject to the
restrictions of RCW 19.150.080(3).
(((6))) (g) That the occupant has no right to repurchase any
property sold at the lien sale.
(2) The owner may not send by electronic mail the notice required
under this section to the occupant's last known address or alternative
address unless:
(a) The occupant expressly agrees to notice by electronic mail;
(b) The rental agreement executed by the occupant specifies in bold
type that notices will be given to the occupant by electronic mail;
(c) The owner provides the occupant with the electronic mail
address from which notices will be sent and directs the occupant to
modify his or her e-mail settings to allow electronic mail from that
address to avoid any filtration systems; and
(d) The owner notifies the occupant of any change in the electronic
mail address from which notices will be sent prior to the address
change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.150 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an occupant is in default for sixty or more days and the
personal property stored in the leased space is a motor vehicle or
boat, the owner may have the personal property towed or removed from
the self–service storage facility in lieu of a sale. Prior to having
the vehicle towed, the owner must provide notice to the occupant
stating the name, address, and contact information of the towing
company.
(2) The owner is not liable for any damage to the personal property
towed or removed from the self–service storage facility once the
property is in the possession of a third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.150 RCW
to read as follows:
If a rental agreement specifies a limit on the value of personal
property that may be stored in an occupant's space, the limit shall be
deemed to be the maximum value of the stored personal property in the
occupant's space.

--- END ---