BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2015, each school district shall adopt a policy
and procedures that at a minimum incorporate the model policy and
procedures provided under subsection (2) of this section that require
a school that receives a report that a student was physically injured
on school property to notify the injured student's parents or
guardians. It is the responsibility of each school district to share
its policy on an annual basis with parents or guardians, students,
volunteers, and school employees.
(2) The Washington state school directors' association, with the
assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall convene an advisory group to develop a model policy and
procedures that require a school that receives a report that a student
was physically injured on school property to notify the injured
student's parents or guardians. The policy must address the following:
(a) What qualifies as acceptable forms of notification;
(b) The duration of time the school has to perform the notification
after receiving a report;
(c) Who at the school will perform the notification;
(d) At what point the obligation to notify has been satisfied by
the school;
(e) A definition of school property; and
(f) What qualifies as physical injury.
(3) The Washington state school directors' association shall submit
the model policy and procedures to all school districts, the governor,
and the legislature and shall post the model policy and procedures on
its web site by January 1, 2015.

--- END ---