BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
Part I
Improving Administrative Efficiency
Sec. 101 RCW 34.05.010 and 2013 c 110 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions ((set forth)) in this section ((shall)) apply
throughout this chapter((,)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Adjudicative proceeding" means a proceeding before an agency
in which an opportunity for hearing before that agency is required by
statute or constitutional right before or after the entry of an order
by the agency. Adjudicative proceedings also include all cases of
licensing and rate making in which an application for a license or rate
change is denied except as limited by RCW 66.08.150, or a license is
revoked, suspended, or modified, or in which the granting of an
application is contested by a person having standing to contest under
the law.
(2) "Agency" means any state board, commission, department,
institution of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make
rules or to conduct adjudicative proceedings, except those in the
legislative or judicial branches, the governor, or the attorney general
except to the extent otherwise required by law and any local
governmental entity that may request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 42.41 RCW.
(3) "Agency action" means licensing, the implementation or
enforcement of a statute, the adoption or application of an agency rule
or order, the imposition of sanctions, or the granting or withholding
of benefits.
Agency action does not include an agency decision regarding (a)
contracting or procurement of goods, services, public works, and the
purchase, lease, or acquisition by any other means, including eminent
domain, of real estate, as well as all activities necessarily related
to those functions, or (b) determinations as to the sufficiency of a
showing of interest filed in support of a representation petition, or
mediation or conciliation of labor disputes or arbitration of labor
disputes under a collective bargaining law or similar statute, or (c)
any sale, lease, contract, or other proprietary decision in the
management of public lands or real property interests, or (d) the
granting of a license, franchise, or permission for the use of
trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency.
(4) "Agency head" means the individual or body of individuals in
whom the ultimate legal authority of the agency is vested by any
provision of law. If the agency head is a body of individuals, a
majority of those individuals constitutes the agency head.
(5) "Entry" of an order means the signing of the order by all
persons who are to sign the order, as an official act indicating that
the order is to be effective.
(6) "Filing" of a document that is required to be filed with an
agency means delivery of the document to a place designated by the
agency by rule for receipt of official documents, or in the absence of
such designation, at the office of the agency head.
(7) "Institutions of higher education" are the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, the various community colleges, and the
governing boards of each of the above, and the various colleges,
divisions, departments, or offices authorized by the governing board of
the institution involved to act for the institution, all of which are
sometimes referred to in this chapter as "institutions."
(8) "Interpretive statement" means a written expression of the
opinion of an agency, entitled an interpretive statement by the agency
head or its designee, as to the meaning of a statute or other provision
of law, of a court decision, or of an agency order.
(9)(a) "License" means a franchise, permit, certification,
approval, registration, charter, or similar form of authorization
required by law, but does not include (i) a license required solely for
revenue purposes, or (ii) a certification of an exclusive bargaining
representative, or similar status, under a collective bargaining law or
similar statute, or (iii) a license, franchise, or permission for use
of trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency.
(b) "Licensing" includes the agency process respecting the
issuance, denial, revocation, suspension, or modification of a license.
(10) "Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to rule
making or policy or interpretive statements, means regular mail or
electronic distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by electronic mail
or facsimile mail.
(11)(a) "Order," without further qualification, means a written
statement of particular applicability that finally determines the legal
rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of a
specific person or persons.
(b) "Order of adoption" means the official written statement by
which an agency adopts, amends, or repeals a rule.
(12) "Party to agency proceedings," or "party" in a context so
indicating, means:
(a) A person to whom the agency action is specifically directed; or
(b) A person named as a party to the agency proceeding or allowed
to intervene or participate as a party in the agency proceeding.
(13) "Party to judicial review or civil enforcement proceedings,"
or "party" in a context so indicating, means:
(a) A person who files a petition for a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding; or
(b) A person named as a party in a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding, or allowed to participate as a party in a
judicial review or civil enforcement proceeding.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
association, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or
private organization or entity of any character, and includes another
agency.
(15) "Policy statement" means a written description of the current
approach of an agency, entitled a policy statement by the agency head
or its designee, to implementation of a statute or other provision of
law, of a court decision, or of an agency order, including where
appropriate the agency's current practice, procedure, or method of
action based upon that approach.
(16) "Rule" means any agency order, directive, or regulation of
general applicability (a) the violation of which subjects a person to
a penalty or administrative sanction; (b) which establishes, alters, or
revokes any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; (c) which establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification
or requirement relating to the enjoyment of benefits or privileges
conferred by law; (d) which establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualifications or standards for the issuance, suspension, or revocation
of licenses to pursue any commercial activity, trade, or profession; or
(e) which establishes, alters, or revokes any mandatory standards for
any product or material which must be met before distribution or sale.
The term includes the amendment or repeal of a prior rule, but does not
include (i) statements concerning only the internal management of an
agency and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the
public, (ii) declaratory rulings issued pursuant to RCW 34.05.240,
(iii) traffic restrictions for motor vehicles, bicyclists, and
pedestrians established by the secretary of transportation or his or
her designee where notice of such restrictions is given by official
traffic control devices, ((or)) (iv) rules of institutions of higher
education involving standards of admission, academic advancement,
academic credit, graduation and the granting of degrees, employment
relationships, or fiscal processes, or (v) the determination and
publication of updated nexus thresholds by the department of revenue in
accordance with RCW 82.04.067.
(17) "Rules review committee" or "committee" means the joint
administrative rules review committee created pursuant to RCW 34.05.610
for the purpose of selectively reviewing existing and proposed rules of
state agencies.
(18) "Rule making" means the process for formulation and adoption
of a rule.
(19) "Service," except as otherwise provided in this chapter, means
posting in the United States mail, properly addressed, postage prepaid,
or personal or electronic service. Service by mail is complete upon
deposit in the United States mail. Agencies may, by rule, authorize
service by electronic transmission, or by commercial parcel delivery
company.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.32.534 and 2010 c 114 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
report under this section must file a complete annual report with the
department. The report is due by April 30th of the year following any
calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax
preference that requires a report under this section. The department
may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(b) The report must include information detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for
employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference
was claimed. However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment, wage,
and benefit information per job at the manufacturing site for the year
that the tax preference was claimed. The report must not include names
of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year
that the tax preference was claimed.
(c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by
RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW
82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must
indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this
state during the time period covered by the report.
(d) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a
report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report
filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this
section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this
section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax
preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails
to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW
82.32.590, the department must declare the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed
at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(5) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by ((October))
December 1st.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.32.585 and 2011 c 23 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
survey under this section must file a complete annual survey with the
department.
(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the survey is
due by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a
person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a
survey under this section.
(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first survey
must be filed by April 30th of the calendar year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
operationally complete, and a survey must be filed by April 30th of
each of the seven succeeding calendar years.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey. For a person that
claimed an exemption provided in RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, the
survey must include the amount of tax exempted under those sections in
the prior calendar year for each general area or category of research
and development for which exempt machinery and equipment and labor and
services were acquired in the prior calendar year.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees,
for the year that the tax preference was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) For persons claiming the tax preference provided under chapter
82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at
the investment project.
(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452,
the survey must also include the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with the research and development activities for which the
credit was claimed, and whether the tax preference has been assigned,
and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW 82.04.4452 apply
to this subsection (2)(d).
(e) For persons claiming the tax exemption in RCW 82.08.025651 or
82.12.025651, the survey must also include the general areas or
categories of research and development for which machinery and
equipment and labor and services were acquired, exempt from tax under
RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, in the prior calendar year.
(f) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the
information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section, is deemed
taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330. Information required in
subsection (2)(a) of this section is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the
amount of the tax preference claimed as reported on the survey is
different than the amount actually claimed or otherwise allowed by the
department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or other
information known to the department, the amount actually claimed or
allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but
fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey
or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the
amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due. If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, twelve
and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by ((October))
December 1st.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.32.235 and 2009 c 562 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter the
department is authorized to issue to any person, including the
department, a notice and order to withhold and deliver property of any
kind whatsoever when there is reason to believe that there is in the
possession of such person, property which is or will become due, owing,
or belonging to any taxpayer against whom a warrant has been filed.
(2) The sheriff of the county where the service is made, or his or
her deputy, or any duly authorized representative of the department may
personally serve the notice and order to withhold and deliver upon the
person to whom it is directed or may do so by certified mail, with
return receipt requested. Upon written consent of the person to be
served, a notice and order to withhold and deliver issued under
subsection (1) of this section may be served electronically.
(3)(a) The department is authorized to issue a notice and order to
withhold and deliver to any financial institution in the form of a
listing of all or a portion of the unsatisfied tax warrants filed under
this chapter with the clerk of the superior court of a county of the
state, except tax warrants subject to a payment agreement, which is not
in default, between the department and the taxpayer. The department
may also issue a notice and order to withhold and deliver in the form
authorized in this subsection (3)(a) to itself or any other person upon
that person's written consent.
(b) ((As an alternative to the methods of service in subsection (2)
of this section,)) The department may serve the notice and order to
withhold and deliver authorized under this subsection electronically.
The remedy in this subsection (3) is in addition to any other remedies
authorized by law.
(c) No more than one notice and order to withhold and deliver under
this subsection (3) may be served on the same ((financial institution
in a calendar month)) person in a calendar month except upon the
person's written consent.
(d) A notice and order to withhold and deliver served on a
financial institution under this subsection (3) must include the
federal taxpayer identification number of each taxpayer listed in the
notice.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "financial institution" means
a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan
association, or credit union authorized to do business and accept
deposits in this state under state or federal law.
(f) The department may provide a financial institution relief from
a notice and order to withhold and deliver in the form provided under
this subsection (3) upon the request of the financial institution. The
department must consider the size, customer base, and geographic
location of the financial institution when considering whether to
provide relief. The department must serve any financial institution so
relieved under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Any person who has been served with a notice and order to
withhold and deliver under subsection (1) of this section must answer
the notice within twenty days, exclusive of the day of service. Any
person who has been served with a notice and order to withhold and
deliver under subsection (3) of this section must answer the notice
within thirty days, exclusive of the day of service. The answer must
be in writing, under oath if required by the department, and include
true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice. Any person
served under subsection (3) of this section may answer in aggregate
within thirty days, but must answer separately as to each taxpayer
listed and specify any property by taxpayer which is delivered. The
department must allow any person served electronically ((under
subsection (3))) as authorized in subsection (2) or (3) of this section
to answer the notice and order to withhold and deliver electronically
in a format provided or approved by the department.
(5) In the event there is in the possession of any person served
with a notice and order to withhold and deliver, any property which may
be subject to the claim of the department, such property must be
delivered immediately to the department of revenue or its duly
authorized representative upon demand. The department must hold the
property in trust for application on the indebtedness involved or for
return, without interest, in accordance with final determination of
liability or nonliability. Instead of delivering the property to the
department or the department's duly authorized representative, the
person may furnish a bond satisfactory to the department conditioned
upon final determination of liability.
(6) Should any person, having been served with a notice and order
to withhold and deliver, fail to answer the notice and order to
withhold and deliver within the time prescribed in this section or
otherwise fail to comply with the duties imposed in this section, the
department may bring a proceeding, in the superior court of Thurston
county or of the county in which service of the notice was made, to
enforce the notice and order to withhold and deliver. The court may
render judgment by default against such person for the full amount
claimed by the department in the notice and order to withhold and
deliver or may grant such other relief as the court deems just,
together with costs.
(7) For purposes of this section, "person" has the same meaning as
in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes any agency, department, or
institution of the state.

Part II
Repealing Obsolete Statutes
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 RCW 82.32.795 (Candy list -- Compilation)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 910 are each repealed.

Part III
Clarifying and Corrective Amendments
Sec. 301 RCW 60.28.040 and 2009 c 432 s 7 and 2009 c 219 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the amount of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's successors or assignees with
respect to a public improvement contract wherein the contract price is
thirty-five thousand dollars or more, ((shall be)) is a lien prior to
all other liens upon the amount of the retained percentage withheld by
the disbursing officer under such contract.
(2) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, after payment of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's successors or assignees with
respect to a public improvement contract wherein the contract price is
((twenty)) thirty-five thousand dollars or more, the amount of all
other taxes, increases, and penalties under Title 82 RCW, due and owing
from the contractor, ((shall be)) is a lien prior to all other liens
upon the amount of the retained percentage withheld by the disbursing
officer under such contract.
(3) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, after payment of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, the amount of all taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become
due under Titles 50 and 51 RCW from the contractor or the contractor's
successors or assignees with respect to a public improvement contract
wherein the contract price is ((twenty)) thirty-five thousand dollars
or more ((shall be)) is a lien prior to all other liens upon the amount
of the retained percentage withheld by the disbursing officer under
such contract.
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the amount of all
other taxes, increases, and penalties due and owing from the contractor
((shall be)) is a lien upon the balance of such retained percentage
remaining in the possession of the disbursing officer after all other
statutory lien claims have been paid.
(5) The employees of a contractor or the contractor's successors or
assignees who have not been paid the prevailing wage under such a
public improvement contract shall have a first priority lien against
the bond or retainage prior to all other liens.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.190 and 2010 c 111 s 202 and 2010 c 106 s 204
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose of:
(a) Resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of
business;
(b) Incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of
real or personal property when installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, imprinting, improving, constructing, or decorating such real
or personal property of or for consumers;
(c) Consuming such property in producing for sale as a new article
of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale;
(d) Consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon
which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction
directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty
as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), if such tangible personal property
replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by
the extended warranty without intervening use by such person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or
telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065,
other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW
82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), other than for resale in the regular course of
business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations
under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any
person who purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation
service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the
regular course of business; (e) any person who purchases or acquires an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale
in the regular course of business; and (f) any person who is an end
user of software. For purposes of this subsection (2)(f) and RCW
82.04.050(6), a person who purchases or otherwise acquires prewritten
computer software, who provides services described in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b) and who will charge consumers for the right to access
and use the prewritten computer software, is not an end user of the
prewritten computer software;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the
property in or upon the right-of-way of such street, place, road,
highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of
such mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person is a consumer within the meaning of
this subsection in respect to tangible personal property incorporated
into, installed in, or attached to such building or other structure by
such person, except that consumer does not include any person engaged
in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving
new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above
real property of or for the United States, or any instrumentality
thereof, if the investment project would qualify for sales and use tax
deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section may be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property;
(10) Any person who purchases, acquires, or uses services described
in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) other than:
(a) For resale in the regular course of business; or
(b) For purposes of consuming the service described in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b) in producing for sale a new product, but only if such
service becomes a component of the new product. For purposes of this
subsection (10), "product" means a digital product, an article of
tangible personal property, or the service described in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b);
(11)(a) Any end user of a digital product or digital code.
"Consumer" does not include any person who is not an end user of a
digital product or a digital code and purchases, acquires, owns, holds,
or uses any digital product or digital code for purposes of consuming
the digital product or digital code in producing for sale a new
product, but only if the digital product or digital code becomes a
component of the new product. A digital code becomes a component of a
new product if the digital good or digital automated service acquired
through the use of the digital code becomes incorporated into a new
product. For purposes of this subsection, "product" has the same
meaning as in subsection (10) of this section.
(b)(i) For purposes of this subsection, "end user" means any
taxpayer as defined in RCW 82.12.010 other than a taxpayer who receives
by contract a digital product for further commercial broadcast,
rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing,
distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the product, in whole or
in part, to others. A person that purchases digital products or
digital codes for the purpose of giving away such products or codes
will not be considered to have engaged in the distribution or
redistribution of such products or codes and will be treated as an end
user;
(ii) If a purchaser of a digital code does not receive the
contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is
redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code
relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is an end user. If the
purchaser of the digital code receives the contractual right to further
redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying
digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser
of the digital code is not an end user. A purchaser of a digital code
who has the contractual right to further redistribute the digital code
is an end user if that purchaser does not have the right to further
redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying
digital product to which the digital code relates; ((and))
(12) Any person who provides services described in RCW
82.04.050(9). Any such person is a consumer with respect to the
purchase, acquisition, or use of the tangible personal property that
the person provides along with an operator in rendering services
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person may also
be a consumer under other provisions of this section;
(13) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses
chemical sprays or washes for the purpose of postharvest treatment of
fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, or who
purchases feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials, is not
a consumer of such items, but only to the extent that the items:
(a) Are used in relation to the person's participation in the
federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality
incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, the wildlife habitat
incentives program, or their successors administered by the United
States department of agriculture;
(b) Are for use by a farmer for the purpose of producing for sale
any agricultural product; or
(c) Are for use by a farmer to produce or improve wildlife habitat
on land the farmer owns or leases while acting under cooperative
habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt
from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and
wildlife; and
(14) A regional transit authority is not a consumer with respect to
labor, services, or tangible personal property purchased pursuant to
agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed
guideway equipment when a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015,
performs the labor or services.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.04.285 and 2005 c 369 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
operating contests of chance; as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal
to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on those persons subject to tax in
subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the additional tax with
respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the
gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied
by the rate of 0.1 percent through June 30, 2006, and 0.13 percent
thereafter. The money collected under this subsection (2) shall be
deposited in the problem gambling account created in RCW 43.20A.892.
This subsection does not apply to businesses operating contests of
chance when the gross income from the operation of contests of chance
is less than fifty thousand dollars per year.
(3)(a) For the purpose of this section, "contests of chance" means
any contests, games, gaming schemes, or gaming devices, other than the
state lottery as defined in RCW 67.70.010, in which the outcome depends
in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that
skill of the contestants may also be a factor in the outcome. The term
includes social card games, bingo, raffle, and punchboard games, and
pull-tabs as defined in chapter 9.46 RCW.
(b) The term does not include: (i) Race meet((s)) for the conduct
of which a license must be secured from the Washington horse racing
commission, ((or)) (ii) "amusement game" as defined in RCW 9.46.0201,
or (iii) any activity that is not subject to regulation by the gambling
commission.
(4) "Gross income of the business" does not include the monetary
value or actual cost of any prizes that are awarded, amounts paid to
players for winning wagers, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot
contests, or repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive
jackpot prizes.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.04.460 and 2011 c 174 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
earning apportionable income taxable under this chapter and also
taxable in another state must, for the purpose of computing tax
liability under this chapter, apportion to this state, in accordance
with RCW 82.04.462, that portion of the person's apportionable income
derived from business activities performed within this state.
(2) The department must by rule provide a method of apportioning
the apportionable income of financial institutions, where such
apportionable income is taxable under RCW 82.04.290. The rule adopted
by the department must, to the extent feasible, be consistent with the
multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment
and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on
June 1, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section,
except that:
(a) The department's rule must provide for a single factor
apportionment method based on the receipts factor; and
(b) The definition of "financial institution" contained in appendix
A to the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the
apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions is
advisory only.
(3) The department may by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of
telecommunications service and competitive telephone service taxed
under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax under
this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
income attributable to this state. The rule must provide for an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the tax base.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Apportionable income" means gross income of the business
generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income
received from apportionable activities performed outside this state if
the income would be taxable under this chapter if received from
activities in this state, less the exemptions and deductions allowable
under this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "apportionable
activities" means only those activities taxed under:
(i) RCW 82.04.255;
(ii) RCW 82.04.260 (3), (((4),)) (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), and
(((12))) (13);
(iii) RCW 82.04.280 (1)(e);
(iv) RCW 82.04.285;
(v) RCW 82.04.286;
(vi) RCW 82.04.290;
(vii) RCW 82.04.2907;
(viii) RCW 82.04.2908;
(ix) RCW 82.04.263, but only to the extent of any activity that
would be taxable under any of the provisions enumerated under (a)(i)
through (viii) of this subsection (4) if the tax classification in RCW
82.04.263 did not exist; and
(x) RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (14) and 82.04.280(1)(a), but only with
respect to advertising.
(b)(i) "Taxable in another state" means that the taxpayer is
subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities; or the taxpayer is
not subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities, but any other state
has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a business activities tax
on such income under the substantial nexus standards in RCW
82.04.067(1).
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "business activities
tax" and "state" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.04.462 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 105 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The apportionable income of a person within the scope of RCW
82.04.460(1) is apportioned to Washington by multiplying its
apportionable income by the receipts factor. Persons who are subject
to tax under more than one of the tax classifications enumerated in RCW
82.04.460(4)(a) (i) through (x) must calculate a separate receipts
factor for each tax classification that the person is taxable under.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the receipts
factor is a fraction and is calculated as provided in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section and, for financial institutions, as provided in
the rule adopted by the department under the authority of RCW
82.04.460(2).
(3)(a) The numerator of the receipts factor is the total gross
income of the business of the taxpayer attributable to this state
during the tax year from engaging in an apportionable activity. The
denominator of the receipts factor is the total gross income of the
business of the taxpayer from engaging in an apportionable activity
everywhere in the world during the tax year.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for purposes of
computing the receipts factor, gross income of the business generated
from each apportionable activity is attributable to the state:
(i) Where the customer received the benefit of the taxpayer's
service or, in the case of gross income from royalties, where the
customer used the taxpayer's intangible property. When a customer
receives the benefit of the taxpayer's services or uses the taxpayer's
intangible property in this and one or more other states and the amount
of gross income of the business that was received by the taxpayer in
return for the services received or intangible property used by the
customer in this state can be reasonably determined by the taxpayer,
such amount of gross income must be attributed to this state.
(ii) If the customer received the benefit of the service or used
the intangible property in more than one state and if the taxpayer is
unable to attribute gross income of the business under the provisions
of (b)(i) of this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be
attributed to the state in which the benefit of the service was
primarily received or in which the intangible property was primarily
used.
(iii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (3),
gross income of the business must be attributed to the state from which
the customer ordered the service or, in the case of royalties, the
office of the customer from which the royalty agreement with the
taxpayer was negotiated.
(iv) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state to which the billing statements or invoices are sent to the
customer by the taxpayer.
(v) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state from which the customer sends payment to the taxpayer.
(vi) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of
this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to
the state where the customer is located as indicated by the customer's
address: (A) Shown in the taxpayer's business records maintained in
the regular course of business; or (B) obtained during consummation of
the sale or the negotiation of the contract for services or for the use
of the taxpayer's intangible property, including any address of a
customer's payment instrument when readily available to the taxpayer
and no other address is available.
(vii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), or
(vi) of this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be
attributed to the commercial domicile of the taxpayer.
(viii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(b), "customer" means a
person or entity to whom the taxpayer makes a sale or renders services
or from whom the taxpayer otherwise receives gross income of the
business. "Customer" includes anyone who pays royalties or charges in
the nature of royalties for the use of the taxpayer's intangible
property.
(c) Gross income of the business from engaging in an apportionable
activity must be excluded from the denominator of the receipts factor
if, in respect to such activity, at least some of the activity is
performed in this state, and the gross income is attributable under (b)
of this subsection (3) to a state in which the taxpayer is not taxable.
For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "not taxable" means that the
taxpayer is not subject to a business activities tax by that state,
except that a taxpayer is taxable in a state in which it would be
deemed to have a substantial nexus with that state under the standards
in RCW 82.04.067(1) regardless of whether that state imposes such a
tax. "Business activities tax" means a tax measured by the amount of,
or economic results of, business activity conducted in a state. The
term includes taxes measured in whole or in part on net income or gross
income or receipts. "Business activities tax" does not include a sales
tax, use tax, or a similar transaction tax, imposed on the sale or
acquisition of goods or services, whether or not denominated a gross
receipts tax or a tax imposed on the privilege of doing business.
(d) This subsection (3) does not apply to financial institutions
with respect to apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290.
Financial institutions must calculate the receipts factor as provided
in subsection (4) of this section and the rule adopted by the
department under the authority of RCW 82.04.460(2) with respect to
apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290. Financial
institutions that are subject to tax under any other tax classification
enumerated in RCW 82.04.460(4)(a) (i) through (v) and (vii) through (x)
must calculate a separate receipts factor, as provided in this section,
for each of the other tax classifications that the financial
institution is taxable under.
(4) A taxpayer may calculate the receipts factor for the current
tax year based on the most recent calendar year for which information
is available for the full calendar year. If a taxpayer does not
calculate the receipts factor for the current tax year based on
previous calendar year information as authorized in this subsection,
the business must use current year information to calculate the
receipts factor for the current tax year. In either case, a taxpayer
must correct the reporting for the current tax year when complete
information is available to calculate the receipts factor for that
year, but not later than October 31st of the following tax year.
Interest will apply to any additional tax due on a corrected tax
return. Interest must be ((assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the original return was due, and will accrue)) computed and
assessed as provided in RCW 82.32.050 and accrues until the additional
taxes are paid. Penalties as provided in RCW 82.32.090 will apply to
any such additional tax due only if the current tax year reporting is
not corrected and the additional tax is not paid by October 31st of the
following tax year. Interest as provided in RCW 82.32.060 will apply
to any tax paid in excess of that properly due on a return as a result
of a taxpayer using previous calendar year data or incomplete current-year data to calculate the receipts factor.
(5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Apportionable activities" and "apportionable income" have the
same meaning as in RCW 82.04.460.
(b) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession
of the United States, or any foreign country or political subdivision
of a foreign country.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.08.02807 and 2002 c 113 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to the sales of
medical supplies, chemicals, or materials to an organ procurement
organization exempt under RCW 82.04.326. ((The definitions of medical
supplies, chemicals, and materials in RCW 82.04.324 apply to this
section.)) This exemption does not apply to the sale of construction
materials, office equipment, building equipment, administrative
supplies, or vehicles.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.45.150 and 1996 c 149 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
All of chapter 82.32 RCW, except RCW 82.32.030, 82.32.050,
82.32.140, 82.32.270, and 82.32.090 (1) and (((8))) (10), applies to
the tax imposed by this chapter, in addition to any other provisions of
law for the payment and enforcement of the tax imposed by this chapter.
The department of revenue shall by rule provide for the effective
administration of this chapter. The rules shall prescribe and furnish
a real estate excise tax affidavit form verified by both the seller and
the buyer, or agents of each, to be used by each county, or the
department, as the case may be, in the collection of the tax imposed by
this chapter, except that an affidavit given in connection with grant
of an easement or right-of-way to a gas, electrical, or
telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, or to a public
utility district or cooperative that distributes electricity, need be
verified only on behalf of the company, district, or cooperative. The
department of revenue shall annually conduct audits of transactions and
affidavits filed under this chapter.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.45.195 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 518 are each
amended to read as follows:
A sale of standing timber is exempt from tax under this chapter if
the gross income from such sale is taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))
(12)(d).

Sec. 309 RCW 84.33.140 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation must be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land must, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
must list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with respect
to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted as
provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor must compute
the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio applied
generally in computing the assessed value of other property in the
county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land are as
follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department must adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
must certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department must:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section must be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment must
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values must be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land must continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, does not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance must be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance must be on a form prepared by the department. If
the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and attached
to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating taxes
calculated under subsection (11) of this section are due and payable by
the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor may not accept
an instrument of conveyance regarding designated forest land for filing
or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance
or the compensating tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate
excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller,
transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation
calculated under subsection (11) of this section to the county board of
equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to
hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land may not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient must annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land may not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor has the option of requiring an owner of forest
land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal applies only to the land affected. If land is removed from
designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the removal
applies only to the actual area of land that is no longer primarily
devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without regard to any
other land that may have been included in the application and approved
for designation, as long as the remaining designated forest land meets
the definition of forest land contained in RCW 84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor must notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation must, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation must immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor must revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation must be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land are assessed and payable up until
the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of the
land are assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax is imposed on land removed from designation
as forest land. The compensating tax is due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of this
tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from designation,
the assessor must compute the amount of compensating tax, and the
treasurer must mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating
tax owed and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount
of compensating tax is equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
becomes a lien on the land, which attaches at the time the land is
removed from designation as forest land and has priority and must be
fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment,
debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may
become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon expiration
of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by
law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as
provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax unpaid on its due date
will thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until
paid, interest is charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent
ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section may not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) a sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power based on
official action taken by the entity and confirmed in writing;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW, or for acquisition and management as
a community forest trust as defined in chapter 79.155 RCW. At such
time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section is
imposed upon the current owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a conservation easement of
private forest lands within unconfined channel migration zones or
containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species under
RCW 76.09.040;
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h); or
(i)(i) The discovery that the land was designated under this
chapter in error through no fault of the owner. For purposes of this
subsection (13)(i), "fault" means a knowingly false or misleading
statement, or other act or omission not in good faith, that contributed
to the approval of designation under this chapter or the failure of the
assessor to remove the land from designation under this chapter.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (13), the discovery that land
was designated under this chapter in error through no fault of the
owner is not the sole reason for removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section if an independent basis for removal
exists. An example of an independent basis for removal includes the
land no longer being devoted to and used for growing and harvesting
timber.
(14) In a county with a population of more than six hundred
thousand inhabitants or in a county with a population of at least two
hundred forty-five thousand inhabitants that borders Puget Sound as
defined in RCW 90.71.010, the compensating tax specified in subsection
(11) of this section may not be imposed if the removal of designation
as forest land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely
from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax is imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 310 RCW 84.34.065 and 2001 c 249 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The true and fair value of farm and agricultural land shall be
determined by consideration of the earning or productive capacity of
comparable lands from crops grown most typically in the area averaged
over not less than five years, capitalized at indicative rates. The
earning or productive capacity of farm and agricultural lands ((shall
be)) is the "net cash rental," capitalized at a "rate of interest"
charged on long term loans secured by a mortgage on farm or
agricultural land plus a component for property taxes. The current use
value of land under RCW 84.34.020(2)(((e) shall)) (f) must be
established as: The prior year's average value of open space farm and
agricultural land used in the county plus the value of land
improvements such as septic, water, and power used to serve the
residence. This ((shall)) may not be interpreted to require the
assessor to list improvements to the land with the value of the land.
(2) For the purposes of the above computation:
(((1))) (a)(i) The term "net cash rental" ((shall)) means the
average rental paid on an annual basis, in cash, for the land being
appraised and other farm and agricultural land of similar quality and
similarly situated that is available for lease for a period of at least
three years to any reliable person without unreasonable restrictions on
its use for production of agricultural crops. There ((shall be)) is
allowed as a deduction from the rental received or computed any costs
of crop production charged against the landlord if the costs are such
as are customarily paid by a landlord. If "net cash rental" data is
not available, the earning or productive capacity of farm and
agricultural lands ((shall be)) is determined by the cash value of
typical or usual crops grown on land of similar quality and similarly
situated averaged over not less than five years. Standard costs of
production ((shall be)) are allowed as a deduction from the cash value
of the crops.
(ii) The current "net cash rental" or "earning capacity" ((shall
be)) is determined by the assessor with the advice of the advisory
committee as provided in RCW 84.34.145, and through a continuing
internal study, assisted by studies of the department of revenue. This
net cash rental figure as it applies to any farm and agricultural land
may be challenged before the same boards or authorities as would be the
case with regard to assessed values on general property.
(((2))) (b)(i) The term "rate of interest" ((shall)) means the rate
of interest charged by the farm credit administration and other large
financial institutions regularly making loans secured by farm and
agricultural lands through mortgages or similar legal instruments,
averaged over the immediate past five years.
(ii) The "rate of interest" ((shall)) must be determined annually
by a rule adopted by the department of revenue and such rule ((shall))
must be published in the state register not later than January 1 of
each year for use in that assessment year. The department of revenue
determination may be appealed to the state board of tax appeals within
thirty days after the date of publication by any owner of farm or
agricultural land or the assessor of any county containing farm and
agricultural land.
(((3))) (c) The "component for property taxes" ((shall be)) is a
figure obtained by dividing the assessed value of all property in the
county into the property taxes levied within the county in the year
preceding the assessment and multiplying the quotient obtained by one
hundred.

Sec. 311 RCW 84.34.108 and 2009 c 513 s 2, 2009 c 354 s 3, 2009
c 255 s 2, and 2009 c 246 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification ((shall)) must be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls and the land ((shall)) must be valued
pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a
portion of the classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of
the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner ((shall)) does not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance ((shall)) must be on a form
prepared by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed
by the new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit,
all additional taxes, applicable interest, and penalty calculated
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section ((shall)) become due and
payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
((shall)) may not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding
classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed
the notice of continuance or the additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax
stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new
owner may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection
(4) of this section to the county board of equalization in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred
on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, ((shall)) must
provide reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination
whether the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020
(1) or (3). The assistance ((shall)) must be provided within thirty
days of receipt of the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after the removal of all or a portion of the
land from current use classification under subsection (1) of this
section, the assessor ((shall)) must notify the owner in writing,
setting forth the reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or
owner may appeal the removal to the county board of equalization in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. The removal notice
must explain the steps needed to appeal the removal decision, including
when a notice of appeal must be filed, where the forms may be obtained,
and how to contact the county board of equalization.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor
((shall)) must revalue the affected land with reference to its true and
fair value on January 1st of the year of removal from classification.
Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of
classification ((shall)) must be listed and taxes ((shall)) must be
allocated according to that part of the year to which each assessed
valuation applies. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this
section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty ((shall))
must be imposed, which ((shall be)) are due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the
additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty. As soon as possible,
the assessor ((shall)) must compute the amount of additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty and the treasurer ((shall)) must mail
notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment
is due. The amount of the additional tax, applicable interest, and
penalty shall be determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land," "farm and
agricultural land," or "timber land" and the amount of property tax
otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land
not been so classified;
(b) The amount of applicable interest ((shall)) must be equal to
the interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same
statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on
which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;
(c) The amount of the penalty ((shall)) must be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.
(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty((, shall))
become a lien on the land which ((shall attach)) attaches at the time
the land is removed from classification under this chapter and
((shall)) have priority to and ((shall)) must be fully paid and
satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt,
obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may become
charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the
same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by law
for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided
in RCW 84.64.050. Any additional tax unpaid on ((its)) the due date
((shall thereupon become)) are delinquent as of the due date. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest ((shall)) must be charged at
the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified
in subsection (4) of this section ((shall)) may not be imposed if the
removal of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section ((shall)) must be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(f);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a conservation easement of
private forest lands within unconfined channel migration zones or
containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species under
RCW 76.09.040;
(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(6)(k); or
(l)(i) The discovery that the land was classified under this
chapter in error through no fault of the owner. For purposes of this
subsection (6)(l), "fault" means a knowingly false or misleading
statement, or other act or omission not in good faith, that contributed
to the approval of classification under this chapter or the failure of
the assessor to remove the land from classification under this chapter.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (6), the discovery that land
was classified under this chapter in error through no fault of the
owner is not the sole reason for removal of classification pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section if an independent basis for removal
exists. Examples of an independent basis for removal include the owner
changing the use of the land or failing to meet any applicable income
criteria required for classification under this chapter.

Sec. 312 RCW 84.34.300 and 1992 c 52 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that farming, timber production, and the
related agricultural and forest industries have historically been and
currently are central factors in the economic and social lifeblood of
the state; that it is a fundamental policy of the state to protect
agricultural and timber lands as a major natural resource in order to
maintain a source to supply a wide range of agricultural and forest
products; and that the public interest in the protection and
stimulation of farming, timber production, and the agricultural and
forest industries is a basic element of enhancing the economic
viability of this state. The legislature further finds that farmland
and timber land in urbanizing areas are often subjected to high levels
of property taxation and benefit assessment, and that such levels of
taxation and assessment encourage and even force the removal of such
lands from agricultural and forest uses. The legislature further finds
that because of this level of taxation and assessment, such farmland
and timber land in urbanizing areas are either converted to
nonagricultural and nonforest uses when significant amounts of nearby
nonagricultural and nonforest area could be suitably used for such
nonagricultural and nonforest uses, or, much of this farmland and
timber land is left in an unused state. The legislature further finds
that with the approval by the voters of the Fifty-third Amendment to
the state Constitution, and with the enactment of chapter 84.34 RCW,
the owners of farmlands and timber lands were provided with an
opportunity to have such land valued on the basis of its current use
and not its "highest and best use" and that such current use valuation
is one mechanism to protect agricultural and timber lands. The
legislature further finds that despite this potential property tax
reduction, farmlands and timber lands in urbanized areas are still
subject to high levels of benefit assessments and continue to be
removed from farm and forest uses.
(2) It is therefore the purpose of the legislature to establish,
with the enactment of RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380, another
mechanism to protect agricultural and timber land which creates an
analogous system of relief from certain benefit assessments for farm
and agricultural land and timber land. It is the intent of the
legislature that special benefit assessments not be imposed for the
availability of sanitary and/or storm sewerage service, or domestic
water service, or for road construction and/or improvement purposes on
farm and agricultural lands and timber lands which have been designated
for current use classification as farm and agricultural lands or timber
lands until such lands are withdrawn or removed from such
classification or unless such lands benefit from or cause the need for
the local improvement district.
(3) The legislature finds, and it is the intent of RCW 84.34.300
through 84.34.380 and 84.34.922, that special benefit assessments for
the improvement or construction of sanitary and/or storm sewerage
service, or domestic water service, or certain road construction do not
generally benefit land which has been classified as ((open space)) farm
and agricultural land or timber land under the open space act, chapter
84.34 RCW, until such land is withdrawn or removed from such
classification ((or such land is used for a more intense and
nonagricultural use, or the land is no longer used as timber land)).
The purpose of RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380 and 84.34.922 is to
provide an exemption from certain special benefit assessments which do
not benefit timber land or open space farm and agricultural land, and
to provide the means for local governmental entities to recover such
assessments in current dollar value in the event such land is no longer
devoted to farming or timber production under chapter 84.34 RCW. Where
the owner of such land chooses to make limited use of improvements
related to special benefit assessments, RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380
provides the means for the partial assessment on open space timber and
farmland to the extent the land is directly benefited by the
improvement.

Sec. 313 RCW 84.34.320 and 1992 c 69 s 17 and 1992 c 52 s 16 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any land classified as farm and agricultural land or timber
land pursuant to chapter 84.34 RCW at the earlier of the times the
legislative authority of a local government adopts a resolution,
ordinance, or legislative act (((1))) to: (a) Create a local
improvement district, in which such land is included or would have been
included but for such classification((,)); or (((2) to)) (b) approve or
confirm a final special benefit assessment roll relating to a sanitary
and/or storm sewerage system, domestic water supply and/or distribution
system, or road construction and/or improvement, which roll would have
included such land but for such classification, ((shall be)) is exempt
from special benefit assessments or charges in lieu of assessment for
such purposes as long as that land remains in such classification,
except as otherwise provided in RCW 84.34.360.
(2) Whenever a local government creates a local improvement
district, the levying, collection and enforcement of assessments shall
be in the manner and subject to the same procedures and limitations as
are provided pursuant to the law concerning the initiation and
formation of local improvement districts for the particular local
government. Notice of the creation of a local improvement district
that includes farm and agricultural land or timber land ((shall)) must
be filed with the county assessor and the legislative authority of the
county in which such land is located. The assessor, upon receiving
notice of the creation of such a local improvement district, ((shall))
must send a notice to the owner of the farm and agricultural land or
timber land listed on the tax rolls of the applicable county treasurer
of: (((1))) (a) The creation of the local improvement district;
(((2))) (b) the exemption of that land from special benefit
assessments; (((3))) (c) the fact that the farm and agricultural land
or timber land may become subject to the special benefit assessments if
the owner waives the exemption by filing a notarized document with the
governing body of the local government creating the local improvement
district before the confirmation of the final special benefit
assessment roll; and (((4))) (d) the potential liability, pursuant to
RCW 84.34.330, if the exemption is not waived and the land is
subsequently removed or withdrawn from the farm and agricultural land
or timber land ((status)) classification. When a local government
approves and confirms a special benefit assessment roll, from which
farm and agricultural land or timber land has been exempted pursuant to
this section, it shall file a notice of such action with the assessor
and the legislative authority of the county in which such land is
located and with the treasurer of that local government, which notice
((shall)) must describe the action taken, the type of improvement
involved, the land exempted, and the amount of the special benefit
assessment which would have been levied against the land if it had not
been exempted. The filing of such notice with the assessor and the
treasurer of that local government ((shall)) constitutes constructive
notice to a purchaser or encumbrancer of the affected land, and every
person whose conveyance or encumbrance is subsequently executed or
subsequently recorded, that such exempt land is subject to the charges
provided in RCW 84.34.330 and 84.34.340 if such land is withdrawn or
removed from its current use classification as farm and agricultural
land or timber land.
(3) The owner of the land exempted from special benefit assessments
pursuant to this section may waive that exemption by filing a notarized
document to that effect with the legislative authority of the local
government upon receiving notice from said local government concerning
the assessment roll hearing and before the local government confirms
the final special benefit assessment roll. A copy of that waiver
((shall)) must be filed by the local government with the assessor, but
the failure of such filing ((shall)) does not affect the waiver.
(4) Except to the extent provided in RCW 84.34.360, the local
government ((shall have)) has no duty to furnish service from the
improvement financed by the special benefit assessment to such exempted
land.

Sec. 314 RCW 84.34.330 and 1992 c 52 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever farm and agricultural land or timber land has once been
exempted from special benefit assessments pursuant to RCW 84.34.320,
any withdrawal or removal from classification ((or change in use from))
as farm and agricultural land or timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW
((shall)) results in the following:
(1) If the bonds used to fund the improvement in the local
improvement district have not been completely retired, such land shall
immediately become liable for: (a) The amount of the special benefit
assessment listed in the notice provided for in RCW 84.34.320; plus (b)
interest on the amount determined in (1)(a) of this section, compounded
annually at a rate equal to the average rate of inflation from the time
the initial notice is filed by the governmental entity which created
the local improvement district as provided in RCW 84.34.320 to the time
the ((owner withdraws such)) land is withdrawn or removed from the
exemption category provided by this chapter; or
(2) If the bonds used to fund the improvement in the local
improvement district have been completely retired, such land shall
immediately become liable for: (a) The amount of the special benefit
assessment listed in the notice provided for in RCW 84.34.320; plus (b)
interest on the amount determined in (2)(a) of this section compounded
annually at a rate equal to the average rate of inflation from the time
the initial notice is filed by the governmental entity which created
the local improvement district as provided in RCW 84.34.320, to the
time the bonds used to fund the improvement have been retired; plus (c)
interest on the total amount determined in (2)(a) and (b) of this
section at a simple per annum rate equal to the average rate of
inflation from the time the bonds used to fund the improvement have
been retired to the time the ((owner withdraws such lands)) land is
withdrawn or removed from the exemption category provided by this
chapter.
(3) The amount payable pursuant to this section shall become due on
the date such land is withdrawn or removed from its ((current use))
farm and agricultural land or timber land classification and ((shall))
must be a lien on the land prior and superior to any other lien
whatsoever except for the lien for general taxes, and shall be
enforceable in the same manner as the collection of special benefit
assessments are enforced by that local government.

Sec. 315 RCW 84.34.370 and 1992 c 52 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a portion of a parcel of land which was classified as farm
and agricultural or timber land pursuant to this chapter is withdrawn
or removed from classification ((or there is a change in use)), and
such land has been exempted from any benefit assessments pursuant to
RCW 84.34.320, the previously exempt benefit assessments ((shall))
become due on only that portion of the land which is withdrawn or
((changed)) removed.

Sec. 316 RCW 84.55.005 and 2007 sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce ((in)) by
September 25th of the year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under
that section or one hundred one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent
or one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 317 RCW 82.08.02061 and 2008 c 325 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department must assess the implementation of the working
families' tax exemption in a report to the legislature to identify
administrative or resource issues that require legislative action. The
department must submit the report to the finance committee of the house
of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate ((by
December 1, 2012)) within eighteen months of the implementation of the
program.

Part IV
Fixing Inadvertent Errors and Oversights in Prior Legislation
Sec. 401 RCW 82.04.250 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 509 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((10))) (11) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person classified by the
federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part
145 certificated repair station and that is engaging within this state
in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax
imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261,
82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 402 RCW 82.04.250 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(11) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person classified by the
federal aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part
145 certificated repair station and that is engaging within this state
in the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax
imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261,
82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 403 RCW 82.04.290 and 2013 c 23 s 314 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly
under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without
limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in
the performance of such business passes to another by accession,
confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising,
demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an
agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational,
educational, and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of
the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by a rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.
(c) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.04.290 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied
by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly
under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by
the rate of 1.5 percent.
(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without
limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in
the performance of such business passes to another by accession,
confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising,
demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an
agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational,
educational, and promotional purposes is not considered a part of the
agent's remuneration or commission and is not subject to taxation under
this section.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2040, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by a
rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.
(c) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 405 RCW 82.08.9651 and 2010 c 114 s 124 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the
production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to
gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product,
deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch
or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse
the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the
gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during
the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the
chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place.
For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the
meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) ((A person claiming the exemption under this section must file
a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.)) (a)
Except as provided under (b) of this subsection (2), a person claiming
the exemption under this section must file a complete annual survey
with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(b) A person claiming the exemption under this section and who is
required to file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534 as a result of claiming the tax preference provided by RCW
82.04.2404 is not also required to file a complete annual survey under
RCW 82.32.585.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.
(((3))) (4) This section expires December 1, 2018.

Sec. 406 RCW 82.12.9651 and 2010 c 114 s 130 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) ((A person claiming the exemption under this section must file
a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.)) (a)
Except as provided under (b) of this subsection (2), a person claiming
the exemption under this section must file a complete annual survey
with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(b) A person claiming the exemption under this section and who is
required to file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534 as a result of claiming the tax preference provided by RCW
82.04.2404 is not also required to file a complete annual survey under
RCW 82.32.585.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.
(((3))) (4) This section expires December 1, 2018.

Sec. 407 RCW 84.40.038 and 2011 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner or person responsible for payment of taxes on any
property may petition the county board of equalization for a change in
the assessed valuation placed upon such property by the county assessor
or for any other reason specifically authorized by statute. Such
petition must be made on forms prescribed or approved by the department
of revenue and any petition not conforming to those requirements or not
properly completed may not be considered by the board. The petition
must be filed with the board:
(a) On or before July 1st of the year of the assessment or
determination((,));
(b) Within thirty days after the date ((an)) the assessment, value
change notice, or other notice ((has been)) was mailed((,));
(c) Within thirty days after the date that the assessor
electronically (i) transmitted the assessment, value change notice, or
other notice, or (ii) notified the owner or person responsible for
payment of taxes that the assessment, value change notice, or other
notice was available to be accessed by the owner or other person; or
(d) Within a time limit of up to sixty days adopted by the county
legislative authority, whichever is later. If a county legislative
authority sets a time limit, the authority may not change the limit for
three years from the adoption of the limit.
(2) The board of equalization may waive the filing deadline if the
petition is filed within a reasonable time after the filing deadline
and the petitioner shows good cause for the late filing. However, the
board of equalization must waive the filing deadline for the
circumstance described under (f) of this subsection if the petition is
filed within a reasonable time after the filing deadline. The decision
of the board of equalization regarding a waiver of the filing deadline
is final and not appealable under RCW 84.08.130. Good cause may be
shown by one or more of the following events or circumstances:
(a) Death or serious illness of the taxpayer or his or her
immediate family;
(b) The taxpayer was absent from the address where the taxpayer
normally receives the assessment or value change notice, was absent for
more than fifteen days of the days allowed in subsection (1) of this
section before the filing deadline, and the filing deadline is after
July 1;
(c) Incorrect written advice regarding filing requirements received
from board of equalization staff, county assessor's staff, or staff of
the property tax advisor designated under RCW 84.48.140;
(d) Natural disaster such as flood or earthquake;
(e) Delay or loss related to the delivery of the petition by the
postal service, and documented by the postal service;
(f) The taxpayer was not sent a revaluation notice under RCW
84.40.045 for the current assessment year and the taxpayer can
demonstrate both of the following:
(i) The taxpayer's property value did not change from the previous
year; and
(ii) The taxpayer's property is located in an area revalued by the
assessor for the current assessment year; or
(g) Other circumstances as the department may provide by rule.
(3) The owner or person responsible for payment of taxes on any
property may request that the appeal be heard by the state board of tax
appeals without a hearing by the county board of equalization when the
assessor, the owner or person responsible for payment of taxes on the
property, and a majority of the county board of equalization agree that
a direct appeal to the state board of tax appeals is appropriate. The
state board of tax appeals may reject the appeal, in which case the
county board of equalization must consider the appeal under RCW
84.48.010. Notice of such a rejection, together with the reason
therefor, ((shall)) must be provided to the affected parties and the
county board of equalization within thirty days of receipt of the
direct appeal by the state board.

Sec. 408 RCW 84.40.175 and 2013 c 235 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the time of making the assessment of real property, the assessor
must enter each description of property exempt under the provisions of
chapter 84.36 RCW, and value and list the same in the manner and
subject to the same rule as the assessor is required to assess all
other property, designating in each case to whom such property belongs.
The valuation requirements of this section do not apply to publicly
owned property exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010.
However, when the exempt status of such property no longer applies as
a result of a sale or change in use, the assessor must value and list
such property as of the January 1st assessment date for the year of the
status change. The owner or person responsible for payment of taxes
may thereafter petition the county board of equalization for a change
in the assessed value in accordance with the timing and procedures set
forth in RCW 84.40.038.

Part V
Clarifying Ride Sharing Tax Preferences
Sec. 501 RCW 46.74.010 and 2009 c 557 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions ((set forth)) in this section ((shall)) apply
throughout this chapter((,)) unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise.
(1) "Commuter ride sharing" means a car pool or van pool
arrangement whereby one or more fixed groups not exceeding fifteen
persons each including the drivers, and (a) not fewer than five persons
including the drivers, or (b) not fewer than four persons including the
drivers where at least two of those persons are confined to wheelchairs
when riding, are transported in a passenger motor vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight not exceeding ten thousand pounds, excluding special
rider equipment, between their places of abode or termini near such
places, and their places of employment or educational or other
institutions, each group in a single daily round trip where the drivers
are also on the way to or from their places of employment or
educational or other institution.
(2) "Flexible commuter ride sharing" means a car pool or van pool
arrangement whereby a group of at least two but not exceeding fifteen
persons including the driver is transported in a passenger motor
vehicle with a gross vehicle weight not exceeding ten thousand pounds,
excluding special rider equipment, between their places of abode or
termini near such places, and their places of employment or educational
or other institutions, where the driver is also on the way to or from
his or her place of employment or educational or other institution.
(3) "Persons with special transportation needs" ((means those
persons defined)) has the same meaning as provided in RCW
81.66.010(((4))).
(4) "Ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs"
means an arrangement whereby a group of persons with special
transportation needs, and their attendants, is transported by a public
social service agency or a private, nonprofit transportation provider,
as defined in RCW 81.66.010(((3))), serving persons with special needs,
in a passenger motor vehicle as defined by the department to include
small buses, cutaways, and modified vans not more than twenty-eight
feet long: PROVIDED, That the driver need not be a person with special
transportation needs.
(5) "Ride-sharing operator" means the person, entity, or concern,
not necessarily the driver, responsible for the existence and
continuance of commuter ride sharing, flexible commuter ride sharing,
or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs. The
term "ride-sharing operator" includes but is not limited to an
employer, an employer's agent, an employer-organized association, a
state agency, a county, a city, a public transportation benefit area,
or any other political subdivision that owns or leases a ride-sharing
vehicle.
(6) "Ride-sharing promotional activities" means those activities
involved in forming a commuter ride-sharing arrangement or a flexible
commuter ride-sharing arrangement, including but not limited to
receiving information from existing and prospective ride-sharing
participants, sharing that information with other existing and
prospective ride-sharing participants, matching those persons with
other existing or prospective ride-sharing participants, and making
assignments of persons to ride-sharing arrangements.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.44.015 and 2010 c 161 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Passenger motor vehicles used primarily for commuter ride
sharing and ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs,
as defined in RCW 46.74.010, are not subject to the motor vehicle
excise tax authorized under this chapter if the vehicles are used as
ride-sharing vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months beginning from
the date of purchase.
(2) To qualify for the motor vehicle excise tax exemption for
commuter ride-sharing vehicles, passenger motor vehicles must:
(a) Have a seating capacity of five or six passengers, including
the driver;
(b) Be used for commuter ride sharing;
(c) Be operated either within:
(i) The state's eight largest counties that are required to develop
commute trip reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW; or
(ii) In other counties, or cities and towns within those counties,
that elect to adopt and implement a commute trip reduction plan; and
(d) Meet at least one of the following conditions:
(i) The vehicle must be operated by a public transportation agency
for the general public;
(ii) The vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in
RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute trip reduction program for
their employees; or
(iii) The vehicle must be owned and operated by individual
employees and must be registered either with the employer as part of
its commute trip reduction program or with a public transportation
agency serving the area where the employees live or work. Individual
employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require certification
that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public
transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor
vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained
within their commute trip reduction program.
(3) The registered owner of a passenger motor vehicle described in
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Shall notify the department upon the termination of the primary
use of the vehicle in commuter ride sharing or ride sharing for persons
with special transportation needs; and
(b) Is liable for the motor vehicle excise tax imposed under this
chapter, prorated on the remaining months for which the vehicle is
registered.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.08.0287 and 2001 c 320 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by this chapter ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of passenger motor vehicles which are to be used primarily for
commuter ride sharing or ride sharing for persons with special
transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are
used as ride-sharing vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months
beginning from the date of purchase.
(2) To qualify for the tax exemption, those passenger motor
vehicles with five or six passengers, including the driver, used for
commuter ride-sharing, must be operated either within the state's eight
largest counties that are required to develop commute trip reduction
plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties, or cities
and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and implement a
commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of the
following conditions must apply: (((1))) (a) The vehicle must be
operated by a public transportation agency for the general public; or
(((2))) (b) the vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in
RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute trip reduction program for
their employees; or (((3))) (c) the vehicle must be owned and operated
by individual employees and must be registered either with the employer
as part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public
transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or
work. Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles will
require certification that the vehicle is registered with a major
employer or a public transportation agency. Major employers who own
and operate motor vehicles for their employees must certify that the
commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element
contained within their commute trip reduction program.

Sec. 504 RCW 82.12.0282 and 2001 c 320 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by this chapter ((shall)) does not apply with
respect to the use of passenger motor vehicles used ((as ride-sharing
vehicles by not less than five persons, including the driver, with a
gross vehicle weight not to exceed 10,000 pounds where the primary
usage is for commuter ride sharing, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, by not
less than four persons including the driver when at least two of those
persons are confined to wheelchairs when riding, or passenger motor
vehicles where the primary usage is for)) primarily for commuter ride
sharing or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs,
as defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are used as ride-sharing
vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months beginning with the date of
first use.
(2) To qualify for the tax exemption, those passenger motor
vehicles with five or six passengers, including the driver, used for
commuter ride sharing, must be operated either within the state's eight
largest counties that are required to develop commute trip reduction
plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties, or cities
and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and implement a
commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of the
following conditions must apply: (((1))) (a) The vehicle must be
operated by a public transportation agency for the general public; or
(((2))) (b) the vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in
RCW 70.94.524 as an element of its commute trip reduction program for
their employees; or (((3))) (c) the vehicle must be owned and operated
by individual employees and must be registered either with the employer
as part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public
transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or
work. Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles will
require certification that the vehicle is registered with a major
employer or a public transportation agency. Major employers who own
and operate motor vehicles for their employees must certify that the
commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element
contained within their commute trip reduction program.

Part VI
Simplifying Exemption Certificate Requirements for Farmers
Sec. 601 RCW 82.08.855 and 2007 c 332 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to
an eligible farmer of:
(a) Replacement parts for qualifying farm machinery and equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to the installing of
replacement parts; and
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing of
qualifying farm machinery and equipment, provided that during the
course of repairing no tangible personal property is installed,
incorporated, or placed in, or becomes an ingredient or component of,
the qualifying farm machinery and equipment other than replacement
parts.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
a single transaction involves services that are not exempt under this
section and services that would be exempt under this section if
provided separately, the exemptions provided in subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section apply if: (i) The seller makes a separately
itemized charge for labor and services described in subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section; and (ii) the separately itemized charge does
not exceed the seller's usual and customary charge for such services.
(b) If the requirements in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (2)
are met, the exemption provided in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this
section applies to the separately itemized charge for labor and
services described in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(3)(a) A ((person)) purchaser claiming an exemption under this
section must keep records necessary for the department to verify
eligibility under this section. ((An exemption is available only when
the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate issued by
the department containing such information as the department requires.
The exemption certificate shall be in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(b) The department shall provide an exemption certificate to an
eligible farmer or renew an exemption certificate, upon application by
that eligible farmer. The application must be in a form and manner
prescribed by the department and shall contain the following
information as required by the department:
(i) The name and address of the applicant;
(ii) The uniform business identifier or tax reporting account
number of the applicant, if the applicant is required to be registered
with the department;
(iii) The type of farming engaged in;
(iv) Either a copy of the applicant's information as provided in
(b)(iv)(A) of this subsection or a declaration as provided in
(b)(iv)(B) of this subsection, as elected by the applicant:
(A) A copy of the applicant's Schedule F of Form 1040, Form 1120,
or other applicable form filed with the internal revenue service
indicating the applicant's gross sales or harvested value of
agricultural products for the tax year covered by the return. If the
applicant has not filed a federal income tax return for the prior tax
year or is not required to file a federal income tax return, the
applicant shall provide copies of other documents establishing the
amount of the applicant's gross sales or harvested value of
agricultural products for the tax year immediately preceding the year
in which an application for exemption under this section is submitted
to the department;
(B) A declaration signed under penalty of perjury as provided in
RCW 9A.72.085 that the applicant is an eligible farmer as defined in
subsection (4)(b) of this section. Any person who knowingly makes a
materially false statement on an application submitted to the
department under the provisions of this section shall be guilty of
perjury in the second degree under chapter 9A.72 RCW. In addition, the
person is liable for payment of any taxes for which an exemption under
this section was claimed, with interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, retroactively to the date the exemption was claimed,
and penalties as provided under chapter 82.32 RCW;
(v) The name of the individual authorized to sign the certificate,
printed in a legible fashion;
(vi) The signature of the authorized individual; and
(vii) Other information the department may require to verify the
applicant's eligibility for the exemption.
(c)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, exemption
certificates take effect on the date issued by the department are not
transferable and are valid for the remainder of the calendar year in
which the certificate is issued and the following four calendar years.
The department shall attempt to notify holders of exemption
certificates of the impending expiration of the certificate at least
sixty days before the certificate expires and shall provide an
application for renewal of the certificate.
(ii) When a certificate holder merely changes identity or form of
ownership of an entity and there is no change in beneficial ownership,
the exemption certificate shall be transferred to the new entity upon
written notice to the department by the transferor or transferee.
(d)(i) A person who is an eligible farmer as defined in subsection
(4)(b)(iii) of this section shall be issued a conditional exemption
certificate. The exemption certificate is)) Sellers making tax-exempt
sales under this section must obtain an exemption certificate from the
purchaser in a form and manner prescribed by the department. In lieu
of an exemption certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data
elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
The seller must retain a copy of the certificate or the data elements
for the seller's files.
(b)(i) For a person who is an eligible farmer as defined in
subsection (4)(b)(iv) of this section, the exemption is conditioned
upon:
(A) The eligible farmer having gross sales or a harvested value of
agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by that person of at
least ten thousand dollars in the first full tax year in which the
person engages in business as a farmer; or
(B) The eligible farmer, during the first full tax year in which
that person engages in business as a farmer, growing, raising, or
producing agricultural products having an estimated value at any time
during that year of at least ten thousand dollars, if the person will
not sell or harvest an agricultural product during the first full tax
year in which the person engages in business as a farmer.
(ii) If a person fails to meet the condition provided in
(((d)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection, the department shall revoke the
exemption certificate. The department shall notify the person in
writing of the revocation and the person's responsibility, and due
date, for payment of any taxes for which an exemption under this
section was claimed)) (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection, the person
must repay any taxes exempted under this section. Any taxes for which
an exemption under this section was claimed ((shall be)) are due and
payable to the department within thirty days of the ((date of the
notice revoking the certificate)) end of the first full tax year in
which the person engages in business as a farmer. The department
((shall)) must assess interest on the taxes for which the exemption was
claimed((. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under)) as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the exemption was claimed, and ((shall))
accrues until the taxes for which the exemption was claimed are paid.
Penalties ((shall)) may not be imposed on any tax required to be paid
under this subsection (3)(((d))) (b)(ii) if full payment is received by
the due date. ((Nothing in this subsection (3)(d) prohibits a person
from reapplying for an exemption certificate.))
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply ((to)) throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.04.213.
(b) "Eligible farmer" means:
(i) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 whose gross sales or
harvested value of agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by
that person ((is)) was at least ten thousand dollars for the ((tax
year)) immediately preceding ((the year in which an application for
exemption under this section is submitted to the department;
(ii) The transferee of an exemption certificate under subsection
(3)(c)(ii) of this section where the transferred certificate expires
before the transferee engages in farming operations for a full tax
year, if the combined gross sales or harvested value of agricultural
products that the transferor and transferee have grown, raised, or
produced meet the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection;
(iii) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213, who does not meet the
definition of "eligible farmer" in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection,
and who did not engage in farming for the entire tax year immediately
preceding the year in which application for exemption under this
section is submitted to the department)) tax year;
(ii) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 whose agricultural
products had an estimated value of at least ten thousand dollars for
the immediately preceding tax year, if the person did not sell or
harvest an agricultural product during that year;
(iii) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 who has merely changed
identity or the form of ownership of an entity that was an eligible
farmer, where there was no change in beneficial ownership, and the
combined gross sales, harvested value, or estimated value of
agricultural products by both entities met the requirements of (b)(i)
or (ii) of this subsection for the immediately preceding tax year;
(iv) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213, who does not meet the
definition of "eligible farmer" in (b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection, and who did not engage in farming for the entire
immediately preceding tax year, because the farmer is either new to
farming or newly returned to farming; or
(((iv))) (v) Anyone who otherwise meets the definition of "eligible
farmer" in this subsection except that they are not a "person" as
defined in RCW 82.04.030.
(c) "Farm vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.181.
(d) "Harvested value" means the number of units of the agricultural
product that were grown, raised, or produced, multiplied by the average
sales price of the agricultural product. For purposes of this
subsection (4)(d), "average sales price" means the average price per
unit of agricultural product received by farmers in this state as
reported by the United States department of agriculture's national
agricultural statistics service for the twelve-month period that
coincides with, or that ends closest to, the end of the relevant tax
year, regardless of whether the prices are subject to revision. If the
price per unit of an agricultural product received by farmers in this
state is not available from the national agricultural statistics
service, average sales price may be determined by using the average
price per unit of agricultural product received by farmers in this
state as reported by a recognized authority for the agricultural
product.
(e) "Qualifying farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and
equipment used primarily by an eligible farmer for growing, raising, or
producing agricultural products. "Qualifying farm machinery and
equipment" does not include:
(i) Vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.670, other than farm tractors
as defined in RCW 46.04.180, farm vehicles, and other farm implements.
For purposes of this subsection (4)(e)(i), "farm implement" means
machinery or equipment manufactured, designed, or reconstructed for
agricultural purposes and used primarily by an eligible farmer to grow,
raise, or produce agricultural products, but does not include lawn
tractors and all-terrain vehicles;
(ii) Aircraft;
(iii) Hand tools and hand-powered tools; and
(iv) Property with a useful life of less than one year.
(f)(i) "Replacement parts" means those parts that replace an
existing part, or which are essential to maintain the working
condition, of a piece of qualifying farm machinery or equipment.
(ii) Paint, fuel, oil, hydraulic fluids, antifreeze, and similar
items are not replacement parts except when installed, incorporated, or
placed in qualifying farm machinery and equipment during the course of
installing replacement parts as defined in (f)(i) of this subsection or
making repairs as described in subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(g) "Tax year" means the period for which a person files its
federal income tax return, irrespective of whether the period
represents a calendar year, fiscal year, or some other consecutive
twelve-month period. If a person is not required to file a federal
income tax return, "tax year" means a calendar year.

Sec. 602 RCW 82.08.890 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 601 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Labor and services rendered in respect to repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of qualifying livestock nutrient
management facilities, or to tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of such facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the sale of or charge made for: (A) Labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing of new, or replacing previously
existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities; or (B)
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities during the course
of constructing new, or replacing previously existing, qualifying
livestock nutrient management facilities.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section
applies to sales made after the livestock nutrient management plan is:
(a) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (b) approved as part of the
permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (c) approved as required
under subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section.
(3)(a) ((The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person.))
The department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons,
as defined in subsection (4)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, to the
department of revenue upon request. Conservation districts must
maintain lists of eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(iii)
of this section to allow the department of revenue to verify
eligibility. ((The application must be in a form and manner prescribed
by the department and must contain information regarding the location
of the dairy or animal feeding operation and other information the
department may require.))
(b) A ((person)) purchaser claiming an exemption under this section
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. ((The exemption is available only when the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate)) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must
obtain an exemption certificate from the purchaser in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a
seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement. The seller must retain a copy
of the certificate or the data elements for the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person: (i) Licensed to produce milk
under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management
plan, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) who owns an animal feeding
operation and has a permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) who
owns an animal feeding operation and has a nutrient management plan
approved by a conservation district as meeting natural resource
conservation service field office technical guide standards and who
((possesses an exemption certificate)) qualifies for the exemption
provided under RCW 82.08.855.
(d) "Handling and treatment of livestock manure" means the
activities of collecting, storing, moving, or transporting livestock
manure, separating livestock manure solids from liquids, or applying
livestock manure to the agricultural lands of an eligible person other
than through the use of pivot or linear type traveling irrigation
systems.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.
(f) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment" means the
following tangible personal property for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure, including repair and replacement
parts for such equipment: (i) Aerators; (ii) agitators; (iii) augers;
(iv) conveyers; (v) gutter cleaners; (vi) hard-hose reel traveler
irrigation systems; (vii) lagoon and pond liners and floating covers;
(viii) loaders; (ix) manure composting devices; (x) manure spreaders;
(xi) manure tank wagons; (xii) manure vacuum tanks; (xiii) poultry
house cleaners; (xiv) poultry house flame sterilizers; (xv) poultry
house washers; (xvi) poultry litter saver machines; (xvii) pipes;
(xviii) pumps; (xix) scrapers; (xx) separators; (xxi) slurry injectors
and hoses; and (xxii) wheelbarrows, shovels, and pitchforks.
(g) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities" means the
following structures and facilities for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure: (i) Flush systems; (ii) lagoons;
(iii) liquid livestock manure storage structures, such as concrete
tanks or glass-lined steel tanks; and (iv) structures used solely for
the dry storage of manure, including roofed stacking facilities.
(5) The exemption under this section does not apply to sales made
from July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013.

Sec. 603 RCW 82.12.855 and 2007 c 332 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use by an eligible farmer of:
(a) Replacement parts for qualifying farm machinery and equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to the installing of
replacement parts; and
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing of
qualifying farm machinery and equipment, provided that during the
course of repairing no tangible personal property is installed,
incorporated, or placed in, or becomes a component of, the qualifying
farm machinery and equipment other than replacement parts.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
a single transaction involves services that are not exempt under this
section and services that would be exempt under this section if
provided separately, the exemptions provided in subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section apply if: (i) The seller makes a separately
itemized charge for labor and services described in subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section; and (ii) the separately itemized charge does
not exceed the seller's usual and customary charge for such services.
(b) If the requirements in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (2)
are met, the exemption provided in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this
section applies to the separately itemized charge for labor and
services described in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(3) The definitions and recordkeeping requirements in RCW
82.08.855((, other than the exemption certificate requirement,)) apply
to this section.
(4) If a person is an eligible farmer as defined in RCW
82.08.855(4)(b)(((iii))) (iv) who cannot prove income because the
person is new to farming or newly returned to farming, the exemption
under this section will apply only if one of the conditions in RCW
82.08.855(3)(((d))) (b)(i)(A) or (B) is met. If ((the)) neither of
those conditions are ((not)) met, any taxes for which an exemption
under this section was claimed and interest on such taxes must be paid.
Amounts due under this subsection shall be in accordance with RCW
82.08.855(3)(((d))) (b)(ii)((, except that the due date for payment is
January 31st of the year immediately following the first full tax year
in which the person engaged in business as a farmer)).
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
department ((shall)) may not assess the tax imposed under this chapter
against a person who no longer qualifies as an eligible farmer with
respect to the use of any articles or services exempt under subsection
(1) of this section, if the person was an eligible farmer when the
person first put the articles or services to use in this state.

Sec. 604 RCW 82.12.890 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 602 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by an eligible person of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities in the
course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of such
facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the use of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities during the course of constructing new, or replacing
previously existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal property
and labor and services made after the livestock nutrient management
plan is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) approved as part
of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) approved as
required under RCW 82.08.890(4)(c)(iii).
(3) ((The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of
RCW 82.08.890 apply to this section.)) The definitions and
recordkeeping requirements in RCW 82.08.890 apply to this section.
(4) The exemption under this section does not apply to the use of
tangible personal property and services if first use of the property or
services in this state occurs from July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 Sections 401 and 403 of this act expire on
the date that sections 402 and 404 of this act take effect.

--- END ---