BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.170 and 2013 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington
state from grapes or other agricultural products.
(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as
a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed
under this section may act as a distributor of its own production.
Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic
winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of
its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington
retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common
carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own
production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating
as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection ((shall)) must
comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors
and/or retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may
maintain a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the
distribution of wine of its own production provided that: (a) The
warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and (b)
the number of warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed
one.
(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations
separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve
samples of its own products, with or without charge, ((and)) may sell
wine of its own production at retail, and may sell for off-premises
consumption wines of its own production in kegs or sanitary containers
meeting the applicable requirements of federal law brought to the
premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at
the tap at the time of sale, provided that: (a) Each additional
location has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the
total number of additional locations does not exceed two; (c) a winery
may not act as a distributor at any such additional location; and (d)
any person selling or serving wine at an additional location for on-premise consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server
permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery
license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations
operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot
connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee,
the board may hold all licensees operating the additional location
jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection ((shall)) may be construed
to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery
licenses.
(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward
the two additional retail locations limit specified in this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its
designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection
include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions
pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The winery may not store wine at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the winery offers bottled wine for sale.
The winery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization
for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to
sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application
shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing
all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved
winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information
for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or
its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold.
Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved
winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location,
the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for
any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee
may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling
wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be
deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of
RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

--- END ---