BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185.070 and 2013 c 145 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which funds from the housing trust
fund or other legislative appropriations are available for use by the
department for the housing assistance program, the department must
announce to all known interested parties, and through major media
throughout the state, a grant and loan application period of at least
ninety days' duration. This announcement must be made as often as the
director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources. The
department must then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of the
department as provided in RCW 43.185.050.
(2) In awarding funds under this chapter, the department must:
(a) Provide for a geographic distribution on a statewide basis; and
(b) Until June 30, 2013, consider the total cost and per-unit cost
of each project for which an application is submitted for funding under
RCW 43.185.050(2) (a) and (j), as compared to similar housing projects
constructed or renovated within the same geographic area.
(3) The department, with advice and input from the affordable
housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020, or a
subcommittee of the affordable housing advisory board, must report
recommendations for awarding funds in a cost-effective manner. The
report must include an implementation plan, timeline, and any other
items the department identifies as important to consider to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.
(4) The department must give first priority to applications for
projects and activities which utilize existing privately owned housing
stock including privately owned housing stock purchased by nonprofit
public development authorities and public housing authorities as
created in chapter 35.82 RCW. As used in this subsection, privately
owned housing stock includes housing that is acquired by a federal
agency through a default on the mortgage by the private owner. Such
projects and activities must be evaluated under subsection (5) of this
section. Second priority must be given to activities and projects
which utilize existing publicly owned housing stock. All projects and
activities must be evaluated by some or all of the criteria under
subsection (5) of this section, and similar projects and activities
shall be evaluated under the same criteria.
(5) The department must give preference for applications based on
some or all of the criteria under this subsection, and similar projects
and activities must be evaluated under the same criteria:
(a) The degree of leveraging of other funds that will occur;
(b) The degree of commitment from programs to provide necessary
habilitation and support services for projects focusing on special
needs populations;
(c) Recipient contributions to total project costs, including
allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft and
trade services, and lender interest rate subsidies;
(d) Local government project contributions in the form of
infrastructure improvements, and others;
(e) Projects that encourage ownership, management, and other
project-related responsibility opportunities;
(f) Projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving the
original target group or income level for a period of at least twenty-five years;
(g) The applicant has the demonstrated ability, stability and
resources to implement the project;
(h) Projects which demonstrate serving the greatest need;
(i) Projects that provide housing for persons and families with the
lowest incomes;
(j) Projects serving special needs populations which are under
statutory mandate to develop community housing;
(k) Project location and access to employment centers in the region
or area;
(l) Projects that provide employment and training opportunities for
disadvantaged youth under a youthbuild or youthbuild-type program as
defined in RCW 50.72.020; ((and))
(m) Project location and access to available public transportation
services; and
(n) Projects involving collaborative partnerships between local
school districts and public housing authorities that help children of
low-income families succeed in school.
(6) The department may only approve applications for projects for
persons with mental illness that are consistent with a regional support
network six-year capital and operating plan.

--- END ---