BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that research has
shown the importance of reducing environmental impacts through building
design. The primary focus of high-performance building design under
state law has been an attempt to reduce heating and cooling
requirements over the course of a building's lifetime. However, what
has been overlooked are opportunities to reduce energy consumption,
carbon emissions, and other environmental impacts at earlier stages in
the building prior to and during construction.
The selection of building materials and products, such as using
wood and wood products, provides substantial opportunities to reduce
lifetime energy consumption, carbon emissions, and other environmental
impacts. A key component of comprehensive life-cycle analysis is the
energy and carbon expended in the manufacturing and production of the
building materials being considered in the construction of public
facilities.
Additionally, a thorough examination of the state building code for
any barriers to the use of wood, and an examination of available
options to address those barriers, is necessary to ensure that the
state can benefit, to the maximum extent possible, from the energy and
environmental benefits of this resource.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.35D.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 249 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.
(2) "High-performance public buildings" means high-performance
public buildings designed, constructed, and certified to a standard as
identified in this chapter.
(3) "Institutions of higher education" means the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
the community colleges, and the technical colleges.
(4) "LEED ((silver)) plus W standard" means the ((United States
green building council leadership in)) energy and environmental design
((green building rating)) standard((, referred to as silver standard))
developed and maintained under section 3 of this act.
(5)(a) "Major facility project" means: (i) A construction project
larger than five thousand gross square feet of occupied or conditioned
space as defined in the Washington state energy code; or (ii) a
building renovation project when the cost is greater than fifty percent
of the assessed value and the project is larger than five thousand
gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space as defined in the
Washington state energy code.
(b) "Major facility project" does not include: (i) Projects for
which the department, public school district, or other applicable
agency and the design team determine the LEED ((silver)) plus W
standard or the Washington sustainable school design protocol to be not
practicable; or (ii) transmitter buildings, pumping stations,
hospitals, research facilities primarily used for sponsored laboratory
experimentation, laboratory research, or laboratory training in
research methods, or other similar building types as determined by the
department. When the LEED ((silver)) plus W standard is determined to
be not practicable for a project, then ((it must be determined if any
LEED standard is practicable for the project. If LEED standards or the
Washington sustainable school design protocol are not followed for the
project,)) the public school district or public agency shall report
these reasons to the department.
(6) "Public agency" means every state office, officer, board,
commission, committee, bureau, department, and public higher education
institution.
(7) "Public school district" means a school district eligible to
receive state basic education moneys pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.
(8) "Washington sustainable school design protocol" means the
school design protocol and related information developed by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with school
districts and the school facilities advisory board.
(9) "Embodied energy" means the total amount of energy consumed or
emitted to extract, manufacture, assemble, transport, and install
materials or products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.35D RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must develop a high-performance public building
standard, to be known as the LEED plus W standard, designed to maximize
the sustainability and environmental performance of major facility
projects.
(2) The LEED plus W standard must address the multiple facets of
high-performance public buildings in categories including energy use
and efficiency, sustainable building materials and resources, site
planning, water efficiency, and indoor environmental quality.
(3) In designing and maintaining the LEED plus W standard, the
department must ensure that at least:
(a) Thirty percent of the total points or credits available in the
standard relate to energy. The point allocation for energy must be
based on a life cycle assessment of the building and building materials
and products to include a comprehensive analysis of the project's
energy use ranging from the embodied energy, post-construction energy
efficiency and use, and end-of-life disposal of materials and products;
and
(b) Fifteen percent of the total points or credits available relate
to sustainable building materials and resources. This point allocation
must: (i) Recognize wood and other low-embodied carbon and energy
products as environmentally preferred products; (ii) recognize
materials and products extracted or produced in Washington; and (iii)
provide equitable treatment of wood that has received any credible
third-party sustainable forest certification.
(4) Once in effect, the LEED plus W standard must be reviewed and
updated, if necessary and consistent with the provisions of this
section, every five years beginning in 2015. The department must
include the results of the review and a summary of any changes made in
the report required under RCW 39.35D.030(4). The department may
include in the review and report any legislative recommendations along
with the results of the review, whether relating to recommended changes
to this chapter or otherwise.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.35D.030 and 2011 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any
funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a
financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed,
constructed, and certified to at least the LEED ((silver)) plus W
standard. ((This subsection applies to major facility projects that
have not entered the design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to the
extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of
building or facility.))
(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public
agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state
capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least
the LEED ((silver)) plus W standard. ((This subsection applies to
major facility projects that have not entered the grant application
process prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED
silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.))
(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and
document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility
projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this
section.
(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to
the department on major facility projects and operating savings.
(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in
subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the
governor and legislature by September 1st of each ((even-numbered))
year ((beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016)). In its report, the
department shall also report on the implementation of this chapter,
including information required under section 3 of this act and, if
applicable, reasons why the LEED plus W standard was not used as
required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The department shall make
recommendations regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter,
including a discussion of incentives and disincentives related to
implementing this chapter.
(((5) For the purposes of determining compliance with the
requirement for a project to be designed, constructed, and certified to
at least the LEED silver standard, the department must credit one
additional point for a project that uses wood products with a credible
third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated
under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act. For
projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an
additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the
LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the standard
under this section.))

Sec. 5 RCW 39.35D.040 and 2011 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public school districts
receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed and
constructed to at least the LEED ((silver)) plus W standard or the
Washington sustainable school design protocol. ((To the extent
appropriate LEED silver or Washington sustainable school design
protocol standards exist for the type of building or facility, this
subsection applies to major facility projects that have not received
project approval from the superintendent of public instruction prior
to: (a) July 1, 2006, for volunteering school districts; (b) July 1,
2007, for class one school districts; and (c) July 1, 2008, for class
two school districts.))
(2) Public school districts under this section shall: (a) Monitor
and document appropriate operating benefits and savings resulting from
major facility projects designed and constructed as required under this
section for a minimum of five years following local board acceptance of
a project receiving state funding; and (b) report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction. The form and content of each
report must be mutually developed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction in consultation with school districts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall consolidate the
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into one report and
report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each ((even-numbered)) year ((beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016)). In its
report, the superintendent of public instruction shall also report on
the implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED plus
W standard or Washington sustainable school design protocol was not
used as required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The superintendent of public
instruction shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing
implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives
and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
issue guidelines for administering this chapter for public school
districts. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and
method for employing and verifying compliance with the LEED ((silver))
plus W standard or the Washington sustainable school design protocol.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the
school facilities advisory board as a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of affected public schools, the
superintendent of public instruction, the department, and others at the
superintendent of public instruction's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the
superintendent of public instruction implement this chapter.
(((6) For projects that comply with this section by meeting the
LEED silver standard, the superintendent of public instruction must
credit one additional point for a project that uses wood products with
a credible third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests
regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act.
For projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an
additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the
LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section.))

Sec. 6 RCW 39.35D.060 and 2006 c 263 s 332 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department, in consultation with affected public
agencies, shall develop and issue guidelines for administering this
chapter for public agencies. The purpose of the guidelines is to
define a procedure and method for employing and verifying activities
necessary for certification to at least the LEED ((silver)) plus W
standard for major facility projects.
(b) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall amend their fee schedules for architectural and
engineering services to accommodate the requirements in the design of
major facility projects under this chapter.
(c) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall procure architecture and engineering services
consistent with chapter 39.80 RCW.
(d) Major facility projects designed to meet standards identified
in this chapter must include building commissioning as a critical cost-saving part of the construction process. This process includes input
from the project design and construction teams and the project
ownership representatives.
(e) As provided in the request for proposals for construction
services, the operating agency shall hold a preproposal conference for
prospective bidders to discuss compliance with and achievement of
standards identified in this chapter for prospective respondents.
(2) The department shall create a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of representatives from the design and
construction industry involved in public works contracting, personnel
from the affected public agencies responsible for overseeing public
works projects, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and others at the department's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the department
implement this chapter.
(3) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.35D.070 and 2005 c 12 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A member of the design or construction teams may not be held liable
for the failure of a major facility project to meet the LEED ((silver))
plus W standard or other ((LEED)) standard established for the project
as long as a good faith attempt was made to achieve the ((LEED))
standard set for the project.

Sec. 8 RCW 39.35D.090 and 2005 c 12 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((is the intent and an established goal of the LEED program as
authored by the United States green building council to increase demand
for building materials and products that are extracted and manufactured
locally, thereby reducing the environmental impacts and to support the
local economy. Therefore, it)) is the intent of the legislature to
emphasize this defined goal and establish a priority to use Washington
state based resources, building materials, products, industries,
manufacturers, and other businesses to provide economic development to
Washington state and to meet the objectives of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The state building code council must, in
consultation with appropriate agencies, subject matter experts, and
stakeholders:
(a) Review the state building code and identify: Existing barriers
in the code to the use of wood and wood products; options to facilitate
the greater use of wood and wood products; the safety, performance, and
energy efficiency and embodied energy benefits, challenges, and any
costs associated with each of those options; and make legislative
recommendations; and
(b) Review the international green construction code and identify
the benefits, challenges, and any costs to the state and its citizens
associated with its inclusion in the state building code; and make
legislative recommendations regarding its potential inclusion in the
state building code.
(2) The state building code council must provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives that
includes its findings and any recommendations by December 31, 2014.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department of enterprise services
must consult with the high-performance buildings advisory committee
established under RCW 39.35D.060 and other appropriate agencies,
subject matter experts, and stakeholders in developing the initial
standard required under section 3 of this act. The department of
enterprise services must submit the standard to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31,
2014. The legislature may review and, if desired, direct modifications
by legislative enactment during the 2015 legislative session.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2, 4, and 5 through 8 of this act
take effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---