BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.003 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 102 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.
(2) "Director" means the director of enterprise services.
(3) "Leaf blower" means any portable machine powered by a gasoline
engine used to blow leaves, dirt, and other debris off sidewalks,
driveways, lawns, or other surfaces.
(4) "State agency" means any office, department, division, bureau,
board, commission, or other agency of the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 204 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The director of enterprise services shall have custody and
control of the capitol buildings and grounds, supervise and direct
proper care, heating, lighting and repairing thereof, and designate
rooms in the capitol buildings to be occupied by various state
officials.
(b) In addition to the powers and duties as provided under RCW
43.19.005, the director shall ensure the maintenance and care of
grounds under the control of state agencies do not include the use of
leaf blowers.
(2) During the 2007-2009 biennium, responsibility for development
of the "Wheeler block" on the capitol campus as authorized in section
6013, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 shall be transferred from the
department of general administration to the department of information
services.
(3) State agencies are prohibited from using leaf blowers.

--- END ---