BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that nature
provides an extraordinary gift of wild fish to the people, ecosystems,
and native species of the Pacific Northwest, creating significant
economic, cultural, and ecological value. Wild salmon have flourished
for thousands of years along the west coast, developing unique
characteristics ensuring their survival in a variety of river, coastal,
and ocean conditions. Historically, salmon have been the most
important food source for tribal communities. Salmon are considered an
icon of our region, celebrated in art, storytelling, culinary
traditions, and are an essential component of the economic engine of
our maritime industry. Tribal, commercial, and recreational harvests
of salmon, along with the production of salmon in captivity, have
defined our region in the minds and imaginations of people around the
world, providing a fine food for their dinner plates.
(2) Human activities that pose a risk to our region's native
species need to be assessed and protections put into place. In 2002,
the Washington state fish and wildlife commission, concerned that the
United States food and drug administration might approve genetically
engineered salmon, adopted rules banning production of genetically
engineered fish in state waters. Additional legislation is now needed
to label fish that are created by combining DNA from unrelated species
to create "novel" life forms that could not occur naturally.
Inadequate health evaluations by the United States food and drug
administration (such as tests on allergenicity based on only six fish)
require that consumers be advised with appropriate labeling that they
may be purchasing genetically engineered fish.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.125.020 and 2001 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter,)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Genetically engineered" means any food that is produced
from an organism or organisms in which the genetic material has been
changed through the application of: (i) In vitro nucleic acid
techniques including recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid techniques and
the direct injection of nucleic acid into cells or organelles. In
vitro nucleic acid techniques include, but are not limited to,
recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid or ribonucleic acid techniques that
use vector systems and techniques involving the direct introduction
into the organisms of hereditary material prepared outside the
organisms, such as microinjection, macroinjection, chemoporation,
electroporation, microencapsulation, and liposome fusion; or (ii)
fusion of cells, including protoplast fusion, or hybridization
techniques that overcome natural physiological, reproductive, or
recombination barriers, where the donor cells or protoplasts do not
fall within the same taxonomic family, in a way that does not occur by
natural multiplication or natural recombination.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, "organism" means
any biological entity capable of replication, reproduction, or
transferring genetic material.
(2) "Fin fish" means any fish having fins that is consumed by
humans, including salmon as defined in RCW 69.04.932.
(3) "Marine aquatic farming location" means a complete complex that
may be composed of various marine enclosures, net pens, or other
rearing vessels, food handling facilities, or other facilities related
to the rearing of Atlantic salmon or other fin fish in marine waters.
A marine aquatic farming location is distinguished from the individual
facilities that collectively compose the location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.125 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person may produce genetically engineered fin fish in state
waters.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor. Each
instance of a genetically engineered fin fish being produced is an
individual violation of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.04.932 and 2013 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercially caught" means wild or hatchery-raised salmon
harvested in the wild by commercial fishers. The term does not apply
to farmed fish raised exclusively by private sector aquaculture.
(2) "Food fish" means fresh or saltwater fin fish and other forms
of aquatic animal life other than crustaceans, mollusks, birds, and
mammals where the animal life is intended for human consumption.
(3) "Genetically engineered" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
77.125.020.
(4) "Salmon" means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except
those classified as game fish in RCW 77.08.020, and includes:

SCIENTIFIC NAME COMMON NAME

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon or king salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon or silver salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum or "keta" salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye or "red" salmon

Salmo salar (in other than Atlantic salmon

its landlocked form)

(((4))) (5) "Shellfish" means crustaceans and all mollusks where
the animal life is intended for human consumption.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.04.934 and 2013 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to knowingly sell or offer for sale at wholesale
or retail any fresh, frozen, or processed salmon without identifying:
(a) Private sector cultured aquatic salmon or salmon products as
farm-raised salmon((, or identifying));
(b) Commercially caught salmon or salmon products as commercially
caught salmon; or
(c) Genetically engineered salmon or salmon products as being
genetically engineered.
(2) Identification of the products under subsection (1) of this
section must be made to the buyer at the point of sale such that the
buyer can make an informed purchasing decision for his or her
protection, health, and safety.
(3) A violation of this section constitutes misbranding under RCW
69.04.938 and is punishable as a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or
felony depending on the fair market value of the fish or shellfish
involved in the violation.
(4) Subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply to
salmon that is minced, pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.
(5) This section does not apply to a commercial fisher properly
licensed under chapter 77.65 RCW and lawfully engaged in the sale of
fish to a fish buyer.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes using additional descriptive
language or trade names to describe food fish or shellfish as long as
the labeling requirements of this section are met.

--- END ---