BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the large number
of individuals involved in the juvenile justice and criminal justice
systems with substance abuse challenges is of significant concern.
Access to effective treatment is critical to the successful treatment
of individuals in the early stages of their contact with the juvenile
justice and criminal justice systems. Such access may prevent further
involvement in the systems. The effective use of substance abuse
treatment options can result not only in significant cost savings for
the juvenile justice and criminal justice systems, but can benefit the
lives of individuals who face substance abuse challenges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A pilot program is established in Snohomish county for the
purpose of studying the effect of chemical dependency diversions as
described in this section.
(2) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the
individual:
(a) Has committed acts constituting a nonfelony crime that is not
a serious offense as identified in RCW 9.41.010;
(b) Has not committed a possible violation of laws relating to
driving or being in physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under chapter 46.20 RCW;
and
(c) Is known by history or consultation with staff designated by
the county to suffer from a chemical dependency, as defined in RCW
70.96A.020, the arresting officer may:
(i) Take the individual to an approved chemical dependency
treatment provider for treatment. The individual must be examined by
a chemical dependency treatment provider within three hours of arrival;
(ii) Take the individual to an emergency medical service
customarily used for incapacitated persons, if no approved treatment
program is readily available. The individual must be examined by a
chemical dependency treatment provider within three hours of arrival;
(iii) Refer the individual to a chemical dependency professional
for initial detention and proceeding under chapter 70.96A RCW; or
(iv) Release the individual upon agreement to voluntary
participation in outpatient treatment.
(3) If the individual is released to the community, the chemical
dependency provider shall inform the arresting officer of the release
within a reasonable period of time after the release if the arresting
officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact
information to the provider.
(4) In deciding whether to refer the individual to treatment under
this section, the police officer shall be guided by standards mutually
agreed upon with the prosecuting authority, which address, at a
minimum, the length, seriousness, and recency of the known criminal
history of the individual, the mental health and substance abuse
history of the individual, where available, and the circumstances
surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.
(5) The police officer shall submit a written report to the
prosecuting attorney within ten days.
(6) Any agreement to participate in treatment shall not require
individuals to stipulate to any of the alleged facts regarding the
criminal activity as a prerequisite to participation in a chemical
dependency treatment alternative. The agreement is inadmissible in any
criminal or civil proceeding. The agreement does not create immunity
from prosecution for the alleged criminal activity.
(7) If an individual violates such agreement and the chemical
dependency treatment alternative is no longer appropriate, the chemical
dependency provider shall inform the referring law enforcement agency
of the violation.
(8) Nothing in this section may be construed as barring the
referral of charges to the prosecuting attorney, or the filing of
criminal charges by the prosecuting attorney.
(9) The police officer, staff designated by the county, or
treatment facility personnel are immune from liability for any good
faith conduct under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Snohomish county shall evaluate the effects
of the pilot program as provided in section 2 of this act. Snohomish
county shall submit a report to the legislature consistent with RCW
43.01.036. The report must summarize the effectiveness of the pilot
program and include: How often the chemical dependency diversion was
used, the kind of treatment the person engaged in, how often treatment
was completed, the number of prosecutions, any cost savings to the
county or state, any cost shifting from the county or state onto other
systems, and the recidivism rate of offenders involved in the pilot
program. The report may include any recommendations to the legislature
to improve the effectiveness of the pilot program. The report is due
July 1, 2015, and every other year until July 1, 2019.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.40.042 and 2013 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
juvenile has committed acts constituting a nonfelony crime that is not
a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092, and the officer
believes that the juvenile suffers from a mental disorder, and the
local prosecutor has entered into an agreement with law enforcement
regarding the detention of juveniles who may have a mental disorder or
may be suffering from chemical dependency, the arresting officer,
instead of taking the juvenile to the local juvenile detention
facility, may take the juvenile to:
(a) An evaluation and treatment facility as defined in RCW
71.34.020 if the juvenile suffers from a mental disorder and the
facility has been identified as an alternative location by agreement of
the prosecutor, law enforcement, and the mental health provider;
(b) A facility or program identified by agreement of the prosecutor
and law enforcement; or
(c) A location already identified and in use by law enforcement for
the purpose of ((mental)) a behavioral health diversion.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an "alternative location"
means a facility or program that has the capacity to evaluate a youth
and, if determined to be appropriate, develop a behavioral health
intervention plan and initiate treatment.
(3) If a juvenile is taken to any location described in subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this section, the juvenile may be held for up to
twelve hours and must be examined by a mental health or chemical
dependency professional within three hours of arrival.
(4) The authority provided pursuant to this section is in addition
to existing authority under RCW 10.31.110 and section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.40.080 and 2013 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A diversion agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile
accused of an offense and a diversion unit whereby the juvenile agrees
to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution. Such agreements
may be entered into only after the prosecutor, or probation counselor
pursuant to this chapter, has determined that probable cause exists to
believe that a crime has been committed and that the juvenile committed
it. Such agreements shall be entered into as expeditiously as
possible.
(2) A diversion agreement shall be limited to one or more of the
following:
(a) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours,
not to be performed during school hours if the juvenile is attending
school;
(b) Restitution limited to the amount of actual loss incurred by
any victim;
(c) Attendance at up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty
hours of educational or informational sessions at a community agency.
The educational or informational sessions may include sessions relating
to respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness;
accountability; self-worth; responsibility; work ethics; good
citizenship; literacy; and life skills. If an assessment identifies
mental health or chemical dependency needs, a youth may access up to
thirty hours of counseling. The counseling sessions may include
services demonstrated to improve behavioral health and reduce
recidivism. For purposes of this section, "community agency" may also
mean a community-based nonprofit organization, a physician, a
counselor, a school, or a treatment provider, if approved by the
diversion unit. The state shall not be liable for costs resulting from
the diversion unit exercising the option to permit diversion agreements
to mandate attendance at up to thirty hours of counseling and/or up to
twenty hours of educational or informational sessions;
(d) A fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars;
(e) Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school,
or work, and restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical
areas; and
(f) Upon request of any victim or witness, requirements to refrain
from any contact with victims or witnesses of offenses committed by the
juvenile.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section, youth courts are not limited to the conditions imposed by
subsection (2) of this section in imposing sanctions on juveniles
pursuant to RCW 13.40.630.
(4) In assessing periods of community restitution to be performed
and restitution to be paid by a juvenile who has entered into a
diversion agreement, the court officer to whom this task is assigned
shall consult with the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or
guardian. To the extent possible, the court officer shall advise the
victims of the juvenile offender of the diversion process, offer victim
impact letter forms and restitution claim forms, and involve members of
the community. Such members of the community shall meet with the
juvenile and advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion
agreement and shall supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.
(5)(a) A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months
and may include a period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of
the divertee.
(b) If additional time is necessary for the juvenile to complete
restitution to a victim, the time period limitations of this subsection
may be extended by an additional six months.
(c) If the juvenile has not paid the full amount of restitution by
the end of the additional six-month period, then the juvenile shall be
referred to the juvenile court for entry of an order establishing the
amount of restitution still owed to the victim. In this order, the
court shall also determine the terms and conditions of the restitution,
including a payment plan extending up to ten years if the court
determines that the juvenile does not have the means to make full
restitution over a shorter period. For the purposes of this subsection
(5)(c), the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a
maximum term of ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday.
Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the juvenile
court may extend the judgment for restitution an additional ten years.
The court may relieve the juvenile of the requirement to pay full or
partial restitution if the juvenile reasonably satisfies the court that
he or she does not have the means to make full or partial restitution
and could not reasonably acquire the means to pay the restitution over
a ten-year period. If the court relieves the juvenile of the
requirement to pay full or partial restitution, the court may order an
amount of community restitution that the court deems appropriate. The
county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the order.
The restitution to victims named in the order shall be paid prior to
any payment for other penalties or monetary assessments. A juvenile
under obligation to pay restitution may petition the court for
modification of the restitution order.
(6) The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court
at any time prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.
(7) Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process
in all contacts with a diversion unit regardless of whether the
juveniles are accepted for diversion or whether the diversion program
is successfully completed. Such due process shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) A written diversion agreement shall be executed stating all
conditions in clearly understandable language;
(b) Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only
grounds for termination;
(c) No divertee may be terminated from a diversion program without
being given a court hearing, which hearing shall be preceded by:
(i) Written notice of alleged violations of the conditions of the
diversion program; and
(ii) Disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the divertee;
(d) The hearing shall be conducted by the juvenile court and shall
include:
(i) Opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence;
(ii) The right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;
(iii) A written statement by the court as to the evidence relied on
and the reasons for termination, should that be the decision; and
(iv) Demonstration by evidence that the divertee has substantially
violated the terms of his or her diversion agreement;
(e) The prosecutor may file an information on the offense for which
the divertee was diverted:
(i) In juvenile court if the divertee is under eighteen years of
age; or
(ii) In superior court or the appropriate court of limited
jurisdiction if the divertee is eighteen years of age or older.
(8) The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be
responsible for providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters
to effectively communicate during diversion unit hearings or
negotiations.
(9) The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee
of his or her rights as provided in this chapter.
(10) The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to a restorative
justice program, community-based counseling, or treatment programs.
(11) The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial
interview for purposes of advising the juvenile as to whether he or she
desires to participate in the diversion process or to appear in the
juvenile court. The juvenile may be represented by counsel at any
critical stage of the diversion process, including intake interviews
and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be fully advised at the
intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the relevant services
an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section, intake
interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.
The juvenile shall be advised that a diversion agreement shall
constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW
13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be
obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be maintained by the
diversion unit together with the diversion agreement, and a copy of
both documents shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the
content of such advisement in simple language.
(12) When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the
juvenile court may receive only the following information for
dispositional purposes:
(a) The fact that a charge or charges were made;
(b) The fact that a diversion agreement was entered into;
(c) The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;
(d) Whether the alleged offender performed his or her obligations
under such agreement; and
(e) The facts of the alleged offense.
(13) A diversion unit may refuse to enter into a diversion
agreement with a juvenile. When a diversion unit refuses to enter a
diversion agreement with a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such
juvenile to the court for action and shall forward to the court the
criminal complaint and a detailed statement of its reasons for refusing
to enter into a diversion agreement. The diversion unit shall also
immediately refer the case to the prosecuting attorney for action if
such juvenile violates the terms of the diversion agreement.
(14) A diversion unit may, in instances where it determines that
the act or omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to
it involved no victim, or where it determines that the juvenile
referred to it has no prior criminal history and is alleged to have
committed an illegal act involving no threat of or instance of actual
physical harm and involving not more than fifty dollars in property
loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the person or
firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release such
a juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion
unit's authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this
subsection includes the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment programs or a restorative justice
program. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be advised
that the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been
referred shall constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as
defined by RCW 13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such
advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall
be maintained by the unit, and a copy of the document shall be
delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The
supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the content of such
advisement in simple language. A juvenile determined to be eligible by
a diversion unit for release as provided in this subsection shall
retain the same right to counsel and right to have his or her case
referred to the court for formal action as any other juvenile referred
to the unit.
(15) A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion
agreement entered into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and
which includes a period extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth
birthday.
(16) If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably
be paid due to a change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be
modified at the request of the divertee and with the concurrence of the
diversion unit to convert an unpaid fine into community restitution.
The modification of the diversion agreement shall be in writing and
signed by the divertee and the diversion unit. The number of hours of
community restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty shall be converted
at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.
(17) Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid
into the county general fund in accordance with procedures established
by the juvenile court administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used
only for juvenile services. In the expenditure of funds for juvenile
services, there shall be a maintenance of effort whereby counties
exhaust existing resources before using amounts collected under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 3 of this act expire July 31,
2019.

--- END ---