BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2012 c 229 s 582 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge((,)); the director of
agriculture((,)); the director of the department of services for the
blind((,)); the chief information officer of the office of chief
information officer((,)); the director of the state system of community
and technical colleges((,)); the director of commerce((,)); the
director of the consolidated technology services agency((,)); the
secretary of corrections((,)); the director of early learning((,)); the
director of ecology((,)); the commissioner of employment security((,));
the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council((,)); the
director of enterprise services((,)); the secretary of the state
finance committee((,)); the director of financial management((,)); the
director of fish and wildlife((,)); the executive secretary of the
forest practices appeals board((,)); the director of the gambling
commission((,)); the secretary of health((,)); the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority((,)); the executive secretary of
the health care facilities authority((,)); the executive secretary of
the higher education facilities authority((,)); the executive secretary
of the horse racing commission((,)); the human resources director((,));
the executive secretary of the human rights commission((,)); the
executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board((,));
the executive director of the state investment board((,)); the director
of labor and industries((,)); the director of licensing((,)); the
director of the lottery commission((,)); the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises((,)); the director of parks
and recreation((,)); the executive director of the public disclosure
commission((,)); the chief executive officer, general counsel, vice
presidents, and board of trustees of any public hospital district with
a population over one hundred fifty thousand; the executive director of
the Puget Sound partnership((,)); the director of the recreation and
conservation office((,)); the director of retirement systems((,)); the
director of revenue((,)); the secretary of social and health
services((,)); the chief of the Washington state patrol((,)); the
executive secretary of the board of tax appeals((,)); the secretary of
transportation((,)); the secretary of the utilities and transportation
commission((,)); the director of veterans affairs((,)); the president
of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The
Evergreen State College((,)); and each district and each campus
president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities
authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission,
human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of
industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on
judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery
fund authority board of trustees, liquor control board, lottery
commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel
resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control
hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees'
benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon
recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State
University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of
trustees.

--- END ---