BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.81.080 and 2002 c 218 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A municipality shall have the right to acquire by condemnation,
in accordance with the procedure provided for condemnation by such
municipality for other purposes, any interest in real property, which
it may deem necessary for a community renewal project under this
chapter after the adoption by the local governing body of a resolution
declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein
is necessary for such purpose. Condemnation for community renewal of
blighted areas is declared to be a public use, and property already
devoted to any other public use or acquired by the owner or a
predecessor in interest by eminent domain may be condemned for the
purposes of this chapter.
(2) In any judicial action to condemn blighted areas, a
municipality may not condemn any aggregate area of real property unless
the municipality:
(a) Demonstrates that each separate and distinct interest in real
property within the aggregate area poses an identifiable threat to
public health, safety, or welfare by reason of the unsanitary, unsafe,
or substandard condition of the premises, or the unlawful use thereof;
and
(b) Demonstrates that reasonable actions to mitigate the threat or
conditions have been attempted with no substantial improvement in the
condition of the property. Reasonable actions may include but are not
limited to administrative actions by the municipality, court actions
other than condemnation proceedings, actions by the owner of the
premises to come into compliance with code, and other reasonable
accommodations.
(3) The award of compensation for real property taken for such a
project shall not be increased by reason of any increase in the value
of the real property caused by the assembly, clearance, or
reconstruction, or proposed assembly, clearance, or reconstruction in
the project area. No allowance shall be made for the improvements
begun on real property after notice to the owner of such property of
the institution of proceedings to condemn such property. Evidence
shall be admissible bearing upon the insanitary, unsafe, or substandard
condition of the premises, or the unlawful use thereof.

--- END ---