BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that all
political power is inherent in the people, and governments derive their
just powers from the consent of the governed, and are established to
protect and maintain individual rights; and that a frequent recurrence
to fundamental principles is essential to the security of individual
right and the perpetuity of free government.
(2) The legislature declares that it is a fundamental principle
that the state Constitution embodies public policy of the highest order
and priority; that it is a compelling interest of the state of
Washington to ensure that the provisions of the state Constitution are
guaranteed and enforced in order to protect and maintain the liberties
and individual rights of the people of the state of Washington; that
the people of the state of Washington should be able to rely primarily
upon the state Constitution for the protection of their liberties and
individual rights; and that it is a legitimate exercise of the police
power of the state of Washington to preserve the public peace, health,
morals, and safety of the people of the state of Washington by
establishing an enforcement mechanism for redress for violations of the
state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Every governmental entity that, under
color of a statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, subjects
or causes to be subjected, a citizen, inhabitant, or domiciliary of the
state of Washington to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or
immunities secured by the Constitution of the state of Washington, is
liable to the person injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or
other proper proceeding for the redress.
(2) A person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter may recover all damages sustained including,
but not limited to, damages or remedies made available under the Civil
Rights Act of 1871 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1983).
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that persons who are
injured by a violation of the state Constitution are eligible for
redress, that future violations of the state Constitution be deterred
thereby, and that this statute be construed liberally for the
accomplishment of its declared purpose in this chapter. Nothing
contained in this chapter shall be construed to deny the right of a
person to institute an action or pursue any civil or criminal remedy
based upon an alleged violation of his or her civil rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) For purposes of this chapter,
"governmental entity" means any federal, state, or local government.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, a governmental entity is
liable for the act of an agency, instrumentality, officer, or employee
done under color of a statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, an officer, employee, or
agent of a governmental entity is liable only to the extent that he or
she acts under color of a statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or
usage.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "person" means a natural
person, and does not include a corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, or other legal or
commercial entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In an action or proceeding to enforce a
provision of this chapter, a court may not impose or levy as a remedy
or otherwise a general or special tax, assessment, fee, toll, charge,
or other monetary obligation on the citizens of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In an action or proceeding to enforce a
provision of this chapter, the prevailing party may recover any and all
attorneys' fees and costs for any act in violation of this chapter,
including but not limited to expert witness fees, to the same extent
recoverable under RCW 49.60.030(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies to causes of action arising
after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---