BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Dependent" means a birth child, adopted child, or stepchild of
a military service member.
(b) "Domiciliary resident" means a person who intends to make
Washington his or her principal place of residency for an indefinite
period and to which the person intends to return following absence.
(c) "Home and community-based services programs" means the programs
established under the state medical assistance program under plans or
waivers as defined in the federal social security act in accordance
with the plans or waivers adopted by the secretary to provide attendant
care services to individuals in need of in-home care who would require
admission to an institution if the attendant care services were not
otherwise provided.
(d) "Military service" means service in the armed forces, armed
forces reserves, or membership in the Washington national guard.
(e) "Military service member" means a person who is currently in
military service or who has separated from such military service in the
previous eighteen months.
(2)(a) An application may be filed with the department of social
and health services for a dependent to receive services provided under
the home and community-based services programs. The secretary of
social and health services shall review completed applications in the
order received. In reviewing applications, the secretary shall
determine whether the dependent is eligible and qualified to receive
services provided under the home and community-based services programs,
excluding from consideration any military service health benefit plan
coverage for the dependent. If the dependent is eligible and
qualified, the secretary shall approve the application.
(b) Upon approval of the application, the secretary shall direct
that services be provided to the dependent on the day in which the
dependent lives in Washington if the dependent furnishes to the
secretary:
(i) A copy of the military service member's Form DD-214 or other
equivalent discharge paperwork;
(ii) Proof of the military service member's residence in Washington
within ninety days from the date of separation from military service;
and
(iii) A written statement that the dependent has no health benefit
plan coverage, excluding from consideration any military service health
benefit plan coverage for the dependent.
(c) Dependents must receive services provided under home and
community-based services programs when physically residing in
Washington if the dependent is eligible and qualified and the military
service member is a domiciliary resident of Washington.
(d) A military service member may be considered a domiciliary
resident of Washington if the military service member demonstrates
intent to make Washington a principal place of residence. Factors
supporting the service member's intent include, but are not limited to,
the following:
(i) The military service member is registered to vote in
Washington;
(ii) The military service member has registered a vehicle in
Washington;
(iii) The military service member holds a current valid Washington
driver's license or identicard; and
(iv) The military service member maintains a residence in this
state for personal use.
(3) Within ninety days prior to receiving services provided under
the home and community-based services programs pursuant to subsection
(2)(b) of this section, a dependent may request to be reassessed by the
department of social and health services. Such a request must include
a report by a qualified medical professional detailing changes to the
level of services provided under the home and community-based services
program that may be necessary for the dependent. If requested, the
department shall provide such an assessment.
(4) There is a rebuttable presumption that a dependent of a
military service member shall maintain eligibility for any home and
community-based services programs on the day the secretary of social
and health services approves the dependent's application.
(5) The secretary of social and health services shall request a
waiver from the appropriate federal agency if a waiver is necessary to
implement the provisions of this section.
(6) The department of social and health services may adopt rules
necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

--- END ---