BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district may impose an excise tax on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on
any premises having fewer than forty lodging units. Except for any tax
imposed under subsection (4) or (5) of this section, if a public
facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to
December 31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the
excise tax if a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the
tax has been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the public
facilities district voting on the proposition.
(2) The rate of the tax may not exceed two percent and the proceeds
of the tax may only be used for the acquisition, design, construction,
remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repairing, and
operation of its public facilities. This excise tax may not be imposed
until the district has approved the proposal to acquire, design, and
construct the public facilities.
(3) Except for a public facilities district created within a county
with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more for the
purpose of acquiring, owning, and operating a convention and trade
center, a public facilities district may not impose the tax authorized
in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section was
imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise taxes,
including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on
the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent.
(4) To replace the tax authorized by RCW 67.40.090, a public
facilities district created within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more for the purpose of acquiring,
owning, and operating a convention and trade center may impose an
excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax
may be levied on any premises: (a) Having fewer than sixty lodging
units; or (b) classified as a hostel. The rate of the tax may not
exceed seven percent within the portion of the district that
corresponds to the boundaries of the largest city within the public
facilities district and may not exceed 2.8 percent in the remainder of
the district. The tax imposed under this subsection (4) may not be
collected prior to the transfer date defined in RCW 36.100.230.
(5) To replace the tax authorized by RCW 67.40.130, a public
facilities district created within a county with a population of one
million five hundred thousand or more for the purpose of acquiring,
owning, and operating a convention and trade center may impose an
additional excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing
of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that
no such tax may be levied on any premises: (a) Having fewer than sixty
lodging units; or (b) classified as a hostel. The rate of the
additional excise tax may not exceed two percent and may be imposed
only within the portion of the district that corresponds to the
boundaries of the largest city within the public facilities district
and may not be imposed in the remainder of the district. The tax
imposed under this subsection (5) may not be collected prior to the
transfer date specified in RCW 36.100.230. The tax imposed under this
subsection (5) must be credited against the amount of the tax otherwise
due to the state from those same taxpayers under chapter 82.08 RCW.
The tax under this subsection (5) may be imposed only for the purpose
of paying or securing the payment of the principal of and interest on
obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district and
paying annual payment amounts to the state under subsection (6)(a) of
this section. The authority to impose the additional excise tax under
this subsection (5) expires on the date that is the earlier of (a) July
1, 2029, or (b) the date on which all obligations issued or incurred by
the public facilities district to implement any redemption, prepayment,
or legal defeasance of outstanding obligations under RCW
36.100.230(3)(a) are no longer outstanding.
(6)(a) Commencing with the first full fiscal year of the state
after the transfer date defined in RCW 36.100.230 and for so long as a
public facilities district imposes a tax under subsection (5) of this
section, the public facilities district must transfer to the state of
Washington on June 30th of each state fiscal year an annual payment
amount.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (6), "annual payment
amount" means an amount equal to revenues received by the public
facilities district in the fiscal year from the additional excise tax
imposed under subsection (5) of this section plus an interest charge
calculated on one-half the annual payment amount times an interest rate
equal to the average annual rate of return for the prior calendar year
in the Washington state local government investment pool created in
chapter 43.250 RCW.
(c)(i) If the public facilities district in any fiscal year is
required to apply additional lodging excise tax revenues to the payment
of principal and interest on obligations it issues or incurs, and the
public facilities district is unable to pay all or any portion of the
annual payment amount to the state, the deficiency is deemed to be a
loan from the state to the public facilities district for the purpose
of assisting the district in paying such principal and interest and
must be repaid by the public facilities district to the state after
providing for the payment of the principal of and interest on
obligations issued or incurred by the public facilities district, all
on terms established by an agreement between the state treasurer and
the public facilities district executed prior to the transfer date.
Any agreement between the state treasurer and the public facilities
district must specify the term for the repayment of the deficiency in
the annual payment amount with an interest rate equal to the twenty
bond general obligation bond buyer index plus one percentage point.
(ii) Outstanding obligations to repay any loans deemed to have been
made to the public facilities district as provided in any such
agreements between the state treasurer and the public facilities
district survive the expiration of the additional excise tax under
subsection (5) of this section.
(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (6)(c), "additional
lodging excise tax revenues" mean the tax revenues received by the
public facilities district under subsection (5) of this section.
(7) A public facilities district is authorized to pledge any of its
revenues, including without limitation revenues from the taxes
authorized in this section, to pay or secure the payment of obligations
issued or incurred by the public facilities district, subject to the
terms established by the board of directors of the public facilities
district. So long as a pledge of the taxes authorized under this
section is in effect, the legislature may not withdraw or modify the
authority to levy and collect the taxes at the rates permitted under
this section and may not increase the annual payment amount to be
transferred to the state under subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The department of revenue must perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the public facilities district at no cost to the
district, and the state treasurer must distribute those taxes as
available on a monthly basis to the district or, upon the direction of
the district, to a fiscal agent, paying agent, or trustee for
obligations issued or incurred by the district.
(9) Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all of the
provisions contained in RCW 82.08.050 and 82.08.060 and chapter 82.32
RCW have full force and application with respect to taxes imposed under
the provisions of this section.
(10) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to sales of
temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997.
(11)(a) For the purposes of this section, "hostel" means a
structure or facility where ninety percent or more of the rooms for
sleeping accommodations are hostel dormitories containing a minimum of
twelve standard beds designed for single-person occupancy within the
facility. Hostel accommodations are supervised and must include at
least one common area and at least one common kitchen for guest use.
A hostel may have no more than one hundred hostel dormitories.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, "hostel dormitory" means a
single room, containing two or more standard beds designed for single-person occupancy, used exclusively as nonprivate communal sleeping
quarters, generally for unrelated persons, where such persons
independently acquire the right to occupy individual beds, with the
operator supervising and determining which bed each person will occupy.
"Hostel dormitory" does not include an en suite restroom, or integral
area with toilet, shower, or bath fixtures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2014.

--- END ---