BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 This act may be known and cited as the
uniform power of attorney act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agent" means a person granted authority to act for a principal
under a power of attorney, whether denominated an agent, attorney-in-
fact, or otherwise. The term includes an original agent, coagent,
successor agent, and a person to which an agent's authority is
delegated.
(2) "Durable," with respect to a power of attorney, means not
terminated by the principal's incapacity.
(3) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar
capabilities.
(4) "Good faith" means honesty in fact.
(5) "Incapacity" means inability of an individual to manage
property, business, personal, or health care affairs because the
individual:
(a) Has an impairment in the ability to receive and evaluate
information or make or communicate decisions even with the use of
technological assistance; or
(b) Is:
(i) An absentee, as defined in chapter 11.80 RCW; or
(ii) Outside the United States and unable to return.
(6) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(7) "Power of attorney" means a writing that uses the term "power
of attorney" and grants authority to an agent to act in the place of
the principal.
(8) "Presently exercisable general power of appointment," with
respect to property or a property interest subject to a power of
appointment, means power exercisable at the time in question to vest
absolute ownership in the principal individually, the principal's
estate, the principal's creditors, or the creditors of the principal's
estate. The term includes a power of appointment not exercisable until
the occurrence of a specified event, the satisfaction of an
ascertainable standard, or the passage of a specified period only after
the occurrence of the specified event, the satisfaction of the
ascertainable standard, or the passage of the specified period. The
term does not include a power exercisable in a fiduciary capacity or
only by will.
(9) "Principal" means an individual who grants authority to an
agent in a power of attorney.
(10) "Property" means anything that may be the subject of
ownership, whether real or personal, legal or equitable, tangible or
intangible, or any interest or right therein.
(11) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(12) "Stocks, bonds, and financial instruments" means stocks,
bonds, mutual funds, and all other types of securities and financial
instruments, whether held directly, indirectly, or in any other manner.
The term shall also include but not be limited to commodity futures
contracts, call or put options on stocks or stock indexes, derivatives,
and margin accounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) This chapter applies to all powers of
attorney except:
(a) A power to the extent it is coupled with an interest in the
subject of the power, including a power given to or for the benefit of
a creditor in connection with a credit transaction;
(b) A proxy or other delegation to exercise voting rights or
management rights with respect to an entity; and
(c) A power created on a form prescribed by a government or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality for a governmental
purpose.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, section 117 of
this act shall not apply to a power to make health care decisions under
sections 217 and 218 of this act, nor shall it apply to the power to
nominate a guardian for a minor child under section 218 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A power of attorney created on or after
the effective date of this section is durable unless it expressly
provides that it is terminated by the incapacity of the principal. The
authority conferred under a power of attorney created prior to the
effective date of this section terminates upon the incapacity of the
principal unless the writing contains the words "This power of attorney
shall not be affected by disability of the principal," or "This power
of attorney shall become effective upon the disability of the
principal," or similar words showing the intent of the principal that
the authority conferred shall be exercisable notwithstanding the
principal's incapacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) A power of attorney must be signed and
dated by the principal, and the signature must be either acknowledged
before a notary public or other individual authorized by law to take
acknowledgments, or attested by two or more competent witnesses who are
neither home care providers for the principal nor care providers at an
adult family home or long-term care facility in which the principal
resides, and who are unrelated to the principal or agent by blood,
marriage, or state registered domestic partnership, by subscribing
their names to the power of attorney, while in the presence of the
principal and at the principal's direction or request.
(2) A power of attorney shall be considered signed in accordance
with this section if, in the case of a principal who is physically
unable to sign his or her name, the principal makes a mark in
accordance with RCW 11.12.030, or in the case of a principal who is
physically unable to make a mark, the power of attorney is executed in
accordance with RCW 64.08.100.
(3) A signature on a power of attorney is presumed to be genuine if
the principal acknowledges the signature before a notary public or
other individual authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) A power of attorney executed in this
state on or after the effective date of this section is valid if its
execution complies with section 105 of this act.
(2) A power of attorney executed in this state before the effective
date of this section is valid if its execution complied with the law of
this state as it existed at the time of execution.
(3) A power of attorney executed other than in this state is valid
in this state if, when the power of attorney was executed, the
execution complied with:
(a) The law of the jurisdiction that determines the meaning and
effect of the power of attorney pursuant to section 107 of this act; or
(b) The requirements for a military power of attorney pursuant to
10 U.S.C. Sec. 1044b, as amended.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by statute other than this act, a
photocopy or electronically transmitted copy of an original power of
attorney has the same effect as the original.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 The meaning and effect of a power of
attorney is determined by the law of the jurisdiction indicated in the
power of attorney and, in the absence of an indication of jurisdiction,
by the law of the jurisdiction in which the power of attorney was
executed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 (1) In a power of attorney, a principal
may nominate a guardian of the principal's estate or guardian of the
principal's person for consideration by the court if protective
proceedings for the principal's estate or person are begun after the
principal executes the power of attorney. Except for good cause shown
or disqualification, the court shall make its appointment in accordance
with the principal's most recent nomination.
(2) If, after a principal executes a power of attorney, a court
appoints a guardian of the principal's estate or other fiduciary
charged with the management of all of the principal's property, the
power of attorney is terminated and the agent's authority does not
continue unless continued by the court.
(3) If, after a principal executes a power of attorney, a court
appoints a guardian of the principal's estate or other fiduciary
charged with the management of some but not all of the principal's
property, the power of attorney shall not terminate or be modified,
except to the extent ordered by the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 (1) A power of attorney is effective when
executed unless the principal provides in the power of attorney that it
becomes effective at a future date or upon the occurrence of a future
event or contingency.
(2) If a power of attorney becomes effective upon the occurrence of
a future event or contingency, the principal, in the power of attorney,
may authorize one or more persons to determine in a writing that the
event or contingency has occurred.
(3) If a power of attorney becomes effective upon the principal's
incapacity and the principal has not authorized a person to determine
whether the principal is incapacitated, or the person authorized is
unable or unwilling to make the determination, the power of attorney
becomes effective upon a determination in a writing by:
(a) A physician or licensed psychologist, unrelated to the
principal or agent by blood or marriage, who has personally examined
the principal, that the principal is incapacitated within the meaning
of section 102(5)(a) of this act; or
(b) A judge or an appropriate governmental official that the
principal is incapacitated within the meaning of section 102(5)(b) of
this act.
(4) A person authorized by the principal in the power of attorney
to determine that the principal is incapacitated may act as the
principal's personal representative pursuant to the health insurance
portability and accountability act, sections 1171 through 1179 of the
social security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d, as amended, and applicable
regulations, to obtain access to the principal's health care
information and communicate with the principal's health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) A power of attorney terminates when:
(a) The principal dies;
(b) The principal becomes incapacitated, if the power of attorney
is not durable;
(c) The principal revokes the power of attorney;
(d) The power of attorney provides that it terminates;
(e) The purpose of the power of attorney is accomplished; or
(f) The principal revokes the agent's authority or the agent dies,
becomes incapacitated, or resigns, and the power of attorney does not
provide for another agent to act under the power of attorney.
(2) An agent's authority terminates when:
(a) The principal revokes the authority;
(b) The agent dies, becomes incapacitated, or resigns;
(c) An action is filed for the dissolution or annulment of the
agent's marriage to the principal or for their legal separation, or an
action is filed for dissolution or annulment of the agent's state
registered domestic partnership with the principal or for their legal
separation, unless the power of attorney otherwise provides; or
(d) The power of attorney terminates.
(3) An agent's authority which has been terminated under subsection
(2)(c) of this section shall be reinstated effective immediately in the
event that such action is dismissed with the consent of both parties or
the petition for dissolution, annulment, or legal separation is
withdrawn.
(4) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, an agent's
authority is exercisable until the authority terminates under
subsection (2) of this section, notwithstanding a lapse of time since
the execution of the power of attorney.
(5) Termination of an agent's authority or of a power of attorney
is not effective as to the agent or another person that, without actual
knowledge of the termination, acts in good faith under the power of
attorney. An act so performed, unless otherwise invalid or
unenforceable, binds the principal and the principal's successors in
interest.
(6) Incapacity of the principal of a power of attorney that is not
durable does not revoke or terminate the power of attorney as to an
agent or other person that, without actual knowledge of the incapacity,
acts in good faith under the power of attorney. An act so performed,
unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal and the
principal's successors in interest.
(7) The execution of a power of attorney does not revoke a power of
attorney previously executed by the principal unless the subsequent
power of attorney provides that the previous power of attorney is
revoked or that all other powers of attorney are revoked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) A principal may designate in a power
of attorney two or more persons to act as coagents. Unless the power
of attorney otherwise provides, all coagents must exercise their
authority jointly; provided, however, a coagent may delegate that
coagent's authority to another coagent.
(2) A principal may designate one or more successor agents to act
if an agent resigns, dies, becomes incapacitated, is not qualified to
serve, or declines to serve. A principal may grant authority to
designate one or more successor agents to an agent or other person
designated by name, office, or function. Unless the power of attorney
otherwise provides, a successor agent:
(a) Has the same authority as that granted to the original agent;
and
(b) May not act until all predecessor agents have resigned, died,
become incapacitated, are no longer qualified to serve, or have
declined to serve.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney and
subsection (4) of this section, an agent that does not participate in
or conceal a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another agent,
including a predecessor agent, is not liable for the actions of the
other agent.
(4) An agent that has actual knowledge of a breach or imminent
breach of fiduciary duty by another agent shall notify the principal
and, if the principal is incapacitated, take any action reasonably
appropriate in the circumstances to safeguard the principal's best
interest. An agent that fails to notify the principal or take action
as required by this subsection is liable for the reasonably foreseeable
damages that could have been avoided if the agent had notified the
principal or taken such action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, an agent is entitled to reimbursement of expenses reasonably
incurred on behalf of the principal and to reasonable compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 Except as otherwise provided in the power
of attorney, a person accepts appointment as an agent under a power of
attorney by exercising authority or performing duties as an agent or by
any other assertion or conduct indicating acceptance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 (1) Notwithstanding provisions in the
power of attorney, an agent that has accepted appointment shall:
(a) Act in accordance with the principal's reasonable expectations
to the extent actually known by the agent and, otherwise, in the
principal's best interest;
(b) Act in good faith; and
(c) Act only within the scope of authority granted in the power of
attorney.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, an agent
that has accepted appointment shall:
(a) Act loyally for the principal's benefit;
(b) Act so as not to create a conflict of interest that impairs the
agent's ability to act impartially in the principal's best interest;
(c) Act with the care, competence, and diligence ordinarily
exercised by agents in similar circumstances;
(d) Keep a record of all receipts, disbursements, and transactions
made on behalf of the principal;
(e) Cooperate with a person that has authority to make health care
decisions for the principal to carry out the principal's reasonable
expectations to the extent actually known by the agent and, otherwise,
act in the principal's best interest; and
(f) Attempt to preserve the principal's estate plan, to the extent
actually known by the agent, if preserving the plan is consistent with
the principal's best interest based on all relevant factors, including:
(i) The value and nature of the principal's property;
(ii) The principal's foreseeable obligations and need for
maintenance;
(iii) Minimization of taxes, including income, estate, inheritance,
generation-skipping transfer, and gift taxes; and
(iv) Eligibility for a benefit, a program, or assistance under a
statute or rule.
(3) An agent that acts in good faith is not liable to any
beneficiary of the principal's estate plan for failure to preserve the
plan.
(4) An agent that acts with care, competence, and diligence for the
best interest of the principal is not liable solely because the agent
also benefits from the act or has an individual or conflicting interest
in relation to the property or affairs of the principal.
(5) If an agent is selected by the principal because of special
skills or expertise possessed by the agent or in reliance on the
agent's representation that the agent has special skills or expertise,
the special skills or expertise must be considered in determining
whether the agent has acted with care, competence, and diligence under
the circumstances.
(6) Absent a breach of duty to the principal, an agent is not
liable if the value of the principal's property declines.
(7) An agent that engages another person on behalf of the principal
is not liable for an act, error of judgment, or default of that person
if the agent exercises care, competence, and diligence in selecting and
monitoring the person, provided however that the agent shall not be
relieved of liability for such person's discretionary acts, that, if
done by the agent, would result in liability to the agent.
(8) Unless section 111(1) of this act applies, an agent may only
delegate authority to another person if expressly authorized to do so
in the power of attorney and may delegate some, but not all, of the
authority granted by the principal. An agent that exercises authority
to delegate to another person the authority granted by the principal is
not liable for an act, error of judgment, or default of that person if
the agent exercises care, competence, and diligence in selecting and
monitoring the person, provided however that the agent shall not be
relieved of liability for such person's discretionary acts, that, if
done by the agent, would result in liability to the agent.
(9) Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, an agent
is not required to disclose receipts, disbursements, or transactions
conducted on behalf of the principal unless ordered by a court or
requested in writing by the principal, a guardian, a conservator,
another fiduciary acting for the principal, a governmental agency
having authority to protect the welfare of the principal, or, upon the
death of the principal, by the personal representative or successor in
interest of the principal's estate. Such request by a guardian,
conservator, or another fiduciary acting for the principal must be
limited to information reasonably related to that guardian,
conservator, or fiduciary's duties. If so requested, within thirty
days the agent shall comply with the request or provide a writing or
other record substantiating why additional time is needed and shall
comply with the request within an additional thirty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 A provision in a power of attorney
relieving an agent of liability for breach of duty is binding on the
principal and the principal's successors in interest except to the
extent the provision:
(1) Relieves the agent of liability for breach of duty committed
dishonestly, with an improper motive, or with gross negligence to the
purposes of the power of attorney or the best interest of the
principal; or
(2) Was inserted as a result of an abuse of a confidential or
fiduciary relationship with the principal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the
power of attorney, the following persons may bring a petition described
in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The principal or the agent;
(b) The spouse or state registered domestic partner of the
principal;
(c) The guardian of the estate or person of the principal;
(d) Any other interested person, as long as the person demonstrates
to the court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the
welfare of the principal and has a good faith belief that the court's
intervention is necessary, and that the principal is incapacitated at
the time of filing the petition or otherwise unable to protect his or
her own interests; and
(e) A person asked to accept the power of attorney.
(2) A person designated in subsection (1) of this section may file
a petition requesting the court to construe a power of attorney or
grant any other appropriate relief, including but not limited to:
(a) Determination of whether the power of attorney is in effect or
has terminated;
(b) Compelling the agent to submit the agent's accounts or report
the agent's acts as agent to the principal, the spouse or state
registered domestic partner of the principal, the guardian of the
person or the estate of the principal, or to any other person required
by the court in its discretion, if the agent has not timely complied
with a request under section 114(9) of this act. However, a government
agency having authority to protect the welfare of the principal may
file a petition upon the agent's refusal or failure to submit an
accounting upon written request and shall not be required to wait sixty
days;
(c) Ratification of past acts or approval of proposed acts of the
agent;
(d) Issuance of an order directing the agent to exercise or refrain
from exercising authority in a power of attorney in a particular manner
or for a particular purpose;
(e) Modification of the authority of an agent under a power of
attorney;
(f) Removal of the agent on a determination by the court of both of
the following:
(i) Determination that the agent has violated or is unfit to
perform the fiduciary duties under the power of attorney; and
(ii) Determination that the removal of the agent is in the best
interest of the principal;
(g) Approval of the resignation of the agent and approval of the
final accountings of the resigning agent if submitted, subject to any
orders the court determines are necessary to protect the principal's
interests;
(h) Confirmation of the authority of a successor agent to act under
a power of attorney upon removal or resignation of the previous agent;
(i) Compelling a third person to honor the authority of an agent,
provided that a third person may not be compelled to honor the agent's
authority if the principal could not compel the third person to act in
the same circumstances;
(j) Order the agent to furnish a bond in an amount the court
determines to be appropriate.
(3) Any action commenced under this section shall be subject to the
notice requirements of chapter 11.96A RCW.
(4) Upon motion by the principal, the court shall dismiss a
petition filed under this section, unless the court finds that the
principal lacks capacity to revoke the agent's authority or the power
of attorney.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in section 120(3)(b) of this act,
any action commenced under this section shall be subject to the
provisions of RCW 11.96A.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 An agent that violates this chapter is
liable to the principal or the principal's successors in interest for
the amount required to restore the value of the principal's property to
what it would have been had the violation not occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 Unless the power of attorney has been
terminated in accordance with section 108 of this act, or the power of
attorney provides a different method for an agent's resignation, an
agent may resign by giving notice to the principal and, if the
principal is incapacitated:
(1) To the conservator or guardian, if one has been appointed for
the principal, and a coagent or successor agent, if designated; or
(2) If there is no person described in subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) To any person reasonably believed by the agent to have
sufficient interest in the principal's welfare;
(b) To a governmental agency having authority to protect the
welfare of the principal; or
(c) By filing notice with the county recorder's office in the
county where the principal resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 (1) For purposes of this section and
section 120 of this act, "acknowledged" means purportedly verified
before a notary public or other individual authorized to take
acknowledgments.
(2) A person that in good faith accepts an acknowledged power of
attorney without actual knowledge that the signature is not genuine may
rely upon the presumption under section 105 of this act that the
signature is genuine.
(3) A person that in good faith accepts an acknowledged power of
attorney without actual knowledge that the power of attorney is void,
invalid, or terminated, that the purported agent's authority is void,
invalid, or terminated, or that the agent is exceeding or improperly
exercising the agent's authority may rely upon the power of attorney as
if the power of attorney were genuine, valid and still in effect, the
agent's authority were genuine, valid and still in effect, and the
agent had not exceeded and had properly exercised the authority.
(4) A person that is asked to accept an acknowledged power of
attorney may request, and rely upon, without further investigation:
(a) An agent's certification given under penalty of perjury meeting
the requirements of subsection (5) of this section; and
(b) An English translation of the power of attorney if the power of
attorney contains, in whole or in part, language other than English.
(5) A certification presented pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section or pursuant to section 120 of this act shall state that:
(a) The person presenting himself or herself as the agent and
signing the affidavit or declaration is the person so named in the
power of attorney;
(b) If the agent is named in the power of attorney as a successor
agent, the circumstances or conditions stated in the power of attorney
that would cause that person to become the acting agent have occurred;
(c) To the best of the agent's knowledge, the principal is still
alive;
(d) To the best of the agent's knowledge, at the time the power of
attorney was signed, the principal was competent to execute the
document and was not under undue influence to sign the document;
(e) All events necessary to making the power of attorney effective
have occurred;
(f) The agent does not have actual knowledge of the revocation,
termination, limitation, or modification of the power of attorney or of
the agent's authority;
(g) The agent does not have actual knowledge of the existence of
other circumstances that would limit, modify, revoke, or terminate the
power of attorney or the agent's authority to take the proposed action;
(h) If the agent was married to or in a state registered domestic
partnership with the principal at the time of execution of the power of
attorney, then at the time of signing the affidavit or declaration, the
marriage or state registered domestic partnership of the principal and
the agent has not been dissolved or declared invalid; and
(i) The agent is acting in good faith pursuant to the authority
given under the power of attorney.
(6) An English translation requested under this section must be
provided at the principal's expense unless the request is made more
than seven business days after the power of attorney is presented for
acceptance.
(7) For purposes of this section and section 120 of this act, a
person that conducts activities through employees is without actual
knowledge of a fact relating to a power of attorney, a principal, or an
agent if the employee conducting the transaction involving the power of
attorney is without actual knowledge of the fact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) A person shall either accept an acknowledged power of attorney
or request a certification or a translation no later than seven
business days after presentation of the power of attorney for
acceptance;
(b) If a person requests a certification or a translation, the
person shall accept the power of attorney no later than five business
days after receipt of the certification or translation; and
(c) A person may not require an additional or different form of
power of attorney for authority granted in the power of attorney
presented.
(2) A person is not required to accept an acknowledged power of
attorney if:
(a) The person is not otherwise required to engage in a transaction
with the principal in the same circumstances;
(b) Engaging in a transaction with the agent or the principal in
the same circumstances would be inconsistent with federal law;
(c) The person has actual knowledge of the termination of the
agent's authority or of the power of attorney before exercise of the
power;
(d) A request for a certification or a translation is refused;
(e) The person in good faith believes that the power is not valid
or that the agent does not have the authority to perform the act
requested, whether or not a certification or a translation has been
requested or provided; or
(f) The person makes, or has actual knowledge that another person
has made, a report to the department of social and health services
stating a good faith belief that the principal may be subject to
physical or financial abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment by
the agent or a person acting for or with the agent.
(3) A person that refuses in violation of this section to accept an
acknowledged power of attorney is subject to:
(a) A court order mandating acceptance of the power of attorney;
and
(b) Liability for reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in
any action or proceeding that confirms the validity of the power of
attorney or mandates acceptance of the power of attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 Unless displaced by a provision of this
chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 This chapter does not supersede any other
law applicable to financial institutions or other entities, and the
other law controls if inconsistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 The remedies under this chapter are not
exclusive and do not abrogate any right or remedy under the law of this
state other than this chapter.

PART II
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) An agent under a power of attorney
may, subject to the requirements of section 114 of this act, and in
particular section 114(2)(f) of this act, do the following on behalf of
the principal or with the principal's property only if the power of
attorney expressly grants the agent the authority and exercise of the
authority is not otherwise prohibited by another agreement or
instrument to which the authority or property is subject:
(a) Create, amend, revoke, or terminate an inter vivos trust;
(b) Make a gift;
(c) Create or change rights of survivorship;
(d) Create or change a beneficiary designation;
(e) Delegate some but not all of the authority granted under the
power of attorney, except as otherwise provided in section 111(1) of
this act;
(f) Waive the principal's right to be a beneficiary of a joint and
survivor annuity, including a survivor benefit under a retirement plan;
(g) Exercise fiduciary powers that the principal has authority to
delegate;
(h) Exercise any power of appointment in favor of anyone other than
the principal;
(i) Create, amend, or revoke a community property agreement;
(j) Cause a trustee to make distributions of property held in trust
under the same conditions that the principal could;
(k) Make any other provisions for nonprobate transfer at death
contained in nontestamentary instruments described in RCW 11.02.091.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, an agent may, even in the absence of a specific grant of
authority, make transfers of property to any trust that benefits the
principal alone and does not have dispositive provisions that are
different from those that would have governed the property had it not
been transferred into such trust.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(b) of this
section, an agent may, even in the absence of a specific grant of
authority, make any transfer of resources not prohibited under chapter
74.09 RCW when the transfer is for the purpose of qualifying the
principal for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for
the medically needy.
(4) Notwithstanding a grant of authority to do an act described in
subsection (1) of this section, unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, an agent that is not an ancestor, spouse, state registered
domestic partner, or descendant of the principal, may not exercise
authority under a power of attorney to create in the agent, or in an
individual to whom the agent owes a legal obligation of support, an
interest in the principal's property, whether by gift, right of
survivorship, beneficiary designation, disclaimer, or otherwise.
(5) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, a grant of
authority to make a gift is subject to section 216 of this act.
(6) Subject to subsections (1) through (5) of this section, if the
subjects over which authority is granted in a power of attorney are
similar or overlap, the broadest authority controls.
(7) Authority granted in a power of attorney is exercisable with
respect to property that the principal has when the power of attorney
is executed or acquires later, whether or not the property is located
in this state and whether or not the authority is exercised or the
power of attorney is executed in this state.
(8) An act performed by an agent pursuant to a power of attorney
has the same effect and inures to the benefit of and binds the
principal and the principal's successors in interest as if the
principal had performed the act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) Subject to the provisions of section
201 of this act, if a power of attorney grants to an agent authority to
do all acts that a principal could do or contains words of similar
effect, the agent has the general authority described in sections 203
through 218 of this act.
(2) An agent has authority described in this act if the power of
attorney refers to general authority with respect to the descriptive
term for the subjects stated in sections 204 through 218 of this act or
cites the section in which the authority is described.
(3) A reference in a power of attorney to general authority with
respect to the descriptive term for a subject in sections 204 through
218 of this act or a citation to a section of sections 204 through 218
of this act incorporates the entire section as if it were set out in
full in the power of attorney.
(4) A principal may modify authority incorporated by reference.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Except as otherwise provided in the power
of attorney, by executing a power of attorney that incorporates by
reference a subject described in sections 204 through 218 of this act
or that grants to an agent authority to do all acts that a principal
could do pursuant to section 202(1) of this act, a principal authorizes
the agent, with respect to that subject, to:
(1) Demand, receive, and obtain by litigation or otherwise,
declaratory or injunctive relief, money, or another thing of value to
which the principal is, may become, or claims to be entitled, and
conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything so received or obtained for
the purposes intended;
(2) Contract in any manner with any person, on terms agreeable to
the agent, to accomplish a purpose of a transaction and perform,
rescind, cancel, terminate, reform, restate, release, or modify the
contract or another contract made by or on behalf of the principal;
(3) Execute, acknowledge, seal, deliver, file, or record any
instrument or communication the agent considers desirable to accomplish
a purpose of a transaction, including creating at any time a schedule
listing some or all of the principal's property and attaching it to the
power of attorney;
(4) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute
resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to a claim existing in favor of or against the principal or
intervene in litigation relating to the claim;
(5) Seek on the principal's behalf the assistance of a court or
other governmental agency to carry out an act authorized in the power
of attorney;
(6) Engage, compensate, and discharge an attorney, accountant,
investment manager, expert witness, or other advisor;
(7) Prepare, execute, and file a record, report, or other document
to safeguard or promote the principal's interest under a statute or
regulation;
(8) Communicate with any representative or employee of a government
or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, on behalf of
the principal;
(9) Access communications intended for, and communicate on behalf
of the principal, whether by mail, electronic transmission, telephone,
or other means; and
(10) Do any lawful act with respect to the subject and all property
related to the subject.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to real property authorizes the agent to:
(1) Demand; buy; sublease; license; receive; accept as a gift or as
security for an extension of credit; or otherwise acquire or reject an
interest in real property or a right incident to real property;
(2) Sell; exchange; convey with or without reservations, covenants,
representations, or warranties; quitclaim; release; surrender; retain
title for security; encumber; partition; consent to partitioning;
subject to an easement or covenant, common interest regime; subdivide;
apply for zoning or other governmental permits; plat or consent to
platting; develop; grant an option concerning; lease; sublease;
license; contribute to an entity in exchange for an interest in that
entity; or, subject to section 201 of this act, otherwise grant or
dispose of an interest in real property or a right incident to real
property;
(3) Pledge or mortgage an interest in real property or right
incident to real property as security to borrow money or pay, renew,
extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal or a debt
guaranteed by the principal, or as security for a nonmonetary
obligation;
(4) Release, assign, satisfy, or enforce by litigation or otherwise
a mortgage, deed of trust, conditional sale contract, encumbrance,
lien, or other claim to real property which exists or is asserted;
(5) Manage or conserve an interest in real property or a right
incident to real property owned or claimed to be owned by the
principal, including:
(a) Insuring against liability or casualty or other loss;
(b) Obtaining or regaining possession of or protecting the interest
or right by litigation or otherwise;
(c) Paying, assessing, compromising, or contesting taxes or
assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in connection with
them; and
(d) Purchasing supplies, hiring assistance or labor, and making
repairs or alterations to the real property;
(6) Use, develop, alter, replace, remove, erect, or install
structures or other improvements upon real property in or incident to
which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest or right;
(7) Participate in a reorganization with respect to real property
or an entity that owns an interest in or right incident to real
property and receive, and hold, and act with respect to stocks and
bonds or other property received in a plan of reorganization,
including:
(a) Selling or otherwise disposing of them;
(b) Exercising or selling an option, right of conversion, or
similar right with respect to them; and
(c) Exercising any voting rights in person or by proxy;
(8) Change the form of title of an interest in or right incident to
real property; and
(9) Dedicate to public use, with or without consideration,
easements or other real property in which the principal has, or claims
to have, an interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to tangible personal property authorizes the agent to:
(1) Demand, buy, receive, accept as a gift or as security for an
extension of credit, or otherwise acquire or reject ownership or
possession of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible
personal property;
(2) Sell; exchange; convey with or without covenants,
representations, or warranties; quitclaim; release; surrender; create
a security interest in; grant options concerning; lease; sublease; or,
otherwise dispose of tangible personal property or an interest in
tangible personal property;
(3) Grant a security interest in tangible personal property or an
interest in tangible personal property as security to borrow money or
pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal or
a debt guaranteed by the principal;
(4) Release, assign, satisfy, or enforce by litigation or
otherwise, a security interest, lien, or other claim on behalf of the
principal, with respect to tangible personal property or an interest in
tangible personal property;
(5) Manage or conserve tangible personal property or an interest in
tangible personal property on behalf of the principal, including:
(a) Insuring against liability or casualty or other loss;
(b) Obtaining or regaining possession of or protecting the property
or interest, by litigation or otherwise;
(c) Paying, assessing, compromising, or contesting taxes or
assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in connection with
taxes or assessments;
(d) Moving the property from place to place;
(e) Storing the property for hire or on a gratuitous bailment; and
(f) Using and making repairs, alterations, or improvements to the
property; and
(6) Change the form of title of an interest in tangible personal
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to stocks, bonds, and financial instruments authorizes the
agent to:
(1) Buy, sell, and exchange stocks, bonds, and financial
instruments;
(2) Establish, continue, modify, or terminate an account with
respect to stocks, bonds, and financial instruments;
(3) Pledge stocks, bonds, and financial instruments as security to
borrow, pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the
principal;
(4) Receive certificates and other evidences of ownership with
respect to stocks, bonds, and financial instruments;
(5) Exercise voting rights with respect to stocks, bonds, and
financial instruments in person or by proxy, enter into voting trusts,
and consent to limitations on the right to vote;
(6) Buy, sell, exchange, assign, settle, and exercise commodity
futures contracts and call or put options on stocks or stock indexes
traded on a regulated option exchange; and
(7) Establish, continue, modify, and terminate option accounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 Except as otherwise expressly provided in
this act and in chapter 30.22 RCW, unless the power of attorney
otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general
authority with respect to banks and other financial institutions
authorizes the agent to:
(1) Continue, modify, and terminate an account or other banking
arrangement made by or on behalf of the principal;
(2) Establish, modify, and terminate an account or other banking
arrangement with a bank, trust company, savings and loan association,
credit union, thrift company, brokerage firm, or other financial
institution selected by the agent;
(3) Contract for services available from a financial institution,
including renting a safe deposit box or space in a vault;
(4) Withdraw, by check, order, electronic funds transfer, or
otherwise, money or property of the principal deposited with or left in
the custody of a financial institution;
(5) Receive statements of account, vouchers, notices, and similar
documents from a financial institution and act with respect to them;
(6) Enter a safe deposit box or vault and withdraw or add to the
contents;
(7) Borrow money and pledge as security personal property of the
principal necessary to borrow money or pay, renew, or extend the time
of payment of a debt of the principal or a debt guaranteed by the
principal;
(8) Make, assign, draw, endorse, discount, guarantee, and negotiate
promissory notes, checks, drafts, and other negotiable or nonnegotiable
paper of the principal or payable to the principal or the principal's
order, transfer money, receive the cash or other proceeds of those
transactions, and accept a draft drawn by a person upon the principal
and pay it when due;
(9) Receive for the principal and act upon a sight draft, warehouse
receipt, or other document of title whether tangible or electronic, or
other negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument;
(10) Apply for, receive, and use letters of credit, credit and
debit cards, electronic transaction authorizations, and traveler's
checks from a financial institution and give an indemnity or other
agreement in connection with letters of credit; and
(11) Consent to an extension of the time of payment with respect to
commercial paper or a financial transaction with a financial
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 Subject to the terms of a document or an
agreement governing an entity or an entity ownership interest, and
unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of
attorney granting general authority with respect to operation of an
entity or business authorizes the agent to:
(1) Operate, buy, sell, enlarge, reduce, or terminate an ownership
interest;
(2) Perform a duty or discharge a liability and exercise in person
or by proxy a right, power, privilege, or option that the principal
has, may have, or claims to have;
(3) Enforce the terms of an ownership agreement;
(4) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute
resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to litigation to which the principal is a party because of an
ownership interest;
(5) Exercise in person or by proxy, or enforce by litigation or
otherwise, a right, power, privilege, or option the principal has or
claims to have as the holder of stocks, bonds, and financial
instruments;
(6) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute
resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to litigation to which the principal is a party concerning
stocks, bonds, and financial instruments;
(7) With respect to an entity or business owned solely by the
principal:
(a) Continue, modify, renegotiate, extend, and terminate a contract
made by or on behalf of the principal with respect to the entity or
business before execution of the power of attorney;
(b) Determine:
(i) The location of its operation;
(ii) The nature and extent of its business;
(iii) The methods of manufacturing, selling, merchandising,
financing, accounting, and advertising employed in its operation;
(iv) The amount and types of insurance carried; and
(v) The mode of engaging, compensating, and dealing with its
employees and accountants, attorneys, or other advisors;
(c) Change the name or form of organization under which the entity
or business is operated and enter into an ownership agreement with
other persons to take over all or part of the operation of the entity
or business; and
(d) Demand and receive money due or claimed by the principal or on
the principal's behalf in the operation of the entity or business and
control and disburse the money in the operation of the entity or
business;
(8) Put additional capital into an entity or business in which the
principal has an interest;
(9) Join in a plan of reorganization, consolidation, conversion,
domestication, or merger of the entity or business;
(10) Sell or liquidate all or part of an entity or business;
(11) Establish through agreement or independent appraisal the value
of an entity or business to which the principal is a party;
(12) Prepare, sign, file, and deliver reports, compilations of
information, returns, or other papers with respect to an entity or
business and make related payments; and
(13) Pay, compromise, or contest taxes, assessments, fines, or
penalties and perform any other act to protect the principal from
illegal or unnecessary taxation, assessments, fines, or penalties, with
respect to an entity or business, including attempts to recover, in any
manner permitted by law, money paid before or after the execution of
the power of attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to insurance and annuities authorizes the agent to:
(1) Continue, pay the premium or make a contribution on, modify,
exchange, sell, rescind, release, or terminate a contract procured by
or on behalf of the principal which insures or provides an annuity to
either the principal or another person, whether or not the principal is
a beneficiary under the contract;
(2) Procure new, different, and additional contracts of insurance
and annuities for the benefit of the principal and the principal's
spouse, state registered domestic partner, children, and other
dependents, and select the amount, type of insurance or annuity, and
mode of payment;
(3) Pay the premium or make a contribution on, modify, exchange,
rescind, release, or terminate a contract of insurance or annuity
procured by the agent;
(4) Apply for and receive a loan secured by a contract of insurance
or annuity;
(5) Surrender and receive the cash surrender value on a contract of
insurance or annuity;
(6) Exercise an election;
(7) Exercise investment powers available under a contract of
insurance or annuity;
(8) Change the manner of paying premiums on a contract of insurance
or annuity;
(9) Change or convert the type of insurance or annuity with respect
to which the principal has or claims to have authority described in
this section;
(10) Apply for and procure a benefit or assistance under a statute
or regulation to guarantee or pay premiums of a contract of insurance
on the life of the principal;
(11) Collect, sell, assign, hypothecate, borrow against, or pledge
the interest of the principal in a contract of insurance or annuity;
(12) Select the form and timing of the payment of proceeds from a
contract of insurance or annuity; and
(13) Pay, from proceeds or otherwise, compromise or contest, and
apply for refunds in connection with, a tax or assessment levied by a
taxing authority with respect to a contract of insurance or annuity or
its proceeds or liability accruing by reason of the tax or assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 (1) In this section, "estates, trusts, and
other beneficial interests" means a trust, probate estate,
guardianship, conservatorship, escrow, or custodianship or a fund from
which the principal is, may become, or claims to be, entitled to a
share or payment.
(2) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a
power of attorney granting general authority with respect to estates,
trusts, and other beneficial interests authorizes the agent to:
(a) Accept, receive, receipt for, sell, assign, pledge, or exchange
a share in or payment from the fund;
(b) Demand or obtain money or another thing of value to which the
principal is, may become, or claims to be, entitled by reason of the
fund, by litigation or otherwise;
(c) Exercise for the benefit of the principal a presently
exercisable general power of appointment held by the principal;
(d) Exercise for the benefit of the principal a presently
exercisable limited power of appointment held by the principal;
(e) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute
resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to litigation to ascertain the meaning, validity, or effect of
a deed, will, declaration of trust, or other instrument or transaction
affecting the interest of the principal;
(f) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute
resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to litigation to remove, substitute, or surcharge a fiduciary,
and any other matter as defined under RCW 11.96A.030;
(g) Conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything received for an
authorized purpose;
(h) Transfer an interest of the principal in real property, stocks,
bonds, and financial instruments, accounts with financial institutions
or securities intermediaries, insurance, annuities, and other property
to the trustee of a revocable trust created by the principal as
settlor, subject to the limitations in section 201(1) of this section;
and
(i) Reject, renounce, disclaim, release, or consent to a reduction
in or modification of a share in or payment from the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to claims and litigation authorizes the agent, without the
need for appointment of a guardian or guardian ad litem under Title 4
RCW, to:
(1) Assert and maintain before a court or administrative agency a
claim, claim for relief, cause of action, counterclaim, offset,
recoupment, or defense, including an action to recover property or
other thing of value, recover damages sustained by the principal,
eliminate or modify tax liability, or seek an injunction, specific
performance, or other relief;
(2) Bring or defend an action to determine adverse claims or
intervene or otherwise participate in litigation;
(3) Seek an attachment, garnishment, order of arrest, or other
preliminary, provisional, or intermediate relief and use an available
procedure to effect or satisfy a judgment, order, or decree;
(4) Make or accept a tender, offer of judgment, or admission of
facts, submit a controversy on an agreed statement of facts, consent to
examination, and bind the principal in litigation;
(5) Submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, and propose
or accept a compromise, subject to special proceeding rule 98.16W;
(6) Waive the issuance and service of process upon the principal,
accept service of process, appear for the principal, designate persons
upon which process directed to the principal may be served, execute,
and file or deliver stipulations on the principal's behalf, verify
pleadings, seek appellate review, procure and give surety and indemnity
bonds, contract and pay for the preparation and printing of records and
briefs, receive, execute, and file or deliver a consent, waiver,
release, confession of judgment, satisfaction of judgment, notice,
agreement, or other instrument in connection with the prosecution,
settlement, or defense of a claim or litigation;
(7) Act for the principal with respect to bankruptcy or insolvency,
whether voluntary or involuntary, concerning the principal or some
other person, or with respect to a reorganization, receivership, or
application for the appointment of a receiver or trustee which affects
an interest of the principal in property or other thing of value;
(8) Pay a judgment, award, or order against the principal or a
settlement made in connection with a claim or litigation; and
(9) Receive money or other thing of value paid in settlement of or
as proceeds of a claim or litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 (1) Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to personal and family maintenance authorizes the agent
to:
(a) Perform the acts necessary to maintain the customary standard
of living of the principal, the principal's spouse or state registered
domestic partner, and the following individuals, whether living when
the power of attorney is executed or later born:
(i) The principal's children;
(ii) Other individuals legally entitled to be supported by the
principal; and
(iii) The individuals whom the principal has customarily supported
or indicated the intent to support;
(b) Make periodic payments of child support and other family
maintenance required by a court or governmental agency or an agreement
to which the principal is a party;
(c) Provide living quarters for the individuals described in
subsection (1) of this section by:
(i) Purchase, lease, or other contract; or
(ii) Paying the operating costs, including interest, amortization
payments, repairs, improvements, and taxes, for premises owned by the
principal or occupied by those individuals;
(d) Provide reasonable domestic help, usual vacations and travel
expenses, and funds for shelter, clothing, food, appropriate education,
including postsecondary and vocational education, and other current
living costs for the individuals described in subsection (1) of this
section;
(e) Pay expenses for necessary health care and custodial care on
behalf of the individuals described in subsection (1) of this section;
(f) Act as the principal's personal representative pursuant to the
health insurance portability and accountability act, sections 1171
through 1179 of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d, as
amended, and applicable regulations, for the limited purpose of making
decisions regarding the payment of costs and expenses arising from
past, present, or future health care provided to the principal which
was consented to by the principal or anyone authorized under the law of
this state to consent to health care on behalf of the principal;
(g) Continue any provision made by the principal for automobiles or
other means of transportation, including registering, licensing,
insuring, and replacing them, for the individuals described in
subsection (1) of this section;
(h) Maintain credit and debit accounts for the convenience of the
individuals described in subsection (1) of this section and open new
accounts; and
(i) Continue payments incidental to the membership or affiliation
of the principal in a religious institution, club, society, order, or
other organization or to continue contributions to those organizations.
(2) Authority with respect to personal and family maintenance is
neither dependent upon, nor limited by, authority that an agent may or
may not have with respect to gifts under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 (1) In this section, "benefits from
governmental programs or civil or military service" means any benefit,
program or assistance provided under a statute or regulation including
social security, medicare, and medicaid.
(2) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a
power of attorney granting general authority with respect to benefits
from governmental programs or civil or military service authorizes the
agent to:
(a) Execute vouchers in the name of the principal for allowances
and reimbursements payable by the United States or a foreign government
or by a state or subdivision of a state to the principal, including
allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the individuals
described in section 212(1)(a) of this act, and for shipment of their
household effects;
(b) Take possession and order the removal and shipment of property
of the principal from a post, warehouse, depot, dock, or other place of
storage or safekeeping, either governmental or private, and execute and
deliver a release, voucher, receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket,
certificate, or other instrument for that purpose;
(c) Enroll in, apply for, select, reject, change, amend, or
discontinue, on the principal's behalf, a benefit or program;
(d) Prepare, file, and maintain a claim of the principal for a
benefit or assistance, financial or otherwise, to which the principal
may be entitled under a statute or regulation;
(e) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute
resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to litigation concerning any benefit or assistance the
principal may be entitled to receive under a statute or regulation; and
(f) Receive the financial proceeds of a claim described in (d) of
this subsection and conserve, invest, disburse, or use for a lawful
purpose anything so received.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 (1) In this section, "retirement plan"
means a plan or account created by an employer, the principal, or
another individual to provide retirement benefits or deferred
compensation of which the principal is a participant, beneficiary, or
owner, including but not limited to a plan or account under the
following sections of the internal revenue code:
(a) An individual retirement account under internal revenue code
section 408, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 408, as amended;
(b) A roth individual retirement account under internal revenue
code section 408A, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 408A, as amended;
(c) A deemed individual retirement account under internal revenue
code section 408(q), 26 U.S.C. Sec. 408(q), as amended;
(d) An annuity or mutual fund custodial account under internal
revenue code section 403(b), 26 U.S.C. Sec. 403(b), as amended;
(e) A pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or other retirement
plan qualified under internal revenue code section 401(a), 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 401(a), as amended;
(f) A plan under internal revenue code section 457(b), 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 457(b), as amended; and
(g) A nonqualified deferred compensation plan under internal
revenue code section 409A, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 409A, as amended.
(2) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a
power of attorney granting general authority with respect to retirement
plans authorizes the agent to:
(a) Select the form and timing of payments under a retirement plan
and withdraw benefits from a plan;
(b) Make a rollover, including a direct trustee-to-trustee
rollover, of benefits from one retirement plan to another;
(c) Establish a retirement plan in the principal's name;
(d) Make contributions to a retirement plan;
(e) Exercise investment powers available under a retirement plan;
and
(f) Borrow from, sell assets to, or purchase assets from a
retirement plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority
with respect to taxes authorizes the agent to:
(1) Prepare, sign, and file federal, state, local, and foreign
income, gift, payroll, property, federal insurance contributions act,
and other tax returns, claims for refunds, requests for extension of
time, petitions regarding tax matters, and any other tax-related
documents, including receipts, offers, waivers, consents, including
consents and agreements under internal revenue code section 2032A, 26
U.S.C. Sec. 2032A, as amended, closing agreements, and any power of
attorney required by the internal revenue service or other taxing
authority including, but not limited to, an internal revenue service
form 2848 in favor of any third party with respect to a tax year upon
which the statute of limitations has not run and the following twenty-five tax years;
(2) Pay taxes due, collect refunds, post bonds, receive
confidential information, and contest deficiencies determined by the
internal revenue service or other taxing authority;
(3) Exercise any election available to the principal under federal,
state, local, or foreign tax law; and
(4) Act for the principal in all tax matters for all periods before
the internal revenue service, or other taxing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 (1) In this section, a gift "for the
benefit of" a person includes but is not limited to a gift to a trust,
an account under the uniform transfers to minors act of any
jurisdiction, and a tuition savings account or prepaid tuition plan as
defined under internal revenue code section 529, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 529, as
amended. Notwithstanding the terms of section 201(1)(a) of this act,
the power to make a gift pursuant to section 201(1)(b) of this act
shall include the power to create a trust, an account under the uniform
transfers to minors act, or a tuition savings account or prepaid
tuition plan as defined under internal revenue code section 529, 26
U.S.C. Sec. 529, as amended, into which a gift is to be made.
(2) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a
power of attorney granting general authority with respect to gifts
authorizes the agent only to:
(a) Make outright to, or for the benefit of, a person, a gift of
any of the principal's property, including by the exercise of a
presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the
principal, in an amount per donee not to exceed the annual dollar
limits of the federal gift tax exclusion under internal revenue code
section 2503(b), 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2503(b), as amended, without regard to
whether the federal gift tax exclusion applies to the gift, or if the
principal's spouse agrees to consent to a split gift pursuant to
internal revenue code section 2513, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2513, as amended, in
an amount per donee not to exceed twice the annual federal gift tax
exclusion limit; and
(b) Consent, pursuant to internal revenue code section 2513, 26
U.S.C. Sec. 2513, as amended, to the splitting of a gift made by the
principal's spouse in an amount per donee not to exceed the aggregate
annual gift tax exclusions for both spouses.
(3) An agent may make a gift outright to, or for the benefit of, a
person of the principal's property only as the agent determines is
consistent with the principal's objectives if actually known by the
agent and, if unknown, as the agent determines is consistent with the
principal's best interest based on all relevant factors, including but
not limited to:
(a) The value and nature of the principal's property;
(b) The principal's foreseeable obligations and need for
maintenance;
(c) Minimization of taxes, including income, estate, inheritance,
generation-skipping transfer, and gift taxes;
(d) Eligibility for a benefit, a program, or assistance under a
statute or rule; and
(e) The principal's personal history of making or joining in making
gifts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, where language in a power of attorney grants general
authority with respect to health care matters:
(1) The agent shall be authorized to act as the principal's
personal representative pursuant to the health insurance portability
and accountability act, sections 1171 through 1179 of the social
security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d, as amended, and applicable
regulations for all purposes thereunder, including but not limited to
accessing and acquiring the principal's health care related
information.
(2) The agent shall be authorized to provide informed consent for
health care decisions on the principal's behalf. If a principal has
appointed more than one agent with authority to make mental health
treatment decisions in accordance with a directive under chapter 71.32
RCW, to the extent of any conflict, the most recently appointed agent
shall be treated as the principal's agent for mental health treatment
decisions unless provided otherwise in either appointment.
(3) Unless he or she is the spouse, state registered domestic
partner, father or mother, or adult child or brother or sister of the
principal, none of the following persons may act as the agent for the
principal: Any of the principal's physicians, the physicians'
employees, or the owners, administrators, or employees of the health
care facility or long-term care facility as defined in RCW 43.190.020
where the principal resides or receives care. Except when the
principal has consented in a mental health advance directive executed
under chapter 71.32 RCW to inpatient admission or electroconvulsive
therapy, this authorization is subject to the same limitations as those
that apply to a guardian under RCW 11.92.043(5) (a) through (c) and
11.92.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, the following general provisions shall apply to any power of
attorney making reference to the care of the principal's minor
children:
(1) A parent or guardian, through a power of attorney, may
authorize an agent to make health care decisions on behalf of one or
more of his or her children, or children for whom he or she is the
legal guardian, who are under the age of majority as defined in RCW
26.28.015, to be effective if the child has no other parent or legal
representative readily available and authorized to give such consent.
(2) A principal may further nominate a guardian or guardians of the
person, or of the estate or both, of a minor child, whether born at the
time of making the durable power of attorney or afterwards, to continue
during the disability of the principal, during the minority of the
child or for any less time by including such a provision in his or her
power of attorney.
(3) The authority of any guardian of the person of any minor child
shall supersede the authority of a designated agent to make health care
decisions for the minor only after such designated guardian has been
appointed by the court.
(4) In the event a conflict between the provisions of a will
nominating a testamentary guardian under the authority of RCW 11.88.080
and the nomination of a guardian under the authority of this statute,
the most recent designation shall control.

PART III
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The following optional form may be used by
an agent to certify facts concerning a power of attorney.

AGENT'S CERTIFICATION AS TO THE VALIDITY OF POWER OF ATTORNEY
AND AGENT'S AUTHORITY

State of

[County] of ]

I, (Name of Agent), [certify] under penalty of perjury that
(Name of Principal) granted me authority as an agent or
successor agent in a power of attorney dated .

I further [certify] that to my knowledge:

(1) I am acting in good faith pursuant to the authority given under the power of attorney;

(2) The principal is alive and has not terminated, revoked, limited, or modified the power of attorney or my
authority to act under the power of attorney; nor has the power of attorney or my authority to act under the power of
attorney been terminated, revoked, limited, or modified by any other circumstances;

(3) When the power of attorney was signed, the principal was competent to execute it and was not under undue
influence to sign;

(4) All events necessary to making the power of attorney effective have occurred;

(5) If I was married or a registered domestic partner of the principal when the power of attorney was executed,
there has been no subsequent dissolution, annulment, or legal separation;

(6) If the power of attorney was drafted to become effective upon the happening of an event or contingency, the
event or contingency has occurred;

(7) If I was named as a successor agent, the prior agent is no longer able or willing to serve, or the conditions
stated in the power of attorney that cause me to become the acting agent have occurred; and

(8)

(Insert other relevant statements)

SIGNATURE AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT

Agent's Signature
Date

Agent's Name Printed

Agent's Address

Agent's Telephone Number

This document was acknowledged before me on ,

(Date)

by
(Name of Agent)

Signature of Notary (Seal, if any)

My commission expires:

[This document prepared by:

]

PART IV
Sec. 401 RCW 11.88.080 and 2005 c 97 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
When either parent is deceased, the surviving parent of any minor
child or a sole parent of a minor child, may by last will or durable
power of attorney nominate a guardian or guardians of the person, or of
the estate or both, of a minor child, whether born at the time of
executing the instrument or afterwards, to continue during the minority
of such child or for any less time. This nomination shall be effective
in the event of the death or incapacity of such parent. Every guardian
of the estate of a child shall give bond in like manner and with like
conditions as required by RCW 11.88.100 and 11.88.110, and he or she
shall have the same powers and perform the same duties with regard to
the person and estate of the minor as a guardian appointed under this
chapter. The court shall confirm the parent's nomination unless the
court finds, based upon evidence presented at a hearing on the matter,
that the individual nominated in the surviving parent's will or durable
power of attorney is not qualified to serve. In the event of a
conflict between the provisions of a will nominating a testamentary
guardian under the authority of this section and the nomination of a
guardian under section 218 of this act, the most recent designation
shall control. This section applies to actions commenced under section
116 of this act.

Sec. 402 RCW 11.86.021 and 1989 c 34 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A beneficiary may disclaim an interest in whole or in part, or
with reference to specific parts, shares or assets, in the manner
provided in RCW 11.86.031.
(2) Likewise, a beneficiary may so disclaim through an agent or
attorney so authorized by written instrument.
(3) A personal representative, guardian, attorney-in-fact if
authorized under a durable power of attorney under chapter ((11.94))
11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 505 of this act), or
other legal representative of the estate of a minor, incompetent, or
deceased beneficiary, may so disclaim on behalf of the beneficiary,
with or without court order, if:
(a) The legal representative deems the disclaimer to be in the best
interests of those interested in the estate of the beneficiary and of
those who take the disclaimed interest because of the disclaimer, and
not detrimental to the best interests of the beneficiary; and
(b) In the case of a guardian, no order has been issued under RCW
11.92.140 determining that the disclaimer is not in the best interests
of the beneficiary.

Sec. 403 RCW 11.88.010 and 2008 c 6 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superior court of each county shall have power to appoint
guardians for the persons and/or estates of incapacitated persons, and
guardians for the estates of nonresidents of the state who have
property in the county needing care and attention.
(a) For purposes of this chapter, a person may be deemed
incapacitated as to person when the superior court determines the
individual has a significant risk of personal harm based upon a
demonstrated inability to adequately provide for nutrition, health,
housing, or physical safety.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, a person may be deemed
incapacitated as to the person's estate when the superior court
determines the individual is at significant risk of financial harm
based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately manage property or
financial affairs.
(c) A determination of incapacity is a legal not a medical
decision, based upon a demonstration of management insufficiencies over
time in the area of person or estate. Age, eccentricity, poverty, or
medical diagnosis alone shall not be sufficient to justify a finding of
incapacity.
(d) A person may also be determined incapacitated if he or she is
under the age of majority as defined in RCW 26.28.010.
(e) For purposes of giving informed consent for health care
pursuant to RCW 7.70.050 and 7.70.065, an "incompetent" person is any
person who is (i) incompetent by reason of mental illness,
developmental disability, senility, habitual drunkenness, excessive use
of drugs, or other mental incapacity, of either managing his or her
property or caring for himself or herself, or both, or (ii)
incapacitated as defined in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection.
(f) For purposes of the terms "incompetent," "disabled," or "not
legally competent," as those terms are used in the Revised Code of
Washington to apply to persons incapacitated under this chapter, those
terms shall be interpreted to mean "incapacitated" persons for purposes
of this chapter.
(2) The superior court for each county shall have power to appoint
limited guardians for the persons and estates, or either thereof, of
incapacitated persons, who by reason of their incapacity have need for
protection and assistance, but who are capable of managing some of
their personal and financial affairs. After considering all evidence
presented as a result of such investigation, the court shall impose, by
order, only such specific limitations and restrictions on an
incapacitated person to be placed under a limited guardianship as the
court finds necessary for such person's protection and assistance. A
person shall not be presumed to be incapacitated nor shall a person
lose any legal rights or suffer any legal disabilities as the result of
being placed under a limited guardianship, except as to those rights
and disabilities specifically set forth in the court order establishing
such a limited guardianship. In addition, the court order shall state
the period of time for which it shall be applicable.
(3) Venue for petitions for guardianship or limited guardianship
shall lie in the county wherein the alleged incapacitated person is
domiciled, or if such person resides in a facility supported in whole
or in part by local, state, or federal funding sources, in either the
county where the facility is located, the county of domicile prior to
residence in the supported facility, or the county where a parent or
spouse or domestic partner of the alleged incapacitated person is
domiciled.
If the alleged incapacitated person's residency has changed within
one year of the filing of the petition, any interested person may move
for a change of venue for any proceedings seeking the appointment of a
guardian or a limited guardian under this chapter to the county of the
alleged incapacitated person's last place of residence of one year or
more. The motion shall be granted when it appears to the court that
such venue would be in the best interests of the alleged incapacitated
person and would promote more complete consideration of all relevant
matters.
(4) Under ((RCW 11.94.010)) section 108 of this act, a principal
may nominate, by a durable power of attorney, the guardian or limited
guardian of his or her estate or person for consideration by the court
if guardianship proceedings for the principal's person or estate are
thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in
accordance with the principal's most recent nomination in a durable
power of attorney except for good cause or disqualification.
(5) Imposition of a guardianship for an incapacitated person shall
not result in the loss of the right to vote unless the court determines
that the person is incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising
the franchise in that the individual lacks the capacity to understand
the nature and effect of voting such that she or he cannot make an
individual choice. The court order establishing guardianship shall
specify whether or not the individual retains voting rights. When a
court determines that the person is incompetent for the purpose of
rationally exercising the right to vote, the court shall notify the
appropriate county auditor.

Sec. 404 RCW 11.103.030 and 2013 c 272 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is
revocable, the trustor may not revoke or amend the trust.
(2) If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one
trustor and unless the trust agreement provides otherwise:
(a) To the extent the trust consists of community property, the
trust may be revoked by either spouse or either domestic partner acting
alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses or both
domestic partners;
(b) To the extent the trust consists of property other than
community property, each trustor may revoke or amend the trust with
regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that
trustor's contribution;
(c) The character of community property or separate property is
unaffected by its transfer to and from a revocable trust; and
(d) Upon the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all
of the trustors, the trustee must promptly notify the other trustors of
the revocation or amendment.
(3) The trustor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:
(a) By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms
of the trust; or
(b)(i) If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the
method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:
(A) A later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or
specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed
according to the terms of the trust; or
(B) A written instrument signed by the trustor evidencing intent to
revoke or amend.
(ii) The requirements of chapter 11.11 RCW do not apply to
revocation or amendment of a revocable trust under (b)(i) of this
subsection.
(4) Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee must deliver
the trust property as the trustor directs.
(5) A trustor's powers with respect to the revocation or amendment
of a trust or distribution of the property of a trust((,)) may be
exercised by the trustor's agent under a power of attorney only to the
extent specified in the power of attorney document, as provided in
((RCW 11.94.050(1))) section 201 of this act and to the extent
consistent with or expressly authorized by the trust agreement.
(6) A guardian of the trustor may exercise a trustor's powers with
respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property
only with the approval of the court supervising the guardianship
pursuant to RCW 11.92.140.
(7) A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or
amended is not liable to the trustor or trustor's successors in
interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the
assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.
(8) This section does not limit or affect operation of RCW
11.96A.220 through 11.96A.240.

Sec. 405 RCW 30.22.170 and 1981 c 192 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any funds on deposit in an account may be paid by a financial
institution to or upon the order of any agent of any depositor. The
contract of deposit or other document creating such agency on or after
the effective date of this section, and in accordance with chapter
11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 505 of this act), is not
affected by the incapacity of the depositor unless otherwise specified.
The contract of deposit or other document creating the agency prior to
the effective date of this section may provide((, in accordance with
chapter 11.94 RCW,)) that any such agent's powers to receive payments
and make withdrawals from an account continues in spite of, or arises
by virtue of, the incompetency of a depositor, in which event the
agent's powers to make payments and withdrawals from an account on
behalf of a depositor is not affected by the incompetency of a
depositor. Except as provided in this section, if the authority was
created prior to the effective date of this section the authority of an
agent to receive payments or make withdrawals from an account
terminates with the death or incompetency of the agent's principal:
PROVIDED, That a financial institution is not liable for any payment or
withdrawal made to or by an agent for a deceased or incompetent
depositor unless the financial institution making the payment or
permitting the withdrawal had actual knowledge of the incompetency or
death at the time payment was made.

Sec. 406 RCW 70.122.130 and 2013 c 251 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall establish and maintain a
statewide health care declarations registry containing the health care
declarations identified in subsection (2) of this section as submitted
by residents of Washington. The department shall digitally reproduce
and store health care declarations in the registry. The department may
establish standards for individuals to submit digitally reproduced
health care declarations directly to the registry, but is not required
to review the health care declarations that it receives to ensure they
comply with the particular statutory requirements applicable to the
document. The department may contract with an organization that meets
the standards identified in this section.
(2)(a) An individual may submit any of the following health care
declarations to the department of health to be digitally reproduced and
stored in the registry:
(i) A directive, as defined by this chapter;
(ii) A durable power of attorney for health care, as authorized in
chapter ((11.94)) 11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 505 of
this act);
(iii) A mental health advance directive, as defined by chapter
71.32 RCW; or
(iv) A form adopted pursuant to the department of health's
authority in RCW 43.70.480.
(b) Failure to submit a health care declaration to the department
of health does not affect the validity of the declaration.
(c) Failure to notify the department of health of a valid
revocation of a health care declaration does not affect the validity of
the revocation.
(d) The entry of a health care directive in the registry under this
section does not:
(i) Affect the validity of the document;
(ii) Take the place of any requirements in law necessary to make
the submitted document legal; or
(iii) Create a presumption regarding the validity of the document.
(3) The department of health shall prescribe a procedure for an
individual to revoke a health care declaration contained in the
registry.
(4) The registry must:
(a) Be maintained in a secure database that is accessible through
a web site maintained by the department of health;
(b) Send annual electronic messages to individuals that have
submitted health care declarations to request that they review the
registry materials to ensure that it is current;
(c) Provide individuals who have submitted one or more health care
declarations with access to their documents and the ability to revoke
their documents at all times; and
(d) Provide the personal representatives of individuals who have
submitted one or more health care declarations to the registry,
attending physicians, advanced registered nurse practitioners, health
care providers licensed by a disciplining authority identified in RCW
18.130.040 who is acting under the direction of a physician or an
advanced registered nurse practitioner, and health care facilities, as
defined in this chapter or in chapter 71.32 RCW, access to the registry
at all times.
(5) In designing the registry and web site, the department of
health shall ensure compliance with state and federal requirements
related to patient confidentiality.
(6) The department shall provide information to health care
providers and health care facilities on the registry web site regarding
the different federal and Washington state requirements to ascertain
and document whether a patient has an advance directive.
(7) The department of health may accept donations, grants, gifts,
or other forms of voluntary contributions to support activities related
to the creation and maintenance of the health care declarations
registry and statewide public education campaigns related to the
existence of the registry. All receipts from donations made under this
section, and other contributions and appropriations specifically made
for the purposes of creating and maintaining the registry established
under this section and statewide public education campaigns related to
the existence of the registry, shall be deposited into the general
fund. These moneys in the general fund may be spent only after
appropriation.
(8) The department of health may adopt rules as necessary to
implement chapter 108, Laws of 2006.
(9) By December 1, 2008, the department shall report to the house
and senate committees on health care the following information:
(a) Number of participants in the registry;
(b) Number of health care declarations submitted by type of
declaration as defined in this section;
(c) Number of health care declarations revoked and the method of
revocation;
(d) Number of providers and facilities, by type, that have been
provided access to the registry;
(e) Actual costs of operation of the registry.

Sec. 407 RCW 71.32.020 and 2011 c 89 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adult" means any individual who has attained the age of
majority or is an emancipated minor.
(2) "Agent" has the same meaning as an attorney-in-fact or agent as
provided in chapter ((11.94)) 11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 505 of this act).
(3) "Capacity" means that an adult has not been found to be
incapacitated pursuant to this chapter or RCW 11.88.010(1)(e).
(4) "Court" means a superior court under chapter 2.08 RCW.
(5) "Health care facility" means a hospital, as defined in RCW
70.41.020; an institution, as defined in RCW 71.12.455; a state
hospital, as defined in RCW 72.23.010; a nursing home, as defined in
RCW 18.51.010; or a clinic that is part of a community mental health
service delivery system, as defined in RCW 71.24.025.
(6) "Health care provider" means an osteopathic physician or
osteopathic physician's assistant licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.57A RCW, a physician or physician's assistant licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.71A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner
licensed under RCW 18.79.050.
(7) "Incapacitated" means an adult who: (a) Is unable to
understand the nature, character, and anticipated results of proposed
treatment or alternatives; understand the recognized serious possible
risks, complications, and anticipated benefits in treatments and
alternatives, including nontreatment; or communicate his or her
understanding or treatment decisions; or (b) has been found to be
incompetent pursuant to RCW 11.88.010(1)(e).
(8) "Informed consent" means consent that is given after the
person: (a) Is provided with a description of the nature, character,
and anticipated results of proposed treatments and alternatives, and
the recognized serious possible risks, complications, and anticipated
benefits in the treatments and alternatives, including nontreatment, in
language that the person can reasonably be expected to understand; or
(b) elects not to be given the information included in (a) of this
subsection.
(9) "Long-term care facility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 43.190.020.
(10) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment which has substantial adverse effects on an individual's
cognitive or volitional functions.
(11) "Mental health advance directive" or "directive" means a
written document in which the principal makes a declaration of
instructions or preferences or appoints an agent to make decisions on
behalf of the principal regarding the principal's mental health
treatment, or both, and that is consistent with the provisions of this
chapter.
(12) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW.
(13) "Principal" means an adult who has executed a mental health
advance directive.
(14) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and
shall also mean a physician, registered nurse, and such others as may
be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 71.05 RCW.
(15) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and
approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

Sec. 408 RCW 71.32.050 and 2003 c 283 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An adult with capacity may execute a mental health advance
directive.
(2) A directive executed in accordance with this chapter is
presumed to be valid. The inability to honor one or more provisions of
a directive does not affect the validity of the remaining provisions.
(3) A directive may include any provision relating to mental health
treatment or the care of the principal or the principal's personal
affairs. Without limitation, a directive may include:
(a) The principal's preferences and instructions for mental health
treatment;
(b) Consent to specific types of mental health treatment;
(c) Refusal to consent to specific types of mental health
treatment;
(d) Consent to admission to and retention in a facility for mental
health treatment for up to fourteen days;
(e) Descriptions of situations that may cause the principal to
experience a mental health crisis;
(f) Suggested alternative responses that may supplement or be in
lieu of direct mental health treatment, such as treatment approaches
from other providers;
(g) Appointment of an agent pursuant to chapter ((11.94)) 11.-- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 505 of this act) to make mental
health treatment decisions on the principal's behalf, including
authorizing the agent to provide consent on the principal's behalf to
voluntary admission to inpatient mental health treatment; and
(h) The principal's nomination of a guardian or limited guardian as
provided in ((RCW 11.94.010)) section 108 of this act for consideration
by the court if guardianship proceedings are commenced.
(4) A directive may be combined with or be independent of a
nomination of a guardian or other durable power of attorney under
chapter ((11.94)) 11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 505 of
this act), so long as the processes for each are executed in accordance
with its own statutes.

Sec. 409 RCW 71.32.060 and 2003 c 283 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A directive shall:
(a) Be in writing;
(b) Contain language that clearly indicates that the principal
intends to create a directive;
(c) Be dated and signed by the principal or at the principal's
direction in the principal's presence if the principal is unable to
sign;
(d) Designate whether the principal wishes to be able to revoke the
directive during any period of incapacity or wishes to be unable to
revoke the directive during any period of incapacity; and
(e) Be witnessed in writing by at least two adults, each of whom
shall declare that he or she personally knows the principal, was
present when the principal dated and signed the directive, and that the
principal did not appear to be incapacitated or acting under fraud,
undue influence, or duress.
(2) A directive executed prior to the effective date of this act
that includes the appointment of an agent pursuant to a power of
attorney under chapter 11.94 RCW shall contain the words "This power of
attorney shall not be affected by the incapacity of the principal," or
"This power of attorney shall become effective upon the incapacity of
the principal," or similar words showing the principal's intent that
the authority conferred shall be exercisable notwithstanding the
principal's incapacity.
(3) A directive is valid upon execution, but all or part of the
directive may take effect at a later time as designated by the
principal in the directive.
(4) A directive may:
(a) Be revoked, in whole or in part, pursuant to the provisions of
RCW 71.32.080; or
(b) Expire under its own terms.

Sec. 410 RCW 71.32.100 and 2003 c 283 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a directive authorizes the appointment of an agent, the
provisions of chapter ((11.94)) 11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 505 of this act) and RCW 7.70.065 shall apply unless otherwise
stated in this chapter.
(2) The principal who appoints an agent must notify the agent in
writing of the appointment.
(3) An agent must act in good faith.
(4) An agent may make decisions on behalf of the principal. Unless
the principal has revoked the directive, the decisions must be
consistent with the instructions and preferences the principal has
expressed in the directive, or if not expressed, as otherwise known to
the agent. If the principal's instructions or preferences are not
known, the agent shall make a decision he or she determines is in the
best interest of the principal.
(5) Except to the extent the right is limited by the appointment or
any federal or state law, the agent has the same right as the principal
to receive, review, and authorize the use and disclosure of the
principal's health care information when the agent is acting on behalf
of the principal and to the extent required for the agent to carry out
his or her duties. This subsection shall be construed to be consistent
with chapters 70.02, 70.24, 70.96A, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW, and with
federal law regarding health care information.
(6) Unless otherwise provided in the appointment and agreed to in
writing by the agent, the agent is not, as a result of acting in the
capacity of agent, personally liable for the cost of treatment provided
to the principal.
(7) An agent may resign or withdraw at any time by giving written
notice to the principal. The agent must also give written notice to
any health care provider, professional person, or health care facility
providing treatment to the principal. The resignation or withdrawal is
effective upon receipt unless otherwise specified in the resignation or
withdrawal.
(8) If the directive gives the agent authority to act while the
principal has capacity, the decisions of the principal supersede those
of the agent at any time the principal has capacity.
(9) Unless otherwise provided in the durable power of attorney, the
principal may revoke the agent's appointment as provided under other
state law.

Sec. 411 RCW 71.32.180 and 2003 c 283 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Where an incapacitated principal has executed more than one
valid directive and has not revoked any of the directives:
(a) The directive most recently created shall be treated as the
principal's mental health treatment preferences and instructions as to
any inconsistent or conflicting provisions, unless provided otherwise
in either document.
(b) Where a directive executed under this chapter is inconsistent
with a directive executed under any other chapter, the most recently
created directive controls as to the inconsistent provisions.
(2) Where an incapacitated principal has appointed more than one
agent under chapter ((11.94)) 11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 505 of this act) with authority to make mental health treatment
decisions, ((RCW 11.94.010)) section 217 of this act controls.
(3) The treatment provider shall inquire of a principal whether the
principal is subject to any court orders that would affect the
implementation of his or her directive.

Sec. 412 RCW 71.32.200 and 2003 c 283 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person with reasonable cause to believe that a directive has
been created or revoked under circumstances amounting to fraud, duress,
or undue influence may petition the court for appointment of a guardian
for the person or to review the actions of the agent or person alleged
to be involved in improper conduct under ((RCW 11.94.090)) section 116
of this act or RCW 74.34.110.

Sec. 413 RCW 71.32.260 and 2009 c 217 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The directive shall be in substantially the following form:

Mental Health Advance Directive

NOTICE TO PERSONS
CREATING A MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

This is an important legal document. It creates an advance directive for mental health treatment. Before signing this
document you should know these important facts:

(1) This document is called an advance directive and allows you to make decisions in advance about your mental health
treatment, including medications, short-term admission to inpatient treatment and electroconvulsive therapy.

YOU DO NOT HAVE TO FILL OUT OR SIGN THIS FORM.
IF YOU DO NOT SIGN THIS FORM, IT WILL NOT TAKE EFFECT.

If you choose to complete and sign this document, you may still decide to leave some items blank.

(2) You have the right to appoint a person as your agent to make treatment decisions for you. You must notify your
agent that you have appointed him or her as an agent. The person you appoint has a duty to act consistently with
your wishes made known by you. If your agent does not know what your wishes are, he or she has a duty to act in
your best interest. Your agent has the right to withdraw from the appointment at any time.

(3) The instructions you include with this advance directive and the authority you give your agent to act will only become
effective under the conditions you select in this document. You may choose to limit this directive and your agent's
authority to times when you are incapacitated or to times when you are exhibiting symptoms or behavior that you
specify. You may also make this directive effective immediately. No matter when you choose to make this directive
effective, your treatment providers must still seek your informed consent at all times that you have capacity to give
informed consent.

(4) You have the right to revoke this document in writing at any time you have capacity.

YOU MAY NOT REVOKE THIS DIRECTIVE WHEN YOU HAVE BEEN FOUND TO BE
INCAPACITATED UNLESS YOU HAVE SPECIFICALLY STATED IN THIS DIRECTIVE THAT
YOU WANT IT TO BE REVOCABLE WHEN YOU ARE INCAPACITATED.

(5) This directive will stay in effect until you revoke it unless you specify an expiration date. If you specify an expiration
date and you are incapacitated at the time it expires, it will remain in effect until you have capacity to make
treatment decisions again unless you chose to be able to revoke it while you are incapacitated and you revoke the
directive.

(6) You cannot use your advance directive to consent to civil commitment. The procedures that apply to your advance
directive are different than those provided for in the Involuntary Treatment Act. Involuntary treatment is a different
process.

(7) If there is anything in this directive that you do not understand, you should ask a lawyer to explain it to you.

(8) You should be aware that there are some circumstances where your provider may not have to follow your directive.

(9) You should discuss any treatment decisions in your directive with your provider.

(10) You may ask the court to rule on the validity of your directive.

PART I.
STATEMENT OF INTENT TO CREATE A
MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE

I, . . . . . . . . . . being a person with capacity, willfully and voluntarily execute this mental health advance directive so
that my choices regarding my mental health care will be carried out in circumstances when I am unable to express my
instructions and preferences regarding my mental health care. If a guardian is appointed by a court to make mental
health decisions for me, I intend this document to take precedence over all other means of ascertaining my intent.

The fact that I may have left blanks in this directive does not affect its validity in any way. I intend that all
completed sections be followed. If I have not expressed a choice, my agent should make the decision that he or she
determines is in my best interest. I intend this directive to take precedence over any other directives I have previously
executed, to the extent that they are inconsistent with this document, or unless I expressly state otherwise in either
document.

I understand that I may revoke this directive in whole or in part if I am a person with capacity. I understand that I
cannot revoke this directive if a court, two health care providers, or one mental health professional and one health care
provider find that I am an incapacitated person, unless, when I executed this directive, I chose to be able to revoke this
directive while incapacitated.

I understand that, except as otherwise provided in law, revocation must be in writing. I understand that nothing in
this directive, or in my refusal of treatment to which I consent in this directive, authorizes any health care provider,
professional person, health care facility, or agent appointed in this directive to use or threaten to use abuse, neglect,
financial exploitation, or abandonment to carry out my directive.

I understand that there are some circumstances where my provider may not have to follow my directive.

PART II.
WHEN THIS DIRECTIVE IS EFFECTIVE

YOU MUST COMPLETE THIS PART FOR YOUR DIRECTIVE TO BE VALID.

I intend that this directive become effective (YOU MUST CHOOSE ONLY ONE):

. . . . . . Immediately upon my signing of this directive.

. . . . . . If I become incapacitated.

. . . . . . When the following circumstances, symptoms, or behaviors occur: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

PART III.
DURATION OF THIS DIRECTIVE

YOU MUST COMPLETE THIS PART FOR YOUR DIRECTIVE TO BE VALID.

I want this directive to (YOU MUST CHOOSE ONLY ONE):

. . . . . . Remain valid and in effect for an indefinite period of time.

. . . . . . Automatically expire . . . . . . years from the date it was created.

PART IV.
WHEN I MAY REVOKE THIS DIRECTIVE

YOU MUST COMPLETE THIS PART FOR THIS DIRECTIVE TO BE VALID.

I intend that I be able to revoke this directive (YOU MUST CHOOSE ONLY ONE):

. . . . . . Only when I have capacity.
I understand that choosing this option means I may only revoke this directive if I have capacity. I further understand
that if I choose this option and become incapacitated while this directive is in effect, I may receive treatment
that I specify in this directive, even if I object at the time.

. . . . . . Even if I am incapacitated.
I understand that choosing this option means that I may revoke this directive even if I am incapacitated. I further
understand that if I choose this option and revoke this directive while I am incapacitated I may not receive
treatment that I specify in this directive, even if I want the treatment.

PART V.
PREFERENCES AND INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT TREATMENT, FACILITIES, AND PHYSICIANS OR
PSYCHIATRIC ADVANCED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONERS

A. Preferences and Instructions About Physician(s) or Psychiatric Advanced Registered Nurse Practitioner(s) to
be Involved in My Treatment

I would like the physician(s) or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner(s) named below to be involved in my
treatment decisions:

Dr. or PARNP . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Contact information: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Dr. or PARNP . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Contact information: . . . . . . . . . . . .

I do not wish to be treated by Dr. or PARNP . . . . . . . . . . . .

B. Preferences and Instructions About Other Providers

I am receiving other treatment or care from providers who I feel have an impact on my mental health care. I would like
the following treatment provider(s) to be contacted when this directive is effective:

Name . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Profession . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Contact information . . . . . . . . . . . .

Name . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Profession . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Contact information . . . . . . . . . . . .

C. Preferences and Instructions About Medications for Psychiatric Treatment (initial and complete all that apply)

. . . . . . I consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the following
medications: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . I do not consent, and I do not authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of the following
medications: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . I am willing to take the medications excluded above if my only reason for excluding them is the side effects
which include . . . . . . . . . . . .
and these side effects can be eliminated by dosage adjustment or other means

. . . . . . I am willing to try any other medication the hospital doctor or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner
recommends

. . . . . . I am willing to try any other medications my outpatient doctor or psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner recommends

. . . . . . I do not want to try any other medications.

Medication Allergies

I have allergies to, or severe side effects from, the following: . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Other Medication Preferences or Instructions

. . . . . . I have the following other preferences or instructions about medications . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .

D. Preferences and Instructions About Hospitalization and Alternatives
(initial all that apply and, if desired, rank "1" for first choice, "2" for second choice, and so on)

. . . . . . In the event my psychiatric condition is serious enough to require 24-hour care and I have no physical conditions
that require immediate access to emergency medical care, I prefer to receive this care in programs/facilities designed as
alternatives to psychiatric hospitalizations.

. . . . . . I would also like the interventions below to be tried before hospitalization is considered:

. . . . . . Calling someone or having someone call me when needed.

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . Staying overnight with someone

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . Having a mental health service provider come to see me

. . . . . . Going to a crisis triage center or emergency room

. . . . . . Staying overnight at a crisis respite (temporary) bed

. . . . . . Seeing a service provider for help with psychiatric medications

. . . . . . Other, specify: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Authority to Consent to Inpatient Treatment

I consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to voluntary admission to inpatient mental health treatment
for . . . . . . days (not to exceed 14 days)

(Sign one):

. . . . . . If deemed appropriate by my agent (if appointed) and treating physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

or

. . . . . . Under the following circumstances (specify symptoms, behaviors, or circumstances that indicate the need for
hospitalization) . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

. . . . . . I do not consent, or authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to inpatient treatment

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

Hospital Preferences and Instructions

If hospitalization is required, I prefer the following hospitals: . . . . . . . . . . . .

I do not consent to be admitted to the following hospitals: . . . . . . . . . . . .

E. Preferences and Instructions About Preemergency

I would like the interventions below to be tried before use of seclusion or restraint is considered
(initial all that apply):

. . . . . . "Talk me down" one-on-one

. . . . . . More medication

. . . . . . Time out/privacy

. . . . . . Show of authority/force

. . . . . . Shift my attention to something else

. . . . . . Set firm limits on my behavior

. . . . . . Help me to discuss/vent feelings

. . . . . . Decrease stimulation

. . . . . . Offer to have neutral person settle dispute

. . . . . . Other, specify . . . . . . . . . . . .

F. Preferences and Instructions About Seclusion, Restraint, and Emergency Medications

If it is determined that I am engaging in behavior that requires seclusion, physical restraint, and/or emergency use of
medication, I prefer these interventions in the order I have chosen (choose "1" for first choice, "2" for second choice,
and so on):

. . . . . . Seclusion

. . . . . . Seclusion and physical restraint (combined)

. . . . . . Medication by injection

. . . . . . Medication in pill or liquid form

In the event that my attending physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner decides to use medication
in response to an emergency situation after due consideration of my preferences and instructions for emergency
treatments stated above, I expect the choice of medication to reflect any preferences and instructions I have expressed in
Part III C of this form. The preferences and instructions I express in this section regarding medication in emergency
situations do not constitute consent to use of the medication for nonemergency treatment.

G. Preferences and Instructions About Electroconvulsive Therapy
(ECT or Shock Therapy)

My wishes regarding electroconvulsive therapy are (sign one):

. . . . . . I do not consent, nor authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of electroconvulsive
therapy

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

. . . . . . I consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

. . . . . . I consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy,
but only under the following conditions: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

H. Preferences and Instructions About Who is Permitted to Visit

If I have been admitted to a mental health treatment facility, the following people are not permitted to visit me there:

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

I understand that persons not listed above may be permitted to visit me.

I. Additional Instructions About My Mental Health Care

Other instructions about my mental health care: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

In case of emergency, please contact:

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Work telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Home telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Physician or Psychiatric Advanced Registered
Nurse Practitioner: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

The following may help me to avoid a hospitalization: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

I generally react to being hospitalized as follows: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Staff of the hospital or crisis unit can help me by doing the following: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

J. Refusal of Treatment

I do not consent to any mental health treatment.

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature)

PART VI.
DURABLE POWER OF ATTORNEY (APPOINTMENT OF MY AGENT)

(Fill out this part only if you wish to appoint an agent or nominate a guardian.)

I authorize an agent to make mental health treatment decisions on my behalf. The authority granted to my agent
includes the right to consent, refuse consent, or withdraw consent to any mental health care, treatment, service, or
procedure, consistent with any instructions and/or limitations I have set forth in this directive. I intend that those
decisions should be made in accordance with my expressed wishes as set forth in this document. If I have not expressed
a choice in this document and my agent does not otherwise know my wishes, I authorize my agent to make the
decision that my agent determines is in my best interest. This agency shall not be affected by my incapacity. Unless I
state otherwise in this durable power of attorney, I may revoke it unless prohibited by other state law.

A. Designation of an Agent

I appoint the following person as my agent to make mental health treatment decisions for me as authorized in this
document and request that this person be notified immediately when this directive becomes effective:

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Work telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Home telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Relationship: . . . . . . . . . . . .

B. Designation of Alternate Agent

If the person named above is unavailable, unable, or refuses to serve as my agent, or I revoke that person's authority to
serve as my agent, I hereby appoint the following person as my alternate agent and request that this person be notified
immediately when this directive becomes effective or when my original agent is no longer my agent:

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Work telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Home telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Relationship: . . . . . . . . . . . .

C. When My Spouse is My Agent (initial if desired)

. . . . . . If my spouse is my agent, that person shall remain my agent even if we become legally separated or our marriage
is dissolved, unless there is a court order to the contrary or I have remarried.

D. Limitations on My Agent's Authority

I do not grant my agent the authority to consent on my behalf to the following:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

E. Limitations on My Ability to Revoke this Durable Power of Attorney

I choose to limit my ability to revoke this durable power of attorney as follows:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

F. Preference as to Court-Appointed Guardian

In the event a court appoints a guardian who will make decisions regarding my mental health treatment, I nominate the
following person as my guardian:

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Work telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Home telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Relationship: . . . . . . . . . . . .

The appointment of a guardian of my estate or my person or any other decision maker shall not give the guardian or
decision maker the power to revoke, suspend, or terminate this directive or the powers of my agent, except as authorized
by law.

. . . . . . . . . . . .
(Signature required if nomination is made)

PART VII.
OTHER DOCUMENTS

(Initial all that apply)

I have executed the following documents that include the power to make decisions regarding health care services for
myself:

. . . . . . Health care power of attorney (chapter ((11.94)) 11.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 505 of this act))

. . . . . . "Living will" (Health care directive; chapter 70.122 RCW)

. . . . . . I have appointed more than one agent. I understand that the most recently appointed agent controls except as
stated below:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

PART VIII.
NOTIFICATION OF OTHERS AND CARE OF PERSONAL AFFAIRS

(Fill out this part only if you wish to provide nontreatment instructions.)

I understand the preferences and instructions in this part are NOT the responsibility of my treatment provider and that no
treatment provider is required to act on them.

A. Who Should Be Notified

I desire my agent to notify the following individuals as soon as possible when this directive becomes effective:

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Day telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Evening telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Day telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Evening telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

B. Preferences or Instructions About Personal Affairs

I have the following preferences or instructions about my personal affairs (e.g., care of dependents, pets, household) if I
am admitted to a mental health treatment facility:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

C. Additional Preferences and Instructions:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

PART IX.
SIGNATURE

By signing here, I indicate that I understand the purpose and effect of this document and that I am giving my
informed consent to the treatments and/or admission to which I have consented or authorized my agent to consent in this
directive. I intend that my consent in this directive be construed as being consistent with the elements of informed
consent under chapter 7.70 RCW.

Signature: . . . . . . . . . . . . Date: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Printed Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

This directive was signed and declared by the "Principal," to be his or her directive, in our presence who, at his or her
request, have signed our names below as witnesses. We declare that, at the time of the creation of this instrument, the
Principal is personally known to us, and, according to our best knowledge and belief, has capacity at this time and does
not appear to be acting under duress, undue influence, or fraud. We further declare that none of us is:

(A) A person designated to make medical decisions on the principal's behalf;

(B) A health care provider or professional person directly involved with the provision of care to the principal at the
time the directive is executed;

(C) An owner, operator, employee, or relative of an owner or operator of a health care facility or long-term care
facility in which the principal is a patient or resident;

(D) A person who is related by blood, marriage, or adoption to the person, or with whom the principal has a dating
relationship as defined in RCW 26.50.010;

(E) An incapacitated person;

(F) A person who would benefit financially if the principal undergoes mental health treatment; or

(G) A minor.

Witness 1: Signature: . . . . . . . . . . . . Date: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Printed Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Witness 2: Signature: . . . . . . . . . . . . Date: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Printed Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . . Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .

PART X.
RECORD OF DIRECTIVE

I have given a copy of this directive to the following persons: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

DO NOT FILL OUT PART XI UNLESS YOU INTEND TO REVOKE
THIS DIRECTIVE IN PART OR IN WHOLE

PART XI.
REVOCATION OF THIS DIRECTIVE

(Initial any that apply):

. . . . . . I am revoking the following part(s) of this directive (specify): . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . I am revoking all of this directive.

By signing here, I indicate that I understand the purpose and effect of my revocation and that no person is bound by any
revoked provision(s). I intend this revocation to be interpreted as if I had never completed the revoked provision(s).

Signature: . . . . . . . . . . . . Date: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Printed Name: . . . . . . . . . . . .

DO NOT SIGN THIS PART UNLESS YOU INTEND TO REVOKE THIS
DIRECTIVE IN PART OR IN WHOLE

PART V
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 In applying and construing this uniform
act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact
it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 This act modifies, limits, and supersedes
the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act,
15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede
section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b)
of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Except as otherwise provided in this act,
on the effective date of this section:
(1) This act applies to a power of attorney created before, on, or
after the effective date of this section;
(2) This act applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of
attorney commenced on or after the effective date of this section;
(3) This act applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of
attorney commenced before the effective date of this section unless the
court finds that application of a provision of this act would
substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial
proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that
provision does not apply and the superseded law applies; and
(4) An act done before the effective date of this section is not
affected by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 11.94.010 (Designation -- Authority -- Effect of acts done--Appointment of guardian, effect -- Accounting -- Reliance on instrument)
and 2007 c 156 s 31, 2005 c 97 s 12, 2003 c 283 s 27, 1995 c 297 s 9,
1989 c 211 s 1, & 1985 c 30 s 25;
(2) RCW 11.94.020 (Effect of death, disability, or incompetence of
principal -- Acts without knowledge) and 1985 c 30 s 26;
(3) RCW 11.94.030 (Banking transactions) and 1985 c 30 s 27;
(4) RCW 11.94.040 (Liability for reliance on power of attorney
document) and 2001 c 203 s 2 & 1985 c 30 s 28;
(5) RCW 11.94.043 (Durable power of attorney -- Revocation or
termination) and 1989 c 211 s 2;
(6) RCW 11.94.046 (Durable power of attorney -- Validity) and 1989 c
211 s 3;
(7) RCW 11.94.050 (Attorney or agent granted principal's powers--Powers to be specifically provided for -- Transfer of resources by
principal's attorney or agent) and 2011 c 327 s 4, 2001 c 203 s 12,
1989 c 87 s 1, & 1985 c 30 s 29;
(8) RCW 11.94.060 (Conveyance or encumbrance of homestead) and 1985
c 30 s 30;
(9) RCW 11.94.070 (Limitations on powers to benefit attorneys-in-fact) and 1994 c 221 s 67;
(10) RCW 11.94.080 (Termination of marriage or state registered
domestic partnership) and 2007 c 156 s 14 & 2001 c 203 s 1;
(11) RCW 11.94.090 (Court petition) and 2008 c 6 s 808 & 2001 c 203
s 3;
(12) RCW 11.94.100 (Persons allowed to file court petition) and
2008 c 6 s 809 & 2001 c 203 s 4;
(13) RCW 11.94.110 (Ruling on court petition) and 2001 c 203 s 5;
(14) RCW 11.94.120 (Award of costs on court petition) and 2001 c
203 s 6;
(15) RCW 11.94.130 (Applicability of dispute resolution provisions
to court petition) and 2001 c 203 s 7;
(16) RCW 11.94.140 (Notice of hearing on court petition) and 2008
c 6 s 810 & 2001 c 203 s 8;
(17) RCW 11.94.150 (Mental health treatment decisions -- Compensation
of agent prohibited -- Reimbursement of expenses allowed) and 2003 c 283
s 28;
(18) RCW 11.94.900 (Application of 1984 c 149 §§ 26-31 as of
January 1, 1985) and 1985 c 30 s 140; and
(19) RCW 11.94.901 (Construction -- Chapter applicable to state
registered domestic partnerships -- 2009 c 521) and 2009 c 521 s 37.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 Sections 101 through 301 and 501 through
503 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.

--- END ---