BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.71.075 and 2012 c 87 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person or entity functioning as a navigator consistent with
the requirements of section 1311(i) of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as
amended, shall not be considered soliciting or negotiating insurance as
stated under chapter 48.17 RCW.
(2) A person or entity functioning as a navigator may not request
health care information from any person seeking their services. Any
information inadvertently received by a navigator may not be disclosed
to any third party and must be destroyed if in print or electronic
form. If a person's health care information is received and disclosed
to a third party in violation of this subsection, the navigator must
inform the person of the disclosure within five business days of
discovery of the disclosure.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "health care information" has
the meaning provided in RCW 70.02.010.

--- END ---