BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.80.020 and 2013 c 11 s 79 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state committee of each major political party consists of one
committeeman and one committeewoman from each county elected by the
county central committee at its organization meeting. ((It must have))
A chair and vice chair ((of opposite sexes)) must be elected. This
committee shall meet during January of each odd-numbered year for the
purpose of organization at a time and place designated by a notice
mailed at least one week before the date of the meeting to all new
state committeemen and committeewomen by the authorized officers of the
retiring committee. At its organizational meeting it shall elect its
chair and vice chair, and such officers as its bylaws may provide, and
adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations. It may:
(1) Call conventions at such time and place and under such
circumstances and for such purposes as the call to convention
designates. The manner, number, and procedure for selection of state
convention delegates is subject to the committee's rules and
regulations duly adopted;
(2) Provide for the election of delegates to national conventions;
(3) Provide for the nomination of presidential electors; and
(4) Perform all functions inherent in such an organization.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the committee may
not adopt rules governing the conduct of the actual proceedings at a
party state convention.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.80.030 and 2003 c 111 s 2003 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county central committee of each major political party consists
of the precinct committee officers of the party from the several voting
precincts of the county. Following each state general election held in
even-numbered years, this committee shall meet for the purpose of
organization at an easily accessible location within the county,
subsequent to the certification of precinct committee officers by the
county auditor and no later than the second Saturday of the following
January. The authorized officers of the retiring committee shall cause
notice of the time and place of the meeting to be mailed to each
precinct committee officer at least seventy-two hours before the date
of the meeting.
At its organization meeting, the county central committee shall
elect a chair and vice chair ((of opposite sexes)).

--- END ---