BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.020 and 2013 c 187 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Apprentice" means a person who is engaged in a state-approved
apprenticeship program and who must receive a wage or compensation
while engaged in the program.
(2) "Apprentice monthly report" means the apprentice record of
daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the approved apprenticeship
program and provided to the apprentice, audited annually by the
department, and kept on file by the approved apprenticeship program for
three years.
(3) "Apprentice trainer" means a person who gives training to an
apprentice in an approved apprenticeship program and who is approved
under RCW 18.16.280.
(4) "Apprenticeship program" means a state-approved apprenticeship
program pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW and approved under RCW 18.16.280
for the training of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics,
master esthetics, and manicuring.
(5) "Apprenticeship training committee" means a committee approved
by the Washington apprenticeship and training council established in
chapter 49.04 RCW.
(6) "Approved apprenticeship shop" means a salon/shop that has been
approved under RCW 18.16.280 and chapter 49.04 RCW to participate in an
apprenticeship program.
(7) "Approved security" means surety bond.
(8) "Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage
in the practice of barbering.
(9) "Board" means the cosmetology, hair design, barbering,
esthetics, and manicuring advisory board.
(10) "Booth renter" means any person licensed in cosmetology, hair
design, natural hair braiding, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring who
rents or leases a section of a building, structure, salon/shop or any
part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of
cosmetology, hair design, natural hair braiding, barbering, esthetics,
or manicuring is conducted. Any person who operates from such a
location is required to meet all salon/shop licensing requirements.
(11) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of cosmetology.
(((11))) (12) "Crossover training" means training approved by the
director as training hours that may be credited to current licensees
for similar training received in another profession licensed under this
chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a
school, ((or)) online by a school, in an approved apprenticeship
program established by the Washington state apprenticeship and training
council and conducted in an approved salon/shop, or online by an
approved apprenticeship program, set by rule under this chapter, and
approved by the department. After consulting with the board, the
director may set by rule a percentage of hours in a curriculum, up to
a maximum of ten percent, that could include hours a student receives
while training in a salon/shop under a contract approved by the
department. Each curriculum must include at least the following
required hours:
(a) School curriculum:
(i) Cosmetologist, ((one)) two thousand six hundred fifty hours;
(ii) Hair design, one thousand six hundred hours;
(iii) Barber, one thousand hours;
(((iii))) (iv) Manicurist, six hundred hours;
(((iv))) (v) Esthetician, seven hundred fifty hours;
(((v))) (vi) Master esthetician either:
(A) One thousand two hundred hours; or
(B) Esthetician licensure plus four hundred fifty hours of
training;
(vi) Instructor-trainee, five hundred hours.
(b) Apprentice training curriculum:
(i) Cosmetologist, ((two)) three thousand hours;
(ii) Hair design, two thousand hours;
(iii) Barber, one thousand two hundred hours;
(((iii))) (iv) Manicurist, eight hundred hours;
(((iv))) (v) Esthetician, eight hundred hours;
(((v))) (vi) Master esthetician, one thousand four hundred hours.
(((13))) (14) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((14))) (15) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing or the director's designee.
(((15))) (16) "Distance or online learning" means theory training
provided online, by a school licensed under this chapter or an approved
apprenticeship program established by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council, in the areas of cosmetology,
manicuring, barbering, esthetics, and instructor-training.
(17) "Esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of esthetics.
(((16))) (18) "Hair design" means the practice of arranging,
dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, extensions, weaving, shampooing,
permanent waving, chemical relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching,
lightening, coloring, mustache and beard design, and massage of the
scalp.
(19) "Hair designer" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of hair design.
(20) "Individual license" means a cosmetology, hair design, barber,
manicurist, esthetician, master esthetician, or instructor license
issued under this chapter.
(((17))) (21) "Instructor" means a person who gives instruction in
a school, or who provides classroom theory training to apprentices in
locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she
holds a license under this chapter, has completed at least five hundred
hours of instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a
school, and has passed a licensing examination approved or administered
by the director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an
accredited postsecondary institution shall upon application be licensed
as an instructor to give instruction in a school, or to provide
classroom theory training to apprentices in locations other than in a
school, in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this
chapter. An applicant who holds an instructional credential from an
accredited community or technical college and who has passed a
licensing examination approved or administered by the director shall
upon application be licensed as an instructor to give instruction in a
school, or to provide classroom theory training to apprentices in
locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she
holds a license under this chapter. To be approved as an "instructor"
in an approved apprenticeship program, the instructor must be a
competent instructor as defined in rules adopted under chapter 49.04
RCW.
(((18))) (22) "Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently
licensed in this state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist,
esthetician, or master esthetician, and is enrolled in an instructor-trainee curriculum in a school licensed under this chapter.
(((19))) (23) "Location license" means a license issued under this
chapter for a salon/shop, school, personal services, or mobile unit.
(((20))) (24) "Manicurist" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of manicuring.
(((21))) (25) "Master esthetician" means a person licensed under
this chapter to engage in the practice of master esthetics.
(((22))) (26) "Mobile unit" is a location license under this
chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, master
esthetics, or manicuring is conducted in a mobile structure. Mobile
units must conform to the health and safety standards set by rule under
this chapter.
(((23))) (27) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
professional service corporation, joint stock association, joint
venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in this state.
(((24))) (28) "Personal services" means a location licensed under
this chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring,
esthetics, or master esthetics is performed for clients in the client's
home, office, or other location that is convenient for the client.
(((25))) (29) "((The)) Practice of barbering" means the cutting,
trimming, arranging, dressing, curling((,)) and shampooing of the head,
and shaving, ((and)) mustache, and beard design of the hair of the
face((,)) and neck, and stimulation of the scalp.
(((26))) (30) "((The)) Practice of cosmetology" means ((arranging,
dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving,
chemical relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching, lightening,
coloring, waxing, tweezing, shaving, and mustache and beard design of
the hair of the face, neck, and scalp; temporary removal of superfluous
hair by use of depilatories, waxing, or tweezing; manicuring and
pedicuring, limited to cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and
caring for and treatment of the cuticles and nails of the hands and
feet, excluding the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise
artificial nails; esthetics limited to toning the skin of the scalp,
stimulating the skin of the body by the use of preparations, tonics,
lotions, or creams; and tinting eyelashes and eyebrows)) the practice
of hair design, manicuring, and esthetics as defined in this section.
(((27))) (31) "Practice of esthetics" means the care of the skin
for compensation by application, use of preparations, antiseptics,
tonics, essential oils, exfoliants, superficial and light peels, or by
any device, except laser, or equipment, electrical or otherwise, or by
wraps, compresses, cleansing, conditioning, stimulation, superficial
skin stimulation, pore extraction, or product application and removal;
temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions, creams,
appliance, waxing, threading, tweezing, or depilatories, including
chemical means; and application of product to the eyelashes and
eyebrows, including extensions, design and treatment, tinting and
lightening of the hair, excluding the scalp. Under no circumstances
does the practice of esthetics include the administration of
injections.
(((28))) (32) "Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping,
polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and
the natural nails of the hands or feet, and the application ((and)),
maintenance, removal ((of sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by
hand or with mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances)), and
repairs of all types of artificial nails and tips. Natural and
artificial manicuring may be performed by the use of mechanical or
electrical apparatus or appliances or by hand. Manicuring includes the
stimulation and care of the skin of the hands and arms up to and
including the elbow, feet, and legs up to and including the knee.
(((29))) (33) "Practice of master esthetics" means the care of the
skin for compensation including all of the methods allowed in the
definition of the practice of esthetics. It also includes the
performance of medium depth peels and the use of medical devices for
care of the skin and permanent hair reduction. The medical devices
include, but are not limited to, lasers, light, radio frequency,
plasma, intense pulsed light, and ultrasound. The use of a medical
device must comply with state law and rules, including any laws or
rules that require delegation or supervision by a licensed health
professional acting within the scope of practice of that health
profession.
(((30))) (34) "Salon/shop" means any building, structure, or any
part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring is
conducted; provided that any person, except employees of a salon/shop,
who operates from a salon/shop is required to meet all salon/shop
licensing requirements and may participate in the apprenticeship
program when certified as established by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council established in chapter 49.04 RCW.
(((31))) (35) "School" means any establishment that offers
curriculum of instruction in the practice of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, master esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-trainee to
students and is licensed under this chapter.
(((32))) (36) "Student" means a person sixteen years of age or
older who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and
receives instruction in any of the curricula of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, master esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-training with or
without tuition, fee, or cost, and who does not receive any wage or
commission.
(((33))) (37) "Student monthly report" means the student record of
daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the school and provided to the
student, audited annually by the department, and kept on file by the
school for three years.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.16.030 and 2013 c 187 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other duties imposed by law, including RCW
18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director shall have the following powers
and duties:
(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance
with RCW 43.24.086;
(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;
(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and
administration of licensing examinations;
(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for
schools, instructors, cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists,
estheticians, master estheticians, salons/shops, personal services, and
mobile units;
(5) To establish curricula for the training of students and
apprentices under this chapter;
(6) To maintain the official department record of applicants and
licensees;
(7) To establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure;
(8) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all
licenses consistent with this chapter; and
(9) ((To ensure that all informational notices produced and mailed
by the department regarding statutory and regulatory changes affecting
any particular class of licensees are mailed to each licensee in good
standing or on inactive status in the affected class whose mailing
address on record with the department has not resulted in mail being
returned as undeliverable for any reason; and
(10))) To make information available to the department of revenue
to assist in collecting taxes from persons required to be licensed
under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.16.050 and 2013 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a state cosmetology, hair design, barbering,
esthetics, and manicuring advisory board consisting of a maximum of ten
members appointed by the director. These members of the board shall
include: A representative of private schools licensed under this
chapter; a representative from an approved apprenticeship program
conducted in an approved salon/shop; a representative of public
vocational technical schools licensed under this chapter; a consumer
who is unaffiliated with the cosmetology, hair design, barbering,
esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring industry; and six members
who are currently practicing licensees who have been engaged in the
practice of manicuring, esthetics, master esthetics, barbering, hair
design, or cosmetology for at least three years. Members shall serve
a term of three years. Any board member may be removed for just cause.
The director may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board
for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(2) Board members shall be entitled to compensation pursuant to RCW
43.03.240 for each day spent conducting official business and to
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(3) The board may seek the advice and input of officials from the
following state agencies: (a) The workforce training and education
coordinating board; (b) the employment security department; (c) the
department of labor and industries; (d) the department of health; (e)
the department of licensing; and (f) the department of revenue.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.16.060 and 2013 c 187 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in a practice listed in
subsection (2) of this section unless the person has a license in good
standing as required by this chapter. A license issued under this
chapter shall be considered to be "in good standing" except when:
(a) The license has expired or has been canceled and has not been
renewed in accordance with RCW 18.16.110;
(b) The license has been denied, revoked, or suspended under RCW
18.16.210, 18.16.230, or 18.16.240, and has not been reinstated;
(c) The license is held by a person who has not fully complied with
an order of the director issued under RCW 18.16.210 requiring the
licensee to pay restitution or a fine, or to acquire additional
training; or
(d) The license has been placed on inactive status at the request
of the licensee, and has not been reinstated in accordance with RCW
18.16.110(3).
(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and
18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without
first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required
by this chapter:
(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) ((and)), (4), and (5) of
this section, engages in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair
design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring;
(b) Instructs in a school;
(c) Operates a school; or
(d) Operates a salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit.
(3) A person who receives a license as an instructor may engage in
the commercial practice for which he or she held a license when
applying for the instructor license without also renewing the
previously held license. However, a person licensed as an instructor
whose license to engage in a commercial practice is not or at any time
was not renewed may not engage in the commercial practice previously
permitted under that license unless that person renews the previously
held license.
(4) An apprentice actively enrolled in an apprenticeship program
for cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring
may engage in the commercial practice as required for the
apprenticeship program.
(5) This section does not apply to persons engaging in the practice
of cosmetology for the sole purpose of preparing an individual for a
professional photograph, or a theatrical, musical, film, video, or
television performance; or for makeup application demonstration for the
purpose of advertisement or sale of cosmetics.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.16.110 and 2004 c 51 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the appropriate license to any
applicant who meets the requirements as outlined in this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 18.16.260:
(a) Failure to renew a license by its expiration date subjects the
holder to a penalty fee and payment of each year's renewal fee, at the
current rate; and
(b) A person whose license has not been renewed within ((one)) ten
years after its expiration date shall have the license canceled and
shall be required to submit an application, pay the license fee, meet
current licensing requirements, and pass any applicable examination or
examinations, in addition to the other requirements of this chapter,
before the license may be reinstated.
(3) In lieu of the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this
section, a license placed on inactive status under RCW 18.16.290 may be
reinstated to good standing upon receipt by the department of: (a)
Payment of a renewal fee, without penalty, for a two-year license
commencing on the date the license is reinstated; and (b) if the
license was on inactive status during any time that the board finds
that a health or other requirement applicable to the license has
changed, evidence showing that the holder of the license has
successfully completed, from a school licensed under RCW 18.16.140, at
least the number of curriculum clock hours of instruction that the
board deems necessary for a licensee to be brought current with respect
to such changes, but in no case may the number of hours required under
this subsection exceed four hours per year that the license was on
inactive status.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes a person whose license has
expired or is on inactive status to engage in a practice prohibited
under RCW 18.16.060 until the license is renewed or reinstated.
(5) Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be established
by rule by the director, the director shall issue a duplicate license
to an applicant.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.16.130 and 2013 c 187 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who is properly licensed in any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, or foreign country shall be eligible
for examination if the applicant submits the approved application and
fee and provides proof to the director that he or she is currently
licensed in good standing as a cosmetologist, hair designer, barber,
manicurist, esthetician, instructor, or the equivalent in that
jurisdiction. ((Upon passage of the required examinations the
appropriate license will be issued.))
(2)(a) The director shall, upon passage of the required
examinations, issue a license as master esthetician to an applicant who
submits the approved application and fee and provides proof to the
director that the applicant is currently licensed in good standing in
esthetics in any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
or foreign country and holds a diplomate of the comite international
d'esthetique et de cosmetologie diploma, or an international therapy
examination council diploma, or a certified credential awarded by the
national coalition of estheticians, manufacturers/distributors &
associations.
(b) The director may upon passage of the required examinations,
issue a master esthetician license to an applicant that is currently
licensed in esthetics in any other state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or foreign country and submits an approved
application and fee and provides proof to the director that he or she
is licensed in good standing and:
(i) The licensing state, territory, or possession of the United
States, or foreign country has licensure requirements that the director
determines are substantially equivalent to a master esthetician license
in this state; or
(ii) The applicant has certification or a diploma or other
credentials that the director determines has licensure requirements
that are substantially equivalent to the degree listed in (a) of this
subsection.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.16.140 and 2002 c 111 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person wishing to operate a school shall, before opening
such a school, pay the license fee and file with the director for
approval a license application containing the following information:
(a) The names and addresses of all owners, managers, and
instructors;
(b) A copy of the school's curriculum satisfying the curriculum
requirements established by the director;
(c) A ((sample)) current copy of the school's catalog, brochure,
enrollment contract, and cancellation and refund policies that will be
used or distributed by the school to students and the public;
(d) A surety bond in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars,
or ten percent of the annual gross tuition collected by the school,
whichever is greater. The approved security shall not exceed fifty
thousand dollars and shall run to the state of Washington for the
protection of unearned prepaid student tuition. The school shall
attest to its gross tuition at least annually on forms provided by the
department. When a new school license is being applied for, the
applicant will estimate its annual gross tuition to establish a bond
amount. This subsection shall not apply to community colleges and
vocational technical schools;
(e) A floor plan that must identify space for the office,
bathrooms, reception area, classrooms, practice or demonstration room,
clinic, and dispensary.
Upon approval of the application and documents, the director shall
issue a license to operate a school.
(2) Changes to the information provided by schools shall be
submitted to the department within fifteen days of the implementation
date.
(3) A change involving the controlling interest or physical
location of the school requires a new license application and fee. The
new application shall include all required documentation, proof of
ownership change, and be approved prior to a license being issued.
(4) School and instructor licenses issued by the department shall
be posted in the reception area of the school.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.16.170 and 2013 c 187 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, licenses issued
under this chapter expire as follows:
(a) A salon/shop, booth renter, personal services, or mobile unit
license expires one year from issuance or when the insurance required
by RCW 18.16.175(1)(g) expires, whichever occurs first;
(b) A school license expires one year from issuance; and
(c) Cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician,
master esthetician, and instructor licenses expire two years from
issuance.
(2) The director may provide for expiration dates other than those
set forth in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of
establishing staggered renewal periods.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.16.175 and 2013 c 187 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A salon/shop, booth renter, or mobile unit shall meet the
following minimum requirements:
(a) Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for
sleeping or residential purposes;
(b) Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate
toilet facilities located within or adjacent to the salon/shop or
mobile unit;
(c) Any room used wholly or in part as a salon/shop or mobile unit
shall not be used for residential purposes, except that toilet
facilities may be used for both residential and business purposes;
(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as
appropriate;
(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of chemicals used in the
practices under this chapter;
(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and
(g) Certify that the salon/shop or mobile unit is covered by a
public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one
hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability.
(2) The director may by rule determine other requirements that are
necessary for safety and sanitation of salons/shops, booth renters,
personal services, or mobile units. The director may consult with the
state board of health and the department of labor and industries in
establishing minimum salon/shop, personal services, and mobile unit
safety requirements.
(3) Personal services license holders shall certify coverage of a
public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one
hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability.
(4) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a salon/shop ((or)),
booth renter, mobile unit, or personal service license holder has
violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, or the
rules adopted under either chapter, or at least once every two years
for an existing salon/shop ((or)), booth renter, mobile unit, or
personal service license holder, the director or the director's
designee shall inspect each salon/shop, leased space, or mobile unit.
If the director determines that any salon/shop ((or)), booth renter,
mobile unit, or personal service license holder is not in compliance
with this chapter, the director shall send written notice to the
salon/shop or mobile unit. A salon/shop, booth renter, or mobile unit
which fails to correct the conditions to the satisfaction of the
director within a reasonable time shall, upon due notice, be subject to
the penalties imposed by the director under RCW 18.235.110. The
director may enter any salon/shop or mobile unit during business hours
for the purpose of inspection. The director may contract with health
authorities of local governments to conduct the inspections under this
subsection.
(5) A salon/shop, booth renter, personal services, or mobile unit
shall obtain a certificate of registration from the department of
revenue.
(6) This section does not prohibit the use of motor homes as mobile
units if the motor home meets the health and safety standards of this
section.
(7) Salon/shop, booth renter, or mobile unit licenses issued by the
department must be posted in direct public view within the salon/shop,
rented or leased space, or mobile unit's reception area.
(8) Cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master
esthetics, and manicuring licenses issued by the department must be
posted at the licensed person's work station.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.16.180 and 2013 c 187 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall prepare and provide to all licensed
salons/shops, booth renters, and mobile units a notice to consumers.
At a minimum, the notice shall state that cosmetology, hair design,
barber, esthetics, master esthetics, ((and)) manicure salons/shops,
booth renters, and mobile units are required to be licensed, that
salons/shops, booth renters, and mobile units are required to maintain
minimum safety and sanitation standards, that customer complaints
regarding salons/shops, booth renters, and mobile units may be reported
to the department, and a telephone number and address where complaints
may be made.
(2) An approved apprenticeship shop must post a notice to consumers
in the reception area of the salon/shop stating that services may be
provided by an apprentice. At a minimum, the notice must state: "This
shop is a participant in a state-approved apprenticeship program.
Apprentices in this program are in training and have not yet received
a license."

Sec. 11 RCW 18.16.190 and 2013 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is a violation of this chapter for any person to engage in the
commercial practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics,
master esthetics, or manicuring, except in a licensed salon/shop or the
home, office, or other location selected by the client for obtaining
the services of a personal service operator, or with the appropriate
individual license when delivering services to placebound clients.
Placebound clients are defined as persons who are ill, disabled, or
otherwise unable to travel to a salon/shop.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.16.200 and 2013 c 187 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action against any
applicant or licensee under this chapter if the licensee or applicant:
(1) Has been found to have violated any provisions of chapter 19.86
RCW;
(2) Has engaged in a practice prohibited under RCW 18.16.060
without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license
required by this chapter;
(3) Has engaged in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair
design, barbering, manicuring, esthetics, or master esthetics in a
school;
(4) Has not provided a safe, sanitary, and good moral environment
for students in a school or the public;
(5) Has failed to display licenses required in this chapter; or
(6) Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under it.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.16.290 and 2013 c 187 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the holder of an individual license in good standing submits
a written and notarized request that the licensee's cosmetology, hair
design, barber, manicurist, esthetician and master esthetician, or
instructor license be placed on inactive status, together with a fee
equivalent to that established by rule for a duplicate license, the
department shall place the license on inactive status until the
expiration date of the license. If the date of the request is no more
than six months before the expiration date of the license, a request
for a two-year extension of the inactive status, as provided under
subsection (2) of this section, may be submitted at the same time as
the request under this subsection.
(2) If the holder of a license placed on inactive status under this
section submits, by the expiration date of the license, a written and
notarized request to extend that status for an additional two years,
the department shall, without additional fee, extend the expiration
date of: (a) The licensee's individual license; and (b) the inactive
status for two years from the expiration date of the license.
(3) A license placed on inactive status under this section may not
be extended more frequently than once in any twenty-four month period
or for more than six consecutive years.
(4) If, by the expiration date of a license placed on inactive
status under this section, a licensee is unable, or fails, to request
that the status be extended and the license is not renewed, the license
shall be canceled.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.16.900 and 2002 c 111 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
This ((act)) chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
"Washington cosmetologists, hair designers, barbers, manicurists, and
estheticians act".

--- END ---