BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that in recent
years not all students eligible for the state need grant program have
received an award due to limited funds and unfamiliarity with
disbursement policies. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
to ensure that institutions of higher education clearly disseminate
their financial aid policies to admitted and prospective students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
Community and technical colleges shall provide financial aid
application due dates and information on whether or not financial aid
will be awarded on a rolling basis to their admitted students at the
time of acceptance. Institutions of higher education are encouraged to
post financial aid application dates and distribution policies on their
web sites.

--- END ---