BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.021 and 2012 c 87 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have a director appointed by
the governor, with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve
at the pleasure of the governor. The director may employ a deputy
director, and such assistant directors and special assistants as may be
needed to administer the authority, who shall be exempt from chapter
41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by law, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority shall be to:
Administer state employees' insurance benefits and retired or disabled
school employees' insurance benefits; administer the basic health plan
pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; administer the children's health program
pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW; study state-purchased health care
programs in order to maximize cost containment in these programs while
ensuring access to quality health care; implement state initiatives,
joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for efficient
administration that have potential application to all state-purchased
health services; and administer grants that further the mission and
goals of the authority. The authority's duties include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; ((and))
(V) Improve health outcomes; and
(VI) Reduce adverse prescription drug events;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, the
Washington health benefit exchange, or a tribal government, including
providing for the participation of those employees whose services are
substantially all in the performance of essential governmental
functions, but not in the performance of commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority;
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160 including, but not limited to:
(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW
41.05.065 for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;
(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;
(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility
determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under
this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be
authorized by the board;
(m)(i) To administer the medical services programs established
under chapter 74.09 RCW as the designated single state agency for
purposes of Title XIX of the federal social security act;
(ii) To administer the state children's health insurance program
under chapter 74.09 RCW for purposes of Title XXI of the federal social
security act;
(iii) To enter into agreements with the department of social and
health services for administration of medical care services programs
under Titles XIX and XXI of the social security act. The agreements
shall establish the division of responsibilities between the authority
and the department with respect to mental health, chemical dependency,
and long-term care services, including services for persons with
developmental disabilities. The agreements shall be revised as
necessary, to comply with the final implementation plan adopted under
section 116, chapter 15, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.;
(iv) To adopt rules to carry out the purposes of chapter 74.09 RCW;
(v) To appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be
required by any federal statute or regulation as a condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the authority. The director may appoint
statewide committees or councils in the following subject areas: (A)
Health facilities; (B) children and youth services; (C) blind services;
(D) medical and health care; (E) drug abuse and alcoholism; (F)
rehabilitative services; and (G) such other subject matters as are or
come within the authority's responsibilities. The statewide councils
shall have representation from both major political parties and shall
have substantial consumer representation. Such committees or councils
shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the director in
his or her discretion may determine. The members of the committees or
councils shall hold office for three years except in the case of a
vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of
the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve
more than two consecutive terms. Members of such state advisory
committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended;
(n) To review and approve or deny the application from the
governing board of the Washington health benefit exchange to provide
state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to employees of
the exchange. The authority shall (i) establish the conditions for
participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject an application; and
(iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in
RCW 41.05.050.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.02.230 and 2013 c 200 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, RCW 70.02.050, 71.05.445,
70.96A.150, 74.09.295, 70.02.210, 70.02.240, 70.02.250, and 70.02.260,
or pursuant to a valid authorization under RCW 70.02.030, the fact of
admission to a provider for mental health services and all information
and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing mental health services to either voluntary or involuntary
recipients of services at public or private agencies must be
confidential.
(2) Information and records related to mental health services,
other than those obtained through treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW,
may be disclosed only:
(a) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of chapter 71.05 RCW, in the provision of
services or appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship
proceedings if provided to a professional person:
(i) Employed by the facility;
(ii) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(iii) Who is a designated mental health professional;
(iv) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(v) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(vi) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW;
(b) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of
a facility in which the patient resides or will reside;
(c)(i) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such a
designation;
(ii) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of
kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if
any:
(A) The information that the person is presently a patient in the
facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;
(B) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of the
patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's
confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin,
attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and
(iii) Other information requested by the next of kin or attorney as
may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings should be
instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator;
(d)(i) To the courts as necessary to the administration of chapter
71.05 RCW or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under
chapter 10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(ii) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;
(e)(i) When a mental health professional is requested by a
representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a
police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal
attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or
provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the
mental health professional shall, if requested to do so, advise the
representative in writing of the results of the investigation including
a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person
investigated. The written report must be submitted within seventy-two
hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from the
law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs later.
(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;
(f) To the attorney of the detained person;
(g) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2), 71.05.340(1)(b),
and 71.05.335. The prosecutor must be provided access to records
regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis, medication,
behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue of whether
treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in the best
interest of the committed person or others. Information must be
disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel;
(h)(i) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person,
when the identity of the person is known to the public or private
agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to
have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may
designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure
must be made by the professional person in charge of the public or
private agency or his or her designee and must include the dates of
commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or
unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only any other
information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The agency
or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or
not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence.
(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;
(i)(i) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The mental health service agency or its employees are not civilly
liable for the decision to disclose or not so long as the decision was
reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act;
(j) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes
described in those sections;
(k) Upon the death of a person. The person's next of kin, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, must be notified.
Next of kin who are of legal age and competent must be notified under
this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children,
brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of
relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient
are governed by RCW 70.02.140;
(l) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred
at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health
services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of
death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after
the death of a patient;
(m) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as are
necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The extent of information
that may be released is limited as follows:
(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
must be disclosed upon request;
(ii) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the
purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act;
(n) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of
this section and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the
patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the
facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of the
disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to
relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the
supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement
agencies designated by the physician or psychiatric advanced registered
nurse practitioner in charge of the patient or the professional person
in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee;
(o) Pursuant to lawful order of a court;
(p) To qualified staff members of the department, to the director
of regional support networks, to resource management services
responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated
by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress
and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be
transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment
modality or facility;
(q) Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving
treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons
employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in
supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to
perform their duties;
(r) Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for
mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse
of persons who are under the supervision of the department;
(s) To a licensed physician or psychiatric advanced registered
nurse practitioner who has determined that the life or health of the
person is in danger and that treatment without the information
contained in the mental health treatment records could be injurious to
the patient's health. Disclosure must be limited to the portions of
the records necessary to meet the medical emergency;
(t) Consistent with the requirements of the federal health
information portability and accountability act, to a licensed mental
health professional or a health care professional licensed under
chapter 18.71, 18.71A, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.79, or 18.36A RCW who is
providing care to a person, or to whom a person has been referred for
evaluation or treatment, to assure coordinated care and treatment of
that person. Psychotherapy notes, as defined in 45 C.F.R. Sec.
164.501, may not be released without authorization of the person who is
the subject of the request for release of information;
(u) To administrative and office support staff designated to obtain
medical records for those licensed professionals listed in (t) of this
subsection;
(v) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily
committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from
one treatment facility to another. The release of records under this
subsection is limited to the mental health treatment records required
by law, a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge
summary. The discharge summary may include a statement of the
patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has
been provided, and recommendation for future treatment, but may not
include the patient's complete treatment record;
(w) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without
modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary
commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or
other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or
patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW;
(x) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to
staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of
protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental disorders
or developmental disabilities. Resource management services may limit
the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county of
residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient was
voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and place of
admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of a guardian
of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's appointment.
Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional information must
notify the patient's resource management services in writing of the
request and of the resource management services' right to object. The
staff member shall send the notice by mail to the guardian's address.
If the guardian does not object in writing within fifteen days after
the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional
information. If the guardian objects in writing within fifteen days
after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not obtain the
additional information;
(y) To all current treating providers of the patient with
prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for the patient
within the last twelve months. To assist in the disclosure provided by
this subsection, all prescriptions provided to the patient must be
included in the patient's electronic medical record. For purposes of
coordinating health care, the department may release without written
authorization of the patient, information acquired for billing and
collection purposes as described in RCW 70.02.050(1)(e). The
department shall notify the patient that billing and collection
information has been released to named providers, and provide the
substance of the information released and the dates of such release.
The department may not release counseling, inpatient psychiatric
hospitalization, or drug and alcohol treatment information without a
signed written release from the client;
(z)(i) To the secretary of social and health services for either
program evaluation or research, or both so long as the secretary adopts
rules for the conduct of the evaluation or research, or both. Such
rules must include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that
all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of confidentiality
substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise
make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information
obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding persons
who have received services such that the person who received such
services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.
/s/ . . . . . ."

(ii) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the
compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government
or researchers under standards, including standards to assure
maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary.
(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department
may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with
federal law and regulations.
(4) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department of social
and health services under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(3)(c) after
dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by
RCW 4.24.550.
(5) The fact of admission to a provider of mental health services,
as well as all records, files, evidence, findings, or orders made,
prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW are
not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside that chapter
without the written authorization of the person who was the subject of
the proceeding except as provided in RCW 70.02.260, in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3)
or 71.05.320(3)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial, in a civil commitment
proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor,
a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and files
maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW must
be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to
the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her
attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or
use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court
finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and
will be maintained.
(6)(a) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, any person may bring an
action against an individual who has willfully released confidential
information or records concerning him or her in violation of the
provisions of this section, for the greater of the following amounts:
(i) One thousand dollars; or
(ii) Three times the amount of actual damages sustained, if any.
(b) It is not a prerequisite to recovery under this subsection that
the plaintiff suffered or was threatened with special, as contrasted
with general, damages.
(c) Any person may bring an action to enjoin the release of
confidential information or records concerning him or her or his or her
ward, in violation of the provisions of this section, and may in the
same action seek damages as provided in this subsection.
(d) The court may award to the plaintiff, should he or she prevail
in any action authorized by this subsection, reasonable attorney fees
in addition to those otherwise provided by law.
(e) If an action is brought under this subsection, no action may be
brought under RCW 70.02.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2014.

--- END ---