BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.102 and 2013 c 23 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, any four-year
institution of higher education that increases tuition beyond levels
assumed in the omnibus appropriations act is subject to the financial
aid requirements included in this section and shall remain subject to
these requirements through the 2018-19 academic year.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, each four-year institution of higher
education that raises tuition beyond levels assumed in the omnibus
appropriations act shall, in a manner consistent with the goal of
enhancing the quality of and access to their institutions, provide
financial aid to offset full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students as follows:
(a) Subtract from the full-time tuition fees an amount that is
equal to the maximum amount of a state need grant award that would be
given to an eligible student with a family income at or below fifty
percent of the state's median family income as determined by the
student achievement council; and
(b) Offset the remainder as follows:
(i) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
below fifty percent of the state's median family income shall receive
financial aid equal to one hundred percent of the remainder if an
institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate
students is five percent or greater of the state's median family income
for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council;
(ii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are
greater than fifty percent and no more than seventy percent of the
state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to
seventy-five percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is ten percent or
greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as
provided by the student achievement council;
(iii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes exceed
seventy percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's
median family income shall receive financial aid equal to fifty percent
of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for
resident undergraduate students is fifteen percent or greater of the
state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the
student achievement council; and
(iv) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
exceed one hundred percent and are no more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid
equal to twenty-five percent of the remainder if an institution's
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is twenty
percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of
four as provided by the student achievement council.
(3) The financial aid required in subsection (2) of this section
shall:
(a) Be reduced by the amount of other financial aid awards, not
including the state need grant;
(b) Be prorated based on credit load; and
(c) Only be provided to students up to demonstrated need.
(4) Financial aid sources and methods may be:
(a) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;
(b) Tuition waivers created by a four-year institution of higher
education for the specific purpose of serving low and middle-income
students; or
(c) Local financial aid programs.
(5) Use of tuition waivers as specified in subsection (4)(b) of
this section shall not be included in determining total state tuition
waiver authority as defined in RCW 28B.15.910.
(6) By ((August 15, 2012, and August 15th)) December 31st every
year ((thereafter)), four-year institutions of higher education that
increase tuition beyond levels assumed in the omnibus appropriations
act after January 1, 2011, shall report to the governor and relevant
committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the various
sources and methods of financial aid in mitigating tuition increases.
A key purpose of these reports is to provide information regarding the
results of the decision to grant tuition-setting authority to the four-year institutions of higher education and whether tuition setting
authority should continue to be granted to the institutions or revert
back to the legislature after consideration of the impacts on students,
including educational access, affordability, and ((quality))
completion. These reports shall include:
(a) The amount of ((additional)) financial aid provided to middle-income and low-income resident students with demonstrated need in the
aggregate and per student;
(b) An itemization of the sources and methods of financial aid
provided by the four-year institution of higher education in the
aggregate and per student for resident undergraduate students;
(c) An analysis of the combined impact of federal tuition tax
credits and financial aid provided by the institution of higher
education on the net cost to students and their families resulting from
tuition increases;
(d) In cases where tuition increases are greater than those assumed
in the omnibus appropriations act at any four-year institution of
higher education, the institution must include an explanation in its
report of why this increase was necessary and how the institution will
mitigate the effects of the increase. The institution must include in
this section of its report a plan and specific timelines; and
(e) An analysis of changes in resident student enrollment patterns,
participation rates, graduation rates, and debt load, by race and
ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic
status, and a plan to mitigate effects of reduced diversity due to
tuition increases. This analysis shall include disaggregated data for
resident students in the following income brackets:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income.
(7) Beginning in the 2012-13 academic year, the University of
Washington shall enroll during each academic year at least the same
number of resident first-year undergraduate students at the Seattle
campus, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012, as enrolled during the 2009-10
academic year. This requirement shall not apply to nonresident
undergraduate and graduate and professional students.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.16.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 446 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, all state officers and employees shall be paid for services
rendered from the first day of the month through the fifteenth day of
the month and for services rendered from the sixteenth day of the month
through the last calendar day of the month. Paydates for these two pay
periods shall be established by the director of financial management
through the administrative hearing process and the official paydates
shall be established six months prior to the beginning of each
subsequent calendar year. Under no circumstance shall the paydate be
established more than ten days after the pay period in which the wages
are earned except when the designated paydate falls on Sunday, in which
case the paydate shall not be later than the following Monday. Payment
shall be deemed to have been made by the established paydates if: (a)
The salary warrant is available at the geographic work location at
which the warrant is normally available to the employee; or (b) the
salary has been electronically transferred into the employee's account
at the employee's designated financial institution; or (c) the salary
warrants are mailed at least two days before the established paydate
for those employees engaged in work in remote or varying locations from
the geographic location at which the payroll is prepared, provided that
the employee has requested payment by mail.
The office of financial management shall develop the necessary
policies and operating procedures to assure that all remuneration for
services rendered including basic salary, shift differential, standby
pay, overtime, penalty pay, salary due based on contractual agreements,
and special pay provisions, as provided for by law, agency policy or
rule, or contract, shall be available to the employee on the designated
paydate. Overtime, penalty pay, and special pay provisions may be paid
by the next following paydate if the postponement of payment is
attributable to: The employee's not making a timely or accurate report
of the facts which are the basis for the payment, or the employer's
lack of reasonable opportunity to verify the claim.
Compensable benefits payable because of separation from state
service shall be paid with the earnings for the final period worked
unless the employee separating has not provided the agency with the
proper notification of intent to terminate.
One-half of the employee's basic monthly salary shall be paid in
each pay period. Employees paid on an hourly basis or employees who
work less than a full pay period shall be paid for actual salary
earned.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply in instances
where it would conflict with contractual rights or, with the approval
of the office of financial management, to short-term, intermittent,
noncareer state employees, to student employees of institutions of
higher education, to national or state guard members participating in
state active duty, and to liquor control agency managers who are paid
a percentage of monthly liquor sales.
(3) When a national or state guard member is called to participate
in state active duty, the paydate shall be no more than seven days
following completion of duty or the end of the pay period, whichever is
first. When the seventh day falls on Sunday, the paydate shall not be
later than the following Monday. This subsection shall apply only to
the pay a national or state guard member receives from the military
department for state active duty.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a
bargained contract at an institution of higher education may include a
provision for paying part-time academic employees on a pay schedule
that coincides with all the paydays used for full-time academic
employees.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this
section, an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 may pay its employees for services rendered biweekly, in pay
periods consisting of two consecutive seven calendar-day weeks. The
paydate for each pay period shall be seven calendar days after the end
of the pay period. Under no circumstance may the paydate be
established more than seven days after the pay period in which the
wages are earned except that when the designated paydate falls on a
holiday, the paydate shall not be later than the following Monday.
(b) Employees on a biweekly payroll cycle under this subsection (5)
who are paid a salary may receive a prorated amount of their annualized
salary each pay period. The prorated amount may be proportional to the
number of pay periods worked in the calendar year. Employees on a
biweekly payroll cycle under this subsection (5) who are paid hourly,
or who work less than a full pay period may be paid the actual salary
amount earned during the pay period.
(c) Each institution that adopts a biweekly pay schedule under this
subsection (5) must establish, publish, and notify the director of the
office of financial management of the official paydates six months
before the beginning of each subsequent calendar year.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section,
academic employees at institutions of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.10.016 whose employment appointments are less than twelve
months may have their salaries prorated in such a way that coincides
with the paydays used for full-time employees.

Sec. 3 RCW 44.28.816 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 31 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) During calendar year 2018, the joint committee shall complete
a systemic performance audit of the tuition-setting authority in RCW
28B.15.067 granted to the governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College. The audit must
include a separate analysis of both the authority granted in RCW
28B.15.067(3) and the authority in RCW 28B.15.067(4). The purpose of
the audit is to evaluate the impact of institutional tuition-setting
authority on student access, affordability, and ((institutional
quality)) completion.
(2) The audit must include an evaluation of the following outcomes
for each four-year institution of higher education:
(a) Changes in undergraduate enrollment, retention, and graduation
by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and
socioeconomic status;
(b) The impact on student transferability, particularly from
Washington community and technical colleges;
(c) Changes in time and credits to degree;
(d) Changes in the number and availability of online programs and
undergraduate enrollments in the programs;
(e) Changes in enrollments in the running start and other dual
enrollment programs;
(f) Impacts on funding levels for state student financial aid
programs;
(g) Any changes in the percent of students who apply for student
financial aid using the free application for federal student aid
(FAFSA);
(h) Any changes in the percent of students who apply for available
tax credits;
(i) Information on the use of building fee revenue by fiscal or
academic year; and
(j) Undergraduate tuition and fee rates compared to undergraduate
tuition and fee rates at similar institutions in the global challenge
states.
(3) The audit must include recommendations on whether to continue
tuition-setting authority beyond the 2018-19 academic year.
(4) In conducting the audit, the auditor shall solicit input from
key higher education stakeholders, including but not limited to
students and their families, faculty, and staff. To the maximum extent
possible, data for the University of Washington and Washington State
University shall be disaggregated by branch campus.
(5) The auditor shall report findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2018.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2018.

--- END ---