BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 There is hereby created an office of the
behavioral health ombuds within the office of the governor for the
purpose of promoting public awareness and understanding of state-funded
behavioral health services, identifying system issues and responses for
the governor and the legislature to act upon, and monitoring and
ensuring compliance with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules,
contract terms, and policies pertaining to provision of behavioral
health services, and the placement, supervision, and treatment of
adults and children in state hospitals or in state-licensed facilities.
The ombuds shall report directly to the governor and shall exercise his
or her powers and duties independently of the secretary of the
department of social and health services and the director of the health
care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to confirmation by the senate,
the governor shall appoint an ombuds who is a person of recognized
judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity, and is qualified by
training or experience, or both, in behavioral health service law,
contracts, and policy.
(2)(a) Before the appointment of the behavioral health ombuds, the
governor shall share information regarding the appointment to a six-person legislative committee, to consist of three senators and three
members of the house of representatives from the legislature.
(b) The president of the senate shall appoint the senate members of
the committee. No more than two members may represent the same party.
(c) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the
house of representatives members of the committee. No more than two
members may represent the same party.
(3) The person appointed ombuds shall hold office for a term of
three years and shall continue to hold office until reappointed or
until his or her successor is appointed. The governor may remove the
ombuds only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability to perform
duties. Any vacancy must be filled by similar appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The ombuds shall perform the following
duties:
(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals receiving behavioral health services,
and on the procedures for providing these services;
(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of
a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule,
or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on
irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombuds may
decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted under
this chapter;
(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and
practiced by state agencies to carry out their responsibilities in
delivering behavioral health services, regulating behavioral health
service providers, or monitoring contracts for provision of behavioral
health services with a view toward accomplishment of objectives
delineated in applicable statutes, polices, and procedures to promote
health and safety;
(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state
hospitals, and state-licensed facilities or agencies providing
behavioral health services to adults and children;
(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the
behavioral health needs of adults and children;
(6) Submit annually to the committee established in section 2 of
this act and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing the
work of the office, including recommendations;
(7) Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the
possession of the ombuds unless prohibited by law; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The ombuds shall treat all matters under
investigation, including the identities of service recipients,
complainants, and individuals from whom information is acquired, as
confidential, except as far as disclosures may be necessary to enable
the ombuds to perform the duties of the office and to support any
recommendations resulting from an investigation. Upon receipt of
information that by law is confidential or privileged, the ombuds shall
maintain the confidentiality of such information and may not further
disclose or disseminate the information except as provided by
applicable state or federal law. Investigative records of the office
of the ombuds are confidential and are exempt from public disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Neither the ombuds nor the ombuds's staff
may be compelled, in any judicial or administrative proceeding, to
testify or to produce evidence regarding the exercise of the official
duties of the ombuds or of the ombuds's staff. All related memoranda,
work product, notes, and case files of the ombuds's office are
confidential, are not subject to discovery, judicial or administrative
subpoena, or other method of legal compulsion, and are not admissible
in evidence in a judicial or administrative proceeding. This section
does not apply to the legislative committee under section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Subject to section 7 of this act,
identifying information about complainants or witnesses is not subject
to any method of legal compulsion, nor may such information be revealed
to the legislative committee or the governor except under the following
circumstances: (a) The complainant or witness waives confidentiality;
(b) under a legislative subpoena when there is a legislative
investigation for neglect of duty or misconduct by the ombuds or
ombuds's office when the identifying information is necessary to the
investigation of the ombuds's acts; or (c) under an investigation or
inquiry by the governor as to neglect of duty or misconduct by the
ombuds or ombuds's office when the identifying information is necessary
to the investigation of the ombuds's acts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "identifying information"
includes the complainant's or witness's name, location, telephone
number, likeness, social security number or other identification
number, or identification of immediate family members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The privilege described under section 6 of
this act does not apply when:
(1) The ombuds or ombuds's staff member has direct knowledge of an
alleged crime, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought is
relevant to that allegation;
(2) The ombuds or a member of the ombuds's staff has received a
threat of, or becomes aware of a risk of, imminent serious harm to any
person, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought is relevant to
that threat or risk;
(3) The ombuds has been asked to provide general information
regarding the general operation of, or the general processes employed
at, the ombuds's office; or
(4) The ombuds or ombuds's staff member has direct knowledge of a
failure by any person specified in RCW 26.44.030, including the state
family and children's ombuds or any volunteer in the ombuds's office,
to comply with RCW 26.44.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An employee of the office of the
behavioral health ombuds is not liable for good faith performance of
responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against an employee of the department, an employee of a
contracting agency of the department, a guardian, or a recipient of
behavioral health services for any communication made, or information
given or disclosed, to aid the office of the behavioral health ombuds
in carrying out its responsibilities, unless the communication or
information is made, given, or disclosed maliciously or without good
faith. This subsection is not intended to infringe on the rights of
the employer to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for
other reasons.
(3) All communications by an ombuds, if reasonably related to the
requirements of that individual's responsibilities under this chapter
and done in good faith, are privileged and that privilege is a defense
in any action in libel or slander.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 When the ombuds or ombuds's staff member has
reasonable cause to believe that any public official, employee, or
other person has acted in a manner warranting criminal or disciplinary
proceedings, the ombuds or ombuds's staff member shall report the
matter, or cause a report to be made, to the appropriate authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department of social and health
services, state hospitals, the health care authority, regional support
networks, and behavioral health service providers under contract shall:
(1) Allow the ombuds or the ombuds's designee to communicate
privately with any person in the custody of the state for the purposes
of carrying out his or her duties under this chapter;
(2) Permit the ombuds or the ombuds's designee physical access to
state institutions serving persons with behavioral health disorders and
state-licensed facilities or residences for the purpose of carrying out
his or her duties under this chapter;
(3) Upon the ombuds's request, grant the ombuds or the ombuds's
designee the right to access, inspect, and copy all relevant
information, records, or documents in their possession or control that
the ombuds considers necessary in an investigation; and
(4) Grant the office of the behavioral health ombuds unrestricted
online access to electronic databases for the purpose of carrying out
its duties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---