BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department, in consultation with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, must administer a two-year pilot
program that links homeless children and their families with stable
housing located in the homeless student's school district. The goal of
the pilot program is to provide educational stability for homeless
children by promoting housing stability for homeless families while
reducing transportation costs for school districts.
(2) The department, working with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, must develop a competitive grant process to make
a one-time grant award of three hundred thousand dollars to a school
district partnered with an eligible organization. For the purposes of
this subsection, "eligible organization" means any local government,
local housing authority, regional support network established under
chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organization, federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of
Washington, or regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance
organization.
(3) In determining which school district will receive the grant
award, preference must be given to rural school districts and school
districts east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.
(4) Activities eligible for assistance under this pilot program
include:
(a) Direct rental assistance, which includes security or utility
deposits, first and last month's rent assistance, rental application
fees, and eligible moving expenses to be determined by the department;
(b) Utility assistance and gas assistance for families with
vehicles;
(c) Shelter and related services for the homeless; and
(d) Employment and educational support for the family so long as
the assistance provided facilitates the family continuing to live in
the school district.
(5) All recipients of funds from the pilot program must be from
very low-income households. For the purposes of this subsection, "very
low-income household" means a family or unrelated persons living
together whose adjusted income is less than fifty percent of the median
family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the
pilot program is located.
(6)(a) The grantee is to track the number of homeless children in
the school district, the number of homeless children served by the
grant, the number of households served by the grant, the types of
services offered, and the educational transportation costs of the
children. This information, along with the educational transportation
costs of homeless children prior to the pilot program, must be reported
to the department, along with any additional information requested by
the department, at the conclusion of the pilot program.
(b) At the conclusion of the pilot program, the department must
compile the information provided by the grantee and report to the
legislature the findings of the grantee, the housing stability of the
homeless families, whether the school district's transportation costs
were reduced during the program period, and any related policy
recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of three hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2014, from the general fund to the department of
commerce for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 1 of this act, referencing section 1 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2014, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 1 of this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires January 15, 2017.

--- END ---