BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual or group health insurance policy providing
prescription drug coverage in the state must permit and apply a
prorated daily cost-sharing rate to prescriptions that are dispensed by
a network pharmacy for less than a thirty-day supply if the prescriber
or pharmacist indicates the fill or refill could be in the best
interest of the patient and is for the purpose of synchronizing the
patient's chronic medications.
(2) No individual or group health insurance policy providing
prescription drug coverage may deny coverage for the dispensing of any
drug prescribed for the treatment of a chronic illness that is made in
accordance with a plan among the insured, a practitioner, and a
pharmacist to synchronize the refilling of multiple prescriptions for
the insured.
(3) No individual or group health insurance policy providing
prescription drug coverage may use payment structures incorporating
prorated dispensing fees determined by calculation of the days' supply
of medication dispensed. Dispensing fees must be determined
exclusively on the total number of prescriptions dispensed.

--- END ---