BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.380 and 2012 c 229 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College shall exempt the following students from the payment of
all tuition fees and services and activities fees:
(1) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter
41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW,
highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her
life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by
any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire
department in this state, or was a highway worker while employed by a
transportation agency: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the
exemption only if they begin their course of study at a state-supported
college or university within ten years of their graduation from high
school; and
(2) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in
chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24
RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or
her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed
by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire
department in this state, or was a highway worker while employed by a
transportation agency.
(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall report to the
education data center on the annual cost of tuition fees and services
and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under
this section. The education data center shall consolidate the reports
of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and
policy committees of the legislature.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Highway worker" means:
(i) Any person who is an employee of a transportation agency and
who is actively employed as such; or
(ii) Supervisory highway maintenance and construction personnel.
(b) "Transportation agency" means any agency, department, or
division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other
unit of local government in this state, and any agency, department, or
division of state government, having as its primary function the
construction, maintenance, and operation of the highways and roads, or
ferries within the state of Washington. Such an agency, department, or
division is distinguished from a transit agency having as one of its
functions the highway maintenance, including but not limited to the
state department of transportation. A transportation agency under this
section does not include a government contractor.

--- END ---