BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17A.245 and 2011 c 145 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each ((candidate or)) political committee other than a
candidate's authorized committee, that expended five thousand dollars
or more in the preceding year or expects to expend five thousand
dollars or more in the current year shall file all contribution reports
and expenditure reports required by this chapter by the electronic
alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055. ((The
commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for candidates
whose authorized committees lack the technological ability to file
reports using the electronic alternative provided by the commission.))
Each candidate or authorized committee of a candidate, that expended
five thousand dollars or more in the preceding year or expects to
expend five thousand dollars or more in the current year may file
contribution reports and expenditure reports required by this chapter
in written form by electronic mail or facsimile or by the electronic
alternative provided by the commission under RCW 42.17A.055.
(2) Failure by a ((candidate or)) political committee to comply
with this section is a violation of this chapter.

--- END ---