BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.250 and 2010 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board for the state of Washington
is created. The board shall consist of seven members qualified by
experience or training in matters pertaining to land use law or land
use planning and who have experience in the practical application of
those matters. All seven board members shall be appointed by the
governor, two each residing respectively in the central Puget Sound,
eastern Washington, and western Washington regions, plus one board
member residing within the state of Washington. At least three members
of the board shall be admitted to practice law in this state and be
engaged in the legal profession with a focus on land use at the time of
his or her appointment, one each residing respectively in the central
Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and western Washington regions. At
least three members of the board shall have been ((a city or county))
an elected official or have been engaged in land use planning or land
use law and who have experience in the practical application of those
matters, one each residing respectively in the central Puget Sound,
eastern Washington, and western Washington regions. After expiration
of the terms of board members on the previously existing three growth
management hearings boards, no more than four members of the seven-member board may be members of the same major political party. No more
than two members at the time of their appointment or during their term
may reside in the same county.
(2) Each member of the board shall be appointed for a term of six
years. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the governor for
the unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy occurs. Members
of the previously existing three growth management hearings boards
appointed before July 1, 2010, shall complete their staggered, six-year
terms as members of the growth management hearings board created under
subsection (1) of this section. The reduction from nine board members
on the previously existing three growth management hearings boards to
seven total members on the growth management hearings board shall be
made through attrition, voluntary resignation, or retirement.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.260 and 2010 c 211 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each petition for review that is filed with the growth
management hearings board shall be heard and decided by a regional
panel of growth management hearings board members. Regional panels
shall be constituted as follows:
(a) Central Puget Sound region. A three-member central Puget Sound
panel shall be selected to hear matters pertaining to cities and
counties located within the region comprised of King, Pierce,
Snohomish, and Kitsap counties.
(b) Eastern Washington region. A three-member eastern Washington
panel shall be selected to hear matters pertaining to cities and
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and
are located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(c) Western Washington region. A three-member western Washington
panel shall be selected to hear matters pertaining to cities and
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, are
located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and are not
included in the central Puget Sound region. Skamania county, if it is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, may elect to be
included within either the western Washington region or the eastern
Washington region.
(2)(a) Each regional panel selected to hear and decide cases shall
consist of three board members, at least a majority of whom shall
reside within the region in which the case arose, unless such members
cannot sit on a particular case because of recusal or disqualification,
or unless the board administrative officer determines that there is an
emergency including, but not limited to, the unavailability of a board
member due to illness, absence, vacancy, or significant workload
imbalance. The presiding officer of each case shall reside within the
region in which the case arose, unless the board administrative officer
determines that there is an emergency.
(b) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection (2)(b), each
regional panel must: (i) Include one member admitted to practice law
in this state; (ii) include one member who has been ((a city or
county)) an elected official or was engaged in land use planning or
land use law; and (iii) reflect the political composition of the board.
The requirements of this subsection (2)(b) may be waived by the board
administrative officer due to member unavailability, significant
workload imbalances, or other reasons.

--- END ---