BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must post signs near all tolled facilities to
inform the travelling public where in-vehicle electronic toll
collection system equipment is sold. The department may advertise a
private business that sells in-vehicle electronic toll collection
system equipment if the private business pays for the cost of
manufacturing and maintaining the sign.
(2) The department must provide in-vehicle electronic toll
collection system equipment through automated vending machines at state
safety rest areas located on Interstate 5 and Interstate 90.

--- END ---