BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that the
Washington state ferry system is operated in a cost-efficient, safe,
and responsible manner. The Washington state ferry system used on
average over seventeen million gallons of diesel fuel in each fiscal
year for 2011, 2012, and 2013, releasing over one hundred eighty-six
thousand tons of emissions each year. The average fuel cost for the
ferry system during the same time period was over fifty-nine million
dollars per year.
A study conducted by the department of transportation in 2013
identified actions that could save thirteen million dollars per year in
fuel costs, while also reducing emissions from state ferry vessels by
more than twenty-seven thousand tons. While some of these actions are
being implemented, the legislature recognizes there are more
opportunities for cost savings and emissions reduction within the ferry
system and supports the department in researching and implementing
additional fuel saving and emissions reduction strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2014, and annually thereafter, the
department must report to the legislature the annual amount of
greenhouse gases, as defined in RCW 70.235.010, and particulate matter
released by the operation of state ferry vessels. The first report
must be for fiscal year 2013.
(2) By June 1, 2016, the department must reduce the average
greenhouse gas and particulate emissions from the state ferry vessel
fleet by five percent over levels reported for fiscal year 2013.
(3) By June 1, 2018, the department must reduce the average
greenhouse gas and particulate emissions from the state ferry vessel
fleet by fifteen percent over levels reported for fiscal year 2013.
(4) By June 1, 2020, the department must reduce the average
greenhouse gas and particulate emissions from the state ferry vessel
fleet by twenty percent over levels reported for fiscal year 2013.
(5) The actions of the department must be consistent with and
conducive towards meeting the statewide greenhouse gas emissions
reduction targets and other related requirements as stated in RCW
70.235.050 and 43.19.648.
(6) The department must provide an implementation plan to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2014, that
identifies the steps needed to meet or exceed the emissions reduction
requirements in this section. The implementation plan must include
specific capital investments and changes to operations and must also
identify associated costs, benefits, and timing of implementation by
item.

--- END ---