BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.725 and 1999 c 269 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is hereby authorized to enter into a continuing
agreement with Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties pursuant to which
the department shall, from time to time, direct the distribution to
each of the counties the amounts authorized in subsection (2) of this
section in accordance with RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The department is authorized to include in each agreement a
provision for the distribution of funds to each county to reimburse the
county for fifty percent of the deficit incurred during each previous
fiscal year in the operation and maintenance of the ferry system owned
and operated by the county. The total amount to be reimbursed to
Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties collectively shall not exceed one
million eight hundred thousand dollars in any biennium. Each county
agreement shall contain a requirement that the county shall maintain
tolls on its ferries at least equal to tolls in place on January 1,
((1990)) 2013.
(3) The annual fiscal year operating and maintenance deficit, if
any, shall be determined by Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties
subject to review and approval of the department. The annual fiscal
year operating and maintenance deficit is defined as the total of
operations and maintenance expenditures less the sum of ferry toll
revenues and that portion of fuel tax revenue distributions which are
attributable to the county ferry as determined by the department.
Distribution of the amounts authorized by subsection (2) of this
section by the state treasurer shall be directed by the department upon
the receipt of properly executed vouchers from each county.
(4) The county road administration board may evaluate requests by
Pierce, Skagit, Wahkiakum, and Whatcom counties for county ferry
capital improvement funds. The board shall evaluate the requests and,
if approved by a majority of the board, submit the requests to the
legislature for funding out of the amounts available under RCW
46.68.090(((1)(j))) (2)(h). Any county making a request under this
subsection shall first seek funding through the public works trust
fund, or any other available revenue source, where appropriate.

--- END ---