BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that watershed
councils are a vital component of the region's efforts to restore and
protect the health of Puget Sound as well as the rivers flowing into
Puget Sound. Watershed councils reflect local knowledge, expertise,
and dedication to restoring and protecting their watersheds, while
coordinating with other councils and tribal, national, state, and local
agencies in the broader geographic context of recovering Puget Sound.
Watershed councils are diverse in their representation, mission, and
the history by which they were formed. They include salmon recovery
lead entities formed under chapter 77.85 RCW, local integrating
organizations formed under guidance from the Puget Sound partnership,
watershed planning entities formed under chapter 90.82 RCW, other
watershed councils formed by county governments, the Hood Canal
coordinating council recognized as a recovery entity in chapter 90.88
RCW, marine resources committees formed under chapter 36.125 RCW, and
others.
The legislature further finds that authorizing statutes and
subsequent council formation have occurred over the previous two
decades in separate actions, and that it is vital that these important
watershed-level efforts be coordinated to the maximum extent
practicable within the regional framework of Puget Sound recovery
strategies, and that any statutory barriers to this coordination be
eliminated.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to direct the Puget Sound
partnership to conduct a review of councils engaged in Puget Sound
recovery work and provide recommendations for legislative actions to
further strengthen the role of watershed councils in achieving a
healthy Puget Sound.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Puget Sound partnership must conduct
a review of the role of watershed councils in accomplishing the goals
and objectives of Puget Sound recovery. In conducting the review, the
partnership must conduct several meetings with representatives of the
full spectrum of watershed councils, including those described in
section 1 of this act. The partnership must also invite other Puget
Sound stakeholder interests, as well as representatives of federal,
tribal, state, and local government agencies engaged in Puget Sound
recovery work.
(2) The Puget Sound partnership must structure the meetings to
obtain the views and recommendations on issues such as:
(a) The most effective structure for watershed councils in relation
to their specific mission;
(b) Ways to achieve greater coordination or integration when more
than one council is working in the same geographic area;
(c) Ways to maximize the role and effectiveness of watershed
councils in implementing restoration projects and programs that are
prioritized within the Puget Sound action agenda; and
(d) Identifying statutory provisions that impede the effectiveness
of councils.
(3) The Puget Sound partnership must compile a summary of the
meetings. The summary, together with recommendations for legislative,
budgetary, and administrative actions to strengthen the role of
watershed councils in Puget Sound recovery, must be provided to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by January 1, 2015.

--- END ---