BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.140 and 2013 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Preliminary plats of any proposed subdivision and dedication
shall be approved, disapproved, or returned to the applicant for
modification or correction within ninety days from date of filing
thereof unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time
period or the ninety day limitation is extended to include up to
twenty-one days as specified under RCW 58.17.095(3): PROVIDED, That if
an environmental impact statement is required as provided in RCW
43.21C.030, the ninety day period shall not include the time spent
preparing and circulating the environmental impact statement by the
local government agency.
(2) Final plats and short plats shall be approved, disapproved, or
returned to the applicant within thirty days from the date of filing
thereof, unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time
period.
(3)(a) Except as provided by (b) of this subsection, a final plat
meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be submitted to the
legislative body of the city, town, or county for approval within
((seven)) ten years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the
date of preliminary plat approval is on or before December 31, 2014,
and within five years of the date of preliminary plat approval if the
date of preliminary plat approval is on or after January 1, 2015.
Approved short plats meeting all the requirements of RCW 58.17.060 must
be submitted for final plat approval to the legislative body of the
city, town, or county for approval within ten years unless a longer
period is authorized by the jurisdiction and provided that the short
plat received summary approval on or after January 1, 2004.
(b) A final plat meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be
submitted to the legislative body of the city, town, or county for
approval within ten years of the date of preliminary plat approval if
the project is not subject to requirements adopted under chapter 90.58
RCW and the date of preliminary plat approval is on or before December
31, 2007. Approved short plats not subject to requirements adopted
under chapter 90.58 RCW and meeting all the requirements of RCW
58.17.060 must be submitted for final plat approval to the legislative
body of the city, town, or county for approval within ten years unless
a longer period is authorized by the jurisdiction and provided that the
short plat received summary approval on or after January 1, 2004.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall act to prevent any
city, town, or county from adopting by ordinance procedures which would
allow extensions of time that may or may not contain additional or
altered conditions and requirements.

--- END ---