BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) For the first time in our country's history, children and youth
across the country are predicted to have shorter lives than their
parents. In order to ensure the next generation is the healthiest ever
we need to ensure children and youth have a healthy weight, enjoy
active lives, eat well, live in safe and stable homes, and have less
contact with environmental toxins. Every child deserves to grow up
healthy and enjoy the beauty and benefits of Washington state. The
most effective and efficient way to ensure a healthy Washingtonian is
to start as early in life as possible. Healthy children are more
likely to become healthy adults.
(2) Helping children become more healthy is a multistate agency and
multisector issue. Much work is underway among state agencies, in
health care, early learning, schools, and among many other sectors and
organizations across the state, but more needs to be done and the work
is not as coordinated as it should be. The legislature therefore
intends to establish a governor's council to be accountable, measure
and complete a comprehensive coordinated project with private and
public organizations that have work underway, and to guide and inform
activities and offer small grants to expand effective programs or
innovative incentives like rewards for kids in school for meeting
physical fitness and healthy eating goals and choices for our children
that have demonstrated to work to help children be more active and
healthy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The governor's council for the
healthiest next generation is established to identify policy-related
action plans and funding recommendations based on data, best practices,
and expert opinion that protect children's health and support
community-level changes.
(2) The council shall include the following members:
(a) The governor, or designee, shall serve as chair of the council;
(b) The chairs of legislative health and education committees;
(c) Agency heads of department of health, office of the
superintendent of public instruction, department of early learning,
health care authority, department of agriculture, department of
transportation, and the department of social and health services; and
(d) Local and state community and business leaders appointed by the
governor.
(3) The council may create advisory committees on an ad hoc basis
for the purpose of obtaining input and supporting working relationships
with nutrition and physical activity experts and practitioners, parent
and student associations, school and child care administrators and
faculty, business and established stakeholder organizations for the
purpose of informing their research, policy, and funding
recommendations. The council shall maintain a contact list of ad hoc
advisory committees to provide notices to stakeholders regarding the
purposes of ad hoc advisory committees, timelines for planned work,
means for participation, and a statement of desired outcomes.
(4) The governor's council shall oversee the work of the strategic
work group that includes the existing efforts from and representation
by the department of health, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the department of early learning. Members must also
include representation from local public health and others with
expertise in nutrition and physical activity. The strategic work group
shall provide expertise and collaborate across the following high-impact focus areas to prevent childhood obesity:
(a) Breastfeeding-friendly environments;
(b) Healthy early learning environments; and
(c) Healthy school environments.
(5) The strategic work group shall take the following immediate
actions to improve children's health:
(a) Support comprehensive breastfeeding policies;
(b) Use existing toolkits for early learning professionals,
including child care providers and early childhood education and
assistance contractors, which provide recommended strategies to ensure
all children are active, eating healthy food, and access to drinking
water, to be made available on department of early learning's web site;
(c) Create a mentoring program to support child care providers in
early learning facilities and school staff to implement the toolkits
and recommended strategies in this chapter;
(d) Use research and best practices, to enhance the performance
standards for the early childhood education and assistance program
described in chapter 43.215 RCW to include best practice standards on
healthy eating and physical activity; nutrition education activities in
written curriculum plans; and incorporating healthy eating, physical
activity, and screen time education into parent education suggested
topics;
(e) Revise statewide guidelines for quality health and fitness
education in schools;
(f) Consider childhood obesity prevention research and best
practices when revising rules concerning children's health outcomes;
and
(g) Identify and support other cross-collaboration opportunities
between state agencies and other private and public organizations.
(6) The governor shall discontinue the council upon a determination
of reduced need or resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The strategic work group established in
section 2 of this act shall submit their recommendations to ensure
better children's health in a report to the governor, the governor's
council, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
31, 2014, which includes the following:
(1) Summary of impacts of childhood obesity on short and long-term
health outcomes, health care and other costs, academic achievement in
early learning, and school settings;
(2) Opportunities for partnerships and multisector collaboration;
(3) Identification, description, and gap analysis of state and
local government and community-based programs using expertise from the
governor's council to prevent childhood obesity, including cross-agency
efforts such as:
(a) Environmental factors;
(b) Safe streets;
(c) Access to drinking water; and
(d) Consideration of all different families and populations;
(4) Assessment of feasibility, benefits, and challenges of
strategies in each of the high-impact focus areas identified in section
2 of this act;
(5) Identification of additional policy and funding recommendations
including a range of actionable items for consideration by the
legislature, including innovative programs to increase physical fitness
in schools, healthy food choices, and tobacco and substance use
cessation and prevention;
(6) Additional action steps and outcomes to reduce childhood
obesity, including a focus on reducing health disparities in specific
population groups; and
(7) Costs and resources required to implement the strategies
identified by the strategic work group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The council and the strategic work group
established in section 2 of this act shall collaborate to identify
shared goals and benchmarks such as:
(1) Increase the percentage of infants who continue to breastfeed
for at least six months. Increase percentage of children ages two
through four with a healthy weight; and
(2) Increase the percentage of tenth graders with a healthy weight.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---