BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In conjunction with recent findings from the
Washington state auditor's office, the legislature finds that there are
thousands of state citizens who have been determined eligible for
services through the department of social and health services'
developmental disability administration. For those who have asked for
help but are waiting for services, families may experience financial or
emotional hardships. The legislature intends to clarify and make
transparent the process for accessing publicly funded services for
individuals with developmental disabilities and their families. The
legislature intends to significantly reduce the number of eligible
individuals who are waiting for services by funding additional slots
and by implementing new programs that better utilize federal funding
partnerships.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.10.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this title, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessment" means an evaluation is provided by the department
to determine:
(a) If the individual meets functional and financial criteria for
medicaid services; and
(b) The individual's support needs for service determination.
(2) "Community residential support services," or "community support
services," and "in-home services" means one or more of the services
listed in RCW 71A.12.040.
(((2))) (3) "Crisis stabilization services" means services provided
to persons with developmental disabilities who are experiencing
behaviors that jeopardize the safety and stability of their current
living situation. Crisis stabilization services include:
(a) Temporary intensive services and supports, typically not to
exceed sixty days, to prevent psychiatric hospitalization,
institutional placement, or other out-of-home placement; and
(b) Services designed to stabilize the person and strengthen their
current living situation so the person may continue to safely reside in
the community during and beyond the crisis period.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((4))) (5) "Developmental disability" means a disability
attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy,
autism, or another neurological or other condition of an individual
found by the secretary to be closely related to an intellectual
disability or to require treatment similar to that required for
individuals with intellectual disabilities, which disability originates
before the individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can
be expected to continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a
substantial limitation to the individual. By January 1, 1989, the
department shall promulgate rules which define neurological or other
conditions in a way that is not limited to intelligence quotient scores
as the sole determinant of these conditions, and notify the legislature
of this action.
(((5))) (6) "Eligible person" means a person who has been found by
the secretary under RCW 71A.16.040 to be eligible for services.
(((6))) (7) "Habilitative services" means those services provided
by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining
life skills and to raise their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy.
(((7))) (8) "Legal representative" means a parent of a person who
is under eighteen years of age, a person's legal guardian, a person's
limited guardian when the subject matter is within the scope of the
limited guardianship, a person's attorney-at-law, a person's
attorney-in-fact, or any other person who is authorized by law to act
for another person.
(((8))) (9) "Notice" or "notification" of an action of the
secretary means notice in compliance with RCW 71A.10.060.
(((9))) (10) "Residential habilitation center" means a state-operated facility for persons with developmental disabilities governed
by chapter 71A.20 RCW.
(((10))) (11) "Respite services" means relief for families and
other caregivers of people with disabilities, typically not to exceed
ninety days, to include both in-home and out-of-home respite care on an
hourly and daily basis, including twenty-four hour care for several
consecutive days. Respite care workers provide supervision,
companionship, and personal care services temporarily replacing those
provided by the primary caregiver of the person with disabilities.
Respite care may include other services needed by the client, including
medical care which must be provided by a licensed health care
practitioner.
(((11))) (12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services or the secretary's designee.
(((12))) (13) "Service" or "services" means services provided by
state or local government to carry out this title.
(((13))) (14) "State-operated living alternative" means programs
for community residential services which may include assistance with
activities of daily living, behavioral, habilitative, interpersonal,
protective, medical, nursing, and mobility supports to individuals who
have been assessed by the department as meeting state and federal
requirements for eligibility in home and community-based waiver
programs for individuals with developmental disabilities. State-operated living alternatives are operated and staffed with state
employees.
(((14))) (15) "Supported living" means community residential
services and housing which may include assistance with activities of
daily living, behavioral, habilitative, interpersonal, protective,
medical, nursing, and mobility supports provided to individuals with
disabilities who have been assessed by the department as meeting state
and federal requirements for eligibility in home and community-based
waiver programs for individuals with developmental disabilities.
Supported living services are provided under contracts with private
agencies or with individuals who are not state employees.
(((15))) (16) "Vacancy" means an opening at a residential
habilitation center, which when filled, would not require the center to
exceed its biennially budgeted capacity.
(17) "Service request list" means a list of eligible persons who
have received an assessment for service determination and their
assessment shows that they meet the eligibility requirements for the
requested service but were denied access due to funding limits.

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.16.050 and 1988 c 176 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
The determination made under this chapter is only as to whether a
person is eligible for services. After the secretary has determined
under this chapter that a person is eligible for services, the
individual may request an assessment for eligibility for medicaid
programs and specific services administered by the developmental
disabilities administration. The secretary shall make a determination
as to what services are appropriate for the person. The secretary shall
prioritize services to medicaid eligible clients. Services may be made
available to nonmedicaid eligible clients based on available funding.
Services available through the state medicaid plan must be provided to
those individuals who meet the eligibility criteria. The department
shall establish and maintain a service request list database for
individuals who are found to be eligible and have an assessed and unmet
need for programs and services offered under a home and community-based
services waiver, but the provision of a specific service would exceed
the biennially budgeted capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of social and health services
shall develop and implement a medicaid program to replace the
individual and family services program for medicaid-eligible clients no
later than May 1, 2015. The new medicaid program must offer services
that closely resemble the services offered in fiscal year 2014 through
the individual and family services program. The department shall
expand the client caseload beginning June 1, 2015. By June 30, 2017,
the department shall increase the number of clients served in the new
medicaid program by four thousand additional individuals from the
numbers served in the 2014 individual and family support program. The
department is authorized in fiscal year 2015 to use general fund--state
dollars previously provided for the individual and family services
program to cover the costs of increasing the number of clients served
in the new medicaid program. To the extent possible, the department
shall use general fund--state savings from section 6 of this act to
offset costs for the increased client caseloads in fiscal years 2016,
2017, 2018, and 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of social and health services
shall expand the home and community-based services basic plus waiver
client caseload beginning June 30, 2015. By June 30, 2017, the
department of social and health services shall increase the number
served on the home and community-based services basic plus waiver
program by one thousand additional individuals from the numbers served
in fiscal year 2014. The department is authorized in fiscal year 2015
to use general fund--state dollars previously provided for the
individual and family services program to cover the costs of increasing
the number of clients served in the basic plus waiver program. To the
extent possible, the department shall use general fund--state savings
from section 6 of this act to offset costs for the increased client
caseloads in fiscal years 2016, 2017, 2018, and 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of social and health services
shall refinance medicaid personal care services under the community
first choice option. Beginning July 1, 2014, the department shall seek
stakeholder input on program and system design prior to the submission
of a proposal to the center for medicaid and medicare services. The
community first choice option shall be designed in such a way to meet
the federal minimum maintenance of effort requirements and all service
requirements as specified in federal rule. Without express legislative
authorization, the per capita cost of all services offered in the new
community first choice benefit design, to include required and optional
services, shall not exceed a three percent increase over the per capita
cost of the services provided to this population prior to the refinance
to the community first choice option. The community first choice
option must be fully implemented no later than August 30, 2015. In
fiscal year 2015, the department shall use general fund--state savings
from section 4 of this act to cover the fiscal year 2015 general fund--state costs of this section. For the 2015-2017 biennium and the 2017-2019 biennium, the department shall use general fund--state savings
from the refinance in this section to offset costs related to sections
4 and 5 of this act.

--- END ---