BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the availability
of affordable, fresh, and nourishing foods is essential for individuals
to maintain a healthy lifestyle. The legislature also finds that new
methods of purchasing and delivering fresh, nourishing foods are
emerging and lowering the costs of these foods. The legislature
further finds that the new business models for purchasing and
delivering fresh, nourishing foods are being inappropriately classified
as food service establishments. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to establish a pass-through food distributor license for
businesses that sell and collect payment only through a web site for
prepackaged foods obtained from a food processor either licensed or
inspected, or both, by a state or federal regulatory agency and that
deliver the food directly to consumers without any interim storage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a license to operate as a pass-through wholesale food distributor to any entity that:
(a) Submits a completed application on forms approved by the
department;
(b) Provides the department with a list of all leased, rented, or
owned vehicles used by the applicant's business to deliver food;
(c) Maintains food temperature logs or uses a device to monitor the
temperature of the packages in real time for all food while in
transport; and
(d) Submits all the appropriate fees to the department.
(2) By rule, the department shall develop an annual license and
renewal fee to defray the costs of administering the licensing and
inspection program created by this section. All moneys received by the
department under the provisions of this section must be paid into the
food processing inspection account within the agricultural local fund
and must be used solely to carry out the provisions of this section.
(3) A licensed pass-through wholesale food distributor shall
protect food from contamination while in transport. Food must be
transported under conditions that protect food against physical,
chemical, and microbial contamination, as well as against deterioration
of the food and its container. This includes, but is not limited to,
the separation of raw materials in such a fashion that they avoid
cross-contamination of other food products, particularly ready-to-eat
food. For example, during the transport of raw fish and seafood, meat,
poultry, and other food which inherently contains pathogenic and
spoilage microorganisms, as well as soil and other foreign material,
must not come into direct contact with other food in the same container
or in any other cross-contaminating circumstance.
(4) In the event of a food recall or when required by the
department, a federal, state, or local health authority in response to
a food borne illness outbreak, a licensed pass-through food distributor
shall use its client listserv to notify customers of the recall and any
other relevant information.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Conduct inspections of vehicles used by the entity, storage,
food handling areas, refrigeration equipment, and product packaging
used by the entity;
(b) Audits of temperature logs and other food handling records as
appropriate;
(c) Investigate any complaints against a licensed pass-through
wholesale food distributor for the failure to maintain food safety; and
(d) Adopt rules, in consultation with the department of health and
local health jurisdictions, necessary to administer and enforce the
program consistent with federal regulations.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(b) "Pass-through food distributor" means an entity that receives
prepackaged food from a food processor either licensed or inspected, or
both, by a state or federal regulatory agency or department and that
delivers the food directly to consumers who only placed and paid for an
order on the entity's web site, without opening the packaging and
without dividing it into smaller packages and no interim storage by the
pass-through food distributor, and is delivered, by means of vehicles
that are equipped with either refrigeration or freezer units, or both,
and that meet the requirements of rules authorized by this chapter.
"Pass-through food distributor" includes an entity that, prior to
delivery to the consumer, temporarily stores the prepackaged food in a
food storage facility either licensed or inspected, or both, by a state
or federal regulatory agency or department.
(7) Pass-through food distributors that have a license from the
department under section 2 of this act are exempt from the permitting
requirements of food service rules adopted by the state board of health
and any local health jurisdiction.

--- END ---