BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent research
shows that the adolescent brain continues to develop well into the
twenties and does not fully mature until an adolescent reaches the age
of twenty-five. Until reaching full brain development, adolescents
lack maturity and have an underdeveloped sense of responsibility that
often results in impetuous and ill-considered actions and decisions.
Adolescents are much more likely to act on impulse, without considering
the consequences of their actions, and they are generally more
receptive and responsive to intervention and rehabilitation. Recent
research from the Washington state institute for public policy also
concludes that juvenile offenders who are transferred to adult
jurisdiction are more likely to reoffend than if they remained under
the juvenile court.
Juvenile justice provisions that transfer a juvenile offender to
adult jurisdiction and often result in lengthy sentences were put into
place before this research was available. In light of this new
research, the legislature believes it is appropriate to conduct a
review of the intersection between the adult and juvenile justice
systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature shall convene a task
force to examine juvenile sentencing reform, with the following voting
members:
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of
representatives;
(c) A representative from the governor's office;
(d) The assistant secretary of the department of social and health
services overseeing the juvenile justice and rehabilitation
administration or his or her designee;
(e) The secretary of the department of corrections or his or her
designee;
(f) A superior court judge from the superior court judges
association family and juvenile law subcommittee, who is familiar with
cases involving the transfer of youth to the adult criminal justice
system and sentencing of youth in the adult criminal justice system;
(g) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys;
(h) A representative of the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers or the Washington defender association;
(i) A representative from the Washington coalition of crime victim
advocates;
(j) A representative from the juvenile court administrator's
association;
(k) A representative from the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(l) A representative from law enforcement who works with juveniles;
and
(m) A representative from the sentencing guidelines commission.
(2) The task force shall choose two cochairs from among its
legislative members.
(3) The task force shall undertake a thorough review of juvenile
sentencing as it relates to the intersection of the adult and juvenile
justice systems and make recommendations for reform that promote
improved outcomes for youth, public safety, and taxpayer resources.
The review shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) The process and circumstances for transferring a juvenile to
adult jurisdiction, including discretionary and mandatory decline
hearings and automatic transfer to adult jurisdiction;
(b) Sentencing standards, term lengths, sentencing enhancements,
and stacking provisions that apply once a juvenile is transferred to
adult jurisdiction; and
(c) The appropriate custody, treatment, and resources for declined
youth who will complete their term of confinement prior to reaching age
twenty-one.
(4) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(5) Legislative members of the task force may be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(7) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 1, 2015.

--- END ---