BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as of November
2013, the unemployment rate in Washington is 6.8 percent and there are
over two hundred thousand unemployed people in the state. The
legislature further finds that the performance of community service
helps unemployed individuals maintain a connection to the labor market,
which in turn increases the ability of an unemployed individual to find
permanent employment. The legislature therefore intends to encourage
unemployed people to maintain a connection to the labor market by
establishing community service options for individuals receiving
unemployment benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.240 and 2006 c 13 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) To ensure that following the initial application for
benefits, an individual is actively engaged in searching for work, the
employment security department shall implement a job search monitoring
program. Effective January 4, 2004, the department shall contract with
employment security agencies in other states to ensure that individuals
residing in those states and receiving benefits under this title are
actively engaged in searching for work in accordance with the
requirements of this section. The department may use interactive voice
technology and other electronic means to ensure that individuals are
subject to comparable job search monitoring, regardless of whether they
reside in Washington or elsewhere.
(b) Except for those individuals with employer attachment or union
referral, individuals who qualify for unemployment compensation under
RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(iv) or (2)(b)(iv), as applicable, and individuals
in commissioner-approved training, an individual who has received five
or more weeks of benefits under this title, regardless of whether the
individual resides in Washington or elsewhere, must provide evidence of
seeking work, as directed by the commissioner or the commissioner's
agents, for each week beyond five in which a claim is filed. With
regard to claims with an effective date before January 4, 2004, the
evidence must demonstrate contacts with at least three employers per
week or documented in-person job search activity at the local
reemployment center. With regard to claims with an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004, the evidence must demonstrate contacts with
at least three employers per week or documented in-person job search
activities at the local reemployment center at least three times per
week. With regard to claims with an effective date on or after July 1,
2014, two hours of community service may be substituted for one
instance of contacting an employer or one in-person job search
activity.
(c) In developing the requirements for the job search monitoring
program, the commissioner or the commissioner's agents shall utilize an
existing advisory committee having equal representation of employers
and workers.
(2) Effective January 4, 2004, an individual who fails to comply
fully with the requirements for actively seeking work under RCW
50.20.010 shall lose all benefits for all weeks during which the
individual was not in compliance, and the individual shall be liable
for repayment of all such benefits under RCW 50.20.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---