BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.12.037 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules((, effective November 1,
2011,)) establishing income eligibility for temporary assistance for
needy families benefits for a child, other than a foster child, who
lives with a caregiver other than his or her parents. The department
shall establish a sliding scale benefit standard for a child when the
income of the child's caregiver is above two hundred percent but below
three hundred percent of the federal poverty level based on family
size. A caregiver with an income above three hundred percent of the
federal poverty level shall not be eligible for temporary assistance
for needy families benefits for a child, not a foster child, who is
residing with that caregiver.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, the department may, by rule,
exempt fifty percent of a caregiver's unearned income in determining
eligibility and benefit standards. This is in addition to other
exemptions authorized by law.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "unearned income" means income
received from a source other than employment or self-employment.

--- END ---