BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
currently no alternatives to competency restoration provided in the
state hospitals. Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated
for this specific purpose, the legislature encourages the department to
develop, on a phased-in basis, alternative locations and increased
access to competency restoration services under chapter 10.77 RCW for
individuals who do not require in-patient psychiatric hospitalization
level services. This may include services within county-operated jails.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.086 and 2013 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the defendant is charged with a felony and determined to
be incompetent, until he or she has regained the competency necessary
to understand the proceedings against him or her and assist in his or
her own defense, or has been determined unlikely to regain competency
pursuant to RCW 10.77.084(1)(b), but in any event for a period of no
longer than ninety days, the court:
(i) Shall commit the defendant to the custody of the secretary who
shall place such defendant in an appropriate facility of the department
for evaluation and treatment; or
(ii) May alternatively order the defendant to undergo evaluation
and treatment at some other facility as determined by the department,
or under the guidance and control of a professional person. Such
facilities may include county jails.
(b) For a defendant whose highest charge is a class C felony, or a
class B felony that is not classified as violent under RCW 9.94A.030,
the maximum time allowed for the initial period of commitment for
competency restoration is forty-five days.
(2) On or before expiration of the initial period of commitment
under subsection (1) of this section the court shall conduct a hearing,
at which it shall determine whether or not the defendant is
incompetent.
(3) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a
defendant charged with a felony is incompetent, the court shall have
the option of extending the order of commitment or alternative
treatment for an additional period of ninety days, but the court must
at the time of extension set a date for a prompt hearing to determine
the defendant's competency before the expiration of the second
restoration period. The defendant, the defendant's attorney, or the
prosecutor has the right to demand that the hearing be before a jury.
No extension shall be ordered for a second or third restoration period
as provided in subsection (4) of this section if the defendant's
incompetence has been determined by the secretary to be solely the
result of a developmental disability which is such that competence is
not reasonably likely to be regained during an extension.
(4) For persons charged with a felony, at the hearing upon the
expiration of the second restoration period or at the end of the first
restoration period, in the case of a defendant with a developmental
disability, if the jury or court finds that the defendant is
incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice, and the
court shall order the defendant be committed to a state hospital as
defined in RCW 72.23.010 for up to seventy-two hours starting from
admission to the facility, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays,
for evaluation for the purpose of filing a civil commitment petition
under chapter 71.05 RCW. The criminal charges shall not be dismissed
if the court or jury finds that: (a) The defendant (i) is a
substantial danger to other persons; or (ii) presents a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security; and (b) there is a substantial probability that the defendant
will regain competency within a reasonable period of time. In the
event that the court or jury makes such a finding, the court may extend
the period of commitment for up to an additional six months.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.77.088 and 2007 c 375 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony crime which is
a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092 and found by the court
to be not competent, then the court shall order the secretary to place
the defendant:
(i) At a secure mental health facility in the custody of the
department or an agency designated by the department for mental health
treatment and restoration of competency. Such agencies may include
county jails. The placement shall not exceed fourteen days in addition
to any unused time of the evaluation under RCW 10.77.060. The court
shall compute this total period and include its computation in the
order. The fourteen-day period plus any unused time of the evaluation
under RCW 10.77.060 shall be considered to include only the time the
defendant is actually at the facility and shall be in addition to
reasonable time for transport to or from the facility;
(ii) On conditional release for up to ninety days for mental health
treatment and restoration of competency; or
(iii) Any combination of this subsection.
(b)(i) If the proceedings are dismissed under RCW 10.77.084 and the
defendant was on conditional release at the time of dismissal, the
court shall order the designated mental health professional within that
county to evaluate the defendant pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW. The
evaluation may be conducted in any location chosen by the professional.
(ii) If the defendant was in custody and not on conditional release
at the time of dismissal, the defendant shall be detained and sent to
an evaluation and treatment facility for up to seventy-two hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, for evaluation for purposes
of filing a petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. The seventy-two-hour
period shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the
court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday
within the seventy-two-hour period.
(2) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony crime that is not
a serious offense as defined in RCW 10.77.092:
The court may stay or dismiss proceedings and detain the defendant
for sufficient time to allow the designated mental health professional
to evaluate the defendant and consider initial detention proceedings
under chapter 71.05 RCW. The court must give notice to all parties at
least twenty-four hours before the dismissal of any proceeding under
this subsection, and provide an opportunity for a hearing on whether to
dismiss the proceedings.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.77.220 and 1982 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person confined pursuant to this chapter shall be incarcerated
in a state correctional institution or facility: PROVIDED, That
nothing herein shall prohibit (1) confinement in a mental health
facility located wholly within a correctional institution, or (2)
confinement in a county jail or other local facility if ordered for the
purposes of competency restoration treatment. Confinement in a county
jail or other local facility while awaiting either placement in a
treatment program or a court hearing pursuant to this chapter is
permitted for no more than seven days.

--- END ---