BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has recognized the physical
demands of law enforcement officer and firefighter duties by providing
for earlier retirement from the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system than from other state retirement
systems. Chapter 372, Laws of 2005 facilitates transition of
firefighters and law enforcement officers to other careers, recognizing
those career professionals could still provide valuable public service
in positions other than law enforcement and firefighting.
It is not the intent, nor is it a reasonable expectation of
members, that chapter 372, Laws of 2005 allow plan 2 retirees of the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system to
continue in a law enforcement officer or firefighter career and still
collect their retirement allowance.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.500 and 2005 c 372 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under subsection (3) of this section, a retiree under
the provisions of plan 2 shall not be eligible to receive such
retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an
eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.37.010, or
41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in
RCW 41.26.030. If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this
section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree
terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be
suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be
actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.
(2) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(3) A member or retiree who becomes employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or
41.37.010 shall have the option to enter into membership in the
corresponding retirement system for that position notwithstanding any
provision of RCW 41.04.270.
(a) A retiree who elects to enter into plan membership shall have
his or her benefits suspended as provided in subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) A member or retiree who does not elect to enter into plan
membership shall be eligible to initiate or continue to receive his or
her benefits without interruption except as provided in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) This subsection (3) does not apply to retirees or members in
positions that would otherwise be eligible for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system except that:
(i) The position is less than full-time;
(ii) The position is less than fully compensated;
(iii) The position is not fully commissioned;
(iv) The position includes additional duties that would make the
position ineligible for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system; or
(v) The retiree or member is designated as an independent
contractor.

--- END ---