BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The creation of the office of corrections
ombuds is intended to assist in strengthening procedures and practices
which lessen the possibility of actions occurring within the department
of corrections which may adversely impact the health, safety, welfare,
and rehabilitation of offenders, and which will effectively reduce the
exposure of the department to litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is hereby created an office of
corrections ombuds within the office of the governor for the purpose of
providing information to offenders and their families; promoting public
awareness and understanding of the rights and responsibilities of
offenders; identifying system issues and responses for the governor and
the legislature to act upon; and ensuring compliance with relevant
statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to corrections facilities,
services, and treatment of offenders under the jurisdiction of the
department.
The ombuds shall report directly to the governor and shall exercise
his or her powers and duties independently of the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(2) "Offender" means an offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 who is
under the control of the department or its contracted agencies,
entities, or programs.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to confirmation by the senate,
the governor shall appoint an ombuds who shall be a person of
recognized judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity, and
shall be qualified by training or experience in corrections law and
policy. Prior to the appointment, the governor shall consult with, and
may receive recommendations from, the appropriate committees of the
legislature regarding the selection of the ombuds.
(2) The person appointed ombuds shall hold office for a term of
three years and shall continue to hold office until reappointed or
until his or her successor is appointed. The governor may remove the
ombuds only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability to perform
duties. Any vacancy shall be filled by similar appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) The ombuds may employ technical experts and other employees to
complete the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The ombuds shall:
(1) Provide to the public as appropriate information on the rights
and responsibilities of offenders and their family members;
(2) Maintain a statewide toll-free telephone number, a collect
telephone number to be operated during normal business hours, a web
site, and a mailing address for the receipt of complaints and
inquiries;
(3) Provide information to interested members of the public
regarding the state's correctional system;
(4) Monitor the development and implementation of federal, state,
and departmental laws, rules, regulations, and policies with respect to
corrections facilities in Washington state with a view toward the
appropriate health, safety, welfare, and rehabilitation of offenders;
(5) Establish a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and
analyze data relating to complaints regarding the department;
(6) Establish procedures to receive and investigate complaints.
(a) The ombuds may initiate and attempt to resolve an investigation
upon his or her own initiative, or upon receipt of a complaint from a
legislator, or an offender in the physical custody of the department,
including offenders who are initially received into the physical
custody of the department and transferred to a county facility or
facility in another state, and a member of the offender's immediate
family, regarding:
(i) Decisions;
(ii) Administrative actions;
(iii) Inactions or omissions;
(iv) Policies;
(v) Procedures and rules; or
(vi) Alleged violations of law
of the department which may adversely affect the health, safety,
welfare, rehabilitation, and rights of offenders.
(b) A person is not entitled as a right to be heard by the ombuds.
The ombuds may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by
rules adopted under this chapter.
(c) If the ombuds does not investigate a complaint, the ombuds
shall notify the complainant of the decision not to investigate and the
reasons for the decision.
(d) The ombuds shall not investigate a complaint from an employee
of the department that relates to the employee's employment
relationship with the department.
(e) The ombuds may refer complainants and others to appropriate
resources, agencies, or departments.
(f) The ombuds shall not levy any fees for the submission or
investigation of complaints.
(g) Prior to any person in the custody of the department obtaining
ombuds services, the person shall have reasonably pursued a resolution
of the complaint through any existing internal grievance,
administrative, or appellate procedures. This subsection (6)(g) shall
not apply to complaints related to threats of bodily harm, including
but not limited to sexual or physical assaults or the denial of
necessary medical treatment.
(h) At the conclusion of an investigation of a complaint, the
ombuds shall render a decision on the merits of each complaint and
communicate the decision to the complainant and to the department. The
ombuds shall state the recommendations and reasons if, in the ombuds'
opinion, the department or any employee thereof should:
(i) Consider the matter further;
(ii) Modify or cancel any action;
(iii) Alter a rule, practice, or ruling;
(iv) Explain in detail the administrative action in question;
(v) Rectify an omission; or
(vi) Take any other action.
(i) If the ombuds so requests, the department shall, within the
time specified, inform the ombuds about the action taken on the
recommendations or the reasons for not complying with them.
(j) If the ombuds believes that any action or omission has or
continues to pose significant prisoner health, safety, welfare, and
rehabilitation issues, the ombuds shall report the finding to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(k) Before announcing a conclusion or recommendation that expressly
or by implication criticizes a person or the department, the ombuds
shall consult with that person or the department. The ombuds may
request to be notified by the department, within a specified time, of
any action taken on any recommendation presented.
(l) The ombuds shall notify the complainant of the actions taken by
the office and by the department;
(7) Submit annually to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the legislature by November 1st of each year a report analyzing the
work of the office including any recommendations; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter and act in
accordance with the policies and procedures established by the office.
This section shall not be construed as requiring offenders to file
a complaint with the ombuds in order to exhaust available
administrative remedies for purposes of the prison litigation reform
act of 1995, P.L. 104-134.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall permit the ombuds
or the his or her designee to enter and inspect at any reasonable time
any correctional facility for the purpose of carrying out his or her
duties under this chapter.
(2) Upon the ombuds' request, the department shall grant the ombuds
or his or her designee the right to access, inspect, and copy all
relevant information, records, or documents in the possession or
control of the department that the ombuds considers necessary in an
investigation of a complaint filed under this chapter; and assist the
ombuds in obtaining the necessary releases of those documents which are
specifically restricted or privileged for use by the ombuds.
(3) If the ombuds or any employee of the office acting as an ombuds
who has been delegated in writing the authority granted is denied
access to any premises under the control of the secretary, the
secretary or the secretary's designee, within twenty-four hours after
the denial, shall give the ombuds a written statement of the reason for
the denial of access.
(4) A state or local government agency or entity that has records
that are relevant to a complaint or an investigation conducted by the
ombuds shall provide the ombuds with access to the records.
(5) The department shall ensure that correspondence from inmates to
the ombuds is not reviewed or inspected, except to ensure that such
correspondence does not contain contraband.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The office of corrections ombuds shall
establish confidentiality rules and procedures for all information
maintained by the office.
(2) Investigative records of the office of corrections ombuds are
confidential and are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW during the course of an ongoing investigation. Such records shall
not be considered privileged or exempt from discovery in criminal
proceedings or in civil litigation if otherwise discoverable under the
rules of civil procedure.
(3) Whenever in the course of providing ombuds services, the ombuds
or a member of the ombuds' staff becomes aware of a criminal act or a
threat to the health and safety of any individual or the security of a
correctional facility, the ombuds shall notify the secretary and the
appropriate facility administrator of such act or threat and the nature
and target thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An employee of the office of corrections
ombuds is not liable for good faith performance of responsibilities
under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against an employee of the department, an employee of a
contracting agency of the department, an offender, or a member of an
offender's immediate family for any communication made, or information
given or disclosed, to aid the office of corrections ombuds in carrying
out its responsibilities, unless the communication or information is
made, given, or disclosed maliciously or without good faith.
(3) A person or the department shall not hinder the lawful actions
of the ombuds or employees of the office, or willfully refuse to comply
with lawful demands of the office.
(4) This section is not intended to infringe on the rights of an
employer to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for other
reasons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---