BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.240 and 2013 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except with regard to institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, any official of the state or of any
political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation authorized to disburse funds in payment of salaries and
wages of employees is authorized upon written request of at least
twenty-five employees to pay all or part of such salaries or wages to
any financial institution for either: (a) Credit to the employees'
accounts in such financial institution; or (b) immediate transfer
therefrom to the employees' accounts in any other financial
institutions.
(2) In disbursing funds for payment of salaries and wages of
employees, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 are authorized to require the following payment methods:
(a) For employees who have an account in a financial institution,
payment to any financial institution for either: (i) Credit to the
employees' accounts in such financial institution; or (ii) immediate
transfer therefrom to the employees' accounts in any other financial
institutions; and
(b) For employees who do not have an account in a financial
institution, payment by alternate methods such as payroll cards.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any
employer to require the employees to have an account in any particular
financial institution or type of financial institution. A single
warrant may be drawn in favor of such financial institution, for the
total amount due the employees involved, and written directions
provided to such financial institution of the amount to be credited to
the account of an employee or to be transferred to an account in
another financial institution for such employee. The issuance and
delivery by the disbursing officer of a warrant in accordance with the
procedure set forth herein and proper indorsement thereof by the
financial institution shall have the same legal effect as payment
directly to the employee.
(4) Conservation districts as established and authorized under
chapter 89.08 RCW are exempt from the requirement to obtain a written
request of twenty-five employees as required in subsection (1) of this
section, and may disburse funds in payment of salaries and wages of
employees consistent with this chapter and RCW 89.08.215.
(5) Counties, in disbursing funds for payment of salaries and wages
of employees in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, may
elect to use the payment methods established in subsection (2)(a) and
(b) of this section for all employees. Use of the disbursement methods
authorized by this subsection (5) must be approved, by ordinance, by
the county legislative authority.
(6) For the purposes of this section "financial institution" means
any bank or trust company established in this state pursuant to chapter
2, Title 12, United States Code, or Title 30 RCW, and any credit union
established in this state pursuant to chapter 14, Title 12, United
States Code, or chapter 31.12 RCW, and any mutual savings bank
established in this state pursuant to Title 32 RCW, and any savings and
loan association established in this state pursuant to chapter 12,
Title 12, United States Code, or Title 33 RCW.

--- END ---