BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax preference contained in this act.
This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent
evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a
private right of action by any party or be used to determine
eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to support
the honey bee industry and provide tax relief to eligible apiarists.
Honey bees pollinate eighty percent of the nation's flowering crops,
which include agricultural crops. They are vitally important to
agriculture and an integral part of food production. Therefore, the
legislature intends to permanently include eligible apiarists within
the definition of farmer and define honey bee products as agricultural
products so that they may receive the same tax relief as that provided
to other sectors of agriculture. Because the legislature intends for
the changes in this act to be permanent, they are exempt from the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.213 and 2001 c 118 s 2 and 2001 c 97 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Agricultural product" means any product of plant cultivation
or animal husbandry including, but not limited to: A product of
horticulture, grain cultivation, vermiculture, viticulture, or
aquaculture as defined in RCW 15.85.020; plantation Christmas trees;
short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035; turf; or any
animal including but not limited to an animal that is a private sector
cultured aquatic product as defined in RCW 15.85.020, or a bird, or
insect, or the substances obtained from such an animal including honey
bee products. "Agricultural product" does not include animals defined
as pet animals under RCW 16.70.020.
(2)(a) "Farmer" means any person engaged in the business of
growing, raising, or producing, upon the person's own lands or upon the
lands in which the person has a present right of possession, any
agricultural product to be sold, and the growing, raising, or producing
honey bee products for sale, or providing bee pollination services, by
an eligible apiarist. "Farmer" does not include a person growing,
raising, or producing such products for the person's own consumption;
a person selling any animal or substance obtained therefrom in
connection with the person's business of operating a stockyard or a
slaughter or packing house; or a person in respect to the business of
taking, cultivating, or raising timber.
(b) "Eligible apiarist" means a person who owns or keeps one or
more bee colonies and who grows, raises, or produces honey bee products
for sale at wholesale and is registered under RCW 15.60.021.
(c) "Honey bee products" means queen honey bees, packaged honey
bees, honey, pollen, bees wax, propolis, or other substances obtained
from honey bees. "Honey bee products" does not include manufactured
substances or articles.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.330 and 2001 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to any farmer that sells
any agricultural product at wholesale or to any farmer who grows,
raises, or produces agricultural products owned by others, such as
custom feed operations. This exemption ((shall)) does not apply to any
person selling such products at retail or to any person selling
manufactured substances or articles. This chapter does not apply to
bee pollination services provided to a farmer by an eligible apiarist.
(2) This chapter ((shall)) also does not apply to any persons who
participate in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture
with respect to land enrolled in that program.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 802 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who:
(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065; or
(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1)
(a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere
leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is
presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging
for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a)(i) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited
to golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day
trips for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers.
(ii) Until July 1, 2017, amusement and recreation services do not
include the opportunity to dance provided by an establishment in
exchange for a cover charge.
(iii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(a):
(A) "Cover charge" means a charge, regardless of its label, to
enter an establishment or added to the purchaser's bill by an
establishment or otherwise collected after entrance to the
establishment, and the purchaser is provided the opportunity to dance
in exchange for payment of the charge.
(B) "Opportunity to dance" means that an establishment provides a
designated physical space, on either a temporary or permanent basis,
where customers are allowed to dance and the establishment either
advertises or otherwise makes customers aware that it has an area for
dancing;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers.
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6)
includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to
perform data processing.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing"
means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the
required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to
usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image
processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing,
claim processing, and similar activities.
(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination
services; and (((c))) (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat
development or access contracts with an organization exempt from
federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and
wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer
owns or leases.
(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service
described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a
"sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.855 and 2007 c 332 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to
an eligible farmer of:
(a) Replacement parts for qualifying farm machinery and equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to the installing of
replacement parts; and
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing of
qualifying farm machinery and equipment, provided that during the
course of repairing no tangible personal property is installed,
incorporated, or placed in, or becomes an ingredient or component of,
the qualifying farm machinery and equipment other than replacement
parts.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
a single transaction involves services that are not exempt under this
section and services that would be exempt under this section if
provided separately, the exemptions provided in subsection (1)(b) and
(c) of this section apply if: (i) The seller makes a separately
itemized charge for labor and services described in subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section; and (ii) the separately itemized charge does
not exceed the seller's usual and customary charge for such services.
(b) If the requirements in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (2)
are met, the exemption provided in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this
section applies to the separately itemized charge for labor and
services described in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. An exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate issued by the department
containing such information as the department requires. The exemption
certificate ((shall)) must be in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller ((shall)) must retain a copy of the certificate
for the seller's files.
(b) The department ((shall)) must provide an exemption certificate
to an eligible farmer or renew an exemption certificate, upon
application by that eligible farmer. The application must be in a form
and manner prescribed by the department and ((shall)) must contain the
following information as required by the department:
(i) The name and address of the applicant;
(ii) The uniform business identifier or tax reporting account
number of the applicant, if the applicant is required to be registered
with the department;
(iii) The type of farming engaged in;
(iv) Either a copy of the applicant's information as provided in
(b)(iv)(A) of this subsection or a declaration as provided in
(b)(iv)(B) of this subsection, as elected by the applicant:
(A) A copy of the applicant's Schedule F of Form 1040, Form 1120,
or other applicable form filed with the internal revenue service
indicating the applicant's gross sales or harvested value of
agricultural products or gross sales of bee pollination services for
the tax year covered by the return. If the applicant has not filed a
federal income tax return for the prior tax year or is not required to
file a federal income tax return, the applicant ((shall)) must provide
copies of other documents establishing the amount of the applicant's
gross sales or harvested value of agricultural products or gross sales
of bee pollination services for the tax year immediately preceding the
year in which an application for exemption under this section is
submitted to the department;
(B) A declaration signed under penalty of perjury as provided in
RCW 9A.72.085 that the applicant is an eligible farmer as defined in
subsection (4)(b) of this section. Any person who knowingly makes a
materially false statement on an application submitted to the
department under the provisions of this section ((shall be)) is guilty
of perjury in the second degree under chapter 9A.72 RCW. In addition,
the person is liable for payment of any taxes for which an exemption
under this section was claimed, with interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, retroactively to the date the exemption was claimed,
and penalties as provided under chapter 82.32 RCW;
(v) The name of the individual authorized to sign the certificate,
printed in a legible fashion;
(vi) The signature of the authorized individual; and
(vii) Other information the department may require to verify the
applicant's eligibility for the exemption.
(c)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, exemption
certificates take effect on the date issued by the department are not
transferable and are valid for the remainder of the calendar year in
which the certificate is issued and the following four calendar years.
The department ((shall)) must attempt to notify holders of exemption
certificates of the impending expiration of the certificate at least
sixty days before the certificate expires and ((shall)) must provide an
application for renewal of the certificate.
(ii) When a certificate holder merely changes identity or form of
ownership of an entity and there is no change in beneficial ownership,
the exemption certificate ((shall)) must be transferred to the new
entity upon written notice to the department by the transferor or
transferee.
(d)(i) A person who is an eligible farmer as defined in subsection
(4)(b)(iii) of this section ((shall)) must be issued a conditional
exemption certificate. The exemption certificate is conditioned upon:
(A) The eligible farmer having gross sales or a harvested value of
agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by that person or
gross sales of bee pollination services of at least ten thousand
dollars in the first full tax year in which the person engages in
business as a farmer; or
(B) The eligible farmer, during the first full tax year in which
that person engages in business as a farmer, growing, raising, or
producing agricultural products having an estimated value at any time
during that year of at least ten thousand dollars, if the person will
not sell or harvest an agricultural product during the first full tax
year in which the person engages in business as a farmer.
(ii) If a person fails to meet the condition provided in (d)(i)(A)
or (B) of this subsection, the department ((shall)) must revoke the
exemption certificate. The department shall notify the person in
writing of the revocation and the person's responsibility, and due
date, for payment of any taxes for which an exemption under this
section was claimed. Any taxes for which an exemption under this
section was claimed ((shall be)) are due and payable within thirty days
of the date of the notice revoking the certificate. The department
((shall)) must assess interest on the taxes for which the exemption was
claimed. Interest ((shall)) must be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the exemption was claimed, and ((shall)) accrues until the taxes
for which the exemption was claimed are paid. Penalties ((shall)) may
not be imposed on any tax required to be paid under this subsection
(3)(d)(ii) if full payment is received by the due date. Nothing in
this subsection (3)(d) prohibits a person from reapplying for an
exemption certificate.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.04.213.
(b) "Eligible farmer" means:
(i) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 whose gross sales or
harvested value of agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by
that person or gross sales of bee pollination services is at least ten
thousand dollars for the tax year immediately preceding the year in
which an application for exemption under this section is submitted to
the department;
(ii) The transferee of an exemption certificate under subsection
(3)(c)(ii) of this section where the transferred certificate expires
before the transferee engages in farming operations for a full tax
year, if the combined gross sales or harvested value of agricultural
products or gross sales of bee pollination services that the transferor
and transferee have grown, raised, ((or)) produced, or provided meet
the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection;
(iii) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213, who does not meet the
definition of "eligible farmer" in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection,
and who did not engage in farming for the entire tax year immediately
preceding the year in which application for exemption under this
section is submitted to the department, because the farmer is either
new to farming or newly returned to farming; or
(iv) Anyone who otherwise meets the definition of "eligible farmer"
in this subsection except that they are not a "person" as defined in
RCW 82.04.030.
(c) "Farm vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.181.
(d) "Harvested value" means the number of units of the agricultural
product that were grown, raised, or produced, multiplied by the average
sales price of the agricultural product. For purposes of this
subsection (4)(d), "average sales price" means the average price per
unit of agricultural product received by farmers in this state as
reported by the United States department of agriculture's national
agricultural statistics service for the twelve-month period that
coincides with, or that ends closest to, the end of the relevant tax
year, regardless of whether the prices are subject to revision. If the
price per unit of an agricultural product received by farmers in this
state is not available from the national agricultural statistics
service, average sales price may be determined by using the average
price per unit of agricultural product received by farmers in this
state as reported by a recognized authority for the agricultural
product.
(e) "Qualifying farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and
equipment used primarily by an eligible farmer for growing, raising, or
producing agricultural products, providing bee pollination services, or
both. "Qualifying farm machinery and equipment" does not include:
(i) Vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.670, other than farm tractors
as defined in RCW 46.04.180, farm vehicles, and other farm implements.
For purposes of this subsection (4)(e)(i), "farm implement" means
machinery or equipment manufactured, designed, or reconstructed for
agricultural purposes and used primarily by an eligible farmer to grow,
raise, or produce agricultural products, but does not include lawn
tractors and all-terrain vehicles;
(ii) Aircraft;
(iii) Hand tools and hand-powered tools; and
(iv) Property with a useful life of less than one year.
(f)(i) "Replacement parts" means those parts that replace an
existing part, or which are essential to maintain the working
condition, of a piece of qualifying farm machinery or equipment.
(ii) Paint, fuel, oil, hydraulic fluids, antifreeze, and similar
items are not replacement parts except when installed, incorporated, or
placed in qualifying farm machinery and equipment during the course of
installing replacement parts as defined in (f)(i) of this subsection or
making repairs as described in subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(g) "Tax year" means the period for which a person files its
federal income tax return, irrespective of whether the period
represents a calendar year, fiscal year, or some other consecutive
twelve-month period. If a person is not required to file a federal
income tax return, "tax year" means a calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.629 (Exemptions -- Honey bee products) and 2013 2nd
sp.s. c 13 s 306 & 2008 c 314 s 2;
(2) RCW 82.04.630 (Exemptions -- Bee pollination services) and 2013
2nd sp.s. c 13 s 307 & 2008 c 314 s 3;
(3) RCW 82.08.0204 (Exemptions -- Honey bees) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13
s 308 & 2008 c 314 s 4;
(4) RCW 82.12.0204 (Exemptions -- Honey bees) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13
s 309 & 2008 c 314 s 5;
(5) RCW 82.08.200 (Exemptions -- Honey beekeepers) and 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 13 s 302;
(6) RCW 82.12.200 (Exemptions -- Honey beekeepers) and 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 13 s 303; and
(7) RCW 43.136.047 (Beekeeper evaluation) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13
s 304.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature intends for the amendments
in this act to be permanent. Therefore, the amendments in this act are
exempt from the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---