BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that guardian
reporting intervals and training reporting requirements may not be
appropriate and may create unnecessary expenses for incapacitated
persons who are indigent and who have no significant changes in
circumstances to report to the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 11.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The court is not required to issue guardianship letters more
frequently than every six years;
(2) A guardian may not be required to report more frequently than
every three years; and
(3) A guardian or limited guardian is not required to complete any
training requirements when:
(a) The value of the estate is less than three thousand dollars;
(b) The guardian or limited guardian files a declaration in lieu of
a report stating that there is no substantial change of circumstances
since the last report. Such declaration may not be required to be
filed more frequently than every three years; and
(c) The court determines that:
(i) The conditions in (a) and (b) of this subsection (3) are met;
and
(ii) Good cause exists, based on all the circumstances of the case,
including but not limited to the factors listed in RCW 11.92.043.

--- END ---