BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.589 and 2002 c 175 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) ((or)) , (c), or (d) of this
subsection, whenever a person is to be sentenced for two or more
current offenses, the sentence range for each current offense shall be
determined by using all other current and prior convictions as if they
were prior convictions for the purpose of the offender score:
PROVIDED, That if the court enters a finding that some or all of the
current offenses encompass the same criminal conduct then those current
offenses shall be counted as one crime. Sentences imposed under this
subsection shall be served concurrently. Consecutive sentences may
only be imposed under the exceptional sentence provisions of RCW
9.94A.535. "Same criminal conduct," as used in this subsection, means
two or more crimes that require the same criminal intent, are committed
at the same time and place, and involve the same victim. This
definition applies in cases involving vehicular assault or vehicular
homicide even if the victims occupied the same vehicle.
(b) Whenever a person is convicted of two or more serious violent
offenses arising from separate and distinct criminal conduct, the
standard sentence range for the offense with the highest seriousness
level under RCW 9.94A.515 shall be determined using the offender's
prior convictions and other current convictions that are not serious
violent offenses in the offender score and the standard sentence range
for other serious violent offenses shall be determined by using an
offender score of zero. The standard sentence range for any offenses
that are not serious violent offenses shall be determined according to
(a) of this subsection. All sentences imposed under (((b) of)) this
subsection (1)(b) shall be served consecutively to each other and
concurrently with sentences imposed under (a) of this subsection.
(c) If an offender is convicted under RCW 9.41.040 for unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and for the
felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm,
or both, the standard sentence range for each of these current offenses
shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions,
except other current convictions for the felony crimes listed in this
subsection (1)(c), as if they were prior convictions. The offender
shall serve consecutive sentences for each conviction of the felony
crimes listed in this subsection (1)(c), and for each firearm
unlawfully possessed.
(d) All sentences imposed under RCW 46.61.502(6), 46.61.504(6), or
46.61.5055(4) shall be served consecutively with any sentences imposed
under RCW 46.20.740 and 46.20.750.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, whenever a
person while under sentence for conviction of a felony commits another
felony and is sentenced to another term of confinement, the latter term
shall not begin until expiration of all prior terms.
(b) Whenever a second or later felony conviction results in
community supervision with conditions not currently in effect, under
the prior sentence or sentences of community supervision the court may
require that the conditions of community supervision contained in the
second or later sentence begin during the immediate term of community
supervision and continue throughout the duration of the consecutive
term of community supervision.
(3) Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, whenever a
person is sentenced for a felony that was committed while the person
was not under sentence for conviction of a felony, the sentence shall
run concurrently with any felony sentence which has been imposed by any
court in this or another state or by a federal court subsequent to the
commission of the crime being sentenced unless the court pronouncing
the current sentence expressly orders that they be served
consecutively.
(4) Whenever any person granted probation under RCW 9.95.210 or
9.92.060, or both, has the probationary sentence revoked and a prison
sentence imposed, that sentence shall run consecutively to any sentence
imposed pursuant to this chapter, unless the court pronouncing the
subsequent sentence expressly orders that they be served concurrently.
(5) In the case of consecutive sentences, all periods of total
confinement shall be served before any partial confinement, community
restitution, community supervision, or any other requirement or
conditions of any of the sentences. Except for exceptional sentences
as authorized under RCW 9.94A.535, if two or more sentences that run
consecutively include periods of community supervision, the aggregate
of the community supervision period shall not exceed twenty-four
months.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.740 and 2010 c 269 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall attach or imprint a notation on the
driving record of any person restricted under RCW 46.20.720,
46.61.5055, or 10.05.140 stating that the person may operate only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.
The department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing
based upon written verification by a company doing business in the
state that it has installed the required device on a vehicle owned or
operated by the person seeking reinstatement. If, based upon
notification from the interlock provider or otherwise, the department
determines that an ignition interlock required under this section is no
longer installed or functioning as required, the department shall
suspend the person's license or privilege to drive. Whenever the
license or driving privilege of any person is suspended or revoked as
a result of noncompliance with an ignition interlock requirement, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides notice
issued by a company doing business in the state that a vehicle owned or
operated by the person is equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock device.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person with such a notation on
his or her driving record to operate a motor vehicle that is not so
equipped.
(3) Any sentence imposed for a violation of subsection (2) of this
section shall be served consecutively with any sentence imposed under
RCW 46.20.750, 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or 46.61.5055.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.750 and 2005 c 200 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who is restricted to the use of a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device and who tampers with the device or
directs, authorizes, or requests another to tamper with the device, in
order to circumvent the device by modifying, detaching, disconnecting,
or otherwise disabling it, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) A person who knowingly assists another person who is restricted
to the use of a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device to
circumvent the device or to start and operate that vehicle in violation
of a court order is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The provisions of
this subsection do not apply if the starting of a motor vehicle, or the
request to start a motor vehicle, equipped with an ignition interlock
device is done for the purpose of safety or mechanical repair of the
device or the vehicle and the person subject to the court order does
not operate the vehicle.
(3) Any sentence imposed for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section shall be served consecutively with any sentence imposed under
RCW 46.20.740, 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or 46.61.5055.

--- END ---