BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that every
individual in the state has a fundamental right to a healthful
environment, and a right to the pursuit of commonplace activities such
as breathing, drinking, eating, working, and recreating without risking
their health as a result of environmental degradation. There are
vulnerable communities throughout the state that bear a
disproportionate burden of pollution problems. Residents of these
communities face higher rates of cancer and other life-threatening
public health problems. All residents of the state, regardless of
race, color, culture, national origin, or income level, have a right to
participate meaningfully and receive fair treatment during the
implementation and enforcement of environmental laws, rules, and
policies. The improvement of environmental law and policy decision-making processes helps state agencies meet their responsibility to
comply with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000(d). These important objectives and
responsibilities are satisfied by the passage of this act.
(2) Pursuant to the policy declared in this section, and consistent
with federal executive order 12898, state agencies shall, to the extent
practical, make achieving environmental justice part of their mission
by identifying and addressing, as appropriate, the disproportionately
high and adverse human health or environmental effects of their
programs, policies, and activities on minority populations and low-income populations in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.94.030.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Highly impacted community" means a community that the
department has determined is likely to bear a disproportionate burden
of public health risks from environmental pollution.
(4) "Person" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.48.020.
(5) "Supplemental environmental project" means an environmentally
beneficial project that a person agrees to undertake in settlement of
an enforcement action, but which the person is not otherwise obligated
to perform.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Within available funds, the department
must identify and maintain a list of highly impacted communities in
this state.
(2) In identifying highly impacted communities, the department
shall consider, at minimum, including areas that have any of the
following characteristics:
(a) Unemployment rates more than twenty percent above the state
average;
(b) Median household income that is less than seventy-five percent
of the state median household income;
(c) Disproportionate public health challenges, as demonstrated by
scientific or public health data; or
(d) A significant percentage of community residents who are
minorities, foreign born, or who lack proficiency in the English
language.
(3) In determining whether a community is a highly impacted
community under this section, the department may rely on existing
scientific or public health data, including public health data compiled
by the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) This section and section 5 of this act
apply to the settlement, registered with a judicial or quasi-judicial
body, of an enforcement action based upon a violation of a permit
issued under chapter 70.94, 70.105, or 90.48 RCW or a violation of an
order under RCW 70.105D.050. In conjunction with the settlement of an
enforcement action, the department may require a person whose activity
negatively affects public health in a highly impacted community to
contribute in-kind services or otherwise fund a supplemental
environmental project under the following circumstances:
(a) A supplemental environmental project may include projects to
protect human health, prevent pollution, reduce pollution, protect or
restore natural or man-made environments, assessments or audits of
environmental quality or pollution prevention, efforts to promote
environmental compliance, or emergency preparedness efforts.
(b) A supplemental environmental project authorized by the
department must:
(i)(A) Take place within the same highly impacted community in
which the violation occurred; or
(B) Primarily benefit the highly impacted community in which the
violation occurred;
(ii)(A) Be designed to reduce the likelihood that similar
violations will occur in the future;
(B) Reduce the adverse impact to public health or the environment
to which the violation at issue contributes within the highly impacted
community; or
(C) Reduce the overall risk to public health or the environment
potentially affected by the violation at issue;
(iii) Be of a scope and type defined in the signed settlement
agreement between the department and the person in violation of a
permit issued under chapter 70.94, 70.105, or 90.48 RCW or an order
under RCW 70.105D.050; and
(iv) Include deadlines and quantifiable performance metrics for the
achievement of intermediate deliverables or objectives towards the
completion of the supplemental environmental project.
(2) If the department requires a person to perform or fund a
supplemental environmental project in conjunction with the settlement
of an enforcement action related to the violation of a permit issued
under chapter 70.94, 70.105, or 90.48 RCW, the department or authority
shall also recover a monetary penalty in accordance with RCW 70.94.430,
70.94.431, 70.105.080, 70.105.085, or 70.105.090 or chapter 90.48 RCW.
(3) In determining the monetary amount to be recovered in the
settlement, in addition to the current factors considered in
determining the amounts of a penalty under RCW 70.94.430, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.105.085, or 70.105.090 or chapter 90.48 RCW, the
department or authority shall consider:
(a) The cost to the person of the supplemental environmental
project; and
(b) The environmental or public health benefits anticipated to
accrue from the supplemental environmental project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To the maximum extent practicable, the
department shall seek the input of the highly impacted community in the
development of a proposed supplemental environmental project pursuant
to section 4 of this act. After the department has decided to consider
the inclusion of a supplemental environmental project in conjunction
with the settlement of an enforcement action, the department shall, to
the maximum extent practicable, seek to provide information to the
highly impacted community regarding:
(1) The proposed supplemental environmental project; and
(2) The process the department plans to follow in making a final
determination regarding the details of the supplemental environmental
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department may adopt rules as necessary
to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act take effect
January 1, 2015.

--- END ---