BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.660.045 and 2007 c 396 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The educator retooling ((to teach mathematics and science))
conditional scholarship program is created. Participation is limited
to current K-12 teachers and individuals having an elementary education
certificate but who are not employed in positions requiring an
elementary education certificate. It is anticipated that candidates
enrolled in this program will complete the requirements for a
mathematics ((or)), science, special education, bilingual education, or
English language learner endorsement((, or both,)) in two years or
less.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include:
(a) Current K-12 teachers shall pursue a middle level mathematics
or science, ((or)) secondary mathematics or science, special education,
bilingual education, or English language learner endorsement.
(b) Individuals having an elementary education certificate but who
are not employed in positions requiring an elementary education
certificate shall pursue an endorsement only in middle level
mathematics or science ((only)), special education, bilingual
education, or English language learner.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2012 c 229 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these
purposes, the conditional scholarship programs in this chapter are
created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the student achievement
council. In administering the programs, the council has the following
powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the conditional scholarship
programs are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of professional educator standards board-approved
alternative routes to teaching programs under RCW 28A.660.040. For
fiscal year 2011, priority must be given to fiscal year 2010
participants in the alternative route partnership program. In order to
receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through a professional educator standards board-approved program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The council may adjust the annual award by the average
rate of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by RCW 28A.660.042.
In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The student achievement council may adjust the annual award
by the average rate of tuition and fee increases at the state community
and technical colleges.
(c) The educator retooling ((to teach mathematics and science))
conditional scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers.
In order to receive conditional scholarship awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; special education, bilingual education, or English
language learner endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement shall pursue an endorsement in middle level mathematics or
science, or both; special education, bilingual education, or English
language learner endorsement; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both, or
special education, bilingual education, or English language learner
endorsement, which shall include passing ((a mathematics or science))
an endorsement test, or ((both)) tests, plus observation and completing
applicable coursework to attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select individuals to receive conditional scholarships. In selecting
recipients, preference shall be given to eligible veterans or national
guard members.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients who fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The student achievement council shall adopt
rules to define the terms for repayment, including applicable interest
rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) The student achievement council may deposit all appropriations,
collections, and any other funds received for the program in this
chapter in the future teachers conditional scholarship account
authorized in RCW 28B.102.080.

--- END ---