BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the authority and the department
purchase or contract for the delivery of medicaid programs, including
medical services with the managed care plans under this chapter, mental
health services with regional support networks or other contractors
under chapter 71.24 RCW, chemical dependency services under chapters
74.50 and 70.96A RCW, and long-term care services under chapter 74.39A
RCW.
(2) The authority and department must collaborate and seek
opportunities to expand access to care for enrollees in the medicaid
programs identified in subsection (1) of this section living in border
communities that may require contractual agreements with providers
across the state border when care is appropriate, available, and cost-effective.
(3) All authority and department contracts for medicaid services
issued or renewed after July 1, 2014, must include provisions that
allow for care to be accessed cross-border ensuring timely access to
necessary care, including inpatient and outpatient services. The
contracts must include reciprocal arrangements that allow Washington,
Oregon, and Idaho border residents to access care when care is
appropriate, available, and cost-effective.
(4) The agencies must jointly report to the health care committees
and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2014, with an
update on the contractual opportunities and the anticipated impacts on
patient access to timely care, the impact on the availability of
inpatient and outpatient services, and the fiscal implications for the
medicaid programs.

--- END ---