BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.34.020 and 2013 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity
with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable
person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or health care.
(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts
injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a
vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is
unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which have the following
meanings:
(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape,
sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual
harassment. Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff
person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff
person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a
vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a
program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is
consensual.
(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily
injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not
limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching,
choking, kicking, shoving, prodding, or the use of chemical restraints
or physical restraints unless the restraints are consistent with
licensing requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise
being used inappropriately.
(c) "Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental
or verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to,
coercion, harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from
family, friends, or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes
ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.
(d) "Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting
undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to
act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or
causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of
another.
(3) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the
vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully
informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the
receipt of services is voluntary.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter
18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes;
chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential
habilitation centers; or any other facility licensed or certified by
the department.
(6) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use,
control over, or withholding of the property, income, resources, or
trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any
person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable
adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a
person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a
vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, or
trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or
entity other than the vulnerable adult;
(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to,
the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship
appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or
transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the
vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the
vulnerable adult; or
(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income,
resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or
entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks
the capacity to consent to the release or use of his or her property,
income, resources, or trust funds.
(7) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW
30.22.040 and 30.22.041. For purposes of this chapter only, "financial
institution" also means a "broker-dealer" or "investment adviser" as
defined in RCW 21.20.005.
(8) "Incapacitated person" means a person who is at a significant
risk of personal or financial harm under RCW 11.88.010(1) (a), (b),
(c), or (d).
(9) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Interested person" means a person who demonstrates to the
court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of
the vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the
court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is
unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the
petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests.
(11) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law
enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel;
individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a
facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health,
adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice
agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(12) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a
person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods
and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable
adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or
pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or
entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of
consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety, including
but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.
(13) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including, but not
limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney, or
volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable
adults.
(14) "Protective services" means any services provided by the
department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable
adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has
been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state
of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to
case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for
medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral
for legal assistance.
(15) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not
living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and
services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental
health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable
adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who
is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care
agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of
inaction by that agency or individual provider.
(16) "Social worker" means:
(a) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2); or
(b) Anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular
course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare,
support, or education of vulnerable adults, or providing social
services to vulnerable adults, whether in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(17) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:
(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or
physical inability to care for himself or herself; or
(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or
(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020 or who the department reasonably believes has a
developmental disability that meets that definition; or
(d) Admitted to any facility; or
(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care
agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
or
(f) Receiving services from an individual provider; or
(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from
a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.

--- END ---