BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.145.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity scholarship board is created. The opportunity
scholarship board consists of ((seven)) eleven members:
(a) ((Three)) Six members appointed by the governor. For ((two))
three of the ((three)) five appointments, the governor shall consider
names from a list provided by the president of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives; and
(b) ((Four)) Five foundation or business and industry
representatives appointed by the governor from among the state's most
productive industries such as aerospace, manufacturing, health
((sciences)) care, information technology, engineering, agriculture,
and others, as well as philanthropy. The foundation or business and
industry representatives shall be selected from among nominations
provided by the private sector donors to the opportunity scholarship
and opportunity expansion programs. However, the governor may request,
and the private sector donors shall provide, an additional list or
lists from which the governor shall select these representatives.
(2) Board members shall hold their offices for a term of four years
from the first day of September and until their successors are
appointed. No more than the terms of two members may expire
simultaneously on the last day of August in any one year.
(3) The members of the opportunity scholarship board shall elect
one of the business and industry representatives to serve as chair.
(4) ((Five)) Seven members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor or the
president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives,
depending upon which made the initial appointment to that position,
shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the board
member whose office has become vacant or expired.
(5) The opportunity scholarship board shall be staffed by the
program administrator.
(6) The purpose of the opportunity scholarship board is to provide
oversight and guidance for the opportunity expansion and the
opportunity scholarship programs in light of established legislative
priorities and to fulfill the duties and responsibilities under this
chapter, including but not limited to determining eligible education
programs for purposes of the opportunity scholarship program. Duties,
exercised jointly with the program administrator, include soliciting
funds and setting annual fund-raising goals.
(7) The opportunity scholarship board may report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations
as to:
(a) Whether some or all of the scholarships should be changed to
conditional scholarships that must be repaid in the event the
participant does not complete the eligible education program; and
(b) A source or sources of funds for the opportunity expansion
program in addition to the voluntary contributions of the high
technology research and development tax credit under RCW 82.32.800.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.145.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The program administrator, under contract with the board, shall
staff the opportunity scholarship board and shall have the duties and
responsibilities provided in this chapter, including but not limited to
publicizing the program, selecting participants for the opportunity
scholarship award, distributing opportunity scholarship awards, and
achieving the maximum possible rate of return on investment of the
accounts in subsection (2) of this section, while ensuring transparency
in the investment decisions and processes. Duties, exercised jointly
with the opportunity scholarship board, include soliciting funds and
setting annual fund-raising goals. The program administrator shall be
paid an administrative fee as determined by the opportunity scholarship
board.
(2) With respect to the opportunity scholarship program, the
program administrator shall:
(a) Establish and manage two separate accounts into which to
receive grants and contributions from private sources as well as state
matching funds, and from which to disburse scholarship funds to
participants;
(b) Solicit and accept grants and contributions from private
sources, via direct payment, pledge agreement, or escrow account, of
private sources for deposit into one or both of the two accounts
created in this subsection (2)(b) in accordance with this subsection
(2)(b):
(i) The "scholarship account," whose principal may be invaded, and
from which scholarships must be disbursed beginning no later than
December 1, 2011, if, by that date, state matching funds in the amount
of five million dollars or more have been received. Thereafter,
scholarships shall be disbursed on an annual basis beginning no later
than May 1, 2012, and every ((May)) October 1st thereafter;
(ii) The "endowment account," from which scholarship moneys may be
disbursed from earnings only in years when:
(A) The state match has been made into both the scholarship and the
endowment account;
(B) The state appropriations for the state need grant under RCW
28B.92.010 meet or exceed state appropriations for the state need grant
made in the 2011-2013 biennium, adjusted for inflation, and eligibility
for state need grant recipients is at least seventy percent of state
median family income; and
(C) The state has demonstrated progress toward the goal of total
per-student funding levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and
fees, of at least the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding
at similar public institutions of higher education in the global
challenge states, as defined, measured, and reported in RCW 28B.15.068.
In any year in which the office of financial management reports that
the state has not made progress toward this goal, no new scholarships
may be awarded. In any year in which the office of financial
management reports that the percentile of total per-student funding is
less than the sixtieth percentile and at least five percent less than
the prior year, pledges of future grants and contributions may, at the
request of the donor, be released and grants and contributions already
received refunded to the extent that opportunity scholarship awards
already made can be fulfilled from the funds remaining in the endowment
account. In fulfilling the requirements of this subsection, the office
of financial management shall use resources that facilitate measurement
and comparisons of the most recently completed academic year. These
resources may include, but are not limited to, the data provided in a
uniform dashboard format under RCW 28B.77.090 as the statewide public
four-year dashboard and academic year reports prepared by the state
board for community and technical colleges; ((and))
(iii) An amount equal to at least fifty percent of all grants and
contributions must be deposited into the scholarship account until such
time as twenty million dollars have been deposited into the account,
after which time the private donors may designate whether their
contributions must be deposited to the scholarship or the endowment
account. The opportunity scholarship board and the program
administrator must work to maximize private sector contributions to
both the scholarship account and the endowment account, to maintain a
robust scholarship program while simultaneously building the endowment,
and to determine the division between the two accounts in the case of
undesignated grants and contributions, taking into account the need for
a long-term funding mechanism and the short-term needs of families and
students in Washington. The first five million dollars in state match,
as provided in RCW 28B.145.040, shall be deposited into the scholarship
account and thereafter the state match shall be deposited into the two
accounts in equal proportion to the private funds deposited in each
account; and
(iv) Once moneys in the opportunity scholarship match transfer
account are subject to an agreement under section 4(5) of this act and
are deposited in the scholarship account or endowment account under
this section, the state acts in a fiduciary rather than ownership
capacity with regard to those assets. Assets in the scholarship
account and endowment account are not considered state money, common
cash, or revenue to the state;
(c) Provide proof of receipt of grants and contributions from
private sources to the board, identifying the amounts received by name
of private source and date, and whether the amounts received were
deposited into the scholarship or the endowment account;
(d) In consultation with the ((higher education coordinating
board)) student achievement council and the state board for community
and technical colleges, make an assessment of the reasonable annual
eligible expenses associated with eligible education programs
identified by the opportunity scholarship board;
(e) Determine the dollar difference between tuition fees charged by
institutions of higher education in the 2008-09 academic year and the
academic year for which an opportunity scholarship is being
distributed;
(f) Develop and implement an application, selection, and
notification process for awarding opportunity scholarships;
(g) Determine the annual amount of the opportunity scholarship for
each selected participant. The annual amount shall be at least one
thousand dollars or the amount determined under (e) of this subsection,
but may be increased on an income-based, sliding scale basis up to the
amount necessary to cover all reasonable annual eligible expenses as
assessed pursuant to (d) of this subsection, or to encourage
participation in baccalaureate degree programs identified by the
opportunity scholarship board;
(h) Distribute scholarship funds to selected participants. Once
awarded, and to the extent funds are available for distribution, an
opportunity scholarship shall be automatically renewed until the
participant withdraws from or is no longer attending the program,
completes the program, or has taken the credit or clock hour equivalent
of one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of time of
the participant's program, whichever occurs first, and as long as the
participant annually submits documentation of filing both a free
application for federal student aid and for available federal education
tax credits, including but not limited to the American opportunity tax
credit; and
(i) Notify institutions of scholarship recipients who will attend
their institutions and inform them of the terms of the students'
eligibility.
(3) With respect to the opportunity expansion program, the program
administrator shall:
(a) Assist the opportunity scholarship board in developing and
implementing an application, selection, and notification process for
making opportunity expansion awards; and
(b) Solicit and accept grants and contributions from private
sources for opportunity expansion awards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.145
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity scholarship board may elect to have the state
investment board invest the funds in the scholarship account and
endowment account described under RCW 28B.145.030(2)(b). If the board
so elects, the state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the
two accounts. All investment and operating costs associated with the
investment of money shall be paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160.
With the exception of these expenses, the earnings from the investment
of the money shall be retained by the accounts.
(2) All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care under RCW
43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state
investment board.
(3) As deemed appropriate by the state investment board, money in
the scholarship and endowment accounts may be commingled for investment
with other funds subject to investment by the state investment board.
(4) Members of the state investment board shall not be considered
an insurer of the funds or assets and are not liable for any action or
inaction.
(5) Members of the state investment board are not liable to the
state, to the fund, or to any other person as a result of their
activities as members, whether ministerial or discretionary, except for
willful dishonesty or intentional violations of law. The state
investment board in its discretion may purchase liability insurance for
members.
(6) The authority to establish all policies relating to the
scholarship account and the endowment account, other than the
investment policies as provided in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section, resides with the opportunity scholarship board and program
administrator acting in accordance with the principles set forth in
this chapter. With the exception of expenses of the state investment
board in subsection (1) of this section, disbursements from the
scholarship account and endowment account shall be made only on the
authorization of the opportunity scholarship board or its designee, and
moneys in the accounts may be spent only for the purposes specified in
this chapter.
(7) The investment board shall routinely consult and communicate
with the opportunity scholarship board on the investment policy,
earnings of the accounts, and related needs of the program.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.145.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity scholarship match transfer account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer as a nonappropriated account to
be used solely and exclusively for the opportunity scholarship program
created in RCW 28B.145.040. The purpose of the account is to provide
matching funds for the opportunity scholarship program.
(2) Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations by the
legislature into the account and any gifts, grants, or donations
received by the executive director of the ((board)) student achievement
council for this purpose.
(3) No expenditures from the account may be made except upon
receipt of proof, by the executive director of the ((board)) student
achievement council from the program administrator, of private
contributions to the opportunity scholarship program. Expenditures, in
the form of matching funds, may not exceed the total amount of private
contributions.
(4) Only the executive director of the ((board)) student
achievement council or the executive director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the opportunity scholarship match transfer account.
Such authorization must be made as soon as practicable following
receipt of proof as required under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The student achievement council shall enter into an appropriate
agreement with the program administrator to demonstrate exchange of
consideration for the matching funds.

--- END ---