BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public hospital
districts engaging in joint ventures should not delegate key elements
of governmental authority with which they have been vested under
Washington law. The legislature therefore intends to provide direction
to public hospital districts regarding limits on delegation of
authority pursuant to joint venture agreements.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.44.240 and 2004 c 261 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any public hospital district may contract or join with any
other public hospital district, publicly owned hospital, nonprofit
hospital, legal entity, or individual to acquire, own, operate, manage,
or provide any hospital or other health care facilities or hospital
services or other health care services to be used by individuals,
districts, hospitals, or others, including providing health maintenance
services.
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, a public hospital
district may not delegate authority granted in this chapter to:
(i) Exercise the right of eminent domain;
(ii) Contract indebtedness or borrow money;
(iii) Raise revenue by levying a property tax;
(iv) Adopt a budget;
(v) Make or amend a management agreement;
(vi) Sue and be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction;
(vii) Employ or discharge a superintendent, attorney, or other
management employee;
(viii) Annex or withdraw territory; or
(ix) Oversee acquisition of any interest in a hospital owned by the
public hospital district.
(2) If a public hospital district chooses to contract or join with
another party or parties pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, it
may do so through establishing a nonprofit corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or other legal entity of its choosing in
which the public hospital district and the other party or parties
participate. The governing body of such legal entity shall include
representatives of the public hospital district, which representatives
may include members of the public hospital district's board of
commissioners.
(3) A public hospital district contracting or joining with another
party pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may appropriate funds
and may sell, lease, or otherwise provide property, personnel, and
services to the legal entity established to carry out the contract or
joint activity.

--- END ---