BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.86A.030 and 2010 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The state treasurer shall make funds available for a time
certificate of deposit investment program according to the following
formula: The state treasurer shall apportion to all participating
depositaries an amount equal to five percent of the three year average
mean of general state revenues as certified in accordance with Article
VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or fifty percent of the
total surplus treasury investment availability, whichever is less.
Within thirty days after certification, an amount equal to those funds
determined to be available according to this formula for the time
certificate of deposit investment program shall be available for
deposit in qualified public depositaries. These funds shall be
allocated among the participating depositaries on a basis to be
determined by the state treasurer.
(b) The funds made available by the treasurer for a time
certificate of deposit investment program under (a) of this subsection
(1) may be provided from either treasury surplus funds or funds held
pursuant to chapter 43.250 RCW.
(2) Of all state funds available under this section, the state
treasurer may use up to ((one)) two hundred ((seventy-five)) million
dollars per year for the purposes of RCW 43.86A.060(2)(c) (i) and (iii)
and up to fifteen million dollars per year for the purposes of RCW
43.86A.060(2)(c)(ii). The amounts made available to these public
depositaries shall be equal to the amounts of outstanding loans made
under RCW 43.86A.060.
(3) The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record
giving consideration to, but not limited to, deposits, assets, loans,
capital structure, investments, or some combination of these factors.
However, if in the judgment of the state treasurer the amount of
allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by this section
will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

--- END ---