BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.210 and 2013 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build, general contractor/construction manager, and job order
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.300, 39.10.340, and
39.10.420, respectively.
(2) "Board" means the capital projects advisory review board.
(3) "Certified public body" means a public body certified to use
design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting
procedures, or both, under RCW 39.10.270.
(4) "Committee," unless otherwise noted, means the project review
committee.
(5) "Design-build procedure" means a contract between a public body
and another party in which the party agrees to both design and build
the facility, portion of the facility, or other item specified in the
contract.
(6) "Disadvantaged business enterprise" means any business entity
certified with the office of minority and women's business enterprises
under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(7) "General contractor/construction manager" means a firm with
which a public body has selected to provide services during the design
phase and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to act as
construction manager and general contractor during the construction
phase.
(8) "Job order contract" means a contract in which the contractor
agrees to a fixed period, indefinite quantity delivery order contract
which provides for the use of negotiated, definitive work orders for
public works as defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(9) "Job order contractor" means a registered or licensed
contractor awarded a job order contract.
(10) "Maximum allowable construction cost" means the maximum cost
of the work to construct the project including a percentage for risk
contingency, negotiated support services, and approved change orders.
(11) "Negotiated support services" means items a general contractor
would normally manage or perform on a construction project including,
but not limited to surveying, hoisting, safety enforcement, provision
of toilet facilities, temporary heat, cleanup, and trash removal, and
that are negotiated as part of the maximum allowable construction cost.
(12) "Percent fee" means the percentage amount to be earned by the
general contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit.
(13) "Public body" means any general or special purpose government
in the state of Washington, including but not limited to state
agencies, institutions of higher education, counties, cities, towns,
ports, school districts, and special purpose districts.
(14) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010.
(15) "Small business entity" means a small business as defined in
RCW 39.26.010.
(16) "Total contract cost" means the fixed amount for the detailed
specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable
construction cost, and the percent fee on the negotiated maximum
allowable construction cost.
(17) "Total project cost" means the cost of the project less
financing and land acquisition costs.
(18) "Unit price book" means a book containing specific prices,
based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where
available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order
contractor. The prices may include: All the costs of materials;
labor; equipment; overhead, including bonding costs; and profit for
performing the items of work. The unit prices for labor must be at the
rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued.
(19) "Work order" means an order issued for a definite scope of
work to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.
(20) "Heavy civil construction project" means a civil engineering
project, the predominant features of which are infrastructure
improvements.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.280 and 2013 c 222 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public body not certified under RCW 39.10.270 must apply for
approval from the committee to use the design-build or general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedure on a project. A
public body seeking approval must submit to the committee an
application in a format and manner as prescribed by the committee. The
application must include a description of the public body's
qualifications, a description of the project, ((and its)) the public
body's intended use of alternative contracting procedures, and, if
applicable, a declaration that the public body has elected to procure
the project as a heavy civil construction project.
(2) To approve a proposed project, the committee shall determine
that:
(a) The alternative contracting procedure will provide a
substantial fiscal benefit or the use of the traditional method of
awarding contracts in lump sum to the low responsive bidder is not
practical for meeting desired quality standards or delivery schedules;
(b) The proposed project meets the requirements for using the
alternative contracting procedure as described in RCW 39.10.300 or
39.10.340;
(c) The public body has the necessary experience or qualified team
to carry out the alternative contracting procedure including, but not
limited to: (i) Project delivery knowledge and experience; (ii)
sufficient personnel with construction experience to administer the
contract; (iii) a written management plan that shows clear and logical
lines of authority; (iv) the necessary and appropriate funding and time
to properly manage the job and complete the project; (v) continuity of
project management team, including personnel with experience managing
projects of similar scope and size to the project being proposed; and
(vi) necessary and appropriate construction budget;
(d) For design-build projects, public body personnel or consultants
are knowledgeable in the design-build process and are able to oversee
and administer the contract; and
(e) The public body has resolved any audit findings related to
previous public works projects in a manner satisfactory to the
committee.
(3) The committee shall, if practicable, make its determination at
the public meeting during which a submittal is reviewed. Public
comments must be considered before a determination is made.
(4) Within ten business days after the public meeting, the
committee shall provide a written determination to the public body, and
make its determination available to the public on the committee's web
site. If the committee fails to make a written determination within
ten business days of the public meeting, the request of the public body
to use the alternative contracting procedure on the requested project
shall be deemed approved.
(5) Failure of the committee to meet within sixty calendar days of
a public body's application to use an alternative contracting procedure
on a project shall be deemed an approval of the application.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.340 and 2013 c 222 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public bodies
may utilize the general contractor/construction manager procedure for
public works projects where at least one of the following is met:
(1) Implementation of the project involves complex scheduling,
phasing, or coordination;
(2) The project involves construction at an occupied facility which
must continue to operate during construction;
(3) The involvement of the general contractor/construction manager
during the design stage is critical to the success of the project;
(4) The project encompasses a complex or technical work
environment; ((or))
(5) The project requires specialized work on a building that has
historic significance; or
(6) The project is, and the public body elects to procure the
project as, a heavy civil construction project. However, no provision
of this chapter pertaining to a heavy civil construction project
applies unless the public body expressly elects to procure the project
as a heavy civil construction project.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.10.350 and 2007 c 494 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public body using the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedure shall provide for:
(a) The preparation of appropriate, complete, and coordinated
design documents;
(b) Confirmation that a constructability analysis of the design
documents has been performed prior to solicitation of a subcontract bid
package;
(c) Reasonable budget contingencies totaling not less than five
percent of the anticipated contract value;
(d) To the extent appropriate, on-site architectural or engineering
representatives during major construction or installation phases;
(e) Employment of staff or consultants with expertise and prior
experience in the management of comparable projects, critical path
method schedule review and analysis, and the administration, pricing,
and negotiation of change orders;
(f) Contract documents that include alternative dispute resolution
procedures to be attempted before the initiation of litigation;
(g) Contract documents that: (i) Obligate the public owner to
accept or reject a request for equitable adjustment, change order, or
claim within a specified time period but no later than sixty calendar
days after the receipt by the public body of related documentation; and
(ii) provide that if the public owner does not respond in writing to a
request for equitable adjustment, change order, or claim within the
specified time period, the request is deemed denied;
(h) Submission of project information, as required by the board;
and
(i) Contract documents that require the contractor, subcontractors,
and designers to submit project information required by the board.
(2) A public body using the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedure may include an incentive clause for early
completion, cost savings, or other performance goals if such incentives
are identified in the request for proposals. No incentives granted may
exceed five percent of the maximum allowable construction cost. No
incentives may be paid from any contingency fund established for
coordination of the construction documents or coordination of the work.
(3) If the construction is completed for less than the maximum
allowable construction cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as
part of an incentive clause shall accrue to the public body. If the
construction is completed for more than the maximum allowable
construction cost, the additional cost is the responsibility of the
general contractor/construction manager.
(4) If the public body and the general contractor/construction
manager agree, in writing, on a price for additional work, the public
body must issue a change order within thirty days of the written
agreement. If the public body does not issue a change order within the
thirty days, interest shall accrue on the dollar amount of the
additional work satisfactorily completed until a change order is
issued. The public body shall pay this interest at a rate of one
percent per month.
(5) For a project procured as a heavy civil construction project,
an independent audit, paid for by the public body, must be conducted to
confirm the proper accrual of costs as outlined in the contract.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.10.360 and 2013 c 222 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public bodies should select general contractor/construction
managers early in the life of public works projects, and in most
situations no later than the completion of schematic design.
(2) Contracts for the services of a general contractor/
construction manager under this section shall be awarded through a
competitive process requiring the public solicitation of proposals for
general contractor/construction manager services. The public
solicitation of proposals shall include:
(a) A description of the project, including programmatic,
performance, and technical requirements and specifications when
available;
(b) The reasons for using the general contractor/construction
manager procedure including, if applicable, a clear statement that the
public body is electing to procure the project as a heavy civil
construction project, in which case the solicitation must additionally:
(i) Indicate the minimum percentage of the cost of the work to
construct the project that will constitute the negotiated self-perform
portion of the project;
(ii) Indicate whether the public body will allow the price to be
paid for the negotiated self-perform portion of the project to be
deemed a cost of the work to which the general contractor/construction
manager's percent fee applies; and
(iii) Require proposals to indicate the proposer's fee for the
negotiated self-perform portion of the project;
(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of the firm,
including submission of the firm's accident prevention program;
(d) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors,
the relative weight of factors, and protest procedures including time
limits for filing a protest, which in no event may limit the time to
file a protest to fewer than four business days from the date the
proposer was notified of the selection decision;
(e) The form of the contract, including any contract for
preconstruction services, to be awarded;
(f) The estimated maximum allowable construction cost; and
(g) The bid instructions to be used by the general
contractor/construction manager finalists.
(3)(a) Evaluation factors for selection of the general
contractor/construction manager shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) Ability of the firm's professional personnel;
(ii) The firm's past performance in negotiated and complex
projects;
(iii) The firm's ability to meet time and budget requirements;
(iv) The scope of work the firm proposes to self-perform and its
ability to perform that work;
(v) The firm's proximity to the project location;
(vi) Recent, current, and projected workloads of the firm; and
(vii) The firm's approach to executing the project.
(b) An agency may also consider the firm's outreach plan to include
small business entities and disadvantaged business enterprises, and the
firm's past performance in the utilization of such firms as an
evaluation factor.
(4) A public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the
proposals. After the committee has selected the most qualified
finalists, at the time specified by the public body, these finalists
shall submit final proposals, including sealed bids for the percent fee
on the estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed
amount for the general conditions work specified in the request for
proposal. The public body shall establish a time and place for the
opening of sealed bids for the percent fee on the estimated maximum
allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for the general
conditions work specified in the request for proposal. At the time and
place named, these bids must be publicly opened and read and the public
body shall make all previous scoring available to the public. The
public body shall select the firm submitting the highest scored final
proposal using the evaluation factors and the relative weight of
factors published in the public solicitation of proposals. A public
body shall not evaluate or disqualify a proposal based on the terms of
a collective bargaining agreement.
(5) The public body shall notify all finalists of the selection
decision and make a selection summary of the final proposals available
to all proposers within two business days of such notification. If the
public body receives a timely written protest from a proposer, the
public body may not execute a contract until two business days after
the final protest decision is transmitted to the protestor. The
protestor must submit its protest in accordance with the published
protest procedures.
(6) Public bodies may contract with the selected firm to provide
services during the design phase that may include life-cycle cost
design considerations, value engineering, scheduling, cost estimating,
constructability, alternative construction options for cost savings,
and sequencing of work, and to act as the construction manager and
general contractor during the construction phase.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.10.370 and 2007 c 494 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The maximum allowable construction cost shall be used to
establish a total contract cost for which the general
contractor/construction manager shall provide a performance and payment
bond. The maximum allowable construction cost shall be negotiated
between the public body and the selected firm when the construction
documents and specifications are at least ninety percent complete.
(2) Major bid packages may be bid in accordance with RCW 39.10.380
before agreement on the maximum allowable construction cost between the
public body and the selected general contractor/construction manager.
The general contractor/construction manager may issue an intent to
award to the responsible bidder submitting the lowest responsive bid.
(3) The public body may, at its option, authorize the general
contractor/construction manager to proceed with the bidding and award
of bid packages and construction before receipt of complete project
plans and specifications. Any contracts awarded under this subsection
shall be incorporated in the negotiated maximum allowable construction
cost.
(4) The total contract cost includes the fixed amount for the
detailed specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum
allowable construction cost, the negotiated support services, and the
percent fee on the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost.
Negotiated support services may be included in the specified general
conditions at the discretion of the public body.
(5) If the public body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory
maximum allowable construction cost with the firm selected that the
public body determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available
funds, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the
public body shall negotiate with the next highest scored firm and
continue until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated.
(6) If the maximum allowable construction cost varies more than
fifteen percent from the bid estimated maximum allowable construction
cost due to requested and approved changes in the scope by the public
body, the percent fee shall be renegotiated.
(7) As part of the negotiation of the maximum allowable
construction cost under subsection (1) of this section, on a project
that the public body has elected to procure as a heavy civil
construction project:
(a) The general contractor/construction manager shall submit a
proposed construction management and contracting plan, which must
include, at a minimum:
(i) The scope of work and cost estimates for each bid package;
(ii) A proposed price and scope of work for the negotiated self-perform portion of the project;
(iii) The bases used by the general contractor/construction manager
to develop all cost estimates, including the negotiated self-perform
portion of the project; and
(iv) The general contractor/construction manager's updated outreach
plan to include small business entities, disadvantaged business
entities, and any other disadvantaged or underutilized businesses as
the public body may designate in the public solicitation of proposals,
as subcontractors and suppliers for the project;
(b) The public body and general contractor/construction manager may
negotiate the scopes of work to be procured by bid and the price and
scope of work for the negotiated self-perform portion of the project,
if any;
(c) The negotiated self-perform portion of the project must not
exceed fifty percent of the cost of the work to construct the project;
(d) Subject to the limitation of RCW 39.10.390(4), the public body
may additionally negotiate with the general contractor/construction
manager to determine on which scopes of work the general
contractor/construction manager will be permitted to bid, if any;
(e) The public body and general contractor/construction manager
shall negotiate, to the public body's satisfaction, a fair and
reasonable outreach plan;
(f) If the public body is unable to negotiate to its reasonable
satisfaction a component of this subsection (7), negotiations with the
firm must be terminated and the public body shall negotiate with the
next highest scored firm and continue until an agreement is reached or
the process is terminated.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.10.390 and 2013 c 222 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, bidding on subcontract work
or for the supply of equipment or materials by the general
contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is prohibited.
(2) The general contractor/construction manager, or its
subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract work or for the supply of
equipment or materials if:
(a) The work within the subcontract bid package or equipment or
materials is customarily performed or supplied by the general
contractor/construction manager;
(b) The bid opening is managed by the public body and is in
compliance with RCW 39.10.380; and
(c) Notification of the general contractor/construction manager's
intention to bid is included in the public solicitation of bids for the
bid package or for the equipment or materials.
(3) In no event may the general contractor/construction manager or
its subsidiaries assign warranty responsibility or the terms of its
contract or purchase order with vendors for equipment or material
purchases to subcontract bid package bidders or subcontractors who have
been awarded a contract. The value of subcontract work performed and
equipment and materials supplied by the general contractor/construction
manager may not exceed thirty percent of the negotiated maximum
allowable construction cost, unless procured as a heavy civil
construction project under this chapter. Negotiated support services
performed by the general contractor/construction manager shall not be
considered subcontract work for purposes of this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter, for a
project that a public body has elected to procure as a heavy civil
construction project under this chapter, at least thirty percent of the
cost of the work to construct the project included in the negotiated
maximum allowable construction cost must be procured through
competitive sealed bidding in which bidding by the general
contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is prohibited.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.131.408 and 2013 c 222 s 22 and 2013 c 186 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2022:
(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2014 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act), 2013
c 222 s 1, 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014, 2007 c 494 s 101, & 2005 c 469
s 3;
(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2013 c 222 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 102, & 2005 c
377 s 1;
(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2013 c 222 s 3, 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009
c 75 s 1, 2007 c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;
(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2013 c 222 s 4 & 2007 c 494 s 104;
(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2013 c 222 s 5, 2009 c 75 s 2, & 2007 c 494
s 105;
(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2013 c 222 s 6 & 2007 c 494 s 106;
(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2013 c 222 s 7, 2009 c 75 s 3, & 2007 c 494
s 107;
(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2014 c ... s 2 (section 2 of this act), 2013
c 222 s 8, & 2007 c 494 s 108;
(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;
(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2013 c 222 s 9, 2009 c 75 s 4, & 2007 c 494
s 201;
(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2013 c 222 s 10, 2007 c 494 s 203, & 1994 c
132 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2013 c 222 s 11, 2009 c 75 s 5, & 2007 c 494
s 204;
(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2014 c ... s 3 (section 3 of this act), 2013
c 222 s 12, & 2007 c 494 s 301;
(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2014 c ... s 4 (section 4 of this act)& 2007
c 494 s 302;
(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2014 c ... s 5 (section 5 of this act), 2013
c 222 s 13, 2009 c 75 s 6, & 2007 c 494 s 303;
(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2014 c ... s 6 (section 6 of this act)& 2007
c 494 s 304;
(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2013 c 222 s 14 & 2007 c 494 s 305;
(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2013 c 222 s 15 & 2010 c 163 s 1;
(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2014 c ... s 7 (section 7 of this act), 2013
c 222 s 16, & 2007 c 494 s 306;
(21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2013 c 222 s 17 & 2007 c 494 s 307;
(22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;
(23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2013 c 222 s 18, 2013 c 186 s 1, 2012 c 102
s 1, 2009 c 75 s 7, 2007 c 494 s 401, & 2003 c 301 s 1;
(24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2007 c 494 s 402;
(25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2013 c 222 s 19 & 2007 c 494 s 403;
(26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2012 c 102 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 404;
(27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2012 c 102 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 405;
(28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2005 c 274 s 275 & 1994 c 132 s 10;
(29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2013 c 222 s 20, 2007 c 494 s 501, & 2001 c
328 s 5;
(31) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(32) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(33) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510;
(34) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512; and
(35) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513.

--- END ---