BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.096 and 2009 c 520 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall convene an advisory committee to analyze
and make recommendations on the disproportionate representation of
children of color in Washington's child welfare system. The department
shall collaborate with the Washington institute for public policy and
private sector entities to develop a methodology for the advisory
committee to follow in conducting a baseline analysis of data from the
child welfare system to determine whether racial disproportionality and
racial disparity exist in this system. The Washington institute for
public policy shall serve as technical staff for the advisory
committee. In determining whether racial disproportionality or racial
disparity exists, the committee shall utilize existing research and
evaluations conducted within Washington state, nationally, and in other
states and localities that have similarly analyzed the prevalence of
racial disproportionality and disparity in child welfare.
(2) At a minimum, the advisory committee shall examine and analyze:
(a) The level of involvement of children of color at each stage in the
state's child welfare system, including the points of entry and exit,
and each point at which a treatment decision is made; (b) the number of
children of color in low-income or single-parent families involved in
the state's child welfare system; (c) the family structures of families
involved in the state's child welfare system; and (d) the outcomes for
children in the existing child welfare system. This analysis shall be
disaggregated by racial and ethnic group, and by geographic region.
(3) The committee of not more than fifteen individuals shall
consist of experts in social work, law, child welfare, psychology, or
related fields, at least two tribal representatives, a representative
of the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee, a representative
of a community-based organization involved with child welfare issues,
a representative of the department, a current or former foster care
youth, a current or former foster care parent, and a parent previously
involved with Washington's child welfare system. Committee members
shall be selected as follows: (a) Five members selected by the senate
majority leader; (b) five members selected by the speaker of the house
of representatives; and (c) five members selected by the secretary of
the department. The secretary, the senate majority leader, and the
speaker of the house of representatives shall coordinate appointments
to ensure the representation specified in this subsection is achieved.
After the advisory committee appointments are finalized, the committee
shall select two individuals to serve as cochairs of the committee, one
of whom shall be a representative from a nongovernmental entity. The
advisory committee shall develop membership rules by August 1, 2014.
The membership rules must be included in the annual secretary's report
required under subsection (6) of this section.
(4) The secretary shall make reasonable efforts to seek public and
private funding for the advisory committee.
(5) Not later than June 1, 2008, the advisory committee created in
subsection (1) of this section shall report to the secretary of the
department on the results of the analysis. If the results of the
analysis indicate disproportionality or disparity exists for any racial
or ethnic group in any region of the state, the committee, in
conjunction with the secretary of the department, shall develop a plan
for remedying the disproportionality or disparity. The remediation
plan shall include: (a) Recommendations for administrative and
legislative actions related to appropriate programs and services to
reduce and eliminate disparities in the system and improve the long-term outcomes for children of color who are served by the system; and
(b) performance measures for implementing the remediation plan. To the
extent possible and appropriate, the remediation plan shall be
developed to integrate the recommendations required in this subsection
with the department's existing compliance plans, training efforts, and
other practice improvement and reform initiatives in progress. The
advisory committee shall be responsible for ongoing evaluation of
current and prospective policies and procedures for their contribution
to or effect on racial disproportionality and disparity.
(6) Not later than December 1, 2008, the secretary shall report the
results of the analysis conducted under subsection (2) of this section
and shall describe the remediation plan required under subsection (5)
of this section to the appropriate committees of the legislature with
jurisdiction over policy and fiscal matters relating to children,
families, and human services. Beginning January 1, 2010, the secretary
shall report annually to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on the implementation of the remediation plan, including any measurable
progress made in reducing and eliminating racial disproportionality and
disparity in the state's child welfare system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2009 c 520 s 96 (uncodified); and
(2) 2007 c 465 s 3 (uncodified).

--- END ---