BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This section is the tax preference
performance statement for the tax credit and tax deferral contained in
sections 2 and 3 of this act. This performance statement is only
intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preferences.
It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or
be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(1) The legislature categorizes these tax preferences as intended
to improve industry competitiveness and create or retain jobs, as
indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (b) and (c).
(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
improve industry competitiveness and create or retain more jobs. It is
the legislature's intent to provide a business and occupation tax
credit for high-technology companies performing research and
development and a sales and use tax deferral for certain construction
and equipment purchases for new and expanding high-technology companies
conducting research and development in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, or environmental technology, in order to reduce the
business costs of performing research and development in specified
areas and to reduce the cost of certain construction and equipment
purchases used for research and development, thereby encouraging
investments in research and development, thereby increasing the number
of firms in the industry performing research and development
activities, thereby increasing the number of jobs performing research
and development in the high-technology industry.
(3) If a review finds that the number of businesses participating
in the credit and deferral programs, and the overall number of jobs for
businesses participating in the credit and deferral programs performing
research and development, have increased compared to the number at the
time of enactment, then the legislature intends to extend the
expiration date of the tax preferences.
(4) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in
subsection (3) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review
committee may refer to: (a) Employment data available from the
employment security department; and (b) the North American industrial
code system (NAICS) from the department of revenue.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2010 c 114 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, must be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year may not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount of
tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department must declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department must assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the
credit was claimed, and accrues until the taxes against which the
credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a result of this
section may be claimed by the person who performed the qualified
research and development subject to the limitations set forth in
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(7) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" ((shall have)) has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(8) This section expires ((January)) October 1, 2015.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.63.030 and 2008 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department ((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 RCW or this chapter,
except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) This section ((shall)) expires ((January)) October 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The high-technology research and
development investment work group is established. The work group
consists of the following members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) The director of the department of commerce who must serve as
chair of the work group;
(d) The director of the department of revenue or his or her
designee;
(e) The presidents of the University of Washington and Washington
State University or their designees;
(f)(i) One representative from each of the following industries
appointed by the governor:
(A) Advanced computing;
(B) Advanced materials;
(C) Biotechnology;
(D) Electronic device technology; and
(E) Environmental technology.
(ii) A statewide organization representing each of the industries
listed in this subsection (1)(f) must submit a list of three names to
the governor. The governor must make each appointment from each list
submitted or request the statewide organization to submit a new list
with up to three additional names.
(2)(a) The work group must develop recommendations for the
legislature to improve the competitiveness of the high-technology
research and development industry through investment strategies that
keep the state's tax incentives competitive and support the ongoing
development of a highly trained workforce. At minimum, the
recommendations must include provisions addressing the following:
(i) Ways to better align the technology transformation, research,
and high-demand degree production activities of higher education
institutions with industry spending to bolster increased development of
a high-technology industry within the state, including:
(A) Developing and integrating technology in new or enhanced
products and services, and launching those products and services in
sustainable businesses in Washington state;
(B) Expanding the high-technology research and development
activities at higher education institutions in a manner that will
support the development and commercialization of technology into new
products, processes, applications, materials, or services; and
(C) Expanding and improving the high-demand degree programs offered
at higher education institutions in a manner that supports increased
numbers and efficiency of high-demand degrees produced.
(ii) The design, size, and scope of high-technology research and
development tax preference programs after October 1, 2015.
(b) In developing these recommendations, the work group must
examine current resources devoted to high-technology research and
development tax preferences and determine the best mix of funding to
keep the state's high-technology research and development industry
competitive and to provide a highly trained workforce to support the
industry.
(c) The work group must submit its proposal to the governor and
fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.02565 and 2011 c 23 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used
directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development
operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer
or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a
testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.
(b) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department by rule. The seller must retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts. "Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment
installed and used in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or
research and development operation to prevent air pollution, water
pollution, or contamination that might otherwise result from the
manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development
operation. "Machinery and equipment" also includes digital goods.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:
(i) Hand-powered tools;
(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is
permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and
(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation
that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation if
the machinery and equipment:
(i) Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal
property;
(ii) Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of
tangible personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;
(iii) Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or
tests tangible personal property at the site or away from the site;
(iv) Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal
property;
(v) Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;
(vi) Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in
the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and
development operation;
(vii) Places tangible personal property in the container, package,
or wrapping in which the tangible personal property is normally sold or
transported; or
(viii) Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW
82.63.010.
(d) "Manufacturer" means a person that qualifies as a manufacturer
under RCW 82.04.110. "Manufacturer" also includes a person that prints
newspapers or other materials.
(e) "Manufacturing" means only those activities that come within
the definition of "to manufacture" in RCW 82.04.120 and are taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW, or would
be taxed as such if such activity were conducted in this state or if
not for an exemption or deduction. "Manufacturing" also includes
printing newspapers or other materials. An activity is not taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW if the
activity is within the purview of chapter 82.16 RCW.
(f) "Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles,
substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. A
manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials
enter the manufacturing site and ends at the point where the processed
material leaves the manufacturing site. With respect to the production
of class A or exceptional quality biosolids by a wastewater treatment
facility, the manufacturing operation begins at the point where class
B biosolids undergo additional processing to achieve class A or
exceptional quality standards. Notwithstanding anything to the
contrary in this section, the term also includes that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part. The term does not include the preparation of food
products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.
(g) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical
energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel.
(h) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research
and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or
processor for hire, if the research and development is integral to the
buyer's development of prewritten computer software for sale as a
product or a service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b), or the buyer's
manufacturing operation. For purposes of this section and RCW
82.12.02565, persons engaged in the development of prewritten computer
software that is not transferred to purchasers by means of a tangible
storage media are deemed to be manufacturers.
(i) "Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine
the properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal
property.
(j) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible personal
property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing operation
begins at the point where the tangible personal property enters the
testing site and ends at the point where the tangible personal property
leaves the testing site. The term also includes the testing of
tangible personal property for use in that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral
part. The term does not include the testing of tangible personal
property for use in the production of electricity by a light and power
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of food
products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that this tax preference is
being amended to correct a technical inconsistency, and these
corrections are not intended to create a new or expanded tax preference
under RCW 82.32.805.

--- END ---