BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that according to the
department of health, suicide is the second leading cause of death for
Washington youth between the ages of ten and twenty-four. Suicide
rates among Washington's youth remain higher than the national average.
An increasing body of research shows an association between adverse
childhood experiences such as trauma, violence, or abuse, and decreased
student learning and achievement. Underserved youth populations in
Washington who are not receiving access to state services continue to
remain at risk for suicide.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.288 and 2011 c 185 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
work with state agency and community partners to ((develop pilot
projects to)) assist schools in implementing youth suicide prevention
activities, which may include the following:
(a) Training for school employees, parents, community members, and
students in recognizing and responding to the signs of suicide;
(b) Partnering with local coalitions of community members
interested in preventing youth suicide; and
(c) Responding to communities determined to be in crisis after a
suicide or attempted suicide to prevent further instances of suicide.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, working
with state and community partners, shall prioritize funding
appropriated for subsection (1) of this section to the following
schools and communities:
(a) Schools identified by the department of health as situated in
a high-risk area or in a community with high-risk populations;
(b) Tribal communities; and
(c) Communities with a high percentage of students who speak
English as a second language.

--- END ---