BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter is
subject to civil liability and legal action for damages, to be brought
by any other person claiming that a violation of this chapter injured
his or her property or person. A person so injured is entitled to
actual damages, including mental pain and suffering endured by him or
her on account of a violation of this chapter, plus reasonable
attorneys' fees and court costs.
(2) A conviction for a violation of this chapter is not a condition
precedent to maintenance of a civil action authorized by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW 9.94A.750 and 9.94A.753, and in addition to
any other civil or criminal penalty authorized by law, the court shall
order restitution for any offense under chapter 9.68A RCW.
(2) The order of restitution under this section shall direct the
defendant to pay the victim through appropriate court mechanism the
full amount of the victim's losses as determined by the court pursuant
to subsection (5)(a) of this section.
(3) The issuance of a restitution order under this section is
mandatory. A court may not decline to issue an order under this
section because of the economic circumstances of the defendant or the
fact that the victim has, or is entitled to receive, compensation for
his or her injuries from the proceeds of insurance or another source.
(4) If the defendant participated in the crime with another person
or other persons, all such participants shall be jointly and severally
responsible for the payment of restitution ordered pursuant to this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Full amount of the victim's losses" includes any costs
incurred by the victim for:
(i) Medical services relating to physical, psychiatric, or
psychological care;
(ii) Physical and occupational therapy or rehabilitation;
(iii) Necessary transportation, temporary housing, and child care
expenses;
(iv) Lost income;
(v) Attorneys' fees and other legal costs;
(vi) Any other losses suffered by the victim as a proximate result
of the offense.
(b) "Victim" means the individual harmed as a result of the
commission of a crime under chapter 9.68A RCW including, in the case of
a victim who is under eighteen years of age, incompetent,
incapacitated, or deceased, the legal guardian of the victim or
representative of the victim's estate, another family member, or any
other person appointed as suitable by the court, but in no event shall
the defendant be named as such representative or guardian.

--- END ---