BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that while the college
bound scholarship program was created in 2007, the first cohort of
scholarship recipients entered institutions of higher education in 2013
and emerging data shows that the program is a success. However, the
legislature further finds that the program faces long-term challenges.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a work group to make
recommendations to ensure the program is viable, productive, and
effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A college bound scholarship program
work group is established. The work group shall consist of the
following members:
(i) Two members of the house of representatives, with one member
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(ii) Two members of the senate, with one member representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate;
(iii) One representative of the four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, selected by the presidents of
those institutions;
(iv) One representative of the state's community and technical
college system, selected by the state board for community and technical
colleges;
(v) One representative of a private, nonprofit higher education
institution as defined in RCW 28B.07.020(4), selected by an association
of independent nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions;
(vi) One representative from the student achievement council;
(vii) One representative from a college scholarship organization
that is a private nonprofit corporation registered under Title 24 RCW
and qualified as a tax-exempt entity under section 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code, with expertise in managing scholarships
and college advising; and
(viii) One nonlegislative representative appointed by the governor.
(b) All members must be appointed by June 30, 2014.
(c) The work group shall appoint its own chair and vice chair and
shall meet at least once but no more than five times in 2014.
(d) Legislative members of the work group shall serve without
additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed in accordance with RCW
44.04.120 while attending meetings of the work group. Nonlegislative
members of the work group may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(2) The work group shall submit a report to the governor and the
legislature by December 31, 2014, with recommendations for making the
college bound scholarship program viable, including but not limited to
funding.
(3) Staff support for the work group shall be jointly provided by
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research, with the office of financial management presenting
data as needed.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---