BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington ranks
forty-seventh out of fifty states in the nation in students per
teacher. Further, the legislature finds that reducing class sizes are
critical for students to learn technical skills such as math, science,
technology, and other skills critical for success in the new economy.
Chapter 548, Laws of 2009 and chapter 236, Laws of 2010 revised the
definition of the program of basic education, established new methods
for distributing state funds to school districts to support this
program of basic education, and established a process where the quality
education council and technical working groups would make
recommendations as to the level of resources that would be required to
achieve the state's defined program of basic education by 2018. It is
the intent of the legislature to implement these laws with fidelity in
order to comply with the constitutional requirement to amply fund basic
education and comply with the Washington supreme court decision in
McCleary v. the State of Washington.
It is the intent of the legislature to define a fully implemented
prototypical school model for the 2017-18 school year. The legislature
intends to achieve this vision through annual improvements in staffing
levels, with a priority on staffing schools with a high level of
poverty students first. The legislature further intends that these
annual improvements serve as benchmarks for investments in basic
education that may be used to assist the Washington supreme court to
determine the adequacy of progress in addressing the state's paramount
duty in accordance with the McCleary decision.
It is the intent of the legislature that these annual investments
to lower class sizes and increase school staffing will increase student
opportunities to receive a basic education as well as improve student
performance and graduation rates.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . ((25.23)) 17.0
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . ((27.00)) 25.0
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . ((27.00)) 25.0
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . ((28.53)) 25.0
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . ((28.74)) 25.0

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . ((26.57)) 19.0
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . ((22.76)) 16.0

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify((:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii))) a specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(e) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:
General education average
class size in
high poverty
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 15.0
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.0
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 23.0
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 23.0
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 23.0

(f)(i) Funding for average class sizes in this subsection (4) shall
be provided only to the extent of, and proportionate to, the school
district's demonstrated actual average class size, up to the funded
class sizes.
(ii) Districts that demonstrate capital facility needs that prevent
them from reducing actual class sizes to funded levels, may use funding
in this subsection (4) for school based-personnel who provide direct
services to students. Districts that use this funding for purposes
other than reducing actual class sizes must annually report the number
and dollar value for each type of personnel funded by school and grade
level.
(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop rules to implement this subsection (4).
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
((1.253))
1.3
((1.353))
1.4
((1.880))
1.9

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
((0.663))
1.0
((0.519))
1.0
((0.523))
1.0

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.076))
0.585 ((0.060))
0.888 ((0.096))
0.824

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.042))
0.311 ((0.006))
0.088 ((0.015))
0.127

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.017))
0.104 ((0.002))
0.024 ((0.007))
0.049

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
((0.493))
0.50
((1.116))
2.0
((1.909))
3.5

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
((0.936))
2.0
((0.700))
1.0
((0.652))
1.0

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . ((2.012))
3.0 ((2.325))
3.5 ((3.269))
3.5

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . ((1.657))
1.7 ((1.942))
2.0 ((2.965))
3.0

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.079))
0.0 ((0.092))
0.7 ((0.141))
1.3

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.00))
1.0 ((0.00))
1.0 ((0.00))
1.0

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.628)) 2.8
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . ((1.813)) 4.0
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.332)) 1.9

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
In order to make measurable progress toward implementing the
provisions of section 2, chapter ..., Laws of 2014 (section 2 of this
act) by September 1, 2017, the legislature shall increase state funding
allocations under RCW 28A.150.260 according to the following schedule:
(1) For the 2015-2017 biennium, funding allocations shall be no
less than fifty percent of the difference between the funding necessary
to support the numerical values under RCW 28A.150.260 as of September
1, 2013, and the funding necessary to support the numerical values
under section 2, chapter ..., Laws of 2014 (section 2 of this act),
with priority for additional funding provided during this biennium for
the highest poverty schools and school districts;
(2) By the end of the 2017-2019 biennium and thereafter, funding
allocations shall be no less than the funding necessary to support the
numerical values under section 2, chapter ..., Laws of 2014 (section 2
of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect September
1, 2018.

--- END ---