BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.285 and 2013 c 23 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((By August 1, 2011,)) Each school district ((shall adopt or
amend if necessary)) must have a policy and procedure that at a minimum
incorporates the revised model policy and procedure provided under
subsection (4) of this section that prohibits the harassment,
intimidation, or bullying of any student. It is the responsibility of
each school district to share this policy with parents or guardians,
students, volunteers, and school employees in accordance with rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Each school
district shall designate one person in the district as the primary
contact regarding the antiharassment, intimidation, cyberbullying, or
bullying policy. The primary contact shall receive copies of all
formal and informal complaints, have responsibility for assuring the
implementation of the policy and procedure, and serve as the primary
contact on the policy and procedures between the school district, the
office of the education ombuds, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The primary contact from each school district
shall attend at least one training class as provided in subsection (6)
of this section, once this training is available.
(2) "Harassment, intimidation, or bullying" means any intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act, including but not limited
to one shown to be motivated by any characteristic in RCW 9A.36.080(3),
or other distinguishing characteristics, when the intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act:
(a) Physically or emotionally harms a student or damages the
student's property; or
(b) Has the effect of substantially interfering with a student's
education; or
(c) Is so severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates an
intimidating or threatening educational environment; or
(d) Has the effect of substantially disrupting the orderly
operation of the school.
Nothing in this section requires the affected student to actually
possess a characteristic that is a basis for the harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(3) The policy and procedure should be adopted or amended through
a process that includes representation of parents or guardians, school
employees, volunteers, students, administrators, and community
representatives. It is recommended that each such policy emphasize
positive character traits and values, including the importance of civil
and respectful speech and conduct, and the responsibility of students
to comply with the district's policy prohibiting harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(4)(a) ((By August 1, 2010, the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with representatives of parents, school
personnel, the office of the education ombuds, the Washington state
school directors' association, and other interested parties, shall
provide to the education committees of the legislature a revised and
updated model harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy
and procedure.)) The superintendent of public instruction shall
publish on its web site, with a link to the safety center web page,
((the revised and updated)) a model harassment, intimidation, and
bullying prevention policy and procedure, along with training and
instructional materials on the components that shall be included in any
district policy and procedure. The superintendent shall adopt rules
regarding school districts' communication of the policy and procedure
to parents, students, employees, and volunteers.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction has the
authority to update with new technologies access to this information in
the safety center, to the extent resources are made available.
(c) Each school district shall by August 15, 2011, provide to the
superintendent of public instruction a brief summary of its policies,
procedures, programs, partnerships, vendors, and instructional and
training materials to be posted on the school safety center web site,
and shall also provide the superintendent with a link to the school
district's web site for further information. The district's primary
contact for bullying and harassment issues shall annually by August
15th verify posted information and links and notify the school safety
center of any updates or changes.
(5) The Washington state school directors' association((, with the
assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall convene an advisory committee to develop a)), in consultation
with the office of education ombuds and other organizations with
expertise on the civil liberties of students, shall update its model
policy prohibiting acts of harassment, intimidation, or bullying that
are conducted via electronic means, also known as cyberbullying, by a
student while on school grounds and during the school day. The updated
model policy shall provide guidance to school districts on how to
enforce cyberbullying policies without violating the privacy, free
speech, and other rights of students. The policy shall include a
requirement that materials meant to educate parents and students about
the seriousness of cyberbullying be disseminated to parents or made
available on the school district's web site. The most up-to-date model
policy must be made available in all school districts' student
handbooks. The school directors' association ((and the advisory
committee shall develop)) shall update sample materials for school
districts to disseminate, which shall also include information on
responsible and safe internet use as well as what options are available
if a student is being bullied via electronic means including, but not
limited to, reporting threats to local police and when to involve
school officials, the internet service provider, or phone service
provider. The school directors' association shall submit the model
policy and sample materials, along with a recommendation for local
adoption, to the governor and the legislature and shall post the model
policy and sample materials on its web site by January 1, ((2008))
2015. Each school district board of directors shall ((establish))
update its own policy by August 1, ((2008)) 2015.
(6) By December 31, 2014, educational service districts must
develop a training class for those people in their school districts who
act as the primary contact regarding the antiharassment, intimidation,
cyberbullying, or bullying policy as provided in subsection (1) of this
section. The training class must be offered on an annual basis by
educational service districts. The training class must be based on the
model policy as provided in subsection (4) of this section; as well as
preexisting resources, trainings, and videos provided on the office of
the superintendent of public instruction's web site; and include
materials related to hazing.
(7) As used in this section, "electronic" or "electronic means"
means any communication where there is the transmission of information
by wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means.

--- END ---