BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
appropriately tax natural gas, the sale of compressed natural gas, or
liquefied natural gas, for use as transportation fuel by a motor
vehicle. Current practice taxes natural gas as a traditional home
heating or electric generation fuel while not taking into account the
benefits of natural gas use as a transportation fuel. This act is
intended to clarify for future use the appropriate taxation of natural
gas, when used as a transportation fuel, in a manner similar to
gasoline and diesel. In addition, this act is intended to establish a
comprehensive method of taxation that treats all entities engaged in
the business of manufacturing and selling natural gas as a
transportation fuel identically, regardless of whether the taxpayer is
a gas distribution business or not, so as to prevent any particular
entity from receiving a competitive advantage by this act. Use of
compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas will provide
environmental benefits to the citizens of Washington and spur economic
development across the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.38.030 and 2013 c 225 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and imposed upon fuel licensees a tax at the
rate of twenty-three cents per each gallon of fuel((, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas)), measured at standard
pressure and temperature.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of five cents per each gallon of fuel((, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas)), measured at standard pressure and
temperature is imposed on fuel licensees. This subsection (2) expires
when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per each gallon of fuel((, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas)), measured at standard pressure and
temperature is imposed on fuel licensees.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per each gallon of fuel((, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas)), measured at standard pressure and
temperature is imposed on fuel licensees.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of two cents per each gallon of fuel((, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas)), measured at standard pressure and
temperature is imposed on fuel licensees.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of one and one-half cents per each gallon of fuel((, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas)), measured at standard
pressure and temperature is imposed on fuel licensees.
(7) Taxes are imposed when:
(a) Fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the fuel is
removed at the rack unless the removal is by a licensed supplier or
distributor for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state,
or the removal is by a fuel supplier for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either of the
following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensed supplier; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed supplier or distributor for direct delivery to a destination
outside of the state, or the removal is to a licensed supplier for
direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under
RCW 82.38.320;
(c) Fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use, or
storage, unless the fuel enters this state for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320, if
either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensed supplier; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Fuel enters this state by means outside the bulk transfer-terminal system and is delivered directly to a licensed terminal unless
the owner is a licensed distributor or supplier;
(e) Fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity
unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the fuel;
(f) Blended fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of
the fuel. The number of gallons of blended fuel subject to tax is the
difference between the total number of gallons of blended fuel removed
or sold and the number of gallons of previously taxed fuel used to
produce the blended fuel;
(g) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the
internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the fuel tax;
(h) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter;
(i) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(j) Fuel is sold by a licensed fuel supplier to a fuel distributor
or fuel blender and the fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.38.075 and 2013 c 225 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To encourage the use of nonpolluting fuels, an annual license
fee in lieu of the tax imposed by RCW 82.38.030 is imposed upon the use
of liquefied natural gas, compressed natural gas, or propane used in
any motor vehicle. The annual license fee must be based upon the
following schedule and formula:

VEHICLE TONNAGE (GVW) FEE

0 - 6,000 $ 45

6,001 - 10,000 $ 45

10,001 - 18,000 $ 80

18,001 - 28,000 $110

28,001 - 36,000 $150

36,001 and above $250

(2) To determine the annual license fee for a registration year,
the appropriate dollar amount in the schedule is multiplied by the fuel
tax rate per gallon effective on July 1st of the preceding calendar
year and the product is divided by 12 cents.
(3) The department, in addition to the resulting fee, must charge
an additional fee of five dollars as a handling charge for each license
issued.
(4) The vehicle tonnage fee must be prorated so the annual license
will correspond with the staggered vehicle licensing system.
(5) A decal or other identifying device issued upon payment of the
annual fee must be displayed as prescribed by the department as
authority to purchase this fuel.
(6) Persons selling or dispensing natural gas or propane may not
sell or dispense this fuel for their own use or the use of others into
tanks of vehicles powered by this fuel which do not display a valid
decal or other identifying device.
(7) Commercial motor vehicles registered in a foreign jurisdiction
under the provisions of the international registration plan are subject
to the annual fee.
(8) Motor vehicles registered in a foreign jurisdiction, except
those registered under the international registration plan under
chapter 46.87 RCW, are exempt from this section.
(9) Vehicles registered in jurisdictions outside the state of
Washington are exempt from this section.
(((8))) (10) Any person selling or dispensing liquefied natural
gas, compressed natural gas, or propane into the tank of a motor
vehicle powered by this fuel, except as prescribed in this chapter, is
subject to the penalty provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.80.010 and 2013 c 225 s 641 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((For purposes of this section:)) The definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020((, respectively,)) and sells or
distributes the fuel into a county((;)).
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide
((motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.38.030 on each gallon of
motor vehicle fuel)) fuel tax rates under RCW 82.38.030 on motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 and on each
gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the
boundaries of the county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under
RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election
held under this section must be held not more than twelve months before
the date on which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting
forth the proposition must state the tax rate that is proposed. The
county's authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section
includes the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapter 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not
be levied less than one month from the date the election results are
certified by the county election officer. The commencement date for
the levy of any tax under this section must be the first day of
January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on ((each gallon of))
motor vehicle fuel and on ((each gallon of)) special fuel is imposed
upon the distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county must contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer must distribute monthly to the levying
county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the additional
excise taxes collected under this section, after the deductions for
payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b)
and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW 82.80.080.
(8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this
section must be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance
with RCW 82.80.070.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in RCW 82.80.110 or if they are a member of a regional
transportation investment district levying the tax in RCW 82.80.120.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.80.110 and 2013 c 225 s 642 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((For purposes of this section:)) The definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020((, respectively,)) and sells or
distributes the fuel into a county((;)).
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) For purposes of dedication to a regional transportation
investment district plan under chapter 36.120 RCW, subject to the
conditions of this section, a county may levy additional excise taxes
equal to ten percent of the statewide ((motor vehicle fuel tax rate
under RCW 82.38.030 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in
RCW 82.38.020 and on each gallon of special fuel)) fuel tax rates under
RCW 82.38.030 on motor vehicle fuel and special fuel as defined in RCW
((82.32.020 [82.38.020])) 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
county. The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of the
county's legislative body and a majority of the registered voters of
the county voting on the proposition at a general or special election.
An election held under this section must be held not more than twelve
months before the date on which the proposed tax is to be levied. The
ballot setting forth the proposition must state that the revenues from
the tax will be used for a regional transportation investment district
plan. The county's authority to levy additional excise taxes under
this section includes the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the
county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are
exempt from the county fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes
are subject to the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable
to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under
chapter 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one
month from the date the election results are certified by the county
election officer. The commencement date for the levy of any tax under
this section will be the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on ((each gallon of))
motor vehicle fuel and on ((each gallon of)) special fuel is imposed
upon the distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county must contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer must distribute monthly to the county
levying the tax as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
after the deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW
46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a county in this
section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation investment
plan, must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW, but only for
those areas that are considered "highway purposes" as that term is
construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are a
member of a regional transportation investment district that is levying
the tax in RCW 82.80.120 or the county is levying the tax in RCW
82.80.010.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.80.120 and 2013 c 225 s 643 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((For purposes of this section:)) The definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020((, respectively,)) and sells or
distributes the fuel into a county((;)).
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030;
(c) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW, subject to the conditions of this section, may levy
additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.38.030 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
district. The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of a
majority of the voters within the district boundaries. Vehicles paying
an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapter 82.38
RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month from the
date the election results are certified. The commencement date for the
levy of any tax under this section will be the first day of January,
April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on ((each gallon of))
motor vehicle fuel and on ((each gallon of)) special fuel is imposed
upon the distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district must contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer must distribute monthly to the district
levying the tax as part of the regional transportation investment
district plan, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as
provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan, must be used in accordance with chapter
36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(9) A district may only levy the tax under this section if the
district is comprised of boundaries identical to the boundaries of a
county or counties. A district may not levy the tax in this section if
a member county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010 or 82.80.110.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.47.010 and 1998 c 176 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Motor vehicle fuel" has the meaning given in RCW 82.36.010.
(2) "Special fuel" has the meaning given in RCW 82.38.020.
(3) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given in RCW 82.36.010.))
For purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, "fuel," "motor vehicle fuel," "special fuel," and "motor
vehicle" have the meaning given in RCW 82.38.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to sales by a gas
distribution business of:
(a) Compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas, where the
compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas is to be sold or used
as transportation fuel; or
(b) Natural gas from which the buyer manufactures compressed
natural gas or liquefied natural gas, where the compressed natural gas
or liquefied natural gas is to be sold or used as transportation fuel.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "transportation fuel" means
fuel for the generation of power to propel a motor vehicle as defined
in RCW 46.04.320, a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310, or a locomotive
or railroad car.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.16A.060 and 2011 c 114 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director may not issue or renew a motor vehicle
registration or change the registered owner of a registered vehicle for
any motor vehicle required to be inspected under chapter 70.120 RCW,
unless the application for issuance or renewal is: (a) Accompanied by
a valid certificate of compliance or a valid certificate of acceptance
issued as required under chapter 70.120 RCW; or (b) exempt, as
described in subsection (2) of this section. The certificates must
have a date of validation that is within twelve months of the assigned
registration renewal date. Certificates for fleet or owner tested
diesel vehicles may have a date of validation that is within twelve
months of the assigned registration renewal date.
(2) The following motor vehicles are exempt from emission test
requirements:
(a) Motor vehicles that are less than five years old or more than
twenty-five years old;
(b) Motor vehicles that are a 2009 model year or newer;
(c) Motor vehicles powered exclusively by electricity, propane,
compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or liquid petroleum gas;
(d) Motorcycles as defined in RCW 46.04.330 and motor-driven cycles
as defined in RCW 46.04.332;
(e) Farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.181;
(f) Street rod vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.572 and custom
vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.161;
(g) Used vehicles that are offered for sale by a motor vehicle
dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;
(h) Classes of motor vehicles exempted by the director of the
department of ecology; and
(i) Hybrid motor vehicles that obtain a rating by the environmental
protection agency of at least fifty miles per gallon of gas during city
driving. For purposes of this section, a hybrid motor vehicle is one
that uses propulsion units powered by both electricity and gas.
(3) The department of ecology ((shall)) must provide information to
motor vehicle owners:
(a) Regarding the boundaries of emission contributing areas and
restrictions established under this section that apply to vehicles
registered in such areas; and
(b) On the relationship between motor vehicles and air pollution
and steps motor vehicle owners should take to reduce motor vehicle
related air pollution.
(4) The department of licensing ((shall)) must:
(a) Notify all registered motor vehicle owners affected by the
emission testing program that they must have an emission test to renew
their registration;
(b) Adopt rules implementing and enforcing this section, except for
subsection (2)(e) of this section, as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) A motor vehicle may not be registered, leased, rented, or sold
for use in the state, starting with the model year as provided in RCW
70.120A.010, unless the vehicle:
(a) Has seven thousand five hundred miles or more; or
(b)(i) Is consistent with the vehicle emission standards and carbon
dioxide equivalent emission standards adopted by the department of
ecology; and
(ii) Has a California certification label for all emission
standards, and carbon dioxide equivalent emission standards necessary
to meet fleet average requirements.
(6) The department of licensing, in consultation with the
department of ecology, may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section and may provide for reasonable exemptions to these
requirements. The department of ecology may exempt public safety
vehicles from meeting the standards where the department finds that
vehicles necessary to meet the needs of public safety agencies are not
otherwise reasonably available.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.37.467 and 1995 c 369 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every automobile, truck, motorcycle, motor home, or off-road
vehicle that is fueled by an alternative fuel source ((shall)) must
bear a reflective placard issued by the national fire protection
association indicating that the vehicle is so fueled. Violation of
this subsection is a traffic infraction.
(2) As used in this section "alternative fuel source" includes
propane, compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, liquid
petroleum gas, or any chemically similar gas but does not include
gasoline or diesel fuel.
(3) If a placard for a specific alternative fuel source has not
been issued by the national fire protection association, a placard
issued by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, shall be required. The chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection,
((shall)) must develop rules for the design, size, and placement of the
placard which ((shall)) remains effective until a specific placard is
issued by the national fire protection association.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.04.310 and 2007 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to any person in respect
to a business activity with respect to which tax liability is
specifically imposed under the provisions of chapter 82.16 RCW
including amounts derived from activities for which a deduction is
allowed under RCW 82.16.050. The exemption in this subsection does not
apply to sales of natural gas, including compressed natural gas and
liquefied natural gas, by a gas distribution business, if such sales
are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.16 RCW as provided in
section 8 of this act.
(2) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by any person
for the sale of electrical energy for resale within or outside the
state.
(3)(a) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by any
person for the sale of natural or manufactured gas in a calendar year
if that person sells within the United States a total amount of natural
or manufactured gas in that calendar year that is no more than twenty
percent of the amount of natural or manufactured gas that it consumes
within the United States in the same calendar year.
(b) For purposes of determining whether a person has sold within
the United States a total amount of natural or manufactured gas in a
calendar year that is no more than twenty percent of the amount of
natural or manufactured gas that it consumes within the United States
in the same calendar year, the following transfers of gas are not
considered to be the sale of natural or manufactured gas:
(i) The transfer of any natural or manufactured gas as a result of
the acquisition of another business, through merger or otherwise; or
(ii) The transfer of any natural or manufactured gas accomplished
solely to comply with federal regulatory requirements imposed on the
pipeline transportation of such gas when it is shipped by a third-party
manager of a person's pipeline transportation.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.04.120 and 2011 c 23 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "To manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or
machinery, to materials so that as a result thereof a new, different or
useful substance or article of tangible personal property is produced
for sale or commercial or industrial use, and includes:
(a) The production or fabrication of special made or custom made
articles;
(b) The production or fabrication of dental appliances, devices,
restorations, substitutes, or other dental laboratory products by a
dental laboratory or dental technician;
(c) Cutting, delimbing, and measuring of felled, cut, or taken
trees; ((and))
(d) Crushing and/or blending of rock, sand, stone, gravel, or ore;
and
(e) The production of compressed natural gas or liquefied natural
gas for use as a transportation fuel as defined in section 8 of this
act.
(2) "To manufacture" does not include:
(a) Conditioning of seed for use in planting; cubing hay or
alfalfa;
(b) Activities which consist of cutting, grading, or ice glazing
seafood which has been cooked, frozen, or canned outside this state;
(c) The growing, harvesting, or producing of agricultural products;
(d) Packing of agricultural products, including sorting, washing,
rinsing, grading, waxing, treating with fungicide, packaging, chilling,
or placing in controlled atmospheric storage;
(e) The production of digital goods;
(f) The production of computer software if the computer software is
delivered from the seller to the purchaser by means other than tangible
storage media, including the delivery by use of a tangible storage
media where the tangible storage media is not physically transferred to
the purchaser; and
(g) Except as provided in subsection (1)(e) of this section, any
activity that is integral to any public service business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010 and with respect to which the gross income associated
with such activity: (i) Is subject to tax under chapter 82.16 RCW; or
(ii) would be subject to tax under chapter 82.16 RCW if such activity
were conducted in this state or if not for an exemption or deduction.
(3) With respect to wastewater treatment facilities:
(a) "To manufacture" does not include the treatment of wastewater,
the production of reclaimed water, and the production of class B
biosolids; and
(b) "To manufacture" does include the production of class A or
exceptional quality biosolids, but only with respect to the processing
activities that occur after the biosolids have reached class B
standards.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.12.022 and 2011 c 174 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A use tax is levied on every person in this state for the
privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas, including
compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, within this state as
a consumer.
(2) The tax must be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in
effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under
RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any
amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(2) in transporting the gas subject
to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under
that chapter.
(3) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means
than through a pipeline.
(4) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the
consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for
which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(5)(a) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is
defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2017.
(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(6) The tax imposed by this section does not apply to the use of
natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the
consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in section 8
of this act.
(7) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in
an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by
another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought
under this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect
to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.
(((7))) (8) The use tax imposed in this section must be paid by the
consumer to the department.
(((8))) (9) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person
who delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the
department. Such report must contain the volume of gas delivered, name
of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as the
department may require by rule.
(((9))) (10) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter
384, Laws of 1989.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.14.230 and 2010 c 127 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing body of any city, while not required by
legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the
purposes authorized by this chapter, fix and impose on every person a
use tax for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas in
the city as a consumer.
(2) The tax is imposed in an amount equal to the value of the
article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the
tax on natural gas businesses under RCW 35.21.870 in the city in which
the article is used. The "value of the article used," does not include
any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a natural gas business
in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those
amounts are subject to tax under RCW 35.21.870.
(3) The tax imposed under this section does not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the
consumer has paid a tax under RCW 35.21.870 with respect to the gas for
which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(4) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in
an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 35.21.870 by
another municipality or other unit of local government with respect to
the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another municipality or
other unit of local government with respect to the gas for which a
credit is sought under this subsection.
(5) The use tax imposed must be paid by the consumer. The
administration and collection of the tax imposed is pursuant to RCW
82.14.050.
(6) The tax authorized by this section does not apply to the use of
natural gas, compressed natural gas, or liquefied natural gas, if the
consumer uses the gas for transportation fuel as defined in section 8
of this act.

Sec. 15 RCW 35.21.870 and 1984 c 225 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No city or town may impose a tax on the privilege of conducting
an electrical energy, natural gas, steam energy, or telephone business
at a rate which exceeds six percent unless the rate is first approved
by a majority of the voters of the city or town voting on such a
proposition.
(2)(a) If a city or town is imposing a rate of tax under subsection
(1) of this section in excess of six percent on April 20, 1982, the
city or town shall decrease the rate to a rate of six percent or less
by reducing the rate each year on or before November 1st by ordinances
to be effective on January 1st of the succeeding year, by an amount
equal to one-tenth the difference between the tax rate on April 20,
1982, and six percent.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a city or town from
reducing its rates by amounts greater than the amounts required in this
subsection.
(3) Voter approved rate increases under subsection (1) of this
section ((shall)) may not be included in the computations under this
subsection.
(4) No city or town may impose a tax on the privilege of conducting
a natural gas business with respect to sales that are exempt from the
tax imposed under chapter 82.16 RCW as provided in section 8 of this
act at a rate higher than its business and occupation tax rate on the
sale of tangible personal property or, if the city or town does not
impose a business and occupation tax on the sale of tangible personal
property, at a rate greater than .002.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.14.030 and 2008 c 86 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing body of any county or city, while not required by
legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the
purposes authorized by this chapter, impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such tax ((shall)) must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county or city as the case may be. ((Except as provided in
RCW 82.14.230,)) This sales and use tax ((shall)) does not apply to
natural or manufactured gas, except for natural gas that is used as a
transportation fuel as defined in section 8 of this act and is taxable
by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of such tax
imposed by a county ((shall be)) is five-tenths of one percent of the
selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used
(in the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax imposed by a city
((shall)) may not exceed five-tenths of one percent of the selling
price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the
case of a use tax). However, in the event a county imposes a sales and
use tax under this subsection, the rate of such tax imposed under this
subsection by any city therein ((shall)) may not exceed four hundred
and twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent.
(2) In addition to the tax authorized in subsection (1) of this
section, the governing body of any county or city may by resolution or
ordinance impose an additional sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. Such additional tax ((shall)) must be collected
upon the same taxable events upon which the tax imposed under
subsection (1) of this section is imposed. The rate of such additional
tax imposed by a county ((shall be)) is up to five-tenths of one
percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of
the article used (in the case of a use tax). The rate of such
additional tax imposed by a city ((shall be)) is up to five-tenths of
one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value
of the article used (in the case of a use tax). However, in the event
a county imposes a sales and use tax under the authority of this
subsection at a rate equal to or greater than the rate imposed under
the authority of this subsection by a city within the county, the
county ((shall)) must receive fifteen percent of the city tax. In the
event that the county imposes a sales and use tax under the authority
of this subsection at a rate which is less than the rate imposed under
this subsection by a city within the county, the county shall receive
that amount of revenues from the city tax equal to fifteen percent of
the rate of tax imposed by the county under the authority of this
subsection. The authority to impose a tax under this subsection is
intended in part to compensate local government for any losses from the
phase-out of the property tax on business inventories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The department of licensing must convene a
work group that includes, at a minimum, representatives from the
department of transportation, the trucking industry, manufacturers of
compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas, and any other
stakeholders as deemed necessary, for the following purposes:
(1) To evaluate the annual license fee in lieu of fuel tax under
RCW 82.38.075 to determine a fee that more closely represents the
average consumption of vehicles by weight and to make recommendations
to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2014, on an updated fee schedule.
(2) To develop a transition plan to move vehicles powered by
liquefied natural gas, compressed natural gas, and propane from the
annual license fee in lieu of fuel tax to the fuel tax under RCW
82.38.030. The transition plan must incorporate stakeholder feedback
and must include draft legislation and cost and revenue estimates. The
transition plan must be submitted to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act is not subject to RCW 82.32.805
and 82.32.808.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 2 through 16 and 18 of this act
take effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---