BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.12.175 and 2011 c 292 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the
interests of a minor or dependent child when the court believes the
appointment of a guardian ad litem is necessary to protect the best
interests of the child in any proceeding under this chapter. The court
((may)) shall only appoint a guardian ad litem from the guardian ad
litem program or court-appointed special advocate program((, if that
program exists in the county)). The court shall attempt to match a
child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has specific
training or education related to the child's individual needs. The
family court services professionals may also make a recommendation to
the court regarding whether a guardian ad litem should be appointed for
the child.
(b) The guardian ad litem's role is to investigate and report
factual information regarding the issues ordered to be reported or
investigated to the court. The guardian ad litem shall always
represent the best interests of the child. Guardians ad litem under
this title may make recommendations based upon his or her
investigation, which the court may consider and weigh in conjunction
with the recommendations of all of the parties. However, all
recommendations must be substantiated through accurate factual
information and may only be made according to the guardian ad litem's
training and licensing. A guardian ad litem may not make
recommendations based upon mental health, physical health, or other
special circumstance without the aid of a licensed professional for
that field of study. The court shall strike all nonprofessional
recommendations from the guardian ad litem report. If a child
expresses a preference regarding the parenting plan, the guardian ad
litem shall report the preferences to the court, together with the
facts relative to whether any preferences are being expressed
voluntarily and the degree of the child's understanding. The court
((may)) shall require the guardian ad litem to provide periodic reports
to the parties regarding the status of his or her investigation. The
guardian ad litem shall file his or her report at least sixty days
prior to trial.
(c) The parties to the proceeding may file with the court written
responses to any report filed by the guardian ad litem. The court
shall consider any written responses to a report filed by the guardian
ad litem, including any factual information or recommendations provided
in the report. The court may not adopt or act upon the guardian ad
litem report or recommendations prior to each party to the proceeding
having at least thirty days to respond to any report or recommendation
filed by the guardian ad litem.
(d) The court shall enter an order for costs, fees, and
disbursements to cover the costs of the guardian ad litem. The court
may order either or both parents to pay for the costs of the guardian
ad litem, according to their ability to pay. If both parents are
indigent, the county shall bear the cost of the guardian, subject to
appropriation for guardians' ad litem services by the county
legislative authority. Guardians ad litem who are not volunteers shall
provide the parties and court with an itemized accounting of their time
and billing for services each month. The court may not award fees for
services rendered without the guardian ad litem first submitting an
itemized accounting of his or her time and billing.
(2)(a) ((If the guardian ad litem appointed is from the county
court-appointed special advocate program,)) The program shall supervise
any guardian ad litem assigned to the case. The court-appointed
special advocate program shall be entitled to notice of all proceedings
in the case.
(b) The legislative authority of each county may authorize creation
of a court-appointed special advocate program. The county legislative
authority ((may)) shall adopt rules of eligibility for court-appointed
special advocate program services that are ((not inconsistent))
consistent with this section.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad
litem and each court-appointed special advocate program shall maintain
a background information record for each guardian ad litem in the
program. The background information record shall include, but is not
limited to, the following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in dissolution, custody, paternity, and other family law
proceedings;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and county or
counties of appointment;
(g) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause;
(h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(i) The results of an examination that shall consist of a
background check as allowed through the Washington state criminal
records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050 and the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834.
This background check shall be done through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification section; and
(j) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information record shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. ((If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program the person appointed as guardian ad litem shall provide the
background information record to the court.))
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, court-appointed special
advocate program or guardian ad litem program, shall provide the
parties or their attorneys with a copy of the background information
record. The portion of the background information record containing
the results of the criminal background check and the criminal history
shall ((not)) be disclosed to the parties ((or)) and their attorneys.
The background information record shall not include identifying
information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem, such as home
addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer guardians ad
litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or pseudonyms as
necessary for their safety.
(4) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends. The court shall immediately appoint
the person recommended by the program.
(5) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.12.177 and 2011 c 292 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All guardians ad litem appointed under this title must comply
with the training requirements established under RCW 2.56.030(15),
prior to their appointment in cases under Title 26 RCW, except that
volunteer guardians ad litem or court-appointed special advocates may
comply with alternative training requirements approved by the
administrative office of the courts that meet or exceed the statewide
requirements. In cases involving allegations of limiting factors under
RCW 26.09.191, the guardians ad litem appointed under this title must
have additional relevant training under RCW 2.56.030(15) ((when it is
available)).
(2)(a) Each guardian ad litem program ((for compensated guardians
ad litem)) shall establish a rotational registry system for the
appointment of guardians ad litem under this title. ((If a judicial
district does not have a program the court shall establish the
rotational registry system.)) Guardians ad litem under this title
shall be selected from the registry ((except in exceptional
circumstances as determined and documented by the court)). Cases
involving mental or physical health, limiting factors under RCW
26.09.191, or other issues outside of the guardian ad litem licensing
must have a licensed professional for that field appointed to assist
the court in examining potential long-term effects on ability to
parent. The parties may make a joint recommendation for the
appointment of a guardian ad litem from the registry.
(b) In judicial districts with a population over one hundred
thousand, a list of three names shall be selected from the registry and
given to the parties and presiding judge or commissioner along with the
background information record as specified in RCW 26.12.175(3),
including their hourly rate for services. Each party may, within three
judicial days, strike one name from the list. If more than one name
remains on the list, the court shall make the appointment from the
names on the list. In the event all three names are stricken the
person whose name appears next on the registry shall be appointed.
(c) If a party reasonably believes that the appointed guardian ad
litem is inappropriate or unqualified, charges an hourly rate higher
than what is reasonable for the particular proceeding, or has a
conflict of interest, the party may, within three judicial days from
the appointment, move for substitution of the appointed guardian ad
litem by filing a motion with the court. Guardians ad litem must
notify each party and court of any actual or potential conflicts of
interest prior to accepting appointment. Failure to do so results in
immediate dismissal of the guardian ad litem and all reports and
documents from the court case. A party knowingly withholding conflict
of interest information is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(d) Under this section, within either registry referred to in (a)
of this subsection, a subregistry may be created that consists of
guardians ad litem under contract with the department of social and
health services' division of child support. Guardians ad litem on such
a subregistry shall be selected and appointed in state-initiated
paternity cases only. Guardians ad litem must notify each party and
court of any actual or potential conflicts of interest prior to
accepting appointment. Failure to do so results in immediate dismissal
of the guardian ad litem and all reports and documents from the court
case. A party knowingly withholding conflict of interest information
is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(e) The superior court shall remove any person from the guardian ad
litem registry who has been found to have misrepresented his or her
qualifications.
(((3) The rotational registry system shall not apply to court-appointed special advocate programs.))

Sec. 3 RCW 26.12.183 and 2000 c 124 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for guardians ad litem appointed by the court from the
subregistry created under RCW 26.12.177(2)(d), the court shall specify
the hourly rate the guardian ad litem or investigator under this title
may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum
amount the guardian ad litem or investigator under this title may
charge without additional court review and approval. The court shall
specify rates and fees in the order of appointment or at the earliest
date the court is able to determine the appropriate rates and fees and
prior to the guardian ad litem billing for his or her services. ((This
section shall apply except as provided by local court rule.))

--- END ---