BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A state officer as defined in RCW
42.52.010 may establish an ethics defense trust fund and name a trustee
if the state officer is subject to a complaint for an ethics violation
filed or issued under this chapter relating to the state officer's
official duties.
(b) For the purposes of this section and sections 2 through 4 of
this act, "official duties" include, but are not limited to, all
activities prescribed in the state Constitution and state statutes,
legislatively funded or mandated authority and responsibilities, job
description, or any tasks, activities, or actions related to carrying
out the duties of the state officer's position that are intended to
protect, promote, educate, and serve the citizens of the state of
Washington.
(2)(a) The proceeds of the trust fund may be used to:
(i) Defray legal expenses and pay monetary penalties incurred by
the state officer as a result of a complaint filed or issued for an
ethics violation under this chapter or an internal legislative
investigatory proceeding;
(ii) Defray costs reasonably incurred in administering the trust
fund, including but not limited to costs incident to the solicitation
of funds; and
(iii) Discharge any tax liabilities incurred as a result of the
creation, operation, or administration of the trust fund.
(b) The proceeds of a trust fund may also be used to defray or
discharge legal expenses, penalties, costs, or liabilities incurred
before the trust fund was established if the legal expenses, penalties,
costs, or liabilities are related to the complaint proceedings for
which the trust fund was established.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the state
officer may not use proceeds from the trust fund for any personal use.
(4) A state officer may not establish or maintain more than one
ethics defense trust fund at any one time.
(5) Chapter 11.98 RCW does not apply to a trust fund established
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The trustee of an ethics defense trust
fund is responsible for:
(a) The receipt and deposit of contributions to the trust fund;
(b) The authorization of expenditures and disbursements from the
trust fund;
(c) The performance of other tasks incident to the administration
of the trust fund.
(2)(a) A trustee of an ethics defense trust fund shall establish a
single exclusive account in a depository, as defined in RCW 42.17A.005.
The depository must be located in this state and must ordinarily
conduct business with the general public in this state.
(b) The trustee shall maintain the account in the name of the trust
fund.
(c) All expenditures made by the trustee shall be drawn from the
account and:
(i) Issued on a check signed by the trustee; or
(ii) Paid using a debit card or other form of electronic
transaction.
(d) A contribution received by a trustee shall be deposited into
the account not later than three working days after the date the
contribution is received.
(e) This section does not prohibit the transfer of any amount
deposited in the account into a certificate of deposit, stock fund, or
other investment instrument.
(f) The account may not include any public or private moneys or any
moneys of any other person, other than contributions received by the
trustee.
(g) A trustee shall retain a copy of each depository account
statement from the account described in this section for not less than
two years after the date the statement is issued by the depository.
(h) The trustee may not be a member of the family of or an employee
of the state officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any person may contribute to an ethics
defense trust fund established in section 1 of this act.
(2) The maximum contribution by any person per year to an ethics
defense trust fund shall be the same as the campaign contribution limit
per person per election cycle established by the public disclosure
commission for candidates for statewide executive office.
(3) The ethics defense trust fund agreement, contributions,
expenditures, and other transfers of moneys to or from the trust fund
shall be reported to the public disclosure commission once a month,
within ten days after the completion of the month, for all transactions
occurring in that month. Failure to report as required by this
subsection is a violation of chapter 42.17A RCW.
(4) Reports filed with the public disclosure commission under
subsection (3) of this section are nonexempt public records subject to
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An ethics defense trust fund established
under section 1 of this act may be terminated by:
(a) The state officer who established the trust fund; or
(b) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the terms of the
trust agreement.
(2) A trust agreement may provide that an ethics defense trust fund
is terminated not later than six months following the completion of the
payments authorized under section 1(2) of this act.
(3) Following termination of an ethics defense trust fund, the
trustee may not accept contributions to or make expenditures from the
trust fund.
(4) Not later than thirty days after an ethics defense trust fund
is terminated, the trustee of the trust fund shall return any moneys
remaining in the trust fund to contributors to the trust fund on a pro
rata basis.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.52.150 and 2011 c 60 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may accept gifts, other than
those specified in subsections (2) ((and)), (5), and (6) of this
section, with an aggregate value in excess of fifty dollars from a
single source in a calendar year or a single gift from multiple sources
with a value in excess of fifty dollars. For purposes of this section,
"single source" means any person, as defined in RCW 42.52.010, whether
acting directly or through any agent or other intermediary, and "single
gift" includes any event, item, or group of items used in conjunction
with each other or any trip including transportation, lodging, and
attendant costs, not excluded from the definition of gift under RCW
42.52.010. The value of gifts given to an officer's or employee's
family member or guest shall be attributed to the official or employee
for the purpose of determining whether the limit has been exceeded,
unless an independent business, family, or social relationship exists
between the donor and the family member or guest.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
following items are presumed not to influence under RCW 42.52.140, and
may be accepted without regard to the limit established by subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) Unsolicited flowers, plants, and floral arrangements;
(b) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(c) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(d) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(e) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(f) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(g) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for deposit in the legislative international trade account
created in RCW 43.15.050;
(h) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for the purpose of promoting the expansion of tourism as
provided for in RCW 43.330.090;
(i) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, solicited on behalf of a national
legislative association, 2006 official conference of the national
lieutenant governors' association, or host committee for the purpose of
hosting an official conference under the circumstances specified in RCW
42.52.820 and section 2, chapter 5, Laws of 2006. Anything solicited
or accepted may only be received by the national association or host
committee and may not be commingled with any funds or accounts that are
the property of any person;
(j) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(k) Unsolicited gifts from dignitaries from another state or a
foreign country that are intended to be personal in nature.
(3) The presumption in subsection (2) of this section is rebuttable
and may be overcome based on the circumstances surrounding the giving
and acceptance of the item.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (5) of this section, a
state officer or state employee of a regulatory agency or of an agency
that seeks to acquire goods or services who participates in those
regulatory or contractual matters may receive, accept, take, or seek,
directly or indirectly, only the following items from a person
regulated by the agency or from a person who seeks to provide goods or
services to the agency:
(a) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(b) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(c) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(d) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(e) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(f) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(g) Those items excluded from the definition of gift in RCW
42.52.010 except:
(i) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity;
(ii) Payments for seminars and educational programs sponsored by a
bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade,
or charitable association or institution; and
(iii) Flowers, plants, and floral arrangements.
(5) A state officer or state employee may accept gifts in the form
of food and beverage on infrequent occasions in the ordinary course of
meals where attendance by the officer or employee is related to the
performance of official duties. Gifts in the form of food and beverage
that exceed fifty dollars on a single occasion shall be reported as
provided in chapter 42.17A RCW.
(6) A state officer may accept contributions made to an ethics
defense trust fund established under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 42.52 RCW.

--- END ---