BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature seeks to reduce
overcrowded classes in public schools and to support the availability
of adequate facilities for students as the legislature continues to
implement reduced class sizes and state-funded all-day kindergarten.
The legislature recognizes that certain areas of the state have large
numbers of students that cannot be accommodated by current, available
school building space. The legislature also recognizes that certain
areas of the state are experiencing rapid growth in the number of
students who are enrolling in school and that continued significant
growth is projected for the foreseeable future.
(2) The legislature intends to create a legislative task force to
review and recommend changes to the eligibility requirements and
distribution formulas for the state's school construction assistance
grant program in time for the legislature to implement such changes in
the 2015-2017 capital construction budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint task force on public school
construction funding is established to review issues related to funding
for construction and renovation of public schools, including but not
limited to:
(a) The statutory provisions governing the school construction
assistance program funding formula;
(b) Eligibility requirements and the funding assistance percentage
for the state's school construction assistance program; and
(c) Flexibility needed within the funding formula to address the
particular needs of school districts experiencing rapid growth.
(2) Appointments to the task force shall be completed within thirty
days of the effective date of this section. The task force shall
consist of eleven voting members. The members shall be:
(a) Four members from the house of representatives, two from each
major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Four members from the senate, two from each major caucus,
appointed by the majority leader and minority leader of the major
caucuses of the senate; and
(c) One member representing an urban school district, one member
representing a suburban school district, and one member representing a
rural school district, appointed by a majority of the legislative
members.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Examine the statutory provisions regarding the funding formula
of school construction projects and how the formula should be adjusted
in light of the legislature's revisions to the definition of basic
education;
(b) Examine eligibility requirements and funding assistance
percentage formulas for the state's school construction assistance
program and how the formula should be adjusted to achieve equitable and
ample funding for the facilities required by school districts to
provide basic education to all Washington students;
(c) Examine flexibility needed in the system to address the needs
of school districts experiencing rapid growth and propose changes;
(d) Examine actual construction costs per square foot and any
variations by geographic region and propose revisions to the existing
construction cost allowance;
(e) Recommend approaches in a report to the governor and the
legislature to address the various examined issues by December 1, 2014,
so that any recommended changes may be implemented in the 2015-2017
capital budget.
(4) The task force shall receive staff and logistics support from
the house of representatives office of program research, senate
committee services, office of financial management, the department of
enterprise services, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The first meeting of the task force shall be convened by
the house of representatives office of program research and senate
committee services within forty-five days of the effective date of this
section.
(5) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---