BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.050 and 2010 c 161 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall not issue an initial ((or renewal))
registration certificate for a motor vehicle to a natural person under
this chapter unless the natural person at time of application:
(a) Presents an unexpired Washington state driver's license; or
(b) Certifies that he or she is:
(i) A Washington state resident who does not operate a motor
vehicle on public roads; or
(ii) Exempt from the requirement to obtain a Washington state
driver's license under RCW 46.20.025.
(2) The department must set up procedures to verify that all owners
meet the requirements of this section.
(3) A person falsifying residency is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
punishable only by a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section, including rules under which a natural person applying for
registration may be exempt from the requirements of this section if the
person provides evidence satisfactory to the department that he or she
has a valid and compelling reason for not being able to meet the
requirements of this section.

--- END ---