BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.060 and 2010 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner has the authority expressly conferred upon him
or her by or reasonably implied from the provisions of this code.
(2) The commissioner must execute his or her duties and must
enforce the provisions of this code.
(3) The commissioner may:
(a) Make reasonable rules for effectuating any provision of this
code, except those relating to his or her election, qualifications, or
compensation. Rules are not effective prior to their being filed for
public inspection in the commissioner's office.
(b) Conduct investigations to determine whether any person has
violated any provision of this code.
(c) Conduct examinations, investigations, hearings, in addition to
those specifically provided for, useful and proper for the efficient
administration of any provision of this code.
(4) When the governor proclaims a state of emergency under RCW
43.06.010(12), the commissioner may issue an order that addresses any
or all of the following matters related to insurance policies issued in
this state:
(a) Reporting requirements for claims;
(b) Grace periods for payment of insurance premiums and performance
of other duties by insureds;
(c) Temporary postponement of cancellations and nonrenewals; and
(d) Medical coverage to ensure access to care.
(5) An order by the commissioner under subsection (4) of this
section may remain effective for not more than sixty days unless the
commissioner extends the termination date for the order for an
additional period of not more than thirty days. The commissioner may
extend the order if, in the commissioner's judgment, the circumstances
warrant an extension. An order of the commissioner under subsection
(4) of this section is not effective after the related state of
emergency is terminated by proclamation of the governor under RCW
43.06.210. The order must specify, by line of insurance:
(a) The geographic areas in which the order applies, which must be
within but may be less extensive than the geographic area specified in
the governor's proclamation of a state of emergency and must be
specific according to an appropriate means of delineation, such as the
United States postal service zip codes or other appropriate means; and
(b) The date on which the order becomes effective and the date on
which the order terminates.
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules that establish general
criteria for orders issued under subsection (4) of this section and may
adopt emergency rules applicable to a specific proclamation of a state
of emergency by the governor.
(7) The rule-making authority set forth in subsection (6) of this
section does not limit or affect the rule-making authority otherwise
granted to the commissioner by law.
(8) In addition to the requirements of the administrative procedure
act established in chapter 34.05 RCW, the commissioner must provide
notice of proposed rule making on matters related to health care
insurance to the health care committees of the legislature, the health
benefit exchange established under chapter 43.71 RCW, the health care
authority established under chapter 41.05 RCW, and the governor. If
any of these parties have concerns or object to the proposed rule
making, the health care committee chairs of the legislature may notify
the joint administrative rules review committee established in RCW
34.05.610 and request the application of RCW 34.05.620, 34.05.630, and
34.05.640.

--- END ---