BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.230 and 2013 c 336 s 3 and 2013 c 220 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2)(a) Personal information:
(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files
maintained by the department of early learning; or
(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be
provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the
purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;
(3) The names and e-mail addresses of persons on public agency
e-mail distribution lists;
(4) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(((4))) (5) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with
the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(((5))) (6) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic
check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial
account numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or
governed by other law;
(((6))) (7) Personal and financial information related to a small
loan or any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(((7))) (8)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential
address, social security number, or other personal information required
to apply for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system.
(((c))) (9)(a)(i) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate,
driver's license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone
or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an
individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an
undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work,
public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This
exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle
license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW
46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued,
denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.
(((d))) (ii) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued
under RCW 88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other
records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an
individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law
enforcement activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of
the total number of vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an
agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned,
destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.
(((e))) (b) Upon request by the legislature, the department of
licensing shall provide a report to the legislature containing all of
the information in (((c) and (d))) (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
that is subject to public disclosure.

--- END ---