BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Because of the federal patient protection and affordable care
act, also known as Obamacare, millions of Americans, many of whom live
in Washington, had their health insurance plans canceled despite
President Obama's promise that they could keep the coverage they had.
(b) The Obama administration responded to this problem in the
following ways:
(i) Allowing state insurance commissioners, for a period of one
year, to approve plans that do not meet the requirements of Obamacare;
(ii) Suspending the individual mandate for persons whose insurance
was canceled due to Obamacare; and
(iii) Allowing persons whose insurance was canceled due to
Obamacare to purchase catastrophic insurance, regardless of age.
(c) The solutions offered by the Obama administration are
insufficient for Washington citizens due to:
(i) The Washington insurance commissioner's refusal to approve
plans that do not meet the requirements of Obamacare; and
(ii) The nonexistence or limited availability of the coverage
alternatives proposed by the Obama administration in response to the
crisis.
(2) The legislature, therefore, intends to expand affordable
coverage options for Washington citizens by:
(a) Allowing health carriers to continue to offer certain
individual or small group health plans in the market outside of the
exchange, regardless of whether the plans meet the requirements of
Obamacare; and
(b) Allowing out-of-state carriers to offer insurance products in
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health carrier may continue to offer an individual or small
group health plan in the market outside of the exchange, regardless of
whether the plan meets any state or federal requirements applicable to
individual or small group plans offered on or after October 1, 2013,
if:
(a) The health plan was offered in the individual or small group
market in Washington on October 1, 2013; and
(b) The purchaser of the health plan was actually enrolled in the
plan on October 1, 2013.
(2) A health carrier choosing to continue to offer an individual or
small group health plan under subsection (1) of this section, shall
send written notice to all enrollees of that plan who have received a
cancellation or termination notice regarding the plan, or who otherwise
should have received such notice, informing them of:
(a) Any changes in the options available to them;
(b) Which market reforms would not be reflected in any continued
coverage;
(c) Their potential right to enroll in a qualified health plan
offered through the exchange and possibly qualify for financial
assistance;
(d) How to access such coverage through the exchange; and
(e) Their right to enroll in health insurance coverage outside of
the exchange that complies with the market reforms identified in (b) of
this subsection.
(3) The commissioner may not adopt any rules or policies that would
prohibit or inhibit continuing coverage under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.43.700 and 2012 c 87 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For plan or policy years beginning January 1, 2014, a carrier
must offer individual or small group health benefit plans that meet the
definition of silver and gold level plans in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, in any market outside the exchange in which it
offers a plan that meets the definition of bronze level in section 1302
of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, a health benefit
plan meeting the definition of a catastrophic plan in RCW
48.43.005(8)(c)(i) may only be sold through the exchange.
(3) By December 1, 2016, the exchange board, in consultation with
the commissioner, must complete a review of the impact of this section
on the health and viability of the markets inside and outside the
exchange and submit the recommendations to the legislature on whether
to maintain the market rules or let them expire.
(4) The commissioner shall evaluate plans offered at each actuarial
value defined in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, and
determine whether variation in prescription drug benefit cost-sharing,
both inside and outside the exchange in both the individual and small
group markets results in adverse selection. If so, the commissioner
may adopt rules to assure substantial equivalence of prescription drug
cost-sharing. Any rules adopted under this subsection do not apply to
health plans offered under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.43.705 and 2012 c 87 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 2 of this act, all health plans,
other than catastrophic health plans, offered outside of the exchange
must conform with the actuarial value tiers specified in section 1302
of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, as bronze, silver, gold, or
platinum.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.43.715 and 2013 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with federal law, the commissioner, in consultation
with the board and the health care authority, shall, by rule, select
the largest small group plan in the state by enrollment as the
benchmark plan for the individual and small group market for purposes
of establishing the essential health benefits in Washington state under
P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.
(2) If the essential health benefits benchmark plan for the
individual and small group market does not include all of the ten
benefit categories specified by section 1302 of P.L. 111-148, as
amended, the commissioner, in consultation with the board and the
health care authority, shall, by rule, supplement the benchmark plan
benefits as needed to meet the minimum requirements of section 1302.
(3) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, a health plan
required to offer the essential health benefits, other than a health
plan offered through the federal basic health program or medicaid,
under P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, may not be offered in the state
unless the commissioner finds that it is substantially equal to the
benchmark plan. When making this determination, the commissioner:
(a) Must ensure that the plan covers the ten essential health
benefits categories specified in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010,
as amended;
(b) May consider whether the health plan has a benefit design that
would create a risk of biased selection based on health status and
whether the health plan contains meaningful scope and level of benefits
in each of the ten essential health benefit categories specified by
section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended;
(c) Notwithstanding ((the foregoing)) this subsection, for benefit
years beginning January 1, 2015, and only to the extent permitted by
federal law and guidance, must establish by rule the review and
approval requirements and procedures for pediatric oral services when
offered in stand-alone dental plans in the nongrandfathered individual
and small group markets outside of the exchange; and
(d) Unless prohibited by federal law and guidance, must allow
health carriers to also offer pediatric oral services within the health
benefit plan in the nongrandfathered individual and small group markets
outside of the exchange.
(4) Beginning December 15, 2012, and every year thereafter, the
commissioner shall submit to the legislature a list of state-mandated
health benefits, the enforcement of which will result in federally
imposed costs to the state related to the plans sold through the
exchange because the benefits are not included in the essential health
benefits designated under federal law. The list must include the
anticipated costs to the state of each state-mandated health benefit on
the list and any statutory changes needed if funds are not appropriated
to defray the state costs for the listed mandate. The commissioner may
enforce a mandate on the list for the entire market only if funds are
appropriated in an omnibus appropriations act specifically to pay the
state portion of the identified costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
A health carrier from another state may offer individual or small
group health plans in Washington, regardless of whether the plans meet
the requirements of this title or any rules adopted by the
commissioner, if the plans meet all applicable requirements in the
carrier's home state.

--- END ---