BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.1695 and 2002 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Electric personal assistive mobility device" (EPAMD) means a self-balancing device with one wheel or two wheels not in tandem, designed
to transport only one person by an electric propulsion system with an
average power of seven hundred fifty watts (one horsepower) if two-wheeled or two thousand watts (two and two-thirds horsepower) if one-wheeled, having a maximum speed on a paved level surface, when powered
solely by such a propulsion system while ridden by an operator weighing
one hundred seventy pounds, of less than twenty miles per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---