BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
Preference in hiring for school district security activities must
be given to veterans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---