BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that hundreds of
homeowners and businesses in the Skagit river basin who lawfully
obtained building permits are subject to interruption of established
groundwater uses through the operation of the Skagit river basin
instream flow rule. An interruptible groundwater supply is not
feasible for domestic use, is hazardous to public health, and imposes
severe economic harm on citizens who justifiably relied on the water
availability determinations of both state and local governments. The
same water users could suffer substantial hardship due to the
enforcement of the Skagit river basin instream flow rule. It is
therefore just, equitable, and within the public's interest to preserve
from interruption those existing water uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Groundwater uses exempt from the permit requirement of RCW
90.44.050 and established between April 14, 2001, and October 3, 2013,
in the Skagit river basin, as delineated in chapter 173-503 WAC as it
existed on the effective date of this section, shall not be subject to
interruption from the instream flows established in the Skagit river
basin instream flow rule, chapter 173-503 WAC as it existed on the
effective date of this section.

--- END ---