BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2012 c 181 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) According to the centers for disease control and prevention:
(i) In 2008, more than thirty-six thousand people died by suicide
in the United States, making it the tenth leading cause of death
nationally.
(ii) During 2007-2008, an estimated five hundred sixty-nine
thousand people visited hospital emergency departments with self-inflicted injuries in the United States, seventy percent of whom had
attempted suicide.
(iii) During 2008-2009, the average percentages of adults who
thought, planned, or attempted suicide in Washington were higher than
the national average.
(b) According to a national study, veterans face an elevated risk
of suicide as compared to the general population, more than twice the
risk among male veterans. Another study has indicated a positive
correlation between posttraumatic stress disorder and suicide.
(i) Washington state is home to more than sixty thousand men and
women who have deployed in support of the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.
(ii) Research continues on how the effects of wartime service and
injuries, such as traumatic brain injury, posttraumatic stress
disorder, or other service-related conditions, may increase the number
of veterans who attempt suicide.
(iii) As more men and women separate from the military and
transition back into civilian life, community mental health providers
will become a vital resource to help these veterans and their families
deal with issues that may arise.
(c) Suicide has an enormous impact on the family and friends of the
victim as well as the community as a whole.
(d) Approximately ninety percent of people who die by suicide had
a diagnosable psychiatric disorder at the time of death, such as
depression. Most suicide victims exhibit warning signs or behaviors
prior to an attempt.
(e) Improved training and education in suicide assessment,
treatment, and management has been recommended by a variety of
organizations, including the United States department of health and
human services and the institute of medicine.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to help lower the
suicide rate in Washington by requiring certain health professionals to
complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management as
part of their continuing education, continuing competency, or
recertification requirements.
(3) The legislature does not intend to expand or limit the existing
scope of practice of any health professional affected by this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.442 and 2013 c 78 s 1 and 2013 c 73 s 6 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) ((Beginning January 1, 2014,)) Each of the following
professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least
once every six years, complete training in suicide assessment,
treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the relevant
disciplining authority:
(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(ii) A chemical dependency professional licensed under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225
RCW;
(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter
18.59 RCW;
(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;
(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social
worker licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; ((and))
(viii) A social worker associate--advanced or social worker
associate -- independent clinical licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(ix) A chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;
(x) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(xi) A licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;
(xii) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter
18.57 RCW;
(xiii) An osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter
18.57A RCW;
(xiv) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed
under chapter 18.74 RCW; and
(xv) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.
(b) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW shall, at least
once every eight years, complete training in suicide assessment,
treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the medical
quality assurance commission.
(((b))) (c) The requirements in (a) and (b) of this subsection
apply to a person holding a retired active license for one of the
professions in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((c))) (d) The training required by this subsection must be at
least six hours in length, unless a disciplinary authority has
determined, under subsection (8)(b) of this section, that training that
includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the
profession in question, in which case the training must be at least
three hours in length.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection((,)):
(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a)(i) through (viii) of
this section must complete the first training required by this section
during the first full continuing education reporting period after
January 1, 2014, or the first full continuing education reporting
period after initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs
later; and
(ii) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a)(ix) through (xiv)
or (b) of this section must complete the first training required by
this section during the first full continuing education reporting
period after the effective date of this section or the first full
continuing education reporting period after initial licensure or
certification, whichever is later.
(b) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section applying for initial licensure ((on or after January 1, 2014,))
may delay completion of the first training required by this section for
six years after initial licensure if he or she can demonstrate
successful completion of the training required in subsection (1) of
this section no more than six years prior to the application for
initial licensure.
(3) The hours spent completing training in suicide assessment,
treatment, and management under this section count toward meeting any
applicable continuing education or continuing competency requirements
for each profession.
(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum
training and experience that is sufficient to exempt a professional
from the training requirements in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The board of occupational therapy practice may exempt an
occupational therapy practitioner from the training requirements of
subsection (1) of this section if the occupational therapy practitioner
has only brief or limited patient contact.
(5)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work
collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide
assessment, treatment, and management.
(b) When developing the model list, the secretary and the
disciplining authorities shall:
(i) Consider suicide assessment, treatment, and management training
programs of at least six hours in length listed on the best practices
registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the
suicide prevention resource center; and
(ii) Consult with public and private institutions of higher
education, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management,
and affected professional associations.
(c) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall report the
model list of training programs to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than December 15, 2013.
(d) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall update the
list at least once every two years. When updating the list, the
secretary and the disciplining authorities shall, to the extent
practicable, endeavor to include training on the model list that
includes content specific to veterans. When identifying veteran-specific content under this subsection, the secretary and the
disciplining authorities shall consult with the Washington department
of veterans affairs.
(6) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit
the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130
RCW.
(7) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this
section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.
(8) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW
18.130.020.
(b) "Training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management"
means empirically supported training approved by the appropriate
disciplining authority that contains the following elements: Suicide
assessment, including screening and referral, suicide treatment, and
suicide management. However, the disciplining authority may approve
training that includes only screening and referral elements if
appropriate for the profession in question based on the profession's
scope of practice. The board of occupational therapy may also approve
training that includes only screening and referral elements if
appropriate for occupational therapy practitioners based on practice
setting.
(9) A state or local government employee is exempt from the
requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least
six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management
from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this
subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may
be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.
(10) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under
chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under
chapter 70.96A RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if
he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide
assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every
six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be
provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training
sessions at the employer's discretion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this
purpose, the department shall implement a pilot program to support
primary care providers in the assessment and provision of appropriate
diagnosis and treatment of adults with mental and behavioral health
disorders and track outcomes of the program. The program must be
designed to promote more accurate diagnoses and treatment through
timely case consultation between primary care providers and psychiatric
specialists, and focused on educational learning collaboratives with
primary care providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary, in consultation with the steering committee
convened in subsection (3) of this section, shall develop a Washington
plan for suicide prevention. The plan must, at a minimum:
(a) Examine data relating to suicide in order to identify patterns
and key demographic factors;
(b) Identify key risk and protective factors relating to suicide;
and
(c) Identify goals, action areas, and implementation strategies
relating to suicide prevention.
(2) When developing the plan, the secretary shall consider national
research and practices employed by the federal government, tribal
governments, and other states, including the national strategy for
suicide prevention. The plan must be written in a manner that is
accessible, and useful to, a broad audience. The secretary shall
periodically update the plan as needed.
(3) The secretary shall convene a steering committee to advise him
or her in the development of the Washington plan for suicide
prevention. The committee must consist of representatives from the
following:
(a) Experts on suicide assessment, treatment, and management;
(b) Institutions of higher education;
(c) Tribal governments;
(d) The state department of veterans affairs;
(e) Suicide prevention advocates, at least one of whom must be a
suicide survivor and at least one of whom must be a survivor of a
suicide attempt;
(f) Local health departments or districts; and
(g) Any other organizations or groups the secretary deems
appropriate.
(4) The secretary shall complete the plan no later than November
15, 2015, publish the report on the department's web site, and submit
copies to the governor and the relevant standing committees of the
legislature.

--- END ---