BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.020 and 2012 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(3) "Child abuse medical assessment" means an assessment by or
under the direction of a licensed physician or other licensed health
care professional trained in the evaluation, diagnosis, and treatment
of child abuse. "Child abuse medical assessment" includes the taking
of a thorough medical history, a complete physical examination, and an
interview for the purpose of making a medical diagnosis, determining
whether or not the child has been abused, and identifying the
appropriate treatment or referral for follow-up for the child.
(4) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(((4))) (5) "Child protective services section" means the child
protective services section of the department.
(((5))) (6) "Children's advocacy center" means a child-focused
facility in good standing with the state chapter for children's
advocacy centers and that coordinates a multidisciplinary process for
the investigation, prosecution, and treatment of sexual and other types
of child abuse. Children's advocacy centers provide a location for
forensic interviews and coordinate access to services such as, but not
limited to, medical evaluations, advocacy, therapy, and case review by
multidisciplinary teams within the context of county protocols as
defined in RCW 26.44.180 and 26.44.185.
(((6))) (7) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained
minister, priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination,
whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of
any public or private organization or institution.
(((7))) (8) "Court" means the superior court of the state of
Washington, juvenile department.
(((8))) (9) "Department" means the state department of social and
health services.
(((9))) (10) "Designated medical professional" means a physician,
physician assistant, or nurse practitioner who has been trained to
conduct child abuse medical assessments and who is regularly available
to conduct child abuse medical assessments.
(11) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child
safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths
and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family
assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse
or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to
address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent
maltreatment.
(((10))) (12) "Family assessment response" means a way of
responding to certain reports of child abuse or neglect made under this
chapter using a differential response approach to child protective
services. The family assessment response shall focus on the safety of
the child, the integrity and preservation of the family, and shall
assess the status of the child and the family in terms of risk of abuse
and neglect including the parent's or guardian's or other caretaker's
capacity and willingness to protect the child and, if necessary, plan
and arrange the provision of services to reduce the risk and otherwise
support the family. No one is named as a perpetrator, and no
investigative finding is entered in the record as a result of a family
assessment.
(((11))) (13) "Founded" means the determination following an
investigation by the department that, based on available information,
it is more likely than not that child abuse or neglect did occur.
(((12))) (14) "Inconclusive" means the determination following an
investigation by the department, prior to October 1, 2008, that based
on available information a decision cannot be made that more likely
than not, child abuse or neglect did or did not occur.
(((13))) (15) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or
any other facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care.
(((14))) (16) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department,
the prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public
safety, or the office of the sheriff.
(((15))) (17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an intent, wish, or
design to intimidate, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may
be inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(((16))) (18) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or
a failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not
limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment
in and of itself.
(((17))) (19) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under
chapter 18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an
employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(((18))) (20) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner"
means a person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine
and surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner. A person who is being furnished
Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science
practitioner will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected
person for the purposes of this chapter.
(((19))) (21) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not
limited to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(((20))) (22) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice
psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual
capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution.
(((21))) (23) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child
abuse or neglect that the department has determined does not rise to
the level of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred
for investigation.
(((22))) (24) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing,
permitting, or encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any
person; or (b) allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the
obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child
by any person.
(((23))) (25) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is
defined in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(((24))) (26) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(((25))) (27) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.090 or an Indian tribe under RCW 74.15.190 that
has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to
provide child welfare services.
(((26))) (28) "Suspicious physical injury" includes, but is not
limited to, burns or scalds; extensive bruising or swelling on any part
of the body; bruising, swelling, or abrasions on the head, neck, or
face; fractures of any bone in a child under the age of three; multiple
fractures in a child of any age; dislocations, soft tissue swelling, or
moderate to severe cuts; loss of the ability to walk or move normally
according to the child's developmental ability; unconsciousness or
difficulty maintaining consciousness; multiple injuries of different
types or different age of injuries; injuries causing serious or
protracted disfigurement or loss of impairment of the function of any
bodily organ; or any other injury that threatens the well-being of the
child.
(29) "Unfounded" means the determination following an investigation
by the department that available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur, or that there is
insufficient evidence for the department to determine whether the
alleged child abuse did or did not occur.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.050 and 2012 c 259 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 26.44.030(11), upon the receipt of a
report concerning the possible occurrence of abuse or neglect, the law
enforcement agency or the department of social and health services must
investigate and provide the protective services section with a report
in accordance with chapter 74.13 RCW, and where necessary to refer such
report to the court.
(2) A law enforcement officer may take, or cause to be taken, a
child into custody without a court order if there is probable cause to
believe that the child is abused or neglected and that the child would
be injured or could not be taken into custody if it were necessary to
first obtain a court order pursuant to RCW 13.34.050. ((The law
enforcement agency or the department of social and health services
investigating such a report is hereby authorized to photograph such a
child for the purpose of providing documentary evidence of the physical
condition of the child.))
(a) The law enforcement agency or the department of social and
health services investigating such a report must:
(i) Immediately photograph or cause to be photographed any
suspicious physical injuries for the purposes of preserving evidence of
the child's condition at the time of the investigation; and
(ii) Ensure that a designated medical professional conducts a child
abuse medical assessment within forty-eight hours or as soon as
practically possible.
(b) The law enforcement agency or department must make a reasonable
effort to locate a designated medical professional. If one is not
available to conduct a child abuse medical assessment within forty-eight hours, the child must be evaluated by an available physician or
nurse practitioner.
(c) If the child is evaluated by a medical provider other than a
designated medical professional, the evaluating medical provider must
make photographs, clinical notes, diagnostic and testing results, and
any other relevant materials available to the designated medical
professional within seventy-two hours following evaluation of the
child.
(d) The requirement in (a) of this subsection applies each time a
suspicious physical injury is observed by law enforcement personnel or
the department:
(i) During a new allegation of abuse; or
(ii) If the injury was not previously observed by a person
conducting an investigation under RCW 26.44.030(12); and
(iii) Regardless of whether the child has been previously
photographed or assessed during an investigation of an allegation of
abuse.
(3) Photographs of the anal or genital region may be taken only by
medical personnel.
(4) Nothing in this section prevents a person conducting a child
abuse investigation from seeking immediate medical treatment from a
hospital emergency room or other medical provider for a child who is
physically injured or otherwise in need of immediate medical care.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.185 and 2010 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county shall revise and expand its existing child sexual
abuse investigation protocol to address investigations of child
fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal child neglect cases and to
incorporate the statewide guidelines for first responders to child
fatalities developed by the criminal justice training commission. The
protocols shall address the coordination of child fatality, child
physical abuse, and criminal child neglect investigations between the
county and city prosecutor's offices, law enforcement, children's
protective services, children's advocacy centers, where available,
local advocacy groups, emergency medical services, and any other local
agency involved in the investigation of such cases. The protocol
revision and expansion shall be developed by the prosecuting attorney
in collaboration with the agencies referenced in this section.
(2) The prosecuting attorney of each county, in collaboration with
the agencies referenced in this section, must identify at least one
designated medical professional as defined in RCW 26.44.020 to conduct
child abuse medical assessments. If, after reasonable effort, a
designated medical professional cannot be identified, a written plan
must be developed that outlines the necessary steps, recruitment, and
training needed to make a designated medical professional available to
the children of the county.
(3) Revised and expanded protocols under this section shall be
adopted and in place by July 1, 2008. Thereafter, the protocols shall
be reviewed every two years to determine whether modifications are
needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to this chapter, the state shall pay any costs incurred by
a hospital, child abuse clinic, or other emergency medical facility for
a child abuse medical assessment of a child with a suspicious physical
injury, when the assessment is performed for the purpose of gathering
evidence for a suspected criminal investigation.

--- END ---