BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.71.075 and 2012 c 87 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person or entity functioning as a navigator consistent with
the requirements of section 1311(i) of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as
amended, shall not be considered soliciting or negotiating insurance as
stated under chapter 48.17 RCW.
(2) As part of or in connection with the application to become a
navigator, consistent with the requirements of section 1311(i) of P.L.
111-148 of 2010, as amended, the person applying as a navigator shall
furnish information concerning his or her identity, including
fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal
bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity
authorized to receive this information for a state and national
criminal history background check.
(3)(a) A person or entity functioning as a navigator may only
request health care information that is relevant to the specific
assessment and recommendation of health plan options. Any health care
information received by a navigator may not be disclosed to any third
party that is not part of the enrollment process and must be destroyed
after enrollment has been completed.
(b) If a person's health care information is received and disclosed
to a third party in violation of (a) of this subsection, the navigator
must notify the person of the breach. The exchange must develop a
policy to establish a reasonable notification period and what
information must be included in the notice. This policy and
information on the exchange's confidentiality policies must be made
available on the exchange's web site.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "health care information" has
the meaning provided in RCW 70.02.010.

--- END ---