BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.025 and 2003 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes
((shall)) must be waived by the county treasurer if the notice for
these taxes due, as provided in RCW 84.56.050, was not sent to a
taxpayer due to error by the county or the United States postal
service. Where waiver of interest and penalties has occurred, the full
amount of interest and penalties ((shall)) must be reinstated if the
taxpayer fails to pay the delinquent taxes within thirty days of
receiving notice that the taxes are due. Each county treasurer
((shall)) must, subject to guidelines prepared by the department of
revenue, establish administrative procedures to determine if taxpayers
are eligible for this waiver. Before allowing a waiver due to error by
the United States postal service, the county treasurer may require
documentation from the United States postal service regarding the delay
or loss of the notice.
(2) ((In addition to the waiver under subsection (1) of this
section,)) The interest and penalties for delinquencies on property
taxes ((shall)) must be waived by the county treasurer under the
following circumstances:
(a) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's personal residence because of hardship
caused by the death of the taxpayer's spouse or member of the
taxpayer's immediate family including, but not limited to, a household
member, grandparent, parent, sibling, child, or grandchild if the
taxpayer notifies the county treasurer of the hardship within sixty
days of the tax due date; or
(b) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's parent's or stepparent's personal
residence because of hardship caused by the death of the taxpayer's
parent or stepparent if the taxpayer notifies the county treasurer of
the hardship within sixty days of the tax due date.
(3) Before allowing a hardship waiver under subsection (2) of this
section, the county treasurer may require a copy of the death
certificate along with an affidavit signed by the taxpayer.
(4)(a) The interest and penalties for delinquencies on property
taxes may be waived by the county treasurer under the following
circumstances:
(i) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's personal residence because of hardship
caused by the serious illness of the taxpayer's spouse or member of the
taxpayer's immediate family including, but not limited to, a household
member, grandparent, parent, sibling, child, or grandchild; or
(ii) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's personal residence because of hardship
caused by incapacity or disability, including inability to manage
property and affairs effectively for reasons such as, but not limited
to, mental incapacity, developmental disability, or serious physical
illness.
(b) Before allowing a hardship waiver under this subsection (4),
the county treasurer may require documentation from a physician along
with an affidavit signed by the taxpayer.
(5) The interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes
may be waived by the county treasurer if the taxpayer fails to make one
payment under RCW 84.56.020 by the due date on the taxpayer's personal
residence because of hardship caused by natural disaster, such as a
flood or earthquake. Before allowing a hardship waiver under this
subsection (5), the county treasurer may require an affidavit signed by
the taxpayer.
(6) Under subsections (4) and (5) of this section, a taxpayer must
request a waiver and must pay the taxes within thirty days of receiving
the notice that taxes are due. Interest and penalties must be
reinstated if the taxpayer fails to pay the delinquent taxes by the due
date if a waiver is not requested and the taxes are not paid within
thirty days of receiving the notice that taxes are due.

--- END ---