BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.081 and 2007 c 69 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the last business day of the second month of each calendar
quarter, the state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute from the timber
tax distribution account:
(a) To each county: The amount of tax collected on behalf of each
county under RCW 84.33.051, less each county's proportionate share of
appropriations for collection and administration activities under RCW
84.33.051((, and shall transfer to the state general fund the amount of
tax collected on behalf of the state under RCW 84.33.041, less the
amount of the distribution under subsection (7) of this section and the
state's proportionate share of appropriations for collection and
administration activities under RCW 84.33.041)). The county treasurer
((shall)) must deposit moneys received under this section in a county
timber tax account ((which shall)) that must be established by each
county. Following receipt of moneys under this section, the county
treasurer ((shall)) must make distributions from any moneys available
in the county timber tax account to taxing districts in the county,
except the state, under subsections (2) through (4) of this section.
(b)(i) For fiscal years 2016 through 2040, to the forest and fish
support account created in RCW 76.09.405: The amount of tax collected
on behalf of the state under RCW 84.33.041 up to the limits according
to the following schedule, less the amount of the distribution under
subsection (7) of this section, and the state's proportionate share of
appropriations for collection and administration activities under RCW
84.33.041. These annual distributions from the timber tax distribution
account are based on the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered
into by the department of natural resources and the department of
ecology. The distribution schedule is as follows:
(A) Up to three million six hundred thousand dollars for the 2016
fiscal year;
(B) Up to four million dollars for the 2017 through 2019 fiscal
years;
(C) Up to three million five hundred thousand dollars for the 2020
and 2021 fiscal years;
(D) Up to three million dollars for fiscal years 2022 through 2029;
(E) Up to one million two hundred thousand dollars for fiscal years
2030 through 2040.
(ii) If RCW 76.09.405(3) becomes operative, those distributions to
the forest and fish support account created in RCW 76.09.405 in
(b)(i)(A) through (E) of this subsection must be transferred by the
state treasurer to the forest landowner incentive programs account
created in section 3 of this act.
(c)(i) For fiscal years 2016 through 2040, any tax collections in
excess of the numbers provided in the schedule listed in (b)(i) of this
subsection must be transferred by the state treasurer to the forest
landowner incentive programs account created in section 3 of this act.
(ii) Beginning in fiscal year 2041, to the forest landowner
incentive programs account created in section 3 of this act: The
amount of tax collected on behalf of the state under RCW 84.33.041 less
the amount of the distribution under subsection (7) of this section,
and the state's proportionate share of appropriations for collection
and administration activities under RCW 84.33.041.
(2) From moneys available, there first ((shall)) must be a
distribution to each taxing district having debt service payments due
during the calendar year, based upon bonds issued under authority of a
vote of the people conducted pursuant to RCW 84.52.056 and based upon
excess levies for a capital project fund authorized pursuant to RCW
84.52.053, of an amount equal to the timber assessed value of the
district multiplied by the tax rate levied for payment of the debt
service and capital projects((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in respect
to levies for a debt service or capital project fund authorized before
July 1, 1984, the amount allocated ((shall)) may not be less than an
amount equal to the same percentage of such debt service or capital
project fund represented by timber tax allocations to such payments in
calendar year 1984. Distribution under this subsection (2) ((shall))
may be used only for debt service and capital projects payments. The
distribution under this subsection ((shall)) must be made as follows:
One-half of such amount ((shall)) must be distributed in the first
quarter of the year and one-half ((shall)) must be distributed in the
third quarter of the year.
(3) From the moneys remaining after the distributions under
subsection (2) of this section, the county treasurer ((shall)) must
distribute to each school district an amount equal to one-half of the
timber assessed value of the district or eighty percent of the timber
roll of such district in calendar year 1983 as determined under this
chapter, whichever is greater, multiplied by the tax rate, if any,
levied by the district under RCW 84.52.052 or 84.52.053 for purposes
other than debt service payments and capital projects supported under
subsection (2) of this section. The distribution under this subsection
((shall)) must be made as follows: One-half of such amount ((shall))
must be distributed in the first quarter of the year and one-half
((shall)) must be distributed in the third quarter of the year.
(4) After the distributions directed under subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, if any, each taxing district ((shall)) must receive an
amount equal to the timber assessed value of the district multiplied by
the tax rate, if any, levied as a regular levy of the district or as a
special levy not included in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(5) If there are insufficient moneys in the county timber tax
account to make full distribution under subsection (4) of this section,
the county treasurer ((shall)) must multiply the amount to be
distributed to each taxing district under that subsection by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the county timber tax
account balance before making the distribution under that subsection.
The denominator of the fraction is the account balance which would be
required to make full distribution under that subsection.
(6) After making the distributions under subsections (2) through
(4) of this section in the full amount indicated for the calendar year,
the county treasurer ((shall)) must place any excess revenue up to
twenty percent of the total distributions made for the year under
subsections (2) through (4) of this section in a reserve status until
the beginning of the next calendar year. Any moneys remaining in the
county timber tax account after this amount is placed in reserve
((shall)) must be distributed to each taxing district in the county in
the same proportions as the distributions made under subsection (4) of
this section.
(7) On the last business day of the second month of each calendar
quarter, the state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute from the timber
tax distribution account to each county an amount of tax collected by
the state under RCW 84.33.041 equal to the amount of any tribal tax
credited against the county's tax under an agreement entered into under
RCW 43.06.480.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.405 and 2007 c 54 s 3 and 2007 c 48 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The forest and fish support account is hereby created in the
state treasury. Receipts from appropriations, the surcharge imposed
under RCW 82.04.261, the designated distributions from the timber tax
distribution account under RCW 84.33.081, and other sources must be
deposited into the account.
(2)(a) Except for money entering the account through a distribution
from the timber tax distribution account, all expenditures from the
account ((shall)) must be used for activities pursuant to the state's
implementation of the forests and fish report as defined in this
chapter and related activities including, but not limited to, adaptive
management, monitoring, and participation grants to tribes, state and
local agencies, and not-for-profit public interest organizations.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, until June
30, 2041, all moneys entering the account through distributions from
the timber tax distribution account may only be used for conducting and
completing the work identified in the cooperative monitoring,
evaluation, and research work plan as adopted by the forest practices
board. The annual distributions from the timber tax distribution
account are based on the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered
into by the department and the department of ecology.
(ii) After the close of each fiscal biennium, any moneys received
in distributions from the timber tax distribution account which remain
unexpended in excess of five hundred thousand dollars must be
transferred by the state treasurer no later than September 30th of each
year to the forest landowner incentive programs account created in
section 3 of this act.
(iii) The department must issue a biennial report to the
legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, that details the receipts
and distributions made under this section, the amounts used on work
under the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research master
schedule, and transfers made under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) Distributions from the timber tax distribution account to the
forest and fish support account that support endangered species act,
incidental take permit, or habitat conservation plan compliance will
cease and those distributions will be transferred to the forest
landowner incentive programs account created in section 3 of this act
six months after any of the following occur:
(a) The state's incidental take permit identified in RCW
77.85.190(2) is terminated, revoked, or rendered ineffective by federal
legislation, rule making, or by a final decision of a court of
competent jurisdiction or is substantially altered outside of the
adaptive management process created in RCW 76.09.370; or
(b) The state withdraws from the forest and fish habitat
conservation plan or relinquishes its incidental take permit.
(4) Distributions from the timber tax distribution account to the
forest and fish support account that support clean water compliance
will cease and those distributions will be transferred to the forest
landowner incentive programs account created in section 3 of this act
six months after the following occurs: The state, the United States
environmental protection agency, or a court of competent jurisdiction
made a final determination that clean water act assurances are
terminated, revoked, or otherwise rendered ineffective by federal,
state legislation, or rule making.
(5) Distributions must be reinstated in the following
circumstances:
(a) If the incidental take permit or clean water act assurances
identified in subsections (3) and (4) of this section are reinstated;
or
(b) The forest practices board, consistent with the adaptive
management process provided in RCW 76.09.370, and after consultation
with appropriate federal and state agencies, tribes, and other
stakeholders, requests distributions to fund specific studies and
activities designed to support reinstatement of clean water assurances
and the incidental take permit. Such distributions must be limited to
the funds identified to complete the studies and specified activities.
(6) Expenditures from the account may also be used for reviews
conducted by the Washington state institute for public policy described
in section 5 of this act.
(7) Expenditures from the forest and fish support account may also
be used for audits of the adaptive management program conducted by the
state auditor's office. Beginning July 1, 2016, and every four years
thereafter, the department must contract with the state auditor's
office to conduct an audit of the department that includes the
following:
(a) Whether the department adhered to applicable federal or state
laws and regulations and the department's policies and procedures;
(b) Whether the records audited ensure public funds are accounted
for and controls are in place to protect public resources from
misappropriation and misuse; and
(c) An opinion on whether the statements fairly present the
government's financial position and results of operations.
(8) Expenditures from the account may be made only after
appropriation by the legislature.
(9) Nothing in this section affects the legislature from funding
the forest practices program from other sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The forest landowner incentive programs account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from transfers made pursuant to RCW
84.33.081 and 76.09.405 must be deposited in the account. The account
is also authorized to receive fund transfers and appropriations as well
as gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may
be made from time to time.
(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for supporting,
and must be equally allocated between, the following programs:
(a) The forestry riparian easement program established in RCW
76.13.120;
(b) The family forest fish passage program created pursuant to RCW
76.13.150 that provides public cost assistance to small forest
landowners associated with the road maintenance and abandonment
processes; and
(c) The program for riparian open space and critical habitat
created pursuant to RCW 76.09.040, beginning in fiscal year 2017.
(3) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation by
the legislature.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.33.0775 and 2010 c 210 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A taxpayer is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under
RCW 84.33.041 for timber harvested on and after January 1, 2000, under
a forest practices notification filed or application approved under RCW
76.09.050 ((and subject to enhanced aquatic resources requirements)).
(2)(a) For a person other than a small harvester who elects to
calculate tax under RCW 84.33.074, the credit is equal to the stumpage
value of timber harvested for sale or for commercial or industrial use
multiplied by eight-tenths of one percent.
(b) For a small harvester who elects to calculate tax under RCW
84.33.074, the credit is equal to sixteen percent of the tax imposed
under this chapter.
(c) The amount of credit claimed by a taxpayer under this section
((shall)) must be reduced by the amount of any compensation received
from the federal government for reduced timber harvest due to enhanced
aquatic resource requirements. If the amount of compensation from the
federal government exceeds the amount of credit available to a taxpayer
in any reporting period, the excess ((shall)) must be carried forward
and applied against credits in future reporting periods. This
subsection does not apply to small harvesters ((as defined in RCW
84.33.073)).
(d) Refunds may not be given in place of credits. Credit may not
be claimed in excess of tax owed. The department ((of revenue shall))
must disallow any credits, used or unused, upon written notification
from the department of natural resources of a final decision that
timber for which credit was claimed was not harvested under a forest
practices notification filed or application approved under RCW
76.09.050 ((and subject to enhanced aquatic resources requirements.
(3) As used in this section, a forest practices notification or
application is subject to enhanced aquatic resource requirements if it
includes, in whole or in part, riparian area, wetland, or steep or
unstable slope from which the operator is limited, by rule adopted
under RCW 76.09.055, 34.05.090, 43.21C.250, and 76.09.370, or any
federally approved habitat conservation plan or department of natural
resources approved watershed analysis, from harvesting timber, or if a
road is included within or adjacent to the area covered by such
notification or application and the road is covered by a road
maintenance plan approved by the department of natural resources under
rules adopted under chapter 76.09 RCW, the forest practices act, or a
federally approved habitat conservation plan.
(4) For forest practices notification or applications submitted
after January 1, 2000, the department of natural resources shall
indicate whether the notification or application is subject to enhanced
aquatic resource requirements and, unless notified of a contrary
determination by the pollution control hearings board, the department
of revenue shall use such indication in determining the credit to be
allowed against the tax assessed under RCW 84.33.041. The department
of natural resources shall develop revisions to the form of the forest
practices notifications and applications to provide a space for the
applicant to indicate and the department of natural resources to
confirm or not confirm, whether the notification or application is
subject to enhanced aquatic resource requirements. For forest
practices notifications or applications submitted before January 1,
2000, the applicant may submit the approved notification or application
to the department of natural resources for confirmation that the
notification or application is subject to enhanced aquatic resource
requirements. Upon any such submission, the department of natural
resources will within thirty days confirm or deny that the notification
or application is subject to enhanced aquatic resource requirements and
will forward separate evidence of each confirmation to the department
of revenue. Unless notified of a contrary ruling by the pollution
control hearings board, the department of revenue shall use the
separate confirmations in determining the credit to be allowed against
the tax assessed under RCW 84.33.041.
(5) A refusal by the department of natural resources to confirm
that a notification or application is subject to enhanced aquatic
resources requirements may be appealed to the pollution control
hearings board.
(6) A person receiving approval of credit must keep records
necessary for the department of revenue to verify eligibility under
this section)).
(3) The legislature finds that the forest and fish agreement
adopted by the legislature in chapter 4, Laws of 1999 1st sp. sess. has
made the Washington state forest practices act the strongest in the
nation, and virtually all timber harvested in Washington state under a
forest practices notification or application approved have had some
impact in which timber is restricted from harvest or costs to harvest
and market timber have increased.
(4) The department of natural resources must transmit to the
department forest practices notifications or applications approved
under RCW 76.09.050 and, unless notified of a contrary determination by
the pollution control hearings board, the department must use such
indication in determining the credit to be allowed against the tax
assessed under RCW 84.33.041.
(5) A refusal by the department of natural resources to confirm
that a notification or application is a forest practices notification
or application approved under RCW 76.09.050 may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board.
(6) A person receiving approval of credit must keep records
necessary for the department to verify that a notification or
application is a forest practices notification or application approved
under RCW 76.09.050.
(7) The legislature finds that the change in the harvest credit for
timber provided in this section is a measure to reduce the
administrative burden on the taxpayer and the government by removing
the paperwork associated with a requirement for the credit that will
continue to be met by virtually all timber harvested even after the
requirement is removed. This section is a government streamlining
reform, does not represent a tax preference, and is not an attempt by
the legislature to induce a specific performance. As such, this
section is exempt from the provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state institute for public policy must study
and, if appropriate, make recommendations to the legislature related to
the management, funding, transparency, efficiency, effectiveness, and
overall operations of the adaptive management program at the department
of natural resources.
(2) The Washington state institute for public policy must consult
with interested stakeholders for input on additional issues to be
included in the study, however, at a minimum, the study must consider
and draw conclusions relating to:
(a) The process for prioritization, revision, inclusion, and
exclusion of projects relating to cooperative monitoring, evaluation,
and research by topical group; including a review of project relevancy
and the existence of current research to justify recent revisions;
(b) The capacity and ability for the adaptive management program to
implement the timelines approved by the forest practices board;
including a review funding, the scientific qualifications of the
participants, the research methods used, the degree to which lean
process recommendations have been implemented, and the other resources
available to the program;
(c) The anticipated tasks of the adaptive management program that
are not related to the master schedule of cooperative monitoring,
evaluation, and research work;
(d) The process by which policy decisions are informed by research
and research is directed by policy decisions; including potential
science workloads dictated by those policy discussions;
(e) The degree to which related scientific research conforms to
modern research principles and degrees of peer review; and
(f) The exploration of additional contracting tools for study
initiation and implementation.
(3) The Washington state institute for public policy is authorized
to contract with consultants if specialized work is required to conduct
the review required in this section. The Washington state institute
for public policy is authorized to expend up to two hundred thousand
dollars from the forest and fish support account created in RCW
76.09.405 for the purposes of each review under subsection (4) of this
section. All funds for the reviews required in subsection (4) of this
section must be spent out of the forest and fish support account
created in RCW 76.09.405.
(4) The Washington state institute for public policy must complete
the initial implementation of this section by no later than July 31,
2017, and must update its review every five years on a schedule
consistent with the five-year review required in the forest practices
habitat conservation plan. Prior to each subsequent five-year review,
the forest practices board must review and if necessary, modify the
issues required in the review. If RCW 76.09.405(3) (a) or (b) takes
effect, no further reviews by the Washington state institute for public
policy are required.

Sec. 6 RCW 76.09.020 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 212 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Appeals board" means the pollution control hearings board
created by RCW 43.21B.010.
(3) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.
(4) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other
species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes
identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander
(Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton
olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's
salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and
their respective habitats.
(5) "Board" means the forest practices board created in RCW
76.09.030.
(6) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(7) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner
or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other
right-of-way ((shall be)) is considered contiguous.
(8) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation"
means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible
with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.
(9) "Date of receipt" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
43.21B.001.
(10) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(11) "Ecosystem services" means the benefits that the public enjoys
as a result of natural processes and biological diversity.
(12) "Ecosystem services market" means a system in which providers
of ecosystem services can access financing or market capital to
protect, restore, and maintain ecological values, including the full
spectrum of regulatory, quasiregulatory, and voluntary markets.
(13) "Fill" means the placement of earth material or aggregate for
road or landing construction or other similar activities.
(14) "Fish passage barrier" means any artificial instream structure
that impedes the free passage of fish.
(15) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use
which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not
include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was
historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends
to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future.
As it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment
plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners,
the term "forest land" excludes:
(a) Residential home sites, which may include up to five acres; and
(b) Cropfields, orchards, vineyards, pastures, feedlots, fish pens,
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of crops, fruit, dairy products, fish, and
livestock exist.
(16) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of
forest land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable
title, or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or
otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any
manner. However, any lessee or other person in possession of forest
land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be excluded
from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee or other
person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the
timber located on such forest land.
(17)(a) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or
directly pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting,
or processing timber, including but not limited to:
(((a))) (i) Road and trail construction, including forest practices
hydraulic projects that include water crossing structures, and
associated activities and maintenance;
(((b))) (ii) Harvesting, final and intermediate;
(((c))) (iii) Precommercial thinning;
(((d))) (iv) Reforestation;
(((e))) (v) Fertilization;
(((f))) (vi) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;
(((g))) (vii) Salvage of trees; and
(((h))) (viii) Brush control.
(b) "Forest practice" ((shall)) does not include preparatory work
such as tree marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or
harvesting of incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries,
ferns, greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which
cannot normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils,
timber, or public resources.
(18) "Forest practices hydraulic project" means a hydraulic
project, as defined under RCW 77.55.011, that requires a forest
practices application or notification under this chapter.
(19) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 76.09.040.
(20) "Forest road," as it applies to the operation of the road
maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules
on small forest landowners, means a road or road segment that crosses
land that meets the definition of forest land, but excludes residential
access roads.
(21) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by
agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if
the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately
before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for
planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does
not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural
methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(22) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to
the board dated April 29, 1999.
(23) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices
except an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.
(24) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.
(25) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in
addition ((shall)) means capital improvements of the state or its
political subdivisions.
(26) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 76.09.450.
(27) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial
species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include
Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that
term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(28) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any part of the
legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract
of sale, "timber owner" ((shall)) means the contract purchaser.
(29) "Unconfined channel migration zone" means the area within
which the active channel of an unconfined stream is prone to move and
where the movement would result in a potential near-term loss of
riparian forest adjacent to the stream. Sizeable islands with
productive timber may exist within the zone.
(30) "Unconfined stream" means generally fifth order or larger
waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location, creating a
complex floodplain characterized by extensive gravel bars, disturbance
species of vegetation of variable age, numerous side channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland complexes. Many of these
streams have dikes and levees that may temporarily or permanently
restrict channel movement.
(31) "Forest practices habitat conservation plan" means the habitat
conservation plan that the department submitted to the United States
fish and wildlife service and the national marine fisheries service in
December of 2005 and approved by the services in May of 2006, as
amended.

--- END ---