BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.030 and 2004 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Except for funds distributed to the account
pursuant to RCW 69.50.540, any nongeneral fund-state funds collected
for this program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust
account and may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in
the account shall be used ((exclusively)) for the purposes of this
chapter, including payments to participating managed health care
systems on behalf of enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of
administering the plan and for the purposes in subsection (2) of this
section.
((During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general
fund.))
(2) Twenty-two percent of the funds distributed to the account from
RCW 69.50.540 must be used to fund evidence-based or research-based,
intensive community interventions shown to promote recovery and reduce
the need for inpatient hospitalization for persons with mental illness,
persons with co-occurring mental illness and chemical dependency
disorders, or both. Funds expended under this subsection must be used
for evidence-based or research-based peer support services, including
peer bridger programs; crisis services including mobile crisis outreach
programs, crisis stabilization, and crisis triage; inpatient transition
support programs; or supported housing programs.
(3) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or
on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter,
including payments to participating managed health care systems on
behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering
the plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
(((3))) (4) The ((administrator)) director shall take every
precaution to see that none of the funds in the separate accounts
created in this section or that any premiums paid either by subsidized
or nonsubsidized enrollees are commingled in any way, except that the
((administrator)) director may combine funds designated for
administration of the plan into a single administrative account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---