BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that local
school districts design, build, own, and manage public school
facilities. School districts are assisted in providing public school
facilities primarily through the school construction assistance grant
program specified in chapter 28A.525 RCW. This grant program provides
financial assistance for new schools to accommodate enrollment growth
and for the modernization and replacement of existing schools while
respecting local decisions and control by locally elected school
boards.
(2) The legislature also finds that some school districts may need
additional assistance to provide school facilities to meet education
reforms as provided in chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2261), chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (Substitute House Bill
No. 2776), and chapter 25, Laws of 2013 2nd sp.s. (Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1872), related to all-day kindergarten, K-3
class size reduction, and science, technology, engineering, and math
literacy.
(3) The legislature intends to provide financial assistance to
school districts that need additional help to provide school facilities
that may facilitate the implementation of these educational reforms.
The most cost-effective way to provide that assistance without
impairing operating budget funds currently devoted to educational
purposes is through high rated general obligation bonds. It is the
intent of the legislature to authorize eight hundred twenty-five
million dollars in general obligation bonds and appropriate those bond
proceeds in this and the following three fiscal biennia to accomplish
the purpose of this act.

PART 2
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 For the purpose of providing state funds
for public school facilities, the state finance committee is authorized
to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum
of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars, or as much thereof as may
be required, to finance projects and grant programs specified in this
act and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section
may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall
determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale
of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 201 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. If the state
finance committee deems it necessary to issue taxable bonds in order to
comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any deposits otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of financial management if it is determined that any such
transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the
purposes specified in section 101 of this act and for the payment of
expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds. These
proceeds shall be administered by the office of financial management
subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements. On each date on which any interest or principal and
interest payment is due the state treasurer shall withdraw from any
general state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in
the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to
the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) Bonds issued under section 201 of this
act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state of
Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall
contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as
the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act, and
section 203 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive
method for the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 The bonds authorized in section 201 of
this act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds under
state control and for all funds of any other public body.

PART 3
MODERNIZING STEM FACILITIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 28A.188
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that to achieve improvements in
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics literacy specialized
school plant facilities are required. Adequate STEM facilities support
interactive, project-based STEM curricula and support STEM teachers who
are attempting to deliver interactive, project-based STEM curricula.
The legislature also recognizes that to achieve expected improvements
in STEM literacy the development and modernization of specialized STEM
facilities must occur at a faster pace than the typical thirty to
fifty-year cycle of modernizing or replacing school plant facilities.
The legislature intends to speed up the development and modernization
of specialized STEM facilities through the grant program described in
this section.
(2) The specialized STEM facility grant program must be
administered by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance specified in
RCW 28A.188.030 and the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW
28A.188.050. The superintendent of public instruction must develop
grant application materials in consultation with the statewide STEM
organization, must review applications for accuracy and financial
reasonableness, and must administer awarded grants. With funds
specifically appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of
public instruction must contract with the statewide STEM organization
specified in RCW 28A.188.050 to evaluate applications against the
criteria specified in subsection (4) of this section and recommend a
single rank-ordered list of grant applications. The superintendent of
public instruction may modify the rank-ordered list received by the
statewide STEM organization for inclusion in the office's capital
budget request, but must also submit to the governor and fiscal
committees of the legislature the original ranking by the statewide
STEM organization with explanations for any changes made to the
ranking. The governor may use the original list prepared by the
statewide STEM organization or may consider any changes recommended by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction in preparing the
governor's capital budget request.
(3) One hundred percent of project costs are eligible for grants
under this program for:
(a) Facilities owned by public school districts or public charter
schools used for grades nine through twelve;
(b) Facilities built or modernized more than ten years prior to the
grant application; and
(c) Project costs for design, construction, project management,
capitalized and noncapitalized equipment and fixtures, and necessary
utility, educational technology infrastructure, and information
technology systems upgrades to support the specialized STEM facilities.
(4) The criteria listed in this subsection must be used to rank
grant requests. In applying these criteria, the statewide STEM
organization should seek to recommend funding for projects that
modernize the most inadequate facilities, to be used by the most
qualified STEM teachers, expected to result in the greatest gains in
STEM literacy for the greatest number of students for the aggregate
amount of proposed grant funding, while improving specialized STEM
facilities in rural, suburban, and urban districts in all parts of the
state. The criteria are:
(a) The extent that existing STEM facilities are inadequate
including the lack of adequate STEM facilities to meet graduation
requirements in RCW 28A.150.220;
(b) A demonstration that existing STEM faculty are in place and are
qualified to deliver an interactive, project-based STEM curriculum in
the proposed specialized STEM facilities, or a plan and budget are in
place to recruit or train such STEM faculty;
(c) The expected gains in STEM literacy that are expected from the
proposed specialized STEM facilities in comparison to the proposed
project costs;
(d) The STEM facilities are needed in schools with the highest free
and reduced-price school lunch enrollment percentages;
(e) A broad distribution of grants across the state benefiting
rural, suburban, and urban districts; and
(f) Economic conditions within the district that limit the ability
of the district to finance the necessary classroom space from local
sources.
(5) For the first round of grant applications to be considered for
grants from the appropriation provided in section 302(2) of this act or
for inclusion in the governor's capital budget request for the 2015-2017 biennium, an expedited grant application and review process must
be conducted by the superintendent of public instruction and the
statewide STEM organization. The first rank-ordered list must
consider, in addition to the criteria in subsection (4) of this
section, projects that demonstrate innovative approaches to the design
and construction of specialized STEM facilities, including facilities
for smaller schools that are flexible and convertible to support
education in a variety of STEM disciplines. The first rank-ordered
list of proposed grants must be submitted to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October
30, 2014. Following that first submission, the superintendent of
public instruction must prepare a biennial grant application cycle for
subsequent biennia.
(6) Modernized spaces funded with this grant program in the prior
ten years are not eligible to receive state funding for modernization
through this grant program or the school construction assistance
program for the space that has been modernized with this grant program.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall write
rules to ensure new space added with funding provided by this grant is
included in the eligible inventory for the school construction
assistance program.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance, must prepare
a plan for evaluating the student performance outcomes resulting from
the STEM facility grant program. The evaluation plan and estimated
cost must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by January 1, 2015. The evaluation plan must provide an initial
evaluation report on student outcomes by January 1, 2019. The report
must also consider options for expanding the grant program to improve
specialized STEM facilities for middle and elementary schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 Specialized STEM Facility Grant Program (92000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation is for grants for the following
list of STEM facility improvement projects:

Franklin Pierce - Washington High School . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
University Place - Curtis High School . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
Zillah School District - Expand Engineering Facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Enumclaw - Stem Computer Lab . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

(2) $40,750,000 of the appropriation is for the top ranked projects
under the process specified in section 301 of this act.
(3) $250,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in section 301
of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000,000

PART 4
ALL-DAY KINDERGARTEN
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that some school districts may need
additional financial assistance to provide classroom capacity to
support the phase-in of state-funded all-day kindergarten specified in
this chapter even though the school construction assistance program
under chapter 28A.525 RCW has included all-day kindergarten in the
calculation of necessary classroom space since 2001. The legislature
intends to assist school districts in the phase-in of all-day
kindergarten with the grant program described in this section.
(2) The all-day kindergarten facility grant program must be
administered by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with an advisory committee. The advisory committee must
include three school district facility managers, one each from an
urban, suburban, and rural school district, selected by the
superintendent of public instruction, and four community members
selected by the governor representing parents and organizations
concerned with early education and student academic performance. The
superintendent of public instruction must develop grant application
materials in consultation with the advisory committee, must review
applications for accuracy and financial reasonableness, and must
administer awarded grants. The advisory committee must review
applications against the criteria specified in subsection (4) of this
section and recommend a single rank-ordered list. The superintendent
of public instruction may modify the rank-ordered list received by the
advisory committee for inclusion in the agency's capital budget
request, but must also submit to the governor and fiscal committees of
the legislature the original ranking by the advisory committee with
explanations for any changes made to the ranking. The governor may use
the original list prepared by the advisory committee or may consider
any changes recommended by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction in preparing the governor's capital budget request.
(3) One hundred percent of project costs necessary to provide
additional classroom space at existing elementary schools are eligible
for kindergarten classroom grants under this program for:
(a) Facilities owned by public school districts or public charter
schools;
(b) Facilities built or modernized prior to 2003; and
(c) Project costs for design, construction, purchase, and
installation of modular buildings, project management, capitalized
equipment, and fixtures. Costs for purchase or lease of portables or
other facilities not installed on permanent foundations are not
eligible.
(4) The criteria listed in this subsection must be used to rank
grant requests. In applying these criteria, the advisory committee
should seek to recommend funding for projects that provide necessary
classroom space in districts furthest behind in implementing state-funded all-day kindergarten, or for districts that have implemented
state-funded all-day kindergarten in temporary spaces, with the highest
enrollment percentages of students eligible for free and reduced-price
school lunches, in districts least able to provide the necessary
classroom space from local sources. The criteria are:
(a) The extent that implementing state-funded all-day kindergarten
may be assisted by additional classroom capacity as verified by site
visits by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
School districts that have implemented state-funded all-day
kindergarten in temporary spaces must be ranked as high as schools not
having implemented state-funded all-day kindergarten due to a lack of
space. For the purposes of this subsection, temporary spaces mean
spaces that are not designed as a classroom nor typically used as a
classroom, such as the library, auditorium, gymnasium, or in
neighboring community facilities not owned by the district;
(b) The kindergarten classroom space is needed in schools with the
highest free and reduced-price school lunch enrollment percentages; and
(c) Economic conditions within the district that limit the ability
of the district to finance the necessary classroom space from local
sources.
(5) For the first round of grant applications to be considered for
grants from the appropriation provided in section 402(1) of this act or
for inclusion in the governor's capital budget request for the 2015-2017 biennium, an expedited grant application and review process must
be conducted by the superintendent of public instruction and the
advisory committee. The first rank-ordered list of proposed grants
must be submitted to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by October 30, 2014.
Following that first submission, the superintendent of public
instruction must prepare a biennial grant application cycle for
subsequent biennia.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
write rules to ensure new space added with funding provided by this
grant is included in the eligible inventory for the school construction
assistance program. Grant funds provided under this section must not
be counted as local match for the school construction assistance
program. The all-day kindergarten program is not intended to replace
the school construction assistance program for providing state
assistance for the construction of new schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 State-Funded All-Day Kindergarten Grant Program
(92000027)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $49,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the top
ranked projects under the process specified in section 401 of this act.
(2) $250,000 of the appropriation is for administrative costs for
implementing the grant program specified in section 401 of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000,000

PART 5
K-3 CLASS SIZE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that some school districts may need
additional financial assistance to provide classroom capacity and
facilities to support the phase-in of state-funded smaller class sizes
in kindergarten through third grade. The legislature intends to
determine the extent that class size reductions might be facilitated by
providing financial assistance to school districts for increasing
classroom capacity and facilities and whether the benefits of class
size reductions are influenced by the number of students in a physical
classroom, or by the student to teacher ratio. The legislature intends
to assist school districts implementing state-funded class size
reductions in kindergarten through third grade through the grant
program required in this section.
(2)(a) Prior to implementing the intended grant program described
in this section the office of the superintendent of public instruction
must determine what features of smaller class sizes, specified in (b)
of this subsection, most reliably produce improvements in student
outcomes, what is the current status of those class size features in
the state's public schools, and how best to achieve class size
reductions for kindergarten through third grade based on the class size
features that produce the most reliable gains in student outcomes.
(b) The office of the superintendent for public instruction must
review research compiled and evaluated by the Washington institute for
public policy on the benefits of reductions in kindergarten through
third grade class size to determine which of the following class size
features are most reliably associated with gains in student outcomes:
(i) An actual smaller number of students in a physical classroom;
or
(ii) A smaller student to teacher ratio.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
complete the currently funded inventory of public school classroom
capacity in order to determine the current status of the actual number
of students in physical classrooms in elementary schools. This
determination must be specified by grade level, or by kindergarten,
primary grades, and elementary grades for classrooms with multigrade
enrollments. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
must also determine the current status of student-teacher ratios in
elementary schools. This determination must be specified by grade
level, or by kindergarten, primary grades, and elementary grades for
classrooms with multigrade enrollments.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
consider the information and determinations resulting from (b) and (c)
of this subsection in recommending to the appropriate committees of the
legislature provisions and criteria for a grant program to assist
school districts to implement state-funded class size reductions in
kindergarten through third grade. At a minimum, the provisions must
require the use of an advisory committee in evaluating grant requests,
the provision of grants that fund one hundred percent of project costs
necessary to provide additional classroom space or other modifications
at existing elementary schools to achieve state-funded class size
reductions in kindergarten through third grade for facilities owned by
public school districts or public charter schools, including costs for
design, construction, purchase, and installation of modular buildings,
project management, capitalized equipment, and fixtures. At a minimum,
the recommended criteria for prioritizing projects must include the
school's free and reduced-price school lunch enrollment percentage.
Costs for purchase or lease of portables or other facilities not
installed on permanent foundations must not be eligible for grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to 2013 2nd sp.s.
c 19 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 Kindergarten/Third Grade Class Size Reduction Grant
Program (92000028)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely to accomplish the tasks specified in section 501 of this act and
prepare a report on the determinations and recommendations to be
submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2014.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000,000

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Sections 201 through 206 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---