BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, in order to
comply with federal requirements under Title IV-D of the federal social
security act, it is necessary to provide to the department of social
and health services' division of child support, the authority to
withhold, restrict, or suspend driver's licenses, professional or
occupational licenses, and recreational or sporting licenses of
individuals who owe overdue child support.
(2) Nearly every year, bills introduced in the legislature propose
new licenses and licensing requirements. If a bill does not contain
the federally required authority to withhold, restrict, or suspend
certain licenses, department of social and health services and
legislative staff must work with the bill sponsor and the appropriate
legislative committee to make sure that the bill is amended to add the
federally required authority before adoption. The legislature finds
that this is not an efficient use of our limited state resources.
(3) To address this problem, the legislature intends to adopt a
statute which provides that any agency of the state of Washington which
issues driver's licenses, professional or occupational licenses, or
recreational or sporting licenses must withhold, restrict, or suspend
the license of a responsible parent when the department of social and
health services certifies that parent's name as being a licensee who is
not in compliance with a child support order, under RCW 74.20A.320.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.20A.320 and 2009 c 408 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may serve upon a responsible parent a notice
informing the responsible parent of the department's intent to submit
the parent's name to the department of licensing and any appropriate
licensing entity responsible for issuing or renewing driver's licenses,
professional or occupational licenses, or recreational or sporting
licenses as a licensee who is not in compliance with a child support
order. The department shall attach a copy of the responsible parent's
child support order to the notice. Service of the notice must be by
certified mail, return receipt requested. If service by certified mail
is not successful, service shall be by personal service.
(2) The notice of noncompliance must include the following
information:
(a) The address and telephone number of the department's division
of child support office that issued the notice;
(b) That in order to prevent the department from certifying the
parent's name to the department of licensing or any other licensing
entity, the parent has twenty days from receipt of the notice to
contact the department and:
(i) Pay the overdue support amount in full;
(ii) Request an adjudicative proceeding as provided in RCW
74.20A.322;
(iii) Agree to a payment schedule with the department as provided
in RCW 74.20A.326; or
(iv) File an action to modify the child support order with the
appropriate court or administrative forum, in which case the department
will stay the certification process up to six months;
(c) That failure to contact the department within twenty days of
receipt of the notice will result in certification of the responsible
parent's name to the department of licensing and any other appropriate
licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order. Upon
receipt of the notice:
(i) The licensing entity will suspend or not renew the parent's
license and the department of licensing will suspend or not renew any
driver's license that the parent holds until the parent provides the
department of licensing and the licensing entity with a release from
the department stating that the responsible parent is in compliance
with the child support order;
(ii) The department of fish and wildlife will suspend a fishing
license, hunting license, occupational licenses, such as a commercial
fishing license, or any other license issued under chapter 77.32 RCW
that the responsible parent may possess, and suspension of a license by
the department of fish and wildlife may also affect the parent's
ability to obtain permits, such as special hunting permits, issued by
the department. Notice from the department of licensing that a
responsible parent's driver's license has been suspended shall serve as
notice of the suspension of a license issued under chapter 77.32 RCW;
(d) That suspension of a license will affect insurability if the
responsible parent's insurance policy excludes coverage for acts
occurring after the suspension of a license;
(e) If the responsible parent subsequently comes into compliance
with the child support order, the department will promptly provide the
parent and the appropriate licensing entities with a release stating
that the parent is in compliance with the order.
(3) When a responsible parent who is served notice under subsection
(1) of this section subsequently complies with the child support order,
a copy of a release stating that the responsible parent is in
compliance with the order shall be transmitted by the department to the
appropriate licensing entities.
(4) The department of licensing and a licensing entity may renew,
reinstate, or otherwise extend a license in accordance with the
licensing entity's or the department of licensing's rules after the
licensing entity or the department of licensing receives a copy of the
release specified in subsection (3) of this section. The department of
licensing and a licensing entity may waive any applicable requirement
for reissuance, renewal, or other extension if it determines that the
imposition of that requirement places an undue burden on the person and
that waiver of the requirement is consistent with the public interest.
(5)(a) Any agency of the state of Washington that issues driver's
licenses, professional or occupational licenses, or recreational or
sporting licenses must withhold, restrict, or suspend the license of a
responsible parent when the department certifies that parent's name as
being a licensee who is not in compliance with a child support order,
under RCW 74.20A.320.
(b) The requirement in (a) of this subsection applies to all state
licensing entities regardless of whether there is a separate agency
statute on the same subject.

--- END ---