BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that many Washington students pursuing
higher education face a growing financial burden. The recent rise in
tuition rates and downturn in the economy make attending higher
education even more financially difficult for students. The
legislature further finds that Washington has gone from subsidizing
two-thirds of a student's tuition to subsidizing just over one-third.
The difference has caused many students to rely heavily on educational
debt. Giving Washington higher education students a sales tax holiday
on instructional materials would help relieve some of the financial
burden of today's higher education costs. Therefore, it is the
legislature's intention to create a sales tax holiday for school
instructional material.
(2) It is the intent of this legislation to provide a sales tax
holiday on school instructional material for the purpose described
under RCW 82.32.808(2)(e). The legislature further intends to review
the tax exemption and its actual fiscal impact on state revenues to
determine if the fiscal impact to state revenues reasonably conforms to
the fiscal estimate in the fiscal note for this legislation.
(3) The provisions of this sales tax holiday are to be administered
consistent with section 322 of the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement, as amended on October 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations provided in this
section, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
school instructional material for personal or nonbusiness use.
(2) The exemption authorized in this section only applies to
purchases made on the second adjacent Friday, Saturday, and Sunday in
August and the third adjacent Friday, Saturday, and Sunday in
September.
(3) For sellers who electronically file their taxes, the department
must provide a separate tax reporting line for exemption amounts
claimed under this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "school instructional
material" means any written material commonly used by a student in a
course of study as a reference and to learn the subject being taught,
including reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks, and
workbooks.
(5) Nothing in this section requires the seller to make tax exempt
retail sales of school instructional material during the time periods
provided in subsection (2) of this section. A seller may choose to
make sales of school instructional material during these time periods,
collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales tax collected to
the state as otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the personal or
nonbusiness use of school instructional material.
(2) The definitions, conditions, and limitations in section 2 of
this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2019.

--- END ---