BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.72 RCW
to read as follows:
A judgment or order found to have been secured through perjury or
fraud must be vacated or modified. A motion to vacate or modify a
judgment may be brought within one year of a party securing or
discovering evidence of fraud or perjury.

--- END ---