BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
When an authority constructs a transportation facility, it must
consider the potential impacts of that facility on parking availability
for residents nearby. The authority must provide appropriate parking
impact mitigation for residents, as determined by the authority in
collaboration with the local government of the area in which the
parking impacts occur. Parking impact mitigation may include, but is
not limited to, subsidizing zoned residential parking permits in the
vicinity of the facility. If a local government implements zoned
residential parking permits as a direct result of the parking impacts
of the facility, the authority must pay for the cost of the parking
permits in the vicinity of the facility.

--- END ---