BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.380 and 1965 c 8 s 43.43.380 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((minimum)) monthly salary and benefits paid to state patrol
officers shall be ((as follows: Officers, three hundred dollars; staff
or technical sergeants, three hundred twenty-five dollars; line
sergeants, three hundred fifty dollars; lieutenants, three hundred
seventy-five dollars; captains, four hundred twenty-five dollars))
competitive with comparable law enforcement agencies within the
boundaries of the state of Washington. Adjustments are intended to
maintain the existing salary levels within the fiftieth percentile of
other Washington state law enforcement compensation plans.

--- END ---