BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of social and health services
shall study issues, utilizing existing resources, related to the
issuance of photo identification cards to each eligible household
participating in the supplemental nutrition assistance program and
temporary assistance for needy families program. The department may
consult with the Washington state institute for public policy for
purposes of the study. The study should identify the benefits and
practical implementation concerns associated with the required use and
issuance of photo identification cards. The department shall submit a
report to the legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 by December 1,
2014. The report may include any recommendations to the legislature
that may help prevent the fraudulent use of electronic benefit cards.

--- END ---