BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature acknowledges that pursuant to Initiative Measure
No. 688 enacted by Washington state voters in 1998, the state director
of labor and industries is authorized by rule to set a subminimum wage
for youth, and has set a wage for young workers aged fourteen and
fifteen at eighty-five percent of the state minimum wage. The purpose
of this subminimum wage rule is to incentivize employers to hire
unskilled teen workers. The legislature finds that over the last
decade, Washington has consistently ranked among the top ten states
with the highest unemployment rate for sixteen to nineteen year olds,
which negatively impacts an individual's long-term employment prospects
and earning potential.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Employers may pay teen training wages to new employees sixteen to
nineteen years of age at eighty-five percent of the minimum wage
required under RCW 49.46.020, or at the minimum wage rate required
under federal law, whichever is greater. Employees working under the
teen training wage may not constitute more than ten percent of an
employer's workforce, except that employers with fewer than twenty
employees may employ two employees at a time using the teen wage.

--- END ---