BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.809 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 11 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger
vehicles, which are ((exclusively)) directly powered by a clean
alternative fuel.
(b) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
qualifying used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty
passenger vehicles, which were modified after their initial purchase,
with an EPA certified conversion to be exclusively powered by a clean
alternative fuel. "Qualifying used passenger cars, light duty trucks,
and medium duty passenger vehicles" means vehicles that:
(i) Are part of a fleet of at least five vehicles, all owned by the
same person;
(ii) Have an odometer reading of less than thirty thousand miles;
(iii) Are less than two years past their original date of
manufacture; and
(iv) Are being sold for the first time after modification.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.
(3) ((As used in this section,)) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen,
or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the
California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the
California code of regulations, effective January 1, 2005, and the
rules of the Washington state department of ecology.
(b) "Directly powered" means the direct source of power to a
vehicle's drive train. "Directly powered" does not include auxiliary
sources of power used to regenerate a battery that acts as a direct
source of power to a drive train.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.809 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 11 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Until July 1, 2015, the provisions of this chapter do not
apply in respect to the use of new passenger cars, light duty trucks,
and medium duty passenger vehicles, which are ((exclusively)) directly
powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(b) Until July 1, 2015, the provisions of this chapter do not apply
to the use of qualifying used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and
medium duty passenger vehicles, which were modified after their initial
purchase with an EPA certified conversion to be exclusively powered by
a clean alternative fuel. As used in this subsection, "qualifying used
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.809.
(2) "Clean alternative fuel" ((has)) and "directly powered" have
the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.809.
(3) A taxpayer is not liable for the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020
on the use, on or after July 1, 2015, of a passenger car, light duty
truck, or medium duty passenger vehicle exclusively powered by a clean
alternative fuel, if the taxpayer used such vehicle in this state
before July 1, 2015, and the use was exempt under this section from the
tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---