BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.19.200 and 1993 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The minority and women's business enterprises account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 39.19.090,
39.19.210, 39.19.220, and 39.19.230 shall be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
defraying all or part of the costs of the office in administering this
chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation.

--- END ---