BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that global climate
change presents an immediate challenge to the state of Washington to
move away from a carbon-based economy and reduce its use of greenhouse
gas-producing fossil fuels. The legislature further finds that
beverage containers that are not recycled contribute substantially to
unnecessary waste, including wasted raw materials, wasted electricity
to create new containers, and litter, which takes up scarce landfill
space. Therefore, the legislature finds that increased incentives to
recycle beverage containers will reduce waste and reduce the use of
fossil fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Beverage" means beer or other malt beverages and mineral
waters, soda water, and similar carbonated soft drinks in liquid form
and intended for human consumption.
(2) "Beverage container" means the individual, separate, sealed
glass, metal, or plastic bottle, can, jar, or carton containing a
beverage.
(3) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(4) "Consumer" means every person who purchases a beverage in a
beverage container for use or consumption.
(5) "Dealer" means every person in this state who engages in the
sale of beverages in beverage containers to a consumer.
(6) "Distributor" means every person who engages in the sale of
beverages in beverage containers to a dealer in this state including
any manufacturer who engages in such sales.
(7) "Manufacturer" means every person bottling, canning, or
otherwise filling beverage containers for sale to distributors or
dealers.
(8) "Place of business of a dealer" means the location at which a
dealer sells or offers for sale beverages in beverage containers to
consumers.
(9) "Redemption center" means a board-approved facility that
accepts beverage containers for return, as provided in section 8 of
this act.
(10) "Use or consumption" includes the exercise of any right or
power over a beverage incident to the ownership thereof, other than the
sale or the keeping or retention of a beverage for the purposes of
sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, every beverage container sold or offered for sale in this
state must have a refund value of not less than five cents.
(2) Every beverage container certified as provided in section 7 of
this act, sold or offered for sale in this state, must have a refund
value of not less than five cents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in section 5 of this
act, a dealer may not refuse to accept from any person any empty
beverage containers of the kind, size, and brand sold by the dealer, or
refuse to pay to that person the refund value of a beverage container.
(2) A distributor may not refuse to accept from a dealer or
redemption center any empty beverage containers of the kind, size, and
brand sold by the distributor, or refuse to pay the dealer or
redemption center the refund value of a beverage container.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A dealer or redemption center may refuse
to accept from any person, and a distributor may refuse to accept from
a dealer or redemption center, any empty beverage container that does
not state on the beverage container a refund value.
(2) A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of
empty beverage containers if the place of business of the dealer and
the kind and brand of empty beverage containers are included in an
order of the board approving a redemption center.
(3) A dealer or redemption center may refuse to accept and to pay
the refund value of any beverage container visibly containing or
contaminated by a substance other than water, residue of the original
contents, or ordinary dust.
(4) A dealer or redemption center may refuse to accept and to pay
the refund value of more than one hundred forty-four individual
beverage containers returned by any one person during one day.
(5) In order to refuse beverage containers under subsection (3) or
(4) of this section, the dealer or redemption center must post in each
area where containers are received a clearly visible and legible sign
containing the following information:

"NOTICE

Washington state law allows a dealer or redemption center to
refuse to accept:

1. Beverage containers visibly containing or contaminated by
a substance other than water, residue of the original contents,
or ordinary dust; or

2. More than one hundred forty-four individual beverage
containers from any one person during one day."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Every beverage container sold or offered
for sale in this state by a dealer must clearly indicate by embossing
or by a stamp, or by a label or other method securely affixed to the
beverage container, the refund value of the container.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to glass beverage
containers designed for beverages having a brand name permanently
marked thereon that had a refund value of not less than five cents.
(3) No person may sell or offer for sale at retail in this state
any metal beverage container containing detachable metal parts as
specified by RCW 70.132.030, as existing on the effective date of this
section.
(4) No person may sell or offer for sale at retail in this state
metal beverage containers connected to each other by a separate holding
device constructed of plastic rings or other material that will not
decompose by photobiodegradation, chemical degradation, or
biodegradation within one hundred twenty days of disposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) To promote the use in this state of
reusable beverage containers of uniform design, and to facilitate the
return of containers to manufacturers for reuse as a beverage
container, the board may certify beverage containers that satisfy the
requirements of this section.
(2) A beverage container may be certified if:
(a) It is reusable as a beverage container by more than one
manufacturer in the ordinary course of business; and
(b) More than one manufacturer will in the ordinary course of
business accept the beverage container for reuse as a beverage
container and pay the refund value of the container.
(3) The board may by rule establish appropriate liquid capacities
and shapes for beverage containers to be certified or decertified in
accordance with the purposes in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A beverage container may not be certified under this section if
by reason of its shape or design, or by reason of words or symbols
permanently inscribed thereon, whether by engraving, embossing,
painting, or other permanent method, it is reusable as a beverage
container in the ordinary course of business only by a manufacturer of
a beverage sold under a specific brand name.
(5) Unless an application for certification is denied by the board
within sixty days after the filing of the application, the beverage
container must be deemed certified.
(6) The board may review at any time certification of a beverage
container. If after such a review, with written notice and hearing
afforded to the person who filed the application for certification, the
board determines the container is no longer qualified for
certification, the board shall withdraw certification.
(7) Withdrawal of certification is effective not less than thirty
days after written notice to the person who filed the application for
certification and to the manufacturers referred to in subsection (2) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) To facilitate the return of empty
beverage containers and to serve dealers of beverages, any person may
establish a redemption center, subject to the approval of the board, at
which any person may return empty beverage containers and receive
payment of the refund value of such beverage containers.
(2) Application for approval of a redemption center must be filed
with the board. The application must state the name and address of the
person responsible for the establishment and operation of the
redemption center, the kind and brand names of the beverage containers
that will be accepted at the redemption center, and the names and
addresses of the dealers to be served by the redemption center. The
application must include additional information as the board may
require.
(3) The board shall approve a redemption center if it finds the
redemption center will provide a convenient service to persons for the
return of empty beverage containers. The order of the board approving
a redemption center must state the dealers to be served by the
redemption center and the kind and brand names of empty beverage
containers that the redemption center must accept. The order may
contain other provisions to ensure the redemption center will provide
a convenient service to the public as the board may determine.
(4) The board may at any time review approval of a redemption
center. After written notice to the person responsible for the
establishment and operation of the redemption center, and to the
dealers served by the redemption center, the board may, after hearing,
withdraw approval of a redemption center if the board finds there has
not been compliance with its order approving the redemption center, or
if the redemption center no longer provides a convenient service to the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---