BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Article IX of
the state Constitution provides: "It is the paramount duty of the
state to make ample provision for the education of all children
residing within its borders ... " The legislature further finds that
the legislature's duty under Article IX of the state Constitution is to
define and amply fund the program of basic education using dependable
resources.
(2) The legislature acknowledges that while local levies cannot be
used to fund basic education, local levies enable schools to provide
programs and activities beyond that required by Article IX of the state
Constitution. The legislature recognizes that local levies are
important to the educational funding system and is a primary method for
communities to show support of the local schools.
(3) The legislature intends to create a legislative task force to
review the use of local levies by school districts and the equity
issues resulting from various aspects of the local levy process, and to
recommend approaches to address the equity issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint task force on local education
financing reform is created to review the use of local levies by school
districts and the equity issues resulting from various aspects of the
local levy process, recommend approaches and draft legislation to
address the equity issues identified, and submit a report to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2014.
(2) Appointments to the task force shall be completed within thirty
days of the effective date of this section. The task force shall
consist of eight voting members and two ex officio members.
(a) The voting members shall be:
(i) Four members from the house of representatives, two from each
major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
and
(ii) Four members from the senate, two from each major caucus,
appointed by the majority leader and minority leader of the major
caucuses of the senate.
(b) The two ex officio members shall be:
(i) The governor or the governor's designee; and
(ii) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee.
(3) The voting members of the task force shall select cochairs from
the voting members of the task force.
(4) The task force shall:
(a) Review the work of the levy and local effort assistance
technical working group created in accordance with chapter 548, Laws of
2009, and amended by chapter 236, Laws of 2010, and other relevant
studies and information, including the final report of the compensation
technical working group created in accordance with chapter 548, Laws of
2009;
(b) Review the use of local levies by school districts, including
the level of funding and how the funding is used by school districts;
(c) Review equity issues related to various aspects of the local
levy process, including school district levy authority, the
determination of the levy base, the different levy lids, and levy
equalization;
(d) Recommend approaches in a report to the governor and the
legislature to address the equity issues and provide a system for state
and local funds that are distributed in an equitably but not
necessarily equivalent manner so that all children have the opportunity
to meet the state's academic standards and become prepared for
postsecondary careers and education. Any recommendation included in
the report must be supported by at least six voting members of the task
force. The report must include draft legislation to implement the
recommendations of the task force.
(5) Staff support for the task force shall be jointly provided by
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research, with the office of financial management and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction providing data and
models as needed. The first meeting of the task force shall be
convened by the house of representatives office of program research and
senate committee services within forty-five days of the effective date
of this section.
(6) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---