BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95I.020 and 1991 c 319 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each local government and its local hazardous waste plan under
RCW 70.105.220 is required to include a used oil recycling element.
This element shall include:
(a) A plan to reach the local goals for household used oil
recycling established by the local government and the department under
RCW 70.95I.030. The plan shall, to the maximum extent possible,
incorporate voluntary agreements with the private sector and state
agencies to provide sites for the collection of used oil. Where
provided, the plan shall also incorporate residential collection of
used oil;
(b) A plan for enforcing the sign and container ordinances required
by RCW 70.95I.040;
(c) A plan for public education on used oil recycling; ((and))
(d) A plan for addressing best management practices as provided for
under RCW 70.95I.030; and
(e) An estimate of funding needed to implement the requirements of
this chapter. This estimate shall include a budget reserve for
disposal of contaminated oil detected at any public used oil collection
site administered by the local government.
(2) By July 1, 1993, each local government or combination of
contiguous local governments shall submit its used oil recycling
element to the department. The department shall approve or disapprove
the used oil recycling element by January 1, 1994, or within ninety
days of submission, whichever is later. The department shall approve
or disapprove the used oil recycling element if it determines that the
element is consistent with this chapter and the guidelines developed by
the department under RCW 70.95I.030.
(3) Each local government, or combination of contiguous local
governments, shall submit an annual statement to the department
describing the number of used oil collection sites and the quantity of
household used oil recycled for the jurisdiction during the previous
calendar year. The first statement shall be due April 1, 1994.
Subsequent statements shall be due April 1st of each year.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a city or
county to construct or operate a public used oil collection site.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95I.030 and 1991 c 319 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 1992, the department shall, in consultation with
local governments, prepare guidelines for the used oil recycling
elements required by RCW 70.95I.020 and best management practices for
preventing and managing polychlorinated biphenyl contamination at
public used oil collection sites.
(a) The guidelines shall:
(((a))) (i) Require development of local collection and rerefining
goals for household used oil for each entity preparing a used oil
recycling element under RCW 70.95I.020;
(((b))) (ii) Require local government to recommend the number of
used oil collection sites needed to meet the local goals. The
department shall establish criteria regarding minimum levels of used
oil collection sites;
(((c))) (iii) Require local government to identify locations
suitable as public used oil collection sites as described under RCW
70.95I.020(1)(a).
(b) The best management practices for preventing and managing
polychlorinated biphenyl contamination at public used oil collection
sites must include:
(i) Tank testing requirements;
(ii) Contaminated tank labeling and security measures;
(iii) Contaminated tank cleanup standards;
(iv) Proper contaminated used oil disposal as required under
chapter 70.105 RCW and 40 C.F.R. Part 761;
(v) Spill control measures; and
(vi) Model contract language for contracts with used oil collection
vendors.
(2) The department may waive all or part of the specific
requirements of RCW 70.95I.020 if a local government demonstrates to
the satisfaction of the department that the objectives of this chapter
have been met.
(3) The department may prepare and implement a used oil recycling
plan for any local government failing to complete the used oil
recycling element of the plan.
(4) The department shall develop statewide collection and
rerefining goals for household used oil for each calendar year
beginning with calendar year 1994. Goals shall be based on the
estimated statewide collection and rerefining rate for calendar year
1993, and shall increase each year until calendar year 1996, when the
rate shall be eighty percent.
(5) By July 1, 1993, the department shall prepare guidelines
establishing statewide equipment and operating standards for public
used oil collection sites. Standards shall:
(a) Allow the use of used oil collection igloos and other types of
portable used oil collection tanks;
(b) Prohibit the disposal of nonhousehold-generated used oil;
(c) Limit the amount of used oil deposited to five gallons per
household per day;
(d) Ensure adequate protection against leaks and spills; and
(e) Include other requirements deemed appropriate by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Cities and counties may submit a petition for relief to the
department for reimbursement of extraordinary costs associated with
managing unforeseen consequences of used oil contaminated with
polychlorinated biphenyl and compliance with United States
environmental protection agency enforcement orders and
enforcement-related agreements.
(2) The department, in consultation with city and county moderate
risk waste coordinators, the United States environmental protection
agency, and other stakeholders must: Use updated best management
practices guidelines for the collection and management of used oil for
prioritizing and processing the petitions; ensure best management
practices for preventing and managing polychlorinated biphenyl
contamination, as required under RCW 70.95I.030, are met; and determine
if costs for disposal or compliance are extraordinary. Prioritization
of the petitions must be based on, but not limited to, such factors as
disposal costs, costs to meet United States environmental protection
agency enforcement orders or enforcement related agreements, and
whether the costs are extraordinary and could not be reasonably
accommodated and anticipated in accordance with the best management
practices for oil contaminated with polychlorinated biphenyl in the
normal budget process.
(3) Before January 1st of each year, the department must develop
and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house
of representatives a prioritized list of submitted petitions that are
recommended for funding by the legislature, if funded, costs must be
reimbursed from the model toxics control accounts.

--- END ---