BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 11.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person appointed for any type of guardianship under chapter
11.88 RCW may inherit or acquire any property interest or receive any
benefit from any decedent ward of the guardian, if the guardian has
either been convicted of theft or found to have committed financial
exploitation as defined in RCW 74.34.020.
(2)(a) A court may allow a person to acquire or receive an interest
in any property or any other benefit, notwithstanding subsection (1) of
this section, if a court determines by clear, cogent, and convincing
evidence that the decedent ward:
(i) Knew of the theft conviction or financial exploitation; and
(ii) Subsequently ratified in writing his or her intent to transfer
the property interest or benefit to that person.
(b) In determining whether to allow a person to acquire or receive
an interest in any property or any other benefit under (a) of this
subsection, a court may consider, among other things:
(i) The various elements of the decedent's dispositive scheme;
(ii) The decedent's likely intent given the totality of the
circumstances; and
(iii) The degree of harm resulting from the guardian's theft or
financial exploitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 11.88 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to appointment to any guardianship under this chapter a
person must disclose to the court any prior finding of financial
exploitation, conviction, or arrest. Appointed guardians have an
ongoing duty to immediately disclose any new finding of financial
exploitation, conviction, or arrest to the court. Upon disclosure the
court should appoint a guardian ad litem to aid the court in
determining whether removal of the guardian is in the best interest of
the ward. Any person who fails to make the disclosures required under
this section is subject to removal as a guardian and contempt of court.

--- END ---