BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a pilot project to provide an
online option to fulfill the traffic safety education requirements
under RCW 46.20.100.
(2) The pilot project must be limited to one thousand students. At
least forty percent of these students must reside east of the crest of
the Cascade mountains.
(3) The department must adopt rules implementing this section
before students begin receiving online traffic safety education. The
department's rules must include the following:
(a) Direction for how online material will be provided, either by
the department or private driver training schools licensed under this
chapter, or a partnership agreement between the two;
(b) Requirements for in-person training to supplement the online
training curriculum; and
(c) Standards for determining whether students are meeting
educational requirements.
(4)(a) Within six months after the conclusion of the pilot project,
the department must provide a report to the legislature regarding the
success of online delivery of traffic safety education.
(b) This report must include the following information: (i) A
summary of student performance compared to students' performance in
traditional in-person education; (ii) a cost comparison between the
pilot project and in-person education; and (iii) a recommendation to
the legislature as to whether or not the pilot project should be
expanded, including suggestions regarding how an online traffic safety
education program could be improved.
(5) The pilot project ends upon the one thousandth student
completing the online traffic safety education course or June 30, 2016,
whichever is earlier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person eighteen to twenty-four years of age who is applying
for his or her first Washington state driver's license and who did not
complete a course in traffic safety education as required under RCW
46.20.100 must complete a young driver risk prevention traffic safety
course that complies with the requirements of section 3 of this act and
is offered by a licensed driver training school.
(2) Any person who holds a valid driver's license from his or her
previous home state and who is applying for a Washington state driver's
license is exempt from the requirements in this section if he or she
has held that out-of-state driver's license for at least one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic curriculum required under RCW
46.82.420, a driver training school may offer a young driver risk
prevention traffic safety course that complies with the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A young driver risk prevention traffic safety course required
under section 2 of this act must comply with the following
requirements:
(a) The course must be able to be completed in a reasonable time to
not unduly delay an applicant from obtaining a Washington state
driver's license;
(b) The course must meet minimum curriculum requirements developed
by the department, providing information about, among other things:
(i) The dangers of distracted driving; (ii) safe driving techniques
concerning hazards such as severe weather, sharing the road with other
vehicles and pedestrians, and driving in construction and school zones;
and (iii) the duties incumbent upon drivers, such as insurance and
registration requirements and steps drivers must take after an
accident; and
(c) Behind the wheel training must consist of basic skills and
maneuvers to be determined by the department.
(3) If the director is presented with acceptable proof that any
licensed instructor or driver training school is not showing proper
diligence in teaching the basic minimum curriculum as required under
subsection (2) of this section, the instructor or school must appear
before the director and show cause why the license of the instructor or
school should not be revoked for such negligence. If the director does
not accept such reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke the
license of the instructor or school, or both.

--- END ---