BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.250 and 1990 c 241 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where sidewalks are provided it is unlawful for any pedestrian
to walk or otherwise move along and upon an adjacent roadway. Where
sidewalks are provided but wheelchair access is not available,
((disabled)) persons with disabilities who require such access may walk
or otherwise move along and upon an adjacent roadway until they reach
an access point in the sidewalk.
(2) Where sidewalks are not provided, any pedestrian walking or
otherwise moving along and upon a highway shall, when practicable, walk
or move only on the left side of the roadway or its shoulder facing
traffic which may approach from the opposite direction ((and upon
meeting an oncoming vehicle shall move clear of the roadway)).

--- END ---