BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.100 and 2001 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Extractor" means every person who from the person's own land or
from the land of another under a right or license granted by lease or
contract, either directly or by contracting with others for the
necessary labor or mechanical services, for sale or for commercial or
industrial use mines, quarries, takes or produces coal, oil, natural
gas, ore, stone, sand, gravel, clay, mineral or other natural resource
product, or fells, cuts or takes timber, Christmas trees other than
plantation Christmas trees, or other natural products, or takes fish,
shellfish, or other sea or inland water foods or products. "Extractor"
does not include persons performing under contract the necessary labor
or mechanical services for others; ((or)) persons meeting the
definition of farmer under RCW 82.04.213; or persons producing
marijuana.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.213 and 2001 c 118 s 2 and 2001 c 97 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Agricultural product" means any product of plant cultivation
or animal husbandry including, but not limited to: A product of
horticulture, grain cultivation, vermiculture, viticulture, or
aquaculture as defined in RCW 15.85.020; plantation Christmas trees;
short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035; turf; or any
animal including but not limited to an animal that is a private sector
cultured aquatic product as defined in RCW 15.85.020, or a bird, or
insect, or the substances obtained from such an animal. "Agricultural
product" does not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products, or animals defined as pet animals under RCW
16.70.020.
(2) "Farmer" means any person engaged in the business of growing,
raising, or producing, upon the person's own lands or upon the lands in
which the person has a present right of possession, any agricultural
product to be sold. "Farmer" does not include a person growing,
raising, or producing such products for the person's own consumption;
a person selling any animal or substance obtained therefrom in
connection with the person's business of operating a stockyard or a
slaughter or packing house; or a person in respect to the business of
taking, cultivating, or raising timber.
(3) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture,"
"horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to
include or relate to marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused
products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include
marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.
(4) "Marijuana," "useable marijuana," and "marijuana-infused
products" have the same meaning as in RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 202 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as
of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts
131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the
dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and
"vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.365 percent through June 30, 2013,
and beginning July 1, 2013, multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 203 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as
of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts
131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the
dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and
"vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as
of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts
131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the
dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and
"vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.
(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in
which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or
wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that
is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited
outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only
applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are
the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.365 percent through June 30, 2013,
and beginning July 1, 2013, multiplied by the rate of 0.35 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.260 and 2013 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, dairy products; or selling dairy
products that the person has manufactured to purchasers who either
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of state or
purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in
the manufacturing of a dairy product; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state
or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the
manufacturing of a dairy product.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "dairy products"
means:
(A) Products, not including any marijuana-infused product, that as
of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts
131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the
dairy products, such as whey and casein; and
(B) Products comprised of not less than seventy percent dairy
products that qualify under (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection, measured by
weight or volume.
(iii) The preferential tax rate provided to taxpayers under this
subsection (1)(c) does not apply to sales of dairy products on or after
July 1, 2023, where a dairy product is used by the purchaser as an
ingredient or component in the manufacturing in Washington of a dairy
product;
(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2015, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "fruits" and
"vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (11), this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2040.
(ii) With respect to the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of commercial airplanes, this
subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1st of the year in
which the department makes a determination that any final assembly or
wing assembly of any version or variant of a commercial airplane that
is the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850 has been sited
outside the state of Washington. This subsection (11)(e)(ii) only
applies to the manufacturing or sale of commercial airplanes that are
the basis of a siting of a significant commercial airplane
manufacturing program in the state under RCW 82.32.850.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.330 and 2001 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to any farmer ((that
sells)) in respect to the sale of any agricultural product at wholesale
or to any farmer who grows, raises, or produces agricultural products
owned by others, such as custom feed operations. This exemption
((shall)) does not apply to any person selling such products at retail
or to any person selling manufactured substances or articles.
(2) This chapter ((shall)) also does not apply to any persons who
participate in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture
with respect to land enrolled in that program.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.04.331 and 1998 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a person
engaging within this state in the business of: (a) Making wholesale
sales to farmers of seed conditioned for use in planting and not
packaged for retail sale; or (b) conditioning seed for planting owned
by others.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "seed" means seed potatoes
and all other "agricultural seed" as defined in RCW 15.49.011. "Seed"
does not include "flower seeds" or "vegetable seeds" as defined in RCW
15.49.011, or any other seeds or propagative portions of plants used to
grow marijuana, ornamental flowers, or ((used to grow)) any type of
bush, moss, fern, shrub, or tree.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.04.4266 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 201 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the
gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving,
freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables; or
(b) Selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the
seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the
ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person
taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve
records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the
goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of
business out of this state.
(2) For purposes of this section, "fruits" and "vegetables" do not
include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.
(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(((3))) (4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.04.625 and 2007 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to any:
(a) Person performing custom farming services for a farmer, when
the person performing the custom farming services is: (i) An eligible
farmer; or (ii) at least fifty percent owned by an eligible farmer; or
(b) Person performing farm management services, contract labor
services, services provided with respect to animals that are
agricultural products, or any combination of these services, for a
farmer or for a person performing custom farming services, when the
person performing the farm management services, contract labor
services, services with respect to animals, or any combination of these
services, and the farmer or person performing custom farming services
are related.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a)(i) "Custom farming services" means the performance of specific
farming operations through the use of any farm machinery or equipment,
farm implement, or draft animal, together with an operator, when: (i)
The specific farming operation consists of activities directly related
to the growing, raising, or producing of any agricultural product to be
sold or consumed by a farmer; and (ii) the performance of the specific
farming operation is for, and under a contract with, or the direction
or supervision of, a farmer. "Custom farming services" does not
include the custom application of fertilizers, chemicals, or
biologicals, or any services related to the growing, raising, or
producing of marijuana.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (2)(a), "specific farming
operation" includes specific planting, cultivating, or harvesting
activities, or similar specific farming operations. The term does not
include veterinary services as defined in RCW 18.92.010; farrier,
boarding, training, or appraisal services; artificial insemination or
stud services, agricultural consulting services; packing or processing
of agricultural products; or pumping or other waste disposal services.
(b) "Eligible farmer" means a person who is eligible for an
exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855 at the time that the custom
farming services are rendered, regardless of whether the person has
applied for an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(c) "Farm management services" means the consultative decisions
made for the operations of the farm including, but not limited to,
determining which crops to plant, the choice and timing of application
of fertilizers and chemicals, the horticultural practices to apply, the
marketing of crops and livestock, and the care and feeding of animals.
"Farm management services" does not include any services related to the
growing, raising, or producing of marijuana.
(d) "Related" means having any of the relationships specifically
described in section 267(b) (1), (2), and (4) through (13) of the
internal revenue code, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2007.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.08.010 and 2010 c 106 s 210 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1)(a)(i) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price"
means the total amount of consideration, except separately stated
trade-in property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and
services, for which tangible personal property, extended warranties,
digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other
services or anything else defined as a "retail sale" under RCW
82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether
received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total amount of
consideration is allowed for the following: (((i))) (A) The seller's
cost of the property sold; (((ii))) (B) the cost of materials used,
labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to
the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of
the seller; (((iii))) (C) charges by the seller for any services
necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation
charges; (((iv))) (D) delivery charges; and (((v))) (E) installation
charges.
(ii) When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" ((shall)) must be determined as nearly as possible
according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar
products of like quality and character under such rules as the
department may prescribe;
(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods,
digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or
anything else defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050, if the amount
is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the
consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser;
(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration
received by the seller from a third party if:
(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other
than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a
price reduction or discount on the sale;
(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or
discount through to the purchaser;
(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is
fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the
item to the purchaser; and
(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:
(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other
documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount
where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized,
distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that
the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon,
certificate, or documentation is presented;
(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a
member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or
discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any
patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or
(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party
price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or
on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the
purchaser;
(2)(a) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean:
(i) The state and its departments and institutions when making
sales to the state and its departments and institutions; or
(ii) A professional employer organization when a covered employee
coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer
agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale at retail that
is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the
client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be
the seller and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax
imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address;
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at
wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging in business," "cash
discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state," ((and)) "within
this state," marijuana, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused
products applies equally to the provisions of this chapter;
(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software;
(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(9) The definitions in RCW 82.04.192 apply to this chapter;
(10) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
chapter 82.12 RCW, whenever the terms "property" or "personal property"
are used, those terms must be construed to include digital goods and
digital codes unless:
(a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property"
is intended only to refer to tangible personal property;
(b) It is clear from the context that the term "property" is
intended only to refer to tangible personal property, real property, or
both; or
(c) To construe the term "property" or "personal property" as
including digital goods and digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd,
or strained consequences; and
(11) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any sale, lease, or
rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease, or subrent.
(12) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture,"
"horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to
include or relate to marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused
products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include
marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.08.020 and 2011 c 171 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state
of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and
(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:
(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the
production of marijuana;
(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365((,));
(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310((,)); and
(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail
sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.08.02565 and 2011 c 23 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used
directly in a manufacturing operation or research and development
operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer
or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a
testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.
(b) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department by rule. The seller must retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts. "Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment
installed and used in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or
research and development operation to prevent air pollution, water
pollution, or contamination that might otherwise result from the
manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development
operation. "Machinery and equipment" also includes digital goods.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:
(i) Hand-powered tools;
(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is
permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and
(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation
that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation if
the machinery and equipment:
(i) Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal
property;
(ii) Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of
tangible personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;
(iii) Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or
tests tangible personal property at the site or away from the site;
(iv) Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal
property;
(v) Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;
(vi) Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in
the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and
development operation;
(vii) Places tangible personal property in the container, package,
or wrapping in which the tangible personal property is normally sold or
transported; or
(viii) Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW
82.63.010.
(d) "Manufacturer" means a person that qualifies as a manufacturer
under RCW 82.04.110. "Manufacturer" also includes a person that prints
newspapers or other materials.
(e) "Manufacturing" means only those activities that come within
the definition of "to manufacture" in RCW 82.04.120 and are taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW, or would
be taxed as such if such activity were conducted in this state or if
not for an exemption or deduction. "Manufacturing" also includes
printing newspapers or other materials. An activity is not taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under chapter 82.04 RCW if the
activity is within the purview of chapter 82.16 RCW.
(f) "Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles,
substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. A
manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials
enter the manufacturing site and ends at the point where the processed
material leaves the manufacturing site. With respect to the production
of class A or exceptional quality biosolids by a wastewater treatment
facility, the manufacturing operation begins at the point where class
B biosolids undergo additional processing to achieve class A or
exceptional quality standards. Notwithstanding anything to the
contrary in this section, the term also includes that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part. The term does not include the preparation of food
products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.
(g) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical
energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel.
(h) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research
and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or
processor for hire.
(i) "Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine
the properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal
property.
(j) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible personal
property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing operation
begins at the point where the tangible personal property enters the
testing site and ends at the point where the tangible personal property
leaves the testing site. The term also includes the testing of
tangible personal property for use in that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral
part. The term does not include the testing of tangible personal
property for use in the production of electricity by a light and power
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of food
products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.
(3) This section does not apply (a) to sales of machinery and
equipment used directly in the manufacturing, research and development,
or testing of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused
products, or (b) to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving such machinery and equipment.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.12.02565 and 2003 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in
respect to the use by a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery
and equipment used directly in a manufacturing operation or research
and development operation, to the use by a person engaged in testing
for a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment
used directly in a testing operation, or to the use of labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.
(2) This section does not apply to the use of (a) machinery and
equipment used directly in the manufacturing, research and development,
or testing of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused
products, or (b) labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving such machinery and
equipment.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.08.0257 and 2009 c 535 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to auction sales
made by or through auctioneers of personal property (including
household goods) that has been used in conducting a farm activity, when
the seller thereof is a farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 and the sale
is held or conducted upon a farm and not otherwise. The exemption in
this section does not apply to personal property used by the seller in
the production of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused
products.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.12.0258 and 2009 c 535 s 612 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of personal property (including household goods) that has been used in
conducting a farm activity, if such property was purchased from a
farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 at an auction sale held or conducted
by an auctioneer upon a farm and not otherwise. The exemption in this
section does not apply to personal property used by the seller in the
production of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused
products.

Sec. 17 RCW 82.08.0273 and 2011 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital
goods, and digital codes, when:
(a) The property is for use outside this state;
(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or
territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United
States, other than the state of Washington; and
(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose,
or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax,
use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities,
or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or
(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection,
provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of
their residence; and
(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department
of revenue access to such records and other forms of verification at
his or her place of residence to assure that such purchases are not
first used substantially in the state of Washington.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller
during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor
vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge
for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident
purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the separately
stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly
stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no
publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the
tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this
section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by
the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a
single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property
and service. All of the requirements in subsections (1) and (3)
through (6) of this section apply to this subsection.
(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
the provisions of this section must display proof of his or her current
nonresident status as provided in this section.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one
piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status
under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from
retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the
seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection
(4)(b) of this section.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence,
determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of
this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which
((shall)) must show the type of proof accepted, including any
identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if
any.
(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection
to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from
the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate
approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board
or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the
department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident
purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this
subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number
or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.
(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the
offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured
identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying
retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit
identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and
subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the
tax due on such purchases.
(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and
who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in
this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable
for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one
thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the
purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest
assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.
(7) The exemption in this section does not apply to sales of
marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.08.02745 and 2007 c 54 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered by any person in respect
to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures used as agricultural employee
housing, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of the buildings or other structures during the
course of the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving the
buildings or other structures. The exemption is available only if the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department by rule.
(2) The exemption provided in this section for agricultural
employee housing provided to year-round employees of the agricultural
employer, only applies if that housing is built to the current building
code for single-family or multifamily dwellings according to the state
building code, chapter 19.27 RCW.
(3) Any agricultural employee housing built under this section
((shall)) must be used according to this section for at least five
consecutive years from the date the housing is approved for occupancy,
or the full amount of tax otherwise due ((shall be)) is immediately due
and payable together with interest, but not penalties, from the date
the housing is approved for occupancy until the date of payment. If at
any time agricultural employee housing that is not located on
agricultural land ceases to be used in the manner specified in
subsection (2) of this section, the full amount of tax otherwise due
((shall be)) is immediately due and payable with interest, but not
penalties, from the date the housing ceases to be used as agricultural
employee housing until the date of payment.
(4) The exemption provided in this section ((shall)) does not apply
to housing built for the occupancy of an employer, family members of an
employer, or persons owning stock or shares in a farm partnership or
corporation business.
(5) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02685((:)), the
following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Agricultural employee" or "employee" has the same meaning as
given in RCW 19.30.010;
(b) "Agricultural employer" or "employer" has the same meaning as
given in RCW 19.30.010; and
(c) "Agricultural employee housing" means all facilities provided
by an agricultural employer, housing authority, local government, state
or federal agency, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the
internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)), or for-profit
provider of housing for housing agricultural employees on a year-round
or seasonal basis, including bathing, food handling, hand washing,
laundry, and toilet facilities, single-family and multifamily dwelling
units and dormitories, and includes labor camps under RCW 70.114A.110.
"Agricultural employee housing" does not include:
(i) Housing regularly provided on a commercial basis to the general
public((. "Agricultural employee housing" does not include));
(ii) Housing provided by a housing authority unless at least eighty
percent of the occupants are agricultural employees whose adjusted
income is less than fifty percent of median family income, adjusted for
household size, for the county where the housing is provided; and
(iii) Housing provided to agricultural employees providing services
related to the growing, raising, or producing of marijuana.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.08.0281 and 2004 c 153 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of drugs for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to patients,
pursuant to a prescription.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of drugs or devices used for family planning purposes, including
the prevention of conception, for human use dispensed or to be
dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription.
(3) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of drugs and devices used for family planning purposes, including
the prevention of conception, for human use supplied by a family
planning clinic that is under contract with the department of health to
provide family planning services.
(4) The following definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any
form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a
duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to
prescribe.
(b) "Drug" means a compound, substance, or preparation, and any
component of a compound, substance, or preparation, other than food and
food ingredients, dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages,
marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products:
(i) Recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia,
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official
national formulary, or any supplement to any of them; or
(ii) Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease; or
(iii) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body.
(c) "Over-the-counter drug" means a drug that contains a label that
identifies the product as a drug required by 21 C.F.R. Sec. 201.66, as
amended or renumbered on January 1, 2003. The label includes:
(i) A "drug facts" panel; or
(ii) A statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a list of those
ingredients contained in the compound, substance, or preparation.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.08.0288 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 55 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to the
lease of irrigation equipment if:
(1) The irrigation equipment was purchased by the lessor for the
purpose of irrigating land controlled by the lessor;
(2) The lessor has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 or 82.12.020 in
respect to the irrigation equipment;
(3) The irrigation equipment is attached to the land in whole or in
part; ((and))
(4) The irrigation equipment is not used in the production of
marijuana; and
(5) The irrigation equipment is leased to the lessee as an
incidental part of the lease of the underlying land to the lessee and
is used solely on such land.

Sec. 21 RCW 82.12.0283 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 55 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply to the use of
irrigation equipment if:
(1) The irrigation equipment was purchased by the lessor for the
purpose of irrigating land controlled by the lessor;
(2) The lessor has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 or 82.12.020 in
respect to the irrigation equipment;
(3) The irrigation equipment is attached to the land in whole or in
part; ((and))
(4) The irrigation equipment is not used in the production of
marijuana; and
(5) The irrigation equipment is leased to the lessee as an
incidental part of the lease of the underlying land to the lessee and
is used solely on such land.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food
and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances,
whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated
form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed
for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does
not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; ((and))
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco; and
(c) Marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, or dietary supplements. For purposes of this subsection, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(b)(i) "Prepared food" means:
(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" means a facility:
(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing
project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code,
as existing on August 1, 2009;
(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and
(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been
entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42
of the federal internal revenue code.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling
price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for
purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) For soft drinks and hot prepared food and food ingredients,
other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have
been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total
gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales
tax rate expressed as a decimal.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 23 RCW 82.08.820 and 2011 c 174 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
warehouse or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include:
(i) Agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party
warehouses, or retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the
person who produced the agricultural product((. "Finished goods" does
not include));
(ii) Logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products
stored as raw materials or in bulk; or
(iii) Marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products;
(f) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(g) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(h) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(i) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(j) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse ((shall)) must be measured in calculating the square
footage, including space that juts out from the building profile such
as loading docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the
square footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the
aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;
(k) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(1)(d);
(l) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(m) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or
more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor,
and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department ((shall)) must determine eligibility under this
section based on information provided by the buyer and through audit
and other administrative records. The buyer ((shall)) must on a
quarterly basis submit an information sheet, in a form and manner as
required by the department by rule, specifying the amount of exempted
tax claimed and the qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the
exemption is claimed. The buyer ((shall)) must retain, in adequate
detail to enable the department to determine whether the equipment or
construction meets the criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of
tax paid; documents describing the material-handling equipment and
racking equipment; location and size of warehouses and grain elevators;
and construction invoices and documents.
(c) The department ((shall)) must on a quarterly basis remit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon which
construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a
remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 24 RCW 82.14.430 and 2011 c 171 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a sales and use tax of up to 0.1 percent of the
selling price or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
The tax authorized by this section is in addition to the tax authorized
by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. Motor
vehicles are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under this
subsection.
(2) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a tax on the use of a motor vehicle within a
regional transportation investment district. The tax applies to those
persons who reside within the regional transportation investment
district. The rate of the tax may not exceed 0.1 percent of the value
of the motor vehicle. The tax authorized by this subsection is in
addition to the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030 and must be imposed
and collected at the time a taxable event under RCW 82.08.020(1) or
82.12.020 takes place. All revenue received under this subsection must
be deposited in the local sales and use tax account and distributed to
the regional transportation investment district according to RCW
82.14.050. The following provisions apply to the use tax in this
subsection:
(a) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller
((shall)) must collect the use tax from the buyer using the collection
provisions of RCW 82.08.050.
(b) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.12 RCW, the use tax
must be collected using the provisions of RCW 82.12.045.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but
does not include:
(i) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the
production of marijuana;
(ii) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365((,));
(iii) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310((,)); and
(iv) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(d) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(e) The value of a motor vehicle must be determined under RCW
82.12.010.
(f) Except as specifically stated in this subsection (2), chapters
82.12 and 82.32 RCW apply to the use tax. The use tax is a local tax
imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW, and chapter 82.14 RCW
applies fully to the use tax.
(3) In addition to fulfilling the notice requirements under RCW
82.14.055(1), and unless waived by the department, a regional
transportation investment district ((shall)) must provide the
department of revenue with digital mapping and legal descriptions of
areas in which the tax will be collected.

Sec. 25 RCW 82.16.050 and 2007 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the gross income the
following items:
(1) Amounts derived by municipally owned or operated public service
businesses, directly from taxes levied for the support or maintenance
thereof. This subsection may not be construed to exempt service
charges which are spread on the property tax rolls and collected as
taxes;
(2) Amounts derived from the sale of commodities to persons in the
same public service business as the seller, for resale as such within
this state. This deduction is allowed only with respect to water
distribution, gas distribution or other public service businesses which
furnish water, gas or any other commodity in the performance of public
service businesses;
(3) Amounts actually paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable
under this chapter as the latter's portion of the consideration due for
services furnished jointly by both, if the total amount has been
credited to and appears in the gross income reported for tax by the
former;
(4) The amount of cash discount actually taken by the purchaser or
customer;
(5) The amount of bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, on which tax was
previously paid under this chapter;
(6) Amounts derived from business which the state is prohibited
from taxing under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or
laws of the United States;
(7) Amounts derived from the distribution of water through an
irrigation system, for irrigation purposes other than the irrigation of
marijuana as defined under RCW 69.50.101;
(8) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in this state to final destination outside this state,
or from points of origin outside this state to final destination in
this state, with respect to which the carrier grants to the shipper the
privilege of stopping the shipment in transit at some point in this
state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing, milling, or other
processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or its
equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate
from point of origin to final destination;
(9) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in the state to an export elevator, wharf, dock or
ship side on tidewater or its navigable tributaries to be forwarded,
without intervening transportation, by vessel, in their original form,
to interstate or foreign destinations. No deduction is allowed under
this subsection when the point of origin and the point of delivery to
the export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side are located within the
corporate limits of the same city or town;
(10) Amounts derived from the transportation of agricultural
commodities, not including manufactured substances or articles, from
points of origin in the state to interim storage facilities in this
state for transshipment, without intervening transportation, to an
export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side on tidewater or its
navigable tributaries to be forwarded, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations. If agricultural commodities are transshipped
from interim storage facilities in this state to storage facilities at
a port on tidewater or its navigable tributaries, the same agricultural
commodity dealer must operate both the interim storage facilities and
the storage facilities at the port.
(a) The deduction under this subsection is available only when the
person claiming the deduction obtains a certificate from the
agricultural commodity dealer operating the interim storage facilities,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department, certifying that:
(i) More than ninety-six percent of all of the type of agricultural
commodity delivered by the person claiming the deduction under this
subsection and delivered by all other persons to the dealer's interim
storage facilities during the preceding calendar year was shipped by
vessel in original form to interstate or foreign destinations; and
(ii) Any of the agricultural commodity that is transshipped to
ports on tidewater or its navigable tributaries will be received at
storage facilities operated by the same agricultural commodity dealer
and will be shipped from such facilities, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations.
(b) As used in this subsection, "agricultural commodity" has the
same meaning as agricultural product in RCW 82.04.213;
(11) Amounts derived from the production, sale, or transfer of
electrical energy for resale within or outside the state or for
consumption outside the state;
(12) Amounts derived from the distribution of water by a nonprofit
water association and used for capital improvements by that nonprofit
water association;
(13) Amounts paid by a sewerage collection business taxable under
RCW 82.16.020(1)(a) to a person taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW for the
treatment or disposal of sewage;
(14) Amounts derived from fees or charges imposed on persons for
transit services provided by a public transportation agency. For the
purposes of this subsection, "public transportation agency" means a
municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and urban public
transportation systems, as defined in RCW 47.04.082. Public
transportation agencies ((shall)) must spend an amount equal to the
reduction in tax provided by this tax deduction solely to adjust routes
to improve access for citizens using food banks and senior citizen
services or to extend or add new routes to assist low-income citizens
and seniors.

Sec. 26 RCW 82.29A.020 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 501 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Leasehold interest" means an interest in publicly owned real
or personal property which exists by virtue of any lease, permit,
license, or any other agreement, written or verbal, between the public
owner of the property and a person who would not be exempt from
property taxes if that person owned the property in fee, granting
possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership.
However, no interest in personal property (excluding land or buildings)
which is owned by the United States, whether or not as trustee, or by
any foreign government may constitute a leasehold interest hereunder
when the right to use such property is granted pursuant to a contract
solely for the manufacture or production of articles for sale to the
United States or any foreign government. The term "leasehold interest"
includes the rights of use or occupancy by others of property which is
owned in fee or held in trust by a public corporation, commission, or
authority created under RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 if the property is
listed on or is within a district listed on any federal or state
register of historical sites. The term "leasehold interest" does not
include road or utility easements, rights of access, occupancy, or use
granted solely for the purpose of removing materials or products
purchased from a public owner or the lessee of a public owner, or
rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the purpose of
natural energy resource exploration. "Leasehold interest" does not
include the preferential use of publicly owned cargo cranes and docks
and associated areas used in the loading and discharging of cargo
located at a port district marine facility. "Preferential use" means
that publicly owned real or personal property is used by a private
party under a written agreement with the public owner, but the public
owner or any third party maintains a right to use the property when not
being used by the private party.
(2)(a) "Taxable rent" means contract rent as defined in (c) of this
subsection in all cases where the lease or agreement has been
established or renegotiated through competitive bidding, or negotiated
or renegotiated in accordance with statutory requirements regarding the
rent payable, or negotiated or renegotiated under circumstances,
established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent
was the maximum attainable by the lessor. However, after January 1,
1986, with respect to any lease which has been in effect for ten years
or more without renegotiation, taxable rent may be established by
procedures set forth in (g) of this subsection. All other leasehold
interests are subject to the determination of taxable rent under the
terms of (g) of this subsection.
(b) For purposes of determining leasehold excise tax on any lands
on the Hanford reservation subleased to a private or public entity by
the department of ecology, taxable rent includes only the annual cash
rental payment made by such entity to the department of ecology as
specifically referred to as rent in the sublease agreement between the
parties and does not include any other fees, assessments, or charges
imposed on or collected by such entity irrespective of whether the
private or public entity pays or collects such other fees, assessments,
or charges as specified in the sublease agreement.
(c) "Contract rent" means the amount of consideration due as
payment for a leasehold interest, including: The total of cash
payments made to the lessor or to another party for the benefit of the
lessor according to the requirements of the lease or agreement,
including any rents paid by a sublessee; expenditures for the
protection of the lessor's interest when required by the terms of the
lease or agreement; and expenditures for improvements to the property
to the extent that such improvements become the property of the lessor.
Where the consideration conveyed for the leasehold interest is made in
combination with payment for concession or other rights granted by the
lessor, only that portion of such payment which represents
consideration for the leasehold interest is part of contract rent.
(d) "Contract rent" does not include: (i) Expenditures made by the
lessee, which under the terms of the lease or agreement, are to be
reimbursed by the lessor to the lessee or expenditures for improvements
and protection made pursuant to a lease or an agreement which requires
that the use of the improved property be open to the general public and
that no profit will inure to the lessee from the lease; (ii)
expenditures made by the lessee for the replacement or repair of
facilities due to fire or other casualty including payments for
insurance to provide reimbursement for losses or payments to a public
or private entity for protection of such property from damage or loss
or for alterations or additions made necessary by an action of
government taken after the date of the execution of the lease or
agreement; (iii) improvements added to publicly owned property by a
sublessee under an agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, which
have been taxed as personal property of the sublessee prior to January
1, 1976, or improvements made by a sublessee of the same lessee under
a similar agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, and such
improvements are taxable to the sublessee as personal property; (iv)
improvements added to publicly owned property if such improvements are
being taxed as personal property to any person.
(e) Any prepaid contract rent is considered to have been paid in
the year due and not in the year actually paid with respect to
prepayment for a period of more than one year. Expenditures for
improvements with a useful life of more than one year which are
included as part of contract rent must be treated as prepaid contract
rent and prorated over the useful life of the improvement or the
remaining term of the lease or agreement if the useful life is in
excess of the remaining term of the lease or agreement. Rent prepaid
prior to January 1, 1976, must be prorated from the date of prepayment.
(f) With respect to a "product lease", the value is that value
determined at the time of sale under terms of the lease.
(g) If it is determined by the department of revenue, upon
examination of a lessee's accounts or those of a lessor of publicly
owned property, that a lessee is occupying or using publicly owned
property in such a manner as to create a leasehold interest and that
such leasehold interest has not been established through competitive
bidding, or negotiated in accordance with statutory requirements
regarding the rent payable, or negotiated under circumstances,
established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent
was the maximum attainable by the lessor, the department may establish
a taxable rent computation for use in determining the tax payable under
authority granted in this chapter based upon the following criteria:
(i) Consideration must be given to rental being paid to other lessors
by lessees of similar property for similar purposes over similar
periods of time; (ii) consideration must be given to what would be
considered a fair rate of return on the market value of the property
leased less reasonable deductions for any restrictions on use, special
operating requirements or provisions for concurrent use by the lessor,
another person or the general public.
(3) "Product lease" as used in this chapter means a lease of
property for use in the production of agricultural or marine products,
not including the production of marijuana as defined in RCW 69.50.101,
to the extent that such lease provides for the contract rent to be paid
by the delivery of a stated percentage of the production of such
agricultural or marine products to the credit of the lessor or the
payment to the lessor of a stated percentage of the proceeds from the
sale of such products.
(4) "Renegotiated" means a change in the lease agreement which
changes the agreed time of possession, restrictions on use, the rate of
the cash rental or of any other consideration payable by the lessee to
or for the benefit of the lessor, other than any such change required
by the terms of the lease or agreement. In addition "renegotiated"
means a continuation of possession by the lessee beyond the date when,
under the terms of the lease agreement, the lessee had the right to
vacate the premises without any further liability to the lessor.
(5) "City" means any city or town.
(6) "Products" includes natural resource products such as cut or
picked evergreen foliage, Cascara bark, wild edible mushrooms, native
ornamental trees and shrubs, ore and minerals, natural gas, geothermal
water and steam, and forage removed through the grazing of livestock.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 A new section is added to chapter 84.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to land
used in the growing, raising, or producing of marijuana, useable
marijuana, or marijuana-infused products as those terms are defined
under RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 28 RCW 84.36.630 and 2003 c 302 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All machinery and equipment owned by a farmer that is personal
property is exempt from property taxes levied for any state purpose if
it is used exclusively in growing and producing agricultural products
during the calendar year for which the claim for exemption is made.
(2) "Farmer" ((has)) and "agricultural product" have the same
meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.213.
(3) A claim for exemption under this section ((shall)) must be
filed with the county assessor together with the statement required
under RCW 84.40.190, for exemption from taxes payable the following
year. The claim ((shall)) must be made solely upon forms as prescribed
and furnished by the department of revenue.

Sec. 29 RCW 84.40.030 and 2007 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All property ((shall)) must be valued at one hundred percent of
its true and fair value in money and assessed on the same basis unless
specifically provided otherwise by law.
(2) Taxable leasehold estates ((shall)) must be valued at such
price as they would bring at a fair, voluntary sale for cash without
any deductions for any indebtedness owed including rentals to be paid.
(3) The true and fair value of real property for taxation purposes
(including property upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone
or other quarry) ((shall)) must be based upon the following criteria:
(((1))) (a) Any sales of the property being appraised or similar
properties with respect to sales made within the past five years. The
appraisal ((shall)) must be consistent with the comprehensive land use
plan, development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, zoning, and any
other governmental policies or practices in effect at the time of
appraisal that affect the use of property, as well as physical and
environmental influences. An assessment may not be determined by a
method that assumes a land usage or highest and best use not permitted,
for that property being appraised, under existing zoning or land use
planning ordinances or statutes or other government restrictions. The
appraisal ((shall)) must also take into account: (((a))) (i) In the
use of sales by real estate contract as similar sales, the extent, if
any, to which the stated selling price has been increased by reason of
the down payment, interest rate, or other financing terms; and (((b)))
(ii) the extent to which the sale of a similar property actually
represents the general effective market demand for property of such
type, in the geographical area in which such property is located.
Sales involving deed releases or similar seller-developer financing
arrangements ((shall)) may not be used as sales of similar property.
(((2))) (b) In addition to sales as defined in subsection (((1)))
(3)(a) of this section, consideration may be given to cost, cost less
depreciation, reconstruction cost less depreciation, or capitalization
of income that would be derived from prudent use of the property, as
limited by law or ordinance. Consideration should be given to any
agreement, between an owner of rental housing and any government
agency, that restricts rental income, appreciation, and liquidity; and
to the impact of government restrictions on operating expenses and on
ownership rights in general of such housing. In the case of property
of a complex nature, or being used under terms of a franchise from a
public agency, or operating as a public utility, or property not having
a record of sale within five years and not having a significant number
of sales of similar property in the general area, the provisions of
this subsection ((shall)) must be the dominant factors in valuation.
When provisions of this subsection are relied upon for establishing
values the property owner ((shall)) must be advised upon request of the
factors used in arriving at such value.
(((3))) (c) In valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the
true and fair value of the land, exclusive of structures thereon
((shall)) must be determined; also the true and fair value of
structures thereon, but the valuation ((shall)) may not exceed the true
and fair value of the total property as it exists. In valuing
agricultural land, growing crops ((shall)) must be excluded. For
purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "growing crops" does not include
marijuana as defined under RCW 69.50.101.

Sec. 30 RCW 82.02.010 and 2011 c 298 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of this title, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue of the state of
Washington;
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of revenue of
the state of Washington;
(3) "Marijuana," "marijuana-infused products," and "useable
marijuana" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 69.50.101;
(4) "Taxpayer" includes any individual, group of individuals,
corporation, or association liable for any tax or the collection of any
tax hereunder, or who engages in any business or performs any act for
which a tax is imposed by this title. "Taxpayer" also includes any
person liable for any fee or other charge collected by the department
under any provision of law, including registration assessments and
delinquency fees imposed under RCW 59.30.050; and
(((4))) (5) Words in the singular number include the plural and the
plural include the singular. Words in one gender include all other
genders.

Sec. 31 RCW 15.13.270 and 2007 c 335 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to nursery dealer
licensing do not apply to: (((1))) (a) Persons making casual or
isolated sales that do not exceed one hundred dollars annually; (((2)))
(b) any garden club, conservation district, or charitable nonprofit
association conducting not more than three sales per year for not more
than four consecutive days each of horticultural plants which are grown
by or donated to its members; (((3))) (c) educational organizations
associated with private or public secondary schools; and (d) the
production of marijuana and persons who are licensed as marijuana
producers under RCW 69.50.325 with respect to the operations under such
license. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "marijuana"
and "marijuana producer" have the same meanings as provided in RCW
69.50.101. However, such a club, conservation district, association,
or organization ((shall)) must apply to the director for a permit to
conduct such sales.
(2) All horticultural plants sold under such a permit ((shall))
must be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 32 RCW 15.13.270 and 2000 c 144 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to licensing do not
apply to: (((1))) (a) Persons making casual or isolated sales that do
not exceed one hundred dollars annually; (((2))) (b) any garden club,
conservation district, or charitable nonprofit association conducting
not more than three sales per year for not more than four consecutive
days each of horticultural plants which are grown by or donated to its
members; (((3))) (c) educational organizations associated with private
or public secondary schools; and (d) the production of marijuana and
persons who are licensed as marijuana producers under RCW 69.50.325
with respect to the operations under such license. For the purposes of
this subsection, the terms "marijuana" and "marijuana producer" have
the same meanings as provided in RCW 69.50.101. However, such a club,
conservation district, association, or organization ((shall)) must
apply to the director for a permit to conduct such sales.
(2) All horticultural plants sold under such a permit ((shall))
must be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 33 RCW 15.17.020 and 1998 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) "Agent" means broker, commission merchant, solicitor, seller,
or consignor, and any other person acting upon the actual or implied
authority of another.
(2) "Certification" means, but is not limited to, the issuance by
the director of an inspection certificate or other official document
stating the grade, classification, and/or condition of any fruits or
vegetables, and/or if the fruits or vegetables are free of plant pests
and/or other defects.
(3) "Combination grade" means two or more grades packed together as
one, except cull grades, with a minimum percent of the product of the
higher grade, as established by rule.
(4) "Compliance agreement" means an agreement entered into between
the department and a shipper or packer, that authorizes the shipper or
packer to issue certificates of compliance for fruits and vegetables.
(5) "Container" means any container or subcontainer used to
prepackage any fruits or vegetables. This does not include a container
used by a retailer to package fruits or vegetables sold from a bulk
display to a consumer.
(6) "Deceptive arrangement or display" means any bulk lot or load,
arrangement, or display of fruits or vegetables which has in the
exposed surface, fruits or vegetables which are so superior in quality,
size, condition, or any other respect to those which are concealed, or
the unexposed portion, as to materially misrepresent any part of the
bulk lot or load, arrangement, or display.
(7) "Deceptive pack" means the pack of any container which has in
the outer layer or any exposed surface fruits or vegetables which are
in quality, size, condition, or any other respect so superior to those
in the interior of the container in the unexposed portion as to
materially misrepresent the contents. Such pack is deceptive when the
outer or exposed surface is composed of fruits or vegetables whose size
is not an accurate representation of the variation of the size of the
fruits or vegetables in the entire container, even though the fruits or
vegetables in the container are virtually uniform in size or comply
with the specific standards adopted under this chapter.
(8) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her
duly authorized representative.
(10) "District manager" means a person representing the director in
charge of overall operation of a fruit and vegetable inspection
district established under RCW 15.17.230.
(11) "Facility" means, but is not limited to, the premises where
fruits and vegetables are grown, stored, handled, or delivered for sale
or transportation, and all vehicles and equipment, whether aerial or
surface, used to transport fruits and vegetables.
(12) "Fruits and vegetables" means any unprocessed fruits or
vegetables, but does not include marijuana as defined in RCW 69.50.101.
(13) "Handler" means any person engaged in the business of
handling, selling, processing, storing, shipping, or distributing
fruits or vegetables that he or she has purchased or acquired from a
producer.
(14) "Inspection" means, but is not limited to, the inspection by
the director of any fruits or vegetables at any time prior to, during,
or subsequent to harvest.
(15) "Mislabel" means the placing or presence of any false or
misleading statement, design, or device upon any wrapper, container,
container label or lining, or any placard used in connection with and
having reference to fruits or vegetables.
(16) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, society, or association, and every officer, agent, or employee
thereof.
(17) "Plant pests" means, but is not limited to, any living stage
of any insects, mites, nematodes, slugs, snails, protozoa, or other
invertebrate animals, bacteria, fungi, viruses, or any organisms
similar to or allied with any of the foregoing, or any infectious
substance, which can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or
damage in any plant or parts thereof, or any processed, manufactured,
or other products of plants.
(18) "Sell" means to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, or ship
or transport in bulk or in containers.
(19) "Standards" means grades, classifications, and other
inspection criteria for fruits and vegetables.

Sec. 34 RCW 15.49.061 and 1989 c 354 s 76 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to marijuana seed.
For the purposes of this subsection, "marijuana" has the same meaning
as defined in RCW 69.50.101.
(2) The provisions of RCW 15.49.011 through 15.49.051 do not apply:
(a) To seed or grain not intended for sowing purposes;
(b) To seed in storage by, or being transported or consigned to a
conditioning establishment for conditioning if the invoice or labeling
accompanying the shipment of such seed bears the statement "seeds for
conditioning" and if any labeling or other representation that may be
made with respect to the unconditioned seed is subject to this chapter;
(c) To any carrier with respect to any seed transported or
delivered for transportation in the ordinary course of its business as
a carrier if the carrier is not engaged in producing, conditioning, or
marketing seeds subject to this chapter; or
(d) Seed stored or transported by the grower of the seed.
(((2))) (3) No person may be subject to the penalties of this
chapter for having sold or offered for sale seeds subject to this
chapter that were incorrectly labeled or represented as to kind,
species, variety, or type, which seeds cannot be identified by
examination thereof, unless he or she has failed to obtain an invoice,
genuine grower's declaration, or other labeling information and to take
such other precautions as may be reasonable to ensure the identity to
be that stated. A genuine grower's declaration of variety shall affirm
that the grower holds records of proof concerning parent seed, such as
invoice and labels.

Sec. 35 RCW 20.01.030 and 2013 c 23 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Any cooperative marketing associations or federations
incorporated under, or whose articles of incorporation and bylaws are
equivalent to, the requirements of chapter 23.86 RCW, except as to that
portion of the activities of the association or federation that involve
the handling or dealing in the agricultural products of nonmembers of
the organization: PROVIDED, That the associations or federations may
purchase up to fifteen percent of their gross from nonmembers for the
purpose of filling orders: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the cooperative
or association acts as a processor as defined in RCW 20.01.500(2) and
markets the processed agricultural crops on behalf of the grower or its
own behalf, the association or federation is subject to the provisions
of RCW 20.01.500 through 20.01.560 and the license provision of this
chapter excluding bonding provisions: PROVIDED FURTHER, That none of
the foregoing exemptions in this subsection apply to any such
cooperative or federation dealing in or handling grain in any manner,
and not licensed under the provisions of chapter 22.09 RCW;
(2) Any person who sells exclusively his or her own agricultural
products as the producer thereof;
(3) Any public livestock market operating under a bond required by
law or a bond required by the United States to secure the performance
of the public livestock market's obligation. However, any such market
operating as a livestock dealer or order buyer, or both, is subject to
all provisions of this chapter except for the payment of the license
fee required in RCW 20.01.040;
(4) Any retail merchant having a bona fide fixed or permanent place
of business in this state, but only for the retail merchant's retail
business conducted at such fixed or established place of business;
(5) Any person buying farm products for his or her own use or
consumption;
(6) Any warehouse operator or grain dealer licensed under the state
grain warehouse act, chapter 22.09 RCW, with respect to his or her
handling of any agricultural product as defined under that chapter;
(7) Any nursery dealer who is required to be licensed under the
horticultural laws of the state with respect to his or her operations
as such licensee;
(8) Any person licensed under the now existing dairy laws of the
state with respect to his or her operations as such licensee;
(9) Any producer who purchases less than fifteen percent of his or
her volume to complete orders;
(10) Any person, association, or corporation regulated under
chapter 67.16 RCW and the rules adopted thereunder while performing
acts regulated by that chapter and the rules adopted thereunder;
(11) Any domestic winery, as defined in RCW 66.04.010, licensed
under Title 66 RCW, with respect to its transactions involving
agricultural products used by the domestic winery in making wine;
(12) Any person licensed as a marijuana producer or processor under
RCW 69.50.325 with respect to the operations under such license. The
definitions in RCW 69.50.101 apply to this subsection (12).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2015,
subject to the contingency stated in section 2, chapter . . . (ESSB
5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015, subject to the contingency stated in section 2, chapter . . .
(ESSB 5952), Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Section 10 of this act expires December 31,
2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 Section 31 of this act expires July 1,
2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 Section 32 of this act takes effect July 1,
2020.

--- END ---