BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.55.181 and 2010 c 210 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In order to receive the permit review and approval process
created in this section, a fish habitat enhancement project must meet
the criteria under (((a) and (b) of)) this ((subsection:
(a) A fish habitat enhancement project)) section and must be a
project to accomplish one or more of the following tasks:
(i) Elimination of human-made or caused fish passage barriers,
including culvert repair and replacement;
(ii) Restoration of an eroded or unstable streambank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(iii) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
(b) The department shall develop size or scale threshold tests to
determine if projects accomplishing any of these tasks should be
evaluated under the process created in this section or under other
project review and approval processes. A project proposal shall not be
reviewed under the process created in this section if the department
determines that the scale of the project raises concerns regarding
public health and safety((; and)).
(((b))) (c) A fish habitat enhancement project must be approved in
one of the following ways in order to receive the permit review and
approval process created in this section:
(i) By the department pursuant to chapter 77.95 or 77.100 RCW;
(ii) By the sponsor of a watershed restoration plan as provided in
chapter 89.08 RCW;
(iii) By the department as a department-sponsored fish habitat
enhancement or restoration project;
(iv) Through the review and approval process for the jobs for the
environment program;
(v) Through the review and approval process for conservation
district-sponsored projects, where the project complies with design
standards established by the conservation commission through
interagency agreement with the United States fish and wildlife service
and the natural resource conservation service;
(vi) Through a formal grant program established by the legislature
or the department for fish habitat enhancement or restoration; ((and))
(vii) Through the department of transportation's environmental
retrofit program as a stand-alone fish passage barrier correction
project;
(viii) Through a local, state, or federally approved fish barrier
removal grant program designed to assist local governments in
implementing stand-alone fish passage barrier corrections; and
(ix) Through other formal review and approval processes established
by the legislature.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of
subsection (1) of this section are expected to result in beneficial
impacts to the environment. Decisions pertaining to fish habitat
enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1) of this
section and being reviewed and approved according to the provisions of
this section are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3)(a) A permit is required for projects that meet the criteria of
subsection (1) of this section and are being reviewed and approved
under this section. An applicant shall use a joint aquatic resource
permit application form developed by the office of regulatory
assistance to apply for approval under this chapter. On the same day,
the applicant shall provide copies of the completed application form to
the department and to each appropriate local government.
(b) Local governments shall accept the application as notice of the
proposed project. The department shall provide a fifteen-day comment
period during which it will receive comments regarding environmental
impacts.
(c) Within forty-five days, the department shall either issue a
permit, with or without conditions, deny approval, or make a
determination that the review and approval process created by this
section is not appropriate for the proposed project. The department
shall base this determination on identification during the comment
period of adverse impacts that cannot be mitigated by the conditioning
of a permit.
(d) If the department determines that the review and approval
process created by this section is not appropriate for the proposed
project, the department shall notify the applicant and the appropriate
local governments of its determination. The applicant may reapply for
approval of the project under other review and approval processes.
(((b))) (e) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial,
conditioning, or modification of a permit under this section may appeal
the decision as provided in RCW 77.55.021(((4))) (8).
(4) No local government may require permits or charge fees for fish
habitat enhancement projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1)
of this section and that are reviewed and approved according to the
provisions of this section.
(5) The state is not liable for any adverse impacts resulting from
a fish enhancement project that meets the criteria of this section and
has been permitted by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.95.180 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 83 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) To maximize available state resources, the department and
the department of transportation ((shall)) must work in partnership to
identify ((cooperative)) and complete projects to eliminate fish
passage barriers caused by state roads and highways.
(b) The partnership between the department and the department of
transportation must be based on the principle of maximizing habitat
recovery through a coordinated investment strategy that, to the maximum
extent practical and allowable, prioritizes opportunities: To correct
multiple fish barriers in whole streams rather than through individual,
isolated projects; and to correct barriers located furthest downstream
in a stream system. Examples of this principle include:
(i) Coordinating with all relevant state agencies and local
governments to maximize the habitat recovery value of the investments
made by the state to correct fish passage barriers;
(ii) Maximizing the habitat recovery value of investments made by
public and private forest landowners through the road maintenance and
abandonment planning process outlined in the forest practices rules, as
that term is defined in RCW 76.09.020;
(iii) Recognizing that many of the barriers owned by the state are
located in the same stream systems as barriers that are the
responsibility of cities and counties with potentially limited
financial resources for correction and that state-local partnership
opportunities may exist to address these barriers; and
(iv) Recognizing the need to continue investments in the family
forest fish passage program created pursuant to RCW 76.13.150 and other
efforts to address fish passage barriers owned by private parties that
are in the same stream systems as barriers owned by public entities.
(2) The department ((of transportation)) shall also provide
engineering and other technical services to assist ((regional fisheries
enhancement groups)) nonstate barrier owners with fish passage barrier
removal projects, provided that the barrier removal projects have been
identified as a priority by the department ((of fish and wildlife)) and
the department ((of transportation)) has received an appropriation to
continue ((the)) that component of a fish barrier removal program.
(3) Nothing in this section is intended to:
(a) Alter the process and prioritization methods used in the
implementation of the forest practices rules, as that term is defined
in RCW 76.09.020, or the family forest fish passage program, created
pursuant to RCW 76.13.150, that provides public cost assistance to
small forest landowners associated with the road maintenance and
abandonment processes; or
(b) Prohibit, delay, or otherwise involve fish barrier projects
undertaken by the department of transportation or another state agency
that are a component of an overall transportation improvement project
or that are being undertaken as a direct result of state law, federal
law, or a court order. However, the department of transportation or
another state agency is required to work in partnership with the fish
passage barrier removal board created in RCW 77.95.160 in the
scheduling, staging, and implementation of these projects.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.95.170 and 1999 c 242 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((of transportation and the department of fish
and wildlife)) may ((administer and)) coordinate with the recreation
and conservation office in the administration of all state grant
programs specifically designed to assist state agencies, ((local
governments,)) private landowners, tribes, organizations, and volunteer
groups in identifying and removing impediments to salmonid fish
passage. The transportation improvement board may administer all grant
programs specifically designed to assist cities, counties, and other
units of local governments with fish passage barrier corrections
associated with transportation projects. All grant programs must be
administered and be consistent with the following:
(a) Salmonid-related corrective projects, inventory, assessment,
and prioritization efforts;
(b) Salmonid projects subject to a competitive application process;
and
(c) A minimum dollar match rate that is consistent with the funding
authority's criteria. If no funding match is specified, a match amount
of at least twenty-five percent per project is required. For local,
private, and volunteer projects, in-kind contributions may be counted
toward the match requirement.
(2) Priority shall be given to projects that ((immediately increase
access to available and improved spawning and rearing habitat for
depressed, threatened, and endangered stocks. Priority shall also be
given to project applications that are coordinated with other efforts
within a watershed)) match the principles provided in RCW 77.95.180.
(3) ((Except for projects administered by the transportation
improvement board,)) All projects subject to this section shall be
reviewed and approved by the fish passage barrier removal ((task
force)) board created in RCW 77.95.160 or an alternative oversight
committee designated by the state legislature.
(4) Other agencies that administer natural resource-based grant
programs ((that may include fish passage barrier removal projects))
shall use fish passage selection criteria that are consistent with this
section when those programs are addressing fish passage barrier removal
projects.
(5)(a) The ((departments of transportation and fish and wildlife))
department shall establish a centralized database directory of all fish
passage barrier information. The database directory must include, but
is not limited to, existing fish passage inventories, fish passage
projects, grant program applications, and other databases. These data
must be used to coordinate and assist in habitat recovery and project
mitigation projects.
(b) The department must develop a barrier inventory training
program that qualifies participants to perform barrier inventories and
develop data that enhance the centralized database. The department may
decide the qualifications for participation. However, employees and
volunteers of conservation districts and regional salmon recovery
groups must be given priority consideration.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.95.160 and 2000 c 107 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((and the department of transportation)) shall
((convene)) maintain a fish passage barrier removal ((task force))
board. ((The task force shall consist of one representative each from
the department, the department of transportation, the department of
ecology, tribes, cities, counties, a business organization, an
environmental organization, regional fisheries enhancement groups, and
other interested entities as deemed appropriate by the cochairs. The
persons representing the department and the department of
transportation shall serve as cochairs of the task force and shall
appoint members to the task force. The task force shall make
recommendations to expand the program in RCW 77.95.180)) The board must
be composed of a representative from the department, the department of
transportation, cities, counties, the governor's salmon recovery
office, tribal governments, and the department of natural resources.
The representative of the department must serve as chair of the board
and may expand the membership of the board to representatives of other
governments, stakeholders, and interested entities.
(2)(a) The duty of the board is to identify and expedite the
removal of human-made or caused impediments to anadromous fish passage
in the most efficient manner practical((. Program)) through the
development of a coordinated approach and schedule that identifies and
prioritizes the projects necessary to eliminate fish passage barriers
caused by state and local roads and highways and barriers owned by
private parties.
(b) The coordinated approach must address fish passage barrier
removals in all areas of the state in a manner that is consistent with
a recognition that scheduling and prioritization is necessary.
(c) The board must coordinate and mutually share information, when
appropriate, with:
(i) Other fish passage correction programs, including local salmon
recovery plan implementation efforts through the governor's salmon
recovery office;
(ii) The applicable conservation districts when developing
schedules and priorities within set geographic areas or counties; and
(iii) The recreation and conservation office to ensure that barrier
removal methodologies are consistent with, and maximizing the value of,
other salmon recovery efforts and habitat improvements that are not
primarily based on the removal of barriers.
(d) Recommendations ((shall)) must include ((a)) proposed funding
mechanisms and other necessary mechanisms and methodologies to
coordinate ((and prioritize)) state, tribal, local, and volunteer
barrier removal efforts within each water resource inventory area and
satisfy the principles of RCW 77.95.180. To the degree practicable,
the board must utilize the database created in RCW 77.95.170 and
information on fish barriers developed by conservation districts to
guide methodology development.
(e) When developing a prioritization methodology under this
section, the board shall consider:
(i) Projects benefiting depressed, threatened, and endangered
stocks;
(ii) Projects providing access to available and high quality
spawning and rearing habitat;
(iii) Correcting the lowest barriers within the stream first;
(iv) Whether an existing culvert is a full or partial barrier;
(v) Projects that are coordinated with other adjacent barrier
removal projects; and
(vi) Projects that address replacement of infrastructure associated
with flooding, erosion, or other environmental damage. ((A priority
shall be given to projects that immediately increase access to
available and improved spawning and rearing habitat for depressed,
threatened, and endangered stocks. The department or the department of
transportation may contract with cities and counties to assist in the
identification and removal of impediments to anadromous fish passage.))
(f) The board may not make decisions on fish passage standards or
categorize as impassible culverts or other infrastructure developments
that have been deemed passable by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.95 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may contract with cities and counties to assist in
the identification and removal of impediments to fish passage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of fish and wildlife must
initiate contact with the United States army corps of engineers, the
national oceanic and atmospheric administration, and, if necessary,
the United States fish and wildlife service to explore the feasibility
of bundling multiple transportation-related fish barrier removal
projects under any available nationwide permits for the purpose of
achieving streamlined federal permitting with a reduced processing
time.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife must report back to the
legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, by October 31, 2016,
summarizing the information gathered and any progress made towards
using the bundling concept to streamline permitting for transportation-related fish barrier removal projects.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2017.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.27.490 and 2003 c 39 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
A fish habitat enhancement project meeting the criteria of RCW
((77.55.290(1))) 77.55.181 is not subject to grading permits,
inspections, or fees and shall be reviewed according to the provisions
of RCW ((77.55.290)) 77.55.181.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.21.404 and 2003 c 39 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
A city or town is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a
fish enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((77.55.290))
77.55.181 and has been permitted by the department of fish and
wildlife.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.63.230 and 2003 c 39 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
A permit required under this chapter for a watershed restoration
project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in compliance
with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510. A fish habitat enhancement
project meeting the criteria of RCW ((77.55.290(1))) 77.55.181 shall be
reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW ((77.55.290))
77.55.181.

Sec. 10 RCW 35A.21.290 and 2003 c 39 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
A code city is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((77.55.290))
77.55.181 and has been permitted by the department of fish and
wildlife.

Sec. 11 RCW 35A.63.250 and 2003 c 39 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A permit required under this chapter for a watershed
restoration project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in
compliance with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510.
(2) A fish habitat enhancement project meeting the criteria of RCW
((77.55.290(1))) 77.55.181 shall be reviewed and approved according to
the provisions of RCW ((77.55.290)) 77.55.181.

Sec. 12 RCW 36.70.982 and 2003 c 39 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
A county is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((77.55.290))
77.55.181 and has been permitted by the department of fish and
wildlife.

Sec. 13 RCW 36.70.992 and 2003 c 39 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A permit required under this chapter for a watershed
restoration project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in
compliance with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510.
(2) A fish habitat enhancement project meeting the criteria of RCW
((77.55.290(1))) 77.55.181 shall be reviewed and approved according to
the provisions of RCW ((77.55.290)) 77.55.181.

Sec. 14 RCW 36.70A.460 and 2003 c 39 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A permit required under this chapter for a watershed
restoration project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in
compliance with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510.
(2) A fish habitat enhancement project meeting the criteria of RCW
((77.55.290(1))) 77.55.181 shall be reviewed and approved according to
the provisions of RCW ((77.55.290)) 77.55.181.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.21C.0382 and 2003 c 39 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Decisions pertaining to watershed restoration projects as
defined in RCW 89.08.460 are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).
(2) Decisions pertaining to fish habitat enhancement projects
meeting the criteria of RCW ((77.55.290(1))) 77.55.181 and being
reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW ((77.55.290))
77.55.181 are not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

--- END ---