BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.165 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The insurance commissioner must reauthorize the efforts with
the lead organization established in RCW 48.165.030, and establish a
new work group to develop recommendations for prior authorization
requirements. The focus of the prior authorization efforts must
include the full scope of health care services including pharmacy
issues. The work group must submit recommendations to the commissioner
by October 31, 2014.
(2) The lead organization and work group established to review
prior authorization requirements must consider the following areas in
their efforts:
(a) Requiring carriers and pharmacy benefit managers to provide a
listing of prior authorization requirements electronically on a web
site. The listing of requirements for any procedure, supply, or
service requiring preauthorization must include criteria needed by the
carrier specific to that medical or procedural code, to allow a
provider's office to submit all information needed on the initial
request for prior authorization, along with instructions for submitting
that information;
(b) Requiring a carrier or pharmacy benefit manager to issue an
acknowledgement of receipt or reference number for prior authorization
within a specified time frame, such as two business days of receipt of
a prior authorization request from a provider;
(c) Recommendations for the best practices for exchanging
information, including alternatives to fax requests;
(d) Recommendations for the best practices if the acknowledgement
has not been received by the provider or pharmacy benefit manager
within the specified time frame, such as two business days;
(e) Recommendations if the carrier or pharmacy benefit manager
fails to approve, deny, or respond to the request for authorization
within the specified time frame and options for deeming approval;
(f) Recommendations to refine the time frames in current rule;
(g) Recommendations to limit or eliminate the application of prior
authorization to routine health care services for which a person may
self-refer; and
(h) Recommendations specific to pharmacy services, including
communication between the pharmacy to the carrier or pharmacy benefit
manager, communications between the carrier or pharmacy benefit manager
with the providers' office, communication of the authorization number,
posting of the criteria for pharmacy related prior authorization on a
web site and other recommended alternatives; and options for prior
authorizations involving urgent and emergent care with short-term
prescription fill, such as a three-day supply, while the authorization
is obtained.
(3) In preparing the recommendations, the work group must consider
the opportunities to align with national mandates and regulatory
guidance in the health insurance portability and accountability act and
the patient protection and affordable care act, and use information
technologies and electronic health records to increase efficiencies in
health care and reengineer and automate age-old practices to improve
business functions and ensure timely access to care for patients.
(4) The commissioner must revise the rules for prior authorization
with the recommendations of the work group and only those
recommendations.

--- END ---