BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the federal
government has, on occasion, required states to change state law as a
condition of receiving federal funds. There are legal limits to that
practice. In National Federation of Independent Business (NFIB) v.
Sebelius, 567 U.S. ___, 132 S. Ct. 2566 (2012), the United States
supreme court ruled that a provision in United States Public Law 111-148, the patient protection and affordable care act, requiring states
to expand medicaid coverage as a condition of receiving medicaid
funding, was impermissibly coercive.
(2) The legislature further finds that requirements in federal law
to change Washington law as a condition of receiving federal funds
have, on occasion, required Washington to expand state programs,
driving costs of state government up and raising concerns that future
federal funding will not cover the expanded obligations.
(3) The legislature further finds that these funding conditions
should receive closer scrutiny, and therefore directs the joint
legislative audit and review committee to annually report to the
legislature regarding federal funding programs affecting Washington
state health and human services agencies that require changes in state
statutes as a condition of receiving federal funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee must, by December
1st each year, report to the legislature regarding federal funding
programs greater than twenty-five million dollars in biennial
expenditures affecting Washington state health and human services
agencies and the common school system that specify conditions requiring
changes in state statutes as a condition of receiving federal funding.

--- END ---