BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.150 and 2011 c 148 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as a result of a mental disorder:
(((i))) (a) Presents a likelihood of serious harm; or (((ii))) (b) is
gravely disabled; the designated mental health professional may, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of any person providing information to
initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that
the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a
petition for initial detention. Before filing the petition, the
designated mental health professional must personally interview the
person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether
the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and
treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization
unit, or triage facility.
(2)(a) If a designated mental health professional decides not to
file a petition, an immediate family member of the person may petition
the superior court for review of the designated mental health
professional's decision. The immediate family member shall serve, or
cause to be served, a notice of the petition on the designated mental
health professional. As soon as possible, but no longer than twenty-four hours after receiving notice of the petition, the designated
mental health professional shall provide the court with a written
explanation of the basis for the decision not to file a petition and a
copy of the information collected during the investigation under
subsection (1) of this section. If upon review of the designated
mental health professional's decision the judge finds that there is
probable cause to support a petition for initial detention and that the
person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and
treatment voluntarily, taking into consideration any information
provided by the immediate family member, the court may enter an order
for initial detention under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means
a spouse, domestic partner, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, or sibling.
(3)(a) An order to detain to a designated evaluation and treatment
facility for not more than a seventy-two-hour evaluation and treatment
period may be issued by a judge of the superior court upon request of
a designated mental health professional, whenever it appears to the
satisfaction of a judge of the superior court:
(i) That there is probable cause to support the petition; and
(ii) That the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate
evaluation and treatment voluntarily.
(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of
perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court
in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the
order.
(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is
appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business
address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent
the person.
(((3))) (4) The designated mental health professional shall then
serve or cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of
rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such
person the designated mental health professional shall file the return
of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file
to the evaluation and treatment facility and the designated attorney.
The designated mental health professional shall notify the court and
the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held
within seventy-two hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation
or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility. The person
shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her
relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other
professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her
presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or
otherwise interfere with the evaluation.
(((4))) (5) The designated mental health professional may notify a
peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into
custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility. At the
time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be
served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a
copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a
petition for initial detention.

--- END ---