BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Businesses that invest capital create
jobs and generate economic activity that supports a healthy Washington
economy. The legislature finds that these investments result in future
revenues that support schools and our communities. Therefore, the
legislature finds that a pilot program must be conducted to evaluate
the effectiveness of a program that provides businesses with the
latitude to invest their business and occupation tax back into their
business or to locate a business in the state of Washington thereby
creating jobs and capital investments in the state for the benefit of
its citizens.
(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement
for the business and occupation tax credit provided in section 2 of
this act for a portion of the construction costs of qualified
industrial facilities. This performance statement is only intended to
be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not
intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to
determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.
(b) The legislature categorizes the tax preference as one intended
to create or retain jobs and to provide funding to support job
readiness training, professional development, or apprenticeship
programs in manufacturing or production occupations, as indicated in
RCW 82.32.808(2) (c) and (f).
(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to
provide a pilot program that would provide a business and occupation
tax credit for a portion of the construction costs of up to five new
manufacturing facilities, two of which must be located in eastern
Washington. In lieu of claiming the credit, a taxpayer may donate all
or a portion of the credit to support job readiness training,
professional development, or apprenticeship programs in manufacturing
or production occupations.
(d) To measure the effectiveness of the credit provided in this act
in achieving the specific public policy objective described in (c) of
this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee
should refer to information available from the employment security
department and department of revenue. If a review finds that each
qualified industrial facility generated at least twenty full-time jobs,
then the legislature intends for the legislative auditor to recommend
extending the expiration date of the tax preference. For purposes of
this subsection (2)(d), full-time jobs includes both temporary
construction jobs and permanent full-time employment positions at the
qualified industrial facility within one year of the date that the
facility became operationally complete as determined by the department
of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this
chapter for a portion of the costs incurred by the person for the
construction of a qualified industrial facility. The credit equals the
state and local retail sales taxes paid by a person on up to ten
million dollars in construction costs for the qualified industrial
facility.
(2) The credit under this section is limited to five qualified
industrial facilities, at least two of which must be located east of
the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(3) The department may not approve a person to receive credit under
this section for the construction of more than one qualified industrial
facility.
(4) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. Before using
a credit under this section, a person must submit an application to the
department in a form and manner required by the department. The
application must contain information regarding the location of the
proposed qualified industrial facility, time schedules for completion
and operation of the proposed qualified industrial facility, the
anticipated manufacturing to be conducted at the proposed qualified
industrial facility, and any other information required by the
department. The department must rule on the application within sixty
days.
(5)(a) A person may contribute all or any portion of the person's
approved credit to the state board for community and technical colleges
invest in Washington account hereby created in the state treasury to be
used exclusively by the state board for supporting customized training
programs, job skills programs, job readiness training, workforce
professional development, and to assist employers with state-approved
apprenticeship programs for manufacturing and production occupations.
(b) Revenues to the invest in Washington account consist of amounts
transferred by the state treasurer as provided in (c) of this
subsection (5).
(c) By June 1, 2015, and by June 1st of every subsequent year, the
department must notify the state treasurer of the amount of credit
under this section contributed to the invest in Washington account
since the effective date of this section through May 15, 2015, in the
case of the first notification under this subsection (5)(c), and since
the previous May 15th for subsequent notifications under this
subsection (5)(c). The department may make adjustments to the annual
notification under this subsection (5)(c) as may be necessary to
correct errors in the previous notification or offset previous
contributions of amounts that did not qualify for credit under this
section.
(d) By July 1, 2015, and by July 1st of every subsequent year, the
state treasurer must transfer the amount included in the department's
most recent notification under (c) of this subsection (5) from the
general fund to the invest in Washington account. Money in the account
may only be appropriated for the purposes specified in (a) of this
subsection (5).
(e) Persons contributing the credit under this section may
disregard the contribution of the credit for purposes of calculating
the small business credit provided in RCW 82.04.4451.
(f) Nothing in this subsection may be construed to modify or expand
the scope of chapter 49.04 RCW.
(g) The department must allow a person to make a contribution under
this subsection when filing its excise tax return, whether on the
original return or an amended return. The department may not consider
a contribution to have been made under this subsection unless the
amount of taxes due under this chapter as reported on the return on
which the contribution is made have also been paid to the department.
Once a contribution is made on a return and the taxes due under this
chapter as reported on that return have been paid, the contribution may
not be revoked.
(6) Credit under this section is earned, and may be claimed or
contributed, for state and local retail sales taxes paid on the
construction of a qualified industrial facility, subject to the
limitation in subsection (1) of this section.
(7) Approved credit under this section may only be claimed on an
excise tax return filed electronically in a manner provided or approved
by the department for taxes originally due on or after the date that
the credit was earned.
(8) Credit may be carried over until claimed or contributed, except
that no credit under this section may be claimed or contributed after
the date that is ten years after the effective date of this section.
This subsection must be construed to provide an expiration date for the
credit for purposes of RCW 82.32.805(2).
(9)(a) A person approved for the credit under this section must
notify the department that the qualified industrial facility is
operationally complete and must also provide the department with a
signed statement from the general contractor indicating, to the best of
the general contractor's knowledge, how many persons worked full-time
on the construction of the qualified industrial facility, whether
employed by the general contractor or any subcontractor. The
notifications required under this subsection (9)(a) must be received by
the department by the end of the calendar year in which the qualified
industrial facility is operationally complete.
(b) A person must repay all or a portion of the credit claimed or
contributed under this section under the following circumstances:
(i) If a qualified industrial facility is not operationally
complete within thirty-six months of the date the department received
the application for credit under this section or the person does not
comply with (a) of this subsection (9), all credit claimed and
contributed under this section must be repaid.
(ii) If a facility ceases to meet the definition of a qualified
industrial facility at any time after the facility became operationally
complete, as determined by the department, through the end of the
calendar year that is seven years after the calendar year that the
facility became operationally complete, all or a portion of the credit
claimed and contributed must be repaid as determined according to the
repayment schedule in RCW 82.63.045(2).
(c) The department must assess interest as provided in chapter
82.32 RCW, but not penalties, on taxes due under this subsection.
(10) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Manufacturing" means (i) those activities that come within the
definition of "to manufacture" in RCW 82.04.120 and are taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under this chapter or would be
taxed as such if not for an exemption or deduction, or (ii) printing
newspapers or other materials. An activity is not taxed as
manufacturing or processing for hire under this chapter if the activity
is within the purview of chapter 82.16 RCW.
(b) "Operationally complete" means constructed to the point of
being functionally useable for its intended purposes as described in
the application required in subsection (4) of this section.
(c) "Qualified industrial facility" means a new building or
multiple new buildings located at a single site, that are used
primarily for manufacturing. For purposes of this subsection (10)(c):
(i) A building is used primarily for manufacturing if more than
fifty percent of the building's useable floor space is used for
manufacturing; and
(ii) Floor space used for offices or the storage of raw materials
or finished product is deemed to be used for manufacturing if such
offices and storage areas are integral to manufacturing occurring
elsewhere in the building or in another building at the qualified
industrial facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
invest in Washington act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2014.

--- END ---