BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that probable
changes in climate and cycles of drought and storms, population growth
and required development, coupled with aging and inadequate water
supply and storm water and flood control infrastructure present
significant risks to the health and safety of our residents and
visitors, the sustained growth of our economy, and preservation and
protection of our natural resources.
(2) A joint legislative task force on financing options for water
supply and integrated water management, flood control, and storm water
projects is established. The task force and its various work groups
must review:
(a) The risks from inadequate water supply, flood control, and
storm water systems in various communities and water basins of the
state;
(b) The advances in water supply development and integrated water
management, flood control and storm water technology, engineering, and
ecosystem management that offer reliable, affordable, and long-lasting
benefits to the health and safety of residents, the sustainability of
regional and state economic growth, and the protection and preservation
of the state's natural resources;
(c) Financing options for water supply development and integrated
water management, flood control, and storm water projects that offer
reliable, affordable, and long-lasting benefits to the health and
safety of residents, the sustainability of regional and state economic
growth, and the protection and preservation of the state's natural
resources. Financing options must identify options for incurring debt
at the lowest cost, and possible state and local revenues necessary to
service that debt without diverting state general funds;
(d) Governance options for setting priorities for financing water
supply development and integrated water management, flood control, and
storm water projects and establishing state and local policies to
ensure that the benefits from such projects:
(i) Are not eroded by a failure to adequately maintain such
projects; or
(ii) Diminished by local decisions that exacerbate risks the
project is intended to mitigate.
(3)(a) The joint legislative task force on financing options for
water supply development and integrated water management, flood
control, and storm water projects shall consist of four members of the
house of representatives, including one member from each of the two
largest caucuses from the capital budget committee and the appropriate
policy committees, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and four members of the senate, including one member
from each of the two largest caucuses from the appropriate policy
committees and the capital budget chair of the ways and means committee
and ranking member for capital budget, to be appointed by the president
of the senate.
(b) The governor or the governor's representative may serve on the
task force. The governor must select four task force members
representing local governments, with two members representing
communities at risk from scarce water supplies and two representing
communities at risk from flooding and storm water control problems from
nominations received from the association of Washington cities and
Washington state association of counties. The governor must also
select two tribal representatives, one representing an area at risk of
inadequate water supplies and one representing an area at risk of
flooding from nominations from the governor's office of Indian affairs.
(c) The office of the state treasurer, the office of financial
management, the departments of ecology, health, agriculture, fish and
wildlife, and commerce shall cooperate with the task force and provide
leadership and staff support to the various work groups established
under subsection (4) of this section.
(d) The task force shall coordinate with the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature and may consult with other interested
parties, as may be appropriate, for technical advice and assistance.
(e) The task force shall select a chair from among its legislative
membership.
(4) The task force must establish expert work groups to
investigate, at a minimum, each of the topics in subsection (2)(a),
(b), (c), and (d) of this section. Work group members may be selected
for their relevant expertise from state, local, and tribal government
agencies, state universities, and knowledgeable private sector
professionals including representatives of the agricultural and
environmental committees. Staff support for the task force must be
provided by the house of representatives office of program research and
the senate committee services. Staff support for the various work
groups must be provided by the involved state agencies.
(5) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members of the task force or work groups, except those representing
state or local government agencies, are entitled to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Members of the task force or work groups representing state or local
government agencies may be entitled to be reimbursed for travel
expenses from their employer under their employers' travel policies.
(6) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees. The budget and expenses of the various work
groups established under subsection (4) of this section must be managed
by the office of financial management in consultation with the task
force.
(7) The task force must report its initial findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2014. A final report of the task force must
be submitted by September 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of eight hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 2015, from the public works assistance account
to the office of financial management for the purposes of this act.
The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30,
2015, from the public works assistance account to the house of
representatives for the purposes of this act. The sum of one hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2015, from the
public works assistance account to the senate for the purposes of this
act.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.050 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 983 are each
amended to read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to
the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account, and
the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for
economic development, innovation, and export grants, including
brownfields; main street improvement grants; and the loan program
consolidation board. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to
the education legacy trust account such amounts as specified by the
legislature. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate moneys from the account to fund necessary expenses of the
task force established in section 1 of this act and the appropriation
specified in section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---