BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.250 and 2010 c 257 s 1 and 2010 c 128 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant;
(3) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, driver's license numbers,
identicard numbers, and emergency contact information of employees or
volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of birth,
residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal wireless
telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social security
numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of employees
or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public agency in
personnel records, public employment related records, or volunteer
rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or volunteers
of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection, "employees"
includes independent provider home care workers as defined in RCW
74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting an active and ongoing investigation of a possible unfair
practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other
federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment;
(6) Criminal history records checks for board staff finalist
candidates conducted pursuant to RCW 43.33A.025;
(7) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and benefit
information for maritime employees collected from private employers
under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in RCW 47.64.220(2); and
(8) Photographs and month and year of birth in the personnel files
of employees and workers of criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The news media, as defined in RCW 5.68.010(5), shall have
access to the photographs and full date of birth. For the purposes of
this subsection, news media does not include any person or organization
of persons in the custody of a criminal justice agency as defined in
RCW 10.97.030.

--- END ---