BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to dissolve the
operations of innovate Washington and transfer the innovate Washington
facilities to Washington State University.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.902 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The college board, in consultation with business, industry,
labor, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the
department of commerce, the employment security department, and
community and technical colleges, shall designate centers of excellence
and allocate funds to existing and new centers of excellence based on
a competitive basis.
(2) Eligible applicants for the program established under this
section include community and technical colleges. Priority shall be
given to applicants that have an established education and training
program serving the targeted industry and that have in their home
district or region an industry cluster with the same targeted industry
at its core.
(3) It is the role of centers of excellence to employ strategies
to:
(a) Create educational efficiencies;
(b) Build a diverse, competitive workforce for strategic
industries;
(c) Maintain an institutional reputation for innovation and
responsiveness;
(d) Develop innovative curriculum and means of delivering education
and training;
(e) Act as brokers of information and resources related to
community and technical college education and training and assistance
available for firms in a targeted industry((, including working with
innovate Washington to develop methods to identify businesses within a
targeted industry that could benefit from the services offered by
innovate Washington under chapter 43.333 RCW)); and
(f) Serve as partners with workforce development councils,
associate development organizations, and other workforce and economic
development organizations.
(4) Examples of strategies under subsection (3) of this section
include but are not limited to: Sharing curriculum and other
instructional resources, to ensure cost savings to the system;
delivering collaborative certificate and degree programs; and holding
statewide summits, seminars, conferences, and workshops on industry
trends and best practices in community and technical college education
and training.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.155.010 and 2012 c 242 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The joint center for aerospace technology innovation is created
to:
(a) Pursue joint industry-university research in computing,
manufacturing efficiency, materials/structures innovation, and other
new technologies that can be used in aerospace firms;
(b) Enhance the education of students in the engineering
departments of the University of Washington, Washington State
University, and other participating institutions through industry-focused research; and
(c) Work directly with existing small, medium-sized, and large
aerospace firms and aerospace industry associations to identify
research needs and opportunities to transfer off-the-shelf technologies
that would benefit such firms.
(2) The center shall be operated and administered as a multi-institutional education and research center, conducting research and
development programs in various locations within Washington under the
joint authority of the University of Washington and Washington State
University. The initial administrative offices of the center shall be
west of the crest of the Cascade mountains. In order to meet aerospace
industry needs, the facilities and resources of the center must be made
available to all four-year institutions of higher education as defined
in RCW 28B.10.016. Resources include, but are not limited to,
internships, on-the-job training, and research opportunities for
undergraduate and graduate students and faculty.
(3) The powers of the center are vested in and shall be exercised
by a board of directors. The board shall consist of nine members
appointed by the governor. The governor shall appoint a nonvoting
chair. Of the eight voting members, one member shall represent small
aerospace firms, one member shall represent medium-sized firms, one
member shall represent large aerospace firms, one member shall
represent labor, two members shall represent aerospace industry
associations, and two members shall represent higher education. The
terms of the initial members shall be staggered.
(4) The board shall hire an executive director. The executive
director shall hire such staff as the board deems necessary to operate
the center. Staff support may be provided from among the cooperating
institutions through cooperative agreements to the extent funds are
available. The executive director may enter into cooperative
agreements for programs and research with public and private
organizations including state and nonstate agencies consistent with
policies of the participating institutions.
(5) The board must:
(a) Work with aerospace industry associations and aerospace firms
of all sizes to identify the research areas that will benefit the
intermediate and long-term economic vitality of the Washington
aerospace industry;
(b) Identify entrepreneurial researchers to join or lead research
teams in the research areas specified in (a) of this subsection and the
steps the University of Washington and Washington State University will
take to recruit such researchers;
(c) Assist firms to integrate existing technologies into their
operations and align the activities of the center with those of impact
Washington ((and innovate Washington)) to enhance services available to
aerospace firms;
(d) Develop internships, on-the-job training, research, and other
opportunities and ensure that all undergraduate and graduate students
enrolled in an aerospace engineering curriculum have direct experience
with aerospace firms;
(e) Assist researchers and firms in safeguarding intellectual
property while advancing industry innovation;
(f) Develop and strengthen university-industry relationships
through promotion of faculty collaboration with industry, and
sponsor((, in collaboration with innovate Washington,)) at least one
annual symposium focusing on aerospace research in the state of
Washington;
(g) Encourage a full range of projects from small research projects
that meet the specific needs of a smaller company to large scale,
multipartner projects;
(h) Develop nonstate support of the center's research activities
through leveraging dollars from federal and private for-profit and
nonprofit sources;
(i) Leverage its financial impact through joint support
arrangements on a project-by-project basis as appropriate;
(j) Establish mechanisms for soliciting and evaluating proposals
and for making awards and reporting on technological progress,
financial leverage, and other measures of impact;
(k) By June 30, 2013, develop an operating plan that includes the
specific processes, methods, or mechanisms the center will use to
accomplish each of its duties as set out in this subsection; and
(l) Report biennially to the legislature and the governor about the
impact of the center's work on the state's economy and the aerospace
sector, with projections of future impact, providing indicators of its
impact, and outlining ideas for enhancing benefits to the state. The
report must be coordinated with the governor's office, the Washington
economic development commission, and the department of commerce((, and
innovate Washington)).

Sec. 4 RCW 42.30.110 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prevent
a governing body from holding an executive session during a regular or
special meeting:
(a) To consider matters affecting national security;
(b) To consider the selection of a site or the acquisition of real
estate by lease or purchase when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of increased price;
(c) To consider the minimum price at which real estate will be
offered for sale or lease when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of decreased price. However,
final action selling or leasing public property shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(d) To review negotiations on the performance of publicly bid
contracts when public knowledge regarding such consideration would
cause a likelihood of increased costs;
(e) To consider, in the case of an export trading company,
financial and commercial information supplied by private persons to the
export trading company;
(f) To receive and evaluate complaints or charges brought against
a public officer or employee. However, upon the request of such
officer or employee, a public hearing or a meeting open to the public
shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;
(g) To evaluate the qualifications of an applicant for public
employment or to review the performance of a public employee. However,
subject to RCW 42.30.140(4), discussion by a governing body of
salaries, wages, and other conditions of employment to be generally
applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting open to the public,
and when a governing body elects to take final action hiring, setting
the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or
discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in
a meeting open to the public;
(h) To evaluate the qualifications of a candidate for appointment
to elective office. However, any interview of such candidate and final
action appointing a candidate to elective office shall be in a meeting
open to the public;
(i) To discuss with legal counsel representing the agency matters
relating to agency enforcement actions, or to discuss with legal
counsel representing the agency litigation or potential litigation to
which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official
capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public knowledge
regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency.
This subsection (1)(i) does not permit a governing body to hold an
executive session solely because an attorney representing the agency is
present. For purposes of this subsection (1)(i), "potential
litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or RCW 5.60.060(2)(a)
concerning:
(i) Litigation that has been specifically threatened to which the
agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity
is, or is likely to become, a party;
(ii) Litigation that the agency reasonably believes may be
commenced by or against the agency, the governing body, or a member
acting in an official capacity; or
(iii) Litigation or legal risks of a proposed action or current
practice that the agency has identified when public discussion of the
litigation or legal risks is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency;
(j) To consider, in the case of the state library commission or its
advisory bodies, western library network prices, products, equipment,
and services, when such discussion would be likely to adversely affect
the network's ability to conduct business in a competitive economic
climate. However, final action on these matters shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(k) To consider, in the case of the state investment board,
financial and commercial information when the information relates to
the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public
knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds
or in private loss to the providers of this information;
(l) To consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished
information related to the development, acquisition, or implementation
of state purchased health care services as provided in RCW 41.05.026;
(m) To consider in the case of the life sciences discovery fund
authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(n) To consider in the case of a health sciences and services
authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information((;
(o) To consider in the case of innovate Washington, the substance
of grant or loan applications and grant or loan awards if public
knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected to
result in private loss to the providers of this information)).
(2) Before convening in executive session, the presiding officer of
a governing body shall publicly announce the purpose for excluding the
public from the meeting place, and the time when the executive session
will be concluded. The executive session may be extended to a stated
later time by announcement of the presiding officer.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.270 and 2013 c 305 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; and
(21) ((Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and
research information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate
Washington in applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under
chapter 43.333 RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed,
would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers
of this information; and
(22))) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW
70.95N.190(4).

Sec. 6 2012 c 63 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that Washington is becoming a leader in the
development and commercialization of aviation biofuels due to its
strong tradition of market innovation, a concentrated demand for
sustainable aviation fuels, leading expertise and research capacity, an
established aviation manufacturing sector, and the availability of a
diverse range of feedstocks for the production of biofuels. The
legislature also finds that the development of aviation biofuels has
the potential to reduce dependence on foreign sources of fossil fuels,
reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and promote economic development and
jobs in Washington. The legislature intends to support the development
of commercial-scale aviation biofuels production facilities in
Washington by facilitating and streamlining the permitting process for
new facilities and the expansion of existing facilities and by
providing access to low-cost financing through the issuance of revenue
bonds.
The legislature finds that the 2012 Washington state energy
strategy calls for a targeted, strategic policy focus on sustainable
aviation biofuels to encourage the realization of Washington's
potential. The legislature also finds that a regional stakeholder
effort to explore the opportunities and challenges surrounding the
production of sustainable aviation fuels, known as sustainable aviation
biofuels northwest, urged policymakers in the Northwest to develop
supportive public policies that will jump start the industry, attract
investment, and accelerate industry growth. In order to provide focus
and develop policy recommendations to support the sustainable aviation
biofuels sector in Washington, the legislature intends to establish a
sustainable aviation biofuels work group. ((Additionally, the
legislature intends Innovate Washington, designated in 2011 as the lead
agency for coordinating clean energy-related initiatives targeted at
growing the clean energy sector, to convene the appropriate
stakeholders and facilitate the opportunity for the state to realize
the full economic growth impact to the state's economy.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.333 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Innovate Washington is hereby abolished and its mission,
powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the department
of commerce on July 1, 2015.
(2)(a) Except as provided in section 8 of this act and (c) of this
subsection, all property of innovate Washington shall be assigned and
transferred to the department of commerce on July 1, 2015. Except as
provided in (c) of this subsection, all reports, documents, surveys,
books, records, files, papers, and written material, regardless of
physical form or characteristics, in the possession of innovate
Washington shall be delivered to the department of commerce. Except as
provided in (c) of this subsection, all cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by
innovate Washington shall be made available to the department of
commerce. Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, all
funds, credits, and other assets, tangible or intangible, held by
innovate Washington shall be assigned and transferred to the department
of commerce.
(b) The department of commerce shall honor any donor-imposed
condition on the transfer of assets to innovate Washington, consistent
with chapter 14, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., returning any unused funds
or other assets to the grantor or the grantor's successor in interest,
if return of such funds or other assets is required in the grant or
other instrument by which the asset was conveyed to innovate
Washington. Any donated assets, the use of which is limited by a
donor-imposed restriction, shall be used only for the purposes
specified in the granting instrument, and where the instrument
restricts the use of such funds or other assets for the purposes of
innovate Washington, they shall be used by the department of commerce
only for the purpose of growing the innovation-based economic sectors
of the state and responding to the technology transfer needs of
existing businesses in the state.
(c)(i) On July 1, 2014, all real property of innovate Washington is
assigned and transferred to Washington State University, including all
real estate, buildings, and facilities located at 665 North Riverpoint
Boulevard in Spokane, Washington and any associated tenant leases and
building obligations. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property associated with the facilities
located at 665 North Riverpoint Boulevard in Spokane, Washington are
assigned and transferred to Washington State University. The master
lease for the Spokane Technology Center building located at 120 North
Pine Street in Spokane, Washington is assigned and transferred to
Washington State University. Innovate Washington shall coordinate with
the department of enterprise services in assigning and transferring the
master lease. Washington State University shall explore terminating
the master lease on the Spokane Technology Center and acquiring the
property for reintegration into the campus, if in the best interests of
the university.
(ii) In operating the 665 North Riverpoint Boulevard building and
the Spokane Technology Center building, Washington State University may
offer rental space to public, private, or private nonprofit entities
that innovate Washington provided services to in the Spokane Technology
Center building, and not in the 665 North Riverpoint Boulevard
building.
(d) If any question arises as to the transfer of any asset used or
held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties
and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall
make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same
to the state agencies concerned.
(3) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The FAA center of excellence for
alternative jet fuels and environment at Washington State University
shall convene a sustainable aviation biofuels work group.
(2) The purpose of the work group is to:
(a) Further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a
productive industry in Washington, using as a foundation the regional
assessment prepared by the collaborative known as the sustainable
aviation fuels northwest;
(b) Facilitate communication and coordination among aviation
biofuels stakeholders;
(c) Provide a forum for discussion and problem solving regarding
potential and current barriers related to technology development,
production, distribution, supply chain development, and
commercialization of aviation biofuels; and
(d) Provide recommendations to the legislature on potential
legislation that will facilitate the technology development,
production, distribution, and commercialization of aviation biofuels.
(3) The FAA center of excellence for alternative jet fuels and
environment at Washington State University, in consultation with the
legislative members, shall designate work group members that represent
sectors involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research,
development, production, and utilization. The work group shall include
but not be limited to representatives from the following:
(a) The Washington state senate;
(b) The Washington state house of representatives;
(c) An agriculture advocacy organization;
(d) An airline operator;
(e) An airplane manufacturer;
(f) An airport operator located in western Washington and an
airport operator located in eastern Washington;
(g) Biofuels feedstock producers;
(h) Two biofuels producers;
(i) The department of agriculture;
(j) The department of commerce;
(k) The department of natural resources;
(l) A sustainable energy advocacy organization;
(m) The United States department of defense;
(n) The University of Washington;
(o) Washington State University; and
(p) The Pacific Northwest national laboratory.
(4) The work group shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(5) The work group may not meet more than twice a year.
(6) The work group shall provide an update of its findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1st of each even year through 2016.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.333.010 (Innovate Washington -- Created -- Mission -- Transfer
of administrative responsibilities for facilities located at the
Washington technology center and Spokane intercollegiate research and
technology institute -- Five-year business plan requirements) and 2011
1st sp.s. c 14 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.333.020 (Board of directors -- Composition -- Meetings -- Duties) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.333.030 (Investing in innovation account) and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 14 s 4;
(4) RCW 43.333.040 (Small business innovation assistance program)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 3;
(5) RCW 43.333.050 (Investing in innovation program -- Administration) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 13 & 2003 c 403 s 8;
(6) RCW 43.333.800 (Sustainable aviation biofuels work group) and
2012 c 63 s 4;
(7) RCW 43.333.900 (Transfer of powers, duties, and functions of
Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute and
Washington technology center) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 17;
(8) RCW 43.333.901 (Effective date -- 2011 1st sp.s. c 14) and 2011
1st sp.s. c 14 s 21;
(9) RCW 41.06.0711 (Innovate Washington -- Certain personnel exempted
from chapter) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 5;
(10) RCW 70.210.020 (Definitions) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 8 &
2003 c 403 s 2;
(11) RCW 70.210.030 (Assessments) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 9 &
2003 c 403 s 4;
(12) RCW 70.210.040 (Loan or grant award criteria) and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 14 s 10 & 2003 c 403 s 5;
(13) RCW 70.210.050 (Peer review committee -- Support of research
commercialization opportunities -- Grant and loan awards, priority,
eligibility) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 11 & 2003 c 403 s 6; and
(14) RCW 70.210.060 (Performance benchmarks, review, report) and
2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 12 & 2003 c 403 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Except for sections 1 and 7 of this act,
this act takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---