BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.210 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "benefit provider" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 28A.400.270.
(2)(a) By December 1, 2013, and December 1st of each year
thereafter, the commissioner shall submit a report to the governor, the
health care authority, and the legislature on school district health
insurance benefits. The report shall be available to the public on the
commissioner's web site. The confidentiality of personally
identifiable district employee data shall be safeguarded consistent
with the provisions of RCW 42.56.400(21).
(b) The report shall include a summary of each school district's
health insurance benefit plans and each district's aggregated financial
data and other information as required in RCW 28A.400.275.
(3) The commissioner shall collect data from school districts or
their benefit providers to fulfill the requirements of this section.
The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement the data
submission requirements under this section and RCW 28A.400.275,
including, but not limited to, the format, timing of data reporting,
data elements, data standards, instructions, definitions, and data
sources.
(4) In fulfilling the duties under chapter 3, Laws of 2012 2nd sp.
sess., the commissioner shall consult with school district
representatives to ensure that the data and reports from benefit
providers will give individual school districts sufficient information
to enhance districts' ability to understand, manage, and seek
competitive alternatives for health insurance coverage for their
employees.
(5) If the commissioner determines that a school district has not
substantially complied with the reporting requirements of RCW
28A.400.275, and the failure is due to the action or inaction of the
school district, the commissioner will inform the superintendent of
public instruction of the noncompliance.
(6) The office of the insurance commissioner shall share all data,
information, and documents collected pursuant to this section with the
health care authority.
(7) Data, information, and documents, other than those described in
subsection (2) of this section, that are provided by a school district
or an entity providing coverage pursuant to this section are exempt
from public inspection and copying under chapter 3, Laws of 2012 2nd
sp. sess. and chapters 42.17A and 42.56 RCW.
(((7))) (8) If a school district or benefit provider does not
comply with the data reporting requirements of this section or RCW
28A.400.275, and the failure is due to the actions of an entity
providing coverage authorized under this title ((48 RCW)), the
commissioner may take enforcement actions under this chapter.
(((8))) (9) The commissioner may enter into one or more personal
services contracts with third-party contractors to provide services
necessary to accomplish the commissioner's responsibilities under
chapter 3, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.655 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
By June 1, 2015, the health care authority must report to the
governor, legislature, and joint legislative audit and review committee
the following duties and analyses, based on two years of reports and
other data, information, and documents collected by the office of the
insurance commissioner, on school district health benefits submitted to
it by the office of the insurance commissioner under this section or
RCW 48.02.210:
(1) The director shall establish a specific target to realize the
goal of greater equity between premium costs for full family coverage
and employee only coverage for the same health benefit plan. In
developing this target, the director shall consider the appropriateness
of the three-to-one ratio of employee premium costs between full family
coverage and employee only coverage, and consider alternatives based on
the data and information received from the office of the insurance
commissioner.
(2) The director shall also study and report the advantages and
disadvantages to the state, local school districts, and district
employees:
(a) Whether better progress on the legislative goals could be
achieved through consolidation of school district health insurance
purchasing through a single consolidated school employee health
benefits purchasing plan;
(b) Whether better progress on the legislative goals could be
achieved by consolidating K-12 health insurance purchasing through the
public employees' benefits board program, and whether consolidation
into the public employees' benefits board program would be preferable
to the creation of a consolidated school employee health benefits
purchasing plan; and
(c) Whether certificated or classified employees, as separate
groups, would be better served by purchasing health insurance through
a single consolidated school employee health benefits purchasing plan
or through participation in the public employees' benefits board
program((; and
(d))).
(3) Analyses shall include implications of taking any of the
actions described in subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this
((subsection)) section to include, at a minimum, the following: The
costs for the state and school employees, impacts for existing
purchasing programs, a proposed timeline for the implementation of any
recommended actions.
(4) Data, information, and documents that are provided to the
authority by a school district, an entity providing coverage, the
office of the insurance commissioner, or the joint legislative audit
and review committee, pursuant to this section or RCW 48.02.210 are
exempt from public inspection and copying under chapters 42.17A and
42.56 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 277 s 5 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);
(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described
in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance
commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to
RCW 28A.400.275, 41.05.655, and 48.02.210; ((and))
(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.29.017; and
(23) Information not subject to public inspection or public
disclosure under RCW 48.43.730(5).

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.400 and 2013 c 65 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b);
(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described
in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the insurance
commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage pursuant to
RCW 28A.400.275, 41.05.655, and 48.02.210; and
(22) Data, information, and documents obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.29.017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2017.

--- END ---