BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need grant program, thus assisting
financially needy or disadvantaged students domiciled in Washington to
obtain the opportunity of attending an accredited institution of higher
education. State need grants under this chapter are available only to
students who are resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (((d))) (e) or any person who has completed the full senior
year of high school and obtained a high school diploma, either at a
Washington public high school or private high school approved under
chapter 28A.195 RCW, or a person who has received the equivalent of a
diploma; who has lived in Washington state for at least three years
immediately before receiving the diploma or its equivalent; who has
continuously lived in the state of Washington after receiving the
diploma or its equivalent and until such time as the individual is
admitted to an eligible institution of higher education and has been
granted deferred action for childhood arrival status pursuant to the
rules and regulations adopted by the United States citizenship and
immigration services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the real
hope act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2015, from the general fund to the student achievement council
solely for the purpose of student financial aid payments under the
state need grant program.

--- END ---