BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state of Washington has a long
history of leading in efforts to protect our natural environment while
encouraging economic opportunities. Public safety, protection of the
natural environment, and economic opportunities are goals shared by all
Washingtonians.
(2) Hazardous material spill prevention and response programs in
Washington state, created through thoughtful cooperation and
coordination between industry and the communities they serve, is a
model to the rest of the nation and a model to the world. As modes of
transport for various types of hazardous materials change and as the
volume of hazardous materials transported through Washington changes,
it is important that proactive steps are taken to ensure public safety
and protection of natural resources.
(3) This act is intended to build upon strong and prudent plans
currently in effect, identify areas that need further protections, and
invest taxpayer funds today to increase safety and prevent spills.
(4) Prevention of hazardous materials spills is a top priority of
the legislature. Providing first responders, local communities, and
impacted parties with the tools to respond when spills do occur is in
the vital interest of the citizens of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of ecology, in
consultation with the utilities and transportation commission, the
federal railroad administration, and industry representatives, shall
conduct a study on the safety of transporting oil and hazardous
materials in bulk by rail. For the purposes of this act, the term
hazardous materials has the same meaning as hazardous substances as
defined in RCW 88.40.011. The study must include:
(a) A review of:
(i) The federal, state, and local emergency response and prevention
programs and activities for spills from railcars transporting oil and
hazardous materials with a focus on high hazard areas where emergency
response equipment can be strategically placed for use by federal,
state, regional, or local governments or other emergency responders;
(ii) The capacity of local jurisdictions to prevent and respond to
oil and hazardous materials spills;
(iii) The identification of weaknesses or gaps in federal, state,
and local oil and hazardous materials spill prevention and response;
and
(iv) Federal regulations governing oil and hazardous materials
spill prevention and response for transport by rail;
(b) A survey of:
(i) Local government funding for emergency oil and hazardous
materials spill prevention and response programs;
(ii) Sources of funding, entities assessed, or contributions
required by participants of emergency oil and hazardous materials spill
prevention and response programs; and
(iii) Regional or countywide cooperative agreements implementing
oil and hazardous materials spill prevention and response programs;
(c) Recommendations for legislative consideration on at least the
following:
(i) Levels of funding and sources of funding for emergency oil and
hazardous materials spill prevention and response programs;
(ii) Participants that should be included in an emergency oil and
hazardous materials spill prevention and response program and the
amount these participants should be assessed;
(iii) Appropriate use of funds such as: Oil and hazardous
materials spill response, equipment, training, or other benefits to
those who are assessed;
(iv) Cooperative regional or countywide agreements to meet
emergency oil and hazardous materials spill prevention and response
program needs, while maintaining an individual organization's distinct
purpose; and
(v) Methods to increase cooperation and coordination among
organizations responding to oil and hazardous materials spills,
including:
(A) Sharing resources or mutual aide between terrestrial and
on-water oil and hazardous materials spill emergencies; and
(B) Communication to ensure a common understanding of the potential
threat from oil or hazardous materials spills.
(2) The department of ecology must provide: (a) A preliminary
evaluation on the status of the safety of transporting hazardous
materials in the state, and include recommendations for near-term
legislative action to address needs identified in the review as
required under subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section, to the relevant
policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
by December 31, 2014; and (b) using the study and reviews conducted
under this section, a final report regarding the safety of the
transport of hazardous materials, as well as recommendations for
policy, budget needs, or legislation to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31,
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of ecology shall conduct an
evaluation of the safety of transporting oil and hazardous materials in
bulk on waters of the state. To the extent possible and practicable,
the department may use or incorporate applicable studies and reports
completed by international, federal, or state agencies or
organizations.
(1) The evaluation must include:
(a) The status of federal, state, and local waterborne oil spill
and hazardous materials spill prevention and preparedness including a
review of:
(i) The capacity to address risks posed by increased waterborne
traffic of oil and hazardous materials; and
(ii) Weaknesses or gaps in oil and hazardous materials spill
prevention and response programs;
(b) Barge and tug operations within the state related to the
movement of oil and petroleum products or hazardous materials;
(c) A description of:
(i) Risks and potential areas of concern where increased prevention
and response activities are needed; and
(ii) Oil spill response organizations and related contractors
currently available for oil and hazardous materials spill prevention
and response activities and their level of readiness; and
(d) A report on those areas of the state where the oil and
hazardous materials spill prevention and response plans and programs
are needed but not completed or robust, including but not limited to
Grays Harbor and the Columbia river.
(2) The department of ecology must: (a) Provide to the relevant
policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
by December 31, 2014, an initial evaluation that includes examples of
excellent oil and hazardous materials spill prevention and response
programs and area or regional efforts; an overview of regional or state
deficiencies or gaps in programs, plans, equipment, or resources; and
recommendations for near-term legislative action; and (b) deliver the
final report regarding the transporting of oil and hazardous materials
on waters of the state, as well as recommendations for policy, budget
needs, or legislation, to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of
the senate and house of representatives by December 31, 2015.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.56.250 and 1991 c 200 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall annually publish an index of available,
up-to-date descriptions of prevention plans and contingency plans for
oil spills submitted and approved pursuant to RCW 90.56.200, 90.56.210,
88.46.040, and 88.46.060 and an inventory of equipment available for
responding to such spills.
(2) The department shall make available on its web site: (a)
Descriptions of prevention and contingency programs for oil or
hazardous materials spills; (b) descriptions of how the department is
responding to or has addressed public concerns regarding oil and
hazardous materials spill prevention and response; and (c) in the event
of an oil or hazardous materials spill, information and updates
regarding all efforts taken to clean up the spill, in consultation with
and in agreement with the unified command, if applicable. The
department may not make available on its web site specific plan
elements or confidential information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must provide to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives:
(a) A review of all state and federal geographic response plans as
needed in contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.210 and 88.46.060
by December 31, 2014; and
(b) Annual updates, beginning December 31, 2015, and ending
December 31, 2021, as required under RCW 43.01.036, as to the progress
made in completing state and federal geographic response plans as
needed in contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.060, 90.56.210,
and 88.46.060.
(2) The department must contract, if practicable, with eligible
independent third parties to ensure completion by December 1, 2016, of
at least fifty percent of the geographic response plans as needed in
contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.210 and 88.46.060 for the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner or operator for each facility other than a
transmission pipeline shall submit to the department data and
information on the volume and type of crude oil that arrived at and
departed from the facility each month, including the place of origin of
the crude oil, the mode of arrival and departure at the facility
including, but not limited to, arrival by vessel, rail, or pipeline.
(2)(a) Any person required to present information to the department
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may request that specific
information be held in confidence. Information requested to be held in
confidence is presumed to be confidential.
(b) Information presented to the department pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section must be held in confidence by the department or
aggregated to the extent necessary to ensure confidentiality if public
disclosure of the specific information or data would result in an
unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the
information.
(c)(i) Whenever the department receives a request to publicly
disclose unaggregated information or otherwise proposes to publicly
disclose information submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, notice of the request or proposal must be provided to the
person submitting the information. The notice must indicate the form
in which the information is to be released. Upon receipt of notice,
the person submitting the information has ten working days in which to
respond to the notice to justify the claim of confidentiality on each
specific item of information covered by the notice on the basis that
public disclosure of the specific information would result in an unfair
competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information.
(ii) The department shall consider the respondent's submittal in
determining whether to publicly disclose the information submitted to
it to which a claim of confidentiality is made. The department shall
issue a written decision that sets forth its reasons for making the
determination whether each item of information for which a claim of
confidentiality is made remains confidential or must be publicly
disclosed.
(iii) The department shall not publicly disclose information
submitted to it pursuant to subsection (1) of this section within ten
working days after the department has issued its written decision
required in (c)(ii) of this subsection.
(iv) No information submitted to the department pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section may be deemed confidential if the person
submitting the information or data has made it public.
(v) With respect to information provided under subsection (1) of
this section, neither the department nor any employee of the department
may do any of the following:
(A) Use the information for any purpose other than the statistical
purposes for which it is supplied;
(B) Make any publication whereby the information furnished by any
particular establishment or individual can be identified; or
(C) Permit anyone other than department employees to examine the
individual reports provided under subsection (1) of this section.
(d) Any confidential information pertinent to the responsibilities
of the department that is obtained by another state agency must be
available to the department and must be treated in a confidential
manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of ecology and the utilities
and transportation commission shall jointly hold a symposium on
emergency prevention and response activities for oil and hazardous
materials transported in the Pacific Northwest region. The department
of ecology and the utilities and transportation commission must invite
state representatives from the Pacific Northwest economic region
authorized under chapter 43.147 RCW and representatives from interested
tribes and local governments. The symposium must include
representatives from neighboring states, territories, and countries.
The symposium must at a minimum address:
(1) Cooperative emergency prevention and response activities
between the shared international and state borders;
(2) Expected risks posed by increased transport of Canadian crude
oil or hazardous materials throughout the Pacific Northwest region
within the next three to five years;
(3) Changes in methods for transporting oil and hazardous materials
and associated risks;
(4) Identification of responsible agencies and corresponding
activities that can be taken to address expected risks; and
(5) Consideration of new or emerging technologies to make transport
safer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department of ecology shall provide
grants to emergency responders to assist with oil spill response and
firefighting equipment and resources needed to meet the requirements of
this act.
(2) The department of ecology, in consultation with emergency first
responders, representatives from the oil and rail industries, and
businesses that are recipients of bulk hazardous materials shall review
grant applications.
(a) The application review must include evaluation of equipment and
resource requests, funding requirements, and coordination with existing
equipment and resources in the area.
(b) Funding must be prioritized for applicants from areas where oil
or other hazardous materials are transferred from one mode of
transportation to another.
(c) Grants must be coordinated to maximize currently existing
equipment and resources that have been put in place by first responders
and industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act may be known and cited as the spill
prevention and response act.

--- END ---