BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
compensating an injured worker permanently and totally disabled from an
industrial injury or occupational disease. However, a permanent and
total disability award should not be a replacement for retirement
income. The legislature finds that a permanent and total disability
award is intended to provide compensation to an injured worker only
during the individual's working years. This statutory change will
generate substantial savings while continuing to protect totally
disabled workers during their working years. The legislature intends
to utilize the savings generated to provide additional monetary
benefits to permanent partial disability award recipients and to lower
workers' compensation rates for Washington employers.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.060 and 2007 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the supervisor of industrial insurance shall determine
that permanent total disability results from the injury, the worker
shall receive monthly during the period of such disability:
(a) If married at the time of injury, sixty-five percent of his or
her wages.
(b) If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty-seven
percent of his or her wages.
(c) If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty-nine
percent of his or her wages.
(d) If married with three children at the time of injury,
seventy-one percent of his or her wages.
(e) If married with four children at the time of injury,
seventy-three percent of his or her wages.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy-five percent of his or her wages.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or
her wages.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty-two
percent of his or her wages.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of injury,
sixty-four percent of his or her wages.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of injury,
sixty-six percent of his or her wages.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of injury,
sixty-eight percent of his or her wages.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy percent of his or her wages.
(2) For any period of time where both husband and wife are entitled
to compensation as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that
spouse having the higher wages of the two shall be entitled to claim
their child or children for compensation purposes.
(3) In case of permanent total disability, if the character of the
injury is such as to render the worker so physically helpless as to
require the hiring of the services of an attendant, the department
shall make monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long
as such requirement continues, but such payments shall not obtain or be
operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.
(4) Should any further accident result in the permanent total
disability of an injured worker, he or she shall receive the pension to
which he or she would be entitled, notwithstanding the payment of a
lump sum for his or her prior injury.
(5) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month if a worker is married and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (5)(b)
is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker as
determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the worker
shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker or the
minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
The limitations under this subsection shall not apply to the
payments provided for in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) In the case of new or reopened claims, if the supervisor of
industrial insurance determines that, at the time of filing or
reopening, the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached
to the workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.
(7) The benefits provided by this section are subject to
modification under RCW 51.32.067.
(8)(a) Benefits under this section end when the worker reaches full
federal retirement age as defined by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 416(1).
(b) This subsection applies to all determinations of permanent
total disability made by the department on or after July 1, 2014.
(9) Beginning on June 30, 2015, and no later than each June 30th
thereafter, the department shall determine the fiscal cost savings
achieved by subsection (8) of this section for the prior calendar year.
The savings achieved in the prior year must be used in the subsequent
year as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of the cost savings achieved by subsection (8) of
this section in the prior year must be used to decrease the basic
accident fund premium rates equally across all risk classifications for
the following year; and
(b) Fifty percent of the cost savings achieved by subsection (8) of
this section in the prior year must be used to increase the amount of
permanent partial disability awards. The increased amount is
considered a supplement to a permanent partial disability award and
must be distributed proportionately based upon the percentage of the
injured worker's disability rating. Permanent partial disability
awards that may not be supplemented are those in which the injured
worker has died or has reached full federal retirement age as of the
date the supplement would be distributed or has received or is
receiving permanent total disability compensation. Permanent partial
disability awards paid by self-insured employers also may not be
supplemented. Subject to the limitations of this subsection, permanent
partial disability awards to be supplemented are awards that:
(i) Will be paid in the following year; and
(ii) Have been paid in previous years, regardless of whether the
claim is closed, subject to reasonable efforts made by the department
to locate injured workers who have received permanent partial
disability awards in previous years. The award of the supplement does
not constitute a reopening of a claim. "Reasonable efforts" means the
department has attempted to contact the injured worker at the injured
worker's last known address on file with the department.
(10) The supplement under subsection (9) of this section does not
constitute an entitlement and no private cause of action is created.
An injured worker who disagrees with the department's decision
regarding a distribution of a supplement to the injured worker may seek
review of the department's decision by contacting the department in the
manner provided by rule.
(11) The department shall develop rules as necessary to implement
subsections (8) through (10) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.067 and 2006 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After a worker elects one of the options in (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection, that option shall apply only if the worker dies during
a period of permanent total disability from a cause unrelated to the
injury, leaving a surviving spouse, child, children, or other
dependent. If, after making an election under this subsection, a
worker dies from a cause related to the injury during a period of
permanent total disability, his or her beneficiaries shall receive
benefits under RCW 51.32.050 (2) through (5).
(a) Option I. An injured worker selecting this option shall
receive the benefits provided by RCW 51.32.060, with no benefits being
paid to the worker's surviving spouse, children, or others.
(b) Option II. An injured worker selecting this option shall
receive an actuarially reduced benefit which upon death shall be
((continued throughout the life of and)) paid to the surviving spouse,
child, or other dependent as the worker has nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. The benefit
is payable to the designated beneficiary through the designated
beneficiary's life or through the period the injured worker would have
been entitled to permanent total disability benefits, whichever ends
first.
(c) Option III. An injured worker selecting this option shall
receive an actuarially reduced benefit and, upon death, one-half of the
reduced benefit shall be ((continued throughout the life of and)) paid
to the surviving spouse, child, or other dependent as the worker has
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. The benefit is payable to the designated beneficiary
through the designated beneficiary's life or through the period the
injured worker would have been entitled to permanent total disability
benefits, whichever ends first.
(2) The worker shall make the election in writing and the worker's
spouse, if any, shall consent in writing as a prerequisite to the
election of Option I.
(3) If the worker's nominated beneficiary is the worker's spouse,
and the worker and spouse enter into a dissolution of marriage after
the nomination has been made, the worker may apply to receive benefits
as calculated under Option I if the period of the worker's entitlement
to permanent total disability benefits has not ended. This change is
effective the date of the decree of dissolution of marriage, but no
more than one year prior to the date application for the change is
received in the department, provided the worker submits legally
certified documentation of the decree of dissolution of marriage.
(4) If the worker's nominated beneficiary dies, the worker may
apply to receive benefits as calculated under Option I if the period of
the worker's entitlement to permanent total disability benefits has not
ended. This change is effective the date of death, but no more than
one year prior to the date application for the change is received in
the department, provided the worker submits a certified copy of the
death certificate.
(5) The change in benefits authorized by subsections (3) and (4) of
this section is a one-time adjustment and will be permanent for the
((life of the worker)) period of the worker's entitlement to permanent
total disability benefits.
(6) The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to
implement this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 401 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Until July 1, 1993, for the permanent partial disabilities
here specifically described, the injured worker shall receive
compensation as follows:

LOSS BY AMPUTATION

Of leg above the knee joint with short
thigh stump (3" or less below the
tuberosity of ischium) . . . . . . . . . . . .

$54,000.00

Of leg at or above knee joint with
functional stump . . . . . . . . . . . .
48,600.00

Of leg below knee joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Of leg at ankle (Syme) . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,800.00

Of foot at mid-metatarsals . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,900.00

Of great toe with resection of metatarsal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . .
11,340.00

Of great toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
6,804.00

Of great toe at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,600.00

Of lesser toe (2nd to 5th) with resection of
metatarsal bone . . . . . . . . . . . .
4,140.00

Of lesser toe at metatarsophalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
2,016.00

Of lesser toe at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
1,494.00

Of lesser toe at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
378.00

Of arm at or above the deltoid insertion or
by disarticulation at the shoulder . . . . . . . . . . . .
54,000.00

Of arm at any point from below the deltoid
insertion to below the elbow joint at
the insertion of the biceps tendon . . . . . . . . . . . .

51,300.00

Of arm at any point from below the elbow
joint distal to the insertion of the
biceps tendon to and including
mid-metacarpal amputation of the
hand . . . . . . . . . . . .

48,600.00

Of all fingers except the thumb at
metacarpophalangeal joints . . . . . . . . . . . .
29,160.00

Of thumb at metacarpophalangeal joint or
with resection of carpometacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . .

19,440.00

Of thumb at interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . . 9,720.00

Of index finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . .

12,150.00

Of index finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
9,720.00

Of index finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
5,346.00

Of middle finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . .

9,720.00

Of middle finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
7,776.00

Of middle finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
4,374.00

Of ring finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . .

4,860.00

Of ring finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
3,888.00

Of ring finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
2,430.00

Of little finger at metacarpophalangeal
joint or with resection of metacarpal
bone . . . . . . . . . . . .

2,430.00

Of little finger at proximal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
1,944.00

Of little finger at distal interphalangeal
joint . . . . . . . . . . . .
972.00

MISCELLANEOUS

Loss of one eye by enucleation . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,600.00

Loss of central visual acuity in one eye . . . . . . . . . . . . 18,000.00

Complete loss of hearing in both ears . . . . . . . . . . . . 43,200.00

Complete loss of hearing in one ear . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,200.00

(b) Beginning on July 1, 1993, compensation under this subsection
shall be computed as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the compensation amounts for the
specified disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection shall be
increased by thirty-two percent; ((and))
(ii) Except as provided in (b)(iii) of this subsection, beginning
on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the compensation amounts
for the specified disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection, as
adjusted under (b)(i) of this subsection, shall be readjusted to
reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index, calculated
as follows: The index for the calendar year preceding the year in
which the July calculation is made, to be known as "calendar year A,"
is divided by the index for the calendar year preceding calendar year
A, and the resulting ratio is multiplied by the compensation amount in
effect on June 30 immediately preceding the July 1st on which the
respective calculation is made. For the purposes of this subsection,
"index" means the same as the definition in RCW 2.12.037(1); and
(iii) Beginning July 1, 2017, the compensation amounts for the
specified disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection must be
readjusted as follows:
(A) Annually, on July 1st of each year, the amounts must be
readjusted to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price
index, calculated under the formula provided in (b)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(B) The amounts must be readjusted on the basis of the formula
provided in RCW 51.32.060(9) for state fund employers.
(2) Compensation for amputation of a member or part thereof at a
site other than those specified in subsection (1) of this section, and
for loss of central visual acuity and loss of hearing other than
complete, shall be in proportion to that which such other amputation or
partial loss of visual acuity or hearing most closely resembles and
approximates. Compensation shall be calculated based on the adjusted
schedule of compensation in effect for the respective time period as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Compensation for any other permanent partial disability not
involving amputation shall be in the proportion which the extent of
such other disability, called unspecified disability, shall bear to the
disabilities specified in subsection (1) of this section, which most
closely resembles and approximates in degree of disability such other
disability, and compensation for any other unspecified permanent
partial disability shall be in an amount as measured and compared to
total bodily impairment. To reduce litigation and establish more
certainty and uniformity in the rating of unspecified permanent partial
disabilities, the department shall enact rules having the force of law
classifying such disabilities in the proportion which the department
shall determine such disabilities reasonably bear to total bodily
impairment. In enacting such rules, the department shall give
consideration to, but need not necessarily adopt, any nationally
recognized medical standards or guides for determining various bodily
impairments.
(b) Until July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be deemed to be ninety thousand dollars.
Beginning on July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary
benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable for total
bodily impairment shall be adjusted as follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the amount payable for total bodily
impairment under this section shall be increased to one hundred
eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; ((and))
(ii) Except as provided in (b)(iii) of this subsection, beginning
on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the amount payable for
total bodily impairment prescribed in (b)(i) of this subsection shall
be adjusted as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section; and
(iii) Beginning July 1, 2017, the compensation amounts calculated
under (a) of this subsection must be readjusted as follows:
(A) Annually, on July 1st of each year, the amounts must be
readjusted to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price
index, calculated under the formula provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii)
of this section; and
(B) The amounts must be readjusted on the basis of the formula
provided in RCW 51.32.060(9) for state fund employers.
(c) Until July 1, 1993, the total compensation for all unspecified
permanent partial disabilities resulting from the same injury shall not
exceed the sum of ninety thousand dollars. Beginning on July 1, 1993,
total compensation for all unspecified permanent partial disabilities
resulting from the same injury shall not exceed a sum calculated as
follows:
(i) Beginning on July 1, 1993, the sum shall be increased to one
hundred eighteen thousand eight hundred dollars; ((and))
(ii) Except as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection, beginning
on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the sum prescribed in
(b)(i) of this subsection shall be adjusted as provided in subsection
(1)(b)(ii) of this section; and
(iii) Beginning July 1, 2017, the compensation amounts calculated
under (a) of this subsection must be readjusted as follows:
(A) Annually, on July 1st of each year, the amounts must be
readjusted to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price
index, calculated under the formula provided in (1)(b)(ii) of this
section; and
(B) The amounts must be readjusted on the basis of the formula
provided in RCW 51.32.060(9) for state fund employers.
(4) If permanent partial disability compensation is followed by
permanent total disability compensation, all permanent partial
disability compensation paid to the worker under the claim or claims
for which total permanent disability compensation is awarded shall be,
at the choosing of the injured worker, either: (a) Deducted from the
worker's monthly pension benefits until the total award or awards paid
are recovered; or (b) deducted from the pension reserve of such injured
worker and his or her monthly compensation payments shall be reduced
accordingly. Any interest paid on any permanent partial disability
compensation may not be deducted from the pension benefits or pension
reserve. The provisions of this subsection apply to all permanent
total disability determinations issued on or after July 1, 2011.
(5) Should a worker receive an injury to a member or part of his or
her body already, from whatever cause, permanently partially disabled,
resulting in the amputation thereof or in an aggravation or increase in
such permanent partial disability but not resulting in the permanent
total disability of such worker, his or her compensation for such
partial disability shall be adjudged with regard to the previous
disability of the injured member or part and the degree or extent of
the aggravation or increase of disability thereof.
(6) When the compensation provided for in subsections (1) through
(3) of this section exceeds three times the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018, payment shall
be made in monthly payments in accordance with the schedule of
temporary total disability payments set forth in RCW 51.32.090 until
such compensation is paid to the injured worker in full, except that
the first monthly payment shall be in an amount equal to three times
the average monthly wage in the state as computed under the provisions
of RCW 51.08.018. Upon application of the injured worker or survivor
the monthly payment may be converted, in whole or in part, into a lump
sum payment, in which event the monthly payment shall cease in whole or
in part. Such conversion may be made only upon written application of
the injured worker or survivor to the department and shall rest in the
discretion of the department depending upon the merits of each
individual application. Upon the death of a worker all unpaid
installments accrued shall be paid according to the payment schedule
established prior to the death of the worker to the widow or widower,
or if there is no widow or widower surviving, to the dependent children
of such claimant, and if there are no such dependent children, then to
such other dependents as defined by this title.
(7) Awards payable under this section are governed by the schedule
in effect on the date of injury.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.16.035 and 2005 c 410 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall classify all occupations or industries in
accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of
premium which shall be:
(a) The lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the
accident and medical aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance
principles; ((and))
(b) Designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in premium rates; and
(c) Adopted using the savings formula provided in RCW 51.32.060(9)
for state fund employers.
(2) The department shall formulate and adopt rules governing the
method of premium calculation and collection and providing for a rating
system consistent with recognized principles of workers' compensation
insurance which shall be designed to stimulate and encourage accident
prevention and to facilitate collection. The department may annually,
or at such other times as it deems necessary to achieve the objectives
under this section, readjust rates in accordance with the rating system
to become effective on such dates as the department may designate.
(3)(a) After the first report is issued by the state auditor under
RCW 51.44.115, the workers' compensation advisory committee shall
review the report and, as the committee deems appropriate, may make
recommendations to the department concerning:
(i) The level or levels of a contingency reserve that are
appropriate to maintain actuarial solvency of the accident and medical
aid funds, limit premium rate fluctuations, and account for economic
conditions; and
(ii) When surplus funds exist in the trust funds, the circumstances
under which the department should give premium dividends, or similar
measures, or temporarily reduce rates below the rates fixed under
subsection (1) of this section, including any recommendations regarding
notifications that should be given before taking the action.
(b) Following subsequent reports issued by the state auditor under
RCW 51.44.115, the workers' compensation advisory committee may, as it
deems appropriate, update its recommendations to the department on the
matters covered under (a) of this subsection.
(4) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of dividends or premium
discounts.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.040 and 2013 c 125 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.20B.720, 72.09.111, 74.20A.260,
and 51.32.380, no money paid or payable under this title shall, before
the issuance and delivery of the payment, be assigned, charged, or
taken in execution, attached, garnished, or pass or be paid to any
other person by operation of law, any form of voluntary assignment, or
power of attorney. Any such assignment or charge is void unless the
transfer is to a financial institution at the request of a worker or
other beneficiary and made in accordance with RCW 51.32.045.
(2)(a) If any worker suffers (i) a permanent partial injury and
dies from some other cause than the accident which produced the injury
before he or she receives payment of the award for the permanent
partial injury or (ii) any other injury before he or she receives
payment of any monthly installment covering any period of time before
his or her death, the amount of the permanent partial disability award
or the monthly payment, or both, shall be paid to the surviving spouse
or the child or children if there is no surviving spouse. If there is
no surviving spouse and no child or children, the award or the amount
of the monthly payment shall be paid by the department or self-insurer
and distributed consistent with the terms of the decedent's will or, if
the decedent dies intestate, consistent with the terms of RCW
11.04.015. The increase in a permanent partial disability award under
RCW 51.32.060(9)(b) does not apply when a permanent partial disability
award is being paid to the surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, to the child or children, under this section.
(b) If any worker suffers an injury and dies from it before he or
she receives payment of any monthly installment covering time loss for
any period of time before his or her death, the amount of the monthly
payment shall be paid to the surviving spouse or the child or children
if there is no surviving spouse. If there is no surviving spouse and
no child or children, the amount of the monthly payment shall be paid
by the department or self-insurer and distributed consistent with the
terms of the decedent's will or, if the decedent dies intestate,
consistent with the terms of RCW 11.04.015.
(c) Any application for compensation under this subsection (2)
shall be filed with the department or self-insuring employer within one
year of the date of death. The department or self-insurer may satisfy
its responsibilities under this subsection (2) by sending any payment
due in the name of the decedent and to the last known address of the
decedent.
(3)(a) Any worker or beneficiary receiving benefits under this
title who is subsequently confined in, or who subsequently becomes
eligible for benefits under this title while confined in, any
institution under conviction and sentence shall have all payments of
the compensation canceled during the period of confinement. After
discharge from the institution, payment of benefits due afterward shall
be paid if the worker or beneficiary would, except for the provisions
of this subsection (3), otherwise be entitled to them.
(b) If any prisoner is injured in the course of his or her
employment while participating in a work or training release program
authorized by chapter 72.65 RCW and is subject to the provisions of
this title, he or she is entitled to payments under this title, subject
to the requirements of chapter 72.65 RCW, unless his or her
participation in the program has been canceled, or unless he or she is
returned to a state correctional institution, as defined in RCW
72.65.010(3), as a result of revocation of parole or new sentence.
(c) If the confined worker has any beneficiaries during the
confinement period during which benefits are canceled under (a) or (b)
of this subsection, they shall be paid directly the monthly benefits
which would have been paid to the worker for himself or herself and the
worker's beneficiaries had the worker not been confined.
(4) Any lump sum benefits to which a worker would otherwise be
entitled but for the provisions of this section shall be paid on a
monthly basis to his or her beneficiaries.

--- END ---