BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employees of companies providing life alert services must
provide the location and known medical conditions of their customers
when requested by first responders.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "First responder" means firefighters, law enforcement, and
emergency medical personnel as recognized by this state;
(b) "Life alert services" means a service provided for profit that
allows persons in need of emergency assistance to contact a call center
through the activation of a wearable device, such as a pendant or
bracelet.
(3) A violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction under
RCW 7.80.120.

--- END ---