BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.286 and 2007 c 512 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall, with the involvement of the department,
conduct a survey to gather data on ferry users to help inform level of
service, operational, pricing, planning, and investment decisions. The
survey must include, but is not limited to:
(a) Recreational use;
(b) Walk-on customer use;
(c) Vehicle customer use;
(d) Freight and goods movement demand; and
(e) Reactions to potential operational strategies and pricing
policies described under RCW 47.60.327 and 47.60.290.
(2) The commission shall develop the survey after providing an
opportunity for ferry advisory committees to offer input.
(3) The survey must be updated at least every two years and
maintained to support the development and implementation of adaptive
management of ferry services.
(4) At the beginning of each biennium, the commission must report
to the legislature on the surveys conducted pursuant to this chapter
and the cost of conducting such surveys.

--- END ---