BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature has already established
that it is a goal of the state to provide for a public school system
that gives all students the opportunity to achieve personal and
academic success. This goal contains within it a promise of excellence
and opportunity for all students, not just some students. In
establishing the educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee in 2009, the legislature recognized that
additional work was needed to fulfill the promise of excellence and
opportunity for students of certain demographic groups, including
English language learners and also including students with
disabilities.
(2) In its 2013 report to the legislature, the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee made the
following recommendations in keeping with its statutory purpose, which
is to recommend specific policies and strategies to close the
educational opportunity gap:
(a) Decrease the disproportionate representation of students of
color in disciplinary actions in schools;
(b) Enhance the cultural competence of current and future
educators;
(c) Provide English language learner and second language
acquisition endorsements for all educators;
(d) Create new English language learner accountability benchmarks;
(e) Provide tools for deeper data analysis and disaggregation of
student demographic data to inform instructional strategies to close
the opportunity gap; and
(f) Invest in the recruitment and retention of educators of color.
(3) The legislature finds that these recommendations represent a
holistic approach to making progress toward closing the opportunity
gap. The recommendations are interdependent and mutually reinforcing.
Closing the opportunity gap requires highly skilled, culturally
competent, and diverse educators who understand the communities and
cultures that students come from; it requires careful monitoring of not
only the academic performance but also the educational environment for
all students, at a fine grain of detail to assure adequate
accountability; and it requires a robust program of instruction,
including appropriately trained educators, to help English language
learners gain language proficiency as well as academic proficiency.
(4) Therefore the legislature intends to adopt policies and
programs to implement the six recommendations of the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.

PART I
DISPROPORTIONALITY IN STUDENT DISCIPLINE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
convene a discipline task force to develop standard definitions for
causes of student disciplinary actions taken at the discretion of the
school district. The task force must also develop data collection
standards for disciplinary actions that are discretionary and for
disciplinary actions that result in the exclusion of a student from
school. The data collection standards must include data about
education services provided while a student is subject to a
disciplinary action, the status of petitions for readmission to the
school district when a student has been excluded from school, credit
retrieval during a period of exclusion, and school dropout as a result
of disciplinary action.
(2) The discipline task force shall include representatives from
the K-12 data governance group, the educational opportunity gap
oversight and accountability committee, the state ethnic commissions,
the governor's office of Indian affairs, the office of the education
ombudsman, school districts, and other education and advocacy
organizations.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
K-12 data governance group shall revise the statewide student data
system to incorporate the student discipline data collection standards
recommended by the discipline task force, and begin collecting data
based on the revised standards in the 2016-17 school year.

Sec. 102 RCW 28A.600.015 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and
distribute to all school districts lawful and reasonable rules
prescribing the substantive and procedural due process guarantees of
pupils in the common schools. Such rules shall authorize a school
district to use informal due process procedures in connection with the
short-term suspension of students to the extent constitutionally
permissible: PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public instruction
deems the interest of students to be adequately protected. When a
student suspension or expulsion is appealed, the rules shall authorize
a school district to impose the suspension or expulsion temporarily
after an initial hearing for no more than ten consecutive school days
or until the appeal is decided, whichever is earlier. Any days that
the student is temporarily suspended or expelled before the appeal is
decided shall be applied to the term of the student suspension or
expulsion and shall not limit or extend the term of the student
suspension or expulsion. An expulsion or suspension of a student may
not be for an indefinite period of time. A suspension or expulsion of
a student may not be for an indefinite period of time, and a school
district may not suspend the provision of educational services to a
student as a disciplinary measure.
(2) Short-term suspension procedures may be used for suspensions of
students up to and including, ten consecutive school days.
(3) Emergency expulsions must end or be converted to another form
of corrective action within ten school days from the date of the
emergency removal from school. Notice and due process rights must be
provided to students when an emergency expulsion is converted to
another form of corrective action.
(4) For any circumstance where disciplinary action is discretionary
on the part of the school district, a school district may not impose a
disciplinary action that results in the suspension of educational
services to a student. A student may be excluded from a particular
classroom or instructional or activity area for the period of
suspension, but the school district must provide an opportunity for the
student to receive educational services in an alternative manner, which
may include services provided through an alternative program, at an
alternative school, or at an alternative location within the student's
regular school.

Sec. 103 RCW 28A.600.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 303 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.600.010 shall be
interpreted to ensure that the optimum learning atmosphere of the
classroom is maintained, and that the highest consideration is given to
the judgment of qualified certificated educators regarding conditions
necessary to maintain the optimum learning atmosphere.
(2) Any student who creates a disruption of the educational process
in violation of the building disciplinary standards while under a
teacher's immediate supervision may be excluded by the teacher from his
or her individual classroom and instructional or activity area for all
or any portion of the balance of the school day, or up to the following
two days, or until the principal or designee and teacher have
conferred, whichever occurs first. Except in emergency circumstances,
the teacher first must attempt one or more alternative forms of
corrective action. In no event without the consent of the teacher may
an excluded student return to the class during the balance of that
class or activity period or up to the following two days, or until the
principal or his or her designee and the teacher have conferred.
(3) In order to preserve a beneficial learning environment for all
students and to maintain good order and discipline in each classroom,
every school district board of directors shall provide that written
procedures are developed for administering discipline at each school
within the district. Such procedures shall be developed with the
participation of parents and the community, and shall provide that the
teacher, principal or designee, and other authorities designated by the
board of directors, make every reasonable attempt to involve the parent
or guardian and the student in the resolution of student discipline
problems. Such procedures shall provide that students may be excluded
from their individual classes or activities for periods of time in
excess of that provided in subsection (2) of this section if such
students have repeatedly disrupted the learning of other students. The
procedures must be consistent with the rules of the superintendent of
public instruction and must provide for early involvement of parents in
attempts to improve the student's behavior.
(4) The procedures shall assure, pursuant to RCW 28A.400.110, that
all staff work cooperatively toward consistent enforcement of proper
student behavior throughout each school as well as within each
classroom.
(5)(a) A principal shall consider imposing long-term suspension or
expulsion as a sanction when deciding the appropriate disciplinary
action for a student who, after July 27, 1997:
(i) Engages in two or more violations within a three-year period of
RCW 9A.46.120, 28A.320.135, 28A.600.455, 28A.600.460, 28A.635.020,
28A.600.020, 28A.635.060, 9.41.280, or 28A.320.140; or
(ii) Engages in one or more of the offenses listed in RCW
13.04.155.
(b) The principal shall communicate the disciplinary action taken
by the principal to the school personnel who referred the student to
the principal for disciplinary action.
(6) Any corrective action involving a suspension or expulsion from
school for more than ten days must have an end date of not more than
one calendar year from the time of corrective action. Districts shall
make reasonable efforts to assist students and parents in returning to
an educational setting prior to and no later than the end date of the
corrective action. Where warranted based on public health or safety,
a school may petition the superintendent of the school district,
pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, for authorization to exceed the
one calendar year limitation provided in this subsection. The
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules outlining the
limited circumstances in which a school may petition to exceed the one
calendar year limitation, including safeguards to ensure that the
school district has made every effort to plan for the student's return
to school. School districts shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction the number of petitions made to
the school board and the number of petitions granted on an annual
basis.
(7) Nothing in this section prevents a public school district,
educational service district, the Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, or the state school for the blind if it has
suspended or expelled a student from the student's regular school
setting from providing educational services to the student in an
alternative setting or modifying the suspension or expulsion on a case-by-case basis.
(8) As provided in RCW 28A.600.015, for any circumstance where
disciplinary action is discretionary on the part of the school
district, a school district may not impose disciplinary action that
results in the suspension of educational services to a student.

Sec. 104 RCW 28A.600.460 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 305 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) School district boards of directors shall adopt policies that
restore discipline to the classroom. Such policies must provide for at
least the following: Allowing each teacher to take disciplinary action
to correct a student who disrupts normal classroom activities, abuses
or insults a teacher as prohibited by RCW 28A.635.010, willfully
disobeys a teacher, uses abusive or foul language directed at a school
district employee, school volunteer, or another student, violates
school rules, or who interferes with an orderly education process.
Disciplinary action may include but is not limited to: Oral or written
reprimands; written notification to parents of disruptive behavior, a
copy of which must be provided to the principal.
(2) A student committing an offense under chapter 9A.36, 9A.40,
9A.46, or 9A.48 RCW when the activity is directed toward the teacher,
shall not be assigned to that teacher's classroom for the duration of
the student's attendance at that school or any other school where the
teacher is assigned.
(3) A student who commits an offense under chapter 9A.36, 9A.40,
9A.46, or 9A.48 RCW, when directed toward another student, may be
removed from the classroom of the victim for the duration of the
student's attendance at that school or any other school where the
victim is enrolled. A student who commits an offense under one of the
chapters enumerated in this section against a student or another school
employee, may be expelled or suspended.
(4) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of
a school under existing law and rules to expel or suspend a student for
misconduct or criminal behavior. However, as provided in RCW
28A.600.015, for any circumstance where disciplinary action is
discretionary on the part of the school district, a school district may
not impose disciplinary action that results in the suspension of
educational services to a student.
(5) All school districts must collect data on disciplinary actions
taken in each school and must record these actions using the statewide
student data system, based on the data collection standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the K-12
data governance group. The information shall be made available to the
public, but public release of the data shall not include personally
identifiable information including, but not limited to, a student's
social security number, name, or address.

Sec. 105 RCW 43.41.400 and 2012 c 229 s 585 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of
financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
conduct collaborative analyses of early learning, K-12, and higher
education programs and education issues across the P-20 system, which
includes the department of early learning, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the student
achievement council, public and private nonprofit four-year
institutions of higher education, and the employment security
department. The education data center shall conduct collaborative
analyses under this section with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and provide data electronically to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, to the
extent permitted by state and federal confidentiality requirements.
The education data center shall be considered an authorized
representative of the state educational agencies in this section under
applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of accessing and
compiling student record data for research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) In consultation with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and the agencies and organizations
participating in the education data center, identify the critical
research and policy questions that are intended to be addressed by the
education data center and the data needed to address the questions;
(b) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and
analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is
disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups,
and complete P-20 research projects;
(c) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature in identifying the data to be compiled and analyzed to
ensure that legislative interests are served;
(d) Annually provide to the K-12 data governance group a list of
data elements and data quality improvements that are necessary to
answer the research and policy questions identified by the education
data center and have been identified by the legislative committees in
(c) of this subsection. Within three months of receiving the list, the
K-12 data governance group shall develop and transmit to the education
data center a feasibility analysis of obtaining or improving the data,
including the steps required, estimated time frame, and the financial
and other resources that would be required. Based on the analysis, the
education data center shall submit, if necessary, a recommendation to
the legislature regarding any statutory changes or resources that would
be needed to collect or improve the data;
(e) Monitor and evaluate the education data collection systems of
the organizations and agencies represented in the education data center
ensuring that data systems are flexible, able to adapt to evolving
needs for information, and to the extent feasible and necessary,
include data that are needed to conduct the analyses and provide
answers to the research and policy questions identified in (a) of this
subsection;
(f) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(g) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs;
(h) Provide research that focuses on student transitions within and
among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors in the P-20 system; ((and))
(i) Prepare a regular report on the educational and workforce
outcomes of youth in the juvenile justice system, using data
disaggregated by ethnic categories, racial subgroups, and age; and
(j) Make recommendations to the legislature as necessary to help
ensure the goals and objectives of this section and RCW 28A.655.210 and
28A.300.507 are met.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, student achievement council,
public four-year institutions of higher education, department of social
and health services, and employment security department shall work with
the education data center to develop data-sharing and research
agreements, consistent with applicable security and confidentiality
requirements, to facilitate the work of the center. The education data
center shall also develop data-sharing and research agreements with the
administrative office of the courts to conduct research on educational
and workforce outcomes using data maintained under RCW 13.50.010(11)
related to juveniles. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher
education that provide programs of education beyond the high school
level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited
by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer
accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research
agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable
security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center
shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education
agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data
center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and
confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each
contributing agency or institution.

PART II
EDUCATOR CULTURAL COMPETENCE
Sec. 201 RCW 28A.405.106 and 2012 c 35 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction must develop and make
available a professional development program to support the
implementation of the evaluation systems required by RCW 28A.405.100.
The program components may be organized into professional development
modules for principals, administrators, and teachers. The professional
development program shall include a comprehensive online training
package.
(2) The training program must include, but not be limited to, the
following topics:
(a) Introduction of the evaluation criteria for teachers and
principals and the four-level rating system;
(b) Orientation to and use of instructional frameworks;
(c) Orientation to and use of the leadership frameworks;
(d) Best practices in developing and using data in the evaluation
systems, including multiple measures, student growth data, classroom
observations, and other measures and evidence;
(e) Strategies for achieving maximum rater agreement;
(f) Evaluator feedback protocols in the evaluation systems;
(g) Examples of high quality teaching and leadership; and
(h) Methods to link the evaluation process to ongoing educator
professional development.
(3) The training program must also include the foundational
elements of cultural competence, focusing on multicultural education
and principles of English language acquisition. The content of the
training must be aligned with the standards for cultural competence
developed by the professional educator standards board under RCW
28A.410.270. The office of the superintendent of public instruction,
in consultation with the professional educator standards board, the
steering committee established in RCW 28A.405.100, and the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, must integrate
the content for cultural competence into the overall training for
principals, administrators, and teachers to support the revised
evaluation systems.
(4) To the maximum extent feasible, the professional development
program must incorporate or adapt existing online training or
curriculum, including securing materials or curriculum under contract
or purchase agreements within available funds. Multiple modes of
instruction should be incorporated including videos of classroom
teaching, participatory exercises, and other engaging combinations of
online audio, video, and print presentation.
(((4))) (5) The professional development program must be developed
in modules that allow:
(a) Access to material over a reasonable number of training
sessions;
(b) Delivery in person or online; and
(c) Use in a self-directed manner.
(((5))) (6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
must maintain a web site that includes the online professional
development materials along with sample evaluation forms and templates,
links to relevant research on evaluation and on high quality teaching
and leadership, samples of contract and collective bargaining language
on key topics, examples of multiple measures of teacher and principal
performance, suggestions for data to measure student growth, and other
tools that will assist school districts in implementing the revised
evaluation systems.
(((6))) (7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
must identify the number of in-service training hours associated with
each professional development module and develop a way for users to
document their completion of the training. Documented completion of
the training under this section is considered approved in-service
training for the purposes of RCW 28A.415.020.
(((7))) (8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall periodically update the modules to reflect new topics and
research on performance evaluation so that the training serves as an
ongoing source of continuing education and professional development.
(((8))) (9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall work with the educational service districts to provide
clearinghouse services for the identification and publication of
professional development opportunities for teachers and principals that
align with performance evaluation criteria.

Sec. 202 RCW 28A.405.120 and 2012 c 35 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts shall require each administrator, each
principal, or other supervisory personnel who has responsibility for
evaluating classroom teachers or principals to have training in
evaluation procedures.
(2) Before school district implementation of the revised evaluation
systems required under RCW 28A.405.100, principals and administrators
who have evaluation responsibilities must engage in professional
development designed to implement the revised systems and maximize
rater agreement. The professional development to support the revised
evaluation systems must also include foundational elements of cultural
competence, focusing on multicultural education and principles of
English language acquisition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
collaboration with the educational opportunity gap oversight and
accountability committee, the professional educator standards board,
colleges of education, and representatives from diverse communities and
community-based organizations, must develop a content outline for
professional development and training in cultural competence for school
staff.
(2) The content of the cultural competence professional development
and training must be aligned with the standards developed by the
professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.270.
(3) The cultural competence professional development and training
must contain components that are appropriate for classified school
staff and district administrators as well as certificated instructional
staff and principals at the building level. The professional
development and training must also contain components suitable for
delivery by individuals from the local community or community-based
organizations with appropriate expertise.
(4) The legislature encourages educational service districts and
school districts to use the cultural competence professional
development and training developed under this section and provide
opportunities for all school and school district staff to gain
knowledge and skills in cultural competence, including in partnership
with their local communities.

PART III
INSTRUCTING ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNERS
Sec. 301 RCW 28A.660.045 and 2007 c 396 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The educator retooling (to teach mathematics and science))
conditional scholarship program is created. Participation is limited
to current K-12 teachers and individuals having an elementary education
certificate but who are not employed in positions requiring an
elementary education certificate. It is anticipated that candidates
enrolled in this program will complete the requirements for a
mathematics ((or)), science, special education, bilingual education, or
English language learner endorsement((, or both,)) in two years or
less.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include:
(a) Current K-12 teachers shall pursue a middle level mathematics
or science, ((or)) secondary mathematics or science, special education,
bilingual education, or English language learner endorsement.
(b) Individuals having an elementary education certificate but who
are not employed in positions requiring an elementary education
certificate shall pursue an endorsement only in middle level
mathematics or science ((only)), special education, bilingual
education, or English language learner.

Sec. 302 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2012 c 229 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these
purposes, the conditional scholarship programs in this chapter are
created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the student achievement
council. In administering the programs, the council has the following
powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the conditional scholarship
programs are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of professional educator standards board-approved
alternative routes to teaching programs under RCW 28A.660.040. For
fiscal year 2011, priority must be given to fiscal year 2010
participants in the alternative route partnership program. In order to
receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through a professional educator standards board-approved program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The council may adjust the annual award by the average
rate of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by RCW 28A.660.042.
In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The student achievement council may adjust the annual award
by the average rate of tuition and fee increases at the state community
and technical colleges.
(c) The educator retooling ((to teach mathematics and science))
conditional scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers.
In order to receive conditional scholarship awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, ((or)) secondary mathematics or
science, special education, bilingual education, or English language
learner endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement shall pursue an endorsement in middle level mathematics or
science, ((or both)) special education, bilingual education, or English
language learner; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive ((a mathematics or science)) the endorsement, ((or
both,)) which shall include passing ((a mathematics or science)) the
associated endorsement test((,)) or ((both)) tests, plus observation
and completing applicable coursework to attain the proper endorsement;
and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select individuals to receive conditional scholarships. In selecting
recipients, preference shall be given to eligible veterans or national
guard members. In awarding educator retooling scholarships to support
additional bilingual education and English language learner
endorsements, the board shall give preference to: Teachers seeking
endorsements in order to be assigned to the transitional bilingual
instructional program under the provisions of RCW 28A.180.040(2),
teachers assigned to schools required under state or federal
accountability measures to implement a plan for improvement, and
teachers assigned to schools whose enrollment of English language
learner students has increased an average of more than five percent per
year over the previous three years.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients who fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The student achievement council shall adopt
rules to define the terms for repayment, including applicable interest
rates, fees, and deferments. The student achievement council must
provide regular reports to the professional educator standards board
that include the enrollment, employment, and repayment status of
recipients of all scholarships under this section and the certificate
number of recipients who have successfully completed a certification
program.
(6) The student achievement council may deposit all appropriations,
collections, and any other funds received for the program in this
chapter in the future teachers conditional scholarship account
authorized in RCW 28B.102.080. Funds received by the professional
educator standards board for the program in this chapter may be
transferred to the student achievement council for deposit in the
future teachers conditional scholarship account.

Sec. 303 RCW 28A.180.040 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall:
(a) Make available to each eligible pupil transitional bilingual
instruction to achieve competency in English, in accord with rules of
the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) Wherever feasible, ensure that communications to parents
emanating from the schools shall be appropriately bilingual for those
parents of pupils in the bilingual instruction program;
(c) Determine, by administration of an English test approved by the
superintendent of public instruction the number of eligible pupils
enrolled in the school district at the beginning of a school year and
thereafter during the year as necessary in individual cases;
(d) Ensure that a student who is a child of a military family in
transition and who has been assessed as in need of, or enrolled in, a
bilingual instruction program, the receiving school shall initially
honor placement of the student into a like program.
(i) The receiving school shall determine whether the district's
program is a like program when compared to the sending school's
program; and
(ii) The receiving school may conduct subsequent assessments
pursuant to RCW 28A.180.090 to determine appropriate placement and
continued enrollment in the program;
(e) Before the conclusion of each school year, measure each
eligible pupil's improvement in learning the English language by means
of a test approved by the superintendent of public instruction;
(f) Provide in-service training for teachers, counselors, and other
staff, who are involved in the district's transitional bilingual
program. Such training shall include appropriate instructional
strategies for children of culturally different backgrounds, use of
curriculum materials, and program models; and
(g) Make available a program of instructional support for up to two
years immediately after pupils exit from the program, for exited pupils
who need assistance in reaching grade-level performance in academic
subjects even though they have achieved English proficiency for
purposes of the transitional bilingual instructional program.
(2) Beginning in the 2018-19 school year, all classroom teachers
assigned using funds for the transitional bilingual instructional
program to provide supplemental instruction for eligible pupils must
hold an endorsement in bilingual education or English language learner,
or both.
(3) The definitions in Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 apply to
subsection (1)(d) of this section.

PART IV
ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNER ACCOUNTABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall convene an English language learner
accountability task force to design a performance-based accountability
system for the transitional bilingual instructional program. The task
force must include representatives from the educational opportunity gap
oversight and accountability committee, the state ethnic commissions,
the governor's office of tribal affairs, the office of the education
ombudsman, the civil rights office within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, parents, community
representatives, and program directors and teachers from school
districts of different sizes and with different English language
learner student populations.
(2) The task force must review the research literature to identify
evidence-based program designs and instructional strategies for English
language learners to achieve English proficiency.
(3) The task force must identify performance benchmarks for
transitional bilingual instructional programs, including:
(a) Benchmarks based on performance of eligible and exited
students, including performance in English language and performance in
other academic areas, based on state learning standards; and
(b) Benchmarks based on program characteristics that research
suggests are associated with students achieving English proficiency,
such as staff qualifications and training and the level of supplemental
instruction for students.
(4) The task force must design an accountability system for the
program that includes reporting and monitoring of benchmark performance
and tiered levels of support and technical assistance for schools and
districts based on benchmark performance. The design of the system
must also include a reduction in requirements for schools and districts
to submit program applications and program plans for state approval, to
be replaced with a focus on program outcomes.
(5) The task force must submit a report first to the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee and the quality
education council, and then to the education committees of the
legislature, with recommendations for the design of the accountability
system and any policy changes, statutory changes, or resources
necessary for its implementation. An interim report is due to the
legislative education committees by January 15, 2015, and a final
report is due by September 30, 2015.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 28A.657
RCW to read as follows:
At the beginning of each school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall identify schools that
experienced a significant increase during the previous two school years
in enrollment of English language learner students as compared to
previous enrollment trends. The office shall notify the schools, and
school districts in which the schools are located must provide the
cultural competence professional development and training developed
under section 203 of this act for classified, certificated
instructional, and administrative staff of the schools. The
professional development and training may be delivered by an
educational service district, through district in-service, or by
another qualified provider, including in partnership with the local
community.

PART V
RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION OF EDUCATORS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) The professional educator standards
board and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
convene a work group to revise and update the model framework and
curriculum, as well as the program of study, for high school career and
technical education courses related to careers in education.
(2) The revised careers in education courses must incorporate:
(a) Standards for cultural competence developed by the professional
educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.270;
(b) The most recent competency standards established by the
professional educator standards board and new research on best
practices for educator preparation and development; and
(c) Curriculum and activities used by the recruiting Washington
teachers program under RCW 28A.415.370.
(3) The revisions must be completed before the 2015-16 school year.
(4) This section expires September 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the professional educator standards board shall convene a work group to
design an articulated pathway for teacher preparation and certification
that has the characteristics described in this section. The work group
must include representatives of community and technical college
paraeducator apprenticeship and certificate programs, colleges of
education, teacher and paraeducator associations, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) An articulated pathway for teacher preparation and
certification includes:
(a) Paraeducator certificate and apprenticeship programs that offer
course credits that apply to transferrable associate degrees and are
aligned with the standards and competencies for teachers adopted by the
professional educator standards board;
(b) Associate degree programs that build on and do not duplicate
the courses and competencies of paraeducator certificate programs,
incorporate field experiences, are aligned with the standards and
competencies for teachers adopted by the professional educator
standards board, and are transferrable to bachelor's degree in
education programs and teacher certification programs;
(c) Bachelor's degree programs that lead to teacher certification
that build on and do not duplicate the courses and competencies of
transferrable associate degrees; and
(d) Incorporation of the standards for cultural competence
developed by the professional educator standards board under RCW
28A.410.270 throughout the courses and curriculum of the pathway,
particularly focusing on multicultural education and principles of
language acquisition.
(3) The professional educator standards board must submit a report
to the education committees of the legislature by January 10, 2015,
comparing the current status of pathways for teacher certification to
the elements of the articulated pathway. The report must highlight
gaps and recommend strategies to address them.
(4) The professional educator standards board and the state board
for community and technical colleges may exercise their respective
authorities regarding program approval to implement the articulated
pathway for teacher preparation and certification under this section in
approved teacher certification programs and certificate and degree
programs offered by community and technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year, any community or
technical college that offers an apprenticeship program or certificate
program for paraeducators must provide candidates the opportunity to
earn transferrable course credits within the program. The programs
must also incorporate the standards for cultural competence, including
multicultural education and principles of language acquisition,
developed by the professional educator standards board under RCW
28A.410.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 202 of this act, referencing section 202 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2014, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 202 of this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 402 of this act, referencing section 402 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2014, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 402 of this act is null and
void.

--- END ---