BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington Constitution establishes "the
paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education
of all children ... ." Providing quality education for all children in
Washington requires well-qualified and dedicated school employees. The
number one priority identified by the compensation technical work group
was the need to increase starting salaries for educators in order to
attract a wider pool of the highest quality candidates. A comparable
wage analysis indicated that beginning salaries allocated by the state
were more than fifteen thousand dollars below what was needed for
competitive salaries among comparable professions. Historically,
teacher salaries have been more than two times the minimum wage. The
legislature finds that certain jurisdictions within the state have
passed minimum wages that will place upward pressure on wages and may
make it more difficult to attract and retain a well-qualified educator
workforce. Therefore, the legislature intends to ensure that beginning
pay for teachers be set at the comparable wage established by the
compensation technical work group as adjusted for inflation. The
legislature intends to ensure that beginning teacher salaries are amply
funded to attract and retain the highest quality educators.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2010 c 235 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service((; and)).
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service.
(c) In the 2014-15 school year, the minimum salary for any level of
experience and education provided in any salary allocation model used
in state funding formulas for certificated instructional staff
allocations shall not be less than fifty-two thousand seventy-four
dollars. For each subsequent school year, the minimum salary in the
salary allocation schedule in the appropriations act shall be adjusted
in accordance with RCW 28A.400.205.
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities,
for incentives, or for implementing specific measurable innovative
activities, including professional development, specified by the school
district to: (a) Close one or more achievement gaps, (b) focus on
development of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM)
learning opportunities, or (c) provide arts education. Beginning
September 1, 2011, school districts shall annually provide a brief
description of the innovative activities included in any supplemental
contract to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall summarize
the district information and submit an annual report to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state to incur any present
or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts shall be subject
to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the
provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and if not
renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with RCW
28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of
services which are a part of the basic education program required by
Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 ((and)), 28A.400.275, and 28A.400.280.

--- END ---