BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.42.020 and 2009 c 283 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Local government" means a city, town, public utility district,
irrigation district, public port, county, sewer district, or water
district.
(3) "Net water savings" means the amount of water that is
determined to be conserved and usable within a specified stream reach
or reaches for other purposes without impairment or detriment to water
rights existing at the time that a water conservation project is
undertaken, reducing the ability to deliver water, or reducing the
supply of water that otherwise would have been available to other
existing water uses.
(4) "Pilot planning areas" means the geographic areas designated
under RCW 90.54.045(2).
(5) "Trust water right" means any water right acquired by the state
under this chapter for management in the state's trust water rights
program.
(6) "Water bank sponsor" means any person, corporation, or other
entity, including a state agency or local government, that has,
directly or indirectly, transferred a water right or any portion
thereof to the state trust water program for water banking purposes.
(7) "Water conservation project" means any project or program that
achieves physical or operational improvements that provide for
increased water use efficiency in existing systems of diversion,
conveyance, application, or use of water under water rights existing on
July 28, 1991.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Every water bank sponsor approved by the department under this
section shall file with the department a schedule showing the amount
charged, including all costs and fees for a mitigation credit. No
change may be made in the amount charged or other costs and fees paid
unless the sponsor provides notice to the department at least thirty
days before the change goes into effect. The notice must plainly state
the changes to be made in the schedule then on file with the department
and the effective date of the changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, no water bank
sponsor may charge, demand, collect, or receive from another person or
entity a greater, less, or different compensation for any service
rendered or to be rendered than the rates and charges applicable to the
service as specified in its schedule filed and in effect at the time,
nor may any water bank sponsor directly or indirectly refund or remit
in any manner or by any device any portion of the rates or charges so
specified, or furnish a mitigation credit at free or reduced rates
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no water
bank sponsor may extend to any person or entity any form of contract or
agreement or any rule or regulation or any privilege or facility except
those as are regularly and uniformly extended to all persons and
entities under like circumstances.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits a water bank sponsor from
offering a mitigation credit at a free or reduced rate for:
(i) The use of the state or a political subdivision thereof for any
project in which the state or political subdivision is the owner or
sponsor;
(ii) Its own use or the use of any of its officers, employees, or
agents;
(iii) The use of a hospital, charitable and eleemosynary
institution, or fire protection or other public health or safety
facility; or
(iv) Low-income senior customers and low-income customers.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits a water bank sponsor from
establishing a sliding scale of charges, whereby a greater charge is
made per unit for mitigation for a lesser than a greater quantity of
water use, or any service rendered or to be rendered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
No water bank sponsor may make or grant any undue or unreasonable
preference or advantage to any person, corporation, or locality, or to
any particular description of service in any respect whatsoever, or
refuse service or subject any particular person, corporation, or
locality or any particular description of service to any undue or
unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
No water bank sponsor may, directly or indirectly, or by any
special rate, rebate, drawback, or other device or method, charge,
demand, collect, or receive from any person or corporation a greater or
less compensation for the purchase or assignment of a groundwater
mitigation credit, or for any service rendered or to be rendered, or in
connection therewith, except as authorized in this chapter, than it
charges, demands, collects, or receives from any other person or
corporation for doing a like or contemporaneous service with respect
thereto under the same or substantially similar circumstances or
conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall require each water bank sponsor to demonstrate
for each mitigation credit transferred by the sponsor the availability
of an adequate, reliable, and uninterruptible water supply suitable to
mitigate for the intended purposes for which mitigation is required.
The department shall ensure that each new water use for which
mitigation is required will not cause detriment or injury to existing
water rights, including instream flows that otherwise could be
adversely affected by the new water use, or cause harm to priority
species of fish and wildlife or critical habitat for species listed
under the endangered species act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
No water bank sponsor may transfer a mitigation credit to any
person or entity for any proposed use of water that is inconsistent
with an approved state or local government land use plan or ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the water
banking best practices act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---