BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 4.84.370 (Appeal of land use decisions--Fees and costs) and 1995 c 347 s 718 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The repeal of RCW 4.84.370 applies
retroactively to any litigation that is pending as of the effective
date of this section.

--- END ---