BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
community-based programs designed to deliver evidence-based supports to
struggling students who are at risk of chronic absenteeism and low
literacy rates, and who may ultimately drop out of school. The
legislature further finds that state resources should be provided to
such community-based organizations to empower students to stay in
school and achieve in life. The legislature intends to provide funding
to these programs to leverage success for students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds being provided for this specific purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with
the state-level office of a nonprofit community-based organization with
local affiliates in Washington communities to increase the support for
and coordination of evidence-based services provided by the local
affiliates to assist struggling students.
(2) As part of the contract to receive state funds, the local
affiliates and state-level office shall annually collect and report
student outcome data as required by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.
(3) Beginning December 1, 2014, and by December 1st every even-numbered year thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall analyze by individual school year the data provided
under subsection (2) of this section to determine if the state funding
is resulting in improved student outcomes and submit a report to the
governor and the legislative education committees with the analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2015, from the state general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---