BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.140 and 2012 c 84 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A development shall not be undertaken on the shorelines of the
state unless it is consistent with the policy of this chapter and,
after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the applicable guidelines,
rules, or master program.
(2) A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines
of the state without first obtaining a permit from the government
entity having administrative jurisdiction under this chapter.
A permit shall be granted:
(a) From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master
program has become effective, only when the development proposed is
consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) after their
adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and (iii) so far
as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for the area;
(b) After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department
of an applicable master program, only when the development proposed is
consistent with the applicable master program and this chapter.
(3) The local government shall establish a program, consistent with
rules adopted by the department, for the administration and enforcement
of the permit system provided in this section. The administration of
the system so established shall be performed exclusively by the local
government.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of
this section, the local government shall require notification of the
public of all applications for permits governed by any permit system
established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that
notice of the application is given by at least one of the following
methods:
(a) Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners as shown by the records of the county assessor within at least
three hundred feet of the boundary of the property upon which the
substantial development is proposed;
(b) Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property
upon which the project is to be constructed; or
(c) Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to
accomplish the objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners
and the public.
The notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to
submit written comments concerning an application, or desiring to
receive notification of the final decision concerning an application as
expeditiously as possible after the issuance of the decision, may
submit the comments or requests for decisions to the local government
within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be published
pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in a
timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the
decision to each person who submits a request for the decision.
If a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a
hearing shall include a statement that any person may submit oral or
written comments on an application at the hearing.
(5) The system shall include provisions to assure that construction
pursuant to a permit will not begin or be authorized until twenty-one
days from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in
subsection (6) of this section; or until all review proceedings are
terminated if the proceedings were initiated within twenty-one days
from the date of filing as defined in subsection (6) of this section
except as follows:
(a) In the case of any permit issued to the state of Washington,
department of transportation, for the construction and modification of
SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake Washington, the construction may
begin after thirty days from the date of filing, and the permits are
valid until December 31, 1995;
(b)(i) In the case of any permit or decision to issue any permit to
the state of Washington, department of transportation, for the
replacement of the floating bridge and landings of the state route
number 520 Evergreen Point bridge on or adjacent to Lake Washington,
the construction may begin twenty-one days from the date of filing.
Any substantial development permit granted for the floating bridge and
landings is deemed to have been granted on the date that the local
government's decision to grant the permit is issued. This
authorization to construct is limited to only those elements of the
floating bridge and landings that do not preclude the department of
transportation's selection of a four-lane alternative for state route
number 520 between Interstate 5 and Medina. Additionally, the
Washington state department of transportation shall not engage in or
contract for any construction on any portion of state route number 520
between Interstate 5 and the western landing of the floating bridge
until the legislature has authorized the imposition of tolls on the
Interstate 90 floating bridge and/or other funding sufficient to
complete construction of the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV program. For the purposes of this subsection (5)(b), the
"western landing of the floating bridge" means the least amount of new
construction necessary to connect the new floating bridge to the
existing state route number 520 and anchor the west end of the new
floating bridge;
(ii) Nothing in this subsection (5)(b) precludes the shorelines
hearings board from concluding that the project or any element of the
project is inconsistent with the goals and policies of the shoreline
management act or the local shoreline master program;
(iii) This subsection (5)(b) applies retroactively to any appeals
filed after January 1, 2012, and to any appeals filed on or after March
23, 2012, and expires June 30, 2014.
(c) Except as authorized in (b) of this subsection, construction
may be commenced no sooner than thirty days after the date of the
appeal of the board's decision is filed if a permit is granted by the
local government and (i) the granting of the permit is appealed to the
shorelines hearings board within twenty-one days of the date of filing,
(ii) the hearings board approves the granting of the permit by the
local government or approves a portion of the substantial development
for which the local government issued the permit, and (iii) an appeal
for judicial review of the hearings board decision is filed pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may request, within ten days of the
filing of the appeal with the court, a hearing before the court to
determine whether construction pursuant to the permit approved by the
hearings board or to a revised permit issued pursuant to the order of
the hearings board should not commence. If, at the conclusion of the
hearing, the court finds that construction pursuant to such a permit
would involve a significant, irreversible damaging of the environment,
the court shall prohibit the permittee from commencing the construction
pursuant to the approved or revised permit until all review proceedings
are final. Construction pursuant to a permit revised at the direction
of the hearings board may begin only on that portion of the substantial
development for which the local government had originally issued the
permit, and construction pursuant to such a revised permit on other
portions of the substantial development may not begin until after all
review proceedings are terminated. In such a hearing before the court,
the burden of proving whether the construction may involve significant
irreversible damage to the environment and demonstrating whether such
construction would or would not be appropriate is on the appellant;
(d) Except as authorized in (b) of this subsection, if the permit
is for a substantial development meeting the requirements of subsection
(11) of this section, construction pursuant to that permit may not
begin or be authorized until twenty-one days from the date the permit
decision was filed as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
If a permittee begins construction pursuant to (a), (b), (c), or
(d) of this subsection, the construction is begun at the permittee's
own risk. If, as a result of judicial review, the courts order the
removal of any portion of the construction or the restoration of any
portion of the environment involved or require the alteration of any
portion of a substantial development constructed pursuant to a permit,
the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs involved in
adhering to such requirements from the local government that granted
the permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or intervener.
(6) Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority
of this section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall,
concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be
filed with the department and the attorney general. This shall be
accomplished by return receipt requested mail. A petition for review
of such a decision must be commenced within twenty-one days from the
date of filing of the decision.
(a) ((With regard to a permit other than a permit governed by
subsection (10) of this section,)) "Date of filing" as used in this
section refers to the date of actual receipt by the department of the
local government's decision.
(b) ((With regard to a permit for a variance or a conditional use
governed by subsection (10) of this section, "date of filing" means the
date the decision of the department is transmitted by the department to
the local government.
(c) When a local government simultaneously transmits to the
department its decision on a shoreline substantial development with its
approval of either a shoreline conditional use permit or variance, or
both, "date of filing" has the same meaning as defined in (b) of this
subsection.
(d))) The department shall notify in writing the local government
and the applicant of the date of filing by telephone or electronic
means, followed by written communication as necessary, to ensure that
the applicant has received the full written decision.
(7) Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of
proving that a proposed substantial development is consistent with the
criteria that must be met before a permit is granted. In any review of
the granting or denial of an application for a permit as provided in
RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting the review has the
burden of proof.
(8) Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the
permittee and the public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon
the finding that a permittee has not complied with conditions of a
permit. If the department is of the opinion that noncompliance exists,
the department shall provide written notice to the local government and
the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the
permit, the department may petition the hearings board for a rescission
of the permit upon written notice of the petition to the local
government and the permittee if the request by the department is made
to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination of the
thirty-day notice to the local government.
(9) The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to
chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be required to obtain a permit under this
section.
(10) Any permit for a variance or a conditional use ((issued with
approval by a local government under their approved master program must
be submitted to the department for its approval or disapproval)) is
subject to the same provisions of this section applicable to permits
for substantial development.
(11)(a) An application for a substantial development permit for a
limited utility extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or
other measures to protect a single-family residence and its appurtenant
structures from shoreline erosion shall be subject to the following
procedures:
(i) The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section
shall be twenty days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this
section shall state the manner in which the public may obtain a copy of
the local government decision on the application no later than two days
following its issuance;
(ii) The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny
the permit within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period
specified in (a)(i) of this subsection; and
(iii) If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the
permit to the local government legislative authority, the appeal shall
be finally determined by the legislative authority within thirty days.
(b) For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means
the extension of a utility service that:
(i) Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or
more of the following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or
sewer;
(ii) Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter;
and
(iii) Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet
within the shorelines of the state.

--- END ---