BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.19.150 and 1987 c 328 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, city, county, town, special purpose district,
public corporation created by the state, municipal corporation, or
quasi-municipal corporation having reason to believe that a particular
minority and women's business enterprise should not have been certified
under RCW 39.19.140 may petition the office for reconsideration. The
basis for the petition may be one or more of the following:
(a) The office's rules or regulations were improperly applied; or
(b) Material facts relating to the minority and women's business
enterprise's certification application to the office are untrue.
(2) The petitioner shall carry the burden of persuasion. The
affected minority or women's business enterprise shall receive notice
of the petition and an opportunity to respond.
(3) After reviewing the information presented in support of and in
opposition to the petition, the office shall issue a written decision,
granting or denying the petition. If the office grants the petition,
it may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the certification or impose
sanctions under this chapter as appropriate.
(4) The office's decision on a petition is administratively final
and the rights of appeal set out in the office regulations shall apply.
A certification shall remain in effect while a petition is pending.

--- END ---