BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The family assessment response worker shall assess for child
safety and child well-being when collaborating with a family to
determine the need for child care, preschool, or home visiting
services.
(2) Effective July 1, 2015, the family assessment response worker
may only refer children to preschool programs that are enrolled in the
early achievers program and rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 unless one of
the following conditions applies:
(a) The family lives in an area with no local preschool programs
that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 in the early achievers program;
(b) The local preschool programs that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 in
the early achievers program are not able to meet the needs of the
child; or
(c) The child is attending a preschool program prior to the family
assessment response case and the parent or caregiver does not want the
child to change preschool programs.
(3) Effective July 1, 2019, the family assessment response worker
shall only make child care referrals for nonschool-aged children to
licensed child care programs that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5 in the
early achievers program described in RCW 43.215.100 unless one of the
following conditions applies:
(a) The family lives in an area with no local programs that rate at
level 3, 4, or 5 in the early achievers program;
(b) The local child care programs that rate at a level 3, 4, or 5
in the early achievers program are not able to meet the needs of the
child; or
(c) The child is attending a child care program prior to the family
assessment response case and the parent or caregiver does not want the
child to change child care programs.
(4) The family assessment response worker shall make every effort
to provide referrals to high quality child care and early learning
programs.
(5) The family assessment response worker shall make every effort
to provide referrals to state and federally subsidized programs such
as, but not limited to, licensed child care programs that receive state
subsidy pursuant to RCW 43.215.135; early childhood education and
assistance programs; head start programs; and early head start
programs.
(6)(a) At least fifteen days prior to closing the family assessment
response case, the family assessment worker shall meet with the child's
parent or caregiver to discuss child care and early learning services.
If the family plans to use child care or early learning services, the
family assessment worker shall work with the family to facilitate
successful enrollment.
(b) The family assessment worker shall document if the family
elects to use child care and early learning services.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.405 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 16 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 43.215.400 through ((43.215.450,
43.215.455, 43.215.456,)) 43.215.457((,)) and 43.215.900 through
43.215.903.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW
43.215.420.
(2) "Approved programs" means those state-supported education and
special assistance programs which are recognized by the department as
meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the department to qualify
under RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.450 and 43.215.900 through
43.215.903 and are designated as eligible for funding by the department
under RCW 43.215.430 and 43.215.440.
(3) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the
needs of the child and includes education, health, and family support
services.
(4) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(5)(a) "Eligible child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten
whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the
federal poverty level, as published annually by the federal department
of health and human services, and includes a child whose family is
eligible for public assistance, and who is not a participant in a
federal or state program providing comprehensive services; a child
eligible for special education due to disability under RCW 28A.155.020;
and may include children who are eligible under rules adopted by the
department if the number of such children equals not more than ten
percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program.
Priority for enrollment shall be given to children from families with
the lowest income, children in foster care, or to eligible children
from families with multiple needs.
(b) Subject to the availability of appropriations specifically for
this purpose, the department may include as an eligible child, a child
who is not otherwise receiving services under (a) of this subsection,
but is receiving child protective services under RCW 26.44.020(3), or
family assessment response services under RCW 26.44.260. If included
as an eligible child, these children shall receive priority services
under (a) of this subsection.
(6) "Family support services" means providing opportunities for
parents to:
(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;
(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting
skills;
(c) Further their education and training;
(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;
(e) Increase their self-reliance.

--- END ---