BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
address the Washington supreme court's decision in State v. Veliz, 176
Wn.2d 849 (2013). The court held that a parent cannot be charged with
custodial interference under RCW 9A.40.060(2) if a parent withholds the
other parent from having access to the child in violation of
residential provisions of a domestic violence protection order. The
legislature intends that the provisions of RCW 9A.40.060(2) be
applicable in cases in which a court has entered any order making
residential provisions for a child including, but not limited to,
domestic violence protection orders that include such residential
provisions.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.40.060 and 1998 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A relative of a child under the age of eighteen or of an
incompetent person is guilty of custodial interference in the first
degree if, with the intent to deny access to the child or incompetent
person by a parent, guardian, institution, agency, or other person
having a lawful right to physical custody of such person, the relative
takes, entices, retains, detains, or conceals the child or incompetent
person from a parent, guardian, institution, agency, or other person
having a lawful right to physical custody of such person and:
(a) Intends to hold the child or incompetent person permanently or
for a protracted period; or
(b) Exposes the child or incompetent person to a substantial risk
of illness or physical injury; or
(c) Causes the child or incompetent person to be removed from the
state of usual residence; or
(d) Retains, detains, or conceals the child or incompetent person
in another state after expiration of any authorized visitation period
with intent to intimidate or harass a parent, guardian, institution,
agency, or other person having lawful right to physical custody or to
prevent a parent, guardian, institution, agency, or other person with
lawful right to physical custody from regaining custody.
(2) A parent of a child is guilty of custodial interference in the
first degree if the parent takes, entices, retains, detains, or
conceals the child, with the intent to deny access, from the other
parent having the lawful right to time with the child pursuant to a
((court-ordered parenting plan)) court order making residential
provisions for the child, and:
(a) Intends to hold the child permanently or for a protracted
period; or
(b) Exposes the child to a substantial risk of illness or physical
injury; or
(c) Causes the child to be removed from the state of usual
residence.
(3) A parent or other person acting under the directions of the
parent is guilty of custodial interference in the first degree if the
parent or other person intentionally takes, entices, retains, or
conceals a child, under the age of eighteen years and for whom no
lawful custody order or parenting plan has been entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction, from the other parent with intent to deprive
the other parent from access to the child permanently or for a
protracted period.
(4) Custodial interference in the first degree is a class C felony.

--- END ---