BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.240 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2015, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer
may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale,
or distribute for use in this state children's products or residential
upholstered furniture, as defined in RCW 70.76.010, containing TDCPP
(tris(1,3-dichloro-2-propyl)phosphate), chemical abstracts service
number 13674-87-8, as of the effective date of this section, or TCEP
(tris(2-chloroethyl)phosphate), chemical abstracts service number 115-96-8, as of the effective date of this section, in amounts greater than
one hundred parts per million in any product component.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.240.050 and 2008 c 288 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A manufacturer of products that are restricted under this
chapter must notify persons that sell the manufacturer's products in
this state about the provisions of this chapter no less than ninety
days prior to the effective date of the restrictions.
(2) A manufacturer that produces, sells, or distributes a product
prohibited from manufacture, sale, or distribution in this state under
this chapter shall recall the product and reimburse the retailer or any
other purchaser for the product.
(3) A manufacturer of children's products in violation of this
chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand
dollars for each violation in the case of a first offense.
Manufacturers who are repeat violators are subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties
collected under this section must be deposited in the state toxics
control account created in RCW 70.l05D.070.
(4) Retailers who unknowingly sell products that are restricted
from sale under this chapter are not liable under this chapter.
(5) The sale or purchase of any previously owned product containing
a chemical restricted under this chapter made in casual or isolated
sales as defined in RCW 82.04.040, or by a nonprofit organization, is
exempt from this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.240 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to carry out its duty under the children's safe
products act, the department is authorized to promote the development
of safer consumer products, through the use of sound, scientific
principles and working in cooperation with other states, governmental
and nongovernmental entities, industry, scientific experts, and the
public through a recognized clearinghouse.
(2)(a) The department must participate with other states,
governmental and nongovernmental entities, industry, and the public to:
(i) Increase its understanding and use of available credible scientific
data on chemicals, including information on uses, exposures, hazards,
risks, safety assessments, existing state and federal regulatory
programs, and potential health and environmental concerns; (ii) produce
and inventory information on safer alternatives to specific uses of
chemicals of concern and to provide technical assistance to businesses
and consumers related to safer alternatives; and (iii) undertake other
activities in support of state programs to promote the protection of
human health and the environment.
(b) In order to achieve the goals of this section and the state's
participation in a collaborative effort with other states, the process
must include: (i) The collection and dissemination of information
regarding chemical hazards and risks; (ii) the collection and
dissemination of information regarding the use of chemicals in child
care products; (iii) the assessment of alternatives to chemicals and
their use in products; and (iv) public education.
(c) The clearinghouse must be the repository for information
collected.
(3) In examining existing chemicals, producing inventories,
providing technical assistance, or in promoting safer alternatives, the
department must ensure the completion of exposure and risk assessments
for each chemical considered. A failure to consider exposure and risk
in addition to hazard will lead to an overly precautionary and false
outcome in the development of any effort to categorize and promote
safer chemicals.
(4) Any recommendations, developed through the state's
participation in the process described in this section, must be
reported to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives for consideration.

--- END ---