BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission must establish and maintain an advisory
committee to represent the interests of mineral prospectors and miners
to the commission and the department on matters including, but not
limited to, issues relating to individual hydraulic project approval
permit processing under this chapter, relevant rules and proposed rule
changes under this chapter, and the gold and fish pamphlet established
under RCW 77.55.091. The advisory committee must serve as a
collaborative forum for regular communication of both ongoing and
emergent issues relating to mineral prospecting and mining.
(2) In determining the size and membership of the advisory
committee, the commission must consult with and consider nominations
from appropriate mineral prospecting and mining groups. The committee
must consist of between five and nine members, as determined by the
commission. Each member of the advisory committee shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The advisory committee must meet at least quarterly, and at
other appropriate times to address emergent issues or proposed rule
changes under this chapter relevant to mineral prospecting and mining.

--- END ---