BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that the state conservation commission
and the departments of ecology, agriculture, fish and wildlife, and
natural resources work together cooperatively, efficiently, and
productively to facilitate the expeditious construction of two
demonstration projects. The legislature expects that the joint and
contemporaneous participation of all these state agencies will expedite
the permitting of these demonstration projects. The legislature
further intends that the collaborative process that the stakeholder
group creates, including local stakeholders among others, will be used
as a model for river management throughout the state.
(2) The legislature finds that the excessive accumulation of
sediment and gravel in certain rivers of the state poses a threat to
farmland and to the recovery or enhancement of certain fish
populations. The legislature also finds that the failure to manage
sediment and gravel accumulation has contributed to erosion and
resulted in the loss of productive farmland and mature treed riparian
zones that cool the waters, flooding in residential areas, loss of
recreational access to rivers, and loss of public infrastructure.
(3) The state conservation commission and the departments of
agriculture, natural resources, fish and wildlife, and ecology must
jointly identify and implement two demonstration projects that test the
effectiveness and costs of river management by using various sediment
management strategies and techniques as applied to accomplish the
following goals:
(a) Protection of agricultural lands;
(b) Restoration or enhancement of fish runs; and
(c) Protection of public infrastructure and recreational access.
(4)(a) The state conservation commission must convene a stakeholder
group consisting of the departments of agriculture, natural resources,
fish and wildlife, and ecology, local and statewide agricultural
organizations, tribes, land conservation organizations, and local
governments with interest and experience in the use of sediment
management techniques to provide for flood control. The stakeholder
group must develop and implement two demonstration projects, one
located in Whatcom county and one located in Grays Harbor county.
(b) In developing and implementing these demonstration projects,
the departments must examine sediment management conducted in the
Fraser river, British Columbia, Canada and include any potentially
applicable practices in the demonstration projects.
(c) The departments must: (i) Examine and find whether and how the
Fraser river experience applies to the goals of this act; and (ii) set
benchmarks and a timetable for progress toward achievement of the goals
of this act.
(d) Any gravel resources removed as a result of these pilot
projects must be: (i) Used at the departments' discretion in projects
related to fish programs in the local area of the project or by
property owners adjacent to the project; (ii) made available to a local
tribe for its use; or (iii) sold and the proceeds applied to funding
the demonstration projects.
(5) At a minimum, the pilot projects must include the following
sediment management strategies and techniques:
(a) At all times of sediment or gravel removal, a person must be on
hand to observe that the practices follow established pilot project
protocols and protect fish life;
(b) Gravel or sediment may not be removed at times when fish runs
are known to be in the river; and
(c) Reasonable steps must be taken to reduce turbidity resulting
from gravel and sediment removal activities.
(6) The departments must consider other sediment management
strategies and techniques including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Reducing turbidity caused by year-round stream bank erosion
that is caused by accumulation of excess sediment and gravel that
changes the river course;
(b) Providing deeper, cooler holes for fish life;
(c) Providing deeper river channels for fish passage;
(d) Ensuring that any management activities leave sufficient gravel
and sediment for fish spawning and rearing;
(e) Providing stable river banks that will allow for long-term
growth of riparian enhancement efforts, such as planting shade trees
and hedgerows;
(f) Protecting existing mature treed riparian zones that cool the
waters;
(g) Removing excess sediment and gravel that causes diversion of
water and erosion of river banks and farmland;
(h) Restoring previously existing bank contours that protect the
land from erosion caused by more intense and more frequent flooding;
and
(i) Developing management practices that reduce the amount of
gravel, sediment, and woody debris deposited into farm fields.
(7) The departments must report to the legislative committees with
oversight of agriculture, water, rural economic development, ecology,
fish and wildlife, and natural resources by December 31, 2014, on: (a)
Their examination and findings of the applicability of the Fraser river
experience to the goals of this act; (b) their progress toward setting
benchmarks and meeting the stakeholder group's timetable; (c) any
decisions made in implementing the projects; and (d) agency
recommendations for funding of the projects from federal grants,
federal loans, state grants and loans, and private donations, or if
other funding sources are not available or complete, submitting the two
projects for consideration in the biennial capital budget request to
the governor and the legislature. The departments must report annually
thereafter by December 31st of each year.
(8) The stakeholder group must be staffed jointly by the
departments. Costs of the stakeholder group, including staffing, must
be borne jointly by the departments.

--- END ---