BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.203 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 999 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section)) The
state treasurer must, on behalf of the department and notwithstanding
RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the contrary, ((the director shall
pay)) distribute by April 30th of each year on game lands in each
county((, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201,)) an amount
in lieu of real property taxes equal to that amount paid on similar
parcels of open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW ((or the
greater of seventy cents per acre per year or the amount paid in 1984))
except taxes levied for any state purpose, plus an additional amount
for control of noxious weeds equal to that which would be paid if such
lands were privately owned. This amount ((shall)) may not be assessed
or paid on department buildings, structures, facilities, game farms,
fish hatcheries, water access sites, tidelands, or public fishing areas
((of less than one hundred acres)). The department must provide all
relevant information to the state treasurer for each county receiving
an amount in lieu of real property taxes including but not limited to
the amount of acres eligible, the open space rate to be applied, and
the additional amount for control of noxious weeds.
(2) "Game lands," as used in this section ((and RCW 77.12.201)),
means those tracts ((one hundred acres or larger)), regardless of
acreage, owned in fee by the department and used for wildlife habitat
and public recreational purposes. All lands purchased for wildlife
habitat, public access, or recreation purposes with federal funds in
the Snake River drainage basin ((shall be)) are considered game lands
regardless of acreage.
(3) This section ((shall)) does not apply to lands transferred
after April 23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(4) The county ((shall)) must distribute the amount received under
this section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing
districts except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way
it would distribute local property taxes from private property. The
county shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.
(((5) For the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the director
shall pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in each county, if
requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in lieu of real
property taxes and shall be distributed as follows:

County

Adams . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,909

Asotin . . . . . . . . . . . . 36,123

Chelan . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,757

Columbia . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,795

Ferry . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,781

Garfield . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,840

Grant . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,443

Kittitas . . . . . . . . . . . . 143,974

Klickitat . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,906

Lincoln . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,535

Okanogan . . . . . . . . . . . . 151,402

Pend Oreille . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,309

Yakima . . . . . . . . . . . . 126,225

These amounts shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings,
structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or
public fishing areas of less than one hundred acres.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.201 (Counties may elect to receive
an amount in lieu of taxes -- County to record collections for violations
of law or rules -- Deposit) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 998, 2012 2nd sp.s.
c 7 s 923, 2009 c 479 s 63, & 1987 c 506 s 29 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2015.

--- END ---