BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employees of companies providing life alert services must
provide the location and any known medical conditions of their
customers when requested by first responders during an emergency.
(2) Information received by a first responder under subsection (1)
of this section is confidential and may only be used in responding to
the emergency that prompted the information request. Any first
responder receiving the information must destroy it at the end of the
emergency and give written notification of such destruction to the life
alert services company. A failure to destroy the information is a
class 1 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.
(3) It is not a violation of this section if a life alert services
company or an employee makes a good faith effort to comply with this
section. In addition, the company or employee is immune from civil
liability for a good faith effort to comply with this section. Should
a company or employee prevail upon the defense provided in this
section, the company or employee is entitled to recover expenses and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.
(4) First responders and their employing jurisdictions are not
liable for failing to request the information in subsection (1) of this
section. In addition, this act does not create a private right of
action.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Emergency" means an unforeseen combination of circumstances
that requires the attention of first responders acting within the scope
of their official duties. An emergency includes the outage of life
alert services for more than twenty-four continuous hours.
(b) "First responder" means career firefighters, law enforcement
officers, and emergency medical personnel as licensed or certificated
by this state.
(c) "Life alert services" means a service provided for profit that
allows persons in need of emergency assistance to contact a call center
through the activation of a wearable device, such as a pendant or
bracelet.
(6) A violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction under
RCW 7.80.120.

--- END ---