BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that every year the state invests
billions of dollars to help students acquire the knowledge and skills
that are needed, in the contemporary setting, to equip students for
their role as citizens and as potential competitors in today's market,
as well as in the marketplace of ideas.
(2) The legislature intends to strengthen the educational system
and assist Washington's children through the various stages of their
education by implementing best practices and evidence-based strategies
to provide the opportunity for students to learn and achieve the state-established student educational outcomes.
(3) The legislature further intends to build a fair and effective
funding system by targeting investments and resources to provide an
equal educational opportunity for all students, regardless of
background, family income, where they live, or where they attend
school; and to amply fund the schools that serve them.
(4) The legislature further intends to implement an unbiased and
effective method of analyzing how the state investments in public
education are impacting Washington's students, so that the legislature
can continue to make educational changes to the evolving program of
basic education in those areas where emerging research and evidence
shows there are more effective and efficient strategies for helping
students succeed; and so the state can meet its constitutional duty
under Article IX of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature directs the Washington institute for public policy
to conduct the following on-going systematic reviews and biannually
report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2016, and by
December 1st in every even-numbered year thereafter:
(1) A review of high quality research to identify and update
inventories of evidence-based, research-based, and promising
educational practices and services, in early learning, K-12, and higher
education that can, with a high degree of certainty, lead to better
educational outcomes coupled with a more efficient use of taxpayer
dollars; and
(2) A review of the state's investments in the educational system,
including early learning, K-12, and higher education, with a focus on
K-12, to identify the investments that result in the most effective and
evidence-based practices that reliably provide an opportunity for
students to successfully meet the state-established student outcomes.
The initial analyses shall focus on the nine hundred eighty-two million
dollars provided in the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act for
enhancements to the program of basic education.

--- END ---