BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Every year the state of Washington issues
contracts worth billions of dollars in contracting opportunities. Many
of these are combined with federal dollars in order to leverage the
total capacity of both entities. Many federal contracts have
stipulations attached, that require goals and metrics to ensure fair
participation with small, disadvantaged, minority, and women-owned
businesses.
In 2013, after responding to several complaints by a small
contractor the federal highway administration found that the prime
contractor on the Seattle viaduct project was violating the terms of
contract with relation to small, women, and minority business
participation. Further, the federal highway administration found that
the prime contractor was purposely placing barriers to access for the
smaller contractors. Further, studies have shown that such barriers in
the past have had very detrimental effects for the communities
represented by these businesses. From record high unemployment rates
to increased negative social issues like high dropout rates and
swelling prison populations, the social impact of these businesses'
denials of jobs has been devastating on these communities.
The legislature intends for a study to be completed to determine
how best to address the various barriers that remain for women and
minorities and how best to remedy these barriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall study the impacts of Initiative Measure No. 200
(approved by the voters in 1998) on minorities in higher education and
public contracting. For the purposes of this study, the term minority
includes women. The factors to be considered include race, sex, color,
ethnicity, and national origin.
(2) The study shall review and analyze the enrollment data of
minorities in four-year universities and community and technical
colleges starting in 1993 and ending in 2013. For each year within the
designated time period, the enrollment analysis shall include the
number of minority students enrolled at the institution, new minority
students who enrolled during that year, minority students who graduated
during that year, and minority students who left the institution during
that year prior to graduation.
(3) The study shall also review and analyze public contracts
awarded to minority and women-owned businesses between 1993 and 2013.
The study shall focus on public works contracts and public contracts
for goods and services. For each year within the designated time
period, the public contracts analysis shall include the amount expended
with certified minority and women-owned businesses compared to state
overall expenditures by industry category. The analysis shall be
disaggregated by ethnicity. The study shall also analyze Washington's
practices of awarding contracts to minority and women-owned businesses
compared to other states, assess best practices for public contracting,
methods for improving public knowledge of opportunities to engage in
increased contracting and procurement prospects, and assess agency
purchasing.
(4) The study shall analyze whether there are any links between the
implementation of Initiative Measure No. 200 and the social impacts on
minorities based on data between 1993 and 2013. For each year within
the designated time period, the study shall analyze incarceration rates
of minorities, school drop-out rates, unemployment rates, and the
impact of contracts not being awarded to minority and women-owned
businesses.
(5) The Washington state institute for public policy must make
determinations on the link between the implementation of Initiative
Measure No. 200 and its impact on minorities in higher education and
public contracting.
(6) The Washington state institute for public policy shall submit
its report on the study with recommendations to the legislature by
January 1, 2015.

--- END ---