BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that low-income
children in Washington with serious mental health needs are
insufficiently served in their community and that many families are
forced to seek intensive, out-of-home placements for their child in
order to receive services. Entering a state institution, foster home,
or other out-of-home placement may create additional hardship on the
child and the family by forcing a child into an unfamiliar living
situation and separating them from their family, friends, school,
community, and natural supports. The legislature intends to expand
intensive home and community-based children's services previously
provided through a wraparound pilot program and to repurpose pilot
funding toward a similar statewide model to serve children with serious
mental health needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.065 and 2007 c 359 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
((To the extent funds are specifically appropriated for this
purpose,)) (1) The department of social and health services shall
((contract for implementation of)) implement statewide, a wraparound
((model)) with intensive services medicaid program of integrated home
and community-based children's mental health services ((delivery in up
to four regional support network regions in Washington state in which
wraparound programs are not currently operating, and in up to two
regional support network regions in which wraparound programs are
currently operating. Contracts in regions with existing wraparound
programs shall be for the purpose of expanding the number of children
served.
(1) Funding provided may be expended for: Costs associated with a
request for proposal and contracting process; administrative costs
associated with successful bidders' operation of the wraparound model;
the evaluation under subsection (5) of this section; and funding for
services needed by children enrolled in wraparound model sites that are
not otherwise covered under existing state programs. The services
provided through the wraparound model sites shall include, but not be
limited to, services covered under the medicaid program. The
department shall maximize the use of medicaid and other existing state-funded programs as a funding source. However, state funds provided may
be used to develop a broader service package to meet needs identified
in a child's care plan. Amounts provided shall supplement, and not
supplant, state, local, or other funding for services that a child
being served through a wraparound site would otherwise be eligible to
receive)) beginning July 1, 2014. The services must be phased in as
rapidly as feasible and according to a schedule that prioritizes
infrastructure availability and local provider readiness.
(2) The wraparound ((model sites)) with intensive services medicaid
program shall serve children ((with serious emotional or behavioral
disturbances who are at high risk of residential or correctional
placement or psychiatric hospitalization, and who have been referred
for services from the department, a county juvenile court, a tribal
court, a school, or a licensed mental health provider or agency)) and
youth under the age of twenty-one with a mental illness or condition
and who have a functional impairment which substantially interferes
with or substantially limits the ability to function in the family,
school or community setting, and for whom intensive home and community-based services have been recommended by a licensed practitioner to
correct or ameliorate the mental illness or condition.
(((3) Through a request for proposal process, the department shall
contract, with regional support networks, alone or in partnership with
either educational service districts or entities licensed to provide
mental health services to children with serious emotional or behavioral
disturbances, to operate the wraparound model sites. The contractor
shall provide care coordination and facilitate the delivery of services
and other supports to families using a strength-based, highly
individualized wraparound process. The request for proposal shall
require that:
(a) The regional support network agree to use its medicaid revenues
to fund services included in the existing regional support network's
benefit package that a medicaid-eligible child participating in the
wraparound model site is determined to need;
(b) The contractor provide evidence of commitments from at least
the following entities to participate in wraparound care plan
development and service provision when appropriate: Community mental
health agencies, schools, the department of social and health services
children's administration, juvenile courts, the department of social
and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration, and managed
health care systems contracting with the department under RCW
74.09.522; and
(c) The contractor will operate the wraparound model site in a
manner that maintains fidelity to the wraparound process as defined in
RCW 71.36.010.
(4) Contracts for operation of the wraparound model sites shall be
executed on or before April 1, 2008, with enrollment and service
delivery beginning on or before July 1, 2008.
(5) The evidence-based practice institute established in RCW
71.24.061 shall evaluate the wraparound model sites, measuring outcomes
for children served. Outcomes measured shall include,)). Referral to
services may include, but is not limited to:
(a) A self-referral from the child or the child's family;
(b) Regional support networks;
(c) Mental health or medical providers;
(d) Tribes or tribal courts;
(e) Health care authority;
(f) The department of social and health services;
(g) County juvenile courts;
(h) Schools; and
(i) Local law enforcement.
(3) The department shall track, monitor, and report on client
outcomes including, but ((are)) not limited to: Decreased out-of-home
placement, including residential, group, and foster care, and increased
stability of such placements, school attendance, school performance,
recidivism, emergency room utilization, involvement with the juvenile
justice system, decreased use of psychotropic medication, and decreased
hospitalization.
(((6) The evidence-based practice institute shall provide a report
and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2010.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 For the duration of the implementation
process of the wraparound with intensive services medicaid program, the
department of social and health services shall provide annual
implementation outcome reports to the office of financial management
and the appropriate legislative committees on or before December 1st
each year. Throughout the implementation process, and as services are
phased in, the department shall seek input from local stakeholders to
include families and youth, local government, tribal partners, and
service providers on:
(1) The adequacy and availability of core services required for the
wraparound with intensive services medicaid program within each
provider network and shall engage in problem-solving around shortages
or lack of quality core service availability;
(2) Performance measures, outcomes, and quality improvement
relevant to children's behavioral health in Washington state; and
(3) Recommendations for participants in a local collaborative body
to ensure that children, families, and other stakeholders have a clear
pathway to receive intensive home and community-based wraparound
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Beginning July 1, 2014, funding provided for
the wraparound pilot programs must be repurposed toward the costs of
phasing in a statewide implementation of wraparound with intensive
services medicaid program. The department of social and health
services shall prioritize service areas where pilot programs were
previously established first on the phase-in implementation schedule.

--- END ---