BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At least five days' notice must be given of all public hearings
held by any legislative committee other than a committee on rules. The
notice must contain the date, time, and place of the hearing together
with the title and number of each bill, or identification of the
subject matter, to be considered at the hearing. By a majority vote of
the committee members present at any committee meeting, the notice may
be dispensed with. The reason for the action must be set forth in a
written statement preserved in the records of the meeting.
(2) No legislative committee may hold a public hearing during a
regular or special session on a proposal identified as a draft unless
the draft has been made available to the public at least twenty-four
hours before the hearing. This rule does not apply during the five
days before any cutoff established by concurrent resolution nor does it
apply to any measure exempted from the cutoff resolution.

--- END ---