BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Article III, section 9 of the state
Constitution provides that the "pardoning power shall be vested in the
governor under such regulations and restrictions as may be prescribed
by law." Moreover, Article I, section 35 of the state Constitution
ensures that the voices of victims and their families are entitled to
notice and an opportunity to be heard in the sentencing and clemency
processes. The legislature finds that the clemency and pardons board
plays an important role in advising the governor in his or her power to
issue pardons, commute sentences, and grant reprieves and protecting
the rights of victims to be heard during the exercise of that power.
The purposes for the establishment of the clemency and pardons
board as provided in section 1, chapter 323, Laws of 1999 are to
"assist the governor in gathering the facts necessary to the wise
exercise of this [pardoning] power" and "ensure that all victims and
survivors of victims of crimes are afforded a meaningful role in the
clemency process." Under RCW 9.94A.885, prosecutors are notified
thirty days before a hearing and are required to "make reasonable
efforts to notify victims, survivors of victims, witnesses, and the law
enforcement agency or agencies that conducted the investigation, of the
date and place of the hearing." The hearings are also required to be
open to the public. The legislature reaffirms the board's
indispensable role in ensuring that the pardoning and reprieve power is
exercised with deliberation and after victims, law enforcement, and the
prisoner have had the opportunity to be heard.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.01.120 and 2010 c 8 s 1003 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a prisoner has been sentenced to death, the governor shall
have power to commute such sentence to imprisonment for life at hard
labor; and in all cases in which the governor is authorized to grant
pardons or commute sentence of death, he or she may, upon the petition
of the person convicted, commute a sentence or grant a pardon, upon
such conditions, and with such restrictions, and under such limitations
as he or she may think proper; and he or she may issue his or her
warrant to all proper officers to carry into effect such pardon or
commutation, which warrant shall be obeyed and executed, instead of the
sentence, if any, which was originally given. The governor may also,
on good cause shown, grant respites or reprieves from time to time as
he or she may think proper. Good cause, for the purposes of this
section, means that the governor has undergone an individualized
consideration of the facts of a specific conviction after he or she has
received a recommendation from the clemency and pardons board as
provided in RCW 9.94A.885.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---