BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.23B.010 and 1992 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Barrel" means a unit of measurement of volume equal to forty-two United States gallons of crude oil or petroleum product.
(2) "Bulk oil terminal" means a facility of any kind, other than a
waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil from a tank
car.
(3) "Crude oil" means any naturally occurring liquid hydrocarbons
at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the earth,
including condensate and natural gasoline.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((4))) (5) "Marine terminal" means a facility of any kind, other
than a waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil or
petroleum products to or from a waterborne vessel or barge.
(((5))) (6) "Navigable waters" means those waters of the state and
their adjoining shorelines that are subject to the ebb and flow of the
tide, including the Columbia and Snake rivers.
(((6))) (7) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(((7))) (8) "Petroleum product" means any liquid hydrocarbons at
atmospheric temperature and pressure that are the product of the
fractionation, distillation, or other refining or processing of crude
oil, and that are used as, useable as, or may be refined as a fuel or
fuel blendstock, including but not limited to, gasoline, diesel fuel,
aviation fuel, bunker fuel, and fuels containing a blend of alcohol and
petroleum.
(((8))) (9) "Tank car" means a rail car, the body of which consists
of a tank for transporting liquids.
(10) "Taxpayer" means the person owning crude oil or petroleum
products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks
of a marine or bulk oil terminal in this state ((from a waterborne
vessel or barge)) and who is liable for the taxes imposed by this
chapter.
(((9))) (11) "Waterborne vessel or barge" means any ship, barge, or
other watercraft capable of travelling on the navigable waters of this
state and capable of transporting any crude oil or petroleum product in
quantities of ten thousand gallons or more for purposes other than
providing fuel for its motor or engine.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.23B.020 and 2006 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal
within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the
navigable waters of this state; and (b) crude oil at a bulk oil
terminal within this state from a tank car. The tax imposed in this
section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products
immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a
marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car or waterborne vessel or
barge at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude oil or petroleum
product received.
(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal
within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the
navigable waters of this state; and (b) crude oil at a bulk oil
terminal within this state from a tank car. The tax imposed in this
section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products
immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a
marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car or waterborne vessel or
barge at the rate of four cents per barrel of crude oil or petroleum
product.
(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter ((shall)) must be collected
by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any
person charged with collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for
the taxes, or in the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in
writing of the ((imposition of the)) taxes imposed, or having collected
the taxes, fails to pay them to the department in the manner prescribed
by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the person's own
acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control,
he or she ((shall)), nevertheless, ((be)) is personally liable to the
state for the amount of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner
to a marine or bulk oil terminal operator ((shall)) must relieve the
owner from further liability for the taxes.
(4) Taxes collected under this chapter ((shall)) must be held in
trust until paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes
who appropriates or converts the taxes collected ((shall be)) is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required
by this chapter to be collected ((shall)) must be stated separately
from other charges made by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator in
any invoice or other statement of account provided to the taxpayer.
(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to
the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged
with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the taxes.
(6) The taxes ((shall be)) are due from the marine or bulk oil
terminal operator, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed
by the department, within twenty-five days after the end of the month
in which the taxable activity occurs.
(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine
or bulk oil terminal operator or to the department, ((shall))
constitute a debt from the taxpayer to the marine or bulk oil terminal
operator. Any person required to collect the taxes under this chapter
who, with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter, fails or
refuses to do so as required and any taxpayer who refuses to pay any
taxes due under this chapter((, shall be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor
as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the
taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The
department ((shall)) must give its approval for direct payment under
this section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that
direct payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed
under this chapter. The department ((shall)) must provide by rule for
the issuance of a direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying
for direct payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct
payment certificate by a terminal operator ((shall)) must relieve the
marine or bulk oil terminal operator from any liability for the
collection or payment of the taxes imposed under this chapter.
(9) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section ((shall)) must be deposited into the state oil spill response
account. All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this
section shall be deposited into the oil spill prevention account.
(10) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter,
the office of financial management ((shall)) must determine the balance
of the oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar
quarter. Balance determinations by the office of financial management
under this section are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge
the validity of any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of
financial management ((shall)) must promptly notify the departments of
revenue and ecology of the account balance once a determination is
made. For each subsequent calendar quarter, the tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section shall be imposed during the entire
calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly
balance is more than nine million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during
the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent
quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.23B.030 and 1992 c 73 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) only apply to the
first receipt of crude oil or petroleum products at a marine or bulk
oil terminal in this state and not to the later transporting and
subsequent receipt of the same oil or petroleum product, whether in the
form originally received at a marine or bulk oil terminal in this state
or after refining or other processing.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.23B.040 and 1992 c 73 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Credit ((shall)) must be allowed against the taxes imposed under
this chapter for any crude oil or petroleum products received at a
marine or bulk oil terminal and subsequently exported from or sold for
export from the state.

--- END ---