BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the supreme court
has a constitutional duty under Article IV of the Washington state
Constitution to hear and decide cases so the citizens can have timely
and efficient resolution of their disputes. The legislature finds that
the vast majority of other states have seven or fewer justices on their
state supreme courts. Despite the fact that additional resources in
the form of two extra justices have been funded by the legislature, the
caseload of the supreme court has consistently declined over the last
six years. According to the most recent information provided by the
administrative office of the courts, the supreme court decided one
hundred thirty-one fewer cases in 2012 than it did in 2008. Therefore,
the legislature finds that the supreme court is not meeting its
constitutional duty.
The need for immediate action could not be more apparent.
Conversely failing to act would send a strong message about the court's
good faith commitment about fulfilling its constitutional promise. To
some it may seem counterproductive to seek quantity over quality and
that this is a blunt instrument to deal with a fairly complex, nuanced,
and debatable problem. Others may also view it as an obscene violation
of the doctrine of separation and unthinkable intrusion into a matter
clearly within the purview of the supreme court, however the
legislature shall not stand idly by while the supreme court makes
unfulfilled promises.
The legislature has no wish to be forced into issuing specific
directives to the supreme court to decide specific cases in order to
process them more speedily or to hold the supreme court members in
contempt of the legislature. However, it is incumbent upon the supreme
court to demonstrate through real and immediate action that it is
making real and measurable progress, not simply promises. The
legislature hereby orders the court to increase the number of cases it
decides by fifty percent by the 2017-2018 court calendar. The
legislature also demands that the supreme court draw upon its purported
budgetary expertise and provide a report by April 30, 2014, as to how
it plans to fully implement this order and provide a timetable for
funding its plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2014.

--- END ---