BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If either contingency in RCW 82.08.050(12) occurs, the
department, in consultation with the economic and revenue forecast work
group created in RCW 82.33.040, must annually estimate the anticipated
net increase in state sales tax revenues resulting from remote sellers
collecting and remitting sales tax on retail sales to buyers located in
this state.
(2) Annually, beginning in the fiscal year during which either of
the contingencies in RCW 82.08.050(12) occurred, the department must
notify the state treasurer of the estimated amount determined under
subsection (1) of this section for that fiscal year. On the last
working day of the fiscal year, the state treasurer must transfer such
amount from the general fund to the education legacy trust account
created in RCW 83.100.230.
(3) For purposes of this section, "net increase" means the increase
in state sales tax revenues received by the state resulting from remote
sellers collecting and remitting sales tax on retail sales to buyers
located in this state, which must reflect any vendor compensation the
state is required to provide sellers as a condition to requiring remote
sellers to collect sales tax on sales to Washington consumers.

--- END ---