BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide a beginning proposal for an expenditure plan as required by the
Washington state supreme court's order dated January 9, 2014.
The legislature recognizes that Substitute House Bill No. 2776,
chapter 236, Laws of 2010, was part one of a phase-in plan for meeting
the state's constitutional obligations. That legislation established
four initial funding priorities within the program of basic education
as defined in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2261, chapter 548,
Laws of 2009, and provided the final 2018 enhanced values for those
priorities. The legislature intends to establish part two of the
phase-in plan by requiring a linear funding expectation for fully
phasing-in the final values of the Substitute House Bill No. 2776
priorities while also establishing final enhanced values for a second
set of priorities and also requiring a linear funding phase-in of those
enhancements. The legislature intends to focus these second priorities
on those portions of the prototypical school formula that will assist
schools in implementing the opportunity to earn twenty-four credits for
high school graduation. In recognition of the court's statement that
it is "deeply troubling" that the state has not offered any plan for
meeting its compensation obligations, phase two also includes a phase-in plan for compensation. The legislature acknowledges that future
legislatures may consider alternative schedules and plans to reflect
different legislative priorities and new emerging research.

PART I
A PHASE-IN PLAN FOR MEETING MCCLEARY OBLIGATIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a)(i) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical
school shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom
teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(ii) Beginning in the 2015-2017 biennium, to assist school
districts to provide students the opportunity to complete twenty-four
credits for high school graduation, the minimum allocation for the
general education average class in grades nine through twelve shall be
enhanced in a linear fashion to provide sufficient state funding to
reduce class size to twenty-three full-time equivalent students per
teacher in the 2017-18 school year.
(b) To assist school districts to provide students the opportunity
to complete twenty-four credits for high school graduation, the minimum
allocation for high school laboratory class size shall be enhanced to
provide sufficient state funding as provided in this subsection (4)(b).
(i) The minimum class size allocation for each prototypical high
school shall be enhanced to provide funding for two laboratory science
courses per full-time equivalent student to be completed within grades
nine through twelve, calculated as follows: The number of total full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades nine through twelve
multiplied by the laboratory science course factor of 0.0833, by the
number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide
instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours under
RCW 28A.150.220, providing at least one teacher planning period per
school day, and based on the laboratory science average class size of
19.98 full-time equivalent students per teacher.

Laboratory science
average class size
enhancement
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.98

(((b) During)) (ii) Beginning in the 2015-2017 biennium, the
laboratory science average class size shall be enhanced in a linear
fashion in order to provide sufficient state funding to achieve an
average class size of no more than nineteen full-time equivalent
students per teacher in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) Beginning with the ((2011-2013)) 2015-2017 biennium and
beginning with schools with the highest percentage of students eligible
for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, sufficient
state funding must be provided to reduce the general education average
class size for grades K-3 ((shall be reduced until the)) in a linear
fashion each biennium in order to achieve an average class size funded
under this subsection (4) ((is)) of no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher ((beginning in)) by the 2017-18 school
year.
(((c))) (d)(i) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle
and high school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom
teachers based on the following number of full-time equivalent students
per teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(((d))) (ii) Beginning in the 2015-2017 biennium, to assist school
districts to provide students the opportunity to complete twenty-four
credits for high school graduation, the minimum allocation for high
schools shall be enhanced in a linear fashion to provide sufficient
state funding for full-time equivalent classroom teachers based on the
following number of full-time equivalent students per teacher in career
and technical education in the 2017-18 school year:
Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.0
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 16.0
(e) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for ((laboratory science,))
advanced placement((,)) and international baccalaureate courses.
(5)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
((1.116))
1.216
((1.909))
2.539

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

((Parent involvement)) Family and community engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . ((0.00))
0.0825 0.00 0.00

(b) Beginning in the 2015-2017 biennium, to assist school districts
to provide students the opportunity to complete twenty-four credits for
high school graduation, the minimum allocations shall be enhanced in a
linear fashion to provide sufficient state funds to provide the
following types of staff at the high school level in addition to
teachers in 2017-18 school year:
(i) Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated
building level administrators to 1.9; and
(ii) Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach
and graduation advising to 3.5.
(c) Beginning in the 2015-2017 biennium, in addition to the amounts
provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection, the minimum allocations
shall be enhanced in a linear fashion to provide sufficient state funds
to provide the following types of staff in addition to teachers at the
elementary and middle school level in the 2017-18 school year:

Elementary School Middle School

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent
outreach and graduation advising . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.5 2.0

Family and community engagement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.0 1.0

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (((b))) (c) and (5) of this section and (a) of
this subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the
minimum allocation for each school district shall include allocations
per annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(c) In addition to the amounts provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, to assist school districts to provide students the
opportunity to complete twenty-four credits for high school graduation,
beginning in the 2014-15 school year, the omnibus appropriations act
shall provide the following minimum allocation for each annual average
full-time equivalent student in grades nine through twelve sufficient
for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be
adjusted annually for inflation:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades 9-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $36.35
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $39.02
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $82.84
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $6.04

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) ((Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine
through twelve;
(c))) Preparatory career and technical education courses for
students in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(((d))) (c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for
students in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, ((1.5156)) 2.3975
hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen
learning assistance program students per teacher.
(b)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
students whose primary language is other than English, allocations
shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who
are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher.
(ii) Beginning in the 2015-2017 biennium, the minimum allocation
must be increased to provide six hours per week in extra instruction
with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction program students per
teacher in middle school, and eight hours per week in extra instruction
with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction program students per
teacher in high school. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(iii) In addition to the amounts provided in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection, an additional three hours per week of transitional
support with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction program
students per teacher must be provided for each student for up to two
years after exiting the transitional bilingual instruction program.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) ((and)), (b), and
(c), (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided
under RCW 28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 102 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2012 c 51 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. ((During)) Beginning with the
((2011-2013)) 2015-2017 biennium, funding enhancements shall ((continue
to)) be phased-in ((each year until)) in a linear fashion each biennium
in order to provide sufficient state funding to achieve full statewide
implementation of all-day kindergarten ((is achieved)) in the 2017-18
school year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day
kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in
subsequent school years regardless of changes in the school's
percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as
long as other program requirements are fulfilled. Additionally,
schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support shall agree to
the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2)(a) It is the intent of the legislature that administration of
the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills as required
in this subsection (2) and RCW 28A.655.080 replace administration of
other assessments being required by school districts or that other
assessments only be administered if they seek to obtain information not
covered by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(b) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section and to the extent funds are available, beginning with the 2011-12 school year on a voluntary basis, schools must identify the skills,
knowledge, and characteristics of kindergarten students at the
beginning of the school year in order to support social-emotional,
physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children;
support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform
instruction. Kindergarten teachers shall administer the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills, as directed by the
superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the
department of early learning and in collaboration with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership designated in RCW
43.215.070, and report the results to the superintendent. The
superintendent shall share the results with the director of the
department of early learning.
(c) School districts shall provide an opportunity for parents and
guardians to excuse their children from participation in the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

Sec. 103 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least one thousand
eighty instructional hours for students enrolled in ((each of)) grades
((seven)) nine through twelve and at least one thousand instructional
hours for students in ((each of)) grades one through ((six according to
an implementation schedule adopted by the legislature, but not before
the 2014-15 school year)) eight, all of which may be calculated by a
school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional
hours over grades one through twelve. The increase in instructional
hours for students enrolled in grades nine through twelve is intended
to assist school districts to provide students the opportunity to
complete twenty-four credits for high school graduation; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, ((subject to a phased-in implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature)) beginning with the graduating class of 2019. Course
distribution requirements may be established by the state board of
education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students and exited students whose primary language is other than
English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under
RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade
basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are
five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than
twenty-one years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred
eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by
a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. ((However,))
(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of
developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of
the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the
parent involvement component of the inventory. ((In addition,
effective May 1, 1979,))
(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a
school district may schedule the last five school days of the one
hundred ((and)) eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes
((in the case of students who are graduating from high school,))
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student((, and)). All such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district
for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such
students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in
subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 104 RCW 28A.150.390 and 2010 c 236 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a
programmed budget request for special education programs for students
with disabilities. Funding for programs operated by local school
districts shall be on an excess cost basis from appropriations provided
by the legislature for special education programs for students with
disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing through RCW
28A.150.260 (4)(a) ((and)), (b), and (c), (5), (6), and (8).
(2) The excess cost allocation to school districts shall be based
on the following:
(a) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten who are eligible for and enrolled in special education,
multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time equivalent
student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(b) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment, multiplied by the district's funded enrollment
percent, multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 0.9309.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Base allocation" means the total state allocation to all
schools in the district generated by the distribution formula under RCW
28A.150.260 (4)(a) ((and)), (b), and (c), (5), (6), and (8), to be
divided by the district's full-time equivalent enrollment.
(b) "Basic education enrollment" means enrollment of resident
students including nonresident students enrolled under RCW 28A.225.225
and students from nonhigh districts enrolled under RCW 28A.225.210 and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program under RCW 28A.225.250.
(c) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding students ages birth
through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten,
as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment.
(d) "Funded enrollment percent" means the lesser of the district's
actual enrollment percent or twelve and seven-tenths percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) In order to eliminate grandfathered salary allocations,
which means a state salary allocation rate for classified or
certificated administrative staff provided to a school district that
exceeds the standard salary allocation, beginning in the 2015-2017
biennium, the legislature shall provide sufficient funds for whichever
is greater:
(i) The certificated administrative and classified salary
allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2 for the 2015-16 school
year; or
(ii) The average state salary allocation amounts for basic
education state-funded certificated administrative staff and classified
staff units per full-time equivalent as follows:

Certificated administrative staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,765
Classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,153

(b) The minimum allocations provided in (a) of this subsection
shall be enhanced in a linear fashion to provide sufficient state funds
for the average state salary allocations for basic education state-funded certificated administrative staff and classified staff units per
full-time equivalent in the 2019-20 school year as follows:

Certificated administrative staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,158
Classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,486

(2) The allocations established in subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted for Initiative Measure No. 732 cost-of-living
increases as provided in the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) This section expires August 1, 2021.

Sec. 106 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2010 c 236 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only((, to be)) and used to distribute funds for
basic education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260. For the purposes of this section, the staff allocations
for classroom teachers, teacher librarians, guidance counselors, and
student health services staff under RCW 28A.150.260 are considered
allocations for certificated instructional staff.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree
may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state
salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus
appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a master's degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(4) For the 2015-16 school year through the 2019-20 school year, a
revised statewide salary allocation schedule as provided in section 107
of this act shall be phased-in for certificated instructional staff.
(5)(a) Beginning in the 2020-21 school year and thereafter, the
state must provide sufficient funding for a beginning certificated
instructional staff with an entry-level residency certificate to remain
on a residency certificate for up to nine years at the same salary
allocation, although there are different levels of salary allocations
for residency certificate holders who have a bachelor's degree and
those who have an advanced degree. Allocations based on an advanced
degree must be only for those degrees that are relevant to current or
future assignments as locally determined by the relevant school
district.
(b) The school year after a certificated instructional staff
obtains a professional certificate, the state must provide sufficient
funding to provide a salary increase. A minimum of three years of
experience is required to make the progression from the residency
certification to the professional certification.
(c) The state must provide sufficient funding to provide an
additional salary increase for a certificated instructional staff after
nine years of experience with retention of the professional/continuing
certificate.
(d) In the 2020-21 school year, the state minimum salary allocation
shall be as follows:

Years of
Experience BA -
Initial/
Residency BA -
Prof.
/ Cont. MA+ -
Initial /
Residency MA+ -
Prof.
/ Cont.

0 $48,000 $N/A $52,800 $N/A

1 48,000 N/A 52,800 N/A

2 48,000 N/A 52,800 N/A

3 48,000 N/A 52,800 N/A

4 48,000 58,000 52,800 62,800

5 48,000 58,000 52,800 62,800

6 48,000 58,000 52,800 62,800

7 48,000 58,000 52,800 62,800

8 48,000 58,000 52,800 62,800

9 48,000 58,000 52,800 62,800

10+ N/A 70,000 52,800 77,000

(6) Beginning in the 2021-22 school year and thereafter, the actual
state salary allocation schedule shall be based on the 2020-21 school
year salary allocation schedule framework with the values specified in
the omnibus appropriations act.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board shall make rules to implement
this section.
(8) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year, the calculation of years
of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers,
counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include
experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational
therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists.
The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool
position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up
to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of
service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be
applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit
under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement
system benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) In the 2015-16 school year, except for certificated
instructional staff who do not receive a salary increase under the
following state salary allocation schedule, the minimum state salary
allocation shall be as follows:

Years of
Experience BA + 0 BA + 15 BA + 30 BA + 45 BA + 90 BA + 135 MA MA +
45 MA +
90

0 $38,000 $38,000 $38,000 $38,000 $41,000 $43,000 $47,000 $47,000 $47,000

1 38,000 38,000 38,000 38,000 41,000 43,000 47,000 47,000 47,000

2 38,000 38,000 38,000 38,000 41,000 43,000 47,000 47,000 47,000

3 38,000 38,000 38,000 38,437 41,518 43,549 47,000 47,000 47,000

4 38,000 38,000 38,000 38,964 42,064 44,110 47,000 47,000 47,000

5 38,000 38,000 38,000 39,498 42,586 44,673 47,000 47,000 47,000

6 38,000 38,000 38,769 40,039 43,113 45,211 47,000 47,000 47,000

7 38,000 38,572 39,621 40,960 44,079 46,235 47,000 47,000 47,000

8 38,787 39,831 40,905 42,355 45,516 47,751 47,000 47,000 47,000

9 41,135 42,262 43,765 46,999 49,310 47,241 50,477 52,788

10 43,635 45,247 48,524 50,913 48,724 52,003 54,390

11 46,772 50,121 52,557 50,249 53,599 56,034

12 48,249 51,761 54,269 51,835 55,238 57,748

13 53,440 56,024 53,476 56,918 59,501

14 55,128 57,844 55,165 48,716 61,322

15 62,500 62,500 68,750 68,750 68,750

16+ 62,500 62,500 68,750 68,750 68,750

(b) In the 2016-17 school year, except for certificated
instructional staff who do not receive a salary increase under the
following state salary allocation schedule, the minimum state salary
allocation shall be as follows:

Years of
Experience BA + 0 BA + 15 BA + 30 BA + 45 BA + 90 BA + 135 MA MA +
45 MA +
90

0 $42,000 $42,000 $42,000 $42,000 $42,000 $44,000 $48,500 $48,500 $48,500

1 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 44,000 48,500 48,500 48,500

2 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 44,000 48,500 48,500 48,500

3 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 44,000 48,500 48,500 48,500

4 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,064 44,110 48,500 48,500 48,500

5 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,586 44,673 48,500 48,500 48,500

6 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 43,113 45,211 48,500 48,500 48,500

7 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,000 44,079 46,235 48,500 48,500 48,500

8 42,000 42,000 42,000 42,355 45,516 47,751 48,500 48,500 48,500

9 41,135 42,262 43,765 46,999 49,310 48,500 48,500 48,500

10 43,635 45,247 48,524 50,913 48,724 52,003 54,390

11 46,772 50,121 52,557 50,249 53,599 56,034

12 48,249 51,761 54,269 51,835 55,238 57,748

13 53,440 56,024 53,476 56,918 59,501

14 64,000 64,000 70,400 70,400 70,400

15 64,000 64,000 70,400 70,400 70,400

16+ 64,000 64,000 70,400 70,400 70,400

(c) In the 2017-18 school year, except for certificated
instructional staff who do not receive a salary increase under the
following state salary allocation schedule, the minimum state salary
allocation shall be as follows:

Years of
Experience BA + 0 BA + 15 BA + 30 BA + 45 BA + 90 BA +
135 MA MA +
45 MA +
90

0 $44,000 $44,000 $44,000 $44,000 $44,000 $46,000 $50,000 $50,000 $50,000

1 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 46,000 50,000 50,000 50,000

2 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 46,000 50,000 50,000 50,000

3 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 46,000 50,000 50,000 50,000

4 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 46,000 50,000 50,000 50,000

5 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 46,000 50,000 50,000 50,000

6 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 46,000 50,000 50,000 50,000

7 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,079 46,235 50,000 50,000 50,000

8 44,000 44,000 44,000 44,000 45,516 47,751 50,000 50,000 50,000

9 44,000 44,000 44,000 46,999 49,310 50,000 50,000 50,000

10 44,000 45,247 48,524 50,913 48,724 52,003 54,390

11 46,772 50,121 52,557 50,249 53,599 56,034

12 48,249 51,761 54,269 51,835 55,238 57,748

13 65,500 65,500 72,050 72,050 72,050

14 65,500 65,500 72,050 72,050 72,050

15 65,500 65,500 72,050 72,050 72,050

16+ 65,500 65,500 72,050 72,050 72,050

(d) In the 2018-19 school year, except for certificated
instructional staff who do not receive an increase under the following
state salary allocation schedule, the minimum state salary allocation
shall be as follows:

Years of
Experience BA + 0 BA +
15 BA +
30 BA +
45 BA + 90 BA +
135 MA MA +
45 MA + 90

0 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $52,800 $52,800 $52,800

1 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

2 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

3 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

4 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

5 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

6 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

7 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

8 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

9 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

10 48,000 48,000 48,524 50,913 52,800 52,800 54,390

11 48,000 50,121 52,557 52,800 53,599 56,034

12 67,000 67,000 67,000 73,700 73,700 73,700

13 67,000 67,000 73,700 73,700 73,700

14 67,000 67,000 73,700 73,700 73,700

15 67,000 67,000 73,700 73,700 73,700

16+ 67,000 67,000 73,700 73,700 73,700

(e) In the 2019-20 school year, except for certificated
instructional staff who do not receive a salary increase under the
following state salary allocation schedule, the minimum state salary
allocation shall be as follows:

Years of
Experience BA + 0 BA + 15 BA + 30 BA + 45 BA + 90 BA + 135 MA MA +
45 MA +
90

0 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $48,000 $52,800 $52,800 $52,800

1 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

2 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

3 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

4 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

5 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

6 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

7 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

8 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

9 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 48,000 52,800 52,800 52,800

10 48,000 48,000 48,524 50,913 52,800 52,800 54,390

11 68,500 68,500 68,500 75,350 75,350 75,350

12 68,500 68,500 68,500 75,350 75,350 75,350

13 68,500 68,500 75,350 75,350 75,350

14 68,500 68,500 75,350 75,350 75,350

15 68,500 68,500 75,350 75,350 75,350

16+ 68,500 68,500 75,350 75,350 75,350

(2) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year through the 2019-20
school year, if an individual certificated instructional staff unit
would not receive a salary increase under the revised state salary
allocation schedules in this section, then the state shall provide
sufficient funding to provide the certificated instructional staff unit
with a cost-of-living adjustment in accordance with RCW 28A.400.205.
(3) This section expires August 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to ensure that K-12 state salary
allocations keep pace with the wages of comparable occupations by
requiring a comparable wage analysis be conducted every four years.
(2) By July 1, 2018, and every four years thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall conduct or contract for a
comparative labor market analysis of the salaries and other
compensation for school district employees. The first analysis,
including any recommendations for salary adjustments based on the
analysis, must be submitted to the governor and the legislature by July
1, 2019. Subsequent reports shall be submitted by July 1st every four
years thereafter.

Sec. 109 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2010 c 235 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state is responsible for fully
funding salaries of staff performing basic education activities. The
legislature further finds that the compensation technical working group
created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2261 (chapter 548, Laws
of 2009) in its June 30, 2012, final report affirmed that average
comparable wages are sufficient to recruit and retain high quality
staff. However, the legislature further finds that the compensation
technical working group recommended that districts be allowed to
provide locally funded salary enhancements for nonbasic education
functions. The legislature intends to implement the recommendation of
the working group and authorize school districts to use local funds to
provide salary enhancements for nonbasic education functions. The
legislature further intends to ensure equity around the state by
limiting the locally funded enhancements to ten percent above the state
allocation to the district once the state is fully funding basic
education salaries at comparable wages in the 2019-20 school year.
(2) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(((2))) (3)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall
not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service((; and)).
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service.
(((3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated
instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average
certificated instructional staff salary used for the state basic
education allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.410.
(b))) (c) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated
instructional staff shall be included as salary ((under (a) of this
subsection)) only to the extent that the district's actual average
benefit contribution exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits
allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the
state operating appropriations act in effect at the time the
compensation is payable. For purposes of this section, fringe benefits
shall not include payment for unused leave for illness or injury under
RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and
retirement benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or
employer contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance
benefits allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit
in the state operating appropriations act in effect at the time the
compensation is payable. A school district may not use state funds to
provide employer contributions for such excess health benefits.
(((c))) (4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, school
districts are authorized to use local funds for salaries of
certificated instructional staff up to but not exceeding ten percent of
the state allocation to the district. The use of the local funds will
be defined at the school district level and will provide for locally
funded salary enhancements for nonbasic education functions.
(b) As the state phases-in a revised state salary allocation
schedule in section 107 of this act, for the school years 2015-16
through 2019-20, school districts are authorized to provide ten percent
of the amount that the school district would receive under the 2020-21
school year state salary allocation schedule contained in RCW
28A.150.410.
(c) The use of local funds for salary enhancements under this
section:
(i) Shall not cause the state to incur any present or future
funding obligation; and
(ii) Is subject to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter
41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one
year, and, if not renewed, shall not constitute adverse change in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380.
(d) No district may use local funds under the authorization of this
subsection (4) for the provision of services that are a part of the
basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(((4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff
may exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities,
for incentives, or for implementing specific measurable innovative
activities, including professional development, specified by the school
district to: (a) Close one or more achievement gaps, (b) focus on
development of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM)
learning opportunities, or (c) provide arts education. Beginning
September 1, 2011, school districts shall annually provide a brief
description of the innovative activities included in any supplemental
contract to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall summarize
the district information and submit an annual report to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state to incur any present
or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts shall be subject
to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the
provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and if not
renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with RCW
28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of
services which are a part of the basic education program required by
Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.
(5))) (6) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall
comply with RCW 28A.400.350 ((and)), 28A.400.275, and 28A.400.280.

Sec. 110 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the 2013-14 and
2014-15 school years, each school district shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.
(3) As the state phases-in a revised statewide salary allocation
schedule, beginning in the 2015-16 school year and through the 2019-20
school year certificated instructional staff who do not receive a
salary increase under the revised statewide salary allocation schedules
in accordance with RCW 28A.150.410 shall be the only certificated
instructional staff who receive a cost-of-living increase under this
section.

Sec. 111 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2013 c 242 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection minus (e) of this
subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (7) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection, for
districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount
equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included in the
nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (7) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 shall
be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to reflect each district's proportional share of student enrollment in
the cooperative;
(e) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a)(i) For levy collections in calendar year 2010, the difference
between the allocation the district would have received in the current
school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended by chapter 19, Laws of
2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the district received in the
current school year pursuant to RCW 28A.505.220;
(ii) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, the
allocation rate the district would have received in the prior school
year using the Initiative 728 rate multiplied by the full-time
equivalent student enrollment used to calculate the Initiative 728
allocation for the prior school year; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year using the Initiative 732 base and the
allocations the district actually received the prior school year
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
(5) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4)(a) and (b) of this section, a district's levy base shall
also include the difference between an allocation of fifty-three and
two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four enrolled
in the prior school year and the allocation of certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in
grades kindergarten through four that the district actually received in
the prior school year, except that the levy base for a school district
whose allocation in the 2009-10 school year was less than fifty-three
and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four shall
include the difference between the allocation the district actually
received in the 2009-10 school year and the allocation the district
actually received in the prior school year.
(6) For levy collections beginning in calendar year 2014 and
thereafter, in addition to the allocations included under subsections
(3)(a) through (c), (4)(a) and (b), and (5) of this section, a
district's levy base shall also include the funds allocated by the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.715.040 to a school
that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact and that
formerly contracted with the school district to provide educational
services through an interlocal agreement and received funding from the
district.
(7)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-four
percent in 2010 and twenty-eight percent in 2011 through 2017 and
twenty-four percent every year thereafter;
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(ii) For 2011 through 2017, the percentage calculated as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (8) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(ii)(C) of this subsection.
(8)(a) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds
from the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section: (((a))) (i) That are not attributable to
enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (((b))) (ii) that are or were specifically identified
as levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction
funds are dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized
until after the start of the current school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction
funds by using prior school year data in place of current school year
data. Levy reduction funds shall not include moneys received by school
districts from cities or counties.
(b) Beginning with the 2015-16 school year through the 2019-20
school year, the increased salary allocations under the revised salary
allocation schedules in section 107 of this act shall be deemed levy
reduction funds for those school districts that have been grandfathered
at a greater levy authority than the maximum levy percentage provided
in subsection (7)(a) of this section.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(b) "Current school year" means the year immediately following the
prior school year.
(c) "Initiative 728 rate" means the allocation rate at which the
student achievement program would have been funded under chapter 3,
Laws of 2001, if all annual adjustments to the initial 2001 allocation
rate had been made in previous years and in each subsequent year as
provided for under chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's state allocation
for annual salary cost-of-living increases for district employees in
the state-funded salary base as it would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, if each annual cost-of-living increase
allocation had been provided in previous years and in each subsequent
year.
(10) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(11) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
(12) For calendar year 2009, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall recalculate school district levy authority to
reflect levy rates certified by school districts for calendar year
2009.

Sec. 112 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2010 c 237 s 2 and 2010 c 99 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection minus (e) of this
subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection, for
districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount
equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included in the
nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 shall
be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to reflect each district's proportional share of student enrollment in
the cooperative;
(e) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-four
percent in 2010 and twenty-eight percent in 2011 through 2017 and
twenty-four percent every year thereafter;
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; ((and))
(ii) For 2011 through 2017, the percentage calculated as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(ii)(C) of this subsection;
(iii) For 2018 and thereafter, the percentage shall be calculated
as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(iii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii)(C) of this subsection.
(5)(a) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds
from the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3)
of this section: (((a))) (i) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and
(((b))) (ii) that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction
funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent
on formula factors which would not be finalized until after the start
of the current school year, the superintendent of public instruction
shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior
school year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction
funds shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities
or counties.
(b) The increased salary allocations under the revised salary
allocation schedule in section 107 of this act through the 2019-20
school year shall be deemed levy reduction funds for those school
districts that have been grandfathered at a greater levy authority than
the maximum levy percentage provided in subsection (4)(a) of this
section.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

PART II
IMMEDIATE AND CONCRETE ACTION TOWARDS
FULFILLING THE STATE'S ARTICLE IX CONSTITUTIONAL DUTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 It is the intent of the legislature to
take "immediate, concrete action" this legislative session in order to
show the state's good faith commitment to continuing to make progress
towards the 2018 full funding goals as required by the Washington state
supreme court's order dated January 9, 2014.
The legislature intends to provide additional funding for the
initial priorities established in Substitute House Bill No. 2776,
chapter 236, Laws of 2010, of all-day kindergarten, reduced class
sizes, and fully fund materials, supplies, and operating costs. The
legislature further intends to provide funding for second grade class-size reductions so as to build upon the all-day kindergarten and first
grade class-size investments that have already been made in order to
ensure that the academic gains made due to those investments are not
lost by that same cohort of students as they progress through the
educational system.
Additionally, the legislature intends to make investments in
educator compensation in recognition of the court's statement that
state funding of educator compensation remains "constitutionally
inadequate."

Sec. 202 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2014) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,395,289,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2015) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,581,336,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $328,563,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,305,188,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2013, to August 31, 2013, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 503, chapter 50, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess., as amended.
(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2013-14 and 2014-15 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, except that the allocation for guidance
counselors in a middle school shall be 1.216 and the allocation for
guidance counselors in a high school shall be 2.009 in the 2013-14
school year and the allocation for guidance counselors in high school
shall be 2.539 in the 2014-15 school year in order to begin to assist
school districts in providing students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credit hours, which enhancements are within the program of
basic education. The superintendent shall make allocations to school
districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent
student enrollment in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260 2013-14
School Year 2014-15
School Year

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23 25.23

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for laboratory science,
career and technical education (CTE), and skill center programs average
class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

(A) General education class size in high poverty schools:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260

Grade 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(B) For grades K-1, class size of 20.85 is provided for high
poverty schools for the 2013-14 school year and for grade 2, class size
of 20.85 is provided for high poverty schools for the 2014-15 school
year;
(C) For grades K through 1, the superintendent shall, at a minimum,
allocate funding to high-poverty schools for the 2014-15 school year
based on an average class size of 24.10 full-time equivalent students
per teacher. The superintendent shall provide enhanced funding for
class size reduction in grades K through 1 to the extent of, and
proportionate to, the school's demonstrated actual average class size
up to a class size of 20.30 full-time equivalent students per teacher.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules to implement the enhanced funding authorized under (ii)(C) of
this subsection and shall distribute draft rules for review no later
than December 1, 2013. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report the draft rules and proposed methodology to
the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013.
(D) The enhancement in this subsection (2)(c)(ii) is within the
program of basic education.
(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) ((Laboratory science,)) Advanced placement((,)) and
international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size
assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and (a)
of this subsection and is considered certificated instructional staff,
except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 students full-time equivalent enrollment:

((Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's))

2013-14
School Year 2014-15
School Year

Career and Technical Education 2.02 2.72

Skill Center 2.36 3.06

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula
generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The
superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the
district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each
grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the
allocation for principals, assistance principals, and other
certificated building level administrators:

Prototypical School Building:

Elementary School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.253

Middle School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.353

High School . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.880

(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of
the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following
factors: Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.025
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.198

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade,
except that the allocation for parent involvement coordinators in an
elementary school shall be 0.0825, which enhancement is within the
program of basic education.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2013-14 and 2014-15
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be
allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 1.71 percent in the 2013-14
school year and 2.00 percent in the 2014-15 school year for career and
technical education students, and 21.60 percent in the 2013-14 school
year and 15.98 percent in the 2014-15 school year for skill center
students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 18.68
percent in the 2013-14 school year and 18.68 percent in the 2014-15
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 20.95
percent in the 2013-14 school year and 20.95 percent in the 2014-15
school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2013-14
SCHOOL YEAR 2014-15
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology $77.46 $((82.16)) 86.76

Utilities and Insurance $210.46 $((223.23)) 235.73

Curriculum and Textbooks $83.17 $((88.21)) 93.15

Other Supplies and Library Materials $176.56 $((187.27)) 197.75

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated
and Classified Staff
$12.86
$((13.64)) 14.41

Facilities Maintenance $104.27 $((110.59)) 116.78

Security and Central Office $72.24 $((76.62)) 80.91

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $737.02 $((781.72)) 825.48

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations of $1,244.25 for the 2013-14 school year and
$1,262.92 for the 2014-15 school year.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation of
$1,399.30 for the 2013-14 school year and $1,420.29 for the 2014-15
school year.
(d) ((Students in laboratory science courses generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.)) In addition
to the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, beginning in the
2014-15 school year in order to begin to assist school districts in
providing students the opportunity to complete twenty-four credit
hours, the following minimum allocations shall be provided for each
annual average full-time equivalent student in grades nine through
twelve for the following materials, supplies, and operating costs, to
be adjusted annually for inflation:
Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades 9-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $36.35
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $39.02
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $82.84
Instructional professional development for
certificated and classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $6.04

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2013, to August
31, 2013, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 34, Laws of
2011 1st sp. sess. (allocation of funding for funding for students
enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) Amounts provided in this section beginning September 1, 2013,
are adjusted to reflect modifications to alternative learning
experience courses in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5946
(student educational outcomes).
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 43.75 percent of kindergarten enrollment
in the 2013-14 school year and ((43.75)) 57.5 percent in the 2014-15
school year, which enhancement is within the program of basic
education.

(12) ((INCREASED INSTRUCTIONAL HOURS FOR GRADES SEVEN THROUGH
TWELVE
(a) School districts shall implement the increased instructional
hours for the instructional program of basic education required under
the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220(2)(a) beginning with the 2014-15
school year, which enhancement is within the program of basic
education.
(b) Amounts provided in this section are sufficient to fund
increased instructional hours in grades seven through twelve. For the
2014-15 school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding to
school districts for increased instructional hours. In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(a) Additional instruction of 2.2222 hours per week per full-time
equivalent student in grades seven through twelve in school year 2014-15; (b) the general education average class sizes specified in section
502(2)(c); (c) 36 instructional weeks per year; (d) 900 instructional
hours per teacher; and (e) the district's average staff mix and
compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act.

(13))) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall
add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any
grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs
with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this
subsection;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this
subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent
with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place
for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws
of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for
inflation.
(((14))) (13) Any school district board of directors may petition
the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(((15))) (14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the
following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal
years 2014 and 2015 as follows:
(a) $605,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $614,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for fire protection for school
districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2014 and $436,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(((16))) (15) $214,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2014 and $217,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2015 are provided solely for school district
emergencies as certified by the superintendent of public instruction.
At the close of the fiscal year the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the allocations
provided to districts and the nature of the emergency.
(((17))) (16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a
maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to
chapter 463, Laws of 2007.
(((18))) (17) Students participating in running start programs may
be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including
school district and institution of higher education enrollment. In
calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction may average the participating student's September
through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end
dates for courses provided by the high school and higher education
institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the student achievement council, and the education
data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students
participating in the running start program, including course load
analyses at both the high school and community and technical college
system.
(((19))) (18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each
district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(((20))) (19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to
approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs
shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career
and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 203 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the 2013-14 ((and
2014-15)) school year((s)), each school district shall be provided a
cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living
increase.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 204 RCW 28B.50.465 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Academic employees of community and technical college districts
shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, "academic
employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each college district shall receive a cost-of-living allocation
sufficient to increase academic employee salaries, including mandatory
salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the
cost-of-living index.
(b) A college district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year,
each college district shall certify to the college board that it has
spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and
salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for academic employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except for the 2013-2014 ((and 2014-2015))
fiscal year((s)), the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living
increase set forth in this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 205 RCW 28B.50.468 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Classified employees of technical colleges shall be provided an
annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
For purposes of this section, "technical college" has the same meaning
as defined in RCW 28B.50.030. This section applies to only those
classified employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each technical college board of trustees shall receive a cost-of-living
allocation sufficient to increase classified employee salaries,
including mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly
increase in the cost-of-living index.
(b) A technical college board of trustees shall distribute its
cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in
accordance with the technical college's salary schedules, collective
bargaining agreements, and other compensation policies. No later than
the end of the fiscal year, each technical college shall certify to the
college board that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for technical college classified employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except for the 2013-2014 ((and 2014-2015))
fiscal year((s)), the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living
increase set forth in this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 206 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the
certification. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual
bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08 school year.
Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation, except that
the bonus shall not be increased during the 2013-14 ((and 2014-15))
school year((s)).
(2) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by
subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional
assignment in a school in which at least seventy percent of the
students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount.

PART III
PROVIDING NEW REVENUE TO SUPPORT MEETING THE STATE'S ARTICLE IX
CONSTITUTIONAL DUTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The legislature intends to provide initial
options for additional revenue to support meeting the state's Article
IX state constitutional duty in a reliable and dependable manner.
The legislature recognizes that simply reducing funding in other
areas of the omnibus appropriations act is neither a long-term nor
sustainable solution to fulfilling the state's basic education
obligations. The legislature further recognizes that budget cuts that
impact state funding for programs that provide holistic services for
children and their families will only undermine students' ability to
arrive at the classroom ready to learn. Therefore, the legislature
acknowledges that additional revenue options are necessary if
Washington is to be on track to meet its constitutional promises by
2018.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food
and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances,
whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated
form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed
for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does
not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. ((For purposes of this
subsection, the following definitions apply:
(a))) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a safety-sealed
container or package for human consumption. Bottled water is calorie
free and does not contain sweeteners or other additives except that it
may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii) fluoride; (iii)
carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes; (v) oxygen;
(vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts, or essences
derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes water that is
delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with
the water.
(b) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(((b))) (c)(i) "Prepared food" means:
(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(((c))) (d) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain
natural or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages
that contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" means a facility:
(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing
project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code,
as existing on August 1, 2009;
(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and
(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been
entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42
of the federal internal revenue code.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling
price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for
purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) For soft drinks, bottled water, and hot prepared food and food
ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated
after they have been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling
price is the total gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of
one plus the sales tax rate expressed as a decimal.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.12.0293 and 2011 c 2 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and food
ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft
drinks," "bottled water," and "dietary supplements" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water dispensed or to
be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription for use in the
cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of a disease or other
medical condition.
(2) For purposes of this section, "prescription" means an order,
formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or
other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner authorized
by the laws of this state to prescribe.
(3) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a
reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must
collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has
paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on
purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a
refund of the state and local sales taxes directly from the department
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must
deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is
less than twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid
more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the
tax was paid to the seller.
(4) The provisions of RCW 82.32.060 apply to refunds authorized
under this section.
(5) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer
in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers
claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller
with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of bottled water dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant
to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of a disease or medical condition.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "prescription" has the same
meaning as provided in section 304 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the conditions in this section, the tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled water to persons whose
primary source of drinking water is unsafe.
(b) For purposes of this subsection and section 307 of this act, a
person's primary source of drinking water is unsafe if:
(i) The public water system providing the drinking water has issued
a public notification that the drinking water may pose a health risk,
and the notification is still in effect on the date that the bottled
water was purchased;
(ii) Test results on the person's drinking water, which are no more
than twelve months old, from a laboratory certified to perform drinking
water testing show that the person's drinking water does not meet safe
drinking water standards applicable to public water systems; or
(iii) The person otherwise establishes, to the department's
satisfaction, that the person's drinking water does not meet safe
drinking water standards applicable to public water systems.
(2) Except for sales of bottled water delivered to the buyer in a
reusable container that is not sold with the water, sellers must
collect tax on sales subject to this exemption. Any buyer that has
paid at least twenty-five dollars in state and local sales taxes on
purchases of bottled water subject to this exemption may apply for a
refund of the state and local sales taxes directly from the department
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must
deny any refund application if the amount of the refund requested is
less than twenty-five dollars. No refund may be made for taxes paid
more than four years after the end of the calendar year in which the
tax was paid to the seller.
(3) The provisions of RCW 82.32.060 apply to refunds authorized
under this section.
(4)(a) With respect to sales of bottled water delivered to the
buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water, buyers
claiming the exemption provided in this section must provide the seller
with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.
(b) The department may waive the requirement for an exemption
certificate in the event of disaster or similar circumstance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of bottled water by persons whose primary source of drinking water is
unsafe as provided in section 306 of this act.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.12.0263 and 1980 c 37 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in respect to
the use of biomass fuel by the extractor or manufacturer thereof when
used directly in the operation of the particular extractive operation
or manufacturing plant which produced or manufactured the same. For
purposes of this section, "biomass fuel" means wood waste and other
wood residuals, including forest derived biomass, but does not include
firewood or wood pellets. "Biomass fuel" also includes partially
organic by-products of pulp, paper, and wood manufacturing processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The value of the article used with respect to refinery fuel gas
under this chapter is the most recent monthly United States natural gas
wellhead price, as published by the federal energy information
administration.
(2) Taxes collected under this chapter on the use of refinery fuel
gas must be deposited in the education legacy trust account. The
department must establish a separate reporting code for taxes collected
under this chapter on the use of refinery fuel gas.
(3) This section applies to the use of refinery fuel gas occurring
on or after June 1, 2014.

Sec. 310 RCW 82.08.0273 and 2011 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital
goods, and digital codes, when)) Subject to the conditions and
limitations in this section, an exemption from the tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 in the form of a remittance from the department is provided
for sales to nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property,
digital goods, and digital codes. The exemption only applies if:
(a) The property is for use outside this state;
(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or
territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United
States, other than the state of Washington; and
(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose,
or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax,
use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities,
or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or
(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection,
provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of
their residence; and
(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department
of revenue access to such records and other forms of verification at
((his or her)) the purchaser's place of residence to assure that such
purchases are not first used substantially in the state of Washington.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller
during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor
vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge
for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident
purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the separately
stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly
stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no
publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the
tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this
section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by
the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a
single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property
and service. All of the ((requirements)) provisions in subsections (1)
and (3) through (((6))) (7) of this section apply to this subsection.
(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
the provisions of this section must ((display proof of his or her
current nonresident status as provided in this section)) pay the state
and local sales tax to the seller at the time of purchase and then
request a remittance of the state portion of the sales tax from the
department in accordance with this subsection and subsection (4) of
this section. A request for remittance must include proof of the
person's status as a nonresident at the time of the purchase for which
a remittance is requested. The request for a remittance must also
include any additional information and documentation as required by the
department, which may include a description of the item purchased for
which a remittance is requested, the sales price of the item, the
amount of state and local sales tax paid on the item, the date of the
purchase, the name of the seller and the physical address where the
sale took place, and copies of sales receipts showing the qualified
purchases.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one
piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(((c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status
under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from
retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the
seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection
(4)(b) of this section.))
(4)(a) ((Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence,
determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of
this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which shall
show the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers
where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.
(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection
to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from
the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate
approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board
or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the
department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident
purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this
subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number
or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.
(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the
offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured
identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying
retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit
identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and
subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the
tax due on such purchases.
(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and
who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in
this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable
for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one
thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the
purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest
assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW))
(i) Beginning January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015, a person
may request a remittance from the department for state and local sales
taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in
Washington between June 1, 2014, and December 31, 2014.
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2016, a person may request a remittance
from the department during any calendar year for state sales taxes paid
by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington during
the immediately preceding calendar year only. No application may be
made with respect to purchases made before the immediately preceding
calendar year.
(b) The remittance request, including proof of nonresident status
and any other documentation and information required by the department,
must be made using an application process as prescribed by the
department, which may be a paper process, electronic process, or a
combination of a paper and electronic process. Only one remittance
request may be made by a person per calendar year.
(c) The total amount of a remittance request must be at least
twenty-five dollars. The department must deny any request for a
remittance that is less than twenty-five dollars.
(d) The department will examine the applicant's proof of
nonresident status and any other documentation and information as
required in the application to determine whether the applicant is
entitled to a remittance under this section.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements to the department,
which includes the offer of fraudulent or fraudulently procured
identification or fraudulent sales receipts, in order to receive a
remittance of retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72
RCW and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the
department under this section.
(b) Any person requesting a remittance of sales tax from the
department by providing proof of identification or sales receipts not
the person's own, or counterfeit identification or sales receipts, with
intent to violate the provisions of this section, is (i) guilty of a
misdemeanor, (ii) liable for the tax, (iii) subject to a penalty equal
to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on such purchases,
and (iv) ineligible to receive any further remittances from the
department under this section.
(6) The exemption provided by this section is for the state sales
tax only.
(7) A nonresident who receives a refund of sales tax from the
seller for any reason with respect to a purchase made in this state is
not entitled to a remittance for the state sales tax paid on the
purchase. A person who receives both a remittance under this section
and a refund from the seller with respect to the same purchase must
immediately repay the remittance to the department. Interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section
from the date that the department made the remittance until the amount
due under this subsection is paid to the department. A person who
receives a remittance with respect to a purchase for which the person
had, at the time the person submitted the application for a remittance,
already received a refund of sales tax from the seller is also liable
for the evasion penalty in RCW 82.32.090(7) and is ineligible to
receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 RCW 82.04.272 (Tax on warehousing and
reselling prescription drugs) and 2013 c 19 s 127, 2003 c 168 s 401, &
1998 c 343 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 312 RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used,
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively
owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or
improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or
processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or
processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d)
operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and
performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the federal communications commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount
of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat,
seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit
packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have
direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
(("Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.))
(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once
every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication.

Sec. 313 RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used,
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively
owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or
improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or
processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or
processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d)
operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and
performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the federal communications commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount
of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat,
seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit
packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have
direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
(("Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.))
(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once
every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication.

Sec. 314 RCW 82.32.790 and 2010 c 114 s 201 and 2010 c 106 s 401
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Section 313, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section 313 of
this act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104, 110,
117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, section 3,
chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
((section 4,)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting
and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip
fabrication facility in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) Section 313, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section 313 of this
act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104, 110, 117,
123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, section 3,
chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 take((s)) effect the first day of the month
in which a contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor
fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the director of the
department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the
effective date of section 313, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section 313
of this act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104,
110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of
2010(([,])), section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter
300, Laws of 2006, and ((section 4,)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003 to
affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate
by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and section 313, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section 313 of
this act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104, 110,
117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, section 3,
chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 ((is)) are effective, the department
discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place
within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department
must make a determination that section 313, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014
(section 313 of this act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010,
sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws
of 2010, section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300,
Laws of 2006, and chapter 149, Laws of 2003 ((is)) are no longer
effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed
deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person
reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit
under section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of section 313, chapter . . ., Laws of 2014 (section
313 of this act), section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104,
110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010,
section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of
2006, and chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By the last workday of the second and fourth calendar quarters,
the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in subsection
(2) of this section from the general fund to the education legacy trust
account. The first transfer under this subsection (1) must occur by
December 31, 2014.
(2) By December 15th and June 15th of each year, the department
must estimate the increase in state general fund revenues from the
changes made under sections 302 through 314 of this act for the current
and prior calendar quarters and notify the state treasurer of the
increase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 A new section is added to chapter 43.135
RCW to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to:
(1) The transfers under section 315 of this act; and
(2) The appropriations in sections 202 through 206 of this act
necessary to fund cost of living increases; materials, supplies, and
operating costs; class size reduction; and all-day kindergarten.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Section 101 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Section 111 of this act expires January 1,
2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Section 112 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Sections 301 through 312 and 314 through
316 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect June 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Section 312 of this act expires on the
date that section 313 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 Sections 201 through 206 of this act take
effect July 1, 2014.

--- END ---