BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
A pharmacist is authorized, without consulting a physician or
obtaining a new prescription or refill from a physician, to provide for
one early refill of a prescription for eye drops to treat glaucoma if
all of the following criteria are met:
(1) The refill is requested by a patient less than thirty days
after the later of:
(a) The date the original prescription was dispensed to the
patient; or
(b) The date that the last refill of the prescription was dispensed
to the patient;
(2) The prescriber indicates on the original prescription that a
specific number of refills will be needed;
(3) The refill does not exceed the number of refills that the
prescriber indicated under subsection (2) of this section;
(4) The prescription has not been refilled more than once during
the thirty-day period prior to the request for an early refill.

--- END ---