BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that oil
transportation by train and vessel poses a potential hazard to the
health and well-being of Washington residents and the natural resources
and economic vitality of the state. Recent accidents, such as the oil
train explosions in North Dakota, Alabama, New Brunswick, and Quebec,
as well as the frequent incidence of leaks and spills from pipelines,
railcars, and vessels carrying oil across the nation, highlight the
risks to human health and the environment caused by the transportation
of oil. Furthermore, as the location and type of oil extracted in
North America changes with the advent of new technology, there are
associated changes in the patterns and methods of transporting crude
oil and refined petroleum products. According to the United States
department of transportation, the new types of oil being transported
through the state may also be particularly flammable and dangerous.
Measures to prevent spills from oil trains and tank vessels are
critical to lowering risks to the state's natural resources and
economic base. It is therefore the intent and purpose of this act to
assess the risks of spill and gaps in the current response capacity, to
ensure that response plans are completed and updated, to ensure that
the public has access to information about the movement of oil through
the state, and to ensure that communities are fully informed about any
risks posed to their safety by the transportation of oil.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall make available on its web site a quarterly
report on the maritime and terrestrial transportation of oil in
Washington. The report must include information including, but not
limited to, the following sources:
(1) Information submitted to the department pursuant to section 3
of this act;
(2) Advanced notices of transfers and other information provided to
the department pursuant to RCW 88.46.165, including aggregated
information on the quantities and types of oil being transferred, the
frequency and duration of oil transfers, and the locations of product
transfers;
(3) Reported information on spills, accidents, discharges, or other
prohibited occurrences submitted to the department pursuant to RCW
90.56.050(1), 90.56.280, or 88.46.100; and
(4) Relevant information about the volume and type of oil
transported through Washington that is collected by federal agencies
including the United States department of transportation, United States
coast guard, United States department of energy, and United States army
corps of engineers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner or operator for each facility other than a
transmission pipeline shall submit to the department the following
information:
(a) The number of tank vessels and railcars that transferred or
delivered oil at the facility each week;
(b) The volume and type of oil that arrived at and departed from
the facility each week, including the volume and type of oil:
(i) By mode of arrival at the facility, including but not limited
to arrival by vessel, rail, pipeline, or motor vehicle;
(ii) By mode of departure from the facility, including but not
limited to departure by vessel, rail, pipeline, or motor vehicle; and
(c) The route taken by any oil that arrived at the facility by
railcar.
(2) Beginning November 1, 2014, the owner or operator of each
facility must submit the information required pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section by February 1st, May 1st, August 1st, and November
1st of each year and each quarterly submission must include the
information in subsection (1) of this section for each week of the
quarter covered by the submission. The department may develop a
reporting form and guidance for the submission of the information in
subsection (1) of this section by facility owners or operators. To the
extent feasible, the department must integrate the reporting form with
other forms used by facilities to submit information to the department,
including forms used to submit the information required by RCW
88.46.165.
(3)(a) Prior to making any confidential information submitted
pursuant to this section available on its web site, the department must
aggregate the submitted information to the extent necessary to ensure
confidentiality if public disclosure of the specific information or
data would result in an unfair competitive disadvantage to the owner or
operator submitting the information.
(b) The department may not make publicly available specific
information about the volume of oil or the number of vessels or
railcars that arrive at or depart from individual facilities. Instead,
information about facility-specific arrivals and departures of oil must
be aggregated prior to disclosure in order to prevent unfair
competitive disadvantage to the owner or operator submitting the
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must provide to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives:
(a) A review of all state and federal geographic response plans as
needed in contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.210 and 88.46.060
by December 31, 2014; and
(b) Annual updates, beginning December 31, 2015, and ending
December 31, 2021, as required under RCW 43.01.036, as to the progress
made in completing state and federal geographic response plans as
needed in contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.060, 90.56.210,
and 88.46.060.
(2) The department must contract, if practicable, with eligible
independent third parties to ensure completion by December 1, 2016, of
at least fifty percent of the geographic response plans as needed in
contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.210 and 88.46.060 for the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Washington State University shall
consult with the department of ecology and the emergency management
division of the military department to conduct a study regarding the
state's capacity to respond to and recover from accidents involving
railcars transporting oil. In conducting this study, Washington State
University shall consider the potential near-term increase in the
volume of oil being transported via rail through Washington as a result
of proposed new or expanded oil refining and storage facilities.
Washington State University shall seek the input of relevant
stakeholders and other state agencies in carrying out this study.
(2) The study required under subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Examine the current and projected prevalence of oil
transportation by railcar through Washington communities;
(b) Make a preliminary identification of the communities at the
greatest risk of an accident involving oil transportation by railcar;
(c) Examine, generally, the extent to which state and local
emergency plans, oil spill contingency plans developed pursuant to
chapter 90.56 RCW, and geographic response plans address this threat;
(d) Examine the roles and responsibilities of federal, state,
local, and tribal entities in preparing for emergencies or oil spills;
(e) Determine whether adequate resources are available to respond
to and recover from such an accident in a timely and effective manner;
and
(f) Address the potential impacts to transportation networks and
other critical infrastructure from an accident involving oil
transported by railcar.
(3) Washington State University shall report its findings from the
study to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1,
2014.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of ecology and the utilities
and transportation commission shall jointly hold a symposium on
emergency prevention and response activities for bulk crude oil
transported in the Pacific Northwest region. The department and the
commission must invite state representatives from the Pacific Northwest
economic region authorized under chapter 43.147 RCW and representatives
from interested tribes and local governments. The symposium must
include invitations to representatives from neighboring states,
provinces, territories, and countries in the region. The symposium
must at a minimum address:
(1) Cooperative emergency prevention and response activities
between the shared international and state borders;
(2) Expected risks posed by increased transport of Canadian crude
oil throughout the Pacific Northwest region within the next three to
five years;
(3) Changes in methods for transporting crude oil and associated
risks;
(4) Identification of responsible agencies and corresponding
activities that can be taken to address expected risks; and
(5) Consideration of new or emerging technologies to make transport
safer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of ecology shall provide an
analysis of the safety of transporting bulk crude oil on the waters of
the state.
(1) The analysis must include:
(a) The capacity to address risks posed by increased waterborne
traffic shipping crude oil in bulk as freight;
(b) Weaknesses or gaps in bulk crude oil spill prevention and
response programs, including identification of incomplete or weak
programs, with a focus on Grays Harbor and the Columbia river;
(c) An assessment of the costs and benefits of adopting tug escort
requirements for oil laden tankers on the waters of Grays Harbor and
the lower Columbia river, and of modifying the tug escort requirements
for oil laden tankers on Puget Sound;
(d) Barge and tug operations within the state related to the
movement of bulk crude oil; and
(e) A status report on the federal, state, and local waterborne
bulk crude oil spill prevention and preparedness.
(2) The department of ecology must provide the analysis to the
relevant policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 31, 2014. The analysis must also include
a status report on waterborne bulk crude oil spill prevention and
preparedness and recommendations for strengthening crude oil spill
prevention and preparedness specifically in Grays Harbor and the
Columbia river.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must provide grants to emergency responders to
assist with oil spill response and firefighting equipment and resources
needed to meet the requirements of this act.
(2) In developing the guidelines for prioritizing applications for
grant awards, the department must consult with communities located
along or near the routes of waterborne and rail shipping of bulk crude
oil, emergency responder agencies, representatives from the oil and
rail industries, and businesses that receive shipments of bulk crude
oil.
(a) In reviewing an application the department must evaluate the
funding request, the need for additional funding, and the extent the
applicant is able to coordinate with other response agencies having
equipment and resources in the area.
(b) Funding must be prioritized for applicants from areas where
liquid bulk crude oil is transferred from one mode of transportation to
another.
(c) Grants must be coordinated to maximize currently existing
equipment and resources that have been put in place by first responders
and industry.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.23B.010 and 1992 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Barrel" means a unit of measurement of volume equal to forty-two United States gallons of crude oil or petroleum product.
(2) "Bulk oil terminal" means a facility of any kind, other than a
waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil to or from
a rail tank car.
(3) "Crude oil" means any naturally occurring liquid hydrocarbons
at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the earth,
including condensate and natural gasoline.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((4))) (5) "Marine terminal" means a facility of any kind, other
than a waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil or
petroleum products to or from a waterborne vessel or barge.
(((5))) (6) "Navigable waters" means those waters of the state and
their adjoining shorelines that are subject to the ebb and flow of the
tide, including the Columbia and Snake rivers.
(((6))) (7) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(((7))) (8) "Petroleum product" means any liquid hydrocarbons at
atmospheric temperature and pressure that are the product of the
fractionation, distillation, or other refining or processing of crude
oil, and that are used as, useable as, or may be refined as a fuel or
fuel blendstock, including but not limited to, gasoline, diesel fuel,
aviation fuel, bunker fuel, and fuels containing a blend of alcohol and
petroleum.
(((8))) (9) "Tank car" means a railcar, the body of which consists
of a tank for transporting liquids.
(10) "Taxpayer" means the person owning crude oil or petroleum
products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks
of a marine or bulk oil terminal in this state from a waterborne vessel
or barge and who is liable for the taxes imposed by this chapter.
(((9))) (11) "Waterborne vessel or barge" means any ship, barge, or
other watercraft capable of travelling on the navigable waters of this
state and capable of transporting any crude oil or petroleum product in
quantities of ten thousand gallons or more for purposes other than
providing fuel for its motor or engine.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.23B.020 and 2006 c 256 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal
within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the
navigable waters of this state; and (b) crude oil at a bulk oil
terminal within this state from a rail tank car. The tax imposed in
this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum
products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks
of a marine or bulk terminal from a rail tank car or waterborne vessel
or barge at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude oil or petroleum
product received.
(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal
within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the
navigable waters of this state; and (b) crude oil at a bulk oil
terminal within this state from a rail tank car. The tax imposed in
this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum
products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks
of a marine or bulk oil terminal from a rail tank car or waterborne
vessel or barge at the rate of four cents per barrel of crude oil or
petroleum product.
(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter ((shall)) must be collected
by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any
person charged with collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for
the taxes, or in the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in
writing of the ((imposition of the)) taxes imposed, or having collected
the taxes, fails to pay them to the department in the manner prescribed
by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the person's own
acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control,
he or she ((shall)), nevertheless, ((be)) is personally liable to the
state for the amount of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner
to a marine or bulk oil terminal operator ((shall)) must relieve the
owner from further liability for the taxes.
(4) Taxes collected under this chapter ((shall)) must be held in
trust until paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes
who appropriates or converts the taxes collected ((shall be)) is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required
by this chapter to be collected ((shall)) must be stated separately
from other charges made by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator in
any invoice or other statement of account provided to the taxpayer.
(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to
the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged
with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the taxes.
(6) The taxes ((shall be)) are due from the marine or bulk oil
terminal operator, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed
by the department, within twenty-five days after the end of the month
in which the taxable activity occurs.
(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine
or bulk oil terminal operator or to the department, ((shall))
constitute a debt from the taxpayer to the marine or bulk oil terminal
operator. Any person required to collect the taxes under this chapter
who, with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter, fails or
refuses to do so as required and any taxpayer who refuses to pay any
taxes due under this chapter((, shall be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor
as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the
taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The
department ((shall)) must give its approval for direct payment under
this section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that
direct payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed
under this chapter. The department ((shall)) must provide by rule for
the issuance of a direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying
for direct payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct
payment certificate by a terminal operator ((shall)) must relieve the
marine or bulk oil terminal operator from any liability for the
collection or payment of the taxes imposed under this chapter.
(9) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section ((shall)) must be deposited into the state oil spill response
account. All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this
section shall be deposited into the oil spill prevention account.
(10) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter,
the office of financial management ((shall)) must determine the balance
of the oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar
quarter. Balance determinations by the office of financial management
under this section are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge
the validity of any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of
financial management ((shall)) must promptly notify the departments of
revenue and ecology of the account balance once a determination is
made. For each subsequent calendar quarter, the tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section shall be imposed during the entire
calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly
balance is more than nine million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during
the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent
quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.23B.030 and 1992 c 73 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) only apply to the
first receipt of crude oil or petroleum products at a marine or bulk
oil terminal in this state and not to the later transporting and
subsequent receipt of the same oil or petroleum product, whether in the
form originally received at a marine or bulk oil terminal in this state
or after refining or other processing.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.23B.040 and 1992 c 73 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Credit ((shall)) must be allowed against the taxes imposed under
this chapter for any crude oil or petroleum products received at a
marine or bulk oil terminal and subsequently exported from or sold for
export from the state.

--- END ---