BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) An additive transportation budget of the
state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the
several amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to
accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the
several accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and
offices for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital
projects, and for other specified purposes, including the payment of
any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period
ending June 30, 2015.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the funding levels
specified in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-MCC-2, as developed
February 28, 2014, represents a commitment to provide appropriations to
the agencies, programs, and activities at the amounts identified
therein through fiscal year 2026.

2013-2015 FISCAL BIENNIUM
TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES-OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,551,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,730,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,281,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,551,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation and (($5,055,000)) $4,730,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
chapter . . . (Senate Bill No.. . . (S-3211/14)) (transportation
revenue), Laws of 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM
K
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the connecting Washington
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
provide compensation for the expert review panels established in
chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6224), Laws of 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES-CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)

The department shall work with the office of financial management's
facilities oversight program to develop a revised predesign for a new
Olympic region facility, with an estimated total cost of no more than
forty million dollars. Priority must be given to accommodating the
maintenance and operations functions of the Olympic region. The
department must provide a copy of the revised predesign to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,856,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire connecting Washington account appropriation is
provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund,
project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-MCC-1 as
developed February 28, 2014, Program - Highway Improvements Program
(I). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project
appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed
subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603, chapter 306,
Laws of 2013 and section 501 of this act.
(2) The connecting Washington account--state appropriation includes
up to $203,567,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
chapter . . . (Senate Bill No.. . .)(S-3212/14)), Laws of 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,497,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,497,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account) and
connecting Washington account appropriations in this section are
provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP
Transportation Document 2014-MCC-1 as developed February 28, 2014,
Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).
(2) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes up to $50,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL--PROGRAM Y
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,200,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP
Transportation Document 2014-MCC-1 as developed February 28, 2014,
Program – Rail Capital Program (Y).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,246,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP
Transportation Document 2014-MCC-1 as developed February 28, 2014,
Program - Local Programs (Z).

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND
DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,000
Highway Bond Retirement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,287,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to 2013 c 306
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Connecting Washington Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS
Sec. 501 2013 c 306 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FUND TRANSFERS
(1) The transportation 2003 projects or improvements and the 2005
transportation partnership projects or improvements are listed in the
LEAP list titled 2013-1 as developed April 23, 2013, which consists of
a list of specific projects by fund source and amount over a ten-year
period. The connecting Washington projects or improvements are listed
in LEAP Transportation Document 2014-MCC-1 as developed February 28,
2014, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source and
amount over a twelve-year period. Current fiscal biennium funding for
each project is a line-item appropriation, while the outer year funding
allocations represent a ten-year plan. The department is expected to
use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in the delivery
and completion of all transportation partnership account ((and)),
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), and connecting Washington
account projects on the LEAP transportation documents referenced in
this act. However, this section does not apply to the I- 5/Columbia
River Crossing project (400506A). For the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015
project appropriations, unless otherwise provided in this act, the
director of financial management may authorize a transfer of
appropriation authority between projects funded with transportation
2003 account (nickel account) appropriations, ((or)) transportation
partnership account appropriations, or connecting Washington account
appropriations, in order to manage project spending and efficiently
deliver all projects in the respective program under the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source
referenced on the respective project list;
(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the
reduction of the scope of a project or be made to support increases in
the scope of a project;
(c) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director
of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder
the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature. Until
the legislature reconvenes to consider the 2014 supplemental omnibus
transportation appropriations act, any unexpended 2011-2013
appropriation balance as approved by the office of financial
management, in consultation with the legislative staff of the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees, may be considered
when transferring funds between projects;
(d) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated
to the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the
project;
(e) Transfers may not occur for projects not identified on the
applicable project list;
(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session;
and
(g) Transfers between projects may be made, without the approval of
the director of the office of financial management, by the department
of transportation until the transfer amount by project exceeds two
hundred fifty thousand dollars, or ten percent of the total project,
whichever is less. These transfers must be reported quarterly to the
director of financial management and the chairs of the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees.
(2) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds
under this section, a copy of the request must be submitted to the
transportation committees of the legislature.
(3) The office of financial management shall work with legislative
staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees to review the requested transfers in a timely manner.
(4) The office of financial management shall document approved
transfers and schedule changes in the transportation executive
information system, compare changes to the legislative baseline funding
and schedules identified by project identification number identified in
the LEAP transportation documents referenced in this act, and transmit
revised project lists to chairs of the transportation committees of the
legislature on a quarterly basis.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 This act takes effect if chapter . . .
(Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1129), Laws of 2014 (ferry
vessel replacement), chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1902), Laws of 2014 (trailer license plates), chapter . . .
(Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785), Laws of 2014
(license plate replacement), and chapter . . . (Senate Bill No.. . .
(S-3211/14)), Laws of 2014 are each enacted by June 30, 2014.

INDEX PAGE #

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
RAIL--PROGRAM Y . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
FUND TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
--- END ---