BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature of the state of Washington
is based upon the concept of a citizen-legislator, with an expectation
that its members engage in private activities and occupations at the
discretion and control of those members. Legislators are thus allowed
and encouraged to have nonlegislative occupations, earnings, and
experiences, bringing the knowledge from those activities into the
legislative process for the benefit of other legislators and the
citizens. This expectation is reflected in the limited time periods
provided for the conduct of legislative sessions, alternating annual
sessions of sixty and one hundred five days.
By contrast, statewide elected officials are provided
constitutional and statutory duties that may require action at
different times during the full course of a calendar year. These
duties vary widely between statewide elected officials. Consistent
with the purposes and constitutional duties of their offices, such
officials should be able to engage in nonpartisan activities that
benefit the citizens of the state, without risking adverse legal and
political consequences arising from technical conflicts with otherwise
appropriate ethical limitations. The legislature finds that the
ethical distinction between official and unofficial activities can
under certain circumstances produce an unfair result that is not in the
best interests of the people of the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.010 and 2011 c 60 s 28 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative,
executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes
all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of
higher education created and supported by the state government, and
those courts that are parts of state government.
(2) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way
as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide
assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help,
aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist
such person.
(3) "Beneficial interest" has the meaning ascribed to it under the
Washington case law. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund
or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management
powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in
which the fund or pool invests.
(4) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however
designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be
paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of,
personal services to any person.
(5) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information,
rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general
public on request or (b) information made confidential by law.
(6) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or more
persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular
thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an
employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a
sales agreement.
(7) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct, the
legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.
(8) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in RCW
42.17A.005.
(9) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no
consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:
(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond
a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to
gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an
officer or employee;
(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are
customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official
duties;
(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event
hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;
(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in
this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging,
and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after
the event;
(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to
accept;
(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel
expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs
sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional,
educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used
in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel,
lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the
day after the event;
(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days
of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within thirty days
of receipt;
(h) Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17A RCW;
(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee
group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and
(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in
recognition of academic or scientific achievement.
(10) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an
agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board,
committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person,
agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency
employees and regulate their conduct.
(11) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a state
officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar
item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state
employee's official role.
(12) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific scope
of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the
officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.
The official duties of a statewide elected official include, but are
not limited to, all activities prescribed in the state Constitution and
state statutes, legislatively funded or mandated authority and
responsibilities, job description, and any nonpartisan tasks conducted
by the statewide elected official in his or her official capacity that
are intended to protect, promote, educate, or serve the citizens of the
state of Washington.
(13) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a
proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state
employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the
rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include
preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the
performance of legislative duties.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not
operated for profit.
(15) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission,
department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial
branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue
permits or licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified
persons.
(16) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction involving
the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority,
whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through
subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct
state action in respect of such transaction.
(17) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency,
including, but not limited to:
(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and
(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction,
sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with
respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.
(18) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by an
agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this
chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or
state employees.
(19) "State officer" means every person holding a position of
public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office
of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court,
judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members
of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of elective
offices in the executive branch of state government, chief executive
officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions, or
committees with authority over one or more state agencies or
institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in
supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes
of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or
undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.
(20) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary
meaning, includes:
(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other
chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a
right to compensation;
(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of
the option; and
(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or
procurement.
(21)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a proceeding,
application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination,
contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the state officer,
state employee, or former state officer or state employee in question
believes, or has reason to believe:
(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or
(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or
(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial
proprietary interest.
(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the
following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation,
including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of
legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case,
lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not
participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is
the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.
(22) "University" includes "state universities" and "regional
universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes any
research or technology institute affiliated with a university,
including without limitation, the Spokane intercollegiate research and
technology institute and the Washington technology center.
(23) "University research employee" means a state officer or state
employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the state
officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology transfer,
approved consulting activities related to research and technology
transfer, or other incidental activities.

--- END ---