BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state of Washington has a long
history of leading in efforts to protect our natural environment while
encouraging economic opportunities. Public safety, protection of the
natural environment, and economic opportunities are goals shared by all
Washingtonians.
(2) Liquid bulk crude oil spill prevention and response programs in
Washington state, created through thoughtful cooperation and
coordination between industry and the communities they serve, is a
model to the rest of the nation and a model to the world. As modes of
transport for various types of liquid bulk crude oil change and as the
volume of liquid bulk crude oil transported through Washington changes,
it is important that proactive steps are taken to ensure public safety
and protection of natural resources.
(3) This act is intended to build upon strong and prudent plans
currently in effect, identify areas that need further protections, and
invest taxpayer funds today to increase safety and prevent spills.
(4) Prevention of crude oil spills is a top priority of the
legislature. Providing first responders, local communities, and
impacted parties with the tools to respond when spills do occur is in
the vital interest of the citizens of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of ecology, in
consultation with the utilities and transportation commission, the
federal railroad administration, and industry representatives, shall
conduct a study on the safety of transporting crude oil in liquid bulk
form by rail. The study must include:
(a) A review of:
(i) The federal, state, and local emergency response and prevention
programs and activities for spills from tank cars transporting liquid
bulk crude oil with a focus on high hazard areas where emergency
response equipment can be strategically placed for use by federal,
state, regional, or local governments or other emergency responders;
(ii) The capacity of local jurisdictions to prevent and respond to
liquid bulk crude oil spills;
(iii) The identification of weaknesses or gaps in federal, state,
and local liquid bulk crude oil spill prevention and response; and
(iv) Federal regulations governing liquid bulk crude oil spill
prevention and response for transport by rail;
(b) A survey of:
(i) Local government funding for emergency liquid bulk crude oil
spill prevention and response programs;
(ii) Sources of funding, entities assessed, or contributions
required by participants of emergency liquid bulk crude oil spill
prevention and response programs; and
(iii) Regional or countywide cooperative agreements implementing
liquid bulk crude oil spill prevention and response programs;
(c) Recommendations for legislative consideration on the following:
(i) Levels of funding and sources of funding for emergency liquid
bulk crude oil spill prevention and response programs;
(ii) Participants that should be included in an emergency liquid
bulk crude oil spill prevention and response program and the amount
these participants should be assessed;
(iii) Appropriate use of funds such as: Liquid bulk crude oil
spill response, equipment, training, or other benefits to those who are
assessed;
(iv) Cooperative regional or countywide agreements to meet
emergency liquid bulk crude oil spill prevention and response program
needs, while maintaining an individual organization's distinct purpose;
and
(v) Methods to increase cooperation and coordination among
organizations responding to liquid bulk crude oil spills, including:
(A) Sharing resources or mutual aide between terrestrial and on-water liquid bulk crude oil spill emergencies; and
(B) Communication to ensure a common understanding of the potential
threat from liquid bulk crude oil spills; and
(d) A report on the status and progress of federal rule making for
tank car safety requirements including model, age, modifications, and
upgrades.
(2) The department of ecology must provide: (a) A preliminary
evaluation on the status of the safety of transporting liquid bulk
crude oil by rail in the state and include recommendations for near-term legislative action to address needs identified in the review as
required under subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section, to the relevant
policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
by December 31, 2014; and (b) using the study and reviews conducted
under this section, a final report regarding the safety of the
transport of liquid bulk crude oil by rail, as well as recommendations
for policy, budget needs, or legislation to the relevant policy and
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of ecology shall provide an
analysis on the safety of transporting liquid bulk crude oil on waters
of the state.
(1) The analysis must include:
(a) The capacity to address risks posed by liquid bulk crude oil;
(b) Weaknesses or gaps in liquid bulk crude oil spill prevention
and response programs, including identification of programs that are
not complete or need to be more robust, with a focus on Grays Harbor
and the Columbia river; and
(c) Barge and tug operations within the state related to the
movement of liquid bulk crude oil; and
(d) A status report on the federal, state, and local waterborne
liquid bulk crude oil spill prevention and preparedness.
(2) The department of ecology must provide to the relevant policy
and fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31, 2014, a status report on waterborne liquid bulk crude oil
spill prevention and preparedness; recommendations for Grays Harbor and
the Columbia river crude oil spill prevention and preparedness; an
analysis of barge and tug liquid bulk crude oil operations; and safety
gaps or weaknesses in liquid bulk crude oil spill prevention and
response programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must provide to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives:
(a) A review of all state and federal geographic response plans as
needed in contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.210 and 88.46.060
by December 31, 2014; and
(b) Annual updates, beginning December 31, 2015, and ending
December 31, 2021, as required under RCW 43.01.036, as to the progress
made in completing state and federal geographic response plans as
needed in contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.060, 90.56.210,
and 88.46.060.
(2) The department must contract, if practicable, with eligible
independent third parties to ensure completion by December 1, 2016, of
at least fifty percent of the geographic response plans as needed in
contingency plans required under RCW 90.56.210 and 88.46.060 for the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner or operator for each facility other than a
transmission pipeline shall submit to the department data and
information on the volume and type of crude oil that arrived at and
departed from the facility each month, including the state, province,
or country of origin of the crude oil, the mode of arrival and
departure at the facility including, but not limited to, arrival by
vessel, rail, or pipeline.
(2)(a) Any person required to present information to the department
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may request that specific
information be held in confidence. Information requested to be held in
confidence is presumed to be confidential.
(b) Information presented to the department pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section must be held in confidence by the department or
aggregated to the extent necessary to ensure confidentiality if public
disclosure of the specific information or data would result in an
unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the
information.
(c)(i) Whenever the department receives a request to publicly
disclose unaggregated information or otherwise proposes to publicly
disclose information submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, notice of the request or proposal must be provided to the
person submitting the information. The notice must indicate the form
in which the information is to be released. Upon receipt of notice,
the person submitting the information has ten working days in which to
respond to the notice to justify the claim of confidentiality on each
specific item of information covered by the notice on the basis that
public disclosure of the specific information would result in an unfair
competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information.
(ii) The department shall consider the respondent's submittal in
determining whether to publicly disclose the information submitted to
it to which a claim of confidentiality is made. The department shall
issue a written decision that sets forth its reasons for making the
determination whether each item of information for which a claim of
confidentiality is made remains confidential or must be publicly
disclosed.
(iii) The department shall not publicly disclose information
submitted to it pursuant to subsection (1) of this section within ten
working days after the department has issued its written decision
required in (c)(ii) of this subsection.
(iv) No information submitted to the department pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section may be deemed confidential if the person
submitting the information or data has made it public.
(v) With respect to information provided under subsection (1) of
this section, neither the department nor any employee of the department
may do any of the following:
(A) Use the information for any purpose other than the statistical
purposes for which it is supplied;
(B) Make any publication whereby the information furnished by any
particular establishment or individual can be identified; or
(C) Permit anyone other than department employees to examine the
individual reports provided under subsection (1) of this section.
(d) Any confidential information pertinent to the responsibilities
of the department that is obtained by another state agency must be
available to the department and must be treated in a confidential
manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of ecology and the utilities
and transportation commission shall jointly hold a symposium on
emergency prevention and response activities for liquid bulk crude oil
transported in the Pacific Northwest region. The department of ecology
and the utilities and transportation commission must invite state
representatives from the Pacific Northwest economic region authorized
under chapter 43.147 RCW and representatives from affected tribes,
local governments, the United States government, provinces, Canada, and
other appropriate stakeholders. The symposium must at a minimum
address:
(1) Cooperative emergency prevention and response activities
between the shared international and state borders;
(2) Expected risks posed by increased transport of Canadian crude
oil or liquid bulk crude oil throughout the Pacific Northwest region
within the next three to five years;
(3) Changes in methods for transporting liquid bulk crude oil and
associated risks;
(4) Identification of responsible agencies and corresponding
activities that can be taken to address expected risks; and
(5) Consideration of new or emerging technologies to make transport
of Canadian crude oil or liquid bulk crude oil safer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department of ecology shall provide
grants to emergency responders to assist with oil spill response and
firefighting equipment and resources needed to meet the requirements of
this act.
(2) The department of ecology, in consultation with emergency first
responders, representatives from oil and rail industries, and
businesses that are recipients of liquid bulk crude oil shall review
grant applications.
(a) The application review must include an evaluation of equipment
and resource requests, funding requirements, and coordination with
existing equipment and resources in the area.
(b) Funding must be prioritized for applicants from areas where
liquid bulk crude oil is transferred from one mode of transportation to
another.
(c) Grants must be coordinated to maximize currently existing
equipment and resources that have been put in place by first responders
and industry.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.23B.010 and 1992 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Barrel" means a unit of measurement of volume equal to forty-two United States gallons of crude oil or petroleum product.
(2) "Bulk oil terminal" means a facility of any kind, other than a
waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil from a tank
car.
(3) "Crude oil" means any naturally occurring liquid hydrocarbons
at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the earth,
including condensate and natural gasoline.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((4))) (5) "Marine terminal" means a facility of any kind, other
than a waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil or
petroleum products to or from a waterborne vessel or barge.
(((5))) (6) "Navigable waters" means those waters of the state and
their adjoining shorelines that are subject to the ebb and flow of the
tide, including the Columbia and Snake rivers.
(((6))) (7) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(((7))) (8) "Petroleum product" means any liquid hydrocarbons at
atmospheric temperature and pressure that are the product of the
fractionation, distillation, or other refining or processing of crude
oil, and that are used as, useable as, or may be refined as a fuel or
fuel blendstock, including but not limited to, gasoline, diesel fuel,
aviation fuel, bunker fuel, and fuels containing a blend of alcohol and
petroleum.
(((8))) (9) "Tank car" means a rail car, the body of which consists
of a tank for transporting liquids.
(10) "Taxpayer" means the person owning crude oil or petroleum
products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks
of a marine or bulk oil terminal in this state ((from a waterborne
vessel or barge)) and who is liable for the taxes imposed by this
chapter.
(((9))) (11) "Waterborne vessel or barge" means any ship, barge, or
other watercraft capable of travelling on the navigable waters of this
state and capable of transporting any crude oil or petroleum product in
quantities of ten thousand gallons or more for purposes other than
providing fuel for its motor or engine.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.23B.020 and 2006 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal
within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the
navigable waters of this state; and (b) crude oil at a bulk oil
terminal within this state from a tank car. The tax imposed in this
section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products
immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a
marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car or waterborne vessel or
barge at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude oil or petroleum
product received.
(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal
within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the
navigable waters of this state; and (b) crude oil at a bulk oil
terminal within this state from a tank car. The tax imposed in this
section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products
immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a
marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car or waterborne vessel or
barge at the rate of four cents per barrel of crude oil or petroleum
product.
(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter ((shall)) must be collected
by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any
person charged with collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for
the taxes, or in the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in
writing of the ((imposition of the)) taxes imposed, or having collected
the taxes, fails to pay them to the department in the manner prescribed
by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the person's own
acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control,
he or she ((shall)), nevertheless, ((be)) is personally liable to the
state for the amount of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner
to a marine or bulk oil terminal operator ((shall)) must relieve the
owner from further liability for the taxes.
(4) Taxes collected under this chapter ((shall)) must be held in
trust until paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes
who appropriates or converts the taxes collected ((shall be)) is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required
by this chapter to be collected ((shall)) must be stated separately
from other charges made by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator in
any invoice or other statement of account provided to the taxpayer.
(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to
the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged
with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the taxes.
(6) The taxes ((shall be)) are due from the marine or bulk oil
terminal operator, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed
by the department, within twenty-five days after the end of the month
in which the taxable activity occurs.
(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine
or bulk oil terminal operator or to the department, ((shall))
constitute a debt from the taxpayer to the marine or bulk oil terminal
operator. Any person required to collect the taxes under this chapter
who, with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter, fails or
refuses to do so as required and any taxpayer who refuses to pay any
taxes due under this chapter((, shall be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor
as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the
taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The
department ((shall)) must give its approval for direct payment under
this section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that
direct payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed
under this chapter. The department ((shall)) must provide by rule for
the issuance of a direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying
for direct payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct
payment certificate by a terminal operator ((shall)) must relieve the
marine or bulk oil terminal operator from any liability for the
collection or payment of the taxes imposed under this chapter.
(9) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section ((shall)) must be deposited into the state oil spill response
account. All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this
section shall be deposited into the oil spill prevention account.
(10) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter,
the office of financial management ((shall)) must determine the balance
of the oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar
quarter. Balance determinations by the office of financial management
under this section are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge
the validity of any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of
financial management ((shall)) must promptly notify the departments of
revenue and ecology of the account balance once a determination is
made. For each subsequent calendar quarter, the tax imposed by
subsection (1) of this section shall be imposed during the entire
calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly
balance is more than nine million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during
the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent
quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.23B.030 and 1992 c 73 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) only apply to the
first receipt of crude oil or petroleum products at a marine or bulk
oil terminal in this state and not to the later transporting and
subsequent receipt of the same oil or petroleum product, whether in the
form originally received at a marine or bulk oil terminal in this state
or after refining or other processing.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.23B.040 and 1992 c 73 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Credit ((shall)) must be allowed against the taxes imposed under
this chapter for any crude oil or petroleum products received at a
marine or bulk oil terminal and subsequently exported from or sold for
export from the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act may be known and cited as the
spill prevention and response act.

--- END ---