BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that maintaining a
healthy collegiate sports rivalry is a necessary component in fostering
school spirit and institutional pride. The legislature further finds
that no rivalry in college sports history is as exciting and
competitive as the battles between our state's two premier basketball
teams, the Gonzaga University Bulldogs and the University of Washington
Huskies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2014-15 academic year, the intercollegiate
basketball teams of the University of Washington and Gonzaga University
must compete against each other in a nonconference, regular season
basketball game.

--- END ---