BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW to read as follows:

Any county-operated water bank that leases water rights to offer for mitigation must replace the leased water rights with water rights that will be permanently available for mitigation prior to the expiration of the lease.

--- END ---