BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that outdoor burning of organic waste created as a result of pruning at commercial berry growing operations is a necessary and expeditious method of pest and disease control. Therefore, the legislature finds that outdoor burning of organic waste derived from pruning by commercial berry growers must be allowed as provided in this act.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.94.6514 and 2009 c 118 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consistent with the policy of the state to reduce outdoor burning to the greatest extent practical, outdoor burning shall not be allowed in:

(a) Any area of the state where federal or state ambient air quality standards are exceeded for pollutants emitted by outdoor burning; or

(b) Any urban growth area as defined by RCW 36.70A.030, or any city of the state having a population greater than ten thousand people if such cities are threatened to exceed state or federal air quality standards, and alternative disposal practices consistent with good solid waste management are reasonably available or practices eliminating production of organic refuse are reasonably available.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, outdoor burning may be allowed for the exclusive purpose of managing storm or flood-related debris. The decision to allow burning shall be made by the entity with permitting jurisdiction as determined under RCW 70.94.6534 or 70.94.6518. If outdoor burning is allowed in areas subject to subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, a permit shall be required, and a fee may be collected to cover the expenses of administering and enforcing the permit. All conditions and restrictions pursuant to RCW 70.94.6526(1) and 70.94.6512 apply to outdoor burning allowed under this section.

(3)(a) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and customary to ongoing agricultural activities, that is consistent with agricultural burning authorized under RCW 70.94.6528 and 70.94.6532, is allowed within the urban growth area in accordance with RCW 70.94.6528(8)(a).

(b) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees shall be allowed as an ongoing agricultural activity under this section in accordance with RCW 70.94.6528(8)(b).

(c) Outdoor burning of organic waste derived from pruning by commercial berry growers shall be allowed as an ongoing agricultural activity under this section in accordance with RCW 70.94.6528(8)(c).

(4) This section shall not apply to silvicultural burning used to improve or maintain fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants or animals within state, federal, and private natural area preserves, natural resource conservation areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.94.6524 and 2009 c 118 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be the responsibility and duty of the department of natural resources, department of ecology, department of agriculture, fire districts, and local air pollution control authorities to establish, through regulations, ordinances, or policy, a limited burning permit program.

(2) The permit program shall apply to residential and land clearing burning in the following areas:

(a) In the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated population of greater than fifty thousand; and

(b) In any city and urban growth area that is not otherwise prohibited from burning pursuant to RCW 70.94.6514.

(3) The permit program shall apply only to land clearing burning in the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated population of less than fifty thousand.

(4) The permit program may be limited to a general permit by rule, or by verbal, written, or electronic approval by the permitting entity.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, neither a permit nor the payment of a fee shall be required for outdoor burning for the purpose of disposal of tumbleweeds blown by wind. Such burning shall not be conducted during an air pollution episode or any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715. This subsection (5) shall only apply within counties with a population less than two hundred fifty thousand.

(6) Burning shall be prohibited in an area when an alternate technology or method of disposing of the organic refuse is available, reasonably economical, and less harmful to the environment. It is the policy of this state to foster and encourage development of alternate methods or technology for disposing of or reducing the amount of organic refuse.

(7) Incidental agricultural burning must be allowed without applying for any permit and without the payment of any fee if:

(a) The burning is incidental to commercial agricultural activities;

(b) The operator notifies the local fire department within the area where the burning is to be conducted;

(c) The burning does not occur during an air pollution episode or any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715; and

(d) Only the following items are burned:

(i) Orchard prunings;

(ii) Organic debris along fence lines or irrigation or drainage ditches; ((or))

(iii) Organic debris blown by wind; or

(iv) Organic waste derived from pruning by commercial berry growers.

(8) As used in this section, "nonurban areas" are unincorporated areas within a county that are not designated as urban growth areas under chapter 36.70A RCW.

(9) Nothing in this section shall require fire districts to enforce air quality requirements related to outdoor burning, unless the fire district enters into an agreement with the department of ecology, department of natural resources, a local air pollution control authority, or other appropriate entity to provide such enforcement.

Sec. 4. RCW 70.94.6528 and 2010 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who proposes to set fires in the course of agricultural activities shall obtain a permit from an air pollution control authority, the department of ecology, or a local entity delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.6530. General permit criteria of statewide applicability shall be established by the department, by rule, after consultation with the various air pollution control authorities.

(a) Permits shall be issued under this section based on seasonal operations or by individual operations, or both.

(b) Incidental agricultural burning consistent with provisions established in RCW 70.94.6524 is allowed without applying for any permit and without the payment of any fee.

(2) The department of ecology, local air authorities, or a local entity with delegated permit authority shall:

(a) Condition all permits to ensure that the public interest in air, water, and land pollution and safety to life and property is fully considered;

(b) Condition all burning permits to minimize air pollution insofar as practical;

(c) Act upon, within seven days from the date an application is filed under this section, an application for a permit to set fires in the course of agricultural burning for controlling diseases, insects, weed abatement, or development of physiological conditions conducive to increased crop yield;

(d) Provide convenient methods for issuance and oversight of agricultural burning permits; and

(e) Work, through agreement, with counties and cities to provide convenient methods for granting permission for agricultural burning, including telephone, facsimile transmission, issuance from local city or county offices, or other methods.

(3) A local air authority administering the permit program under subsection (2) of this section shall not limit the number of days of allowable agricultural burning, but may consider the time of year, meteorological conditions, and other criteria specified in rules adopted by the department to implement subsection (2) of this section.

(4) In addition to following any other requirements established by the department to protect air quality pursuant to other laws, applicants for permits must show that the setting of fires as requested is the most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding life or property under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably necessary to successfully carry out the enterprise in which the applicant is engaged, or both. Nothing in this section relieves the applicant from obtaining permits, licenses, or other approvals required by any other law.

(5) The department of ecology, the appropriate local air authority, or a local entity with delegated permitting authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.6530 at the time the permit is issued shall assess and collect permit fees for burning under this section. All fees collected shall be deposited in the air pollution control account created in RCW 70.94.015, except for that portion of the fee necessary to cover local costs of administering a permit issued under this section. Fees shall be set by rule by the permitting agency at the level determined by the task force created by subsection (6) of this section, but fees for field burning shall not exceed three dollars and seventy-five cents per acre to be burned, or in the case of pile burning shall not exceed one dollar per ton of material burned.

(6) An agricultural burning practices and research task force shall be established under the direction of the department. The task force shall be composed of a representative from the department who shall serve as chair; one representative of eastern Washington local air authorities; three representatives of the agricultural community from different agricultural pursuits; one representative of the department of agriculture; two representatives from universities or colleges knowledgeable in agricultural issues; one representative of the public health or medical community; and one representative of the conservation districts. The task force shall:

(a) Identify best management practices for reducing air contaminant emissions from agricultural activities and provide such information to the department and local air authorities;

(b) Determine the level of fees to be assessed by the permitting agency pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, based upon the level necessary to cover the costs of administering and enforcing the permit programs, to provide funds for research into alternative methods to reduce emissions from such burning, and to the extent possible be consistent with fees charged for such burning permits in neighboring states. The fee level shall provide, to the extent possible, for lesser fees for permittees who use best management practices to minimize air contaminant emissions;

(c) Identify research needs related to minimizing emissions from agricultural burning and alternatives to such burning; and

(d) Make recommendations to the department on priorities for spending funds provided through this chapter for research into alternative methods to reduce emissions from agricultural burning.

(7) Conservation districts and the Washington State University agricultural extension program in conjunction with the department shall develop public education material for the agricultural community identifying the health and environmental effects of agricultural outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in alternatives to agricultural outdoor burning.

(8)(a) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and customary to ongoing agricultural activities, that is consistent with agricultural burning authorized under this section and RCW 70.94.6532, is allowed within the urban growth area as described in RCW 70.94.6514 if the burning is not conducted during air quality episodes, or where a determination of impaired air quality has been made as provided in RCW 70.94.473, and the agricultural activities preceded the designation as an urban growth area.

(b) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees, whether or not agricultural crops will be replanted on the land, shall be allowed as an ongoing agricultural activity under this section if a local horticultural pest and disease board formed under chapter 15.09 RCW, an extension office agent with Washington State University that has horticultural experience, or an entomologist employed by the department of agriculture, has determined in writing that burning is an appropriate method to prevent or control the spread of horticultural pests or diseases.

(c) Outdoor burning of organic waste derived from pruning by commercial berry growers, whether or not agricultural crops will be replanted on the land, shall be allowed as an ongoing agricultural activity under this section.

--- END ---