BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 59.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful detainer when he or she occupies real property with the prior consent of the owner but without a denominated rental amount or designated period of tenancy on an at-will basis, and he or she fails to remove from the premises after twenty days' notice in writing served upon him or her in the manner provided by RCW 59.12.040.

(2) This section does not apply to housing for agricultural employees while provided in conjunction with such employment.

(3) RCW 59.12.090, 59.12.100, and 59.12.170 do not apply to any at-will tenant under this section. RCW 59.18.055, 59.18.370, and 59.18.380 through 59.18.410 apply to any action of forcible entry or detainer or unlawful detainer arising from an at-will tenant under this section.

--- END ---