BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.113 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission consists of eight members of African-American origin. The two largest caucuses in the senate and the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives shall each appoint two members. The commissioners shall appoint cochairs from among themselves and no cochair may have been appointed to the commission by a caucus of the same political party as the other cochair. To the extent practicable, appointments to the commission must be made to achieve a balanced representation based on African-American population distribution within the state, geographic considerations, sex, age, and occupation.

(2) Members serve three year terms. In the case of a vacancy, appointment is for the remainder of the unexpired term and must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. No member may serve more than two full consecutive terms.

(3) Members must be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Five members of the commission constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.113.010 and 1992 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state commission on African-American affairs is created. The commission shall be administered by an executive director, who shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the ((governor)) commission. The ((governor)) commission shall set the salary of the executive director, within the limits established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028. The executive director shall employ the staff of the commission.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.113.030 and 1992 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) Examine and define issues pertaining to the rights and needs of African-Americans, and make recommendations to the governor and state agencies for changes in programs and laws.

(2) Advise the governor and state agencies on the development and implementation of policies, plans, and programs that relate to the special needs of African-Americans.

(3) ((Acting in concert with the governor,)) Advise the legislature on issues of concern to the African-American community.

(4) Establish relationships with state agencies, local governments, and private sector organizations that promote equal opportunity and benefits for African-Americans.

(5) Receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources that are made for the use or benefit of the commission and expend, without appropriation, the same or any income from the gifts, grants, or endowments according to their terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 43.115 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission consists of eight members of Hispanic origin. The two largest caucuses in the senate and the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives shall each appoint two members. The commissioners shall appoint cochairs from among themselves and no cochair may have been appointed to the commission by a caucus of the same political party. To the extent practicable, appointments to the commission must be made to achieve a balanced representation based on the Hispanic population distribution within the state, geographic considerations, sex, age, and occupation.

(2) Members serve three year terms. In the case of a vacancy, appointment is for the remainder of the unexpired term and must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. No member may serve more than two full consecutive terms.

(3) Members must be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Five members of the commission constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.115.045 and 1993 c 261 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall be administered by an executive director, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the ((governor)) commission. ((The governor shall base the appointment of the executive director on recommendations of the commission.)) The salary of the executive director shall be set by the ((governor)) commission, within the limits established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028.

(2) The executive director shall employ a staff, who shall be state employees pursuant to Title 41 RCW. The executive director shall prescribe the duties of the staff as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 43.117 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission consists of eight members of Asian Pacific American origin. The two largest caucuses in the senate and the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives shall each appoint two members. The commissioners shall appoint cochairs from among themselves and no cochair may have been appointed to the commission by a caucus of the same political party as the other cochair. To the extent practicable, appointments to the commission must be made to achieve a balanced representation based on the Asian-ethnic population distribution within the state, geographic considerations, sex, age, and occupation.

(2) Members serve three year terms. In the case of a vacancy, appointment is for the remainder of the unexpired term and must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. No member may serve more than two full consecutive terms.

(3) Members must be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Five members of the commission constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 43.117 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission is administered by an executive director, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the commission. The salary of the executive director shall be set by the commission, within the limits established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028.

(2) The executive director shall employ a staff, who are state employees pursuant to Title 41 RCW. The executive director shall prescribe the duties of the staff as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 8. RCW 43.117.050 and 2009 c 549 s 5172 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall:

(1) ((Elect one of its members to serve as chair; and also such other officers as necessary to form an executive committee;

(2))) Adopt rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(((3))) (2) Meet at the call of the ((chair)) cochairs or the call of a majority of its members, but in no case less often than once during any three month period;

(((4))) (3) Be authorized to appoint such citizen task force as it deems appropriate.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.117.070 and 2007 c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall examine and define issues pertaining to the rights and needs of Asian Pacific Americans, and make recommendations to the governor and state agencies with respect to desirable changes in program and law.

(2) The commission shall advise such state government agencies on the development and implementation of comprehensive and coordinated policies, plans, and programs focusing on the special problems and needs of Asian Pacific Americans.

(3) The commission shall advise the legislature on issues of concern to the Asian Pacific American community.

(4) The commission shall coordinate and assist with statewide celebrations during the fourth week of Asian Pacific American Heritage Month that recognize the contributions to the state by Asian Pacific Americans in the arts, sciences, commerce, and education.

(((4))) (5) The commission shall coordinate and assist educational institutions, public entities, and private organizations with celebrations of Korean-American day that recognize the contributions to the state by Korean-Americans in the arts, sciences, commerce, and education.

(((5))) (6) Each state department and agency shall provide appropriate and reasonable assistance to the commission as needed in order that the commission may carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.113.020 (Membership—Terms—Vacancies—Quorum—Expenses) and 1992 c 96 s 3;

(2) RCW 43.115.030 (Membership—Terms—Vacancies—Travel expenses—Quorum) and 1993 c 261 s 2, 1987 c 249 s 3, 1981 c 338 s 15, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 130, & 1971 ex.s. c 34 s 3;

(3) RCW 43.117.040 (Membership—Terms—Vacancies—Travel expenses—Quorum—Executive director) and 2009 c 549 s 5171, 1982 c 68 s 1, 1981 c 338 s 16, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 131, & 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 4;

(4) RCW 43.117.060 (Staff) and 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 6;

(5) RCW 43.131.341 (Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs—Termination) and 1993 c 261 s 5 & 1987 c 249 s 8; and

(6) RCW 43.131.342 (Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs—Repeal) and 1993 c 261 s 6 & 1987 c 249 s 9.

--- END ---