BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.400 and 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions and having regard to the actual and potential hazards then existing. In every event speed shall be so controlled as may be necessary to avoid colliding with any person, vehicle or other conveyance on or entering the highway in compliance with legal requirements and the duty of all persons to use due care.

(2) Except when a special hazard exists that requires lower speed for compliance with subsection (1) of this section, the limits specified in this section or established as hereinafter authorized shall be maximum lawful speeds, and no person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed in excess of such maximum limits.

(a) Twenty-five miles per hour on city and town streets;

(b) Fifty miles per hour on county roads;

(c) Sixty miles per hour on state highways, except for Interstate 90, which must have a maximum limit of seventy-five miles per hour on the portions of the interstate from Ellensburg to mile post 120 and from mile post 150 near George to mile post 255 at the Spokane county border.

The maximum speed limits set forth in this section may be altered as authorized in RCW 46.61.405(1), 46.61.410, and 46.61.415.

(3) The driver of every vehicle shall, consistent with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, drive at an appropriate reduced speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railway grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hill crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway, and when special hazard exists with respect to pedestrians or other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.405 and 1987 c 397 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the secretary of transportation shall determine upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation that any maximum speed hereinbefore set forth is greater than is reasonable or safe with respect to a state highway under the conditions found to exist at any intersection or upon any other part of the state highway system or at state ferry terminals, or that a general reduction of any maximum speed set forth in RCW 46.61.400 is necessary in order to comply with a national maximum speed limit, the secretary may determine and declare a reasonable and safe lower maximum limit or a lower maximum limit which will comply with a national maximum speed limit, for any state highway, the entire state highway system, or any portion thereof, which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected. The secretary may also fix and regulate the speed of vehicles on any state highway within the maximum speed limit allowed by this chapter for special occasions including, but not limited to, local parades and other special events. Any such maximum speed limit may be declared to be effective at all times or at such times as are indicated upon the said signs; and differing limits may be established for different times of day, different types of vehicles, varying weather conditions, and other factors bearing on safe speeds, which shall be effective (a) (([(1)])) when posted upon appropriate fixed or variable signs or (b) (([(2)])) if a maximum limit is established for auto stages which is lower than the limit for automobiles, the auto stage speed limit shall become effective thirty days after written notice thereof is mailed in the manner provided in ((subsection (4) of)) RCW 46.61.410(4), as now or hereafter amended.

(2) This section does not apply to the seventy-five mile per hour speed limit for specific segments of Interstate 90 as provided in RCW 46.61.400(2)(c).

--- END ---