BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.112.060 and 2015 c 252 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The moneys appropriated for these statewide family medicine residency programs shall be in addition to all the income of the schools of medicine and shall not be used to supplant funds for other programs under the administration of the schools of medicine.

(2) The allocation of state funds for the residency programs shall not exceed fifty percent of the total cost of the program.

(3) No more than twenty-five percent of the appropriation for each fiscal year for the affiliated programs shall be authorized for expenditures made in support of the faculty and staff of the schools of medicine who are associated with the affiliated residency programs and are located at the schools of medicine.

(4) No funds for the purposes of this chapter shall be used to subsidize the cost of care incurred by patients.

(5) No more than ten percent of the state funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter may be used for administrative or overhead costs to administer the statewide family medicine residency programs.

(6) Residency programs receiving funds under this chapter must not require applicants who are United States citizens and graduated from the Escuela Latinoamericana de Medicina Cuban medical school to meet any application screening criteria additional to the application criteria required of graduates of United States and Canadian medical schools, except that the residency program may require that the medical graduate be certified by the educational commission for foreign medical graduates.

(7) The family medicine residency network at the University of Washington shall, in collaboration with the schools of medicine, administer the state funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---