BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.112.020 and 2015 c 252 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established a statewide medical education system for the purpose of training resident physicians in family medicine.

(2) The deans of the schools of medicine shall be responsible for implementing the development and expansion of residency programs in cooperation with the medical profession, hospitals, and clinics located throughout the state. The schools of medicine shall support development of high quality, accredited, affiliated residency programs, giving consideration to communities in the state where the population, hospital facilities, number of physicians, and interest in medical education indicate the potential success of the residency program and prioritizing support for health professional shortage areas in the state.

(3) The medical education system shall provide financial support for residents in training for those programs which are affiliated with the schools of medicine and shall establish positions for appropriate faculty to staff these programs.

(4) The schools of medicine shall coordinate with the office of student financial assistance to notify prospective family medicine students and residents of their eligibility for the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program under chapter 28B.115 RCW.

(5) The number of programs shall be determined by the advisory board and be in keeping with the needs of the state.

(6) In reviewing the development of new residency programs, the deans of the schools of medicine, the medical profession, hospitals, and clinics located throughout the state, in consultation with the advisory board, shall pursue opportunities to develop residency programs that would be enhanced by Spanish speaking residents who have graduated from either domestic or foreign medical schools.

--- END ---