BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.44.142 and 2015 c 261 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who is required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may petition the superior court to be relieved of the duty to register:

(a) If the person has a duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile, regardless of whether the conviction was in this state, as provided in RCW 9A.44.143;

(b) If the person is required to register for a conviction in this state and is not prohibited from petitioning for relief from registration under subsection (2) of this section, when the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period; or

(c) If the person is required to register for a federal, tribal, or out-of-state conviction, when the person has spent fifteen consecutive years in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense during that time period.

(2)(a) A person may not petition for relief from registration if the person has been:

(i) Determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW; or

(ii) Convicted as an adult of a sex offense or kidnapping offense that is a class A felony and that was committed with forcible compulsion on or after June 8, 2000.

(b) Any person who may not be relieved of the duty to register may petition the court to be exempted from any community notification requirements that the person may be subject to fifteen years after the later of the entry of the judgment and sentence or the last date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, pursuant to the conviction, if the person has spent the time in the community without being convicted of a disqualifying offense.

(3) A petition for relief from registration or exemption from notification under this section shall be made to the court in which the petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register or, in the case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal, tribal, or military court, to the court in the county where the person is registered at the time the petition is sought. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and served as the respondent in any such petition. The prosecuting attorney must make reasonable efforts to notify the victim via the victim's choice of telephone, letter, or email, if known.

(4)(a) The court may relieve a petitioner of the duty to register only if the petitioner shows by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(b) In determining whether the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the registry, the following factors are provided as guidance to assist the court in making its determination:

(i) The nature of the registrable offense committed including the number of victims and the length of the offense history;

(ii) Any subsequent criminal history;

(iii) The petitioner's compliance with supervision requirements;

(iv) The length of time since the charged incident(s) occurred;

(v) Any input from community corrections officers, law enforcement, or treatment providers;

(vi) Participation in sex offender treatment;

(vii) Participation in other treatment and rehabilitative programs;

(viii) The offender's stability in employment and housing;

(ix) The offender's community and personal support system;

(x) Any risk assessments or evaluations prepared by a qualified professional;

(xi) Any updated polygraph examination;

(xii) Any input of the victim;

(xiii) Any other factors the court may consider relevant.

(5) If a person is relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this section, the relief of registration does not constitute a certificate of rehabilitation, or the equivalent of a certificate of rehabilitation, for the purposes of restoration of firearm possession under RCW 9.41.040.

Sec. 2. RCW 9A.44.143 and 2015 c 261 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile, and who has not been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW may petition the superior court to be relieved of that duty as provided in this section.

(2) For class A sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed when the petitioner was fifteen years of age or older, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if:

(a) At least sixty months have passed since the petitioner's adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping offenses within the sixty months before the petition;

(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the sixty months prior to filing the petition; and

(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(3) For all other sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed by a juvenile not included in subsection (2) of this section, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if:

(a) At least twenty-four months have passed since the petitioner's adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping offenses within the twenty-four months before the petition;

(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the twenty-four months prior to filing the petition; and

(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(4) A petition for relief from registration under this section shall be made to the court in which the petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register or, in the case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court in the county in which the juvenile is registered at the time a petition is sought. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and served as the respondent in any such petition. The prosecuting attorney must make reasonable efforts to notify the victim via the victim's choice of telephone, letter, or email, if known.

(5) In determining whether the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders, the following factors are provided as guidance to assist the court in making its determination, to the extent the factors are applicable considering the age and circumstances of the petitioner:

(a) The nature of the registrable offense committed including the number of victims and the length of the offense history;

(b) Any subsequent criminal history;

(c) The petitioner's compliance with supervision requirements;

(d) The length of time since the charged incident(s) occurred;

(e) Any input from community corrections officers, juvenile parole or probation officers, law enforcement, or treatment providers;

(f) Participation in sex offender treatment;

(g) Participation in other treatment and rehabilitative programs;

(h) The offender's stability in employment and housing;

(i) The offender's community and personal support system;

(j) Any risk assessments or evaluations prepared by a qualified professional;

(k) Any updated polygraph examination;

(l) Any input of the victim;

(m) Any other factors the court may consider relevant.

(6) If a person is relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this section, the relief of registration does not constitute a certificate of rehabilitation, or the equivalent of a certificate of rehabilitation, for the purposes of restoration of firearm possession under RCW 9.41.040.

(7) A juvenile prosecuted and convicted of a sex offense or kidnapping offense as an adult pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or 13.04.030 may not petition to the superior court under this section and must follow the provisions of RCW 9A.44.142.

(8) An adult prosecuted for an offense committed as a juvenile once the juvenile court has lost jurisdiction due to the passage of time between the date of the offense and the date of filing of charges may petition the superior court under the provisions of this section.

--- END ---