BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All health care facilities shall include in the summary of the mammography report, required by federal law to be provided to a patient, information that identifies the patient's individual breast density classification based on the breast imaging reporting and data system established by the American College of Radiology. If a physician at, employed by, or under contract with, the health care facility determines that a patient has heterogeneously or extremely dense breasts, the summary of the mammography report must include the following notice:

"Your mammogram indicates that you may have dense breast tissue. Roughly half of all women have dense breast tissue which is normal. Dense breast tissue may make it more difficult to evaluate your mammogram and may be associated with an increased risk of breast cancer. We are sharing this information with you and your health care provider to help raise your awareness of breast density. We encourage you to talk with your health care provider about this and other breast cancer risk factors. Together, you can decide which screening options are right for you."

(2) Patients who receive diagnostic or screening mammograms may be directed to informative material about breast density. This informative material may include the American College of Radiology's most current brochure on the subject of breast density.

(3) This section does not create a duty of care for any health care facility or any health care providers or other legal obligation beyond the duty to provide notice as set forth in this section.

(4) This section does not require a notice that is inconsistent with the provisions of the federal mammography quality standards act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263b) or any regulations adopted under that act.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home, laboratory, office, or similar place where mammography examinations are performed.

(b) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(6) This section expires January 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

--- END ---