BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2019, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2018" or "FY 2018" means the period beginning July 1, 2017, and ending June 30, 2018.

(b) "Fiscal year 2019" or "FY 2019" means the period beginning July 1, 2018, and ending June 30, 2019.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2019-2021 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2017, from previous biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Division III Roof Replacement and Maintenance (30000003)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Spokane Court Facility Upgrade (92000001)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$66,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

WWRP and State Land Acquisition Study (92000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1001, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

(2) $235,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to the Spokane river forum. The department shall not execute a contract with the grant recipient unless the Spokane river forum is in receipt of all permits by March 1, 2018. If the terms and conditions of this subsection are not met by March 1, 2018, the funding provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,187,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$199,435,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$199,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Development Fund (20084850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,867,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (30000013)

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$129,895,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$129,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered by the department of commerce.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,447,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund (30000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$49,523,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program (30000103)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$17,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,896,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,024,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$16,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,630,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$38,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1041, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., provided that the "New Life Community Development Agency" project may be combined with the "New Life CDA" project in project number 30000188. If the department of commerce and the grantee have not executed a contract by September 1, 2018, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,691,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Grants (30000188)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1072, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., provided that the "New Life CDA" project may be combined with the "New Life Community Development Agency" project in project number 30000185. If the department of commerce and the grantee have not executed a contract by September 1, 2018, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,252,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000190)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1070, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$8,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2013-2015 Energy Efficiency Grants (30000193)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,322,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,538,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,540,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Program (30000731)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,027,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Program (30000792)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1030, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,969,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,386,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1031, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,502,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,859,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$59,701,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$62,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,299,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$83,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-2017 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$10,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,724,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Energy Efficiency Program (30000845)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1039, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,983,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,017,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Housing Improvement Program (30000863)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $71,800,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to award loans and grants on a competitive basis to affordable housing projects statewide for the following categories:

(a) 24 percent of this appropriation must benefit homeless people with chronic mental illness with low or no-barrier, case-managed housing, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose;

(b) 22 percent of this appropriation must benefit homeless families with children, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose;

(c) 10 percent of this appropriation must benefit homeless veterans, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose;

(d) 10 percent of this appropriation must benefit homeless youth, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose;

(e) 10 percent of this appropriation must benefit people with disabilities, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose;

(f) 10 percent of this appropriation must benefit homeownership, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose;

(g) 7 percent of this appropriation must benefit seniors, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose; and

(h) 7 percent of this appropriation must benefit farmworkers, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) If upon review of completed applications, the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

(4)(a) $1,572,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation and $8,428,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for housing preservation to be awarded competitively. The grants are for major building improvements, preservation and system replacements necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than 15 years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent annual median income.

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating and/or utilities costs; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(b) The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution.

(c) Funds shall not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property beyond that intended in making the appropriation.

(5) $2,772,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the HopeWorks social enterprises in Everett.

(6) $6,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing, and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a twenty-five year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting.

(7) $6,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: $3,000,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for Elliott Avenue Housing Community in Seattle.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,200,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$71,800,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$1,572,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$96,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$320,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$416,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants (30000873)

Appropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$6,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (30000875)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Cocoon House, Colby Avenue Youth Center. . . .$438,000

Boys and Girls Club of Chehalis. . . .$200,000

Lake Stevens Boys & Girls Club Teen Center Expansion. . . .$120,000

Teen Expansion at the Clinton & Gloria John Club. . . .$328,000

Arlington Boys & Girls Club Expansion. . . .$99,500

Port Angeles Boys & Girls Club. . . .$1,000,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of South Puget Sound,

Eastside Branch. . . .$1,200,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle, Kent YMCA. . . .$1,170,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle, Auburn Valley YMCA. . . .$762,500

YMCA of Greater Seattle, University YMCA. . . .$1,114,000

Friends of Lopez Island Pool. . . .$175,000

Spokane Valley HUB. . . .$300,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,907,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$27,628,000

TOTAL. . . .$34,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Infill and Affordable Housing Development Assistance (30000876)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $579,000 is provided solely to create a monitoring and assessment program to track affordable housing development trends statewide; and

(2) $1,030,000 is provided solely for a competitive grant program for local governments to implement infill and affordable housing strategies. The department of commerce will, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other federal, state, and local funds in the development of projects.

Appropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$1,609,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$835,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,444,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building for the Arts Grant Program (30000877)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Town Hall Association (Campaign for Town Hall). . . .$1,520,000

Pacific Northwest Ballet Association (Replacement

PNB School at the Francia Russell Center). . . .$1,520,000

Seattle Art Museum (Asian Art Museum Renovation). . . .$1,520,000

Chewelah PACA (Chewelah Center for the Arts). . . .$97,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle Opera at the Center). . . .$1,520,000

Tacoma Art Museum (Benaroya Building Project). . . .$1,020,000

Fort Worden Foundation (Sage Arts and

Education Building). . . .$1,270,000

Seattle Repertory Theatre (Renovating the PONCHO

Forum). . . .$258,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$36,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$44,725,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

180th St SE SR 527 Brook Blvd (Everett). . . .$3,000,000

35th Ave SE Phase II SR 524 to 180th St SE

(Everett). . . .$3,000,000

61st/190th Culvert Replacement & Embankment Repair

(Kenmore). . . .$1,500,000

Automated Meter Reading System (Birch Bay). . . .$1,500,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill North Flare Statn

Repair (Seattle). . . .$1,583,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill Pump Station Repairs

(Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

City Street Light Conversion to Light Emitting Diode

(Vancouver). . . .$4,816,000

Fairview Ave N Bridge Replacement (Seattle). . . .$10,000,000

Georgetown Wet Weather Treatment Station (Seattle). . . .$3,500,000

Isaacs Avenue Improvements - Phase 2 (Walla Walla). . . .$3,962,000

Kennewick Automated Meter Reading Project

(Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

Landslide Repairs (Aberdeen). . . .$373,000

McKinnon Creek Wellfield Infrastructure Improvements

(Lake Forest). . . .$200,000

Miller Street Re-Alignment And Storm Repairs

(Wenatchee). . . .$4,826,000

NE 10th Avenue (Vancouver). . . .$10,000,000

Ostrich Creek Culvert Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$4,688,000

Pine Basin Watershed Storm Sewer Improvements

(Bremerton). . . .$3,881,000

Slater Road/Jordan Creek Fish Passage Project

(Bellingham). . . .$5,000,000

South Fork McCorkle Creek Stormwater Detention Facility

(Kelso). . . .$4,700,000

Sudbury Landfill Area 7 Cell 3 Construction

(Walla Walla). . . .$2,978,000

Sunset Reservoir Rehabilitation (Spokane). . . .$1,412,000

Thurston Co. PUD No. 1 Replacement and Upgrades

(Olympia). . . .$1,028,000

Tipping Floor Restoration & Safety Upgrades

(Davenport). . . .$156,000

US 395/Ridgeline Interchange (Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

Wastewater Reuse Project (Quincy). . . .$10,000,000

Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$97,103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$97,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$85,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $7,000,000 of the general fund private/local account appropriation is provided solely for grants to demonstrate new approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a) Projects must be implemented by local governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(i) Electric vehicle and transportation system charging and control infrastructure, including inductive charging systems;

(ii) Electric vehicle sharing in low-income, multi-unit housing communities in urban areas;

(iii) Grid-related vehicle electrification, connecting vehicle fleets to grid operations, including school and transit buses;

(iv) Electric vehicle fleet management tools;

(v) Electric autonomous vehicles;

(vi) Maritime electrification, such as electric ferries, water taxis, and shore power infrastructure; and

(vii) Rail electrification (solutionary rail project) in consultation with Washington State University.

(6) $8,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in advanced materials at the proposed science laboratories infrastructure facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. These state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as match to the federal funding. The instruments will support researchers at the bioproducts sciences and engineering laboratory, the joint center for deployment research in earth-abundant materials, the center for advanced materials and clean energy technology, and other energy and materials collaborations with the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(7) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the public utility district no. 1 of Klickitat county for the remediation, survey, and evaluation of a closed-loop pump storage hydropower project at the John Day pool.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$7,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$230,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building Communities Fund Grant (30000883)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Boys & Girls Clubs of Snohomish County (Inchelium

Boys & Girls Club Expansion). . . .$27,000

Cocoon House (Colby Avenue Youth Center). . . .$635,000

Mercy Housing Northwest (Historic Building 9

Center Building). . . .$1,000,000

Skagit Valley Family YMCA (New Skagit Valley

Family YMCA). . . .$3,500,000

Edmonds Senior Center (Edmonds Waterfront Center). . . .$2,250,000

Opportunity Council (East Whatcom Regional Resource

Center Phase 2). . . .$500,000

Filipino Community of Seattle (Filipino Community

Innovation Learning Center). . . .$600,000

Amara (Amara Building Renovation/Addition). . . .$1,550,000

YMCA of Yakima (Yakima YMCA/Aquatic Center). . . .$3,500,000

Northwest Indian College (Health and Wellness

Center). . . .$1,750,000

Lydia Place (Bell Tower Service Center). . . .$96,000

Tacoma Community House (Tacoma Community House). . . .$2,500,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,908,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$89,908,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) Subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125, the department shall coordinate with nonprofit organizations and federal and local community partners in gaining firm commitment of nonstate project funding in an amount sufficient to complete a distinct phase of the project or for property acquisition to resolve incompatible land use in the north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord.

(8) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."

(9) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.

(10) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Adams County Industrial Wastewater and Treatment

Center (Othello). . . .$1,250,000

Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$540,000

Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District

(Arlington). . . .$45,000

Belfair Senior Centro Meals on Wheels Kitchen Upgrade

(Belfair). . . .$11,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000

Camp Solomon Schechter (Olympia). . . .$200,000

Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$160,000

Carnation Central Business District Revitalization

(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000

Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1

(Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000

Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$2,000,000

College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement

(College Place). . . .$900,000

Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000

Coordinated and Safe Service Center (Redmond). . . .$309,000

Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development

(Covington). . . .$820,000

Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Daybreak Youth Center for Adolescent Recovery

(Brush Prairie). . . .$1,750,000

Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000

East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000

East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access

(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing

(Seattle). . . .$400,000

Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$250,000

Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation

(Fox Island). . . .$17,000

Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000

Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project

(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000

FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition

(Granger). . . .$255,000

Heritage Park Eastern Washington Butte (Olympia). . . .$50,000

Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000

Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000

Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000

HUB Sports Center Capital Campaign (Spokane). . . .$501,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements

(George). . . .$700,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000

Intrepid Spirit Center (Lakewood). . . .$1,000,000

Islandwood Community Dining Hall and Teaching

Kitchen (Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000

Japanese Gulch Creek Restoration Project (Mukilteo). . . .$721,000

Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000

Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library

(Silverdale). . . .$250,000

La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000

Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Longview Police Department Range and Training

(Castle Rock). . . .$270,000

Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000

Magnuson Community Center Renovation (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000

Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$750,000

Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000

Mukilteo Waterfront Remediation - Phase 2 (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000

Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000

NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000

Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000

Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000

Peace Community Center Renovation and Expansion

(Tacoma). . . .$330,000

Pepin Creek Realignment Project (Lynden). . . .$4,035,000

Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000

Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000

Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000

Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000

Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000

Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project

(Shelton). . . .$1,500,000

Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

South Snohomish County Community Resource Center

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000

Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$600,000

Spokane Family Justice Center at the YWCA (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000

Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000

Tollgate Farmhouse Project (North Bend). . . .$280,000

University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000

Washington Agricultural Education Center (Lynden). . . .$1,250,000

Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000

Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System

(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000

Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacement

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000

Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000

Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000

Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000

Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000

Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000

Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development

(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000

Yelm Senior Center Meals on Wheels Kitchen Upgrade

(Yelm). . . .$29,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$90,660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$90,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Pasco early learning facility;

(2) $980,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Franklin Pierce early learning center in the Franklin Pierce school district; and

(3) The department of commerce shall manage the remaining funds appropriated in this section as directed in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5753 (early learning financing) or Second Substitute House Bill No. 1777 (early learning financing).

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease.

(2) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(3) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(4) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(5) $10,768,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants administered by the department of commerce. The department shall evaluate applications considering the following criteria:

(a) Unmet patient need that reflects the impact the project will have on reducing the unmet oral health needs of the community. This criterion includes the number of new patient visits, the number of new patient visits provided to adults in particular, the unmet oral health needs of the community, and access to other oral health resources.

(b) Efficiency in dental access which reflects the cost to the capital budget for each new patient visit. This criterion accounts for the total number of new dental patient visits annually created by the project, and the volume of treatments per new operatory/chair versus the level of request from the capital budget.

(c) Sustainability that reflects the long-term sustainability of the project and takes into consideration the organization's operational reserves, project pro forma, and leadership strength.

(d) Organizational need that reflects the likelihood that the project will proceed without capital budget funding and accounts for the organization's months of operating costs in reserve, financial position, and ability to raise additional capital funds.

(6) $5,232,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to the following facilities and programs:

East Central Community Center (Spokane). . . .$550,000

Sea Mar Dental Expansion (Seattle). . . .$183,000

Jefferson County Healthcare Dental Clinic

(Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

Volunteers in Medicine (Port Angeles). . . .$699,000

Providence St. Peter Dental Residency (Olympia). . . .$800,000

Spokane Dental Residency (Spokane). . . .$2,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, to issue grants to entities to expand capacity for behavioral health placement in the community. Funds may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of these facilities. These funds may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of grants. The criteria must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health organizations, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical access services in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project; and

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds.

(2) The following projects are subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section: $11,400,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to establish six crisis walk-in or stabilization facilities, with the placement of two facilities in King county, one in Pierce county, and three with the location to be determined in collaboration with the department of social and health services consistent with Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (operating budget). $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants to establish two drug and alcohol detoxification facilities. $4,600,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants to establish two enhanced service facilities.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,536,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 302, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,442,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Sand Point Building 9 (91000446)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1068, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,703,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mental Health Beds (91000447)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1071, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,671,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1064, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,963,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,783,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Econ Dev, Innovation & Expo Grants (92000096)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 304, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,340,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,774,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$5,368,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,741,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth & Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,674,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$89,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,904,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Beds - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$38,857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,542,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$88,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,965,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Low-Income Home Rehabilitation Revolving Loan Program (92000523)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a low income home rehabilitation revolving loan program to be managed by the department consistent with the provisions of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5647 (home rehabilitation loan program) or Second Substitute House Bill No. 1980 (home rehabilitation loan program).

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Emergency Flood Response (92000531)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to communities affected by flooding in the spring of 2017.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$72,116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$87,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$2,458,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,458,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,221,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,221,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (30000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,853,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,147,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Evaluation of Law Enforcement Training by Community Colleges (92000022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract with an external consultant to develop a plan that provides required basic law enforcement training through student paid programs with training provided by community and technical colleges. The consultant must review the costs, benefits, and risks to the state of Washington and review models from other states. The consultant must provide a report with an implementation plan and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 10, 2017.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Higher Education and State Facility Financing Study (92000021)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management shall submit a higher education capital facility financing study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2018. In designing and conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult with legislative and fiscal committee leadership, the department of revenue, the state investment board, the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the public four-year institutions of higher education. The study must include:

(a) A review of the methods that are used to fund higher education facility expansion and improvements in other states and the relative portions of such expenditures that are borne by students, state taxpayers, federal grants, and private contributions;

(b) An examination of alternatives for reducing facility construction and maintenance expenditures per student through strategies such as expansion of distance learning opportunities, increased scheduling of classes during evenings and weekends, the establishment of expected cost benchmarks by facility type, and other means; and

(c) An assessment of the strengths and weaknesses of potential new revenue sources that might be applied to the funding of higher education facilities. These alternative sources must include, but not be limited to, adjusting student fees to support a larger share of the cost of such facilities, bonding against student fee revenues, utilizing local tax revenues to support local higher education capital needs, promoting business participation in the financing of programs strongly linked to area economic development, and other means.

(2) The office of financial management shall submit a state capital facility financing study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2018. In designing and conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult with legislative and fiscal committee leadership. The study must include the establishment of expected cost benchmarks by facility type.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Plaza - Water Infiltration and Elevator Repairs (30000548)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,120,000

TOTAL. . . .$14,588,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000722)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1088, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,141,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$85,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,550,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,776,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,642,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Capitol - Exterior and Interior Repairs (30000724)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$314,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$360,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Dolliver - Critical Building Repairs (30000726)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1103, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$10,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$40,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

West Campus Historic Buildings Exterior Preservation (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,533,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$467,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Heating Systems Repairs - Phase 1 (30000730)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1091, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$40,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$460,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Exterior Lighting Upgrades (30000736)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1098, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Furnishings Preservation Committee Projects (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$68,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Critical Network Standardization & Connectivity (30000732)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1093, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,351,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Court Major Exterior & Building Systems Renewal (30000738)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1094, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$33,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$117,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the preparation of an environmental impact statement evaluating options for the long-term management of the capitol lake and lower Deschutes river watershed and is contingent on the receipt of equal funding from nonstate entities including, but not limited to, local governments, special purpose districts, tribes, and not-for-profit organizations.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$940,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,940,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Transportation Building Preservation (30000777)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $350,000 is provided solely for a predesign, to include an evaluation of temporary work space options for employees displaced by the proposed renovation.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,889,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,871,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Temple of Justice Building Systems Renewal & Update (30000782)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign funding, to include an evaluation of temporary work space options for employees displaced by the proposed renovation.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,754,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,004,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Elevator Modernization (30000786)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,971,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,971,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Systems Rehabilitation (30000791)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .$993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security and Safety Improvements (30000812)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a study to include: (1) An assessment of current capitol campus security, to include infrastructure, technology, and staffing; (2) an assessment of security systems at comparable state capitol campuses; (3) options for security to meet the needs of the capitol campus; and (4) a phased plan for improving campus physical security and safety, including estimated costs. The study must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 31, 2018.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,936,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$314,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,192,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$80,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$2,529,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,970,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Programmatic Projects (30000859)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,397,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,245,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,642,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000889)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to previous biennia;

(b) Projects that were not completed on schedule and the reasons for the delays; and

(c) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order.

(3) At least twice per year, the department shall convene a group of private sector architects, contractors, and state agency facilities personnel to share, at a minimum, information on high performance methods, ideas, operating and maintenance issues, and cost. The facilities personnel must be from the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and any other state agencies that have recently completed a new building or are currently in the construction phase.

(4) The department shall create a plan for scheduled renovations on the capitol campus, to include phasing and swing space for the predesigns for the department of transportation building, temple of justice, and employment security building.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,500,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$73,255,000

TOTAL. . . .$89,255,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1090. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Predesign (91000436)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1100, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$24,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$176,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1091. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Building Envelope Repairs (30000829)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,864,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,436,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1092. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Feasibility Study for Restoring Skylights in Legislative Building (92000010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1104, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$54,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$71,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Campus Utility Renewal Plan (92000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1105, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$180,000

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$470,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,877,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Relocate Mural from GA to 1063 (92000018)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1095. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000702)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,584,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,473,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,057,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,541,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1096. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000744)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$14,235,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,332,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,567,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,049,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1097. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2017-19 Biennium (30000811)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,776,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,821,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1098. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2017-19 Biennium (30000812)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,171,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,661,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,832,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,832,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1099. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,097,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$865,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,962,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$33,315,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$375,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,863,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$41,553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,273,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$46,788,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1100. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center - Land (30000808)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$305,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,060,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000010)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Pacific County. . . .$364,041

Lewis County. . . .$230,000

Grant County. . . .$543,576

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,031,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,469,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$14,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic Cemetery Grant Program (30000021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,060,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Acquisition/Rehabilitation of Historic Matsuda and Mukai Sites (91000006)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$118,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (30000021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall redesign the kitchen and commissary building to account for a reduced client population at western state hospital.

(2) This facility shall house a kitchen, commissary, medical supply, and pharmacy operations to improve operational efficiency at western state hospital and at the special commitment center.

(3) The department shall submit an updated project proposal by October 15, 2017 and return any excess funds.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$28,362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,828,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Kitchen & Dining Room Upgrades (20081506)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall upgrade the kitchen and dining room to facilitate the receiving and warming of food prepared at the western state hospital kitchen.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School - Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: New Boiler Plant (30000468)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$565,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,635,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$171,510,000

TOTAL. . . .$186,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's Center - Activity Center: Renovation (30002237)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$950,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,620,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,580,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$22,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study & Treatment Center - Orcas: Acute Treatment Addition (30002733)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Building Systems Replacement (30002735)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$1,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen - Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$375,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,970,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide - RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory

Institution Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Westlake: Nurse Call System (30002739)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School: New Acute Mental Health Unit (30002745)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School - Multiple Buildings: Roofing Replacement & Repairs (30002752)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island - Infrastructure: Repairs and Upgrades (30003211)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island - Infrastructure: Water System Replacement (30003213)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Water System: Improvements (30003215)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$615,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003240)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003241)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen Children's Center - Academic School (30003242)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,620,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Building Systems Replacement (30003244)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Eastlake: Emergency Generator Replacement (30003326)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$635,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center - King County SCTF: Expansion (30003564)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No funds may be allotted until the department consults with the city of Seattle.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Master Plan Update (30003571)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a master plan for western state hospital and the child study and treatment center. The master plan shall assume a reduced client population at western state hospital that is focused on forensic commitments.

(2) By June 30, 2019, the department of social and health services must transfer deed of the property known as the Fort Steilacoom park to the city of Lakewood. The city of Lakewood will receive the land covered by its current lease. Liabilities existing on the land at the time of transfer will transfer with the land. The transfer must be at no cost to the city. The department may reserve easements in the transferred property at no cost to the department. When the deed is transferred to the city, the lease expires. The department may include a restriction on the property requiring the city of Lakewood to maintain and operate the land as a park.

(3) By June 30, 2019, the department of social and health services must transfer deed of the property known as the Pierce College Fort Steilacoom campus to Pierce College. Pierce College will receive the land covered by its current lease. The transfer must be at no cost to the college. When the deed is transferred to the college, the lease expires.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center - Community Facilities: New Capacity (30003577)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must consult with the communities that are potential sites for these facilities.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,760,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Multiple Buildings: Fire Suppression (30003579)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Campus: Security & Surveillance Upgrades (30003580)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Multiple Buildings: Windows Security (30003585)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center - Campus: HVAC Units Replacement (30003586)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is for the Fircrest school campus master plan and rezone.

(2) The next phase of the master planning process must include the continued exploration of options for the future use of land at the Fircrest school residential habilitation center. Options may include, but are not limited to, use for commercial development, community recreation, senior housing, medical services, or other social services. At a minimum, each option identified within the updated master plan must provide a detailed accounting of the transaction of highest and best value for each parcel on campus. The transaction of highest and best value may not be the option selected for implementation. However, it is the intent of the legislature to maximize the net proceeds from the use of land on the Fircrest campus, which will be deposited into the developmental disabilities community trust account for future expansion of home and community-based services for individuals with developmental disabilities. Therefore, unless a clear reason exists for an alternative, the transaction of highest and best value will be the preferred option. The department must submit the updated master plan to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature on or before October 1, 2018. The department must not act on any option included within the updated master plan until receiving explicit direction from the legislature.

(3) One of the options explored within the updated master plan must be the transfer of approximately five acres east of the existing department of health property, from the department of social and health services to the department of health, for the purpose of future expansion of the public health laboratory, in accordance with the master plan of both agencies.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Forensic Services: Roofing Replacement (30003603)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: Emergency Electrical System Upgrades (30003616)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Building 28: Treatment & Recovery Center (40000024)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,475,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Private Community Inpatient Psychiatric Hospital Beds (92000026)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to negotiate capital project funding when contracting for private inpatient psychiatric beds in existing facilities to provide long-term inpatient care that would otherwise be provided in the state hospitals.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH - All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,426,000

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,943,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,869,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,559,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Lab Conversion (30000302)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$5,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000336)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$28,494,000

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$128,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$192,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public Health Lab South Laboratory Addition (30000379)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$23,376,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,226,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

New Central Boiler Plant (30000381)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,016,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Preservation (30000382)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$261,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$261,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Program (30000383)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$868,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$118,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$472,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$590,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Low-Level Radioactive Waste Site: Soil Acquisition (30000410)

Appropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to well-managed, publicly-owned group A water utilities for the repair and consolidation of group A and B water systems under the following conditions:

(1) A grant can be provided when a water system has been voluntarily transferred to a publicly owned water utility within the last three years. The grant may be used for repair and consolidation costs.

(2) The grant applicant must provide the department of health with an accounting of rehabilitation costs and the value of the system. The grant must be used primarily to cover project design and construction costs, and only in limited cases to cover the cost of system acquisitions, as determined by the department of health in evaluating grant applications.

(3) Grants must primarily be used to cover project construction costs that customers benefiting from the project cannot afford to repay through loans, as determined by the department of health and the publicly owned utility receiving the grant to complete the project.

(4) Applicants must provide a plan demonstrating that project completion will occur within three years of the grant contract execution.

(5) The primary purpose of this appropriation is to fund water system repair and consolidation construction costs. However, the department may use a limited amount of funds under this section for grants for feasibility review of water system repair and consolidation projects that would meet the objectives of this section and RCW 70.119A.190.

(6) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for manganese abatement in the city of Brewster water system.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program - State Match (40000007)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Othello Water Supply and Storage (40000008)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,875,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,085,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Program (30000131)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,609,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC Additional Internment Vaults and Roadway (30000215)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,700,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Boiler Replacement (30000130)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,006,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$139,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,833,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,923,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Roof and Equipment Replacement (30000195)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,748,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SCCC: Replace Heat Exchangers (30000523)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,032,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,032,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Replace Roofs (30000654)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,540,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,810,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Security Video System (30000791)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,568,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Security Video System (30000795)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$627,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,606,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Security Video System (30000800)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$599,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Security Video System (30000801)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$631,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: SOU IMU Security Video (30000803)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,265,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: MSU Bathroom Renovation (30000975)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$859,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,991,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$509,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$856,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,044,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2059, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,819,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30001114)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,909,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,712,000

TOTAL. . . .$66,621,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Security Electronics Network Renovation (30001124)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,458,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,458,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MLCC: 128 Bed Minimum Camp (30001168)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,341,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2075. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

Building Systems Preservation (30000004)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a predesign of the employment security department headquarters renovation. The predesign shall incorporate the findings of the recently completed investment grade audit and shall include an evaluation of temporary work space options for employees displaced by the proposed renovation.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$34,241,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,255,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$8,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,883,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$593,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$99,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,697,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$3,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$88,281,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$624,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$98,276,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$92,367,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3054, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,013,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$373,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,623,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$5,239,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$757,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$69,113,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$1,014,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$549,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,563,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$39,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3003, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,614,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$22,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$40,521,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3004, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,488,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$258,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,944,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation (30000278)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$52,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$3,011,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,636,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,390,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (30000323)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$362,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$13,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,338,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$4,032,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$154,280,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$158,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$91,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,007,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000332)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$221,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,834,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$624,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3044, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$9,238,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$122,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$9,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$2,578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,123,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Tax Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State. . . .$2,194,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$5,463,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,812,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$25,385,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,152,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,858,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,852,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000428)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000429)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3010, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,152,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$347,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,001,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000431)

Reappropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,413,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$487,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$45,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,271,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,679,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$321,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000534)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

State. . . .$139,671,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$189,671,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,329,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$203,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$31,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$34,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$734,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$7,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,449,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$12,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,618,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000587)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,746,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$254,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3068, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$4,957,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State. . . .$2,189,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,854,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,053,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,660,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$17,713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,287,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000669)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,106,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000670)

Appropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,599,000

TOTAL. . . .$37,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000671)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for projects that are not eligible for the Volkswagen "clean diesel" marketing, sales practice, and products liability litigation settlement.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000672)

Appropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000673)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000674)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Centennial Clean Water Program (30000705)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$235,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000706)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,303,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,805,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,108,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (30000708)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000709)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000710)

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

State. . . .$160,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$210,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$840,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,050,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000711)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$76,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$102,435,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the east Columbia irrigation district.

(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a forty-seven and one-half mile pipeline for full capacity.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,940,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue Recovery

Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$28,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$100,940,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey Headquarters Facility Preservation Projects (30000713)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$635,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000714)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriation is provided solely for activities that improve rural water supplies by implementing locally developed projects and watershed plans, as follows:

(1) Surface or ground water storage projects. The department shall consult with the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife before issuing water storage grants.

(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and fish restoration purposes.

(3) Agricultural water supply projects that improve water conservation and water use efficiency.

(4) Acquisition of water to establish water banks. The department must give priority to acquisitions in water short basins. The department must place acquired water into the state's trust water rights program pursuant to chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The department and the state conservation commission shall give preference to projects located in the 16 fish critical basins, other water-short or drought impacted basins, and basins with significant water resource and instream flow issues. Projects that are not within the basins described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.

(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not exceed eighty-five percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.

(3) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section may be allocated for the purchase and installation of flow meters that are implemented in cooperation with the Washington state department of fish and wildlife fish screening program authorized under RCW 77.57.070.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Regional Office Improvements and Storm Water Treatment (30000741)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,682,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000749)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,682,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$47,682,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$230,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-2017 Restored Stormwater Financial Assistance (30000797)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Catastrophic Flood Relief (40000006)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $23,500,000 of the appropriation is for advancing the long-term strategy for the Chehalis basin projects to reduce flood damage and restore aquatic species including project level environmental review, data collection, engineering design of future construction projects, feasibility analysis, and engagement of state agencies, tribes, and other parties.

(2) Up to $11,500,000 of the state building construction account appropriation and $10,000,000 from the federal account is for construction of local priority flood protection and habitat restoration projects.

(3) Up to one and a half percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$42,500,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$52,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$252,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control State Match (40000013)

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to implement the requirements of the Volkswagen "clean diesel" marketing, sales practice, and products liability litigation settlement.

(2) All expenditures from this appropriation must be consistent with the terms of this settlement.

(3) To the extent possible, projects funded through this appropriation should help achieve the state's results Washington goal of 50,000 electric vehicles on the road by 2020.

(4) Fifteen percent of this appropriation must be spent upon projects for the acquisition, installation, operation, and maintenance of new light duty zero emission vehicle supply equipment and infrastructure. The department of ecology must work with the department of transportation to select projects and distribute funding contained in this subsection.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,342,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,942,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,024,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,525,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$51,528,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$70,053,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,947,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$97,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3069, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,910,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lower Yakima GWMA Program Development (92000085)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$414,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

Reappropriation:

State Drought Preparedness Account—State. . . .$1,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port Angeles Municipal Landfill (92000155)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Treatment Plant (Lakewood) (92000156)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,319,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Tacoma Arkema/Dunlap Mound (92000158)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$803,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,097,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State. . . .$538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,262,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

Reappropriation:

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving

Account—State. . . .$9,050,000

Appropriation:

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving

Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$950,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$110,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,823,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,209,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Casey - Lighthouse Historic Preservation (30000109)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,399,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Simcoe - Historic Officers Quarters Renovation (30000155)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,478,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$52,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine Facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,639,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,208,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$98,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,844,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Parking (30000522)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Road Improvements, Stage 2D (30000693)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,823,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,929,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,511,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,138,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,250,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,149,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,199,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Camano Island Day Use Access and Facility Renovation (30000782)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$79,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,434,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Belfair Replace Failing Electrical Supply to Main Camp Loop (30000813)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,619,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,812,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000839)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,098,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,983,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Clean Vessel Boating Pump-Out Grants (30000856)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden – Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sequim Bay Address Failing Retaining Wall (30000861)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$227,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Improve Camp Host Sites (30000864)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Nordic Area Improvements & Horse Camp Development (30000877)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$82,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Cabins, Yurts, and Associated Park Improvement (30000883)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$553,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructures (30000947)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,859,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,484,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock - Replace Failing Sewage Lift Stations (30000948)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,029,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$60,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,167,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,268,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation From Harms Way (30000959)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Maintenance Shop Relocate From Center of Hist District (30000960)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,071,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes - Dry Falls - Upgrade Failing Water Supply Systems (30000962)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,859,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,010,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Ocean City - Replace Non-Compliant Comfort Stations (30000970)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,606,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,606,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Riverside Fisk Property Lk Spokane (Long Lake) Initial Pk Access (30000971)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$372,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$582,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000975)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000977)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructure (30000978)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,091,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000979)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,359,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Cabins (30000988)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,996,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,496,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,016,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,266,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,058,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,808,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,114,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30001031)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steptoe Butte Road Improvements (30001076)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,789,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,255,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Buildings and Ground Improvements (40000005)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

St Edward State Park Environmental Learning Center (92000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $75,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a strategic plan to develop an environmental learning center at Saint Edward state park.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3146, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$96,905,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,949,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$423,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$67,073,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Reappropriation:

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,867,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$2,216,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,083,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,804,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,269,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,073,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$64,989,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, revised April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,206,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3149, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,575,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3150, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,837,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$2,080,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$10,072,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$7,344,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$759,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$20,255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,745,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$16,250,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,553,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,803,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$56,197,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000207)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$1,197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$1,162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,838,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3168, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$642,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,503,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000218)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$2,572,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$15,423,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$13,633,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$3,163,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$34,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,532,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$55,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3164, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$36,117,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,493,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$48,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$66,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$9,989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,221,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$9,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,567,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3167, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,302,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-2, developed June 30, 2015.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,897,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3169, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$27,521,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,451,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$333,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,005,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$155,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,408,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $170,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely to execute a lean study to bring efficiencies to the project development and prioritization process, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$320,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$390,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital budget document no. 2017-21, developed March 29, 2017.

(2) One percent of the farm and forest account—state is provided solely for the prioritized list of projects to be provided by the recreation and conservation funding board by November 1, 2017, pursuant to section 11, chapter 149, Laws of 2016, and the appropriated funds may be spent upon provision of the list.

Appropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$36,000,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$36,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$80,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$340,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$420,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

Appropriation:

Boating Activities Account—State. . . .$10,000

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$17,165,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$17,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$68,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$85,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$13,195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$52,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$65,995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,077,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000415)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000416)

Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,100,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,913,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000417)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000418)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000419)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$57,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Fish Barrier Removal Board (30000421)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Chico Creek, Suquamish Tribe. . . .$3,785,000

Johnson Creek, North Olympic Salmon Coalition. . . .$3,008,000

Buford Creek, Nez Perce Tribe or Asotin C.D.. . . .$4,721,000

Middle Fork Newaukum, Lewis County. . . .$572,000

Unnamed Tributary to Arkansas Creek, Cowlitz County. . . .$285,000

Coleman Creek, Kittitas Conservation District. . . .$771,000

Catherine Creek, Sound Salmon Solutions. . . .$566,000

Coffee Creek, Mason County. . . .$327,000

Johnson Creek, Trout Unlimited/CCT. . . .$544,000

Baxter Creek, Cowlitz County. . . .$2,181,000

Turner Creek, Cowlitz County. . . .$1,090,000

Cottonwood Creek, Asotin Conservation District. . . .$62,000

Unnamed Tributary to Johnson Creek, Clallam County. . . .$1,835,000

(2) The fish barrier removal board must be known as the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,747,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$59,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Public Lands Inventory Update (30000422)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to update the public lands inventory with current information on state agency habitat and recreation land acquisitions and easements, further develop the inventory to respond to the joint legislative audit, and review the committee's request for a single source of information about land acquisitions.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,485,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation and Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to purchase replacement properties for Blanchard mountain trust lands core-zone.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$3,858,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$22,648,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$26,506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,275,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,090,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$22,690,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resources Investment for the Economy and Environment (30000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program (30000011)

Reappropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$49,000

Appropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000

TOTAL. . . .$430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding (30000012)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,362,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,028,000

TOTAL. . . .$22,790,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The general fund—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the four conservation projects in Washington state that were approved for grant awards as part of the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership program authorized under the 2014 farm bill.

(2) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(3) The commission will, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and the development of regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

(4) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$19,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,962,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$23,562,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$20,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$21,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,438,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,752,000

TOTAL. . . .$70,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (30000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, pre-design and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch & Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3188, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,986,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$70,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,056,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

R&D Grant - Deep Furrow Conservation Drill to Conserve Soil/Water (92000008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Distillation Grants (92000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the commission to make grants for dairy waste management projects, one of which must be east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one of which must be west of the of the crest of the Cascade mountains. When providing funding for specific technologies, the commission shall, where appropriate, retain a financial interest in the technology and a share of the rights to its licensing. Such financial interest shall be deemed to be in the interests of the state to advance innovative solutions to challenging environmental issues while supporting private sector initiatives at dairies in Washington.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3205, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Appropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,350,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,900,000

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$19,750,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$84,612,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$171,862,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,810,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,167,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,667,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Renovate Adult Handling Facilities (30000480)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,600,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,200,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,584,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,784,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wallace River Hatchery - Replace Intakes and Ponds (30000660)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Cooperative Elk Damage Fencing (30000662)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Marblemount Hatchery - Renovating Jordan Creek Intake (30000666)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,068,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Whatcom Hatchery - Replace Intake and Pipeline (30000667)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$154,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,673,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,673,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hoodsport Hatchery Adult Pond Renovation (30000686)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$340,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,456,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3217. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000756)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,555,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3218. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000782)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,628,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,475,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,857,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,864,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$376,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to rebuild the Clarks creek (Puyallup) hatchery and fulfill Washington department of transportation mitigation requirements as agreed to with the Puyallup Indian nation for the widening of Interstate 5. The new hatchery must be devoted to salmon production. The department must relocate trout production to other hatcheries.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,200,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,000,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$87,518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$114,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,200,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$110,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000207)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3230, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Working Forest (30000231)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2015-2017 Minor Works Preservation (30000238)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,951,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,836,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3232. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000241)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,815,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (30000261)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,302,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Fire Communications Base Stations & Mountain Top Repeaters (30000262)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,640,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000263)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Replacement (30000264)

Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement—State. . . .$30,000,000

Resources Management Cost Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$61,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$61,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000266)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget SoundCorps (30000267)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Olympic Region HQ Storm Water and Paving (30000268)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,260,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Colville Consolidation Remodel (30000275)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,450,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (30000277)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forest land status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forest lands in counties:

(i) With a population of twenty-five thousand or fewer; and

(ii) With risks of timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act.

(b) This appropriation must be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forest lands in the qualifying counties.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed per RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forest land, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department shall identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsections (1) and (2) of this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and may not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2017-2019 Minor Works Preservation (30000278)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (30000279)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$27,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Chehalis Administration Renovation (30000281)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,774,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3245. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (RHOSP) (30000284)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3246. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2017-2019 Minor Works Programmatic (30000287)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,990,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway Working Forest (30000289)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000290)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,400,000 is provided solely to reduce hazards to public safety, establish new firewise communities, and implement thinning and fuels reduction activities on state trust lands and high-risk private lands. The department shall work in conjunction with communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts in implementing firewise activities, including through grants to these entities for project implementation. The following areas are eligible:

(a) Republic to Wauconda;

(b) North Spokane;

(c) Kittitas to Manastash; and

(d) Klickitat to Goldendale.

(2) $453,000 is provided solely to implement controlled burning treatments on 1,000 acres of state trust land in southeast Stevens and northwest Spokane county.

(3) $500,000 is provided solely for the forest collaborative infrastructure pilot, which will provide contract services, such as technical analysis, facilitation, and logistical support.

(4) $2,500,000 is provided solely for the "good neighbor" cross-boundary competitive grants for projects on federal land that support existing and planned state and local hazard reduction investments, of which $1,600,000 is provided for the north central Washington forest health collaborative, and $650,000 is provided for the Tapash sustainable forests collaborative.

(5) $1,700,000 is provided solely for state trust land reforestation in wildfire-damaged areas.

(6) $2,500,000 is provided solely to perform tree thinning, pruning, and brush disposal. The department must contract with the Washington conservation corps and national student conservation association programs, including the veterans fire corps program, to perform the work.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$78,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$93,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (91000040)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,673,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (92000003)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Access Road Reconstruction (30000059)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$140,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Stormwater Remediation (30000030)

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Campus Communication Infrastructure Improvement (30000101)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$188,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Aviation Revitalization Loans (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account created in section 7028 of this act for direct loans to political subdivisions of the state and privately owned airports for the purpose of improvements at public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities.

(2) The department must convene a community aviation revitalization board to develop criteria for selecting loan recipients, to develop a process for evaluating applications, and to make decisions. The board must consist of the capital budget chair and ranking minority member of the capital budget committee of the house of representatives and the senate ways and means committee, and a representative from both the department of transportation's aviation division and the department of commerce. The board must also consist of the following members appointed by the secretary of transportation: One port district official, one county official, one city official, one representative of airport managers, and one representative of pilots. The chair of the board must be selected by the secretary of transportation. The members of the board must elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director of commerce and the secretary of transportation must serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3) The board may provide loans to privately owned airports for the purpose of airport improvements only if the state is receiving commensurate public benefit, such as guaranteed long-term public access to the airport as a condition of the loan. For purposes of this subsection, "public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities" means all public use airports not listed as having more than fifty thousand annual commercial air service passenger enplanements as published by the federal aviation administration.

(4) An application for loan funds under this section must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. When evaluating loan applications, the board must prioritize applications that provide conclusive justification that completion of the loan application project will create revenue-generating opportunities. The board is not limited to, but must also use, the following expected outcome conditions when evaluating loan applications:

(a) A specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the aviation facility improvement is made;

(b) The loan application project results in the creation of jobs or private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(c) The loan application project improves opportunities for the successful maintenance, operation, or expansion of an airport or adjacent airport business park;

(d) The loan application project results in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(e) The loan application project results in leveraging additional federal funding for an airport.

(5) The repayment of any loan made from the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account under the contracts for aviation loans must be paid into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2007-09 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$44,661,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$747,098,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$791,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,204,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,013,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$389,439,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$389,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$515,480,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$516,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,470,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,517,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (30000091)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,142,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,205,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,075,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,192,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$42,085,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$228,113,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$270,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$305,123,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$130,365,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$435,488,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$48,481,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$483,969,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Emergency Repairs and Equal Access Grants for K-12 Public Schools (30000182)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for urgent repair grants to address non-reoccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $200,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems; abatement of potentially hazardous materials; and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $1,000,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools (30000184)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts and the department of health, shall develop criteria for providing funding for specific projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Districts or schools may apply for grants but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation; (b) any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (c) applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(2) Up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation is for the replacement of lead-contaminated drinking water fixtures.

(3) Up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's nutrition and may include, but is not limited to: Garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

(4) Up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's physical health and may include, but is not limited to: Fitness playground equipment; covered play areas; and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skill Centers - Minor Works (30000187)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Cascadia Tech Academy - Building 100 Modernization (30000194)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,327,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account. . . .$4,559,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,886,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,886,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skill Center - Core Growth (30000197)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project must undergo a budget evaluation study, using a budget evaluation study team approach incorporating value engineering techniques. Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of financial management through an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to cover the cost of the study.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skill Center Modernization - Preconstruction (30000200)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,510,000

TOTAL. . . .$29,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (40000007)

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$4,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,232,000

TOTAL. . . .$19,888,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 K-3 Class Size Reduction Grants (40000002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) 2017-19 K-3 class size reduction grants are available only to school districts that applied to the 2015-17 K-3 class size reduction grant pilot program and were prioritized by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The formula for determining grant awards for 2017-19 must be the same as the formula used to determine grant awards under the 2015-17 K-3 class size reduction grant pilot program, with the following exceptions:

(a) A classroom in a portable building built before January 1, 1992, must be excluded from the district inventory of available classrooms.

(b) Grants for necessary added classrooms that can be provided with the addition of modular classrooms must not exceed two hundred twenty-three thousand five hundred thirteen dollars multiplied by the number of necessary added classrooms multiplied by the state matching ratio defined in the 2015-17 K-3 class size reduction grant pilot program, as adjusted in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(c) Grants for necessary added classrooms that must be provided with a new school or modernization of an existing school building must not exceed six hundred fifty-four thousand six hundred sixty-two dollars multiplied by the number of necessary added classrooms multiplied by the state matching ratio defined in the 2015-17 K-3 class size reduction grant pilot program, as adjusted in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(d) The amounts in (b) and (c) of this subsection must be increased for the fiscal year of the grant award by the same percentage increase as the school construction assistance program construction cost allocation is increased from fiscal year 2016 as authorized in the omnibus capital appropriations act.

(2) Grant funds must be awarded and disbursed in accordance with the requirements established for the 2015-17 K-3 class size reduction grant pilot program in chapter 41, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$564,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$581,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Small Rural District Modernization Grants (92000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for grants to assist small, rural school districts with total enrollments of one thousand students or less, with school facilities with significant building systems deficiencies, and with such low property values that replacing or modernizing the school facility through the school construction assistance program would present an extraordinary tax burden on property owners or would exceed allowable debt for the district.

(2) $16,198,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for projects in small rural districts where the school facility does not need to be replaced or require an extensive modernization, but does have significant building system deficiencies. Grants may not exceed $5,000,000. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare an expedited grant application process and shall consult with the advisory committee that must be established in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5453 in selecting the grant recipients funded by this subsection.

(3) $23,802,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:

Mount Adams School District. . . .$14,277,000

South Bend School District. . . .$7,712,000

Lopez Island School District. . . .$1,813,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $918,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for school construction projects funded through the school construction assistance program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction will contract with Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for the purposes of this section.

(2) $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants for all public school districts every six years.

(3) $500,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to provide grants for completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public school districts every six years for districts not applying for study and surveys or construction assistance. Grant amounts will be calculated at one half of the amount determined for study and surveys.

(4) All public school districts will be required to provide a study and survey or building conditions assessment every six years, prioritized based on age of last information provided to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$183,276,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$779,104,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$965,380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,379,712,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,345,092,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5026, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,848,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (91000404)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5027, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,993,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids - Healthy Schools Grants (91000406)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5014, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,289,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,711,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

NEWTECH Skill Center (Spokane Area Professional-Technical) (92000005)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$345,000

School Construction & Skill Centers Building

Account (Bonds)—State. . . .$61,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$406,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,497,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,903,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,258,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,675,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$244,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,981,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5028, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$218,032,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,513,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$219,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $20,086,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for Seattle public schools to address challenges related to extraordinary growth and to maintain and repair existing buildings.

(2) $1,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Black Diamond elementary school.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Agricultural Science in Schools Grant to FFA Foundation (92000122)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Everett Pathways to Medical Education (92000123)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Campus Preservation (30000088)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$523,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2017-19 Campus Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,755,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center Pre-Design (30000107)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Childhood Deafness and Hearing Loss Minor Public Works FY 17-19 (30000029)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Burke Museum (20082850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$24,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma (20102002)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5036, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$380,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$54,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

College of Engineering Interdisciplinary Ed./Research Center I (30000492)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$49,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

School of Nursing Simulation Learning Lab (30000600)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Interprofessional Education Classroom (30000602)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Computer Science and Engineering Expansion (30000603)

Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,425,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$28,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,075,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000604)

Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,314,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,314,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

2017-19 Minor Works - Preservation (30000736)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$44,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$304,108,000

TOTAL. . . .$349,083,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Evans School - Parrington Hall Renovation (30000810)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Population Health Sciences Building (30000811)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$700,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account. . . .$400,000

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System (92000009)

Appropriation:

UW Building Account—State. . . .$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Troy Hall Renovation (20061030)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,303,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Plant Sciences Building (REC#5) (30000519)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$52,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Vancouver - Life Sciences Building (30000840)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$58,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$59,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2015-17 Minor Works - Preservation (30001188)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$50,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$27,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Global Animal Health Building (30001322)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$36,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$59,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2017-19 Minor Works - Preservation (MCR) (30001342)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$22,295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett University Center (91000026)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$64,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System (92000010)

Appropriation:

WSU Building Account—State. . . .$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

University Science Center - Science I (30000001)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,991,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,791,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal I (30000506)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,449,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000513)

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$4,100,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$9,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,017,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,117,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (30000516)

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$500,000

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$393,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,793,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Engineering Building (30000556)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,695,000

TOTAL. . . .$57,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000558)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Maintenance/Backlog Reduction (30000615)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$29,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,957,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$61,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,522,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,078,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$26,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000783)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$5,015,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,380,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$10,395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$36,455,000

TOTAL. . . .$46,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program (30000817)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,090,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System (92000007)

Appropriation:

CWU Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Science Center - Lab I Basement Renovation (30000118)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$719,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,964,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$23,900,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facility Preservation (30000457)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,625,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$5,805,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$57,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works - Program (30000487)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lecture Hall Remodel (30000493)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$710,000

TESC Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$57,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,902,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000612)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,803,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,633,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Critical Power, Safety, and Security Systems (30000613)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$62,874,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$71,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Access Control Security Upgrades (30000604)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$427,000

WWU Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$1,073,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000615)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,825,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,433,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,458,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Sciences Building Addition & Renovation (30000768)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$85,568,000

TOTAL. . . .$91,568,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2017-19 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000769)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,180,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$470,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Elevator Preservation Safety and ADA Upgrades (30000772)

Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$3,188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,188,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000781)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,998,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,181,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$66,352,000

TOTAL. . . .$72,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System (92000009)

Appropriation:

WWU Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000170)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation - Minor Works Projects (30000222)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,365,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5099, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,653,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,347,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000288)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,346,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Capstone Phase: Adventuress Centennial Restoration

Project. . . .$338,000

The Paramount Theatre Upgrades. . . .$491,000

Stimson-Green Mansion Rehabilitation – Phase III. . . .$165,000

Restoration of the German American Bank Building. . . .$39,000

Capitol Theater Roof Replacement and Awning Restoration. . . .$101,000

Fort Ward Community Hall (Heritage Bakery Building). . . .$79,000

Lighthouse No. 83 (Swiftsure) Phase III Rehabilitation.. . . .$257,000

Gladish Community and Cultural Center Restoration. . . .$112,000

University Heights Center Historic Preservation. . . .$643,000

Railroads, Waterfowl, Field Trips and Family Outings. . . .$427,000

Fort Worden's Historic Warehouses Rehabilitation. . . .$643,000

Yamasaki Courtyard Renewal Project. . . .$26,000

Completion of Longview Shay Pavilion. . . .$52,000

5th Avenue Theatre Upgrade. . . .$644,000

Museum of Flight Roof Repair Project. . . .$322,000

Historic Purse Seiner Shenandoah Restoration - Phase 4. . . .$50,000

The Quincy Valley Community Heritage Barn. . . .$176,000

Tumwater Old Brewhouse Tower Rehabilitation

Project - Phase 1. . . .$435,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Strategic Facility Master Plan (40000004)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (40000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,459,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility (20062699)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,527,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$243,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$43,901,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$351,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,375,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center (20082703)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,319,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (20082704)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,531,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building (20082705)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,908,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy (30000120)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,051,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,794,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,446,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$28,141,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,999,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,441,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,606,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Dev Center (30000126)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,686,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,914,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,071,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$788,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,631,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical College: Automotive Complex Renovation (30000134)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$86,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,747,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,726,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$37,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,094,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,577,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$73,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$33,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,749,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,782,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional - Technical Education Center (30000981)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$840,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5132, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,700,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$24,919,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,619,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,221,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,189,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park: Center for Advanced Manufacturing Technologies (30000984)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5140, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$276,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,772,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,048,000

TOTAL. . . .$31,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic: Shop Building Renovation (30000986)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$929,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,368,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation - Phase 3 (30000987)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,982,000

TOTAL. . . .$33,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,873,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$39,208,000

TOTAL. . . .$42,358,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$35,972,000

TOTAL. . . .$39,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30001291)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$91,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$114,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (30001293)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$8,433,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (30001294)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,861,000

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$25,458,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$31,319,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,319,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (30001295)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,166,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,166,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (30001368)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (30001369)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$21,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle College Student Housing (92000028)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the college to implement the initial steps for student housing.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

(End of part)

PART 6

SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

Sec. 6001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library - Archives Building (30000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign to determine: (a) Necessary program space for the state library currently located in Tumwater, and additional archive space; (b) capital budget requirements, including the use of fees collected by the secretary of state that will support a certificate of participation for the financing of the construction of the facility, and future operating costs; and (c) projected efficiencies of electronic document storage in determining necessary space.

(2) The study must consider the use of the general administration building site as a possible location; and any benefits or consequences may be identified at this site or other sites considered; and lease options.

(3) The office of financial management shall determine the maximum use of the site and consider the consolidation of other state agencies, including separately elected officials.

(4) The building must be a high performance building as described in section 7008 of this act and the construction must be procured using a performance based method including design-build or design-build-operate-maintain.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($400,000))

﻿ $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,428,000

TOTAL. . . .(($55,828,000))

﻿ $55,728,000

Sec. 6002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction (30000724)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3, chapter 1, Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $1,089,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $1,089,000

Sec. 6003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or otherwise increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive bidding processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects;

(b) Require that all expenditures be used for projects that develop and acquire asset that have a useful life of at least thirteen years; and

(c) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require an applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employed by, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of a contract.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a contractor either in procuring or performing under the contract, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the contract by written notice. If the contract is terminated, the department must be entitled to pursue the same remedies against the contractor as it could pursue in the event of a breach of the contract by the contractor.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) The department may not obligate or expend any of the amounts provided in this section on new projects that involve the Snohomish county public utilities district or its subcontractors until the executive ethics board responds to the department's June 17, 2015, request for an advisory opinion on poststate employment.

(6)(a) (($10,000,000)) $16,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(d) Loan applications must disclose all sources of public funds invested in the project. The nonprofit lender must make loans available to the following types of projects that include, but are not limited to: Residential, commercial, industrial, and agricultural energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass as a fuel source.

(e) State funds may not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher percentage of nonstate match funds.

(7) (($6,600,000)) $100,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely for credit enhancements of advanced solar and renewable energy manufacturing within Washington state. The department shall develop an application process to competitively select projects.

(8)(a) $13,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to advance clean and renewable energy technologies and advance transmission and distribution control system improvements for increased reliability, resiliency, and enabling integration of distributed and renewable resources and technology by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) The department shall convene an advisory panel of electric utility representatives to identify program objectives, near term priorities and long term goals.

(d) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(e) Grant funds must be used for research, development, or demonstration projects that integrate intermittent renewables through energy storage, information technology or other smart grid technologies, dispatch energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use demand response, transactive control, or the thermal properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district energy systems to store energy, reduce transmission congestion or otherwise improve system reliability and resiliency and enable integration of distributed and renewable energy sources.

(9)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to match federal funds or other nonstate funding sources used to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the program. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects including, but not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, advancing bioenergy, developing new lightweight materials, and advancing renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(10) $400,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely for capital funding of competitively selected wood energy conversion projects at public facilities.

(11) The department must report on number and results of projects that receive grants or loans through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor and the legislature, by November 1, 2016.

(12) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved, to the house of representatives technology & economic development committee and the senate energy, environment & telecommunications committee. The report must include these metrics from other states.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,400,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$40,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$240,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$280,400,000

Sec. 6004. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) As the most trade dependent state in the nation, the legislature recognizes the significant statewide benefits to be gained from the proposed Asia Pacific cultural center. The multipurpose facility will serve as a needed cultural resource for Washington's Asian and Pacific Islander community; provide affordable housing and educational opportunities; strengthen relations with our Asia-Pacific trading partners; and deliver economic growth as a commercial and tourist destination. The legislature intends to support the development of the project through a grant to be used for project coordination and development of a sustainable financial plan, which the legislature intends as a prerequisite to consideration of any further state capital commitment.

(8) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the 242 home development corporation to develop mental health housing, first and broad, Seattle.

(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Airway Heights Recreational Complex (Airway Heights)

$200,000

Algona Community Center (Algona)

$500,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Ruston)

$200,000

Bellevue Boys & Girls Club (Bellevue)

$200,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center (Vancouver)

$750,000

Central Alarm System (Cook)

$1,000

Chehalis Boys & Girls Club New Facility (Chehalis)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Entrance (Yacolt)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Maintenance (Yacolt)

$300,000

Coastal Resiliency Project (Ocean Shores)

$200,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation (DuPont)

$21,000

Edmonds Veterans Plaza (Edmonds)

$77,000

Ellensburg Train Station (Ellensburg)

$400,000

Evergreen Pool Improvements (White Center)

$90,000

Fort Steilacoom Park (pave and stripe parking lot) (Lakewood)

$257,000

Goldendale Senior Center (Goldendale)

$155,000

Grays Harbor Gateway Center (Aberdeen)

$550,000

Historic Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia)

$250,000

Historic Ship Preservation Project (Bremerton)

$300,000

Holocaust Center for Humanity (Seattle)

$200,000

Kingston Green Community Village (Kingston)

$85,000

Kitsap Peninsula Water Trails (Multiple, along peninsula)

$52,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens)

$309,000

Lyle Activity Center Restoration (Lyle)

$270,000

Mason County Veterans Shelter / Housing (Shelton)

$206,000

Meals on Wheels Kitchen and Café Equipment (Richland)

$206,000

Mental Health Housing, First and ((Denny)) Broad (Seattle)

$500,000

Mill Creek Parks and Public Works Shop (Mill Creek)

$257,000

Mother Joseph Academy Roof Replacement (Vancouver)

$1,000,000

Parkland Prairie Nature Preserve (Parkland)

$30,000

Pasco Early Learning Center (Pasco)

$300,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden)

$400,000

Performing Arts & Event Center (Federal Way)

$52,000

Port of Sunnyside Demolish Carnation Building (Sunnyside)

$100,000

RAC-Covered Bleachers Project (Lacey)

$26,000

Riverwalk Trail Phase VI (Puyallup)

$500,000

Scott Hill Park of Woodland (Woodland)

$500,000

Shelter and Navigation Center (Seattle)

$600,000

Skagit County Children's Advocacy Center (Mount Vernon)

$318,000

Skyline Community Meeting Space (White Salmon)

$172,000

South Kitsap High School NJROTC (Port Orchard)

$30,000

SR 542 Kendall, Columbia Valley Trail (Kendall)

$77,000

Tenino Depot Museum Roof (Tenino)

$22,000

Wesley Homes (Des Moines)

$100,000

Westport Marina Dredging (Westport)

$200,000

Total

$11,363,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 2011 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCCCW: Critical DNR Replacement (30001170)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$375,000

Sec. 6007. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3198 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($500,000))

﻿ $93,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($11,722,000))

﻿ $13,222,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,222,000))

﻿ $13,315,000

Sec. 6008. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3200 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($7,948,000))

﻿ $8,948,000

TOTAL. . . .(($8,198,000))

﻿ $9,053,000

Sec. 6009. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Nasselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($275,000))

﻿ $132,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($13,556,000))

﻿ $17,056,000

TOTAL. . . .(($13,831,000))

﻿ $17,188,000

Sec. 6010. RCW 70.340.130 and 2016 c 161 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On July 1, 2016, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars, up to a transfer of ten million dollars, from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. If ten million dollars is not available to be transferred on July 1, 2016, then by the end of fiscal year 2017, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. The total amount transferred in fiscal year 2017 from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account may not exceed ten million dollars.

(2) On July 1, 2017, and every two years thereafter at the start of each successive biennium, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), up to a transfer of twenty million dollars, from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. If twenty million dollars is not available to be transferred at the beginning of the first fiscal year of the biennium, ((on July 1st)) by the end of the subsequent fiscal year, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. The total amount transferred in a biennium from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account may not exceed twenty million dollars.

Sec. 6011. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account. . . .$24,000,000

Local toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account. . . .$30,000,000

(1) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(2) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts from the cleanup settlement account established in RCW 70.105D.130 to the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account to maintain positive account balances up to an amount not to exceed $23,000,000 that must be considered an ((inter fund)) interfund loan that must be repaid with interest to the cleanup settlement account in three equal repayments in fiscal years ((2019,)) 2020, ((and)) 2021, and 2022.

(3) If, after using the ((inter-fund)) interfund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of clean-up projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, or need to ensure geographic distribution.

(4) By June 30, 2017, the department must submit a list of projects that were delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are forty-one million nine hundred seventy-three thousand dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, two hundred fifty-nine million five hundred fifty-nine thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, and three hundred sixty-one million nine hundred eight thousand dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,023,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to repair the east plaza garage in Olympia.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of labor and industries: Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to modernize a lab and training facility.

(6) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Cascadia College for up to $29,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a parking structure.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Community College for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire property in Renton.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Seattle College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student wellness and fitness center.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $31,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build student housing.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park Community College for up to $33,290,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a center for advanced manufacturing technologies.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to design and renovate the main building.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions, may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. For facilities with an area of 5,000 square feet or greater, the results of a life-cycle cost analysis of building systems must be a primary consideration in the selection of a building design. Construction may proceed only upon providing to the office of financial management the life-cycle costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be determined by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. (1) Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(a) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Considers all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(b) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(c) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, reduce the energy use by fifty percent below prerenovations baseline.

(d) On-site renewable energy: Meet at least thirty percent of the hot water demand through the installation of solar hot water heaters, when life-cycle cost effective. Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(e) Measurement and verification: Install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(f) Benchmarking: Compare actual performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool for laboratory buildings. Web-based data collection and dashboards must also be provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2017-2019 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $150,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (Senate Bill No. 5090, the general obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017. COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account to the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be made.

Sec. 7018. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7025 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7019. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7028 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7020. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7029 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any twelve month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. However, during the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. However, during the 2017-2019 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7021. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7030 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board, if issuing bonds payable out of building fees, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. However, during the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. However, during the 2015-2017 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. However, during the 2017-2019 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7022. RCW 70.105D.070 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 943 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170.

(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.

(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection, the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.

(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following activities:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;

(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70.105.150;

(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:

(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70.105D.150;

(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and

(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding;

(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters;

(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts;

(t) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the department of ecology's water quality, shorelands, environmental assessment, administration, and air quality programs;

(u) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, actions at the state conservation commission to improve water quality for shellfish;

(v) During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, actions at the University of Washington for reducing ocean acidification;

(w) During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia, for the University of Washington Tacoma soil remediation project;

(x) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be spent on projects in section 3160, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. and for transfer to the local toxics control account;

(y) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste account; and

(z) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, forest practices regulation at the department of natural resources.

(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes in descending order of priority:

(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (e)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under (e)(iv) of this subsection. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:

(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;

(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;

(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up sites;

(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and

(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.170, if the legislature determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts.

(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.

(c) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control account may also be used for local government storm water planning and implementation activities.

(d) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general fund, such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:

(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:

(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;

(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and

(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;

(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;

(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;

(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;

(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:

(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;

(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or

(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;

(vii) When pending grant applications under (e)(iv) and (v) of this subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.

(f) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the department may purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account may be spent on projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction, maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However, this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.

(7) Except during the 2011-2013 and the 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, one percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the state toxics control account.

(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery, the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.

(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. affects the ability of a potentially liable person to receive public funding.

(10) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium the local toxics control account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for the storm water financial assistance program administered by the department of ecology.

(11) During the 2017-2019 biennium the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account may be used for interchangeable purposes and funds may be transferred between accounts to accomplish those purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7023. (1) Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be allotted until final project lists are submitted to the office of financial management. Revisions to the project lists are allowed for projects not anticipated at the time of budget development but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment and must include an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be expended on the revisions. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(2)(a) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. All projects must meet the criteria included in this subsection (2)(a). These projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

(b) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7024. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the water pollution control revolving account, up to

$5,000,000 for fiscal year 2018 and up to $5,000,000 for

fiscal year 2019. . . .$10,000,000

Public works assistance account—state: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account, up to $5,000,000

for fiscal year 2018 and up to $5,000,000 for fiscal

year 2019. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7025. STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account, $3,650,000 for

fiscal year 2018 and $3,650,000 for fiscal year 2019. . . .$7,300,000

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account, $13,700,000 in

fiscal year 2018 and $13,700,000 in fiscal year 2019. . . .$27,400,000

(1)(a) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(b) If, after using the interfund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of any projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, purposes of increasing affordable housing, or need to ensure geographic distribution. If the department uses this authority, the department must submit a prioritized list of projects that may be delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) As directed by the pollution liability insurance agency in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the underground storage tank revolving account the lesser of $20,000,000 or the balance of the fund exceeding $7,500,000 after excluding the reserves during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7026. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7027. The energy recovery act account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the energy recovery act account shall be appropriated and expended for loans, loan guarantees, and grants for projects that encourage the establishment of innovative and sustainable industries for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology, including but not limited to refueling projects, pilot projects for plug-in hybrids, and demonstration projects developed with universities and local governments. State and federal funds and loan repayments are deposited in this account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7028. The public use general aviation airport loan revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys collected under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes described in section 4004 of this act. Only the community aviation revitalization board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7029. The commission, with guidance and instruction from the office of financial management, must create a reporting structure to track the success and progress of addressing the maintenance backlog of state parks facilities. The reporting structure must provide a forecast of new project proposals, the status of current funded projects and a list of completed projects. The report must also include a facilities condition index that illustrates changes to the overall quality of facilities of state parks. The legislature intends to receive future biennia capital budget requests that address facility maintenance backlog from the commission in the form of this new report structure as additional information to the current format for agency budget submittal requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7030. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---