BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.201 and 2016 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a designated mental health professional decides not to detain a person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since a designated mental health professional received a request for investigation and the designated mental health professional has not taken action to have the person detained, an immediate family member or guardian or conservator of the person may petition the superior court for the person's initial detention.

(2) A petition under this section must be filed within ten calendar days following the designated mental health professional investigation or the request for a designated mental health professional investigation. If more than ten days have elapsed, the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator must request a new designated mental health professional investigation.

(3)(a) The petition must be filed in the county in which the designated mental health professional investigation occurred or was requested to occur and must be submitted on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts for this purpose. The petition must be accompanied by a sworn declaration from the petitioner, and other witnesses if desired, describing why the person should be detained for evaluation and treatment. The description of why the person should be detained may contain, but is not limited to, the information identified in RCW 71.05.212.

(b) The petition must contain:

(i) A description of the relationship between the petitioner and the person; and

(ii) The date on which an investigation was requested from the designated mental health professional.

(((3))) (4) The court shall, within one judicial day, review the petition to determine whether the petition raises sufficient evidence to support the allegation. If the court so finds, it shall provide a copy of the petition to the designated mental health professional agency with an order for the agency to provide the court, within one judicial day, with a written sworn statement describing the basis for the decision not to seek initial detention and a copy of all information material to the designated mental health professional's current decision.

(((4))) (5) Following the filing of the petition and before the court reaches a decision, any person, including a mental health professional, may submit a sworn declaration to the court in support of or in opposition to initial detention.

(((5))) (6) The court shall dismiss the petition at any time if it finds that a designated mental health professional has filed a petition for the person's initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or that the person has voluntarily accepted appropriate treatment.

(((6))) (7) The court must issue a final ruling on the petition within five judicial days after it is filed. After reviewing all of the information provided to the court, the court may enter an order for initial detention if the court finds that: (a) There is probable cause to support a petition for detention; and (b) the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily. The court shall transmit its final decision to the petitioner.

(((7))) (8) If the court enters an order for initial detention, it shall provide the order to the designated mental health professional agency((, which shall execute the order without delay)) and issue a written order for apprehension of the person by a peace officer for delivery of the person to a facility or emergency room determined by the designated mental health professional. The designated mental health agency serving the jurisdiction of the court must collaborate and coordinate with law enforcement regarding apprehensions and detentions under this subsection, including sharing of information relating to risk and which would assist in locating the person. A person may not be detained to jail pursuant to a written order issued under this subsection. An order for detention under this section should contain the advisement of rights which the person would receive if the person were detained by a designated mental health professional. An order for initial detention under this section expires one hundred eighty days from issuance.

(((8))) (9) Except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order had been entered under RCW 71.05.150. RCW 71.05.160 does not apply if detention was initiated under the process set forth in this section.

(((9))) (10) For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, or sibling.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.201 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 222 and 2016 c 107 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain a person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, an immediate family member or guardian or conservator of the person may petition the superior court for the person's initial detention.

(2) A petition under this section must be filed within ten calendar days following the designated crisis responder investigation or the request for a designated crisis responder investigation. If more than ten days have elapsed, the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator must request a new designated crisis responder investigation.

(3)(a) The petition must be filed in the county in which the designated ((mental health professional)) crisis responder investigation occurred or was requested to occur and must be submitted on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts for this purpose. The petition must be accompanied by a sworn declaration from the petitioner, and other witnesses if desired, describing why the person should be detained for evaluation and treatment. The description of why the person should be detained may contain, but is not limited to, the information identified in RCW 71.05.212.

(b) The petition must contain:

(i) A description of the relationship between the petitioner and the person; and

(ii) The date on which an investigation was requested from the designated crisis responder.

(((3))) (4) The court shall, within one judicial day, review the petition to determine whether the petition raises sufficient evidence to support the allegation. If the court so finds, it shall provide a copy of the petition to the designated crisis responder agency with an order for the agency to provide the court, within one judicial day, with a written sworn statement describing the basis for the decision not to seek initial detention and a copy of all information material to the designated crisis responder's current decision.

(((4))) (5) Following the filing of the petition and before the court reaches a decision, any person, including a mental health professional, may submit a sworn declaration to the court in support of or in opposition to initial detention.

(((5))) (6) The court shall dismiss the petition at any time if it finds that a designated crisis responder has filed a petition for the person's initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or that the person has voluntarily accepted appropriate treatment.

(((6))) (7) The court must issue a final ruling on the petition within five judicial days after it is filed. After reviewing all of the information provided to the court, the court may enter an order for initial detention if the court finds that: (a) There is probable cause to support a petition for detention; and (b) the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily. The court shall transmit its final decision to the petitioner.

(((7))) (8) If the court enters an order for initial detention, it shall provide the order to the designated crisis responder agency((, which shall execute the order without delay)) and issue a written order for apprehension of the person by a peace officer for delivery of the person to a facility or emergency room determined by the designated crisis responder. The designated crisis responder agency serving the jurisdiction of the court must collaborate and coordinate with law enforcement regarding apprehensions and detentions under this subsection, including sharing of information relating to risk and which would assist in locating the person. A person may not be detained to jail pursuant to a written order issued under this subsection. An order for detention under this section should contain the advisement of rights which the person would receive if the person were detained by a designated crisis responder. An order for initial detention under this section expires one hundred eighty days from issuance.

(((8))) (9) Except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order had been entered under RCW 71.05.150. RCW 71.05.160 does not apply if detention was initiated under the process set forth in this section.

(((9))) (10) For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, or sibling.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.203 and 2015 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department and each ((regional support network)) behavioral health organization or agency employing designated mental health professionals shall publish information in an easily accessible format describing the process for an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to petition for court review of a detention decision under RCW 71.05.201.

(2) A designated mental health professional or designated mental health professional agency that receives a request for investigation for possible detention under this chapter must inquire whether the request comes from an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who would be eligible to petition under RCW 71.05.201. If the designated mental health professional decides not to detain the person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since the request for investigation was received and the designated mental health professional has not taken action to have the person detained, the designated mental health professional or designated mental health professional agency must inform the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who made the request for investigation about the process to petition for court review under RCW 71.05.201.

(3) A designated mental health professional or designated mental health professional agency must, upon request, disclose the date of a designated mental health professional investigation under this chapter to an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator of a person to assist in the preparation of a petition under RCW 71.05.201.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.203 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 223 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department and each behavioral health organization or agency employing designated crisis responders shall publish information in an easily accessible format describing the process for an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator to petition for court review of a detention decision under RCW 71.05.201.

(2) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency that receives a request for investigation for possible detention under this chapter must inquire whether the request comes from an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who would be eligible to petition under RCW 71.05.201. If the designated crisis responder decides not to detain the person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or forty-eight hours have elapsed since the request for investigation was received and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must inform the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator who made the request for investigation about the process to petition for court review under RCW 71.05.201.

(3) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must, upon request, disclose the date of a designated crisis responder investigation under this chapter to an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator of a person to assist in the preparation of a petition under RCW 71.05.201.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. By December 15, 2017, the administrative office of the courts, in collaboration with stakeholders, including but not limited to judges, prosecutors, defense attorneys, the department of social and health services, behavioral health advocates, and families, shall: (1) Develop a user's guide to assist pro se litigants in the preparation and filing of a Joel's law petition; and (2) develop a model order of detention under RCW 71.05.201 which contains an advisement of rights for the detained person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect April 1, 2018.

--- END ---