BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature recognizes that collegiate sports play an important role in the campus educational process. The legislature finds that fiscal realities and the core function of institutions of higher education necessitate greater oversight of athletic budgets.

(2) Any institution of higher education that operates an athletic department budget deficit for three consecutive calendar years must have its athletic budget approved by the senate commerce, labor, and sports committee.

--- END ---