BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.32.045 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department, are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in which the taxable activities occur.

(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.

(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.

(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns and pay any taxes otherwise due under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW if the following conditions are met:

(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW, is ((less than:

(i) Twenty-eight thousand dollars per year; or

(ii) Forty-six thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars per year)):

(i) For persons generating less than fifty percent of their taxable amount from activities taxable under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), and 82.04.285, less than:

(A) Twenty-eight thousand dollars per year through June 30, 2018;

(B) One hundred thousand dollars per year beginning July 1, 2018; or

(ii) For persons generating at least fifty percent of their taxable amount from activities taxable under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), and 82.04.285, less than one hundred thousand dollars per year;

(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand dollars per year; and

(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to collect.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.4451 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as provided in this section. The maximum credit for a taxpayer for a reporting period is determined by multiplying the applicable maximum monthly credit amount provided in (a) or (b) of this subsection by the number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.

(a) Except for taxpayers that report at least fifty percent of their taxable amount under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), and 82.04.285, the maximum ((credit for a taxpayer for a reporting period is thirty-five dollars multiplied by the number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045. For a taxpayer that reports at least fifty percent of its taxable amount under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), and 82.04.285, the maximum credit for a reporting period is seventy dollars multiplied by the number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045)) monthly credit amount for a taxpayer is:

(i) Thirty-five dollars through June 30, 2018; and

(ii) One hundred twenty-five dollars beginning July 1, 2018.

(b) For a taxpayer that reports at least fifty percent of its taxable amount under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), and 82.04.285, the maximum monthly credit amount is one hundred twenty-five dollars.

(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.

(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not less than zero.

(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table prepared by the department under this subsection must be used by all taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.29002 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning May 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013, an additional rate of tax of 0.30 percent is added to the rate provided for in RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.285, and 82.04.290(2)(a).

(2) Beginning July 1, 2017, an additional rate of tax of 1.0 percent is added to the rate provided for in RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.285(1), and 82.04.290(2)(a). All revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230.

(3)(a) The additional rate in subsections (1) and (2) of this section ((does)) do not apply to persons engaging within this state in business as a hospital. "Hospital" has the meaning provided in chapter 70.41 RCW but also includes any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

(b) The additional rates in subsections (1) and (2) of this section ((does)) do not apply to amounts received from performing scientific research and development services including but not limited to research and development in the physical, engineering, and life sciences (such as agriculture, bacteriological, biotechnology, chemical, life sciences, and physical science research and development laboratories or services).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---