BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 52.16.160 and 2002 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the limitation of dollar rates contained in RCW 52.16.130, and in addition to any levy for the payment of the principal and interest of any outstanding general obligation bonds and in addition to any levy authorized by RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140 or any other statute, the board of fire commissioners of any fire protection district within such county((, which fire protection district has at least one full-time, paid employee, or contracts with another municipal corporation for the services of at least one full-time, paid employee,)) is hereby authorized to levy each year an ad valorem tax on all taxable property within such district of not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, which levy may be made only if it will not affect dollar rates which other taxing districts may lawfully claim nor cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional and/or statutory limitations.

--- END ---