BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Beginning on the effective date of this section, a nonrefundable additional fee is imposed on all applications and renewals of licenses relating to marijuana required under chapter 69.50 RCW. The fee applies to all applications and license modifications received on or after the effective date of this section and renewals where the date of the license expiration is on or after June 30, 2017. The fee is four hundred eighty dollars. This fee is to be used for the replacement of the state liquor and cannabis board's traceability system.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2018.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.325 and 2016 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers and to produce marijuana plants for sale to cooperatives as described under RCW 69.51A.250, regulated by the state liquor and cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The production, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana producer's license shall be one thousand three hundred dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer intends to produce marijuana.

(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process, package, and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and marijuana retailers, regulated by the state liquor and cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The processing, packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, and marijuana concentrates in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW and the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, by a validly licensed marijuana processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana processor's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana processor's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana processor's license shall be one thousand three hundred dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.

(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at retail in retail outlets, regulated by the state liquor and cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana retailer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana retailer's license shall be one thousand three hundred dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana retailer intends to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.372 and 2016 sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A marijuana research license is established that permits a licensee to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the following limited research purposes:

(a) To test chemical potency and composition levels;

(b) To conduct clinical investigations of marijuana-derived drug products;

(c) To conduct research on the efficacy and safety of administering marijuana as part of medical treatment; and

(d) To conduct genomic or agricultural research.

(2) As part of the application process for a marijuana research license, an applicant must submit to the liquor and cannabis board's designated scientific reviewer a description of the research that is intended to be conducted. The liquor and cannabis board must select a scientific reviewer to review an applicant's research project and determine that it meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, as well as assess the following:

(a) Project quality, study design, value, or impact;

(b) Whether applicants have the appropriate personnel, expertise, facilities/infrastructure, funding, and human/animal/other federal approvals in place to successfully conduct the project; and

(c) Whether the amount of marijuana to be grown by the applicant is consistent with the project's scope and goals.

If the scientific reviewer determines that the research project does not meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the application must be denied.

(3) A marijuana research licensee may only sell marijuana grown or within its operation to other marijuana research licensees. The liquor and cannabis board may revoke a marijuana research license for violations of this subsection.

(4) A marijuana research licensee may contract with the University of Washington or Washington State University to perform research in conjunction with the university. All research projects, not including those projects conducted pursuant to a contract entered into under RCW 28B.20.502(3), must be approved by the scientific reviewer and meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

(5) In establishing a marijuana research license, the liquor and cannabis board may adopt rules on the following:

(a) Application requirements;

(b) Marijuana research license renewal requirements, including whether additional research projects may be added or considered;

(c) Conditions for license revocation;

(d) Security measures to ensure marijuana is not diverted to purposes other than research;

(e) Amount of plants, useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products a licensee may have on its premises;

(f) Licensee reporting requirements;

(g) Conditions under which marijuana grown by marijuana processors may be donated to marijuana research licensees; and

(h) Additional requirements deemed necessary by the liquor and cannabis board.

(6) The production, processing, possession, delivery, donation, and sale of marijuana in accordance with this section and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana researcher, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana research license must be issued in the name of the applicant, must specify the location at which the marijuana researcher intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof may not allow any other person to use the license.

(7) The application fee for a marijuana research license is two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana research license is one thousand three hundred dollars. The applicant must pay the cost of the review process directly to the scientific reviewer as designated by the liquor and cannabis board.

(8) The scientific reviewer shall review any reports made by marijuana research licensees under liquor and cannabis board rule and provide the liquor and cannabis board with its determination on whether the research project continues to meet research qualifications under this section.

(9) For the purposes of this section, "scientific reviewer" means an organization that convenes or contracts with persons who have the training and experience in research practice and research methodology to determine whether a project meets the criteria for a marijuana research license under this section and to review any reports submitted by marijuana research licensees under liquor and cannabis board rule. "Scientific reviewers" include, but are not limited to, educational institutions, research institutions, peer review bodies, or such other organizations that are focused on science or research in its day-to-day activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---