BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16A.130 and 2010 c 161 s 429 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall notify motor vehicle owners, in paper or electronic form, of the liability insurance requirements described in RCW 46.16A.110, 46.16A.040, and 46.30.020 through 46.30.040 at the time of issuance of an original motor vehicle registration and when the department sends a motor vehicle registration renewal notice.

(2) The department must not issue an original vehicle registration on or after July 1, 2018, or a renewal vehicle registration due on or after July 1, 2018, unless the applicant attests to having, and provides proof of meeting, the financial responsibility requirements for operating a motor vehicle as provided in RCW 46.30.020 through 46.30.040.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16A.110 and 2014 c 80 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner or the registered owner's authorized representative must apply for a renewal vehicle registration to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form approved by the director. The application for a renewal vehicle registration must be accompanied by a draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash for all fees and taxes required by law for the application for a renewal vehicle registration. On or after July 1, 2018, the application must be accompanied by current proof of financial responsibility for the registered owner to operate a vehicle as required in RCW 46.30.020. The application, either in paper or electronic form, must also include a field designating the applicant's liability insurance policy information.

(2)(a) When a vehicle changes ownership, the person taking ownership or his or her authorized representative must apply for a renewal vehicle registration as provided in subsection (1) of this section and, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, pay all the taxes and fees that are due at the time of registration renewal. For the purposes of this section, when a vehicle is sold to a vehicle dealer for resale, the application for a renewal registration need not be made until the vehicle is sold by the vehicle dealer.

(b) The person taking ownership or his or her authorized representative must be given credit for the portion of a motor vehicle excise tax, including the motor vehicle excise tax collected under RCW 81.104.160, that reflects the remaining period for which the tax was initially paid by the previous owner.

(3) An application and the fees and taxes for a renewal vehicle registration must be handled in the same manner as an original vehicle registration application. The registration does not need to show the name of the lien holder when the application for renewal vehicle registration becomes the renewal registration upon validation.

(4) A person expecting to be out of state during the normal renewal period of a vehicle registration may renew a vehicle registration and have license plates or tabs preissued by applying for a renewal as described in subsection (1) of this section. A vehicle registration may be renewed for the subsequent registration year up to eighteen months before the current expiration date and must be displayed from the date of issue or from the day of the expiration of the current registration year, whichever date is later.

(5) The department must reimburse its agents, including county auditors, for the costs associated with returning vehicle registration renewal applications that are submitted without proof of financial responsibility as required in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) An application for a renewal vehicle registration is not required for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by:

(a) The state of Washington, or by any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington; or

(b) A governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state and recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department of the interior.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.16A.040 and 2010 c 161 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An owner or the owner's authorized representative must apply for an original vehicle registration to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished by the department. The application must contain:

(a) A description of the vehicle, including its make, model, vehicle identification number, type of body, and power to be used;

(b) The name and address of the person who is the registered owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security interest, the name and address of the secured party;

(c) Current proof of financial responsibility for the owner to operate a vehicle as required in RCW 46.30.020. The application, either in paper or electronic form, must also include a field designating the applicant's liability insurance policy information;

(d) The purpose for which the vehicle is to be used;

(((d))) (e) The licensed gross weight for the vehicle, which is:

(i) The adult seating capacity, including the operator, as provided for in RCW 46.16A.455(1) if the vehicle will be operated as a for hire vehicle or auto stage and has a seating capacity of more than six; or

(ii) The gross weight declared by the applicant as required in RCW 46.16A.455(2) if the vehicle will be operated as a motor truck, tractor, or truck tractor;

(((e))) (f) The empty scale weight of the vehicle; and

(((f))) (g) Other information that the department may require.

(2) The registered owner or the registered owner's authorized representative shall sign the application for an original vehicle registration and certify that the statements on the application are true to the best of the applicant's knowledge.

(3) The application for an original vehicle registration must be accompanied by a draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash for all fees and taxes due for the application for an original vehicle registration.

(4) The department must reimburse its agents, including county auditors, for the costs associated with returning original vehicle registration applications that are submitted without proof of financial responsibility.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.30.040 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial responsibility to a law enforcement officer ((or)), to a court, or to the department on an application for an original vehicle registration or a renewal vehicle registration, including an expired or canceled insurance policy, bond, or certificate of deposit, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---