BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.105 and 2000 c 115 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department may provide a method to distinguish the driver's license of a person who is under the age of twenty-one from the driver's license of a person who is twenty-one years of age or older.

(b) The department must allow for a person who applies to renew his or her driver's license within one week of his or her twenty-first birthday to convert the driver's license to the format of a driver's license for a person who is twenty-one years of age or older.

(2) An instruction permit must be identified as an "instruction permit" and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the department.

(3) An intermediate license must be identified as an "intermediate license" and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---