BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.95B RCW to read as follows:

The wastewater treatment plant operator certification account is created in the state treasury. All fees paid pursuant to RCW 70.95B.095 and any other receipts realized in the administration of this chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys from the account must be used by the department to carry out the purposes of the wastewater treatment plant operator certification program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 70.95B.150 (Administration of chapter—Receipts—Payment to general fund) and 1973 c 139 s 15 are each repealed.

--- END ---