BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.350 and 1997 c 321 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) There shall be a wine and beer retailer's license to be designated as a snack bar license to sell at retail, wine by the glass and beer by the opened bottle or can ((at retail,)). The beverages are only for consumption upon the premises ((only, such license to)).

(b) The license may be issued to a business whose main purpose is to provide instruction to their customers and where customers participate in art activities such as painting, pottery, or sculpting. The business must meet all other requirements of this section.

(2) The licenses may only be issued to places where the sale of wine or beer is not the principal business ((conducted; fee)).

(3) The wine and beer must be consumed in a designated seating area, which may include an area where an instructor leads group activities.

(4) The license fee is set at one hundred twenty-five dollars per year.

--- END ---