BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to appropriation, a health plan offered to employees and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2019, must include coverage for hearing instruments. Coverage must include a new hearing instrument every five years and services and supplies such as the initial assessment, fitting, adjustment, and auditory training.

(2) The hearing instrument must be recommended by a licensed audiologist or hearing aid specialist and dispensed by a licensed audiologist or hearing aid specialist.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "hearing instrument" and "hearing aid specialist" have the same meaning as defined in RCW 18.35.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The medical assistance coverage offered under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2019, must include coverage for hearing instruments when medically necessary. Coverage must include a new hearing instrument every five years, a new hearing instrument when alterations to the existing hearing instrument cannot meet the needs of the patient, and services and supplies such as the initial assessment, fitting, adjustment, and auditory training.

(2) The hearing instrument must be recommended by a licensed audiologist or hearing aid specialist and dispensed by a licensed audiologist or hearing aid specialist.

(3) For purposes of this section, "hearing instrument" and "hearing aid specialist" have the same meaning as defined in RCW 18.35.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of section 2 of this act, referencing section 2 of this act by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2018, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 2 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---