BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The state recognizes the need for person-centered services that enable developmentally disabled clients to have greater access to their community, regardless of the degree of each client's disability or level of acuity. The state further recognizes that employment is highly effective for many and should be encouraged and offered at the outset for individuals age twenty-one and older. However, for others with significant barriers to employment that may or may not be overcome the state appreciates the need for community access services to be available instead of employment or as a complementary service to enhance employment discovery prospects, provide skill development, and provide community involvement and meaningful activities.

Sec. 2. RCW 71A.12.290 and 2012 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Clients age twenty-one and older who are receiving employment services must be offered the choice to transition to a community access program after nine months of enrollment in an employment program, and the option to transition from a community access program to an employment program at any time. Enrollment in an employment program begins at the time the client is authorized to receive employment.

(2) Prior approval by the department shall not be required to effectuate the client's choice to transition from an employment program to community access services after verifying nine months of participation in employment-related services.

(3))) Clients of the department age twenty-one and older must have the option to select employment services or community access services at the outset or at any point during the discovery process. The client must be able to opt in and out of either service at any time. Services shall be based on the client's person-centered plan and appropriate for the needs of the individual client. Services may include a variety of supports and providers that will enable individuals to have greater access to their community, regardless of the degree of each client's disability.

(2) The department shall inform clients and their legal representatives of all available options for employment and ((day services, including the opportunity to request an exception from enrollment in an employment program)) community access at the outset of the discovery process. Information provided to the client and the client's legal representative must include the types of activities each service option provides, and the amount, scope, and duration of service for which the client would be eligible under each service option. ((An individual client may be authorized for only one service option, either employment services or community access services. Clients may not participate in more than one of these services at any given time.

(4))) (3) The department shall work with counties and stakeholders to strengthen and expand ((the existing community access program, including the consideration of options that allow for alternative service settings outside of the client's residence. The program should emphasize support for the clients so that they are able to participate in activities that integrate them into their community and support independent living and skills.

(5) The department shall develop rules to allow for an exception to the requirement that a client participate in an employment program for nine months prior to transitioning to a community access program)) employment services and other community access services. Community access services should emphasize supports and activities that increase community involvement, maintain or improve skills and independence, and meet the diversity of person-centered needs.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "person-centered plan" means the individual support plan conducted and formulated for each client prior to receiving services. Clients must have the ability to revise their person-centered plan if it does not align with their individual needs.

--- END ---