BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.18.245 and 2015 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner who is an eligible family member of a member of the United States armed forces who died while in service to his or her country, or as a result of his or her service, may apply to the department for special gold star license plates for use on a motor vehicle. The registered owner must:

(a) Be a resident of this state;

(b) Provide proof to the satisfaction of the department that the registered owner is an eligible family member, which includes:

(i) A widow;

(ii) A widower;

(iii) A biological parent;

(iv) An adoptive parent;

(v) A stepparent;

(vi) An adult in loco parentis or foster parent;

(vii) A biological child;

(viii) An adopted child; or

(ix) A sibling;

(c) Provide certification from the Washington state department of veterans affairs that the registered owner qualifies for the special license plate under this section;

(d) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on which the gold star license plates will be displayed; and

(e) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering the motor vehicle.

(2)(a) In addition to the license plate fee exemption in subsection (3)(b) of this section, the widow or widower recipient of a gold star license plate under this section is also exempt from annual vehicle registration fees for one personal use motor vehicle. The widow or widower recipient of a gold star license plate under this section may also apply for a standard issue license plate or any qualifying special license plate for one personal use motor vehicle and be exempt from both annual vehicle registration fees and license plate fees for that vehicle.

(b) In lieu of applying for a gold star license plate under this section, an eligible widow or widower under subsection (1)(b) of this section may apply for a standard issue license plate or any qualifying special license plate for one personal use motor vehicle and be exempt from both annual vehicle registration fees and license plate fees for that vehicle.

(3) Gold star license plates must be issued:

(a) Only for motor vehicles owned by qualifying applicants; and

(b) Without payment of any license plate fee.

(4) Gold star license plates must be replaced, free of charge, if the license plates become lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed.

(5) Gold star license plates may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the eligible family member, as described in subsection (1) of this section, upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

--- END ---