BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When any employee of a public agency has reasonable cause to believe that a person located on agency property has a warrant issued for his or her arrest, the employee shall immediately make a report or cause a report to be made to a local law enforcement agency.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Immediately" means the report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no case longer than one business day after the employee had knowledge of the person on agency property.

(b) "Public agency" means any state or local agency in Washington.

(c) "Reasonable cause" means the employee has credible information regarding the status of a warrant and the location of the person.

(3) Nothing in this section creates a duty for public agencies or their employees to investigate whether there is a warrant for a person's arrest.

--- END ---