BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

School districts are not liable for civil damages resulting from criminal acts committed by any of their students that occur outside of the district's custody or supervision.

--- END ---