BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 68.54 RCW to read as follows:

Territory within a cemetery district may be withdrawn from the district in the same manner provided by law for withdrawal of territory from water-sewer districts, as provided by chapter 57.28 RCW, except that no territory within a cemetery district may be withdrawn unless a special election is held and a majority of votes cast by qualified voters residing within the district approve the withdrawal. Agreement between the district board of commissioners and the county legislative authority on the findings of fact under RCW 57.28.080 does not preclude an election under this section.

--- END ---