BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2013 c 255 s 1 and 2009 c 418 s 7 (uncodified) are each amended to read as follows:

Section 5 of this act expires January 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2013 c 255 s 2 and 2010 c 126 s 15 (uncodified);

(2) 2013 c 255 s 3 and 2010 c 126 s 16 (uncodified); and

(3) 2010 c 126 s 12.

--- END ---