BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 31, 2018, the superior courts of each county with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more shall fully implement the electronic filing of documents in compliance with the court rules, electronic filing technical standards, and the recommendations of the Washington state auditor's office.

(2) By December 31, 2019, the superior courts of every county and the appellate courts shall fully implement the electronic filing of documents in compliance with the court rules, electronic filing technical standards, and the recommendations of the Washington state auditor's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. By December 1, 2017, the Washington state auditor's office shall assess the current utilization of electronic filing by Washington superior and appellate courts and make recommendations to the governor, appropriate committees of the legislature, and the Washington supreme court regarding the full statewide mandatory implementation of the electronic filing of documents in compliance with the court rules, electronic filing technical standards, and section 1 of this act. The recommendations shall emphasize the utilization of existing systems and resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, from the general fund to the Washington state auditor's office for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---