BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.28.360 and 2014 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Licensees holding either a license that permits or a license with an endorsement that permits the sale of beer to a purchaser in a container supplied by the licensee or a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser and filled at the tap at the time of sale may similarly sell cider and other wine except fortified wine to a purchaser in such a container. Nothing in this section relieves a licensee from complying with federal law.

(2) For purposes of this section, "cider" has the same meaning as in RCW 66.24.210(6).

--- END ---