BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

The imposition of controls on rent is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No city or town of any class may enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions which regulate the amount of rent to be charged for commercial rental structures or sites other than properties in public ownership or properties under public management. This section does not prohibit any city or town from entering into agreements with private persons which regulate or control the amount of rent to be charged for commercial properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

The imposition of controls on rent is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No code city may enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions which regulate the amount of rent to be charged for commercial rental structures or sites other than properties in public ownership or properties under public management. This section does not prohibit any code city from entering into agreements with private persons which regulate or control the amount of rent to be charged for commercial properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

The imposition of controls on rent is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No county may enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions which regulate the amount of rent to be charged for commercial rental structures or sites other than properties in public ownership or properties under public management. This section does not prohibit any county from entering into agreements with private persons which regulate or control the amount of rent to be charged for commercial properties.

--- END ---