BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that some areas of Washington state are destination locations for recreational steelhead fishing that are supported wholly or in large part by wild steelhead populations. In these areas, recreational fishing is important to local anglers, guides, local businesses, and people from around the state and country who seek out a unique high quality recreational steelhead fishing experience. The popularity of these fisheries continues to grow, increasing the angling pressure on wild steelhead and diminishing the recreational fishing experience. It is the intent of the legislature to establish two pilot projects for two such areas, the Olympic Peninsula and Klickitat river, modeled on successful recreational steelhead management programs in other states and countries. Under the two pilot projects, these areas will be recognized as destination steelhead fisheries and managed to sustain healthy wild steelhead populations and high quality recreational fishing opportunity.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) Destination recreational steelhead fishery pilot projects are established for the Olympic Peninsula and Klickitat river. The objectives of the pilot projects are to protect the health and viability of wild steelhead while providing consistent, high quality fishing opportunity for nonguided and guided recreational anglers by ensuring that the level of guided angling does not adversely impact wild steelhead populations or the recreational fishing experience. The standards for each of these pilot projects may be supplemented by the department based on input from affected stakeholders in each pilot project area, but must at least meet the minimum requirements in this chapter.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Destination steelhead fishery pilot projects are established for the Olympic Peninsula and Klickitat river through June 30, 2022. The geographic area of the Olympic Peninsula pilot project is from the Queets river to the Elwha river, inclusive of all river areas between. The provisions of the Olympic Peninsula destination fishery pilot project apply to steelhead fishing from December 1st to April 30th. The geographic area of the Klickitat river pilot project is the entirety of the river. The provisions of the Klickitat river destination fishery pilot project apply to steelhead fishing from September 15th to November 30th.

(2) During the pilot project period, any recreational fishing guide working within the pilot project area and season must either purchase a destination fishery guide tag specific to that area or work for an outfitter holding an outfitter tag specific to that area. Both tags must be made available only during the first year of the pilot project and any guide or outfitter not obtaining such a tag during the first year cannot purchase a tag during the remainder of the pilot project period. The fee for the destination fishery guide tag is five hundred dollars per year. The fee for the destination fishery outfitter tag is two thousand five hundred dollars per year. The department must deposit amounts collected in the recreational steelhead fishery pilot project account created in section 4 of this act.

(3) To qualify for the destination fishery guide tag, an applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that he or she has held a Washington state fish guide license for the prior four years and has generated fishing guide income from work within the pilot project area for at least the prior two years. To qualify for the destination fishery outfitter tag, an applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that he or she has been operating as an outfitter for the prior four years and has generated income and employed guides within the pilot project area for at least the prior two years. The number of guides employed by an outfitter in a single fishery season may be lower than, but may not exceed, the number of guides they can demonstrate they have employed or contracted with in the fishery each year during the past two years.

(4) During the pilot project period, the destination fishery guide or outfitter tag cannot be sold or transferred. If the destination fishery guide or outfitter tag is not renewed on an annual basis during the pilot project, it cannot be repurchased during the pilot project period.

(5) Recreational fishing guides must provide information to the department through guide log books, in a format developed by the department. Log books must include at least: Daily guide information including, but not limited to, specific areas worked; hours fished; number of guided angler clients; and fish caught. Guide log books must be returned to the department with a frequency and in a manner prescribed by the department.

(6) After the first two years of the pilot projects, the department must calculate the total number of guided rod days in each pilot project area during the prior two years. A "rod day" means one person who fishes with a guide for one day or a substantial portion thereof. A single trip by a guide with two recreational anglers both fishing would count as two rod days. Within each pilot project area, the department must convene a stakeholder process for the purpose of reviewing rod day, catch records, and other data, assessing the level of fishing pressure, and recommending management provisions that would ensure that recreational fishing pressure does not adversely impact steelhead populations or the recreational fishing experience. The recommended management provisions could be within the department's current legal authority or could require legislative action. The department must provide a report to the legislature prior to the end of the pilot project regarding any permanent statutory changes that would further the purpose of this chapter.

(7) The department may establish other administrative provisions for pilot project participants, including vessel decal requirements specific to the pilot project.

(8) In developing these destination fishery pilot projects, the department is encouraged to seek stakeholder input on other river systems, species, and seasons that may warrant designation as a destination fishery.

(9) This section expires June 30, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The recreational steelhead fishery pilot project account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts received from tags sold under section 3 of this act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to implement the pilot projects established under this chapter with an emphasis on additional enforcement, monitoring, and other functions within the destination fishery areas intended to advance the purposes of the pilot projects. Only the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2022.

Sec. 5. RCW 77.65.500 and 2015 c 97 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Licensed taxidermists, fur dealers, anadromous game fish buyers, fishing guides as required under chapter 77.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 6 of this act), game farmers, and persons stocking game fish or conducting a hunting, fishing, or field trial contest shall make reports as required by rules of the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

--- END ---