BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds:

(a) Washington state celebrates the rich cultural heritage and diversity of its residents;

(b) Freedom of religion and protection from persecution on the basis of religion is one of the founding ideals of the nation; and

(c) Washington must uphold the protection of religious freedom enshrined in the United States Constitution for all of its people, and the state has a moral obligation to protect its citizens from religious persecution.

(2) An agency shall not provide or disclose to federal authorities personal information regarding the religious affiliation of any individual that is requested for the purpose of compiling a database of individuals based solely on religious affiliation.

(3) As used in this section, "agency" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.

--- END ---