BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 81.112.050 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 328 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of formation, the area to be included within the boundary of the authority shall be that area set forth in the system plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. Prior to submitting the system and financing plan to the voters, the authority may make adjustments to the boundaries as deemed appropriate but must assure that, to the extent possible, the boundaries: (a) Include the largest-population urban growth area designated by each county under chapter 36.70A RCW; and (b) follow election precinct boundaries. If a portion of any city is determined to be within the service area, the entire city must be included within the boundaries of the authority. Subsequent to formation, when territory is annexed to a city located within the boundaries of the authority, the territory is simultaneously included within the boundaries of the authority and subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations applicable within the city with respect to the authority as provided in RCW 35.13.500 and 35A.14.475, subject to RCW 84.09.030 and 82.14.055, and notwithstanding any other provision of law.

(2)(a) After voters within the authority boundaries have approved the system and financing plan, elections to add areas contiguous to the authority boundaries may be called by resolution of the regional transit authority, after consultation with affected transit agencies and with the concurrence of the legislative authority of the city or town if the area is incorporated, or with the concurrence of the county legislative authority if the area is unincorporated. Only those areas that would benefit from the services provided by the authority may be included and services or projects proposed for the area must be consistent with the regional transportation plan. The election may include a single ballot proposition providing for annexation to the authority boundaries and imposition of the taxes at rates already imposed within the authority boundaries, subject to RCW 84.09.030 and 82.14.055.

(b)(i) Elections to add counties or portions of counties west of the crest of the Cascade mountains that are contiguous with counties already within the authority boundaries may be called by resolution of the regional transit authority, after consultation with affected transit agencies and with the concurrence of the legislative authority of the city or town if the area is incorporated, the concurrence of the county legislative authority if the area is unincorporated, or with the concurrence of each of the affected legislative authorities if the area contains both incorporated and unincorporated areas. Only those areas that would benefit from the services provided by the authority may be included, and services or projects proposed for the area must be consistent with the regional transportation plan. The election may include a single ballot proposition providing for annexation to the authority boundaries and imposition of the taxes at rates already imposed within the authority boundaries. The boundaries of any annexations that occur pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) must follow one or more of the following: Visible physical geography, such as streets; school district boundaries; or precinct boundaries.

(ii) Any county or portion of a county added to the authority pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) is considered a separate transportation subarea for purposes of any transportation subarea equity element utilized by the authority.

--- END ---