BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state of Washington would benefit from the consistency and predictability of observing Pacific Standard Time throughout the calendar year. Research has shown that changing to and from daylight saving time twice per year has negative impacts on public health, increases traffic accidents and crime, disrupts agriculture scheduling, and hinders economic growth. Scientific studies have connected a number of health consequences with the act of switching between standard time and daylight saving time, including greater risks of heart attacks, more frequent workplace injuries, and increased suicide rates in the days immediately after the switch. Therefore, the legislature intends to exercise the rights granted under the uniform time act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 260a(a), and exempt the state of Washington from daylight saving time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The time of the state of Washington shall be Pacific Standard Time throughout the calendar year, as determined by reference to Coordinated Universal Time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW 1.20.051 (Daylight saving time) and 1963 c 14 s 1 & 1961 c 3 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---