BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The secretary of state and legislature recognize the importance of voting and voter registration. To ensure that all eligible citizens can conveniently register to vote, Washington state has fully implemented motor voter registration through the department of licensing, agency-based voter registration, voter registration by mail, in-person voter registration, and online voter registration. In addition, the secretary of state delivers a voter information pamphlet to every household in Washington state that includes information about how to register to vote. Voter registration information is provided to college students at the time of registration for classes and the secretary of state sends voter registration information to all young people when they turn eighteen years of age. Annually, following ongoing voter registration list maintenance, the secretary of state contacts potentially eligible, but not yet registered voters, with registration information. Voter registration information is also provided in several languages, and in forms accessible to persons with disabilities. Materials are also available to persons conducting voter registration drives.

Participation in voting by those between the ages of eighteen and twenty-four is the lowest of any age group. If a person views voting as important at age eighteen, they are likely to become a lifelong voter. It is the intent of the secretary of state and legislature to formalize a registration sign up process for those not yet eighteen, to authorize all persons seventeen years old to sign up to register to vote, and to engage these new voters and encourage their civic participation in an educational environment.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.150 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.090 are each amended to read as follows:

On January 16th of each year or the preceding Friday when January 16th falls on a nonschool day, there shall be observed within each public school "Temperance and Good Citizenship Day." Annually the state superintendent of public instruction shall duly prepare and publish for circulation among the teachers of the state a program for use on such day embodying topics pertinent thereto and may from year to year designate particular laws for special observance.

Each year on "Temperance and Good Citizenship Day," or another day designated by the secretary of state, there shall be an event, coordinated by the county auditor of each county, in each history or social studies class attended by high school seniors encouraging students seventeen years of age or older to sign up to register or register to vote online from the classroom, if funds are provided for county auditor outreach activities. The students shall be given adequate time to complete the preregistration or registration process.

Sec. 3. RCW 29A.08.110 and 2009 c 369 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the original date of mailing ((or)), date of delivery, or eighteenth birthday, whichever is applicable. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes. Within sixty days after the receipt of an application or transfer, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first-class nonforwardable mail, an acknowledgment notice identifying the registrant's precinct and containing such other information as may be required by the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to the auditor any card which is not deliverable.

(2) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice shall require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within forty-five days, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the original date of application. The applicant shall not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person may sign up to register to vote if he or she is seventeen years of age.

(2) A person who signs up to register to vote may not vote until reaching eighteen years of age, and his or her name may not be added to the statewide voter registration database list of voters until such time as he or she is eighteen years of age or will be eighteen years of age before the next election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who has attained seventeen years of age may sign up to register to vote by submitting a voter registration application by mail or online.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) If signing up to register by mail, the person must provide a signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) If signing up to register online, the person must authorize the use of his or her signature on file with department of licensing for voter registration purposes.

(5) The applicant must affirmatively acknowledge that he or she will not vote until his or her eighteenth birthday.

(6) The secretary of state may employ additional security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter preregistration applications submitted electronically.

Sec. 6. RCW 29A.08.125 and 2009 c 369 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the secretary of state shall maintain a statewide voter registration database. This database must be a centralized, uniform, interactive computerized statewide voter registration list that contains the name and registration information of every registered voter in the state.

(2) The statewide list is the official list of registered voters for the conduct of all elections.

(3) The statewide list must include, but is not limited to, the name, date of birth, residence address, signature, gender, and date of registration of every legally registered voter in the state.

(4) A unique identifier must be assigned to each registered voter in the state.

(5) The database must be coordinated with other government databases within the state including, but not limited to, the department of corrections, the department of licensing, the department of health, the administrative office of the courts, and county auditors. The database may also be coordinated with the databases of election officials in other states.

(6) Authorized employees of the secretary of state and each county auditor must have immediate electronic access to the information maintained in the database.

(7) Voter registration information received by each county auditor must be electronically entered into the database. The office of the secretary of state must provide support, as needed, to enable each county auditor to enter and maintain voter registration information in the state database.

(8) The secretary of state has data authority over all voter registration data.

(9) The voter registration database must be designed to accomplish at a minimum, the following:

(a) Comply with the help America vote act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252);

(b) Identify duplicate voter registrations;

(c) Identify suspected duplicate voters;

(d) Screen against any available databases maintained by other government agencies to identify voters who are ineligible to vote due to a felony conviction, lack of citizenship, or mental incompetence;

(e) Provide images of voters' signatures for the purpose of checking signatures on initiative and referendum petitions;

(f) Provide for a comparison between the voter registration database and the department of licensing change of address database;

(g) Provide access for county auditors that includes the capability to update registrations and search for duplicate registrations; ((and))

(h) Provide for the cancellation of registrations of voters who have moved out of state; and

(i) Provide for the storage of pending registration records for persons seventeen years of age in a manner that these records will not appear on the official list of registered voters until the future registrant is eligible to vote.

(10) The secretary of state may, upon agreement with other appropriate jurisdictions, screen against any available databases maintained by election officials in other states and databases maintained by federal agencies including, but not limited to, the federal bureau of investigation, the federal court system, the federal bureau of prisons, and the bureau of citizenship and immigration services.

(11) The database shall retain information regarding previous successful appeals of proposed cancellations of registrations in order to avoid repeated cancellations for the same reason.

(12) Each county auditor shall maintain a list of all registered voters within the county that are contained on the official statewide voter registration list. In addition to the information maintained in the statewide database, the county database must also maintain the applicable taxing district and precinct codes for each voter in the county, and a list of elections in which the individual voted.

(13) Each county auditor shall allow electronic access and information transfer between the county's voter registration system and the official statewide voter registration list.

Sec. 7. RCW 29A.08.210 and 2009 c 369 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application providing the following information concerning his or her qualifications as a voter in this state:

(1) The former address of the applicant if previously registered to vote;

(2) The applicant's full name;

(3) The applicant's date of birth;

(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;

(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;

(6) The sex of the applicant;

(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number, Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's social security number if he or she does not have a Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification card;

(8) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that he or she is an overseas voter;

(9) A check box allowing the applicant to confirm that he or she is at least eighteen years of age or will be eighteen years of age ((by the next election)) before voting;

(10) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United States citizen in order to register to vote;

(11) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;

(12) The following warning:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."

(13) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the applicant's signature; and

(14) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.

This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to be prescribed by the secretary of state.

Sec. 8. RCW 29A.08.615 and 2003 c 111 s 238 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Registered voters are divided into two categories, "active" and "inactive." All registered voters are classified as active, unless assigned to inactive status by the county auditor.

(2) Persons signing up to register to vote who have not yet reached eighteen years of age are classified as "pending" until attaining eighteen years of age.

Sec. 9. RCW 29A.08.710 and 2005 c 246 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the original voter registration records for each county. The original voter registration form must be filed without regard to precinct and is considered confidential and unavailable for public inspection and copying. An automated file of all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to RCW 29A.08.125. An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of filing or maintaining the original voter registration forms if the automated file includes all of the information from the original voter registration forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable facsimile of each voter's signature.

(2) The following information contained in voter registration records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available for public inspection and copying, except as provided in RCW 40.24.060: The voter's name, address, political jurisdiction, gender, date of birth, voting record, date of registration, and registration number. The information contained in voter registration applications for persons signing up to register to vote prior to age eighteen is exempt from public inspection and copying until the applicant reaches age eighteen. No other information from voter registration records or files is available for public inspection or copying.

Sec. 10. RCW 29A.08.720 and 2011 c 10 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the case of voter registration records received through the department of licensing or an agency designated under RCW 29A.08.310, the identity of the office or agency at which any particular individual registered to vote is not available for public inspection and shall not be disclosed to the public. Any record of a particular individual's choice not to register to vote at an office of the department of licensing or a state agency designated under RCW 29A.08.310 is not available for public inspection and any information regarding such a choice by a particular individual shall not be disclosed to the public. The information contained in voter registration applications for persons signing up to register to vote prior to age eighteen is exempt from public inspection and copying until the applicant reaches age eighteen.

(2) Subject to the restrictions of RCW 29A.08.710 and 40.24.060, precinct lists and current lists of registered voters are public records and must be made available for public inspection and copying under such reasonable rules and regulations as the county auditor or secretary of state may prescribe. The county auditor or secretary of state shall promptly furnish current lists of registered voters in his or her possession, at actual reproduction cost, to any person requesting such information. The lists shall not be used for the purpose of mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any property, establishment, organization, product, or service or for the purpose of mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services, or anything of value. However, the lists and labels may be used for any political purpose. The county auditor or secretary of state must provide a copy of RCW 29A.08.740 to the person requesting the material that is released under this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "political purpose" means a purpose concerned with the support of or opposition to any candidate for any partisan or nonpartisan office or concerned with the support of or opposition to any ballot proposition or issue. "Political purpose" includes, but is not limited to, such activities as the advertising for or against any candidate or ballot measure or the solicitation of financial support.

Sec. 11. RCW 29A.08.760 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 813 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state shall provide a duplicate copy of the master statewide computer file or electronic data file of registered voters to the consolidated technology services agency for purposes of creating the jury source list without cost. The information contained in voter registration applications for persons signing up to register to vote prior to age eighteen is exempt from inclusion until the applicant reaches age eighteen. Restrictions as to the commercial use of the information on the statewide computer tape or data file of registered voters, and penalties for its misuse, shall be the same as provided in RCW 29A.08.720 and 29A.08.740.

Sec. 12. RCW 29A.84.140 and 2005 c 246 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who knows that he or she does not possess the legal qualifications of a voter and who registers to vote is guilty of a class C felony. This section does not apply to persons age seventeen signing up to register to vote as authorized under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who has attained seventeen years of age and has a valid Washington state driver's license or identicard may sign up to register to vote by submitting a voter registration application electronically on the secretary of state's web site.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) If signing up to register electronically, the applicant must affirmatively assent to the use of his or her driver's license or identicard signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) The applicant must affirmatively acknowledge that he or she will not vote until his or her eighteenth birthday.

(5) A voter registration application submitted electronically is otherwise considered a registration by mail.

(6) For each electronic registration application, the secretary of state must obtain a digital copy of the applicant's driver's license or identicard signature from the department of licensing.

(7) The secretary of state may employ additional security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter preregistration applications submitted electronically.

Sec. 14. RCW 46.20.155 and 2013 c 11 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant wants to register to vote or update his or her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register or sign up to vote or update your voter registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register, sign up, or update a registration, the agent shall ask the following:

(1) "Are you a United States citizen?"

(2) "Are you or will you be eighteen years of age ((on or)) before ((the next election)) you vote?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the agent shall then submit the registration, sign up form, or update. If the applicant answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not submit ((a voter registration)) an application. Information provided for persons under eighteen years of age under this section is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by electronic commerce.

Sec. 15. RCW 42.56.250 and 2014 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The following employment and licensing information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:

(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;

(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect to an applicant;

(3) The following information held by any public agency in personnel records, public employment related records, volunteer rosters, or included in any mailing list of employees or volunteers of any public agency: Residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal wireless telephone numbers, personal ((electronic mail)) email addresses, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, identicard numbers, and emergency contact information of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal wireless telephone numbers, personal ((electronic mail)) email addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of employees or volunteers of a public agency. For purposes of this subsection, "employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined in RCW 74.39A.240;

(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any identifying information not be disclosed;

(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency conducting an active and ongoing investigation of a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment;

(6) Criminal history records checks for board staff finalist candidates conducted pursuant to RCW 43.33A.025;

(7) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and benefit information for maritime employees collected from private employers under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in RCW 47.64.220(2); ((and))

(8) Photographs and month and year of birth in the personnel files of employees and workers of criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The news media, as defined in RCW 5.68.010(5), shall have access to the photographs and full date of birth. For the purposes of this subsection, news media does not include any person or organization of persons in the custody of a criminal justice agency as defined in RCW 10.97.030; and

(9) Information contained in voter preregistration records under Title 29A RCW and RCW 46.20.155.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. (1) Section 14 of this act does not take effect until the statewide voter registration database operated by the secretary of state is compliant with RCW 29A.08.125, as amended in this act.

(2) The secretary of state's office must provide written notice to the code reviser's office when the statewide voter registration database is compliant with RCW 29A.08.125.

--- END ---