BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.22A.190 and 2007 c 432 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to have committed an infraction under this chapter ((shall)) may be assessed a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for the first infraction and not more than one thousand dollars for a second or subsequent infraction. The department shall set by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for infractions imposed under this chapter.

(2) The administrative law judge may waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty imposed for the infraction.

(3) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the manufactured home installation training account created in RCW 43.22A.100 for the purposes specified in this chapter.

--- END ---