BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.18.200 and 2016 c 36 s 1, 2016 c 30 s 1, 2016 c 16 s 1, and 2016 c 15 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the department:

(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates unless otherwise specified;

(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the department;

(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW; and

(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the department.

(2) The department approves and shall issue the following special license plates:

LICENSE PLATE

DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

4-H

Displays the "4-H" logo.

Armed forces collection

Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty military personnel, reservists, and members of the national guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and national guard.

Breast cancer awareness

Displays a pink ribbon symbolizing breast cancer awareness.

Endangered wildlife

Displays a symbol or artwork symbolizing endangered wildlife in Washington state.

Gonzaga University alumni association

Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak

Recognizes an organization that supports programs that provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

Imagine

Displays the John Lennon self-portrait image and the slogan "Imagine."

Keep kids safe

Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial

Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty.

Music matters

Displays the "Music Matters" logo.

Professional firefighters and paramedics

Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who are members of the Washington state council of firefighters.

Seattle Seahawks

Displays the "Seattle Seahawks" logo.

Seattle Sounders FC

Displays the "Seattle Sounders FC" logo.

Seattle University

Recognizes Seattle University.

Share the road

Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington

Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

State flower

Recognizes the Washington state flower.

Volunteer firefighters

Recognizes volunteer firefighters.

Washington farmers and ranchers

Recognizes farmers and ranchers in Washington state.

Washington lighthouses

Recognizes an organization that supports selected Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental education programs.

Washington state parks

Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural, cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington state wrestling

Promotes and supports college wrestling in the state of Washington.

Washington tennis

Builds awareness and year-round opportunities for tennis in Washington state. Displays a symbol or artwork recognizing tennis in Washington state.

Washington's national park fund

Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and supports priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's fish collection

Recognizes Washington's fish.

Washington's wildlife collection

Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets

Recognizes an organization that assists local member agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington

Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

(3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters and paramedics special license plates must show proof of eligibility by providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state council of firefighters.

(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighters special license plates must (a) have been a volunteer firefighter for at least ten years or be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and (b) have documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service before ten years of service have been completed, the volunteer firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the department on the registration renewal date. If the volunteer firefighter stays in service for at least ten years and then leaves, the license plate may be retained by the former volunteer firefighter and as long as the license plate is retained for use the person will continue to pay the future registration renewals. A qualifying volunteer firefighter may have no more than one set of license plates per vehicle, and a maximum of two sets per applicant, for their personal vehicles. If the volunteer firefighter is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or a felony, the license plates must be surrendered upon conviction.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.220 and 2016 c 36 s 2, 2016 c 31 s 2, 2016 c 30 s 3, 2016 c 16 s 2, and 2016 c 15 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) 4-H

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(b) Amateur radio license

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(c) Armed forces

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(d) Baseball stadium

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

Subsection (2) of this section

(e) Breast cancer awareness

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(f) Collector vehicle

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Collegiate

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.430

(h) Endangered wildlife

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(i) Gonzaga University alumni association

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(j) Helping kids speak

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(k) Horseless carriage

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(l) Imagine

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(m) Keep kids safe

$ 45.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((m))) (n) Law enforcement memorial

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((n))) (o) Military affiliate radio system

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(((o))) (p) Music matters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((p))) (q) Purple Heart

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((q))) (r) Professional firefighters and paramedics

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((r))) (s) Ride share

$ 25.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(((s))) (t) Seattle Seahawks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((t))) (u) Seattle Sounders FC

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((u))) (v) Seattle University

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((v))) (w) Share the road

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((w))) (x) Ski & ride Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((x))) (y) Square dancer

$ 40.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(((y))) (z) State flower

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((z))) (aa) Volunteer firefighters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((aa))) (bb) Washington farmers and ranchers

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((bb))) (cc) Washington lighthouses

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((cc))) (dd) Washington state parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((dd))) (ee) Washington state wrestling

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((ee))) (ff) Washington tennis

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((ff))) (gg) Washington's fish collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((gg))) (hh) Washington's national parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((hh))) (ii) Washington's wildlife collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(((ii))) (jj) We love our pets

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(((jj))) (kk) Wild on Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.420 and 2016 c 36 s 3, 2016 c 16 s 3, and 2016 c 15 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall:

(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;

(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and

(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.

(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fee amounts for each special license plate to the following appropriate account as created in this section in the custody of the state treasurer:

ACCOUNT

CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

4-H programs

Support Washington 4-H programs

Gonzaga University alumni association

Scholarship funds to needy and qualified students attending or planning to attend Gonzaga University

Helping kids speak

Provide free diagnostic and therapeutic services to families of children who suffer from a delay in language or speech development

Imagine

Provide funds to Feeding Washington for programs to help end hunger in Washington

Law enforcement memorial

Provide support and assistance to survivors and families of law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty and to organize, finance, fund, construct, utilize, and maintain a memorial on the state capitol grounds to honor those fallen officers

Lighthouse environmental programs

Support selected Washington state lighthouses that are accessible to the public and staffed by volunteers; provide environmental education programs; provide grants for other Washington lighthouses to assist in funding infrastructure preservation and restoration; encourage and support interpretive programs by lighthouse docents

Music matters awareness

Promote music education in schools throughout Washington

Seattle Seahawks

Provide funds to InvestED to encourage secondary students who have economic needs to stay in school, return to school, or get involved within their learning community

Seattle Sounders FC

Provide funds to Washington state mentors and the association of Washington generals created in RCW 43.15.030 in the following manner: (a) Seventy percent and the remaining proceeds, if any, to Washington state mentors, to increase the number of mentors in the state by offering mentoring grants throughout Washington state that foster positive youth development and academic success, with up to twenty percent of these proceeds authorized for program administration costs; and(b) up to thirty percent, not to exceed forty-thousand dollars annually as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management, to the association of Washington generals, to develop Washington state educational, veterans, international relations, and civics projects and to recognize the outstanding public service of individuals or groups in the state of Washington

Seattle University

Fund scholarships for students attending or planning to attend Seattle University

Share the road

Promote bicycle safety and awareness education in communities throughout Washington

Ski & ride Washington

Promote winter snowsports, such as skiing and snowboarding, and related programs, such as ski and ride safety programs, underprivileged youth ski and ride programs, and active, healthy lifestyle programs

State flower

Support Meerkerk Rhododendron Gardens and provide for grants to other qualified nonprofit organizations' efforts to preserve rhododendrons

Volunteer firefighters

Receive and disseminate funds for purposes on behalf of volunteer firefighters, their families, and others deemed in need

Washington farmers and ranchers

Provide funds to the Washington FFA Foundation for educational programs in Washington state

Washington state wrestling

Provide funds to the Washington state wrestling foundation to fund new and existing college wrestling programs

Washington state council of firefighters benevolent fund

Receive and disseminate funds for charitable purposes on behalf of members of the Washington state council of firefighters, their families, and others deemed in need

Washington tennis

Provide funds to cities to assist in the construction and maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. A city is eligible for construction funds if the city does not already have a public or private facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. Funds for construction must first be made available to the most populous eligible city, according to the most recent census, for a time period not to exceed five years after January 1, 2017. After the five-year time period, the funds for construction must be made available to the next most populous eligible city. Funds for the maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts must first be made available to the first eligible city that utilizes funds for construction provided by chapter 16, Laws of 2016.

Washington's national park fund

Build awareness of Washington's national parks and support priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parks

We love our pets

Support and enable the Washington federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery of Washington state pets in order to reduce pet population

(3) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the accounts described in subsection (2) of this section. The accounts are subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(4) Funds in the special license plate accounts described in subsection (2) of this section must be disbursed subject to the conditions described in subsection (2) of this section and under contract between the department and qualified nonprofit organizations that provide the services described in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit organization" means a not-for-profit corporation operating in Washington that has received a determination of tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3). The qualified nonprofit organization must meet all the requirements under RCW 46.18.100(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Imagine license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display the John Lennon self-portrait image and the slogan "Imagine," to support Feeding Washington for programs to end hunger in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect October 1, 2017.

--- END ---