BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.08A.250 and 2013 c 39 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, "work activity" means:

(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector, including employment through the state or federal work-study program for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;

(3) Work experience, including:

(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a license or certificate in a high-demand occupation, as determined by the employment security department. No internship or practicum shall exceed twelve months; or

(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;

(4) On-the-job training;

(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;

(6) Community service programs, including a recipient's voluntary service at a child care or preschool facility licensed under chapter 43.215 RCW or an elementary school in which his or her child is enrolled;

(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months with respect to any individual except that this twelve-month limit may be increased to twenty-four months subject to funding appropriated specifically for this purpose;

(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;

(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536;

(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or received such a certificate;

(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is participating in a community service program;

(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or nongovernmental agency setting;

(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of advancing their skills and knowledge;

(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and 74.08A.010(4) to become employable;

(15) Financial literacy activities designed to be effective in assisting a recipient in becoming self-sufficient and financially stable; and

(16) Parent education services or programs that support development of appropriate parenting skills, life skills, and employment-related competencies.

--- END ---