BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Part I

Providing reasonable tools for the effective administration of the public utility district privilege tax

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. A new section is added to chapter 54.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The following provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply with respect to the state taxes administered by the department of revenue under this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: RCW 82.32.050, 82.32.060, 82.32.070, 82.32.080, 82.32.085, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105, 82.32.110, 82.32.117, 82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.135, 82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, 82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.235, 82.32.237, 82.32.240, 82.32.270, 82.32.310, 82.32.320, 82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, 82.32.410, and any other provision of chapter 82.32 RCW specifically referenced in the statutes listed in this subsection (1).

(2) Chapter 82.32 RCW also applies with respect to the state taxes administered by the department of revenue under this chapter to the extent provided in any other provision of law.

(3) The definitions in this chapter have full force and application with respect to the application of chapter 82.32 RCW to this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. RCW 54.28.030 (Districts' report to department of revenue) and 1977 ex.s. c 366 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 30, 1959 c 274 s 3, & 1957 c 278 s 3 are each repealed.

Sec. 103. RCW 54.28.040 and 1996 c 149 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before May 1st of each calendar year through calendar year 2018, the department of revenue ((shall)) must compute the tax imposed by this chapter for the last preceding calendar year and notify the district of the amount thereof, which shall be payable on or before the following June 1st.

(2) ((If payment of any tax is not received by the department on or before the due date, there shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the tax; if the tax is not received within one month of the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not received within two months of the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the tax.

(3))) For tax reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2018, taxpayers must report the taxes due under RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 on returns as prescribed by the department of revenue. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), taxes imposed in RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 are due for a taxpayer at the same time as the taxpayer's payment of taxes imposed under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW. The department of revenue may allow taxpayers to report and pay the taxes due under RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 on an annual basis, even if they report taxes imposed under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW more frequently than annually. In such cases, the taxes imposed in RCW 54.28.020 and 54.28.025 are due at the same time as the taxes under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for the taxpayer's final reporting period for the calendar year.

(3) The department of revenue may require persons to report such information as needed by the department to administer this chapter.

(4) Upon receipt of the amount of each tax imposed the department of revenue shall deposit the same with the state treasurer, who ((shall)) must deposit four percent of the revenues received under RCW 54.28.020(1) and 54.28.025(1) and all revenues received under RCW 54.28.020(2) and 54.28.025(2) in the general fund of the state and ((shall)) must distribute the remainder in the manner hereinafter set forth. The state treasurer ((shall)) must send a duplicate copy of each transmittal to the department of revenue.

Sec. 104. RCW 54.28.050 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

((After computing the tax imposed by RCW 54.28.020(1),)) (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department of revenue ((shall)) must instruct the state treasurer, after placing thirty-seven and six-tenths percent of the taxes collected under RCW 54.28.020(1) in the state general fund to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, to distribute the balance collected under RCW 54.28.020(1)(a) to each county in proportion to the gross revenue from sales made within each county; and to distribute the balance collected under RCW 54.28.020(1) (b) and (c) as follows:

(a) If the entire generating facility, including reservoir, if any, is in a single county then all of the balance to the county where such generating facility is located((.));

(b) If any reservoir is in more than one county, then to each county in which the reservoir or any portion thereof is located a percentage equal to the percentage determined by dividing the total cost of the generating facilities, including adjacent switching facilities, into twice the cost of land and land rights acquired for any reservoir within each county, land and land rights to be defined the same as used by the federal ((power commission)) energy regulatory commission.

(c) If the powerhouse and dam, if any, in connection with such reservoir are in more than one county, the balance ((shall)) must be divided sixty percent to the county in which the owning district is located and forty percent to the other county or counties or if ((said)) the powerhouse and dam, if any, are owned by a joint operating agency organized under chapter 43.52 RCW, or by more than one district or are outside the county of the owning district, then to be divided equally between the counties in which such facilities are located. If all of the powerhouse and dam, if any, are in one county, then the balance ((shall)) must be distributed to the county in which the facilities are located.

(2) The department of revenue must instruct the state treasurer to adjust distributions under this section, in whole or in part, to account for each county's proportionate share of amounts previously distributed under this section and subsequently refunded to a public utility district under RCW 82.32.060.

(3) The provisions of this section ((shall)) do not apply to the distribution of taxes collected under RCW 54.28.025.

Sec. 105. RCW 54.28.055 and 1986 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((After computing the tax imposed by RCW 54.28.025(1))) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department of revenue ((shall)) must instruct the state treasurer to distribute the amount collected under RCW 54.28.025(1) as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to the state general fund for the support of schools; and

(b) Twenty-two percent to the counties, twenty-three percent to the cities, three percent to the fire protection districts, and two percent to the library districts.

(2) Each county, city, fire protection district, and library district ((shall)) must receive a percentage of the amount for distribution to counties, cities, fire protection districts, and library districts, respectively, in the proportion that the population of such district residing within the impacted area bears to the total population of all such districts residing within the impacted area. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "library district" includes only regional libraries ((as defined in RCW 27.12.010(4))), rural county library districts ((as defined in RCW 27.12.010(5))), intercounty rural library districts ((as defined in RCW 27.12.010(6))), and island library districts as those terms are defined in RCW 27.12.010(((7))). The population of a library district, for purposes of such a distribution, ((shall)) does not include any population within the library district and the impact area that also is located within a city or town.

(3) Distributions under this section must be adjusted as follows:

(a) If any distribution pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section cannot be made, then that share ((shall)) must be prorated among the state and remaining local districts.

(b) The department of revenue must instruct the state treasurer to adjust distributions under this section, in whole or in part, to account for each county's, city's, fire protection district's, and library district's proportionate share of amounts previously distributed under this section and subsequently refunded to a public utility district under RCW 82.32.060.

(4) All distributions directed by this section to be made on the basis of population ((shall)) must be calculated in accordance with ((data to be provided)) population data as last determined by the office of financial management.

Sec. 106. RCW 82.32.105 and 1998 c 304 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the department ((of revenue)) finds that the payment by a taxpayer of a tax less than that properly due or the failure of a taxpayer to pay any tax by the due date was the result of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department ((of revenue shall)) must waive or cancel any penalties imposed under this chapter with respect to such tax.

(2) The department ((shall)) must waive or cancel the penalty imposed under RCW 82.32.090(1) when the circumstances under which the delinquency occurred do not qualify for waiver or cancellation under subsection (1) of this section if:

(a) The taxpayer requests the waiver for a tax return required to be filed under RCW 54.28.040, 82.32.045, 82.14B.061, 82.23B.020, 82.27.060, 82.29A.050, or 84.33.086; and

(b) The taxpayer has timely filed and remitted payment on all tax returns due for that tax program for a period of twenty-four months immediately preceding the period covered by the return for which the waiver is being requested.

(3) The department ((shall)) must waive or cancel interest imposed under this chapter if:

(a) The failure to timely pay the tax was the direct result of written instructions given the taxpayer by the department; or

(b) The extension of a due date for payment of an assessment of deficiency was not at the request of the taxpayer and was for the sole convenience of the department.

(4) The department ((of revenue shall)) must adopt rules for the waiver or cancellation of penalties and interest imposed by this chapter.

Sec. 107. RCW 82.32.350 and 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may enter into an agreement in writing with any person relating to the liability of such person in respect of any tax imposed by any of the preceding chapters of this title, or any tax in respect to which this section is specifically made applicable, for any taxable period or periods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. Section 102 of this act does not apply with respect to reports due under RCW 54.28.030 in calendar year 2018 or any preceding calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109. The repeal in section 102 of this act and the amendments in section 103 of this act do not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections repealed or amended or under any rule or order adopted under those sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

Part II

Pet adoption fees

Sec. 201. RCW 82.04.040 and 2004 c 153 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, "sale" means any transfer of the ownership of, title to, or possession of property for a valuable consideration and includes any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050. It includes lease or rental, conditional sale contracts, and any contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser but title is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. It also includes the furnishing of food, drink, or meals for compensation whether consumed upon the premises or not. The term "sale" does not include the transfer of the ownership of, title to, or possession of an animal by an animal rescue organization in exchange for the payment of an adoption fee.

(2) "Casual or isolated sale" means a sale made by a person who is not engaged in the business of selling the type of property involved.

(3)(a) "Lease or rental" means any transfer of possession or control of tangible personal property for a fixed or indeterminate term for consideration. A lease or rental may include future options to purchase or extend. "Lease or rental" includes agreements covering motor vehicles and trailers where the amount of consideration may be increased or decreased by reference to the amount realized upon sale or disposition of the property as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 7701(h)(1), as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003. The definition in this subsection (3) ((shall)) must be used for sales and use tax purposes regardless if a transaction is characterized as a lease or rental under generally accepted accounting principles, the United States internal revenue code, Washington state's commercial code, or other provisions of federal, state, or local law.

(b) "Lease or rental" does not include:

(i) A transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or deferred payment plan that requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required payments;

(ii) A transfer of possession or control of property under an agreement that requires the transfer of title upon completion of required payments, and payment of an option price does not exceed the greater of one hundred dollars or one percent of the total required payments; or

(iii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A condition of this exclusion is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (3)(b)(iii), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(4)(a) "Adoption fee" means an amount charged by an animal rescue organization to adopt an animal, except that "adoption fee" does not include any separately itemized charge for any incidental inanimate items provided to persons adopting an animal, including food, identification tags, collars, and leashes.

(b) "Animal care and control agency" means the same as in RCW 16.52.011 and also includes any similar entity operating outside of this state.

(c) "Animal rescue group" means a nonprofit organization that:

(i)(A) Is exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code as it exists on the effective date of this section; or

(B) Is registered as a charity with the Washington secretary of state under chapter 19.09 RCW, whether such registration is required by law or voluntary;

(ii) Has as its primary purpose the prevention of abuse, neglect, cruelty, exploitation, or homelessness of animals; and

(iii) Exclusively obtains dogs, cats, or other animals for placement that are:

(A) Stray or abandoned;

(B) Surrendered or relinquished by animal owners or caretakers;

(C) Transferred from other animal rescue organizations; or

(D) Born in the care of such nonprofit organization other than through intentional breeding by the nonprofit organization.

(d) "Animal rescue organization" means an animal care and control agency or an animal rescue group.

Sec. 202. RCW 82.04.190 and 2015 c 169 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Consumer" means the following:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the person's business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than for the purpose of:

(a) Resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business;

(b) Incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers;

(c) Consuming such property in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale;

(d) Consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person;

(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), other than for resale in the regular course of business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any person who makes a purchase meeting the definition of "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050(15), other than for resale in the regular course of business; (e) any person who purchases or acquires an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course of business; and (f) any person who is an end user of software. For purposes of this subsection (2)(f) and RCW 82.04.050(6), a person who purchases or otherwise acquires prewritten computer software, who provides services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) and who will charge consumers for the right to access and use the prewritten computer software, is not an end user of the prewritten computer software;

(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right-of-way of such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;

(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an easement in real property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition may be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business;

(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person is a consumer within the meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, or any instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a private entity;

(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this section may be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development;

(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the replacement property;

(10) Any person who purchases, acquires, or uses services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) other than:

(a) For resale in the regular course of business; or

(b) For purposes of consuming the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) in producing for sale a new product, but only if such service becomes a component of the new product. For purposes of this subsection (10), "product" means a digital product, an article of tangible personal property, or the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c);

(11)(a) Any end user of a digital product or digital code. "Consumer" does not include any person who is not an end user of a digital product or a digital code and purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any digital product or digital code for purposes of consuming the digital product or digital code in producing for sale a new product, but only if the digital product or digital code becomes a component of the new product. A digital code becomes a component of a new product if the digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of the digital code becomes incorporated into a new product. For purposes of this subsection, "product" has the same meaning as in subsection (10) of this section.

(b)(i) For purposes of this subsection, "end user" means any taxpayer as defined in RCW 82.12.010 other than a taxpayer who receives by contract a digital product for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the product, in whole or in part, to others. A person that purchases digital products or digital codes for the purpose of giving away such products or codes will not be considered to have engaged in the distribution or redistribution of such products or codes and will be treated as an end user;

(ii) If a purchaser of a digital code does not receive the contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is an end user. If the purchaser of the digital code receives the contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is not an end user. A purchaser of a digital code who has the contractual right to further redistribute the digital code is an end user if that purchaser does not have the right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates;

(12) Any person who provides services described in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person is a consumer with respect to the purchase, acquisition, or use of the tangible personal property that the person provides along with an operator in rendering services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person may also be a consumer under other provisions of this section;

(13) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses chemical sprays or washes for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, or who purchases feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials, is not a consumer of such items, but only to the extent that the items:

(a) Are used in relation to the person's participation in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;

(b) Are for use by a farmer for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; or

(c) Are for use by a farmer to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land the farmer owns or leases while acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife; ((and))

(14) A regional transit authority is not a consumer with respect to labor, services, or tangible personal property purchased pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services; and

(15) The term "consumer" does not include:

(a) An animal rescue organization with respect to animals under its care and control; and

(b) Any person with respect to an animal adopted by that person from an animal rescue organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203. Sections 201 and 202 of this act apply both prospectively and retroactively to July 1, 2015.

Part III

Technical corrections and clarifications to 2015 legislation

Sec. 301. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this ((section)) part, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2015.

(2) Parts IV, VI, VIII, and XIX of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect September 1, 2015.

(3) Part X of this act takes effect October 1, 2016.

(4) Section 1105 of this act takes effect January 1, 2016.

(5) Except for section 2004 of this act, Part XX of this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

(6) Section 2004 of this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

Sec. 302. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 2303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

((Part VIII of this act expires July 1, 2019)) (1) Sections 802 and 804, chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. expire July 1, 2026;

(2) Section 803, chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. expires January 1, 2026; and

(3) Section 805, chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. expires January 1, 2031.

Sec. 303. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The legislature finds that a robust maritime industry is crucial for the state's economic vitality. The legislature further finds that:

(i) The joint task force for economic resilience of maritime and manufacturing established policy goals to continue efforts towards developing a robust maritime industry in the state;

(ii) The maritime industry has a direct and indirect impact on jobs in the state;

(iii) Many of the cities and towns impacted by the maritime industry are often small with limited resources to encourage economic growth, heavily relying on the maritime industry for local jobs and revenues in the community;

(iv) Keeping Washington competitive with other cruising destinations is essential to continue to build a robust maritime economy in the state; and

(v) Tax incentives are an imperative component to improve the state's overall competitiveness in this sector.

(b) Therefore, the legislature intends to:

(i) Bolster the maritime industry in the state by incentivizing larger vessel owners to use Washington waters for recreational boating to increase economic activity and jobs in coastal communities and inland water regions of the state;

(ii) Achieve this objective in a fiscally responsible manner and require analysis of specific metrics to ensure valuable state resources are being used to accomplish the intended goal; and

(iii) Provide limited, short-term tax relief to entity-owned nonresident vessel owners that currently are not afforded the same benefits as other nonresident vessel owners.

(2)(a) This subsection is the tax preference performance statement for the entity-owned nonresident vessel tax preference established in section 803 of this act. The performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(b) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to accomplish the purposes indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(c) and one intended to improve the state's competitiveness with other nearby cruising destinations.

(c) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to increase economic activity and jobs related to the maritime industry by providing a tax preference for large entity-owned nonresident vessels to increase the length of time these vessels cruise Washington waters in turn strengthening the maritime economy in the state.

(d) To measure the effectiveness of the tax preference provided in part ((XII [VIII] of this act)) VIII, chapter 6, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. in achieving the public policy objective in (c) of this subsection, the joint legislative audit and review committee must provide the following in a published evaluation of this tax preference by December 31, 2024:

(i) A comparison of the gross and taxable revenue generated by businesses that sell or provide maintenance or repair of vessels, prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(ii) Analysis of retail sales taxes collected from the restaurant and service industries in coastal and inlet coastal jurisdictions, for both counties and cities, for periods prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(iii) Employment and wage trends for businesses described in (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, for periods prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference;

(iv) Descriptive statistics for the number of permits sold each year in addition to the following information:

(A) The cost for each permit by strata of vessel length;

(B) The jurisdiction of ownership for the nonresident vessel; and

(C) The amount of use tax that would have been due based on the estimated value of the vessel;

(v) A comparison of the number of registered entity-owned and individually owned vessels registered in Washington prior to and after the enactment of this tax preference; and

(vi) Data and analysis for Washington's main cruising destination competitors, specifically looking at tax preferences provided in those jurisdictions, vessel industry income data, and any additional relevant information to compare Washington's maritime climate with its competitors.

(e) The provision of RCW 82.32.808(5) does not apply to this tax preference.

Sec. 304. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 30 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 2 ((of this act)), chapter 30, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(1) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to provide tax relief for certain businesses or individuals, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).

(2) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to provide tax relief to senior citizens, disabled persons, and veterans. The legislature recognizes that property taxes impose a substantial financial burden on those with fixed incomes and that property tax relief programs have considerable value in addressing this burden. It is the legislature's intent to increase the current statutory static income thresholds which were last modified in 2004.

(3) ((The expansion of the items allowed to be deducted)) This tax preference is meant to be permanent and, therefore, not subject to the ten-year expiration provision in RCW 82.32.805(1)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305. Nothing in section 204, chapter 5, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. may be construed as affecting the taxable status in calendar year 2015 of any person with a substantial nexus with this state under RCW 82.04.067 any time on or after January 1, 2015, and before September 1, 2015, with respect to business and occupation taxes on apportionable activities as defined in RCW 82.04.460.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306. Section 305 of this act applies retroactively for the period January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015.

Sec. 307. RCW 82.04.050 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 1105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:

(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or

(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or

(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.

(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.

(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.

(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;

(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;

(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(b) Credit bureau services;

(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;

(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and

(g)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (g)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:

(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;

(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as advertising, massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW;

(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;

(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;

(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(g). For purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170; and

(H) Yoga, tai chi, or chi gong classes held at a community center, park, gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any facility that is not primarily used for physical fitness activities other than yoga, tai chi, or chi gong classes.

(iii) Nothing in (g)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).

(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g), the following definitions apply:

(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; yoga; boxing, kickboxing, wrestling, martial arts, or mixed martial arts training; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.

(B) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant.

(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.

(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.

(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.

(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:

(i) Custom software; or

(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.

(c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.

(ii)(A) The service described in (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.

(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.

(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:

(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.

(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:

(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.

(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;

(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;

(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;

(v) Batting cage activities;

(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;

(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;

(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;

(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;

(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);

(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;

(xv) ((Indoor or outdoor playground)) Activities((, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and)) at an indoor or outdoor location where at least one of the following attractions is offered: Inflatable bounce structures or other inflatables; trampolines; laser tag or soft-dart tag; or human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but ((not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW 43.215.010)) only in respect to charges for drop-in play, or amounts charged for private group events, such as birthday parties, family gatherings, or employee outings;

(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;

(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;

(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;

(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and

(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.

(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:

(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed twenty-one days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;

(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or

(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age eighteen, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.

Part IV

Automated sales suppression devices and phantom-ware

Sec. 401. RCW 82.32.670 and 2013 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Automated sales suppression devices, phantom-ware, electronic cash registers or point of sale systems used with automated sales suppression devices or phantom-ware, and any property constituting proceeds traceable to any violation of RCW 82.32.290(4) are considered contraband and are subject to seizure and forfeiture.

(b) Property subject to forfeiture under (a) of this subsection (1) may be seized by any agent of the department authorized to assess or collect taxes, or law enforcement officer of this state, upon process issued by any superior court or district court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

(i) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant; or

(ii) The department or the law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of RCW 82.32.290(4) and exigent circumstances exist making procurement of a search warrant impracticable.

(2) Forfeiture authorized by this section is deemed to have commenced by the seizure. Notice of seizure must be given to the department if the seizure is made by a law enforcement officer without the presence of any agent of the department. The department must cause notice of the seizure and intended forfeiture to be served on the owner of the property seized, if known, and on any other person known by the department to have a right or interest in the seized property. Such service must be made within fifteen days following the seizure or the department's receipt of notification of the seizure. The notice may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule, by certified mail with return receipt requested, or electronically in accordance with RCW 82.32.135. Service by certified mail or electronic means is deemed complete upon mailing the notice, electronically sending the notice, or electronically notifying the person or persons entitled to the notice that the notice is available to be accessed by the person or persons, within the fifteen-day period following the seizure or the department's receipt of notification of the seizure.

(3) If no person notifies the department in writing of the person's claim of lawful ownership or right to lawful possession of the item or items seized within thirty days of the date of service of the notice of seizure and intended forfeiture, the item or items seized are deemed forfeited.

(4)(a) If any person notifies the department, in writing, of the person's claim of lawful ownership or lawful right to possession of the item or items seized within thirty days of the date of service of the notice of seizure and intended forfeiture, the person or persons must be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim. The hearing must be before the director or the director's designee. A hearing and any administrative or judicial review is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. The burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence is upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the item or items seized.

(b) The department must return the item or items to the claimant as soon as possible upon a determination that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession of the item or items seized.

(5) When property is sought to be forfeited on the ground that it constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4), the department must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the property constitutes proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4).

(6)(a) When automated sales suppression devices or phantom-ware voluntarily surrendered to an agent of the department, or property forfeited under this section, other than proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4), is no longer required for evidentiary purposes, the department may:

(i) Destroy or have the property destroyed;

(ii) Retain the property for training or other official purposes; or

(iii) Loan or give the property to any law enforcement or tax administration agency of any state, political subdivision or municipal corporation of a state, or the United States for training or other official purposes. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a)(iii), "state" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.

(b) When proceeds traceable to a violation of RCW 82.32.290(4) forfeited under this section are no longer required for evidentiary purposes, they must be deposited into the general fund.

(7) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section:

(a) "Automated sales suppression device" means a software program that falsifies the electronic records of electronic cash registers or other point of sale systems, including transaction data and transaction reports. The term includes the software program, any device that carries the software program, or an internet link to the software program.

(b) "Electronic cash register" means a device that keeps a register or supporting documents through the means of an electronic device or computer system designed to record transaction data for the purpose of computing, compiling, or processing sales transaction data in whatever manner.

(c) "Phantom-ware" means a programming option that is hidden, preinstalled, or installed-at-a-later-time in the operating system of an electronic cash register or other point of sale device, or hardwired into the electronic cash register or other point of sale device, and that can be used to create a virtual second till or may eliminate or manipulate transaction reports that may or may not be preserved in digital formats to represent the true or manipulated record of transactions in the electronic cash register or other point of sale device.

(d) "Transaction data" means information about sales transactions, including items purchased by a customer, the price for each item, a taxability determination for each item, a segregated tax amount for each of the taxed items, the amount of cash or credit tendered, the net amount returned to the customer in change, the date and time of the purchase, the name, address, and identification number of the vendor, and the receipt or invoice number of the transaction.

(e) "Transaction reports" means a report that includes information associated with sales transactions, taxes collected, media totals, and discount voids at an electronic cash register that can be printed on cash register tape at the end of a day or shift, or a report documenting every action at an electronic cash register or other point of sale device and that is stored electronically.

Part V

Annual surveys and reports for tax preferences

Sec. 501. RCW 82.32.534 and 2016 c 175 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a report under this section, except persons exempt from the provisions of this section, must file a complete annual report with the department. This section does not apply to persons who are not required to have an active tax registration with the department under the provisions of RCW 82.32.030, except when an annual report is required for a property tax preference that requires persons seeking the preference to apply to the department.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the report is due by May 31st of the year following any calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a report under this section.

(c)(i) A tax preference of the type that is ordinarily reported on a tax return and that a person qualified for, but did not report on a previously filed tax return, may be claimed on an amended return filed after the due date for filing the report as provided in (b) of this subsection (1) and within the nonclaim period in RCW 82.32.060, if the person:

(A) Is current on its tax return filing obligations for reporting any taxes due under chapter 82.04, 82.08, or 82.16 RCW;

(B) Had an active tax registration with the department during the reporting period or periods covered by the amended return or returns;

(C) Has not previously claimed the same tax preference on an original or amended return; and

(D) Files a complete annual report or reports in compliance with this section with the amended return or returns.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), if multiple returns are filed for reporting periods within the same calendar year or two or more calendar years, only one report is required to be filed for each calendar year.

(iii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(c)(iii), the provisions of this subsection (1)(c) apply beginning January 1, 2019, for amended returns filed for reporting periods in 2018 or later. However, if the department determines that it can sooner effectively and efficiently implement this subsection (1)(c), the department may accept amended returns before January 1, 2019, for reporting periods beginning no earlier than January 1st of the year immediately preceding the year during which the department begins accepting amended returns in accordance with this subsection (1)(c).

(d) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.

(((b))) (e) The report must include information detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference was claimed. However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment, wage, and benefit information per job at the manufacturing site for the year that the tax preference was claimed. The report must not include names of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year that the tax preference was claimed.

(((c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW 82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this state during the time period covered by the report.

(d))) (f) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.

(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request additional information necessary to measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax preference. The department must annually seek input on changes to the annual report from the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.

(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare:

(i) Thirty-five percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable; and

(ii) An additional fifteen percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable if the person has previously been assessed under this subsection (4) for failure to submit a report under this section for the same tax preference.

(b) The department may not assess interest or penalties on amounts due under this subsection.

(c) If the tax preference is a property tax preference, the person is not required to repay the amount of the tax preference claimed for failing to timely submit an annual report under this section. However, the person is ineligible to claim the tax preference for taxes levied for collection in the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the report was due. The department must provide notice to the appropriate county assessor when a person is ineligible to claim a property tax preference pursuant to this subsection.

(5) The department must use the information from this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must report these statistics to the legislature each year by December 31st. The department need not revise summary descriptive statistics for previous calendar years as a result of tax preferences claimed on amended returns.

(6) For the purposes of determining the identity of persons required to file an annual report as a result of claiming a property tax preference, beginning January 1, 2018, the assessor of the county in which the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference is located must provide written notice to the department that the tax preference has been claimed. Such notice must include the claimant's name, contact information if available, and the address, tax parcel number, or description of the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference. The assessor need not provide the notice required under this subsection (6), if the person is required to file an application with the department to claim the tax preference.

(7) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state ((and)), its departments and institutions, and any other entity that is subject to this section as a result of claiming or receiving the benefit of a tax preference.

(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this section.

Sec. 502. RCW 82.32.585 and 2016 c 175 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a survey under this section, except persons exempt from the provisions of this section, must file a complete annual survey with the department. This section does not apply to persons who are not required to have an active tax registration with the department under the provisions of RCW 82.32.030, except when an annual survey is required for a property tax preference that requires persons seeking the preference to apply to the department.

(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in (((a)(ii) of)) this subsection, the survey is due by May 31st of the year following any calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a survey under this section.

(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first survey must be filed by May 31st of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the investment project is certified by the department as operationally complete, and a survey must be filed by May 31st of each of the seven succeeding calendar years.

(((b))) (c)(i) A tax preference of the type that is ordinarily reported on a tax return and that a person qualified for, but did not report on a previously filed tax return, may be claimed on an amended return filed after the due date for filing the survey as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection (1) and within the nonclaim period in RCW 82.32.060, if the person:

(A) Is current on its tax return filing obligations for reporting any taxes due under chapter 82.04, 82.08, or 82.16 RCW;

(B) Had an active tax registration with the department during the reporting period or periods covered by the amended return or returns;

(C) Has not previously claimed the same tax preference on an original or amended return; and

(D) Files a complete annual survey or surveys in compliance with this section with the amended return or returns.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), if multiple returns are filed for reporting periods within the same calendar year or two or more calendar years, only one survey is required to be filed for each calendar year.

(iii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(c)(iii), the provisions of this subsection (1)(c) apply beginning January 1, 2019, for amended returns filed for reporting periods in 2018 or later. However, if the department determines that it can sooner effectively and efficiently implement this subsection (1)(c), the department may accept amended returns before January 1, 2019, for reporting periods beginning no earlier than January 1st of the year immediately preceding the year during which the department begins accepting amended returns in accordance with this subsection (1)(c).

(d) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.

(2)(a) ((The survey)) Surveys, other than surveys for property tax preferences, must include the amount of the tax preference claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey. For a person that claimed an exemption provided in RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, the survey must include the amount of tax exempted under those sections in the prior calendar year for each general area or category of research and development for which exempt machinery and equipment and labor and services were acquired in the prior calendar year. For property tax preferences requiring a survey under this section, the survey must include an estimate of the amount of property tax savings provided by the tax preference. Such estimates must be based on existing property tax information maintained by the county assessor and treasurer, such as levy rates and assessed values.

(b) ((The survey)) All surveys under this section must also include the following information for employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees, for the year that the tax preference was claimed:

(i) The number of total employment positions;

(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a percent of total employment;

(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three individuals may be combined with another wage band; and

(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.

(c) ((For persons claiming the tax preference provided under chapter 82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include the number of new products or research projects by general classification, and the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at the investment project.

(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452, the survey must also include the qualified research and development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed, the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the research and development activities for which the credit was claimed, and whether the tax preference has been assigned, and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW 82.04.4452 apply to this subsection (2)(d).

(e) For persons claiming the tax exemption in RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, the survey must also include the general areas or categories of research and development for which machinery and equipment and labor and services were acquired, exempt from tax under RCW 82.08.025651 or 82.12.025651, in the prior calendar year.

(f))) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.

(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request additional information necessary to measure the results of, or determine eligibility for, the tax preference. The department must annually seek input on changes to the annual survey from the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(4) All information collected under this section, except the information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330. Information required in subsection (2)(a) of this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the amount of the tax preference claimed as reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed or otherwise allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or other information known to the department, the amount actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.

(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.

(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection or as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare:

(i) Thirty-five percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due; and

(ii) An additional fifteen percent of the amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable, if the person has previously been assessed under this subsection (6) for failure to submit a survey under this section for the same tax preference.

(b) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the amount immediately due under this subsection is twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.

(c) The department may not assess interest or penalties on amounts due under this subsection.

(d) If the tax preference is a property tax preference, the person is not required to repay the amount of the tax preference claimed for failing to timely submit an annual survey under this section. However, the person is ineligible to claim the tax preference for taxes levied for collection in the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the report was due. The department must provide notice to the appropriate county assessor when a person is ineligible to claim a property tax preference pursuant to this subsection.

(7) The department must use the information from this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must report these statistics to the legislature each year by December 31st. The department need not revise summary descriptive statistics for previous calendar years as a result of tax preferences claimed on amended returns.

(8) For the purposes of determining the identity of persons required to file an annual survey as a result of claiming a property tax preference, beginning January 1, 2018, the assessor of the county in which the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference is located must provide written notice to the department that the tax preference has been claimed. Such notice must include the claimant's name, contact information if available, and the address, tax parcel number, or description of the property receiving the benefit of the tax preference. The assessor need not provide the notice required under this subsection (8), if the person is required to file an application with the department to claim the tax preference.

(9) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state ((and)), its departments and institutions, and any other entity that is subject to this section as a result of claiming or receiving the benefit of a tax preference.

(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this section.

Part VI

Miscellaneous technical corrections

Sec. 601. RCW 82.04.261 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 510 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12). Except as otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12) (a), (b), (c), and (d). The surcharge and this section expire July 1, 2024.

(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in RCW 76.09.405.

(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section is suspended if:

(i) Receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during any fiscal biennium; or

(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.

(b)(i) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(i) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the first day of the calendar month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge is imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.

(ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this subsection (3) takes effect on the later of the first day of October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal government appropriates at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least thirty days following the date that the office of financial management makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this section. The surcharge is imposed again on the first day of the following July.

(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of financial management certifies to the department that the federal government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the department must adjust the surcharge in accordance with this subsection.

(b) The department must adjust the surcharge by an amount that the department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited into the forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that begins July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal year for which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by twice the amount of the federal appropriation for participation in forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge takes effect at the beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the date that the office of financial management makes the certification under subsection (5) of this section.

(d) The surcharge is imposed again at the rate provided in subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the following state fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under subsection (3) of this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under this subsection.

(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of the surcharge imposed under this section.

(f) The department must provide timely notice to affected taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the surcharge.

(5) The office of financial management must make the certification to the department as to the status of federal appropriations for tribal participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

Sec. 602. RCW 82.04.334 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 512 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to any sale of standing timber excluded from the definition of "sale" in RCW 82.45.010(3). The definitions in RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (12) apply to this section.

Sec. 603. RCW 82.04.43391 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax interest and fees on loans secured by commercial aircraft primarily used to provide routine air service and owned by:

(a) An air carrier, as defined in RCW ((82.42.030)) 82.42.010, which is primarily engaged in the business of providing passenger air service;

(b) An affiliate of such air carrier; or

(c) A parent entity for which such air carrier is an affiliate.

(2) The deduction authorized under this section is not available to any person who is physically present in this state as determined under RCW 82.04.067(6).

(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Affiliate" means a person is "affiliated," as defined in RCW 82.04.645, with another person; and

(b) "Commercial aircraft" means a commercial airplane as defined in RCW 82.32.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. RCW 82.04.4483 (Credit—Programming or manufacturing software in rural counties) and 2010 c 114 s 119 & 2004 c 25 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 605. RCW 82.32.030 and 2011 c 298 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if any person engages in any business or performs any act upon which a tax is imposed by the preceding chapters, he or she must, under such rules as the department prescribes, apply for and obtain from the department a registration certificate. Such registration certificate is personal and nontransferable and is valid as long as the taxpayer continues in business and pays the tax accrued to the state. In case business is transacted at two or more separate places by one taxpayer, a separate registration certificate for each place at which business is transacted with the public is required. Each certificate must be numbered and must show the name, residence, and place and character of business of the taxpayer and such other information as the department of revenue deems necessary and must be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of business for which it is issued. Where a place of business of the taxpayer is changed, the taxpayer must return to the department the existing certificate, and a new certificate will be issued for the new place of business. No person required to be registered under this section may engage in any business taxable hereunder without first being so registered. The department, by rule, may provide for the issuance of certificates of registration to temporary places of business.

(2) Unless the person is a dealer as defined in RCW 9.41.010, registration under this section is not required if the following conditions are met:

(a) A person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;

(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;

(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department of revenue any other tax or fee ((which)) that the department is authorized to collect; and

(d) The person is not otherwise required to obtain a license subject to the ((master)) business license application procedure provided in chapter 19.02 RCW.

(3) All persons who agree to collect and remit sales and use tax to the department under the agreement must register through the central registration system authorized under the agreement. Persons required to register under subsection (1) of this section are not relieved of that requirement because of registration under this subsection (3).

(4) Persons registered under subsection (3) of this section who are not required to register under subsection (1) of this section and who are not otherwise subject to the requirements of chapter 19.02 RCW are not subject to the fees imposed by the department under the authority of RCW 19.02.075.

Sec. 606. RCW 84.34.108 and 2014 c 97 s 311 and 2014 c 58 s 28 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a notation of the classification must be made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and the land must be valued pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:

(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of the classification;

(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;

(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner or transfer by a transfer on death deed does not, by itself, result in removal of classification. The notice of continuance must be on a form prepared by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all additional taxes, applicable interest, and penalty calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor may not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to hear these appeals;

(d)(i) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter continue to apply after classification has been granted.

(ii) The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, must provide reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance must be provided within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:

(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120; or

(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW 76.09.040.

(3) Within thirty days after the removal of all or a portion of the land from current use classification under subsection (1) of this section, the assessor must notify the owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. The removal notice must explain the steps needed to appeal the removal decision, including when a notice of appeal must be filed, where the forms may be obtained, and how to contact the county board of equalization.

(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor must revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification must be listed and taxes must be allocated according to that part of the year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty must be imposed, which are due and payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty. As soon as possible, the assessor must compute the amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the treasurer must mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty must be determined as follows:

(a) The amount of additional tax is equal to the difference between the property tax paid as "open space land," "farm and agricultural land," or "timberland" and the amount of property tax otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land not been so classified;

(b) The amount of applicable interest is equal to the interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;

(c) The amount of the penalty is as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty may not be imposed if the removal satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.

(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty become a lien on the land ((which)). The lien attaches at the time the land is removed from classification under this chapter and ((have)) has priority to and must be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any additional tax unpaid on the due date ((are [is])) is delinquent as of the due date. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.

(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section may not be imposed if the removal of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted solely from:

(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land located within the state of Washington;

(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official action;

(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of the property;

(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the present use of the land;

(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this section must be imposed;

(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2)(f);

(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;

(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120;

(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a conservation easement of private forestlands within unconfined channel migration zones or containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species under RCW 76.09.040;

(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been assessed and valued as classified forestland, designated as forestland under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection (6)(k); or

(l)(i) The discovery that the land was classified under this chapter in error through no fault of the owner. For purposes of this subsection (6)(l), "fault" means a knowingly false or misleading statement, or other act or omission not in good faith, that contributed to the approval of classification under this chapter or the failure of the assessor to remove the land from classification under this chapter.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (6), the discovery that land was classified under this chapter in error through no fault of the owner is not the sole reason for removal of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if an independent basis for removal exists. Examples of an independent basis for removal include the owner changing the use of the land or failing to meet any applicable income criteria required for classification under this chapter.

Sec. 607. RCW 84.41.041 and 2015 c 86 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county assessor must cause taxable real property to be physically inspected and valued at least once every six years in accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance with a plan filed with and approved by the department of revenue. Such revaluation plan must provide that all taxable real property within a county must be revalued and these newly determined values placed on the assessment rolls each year. Property must be valued at one hundred percent of its true and fair value and assessed on the same basis, in accordance with RCW 84.40.030, unless specifically provided otherwise by law. ((During the intervals between each physical inspection of real property, the valuation of such property may be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be based upon appropriate statistical data. If the revaluation plan provides for physical inspection less frequently than once each four years,)) During the intervals between each physical inspection of real property, the valuation of such property must be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be made once each year and to be based upon appropriate statistical data.

(2) The assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent data respecting taxable property in their control including data respecting any sale or purchase of said property within the past five years, the cost and characteristics of any improvement on the property and other facts necessary for appraisal of the property.

Sec. 608. RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 205 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing periodicals or magazines; (b) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent licensed under the provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually reported by the federal communications commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (g) engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly marketing.

(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.

(c) "Periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the publication.

Sec. 609. RCW 82.32.790 and 2010 c 114 s 201 and 2010 c 106 s 401 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) ((Section 206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010,)) Sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, ((section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006,)) and sections ((4)) 1, 2, 3, and 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.

(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.

(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.

(2) ((Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes)) The sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section take effect the first day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the director of the department of revenue.

(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the effective date of ((sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010[,] section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been signed and ((chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is)) the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section are effective, the department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under ((section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) RCW 82.04.426, 82.04.448, 82.08.965, 82.12.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.970, or 84.36.645. The department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding the effective date of ((chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) the sections referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2010 c 106 s 206;

(2) 2009 c 461 s 3;

(3) 2006 c 300 s 7; and

(4) 2003 c 149 s 4.

Sec. 611. RCW 35.102.130 and 2010 c 111 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

A city that imposes a business and occupation tax must provide for the allocation and apportionment of a person's gross income, other than persons subject to the provisions of chapter 82.14A RCW, as follows:

(1) Gross income derived from all activities other than those taxed as service or royalties must be allocated to the location where the activity takes place.

(a) In the case of sales of tangible personal property, the activity takes place where delivery to the buyer occurs.

(b)(i) In the case of sales of digital products, the activity takes place where delivery to the buyer occurs. The delivery of digital products will be deemed to occur at:

(A) The seller's place of business if the purchaser receives the digital product at the seller's place of business;

(B) If not received at the seller's place of business, the location where the purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as such by the purchaser, receives the digital product, including the location indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the seller;

(C) If the location where the purchaser or the purchaser's donee receives the digital product is not known, the purchaser's address maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;

(D) If no address for the purchaser is maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business, the purchaser's address obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith; and

(E) If no address for the purchaser is obtained during the consummation of the sale, the address where the digital good or digital code is first made available for transmission by the seller or the address from which the digital automated service or service described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c) was provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold.

(ii) If none of the methods in (b)(i) of this subsection (1) for determining where the delivery of digital products occurs are available after a good faith effort by the taxpayer to apply the methods provided in (b)(i)(A) through (E) of this subsection (1), then the city and the taxpayer may mutually agree to employ any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation of income from the sale of digital products. The taxpayer will be responsible for petitioning the city to use an alternative method under this subsection (1)(b)(ii). The city may employ an alternative method for allocating the income from the sale of digital products if the methods provided in (b)(i)(A) through (E) of this subsection (1) are not available and the taxpayer and the city are unable to mutually agree on an alternative method to effectuate an equitable allocation of income from the sale of digital products.

(iii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), the following definitions apply:

(A) "Digital automated services," "digital codes," and "digital goods" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.192;

(B) "Digital products" means digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, and the services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) and (6)(((b))) (c); and

(C) "Receive" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.32.730.

(c) If a business activity allocated under this subsection (1) takes place in more than one city and all cities impose a gross receipts tax, a credit must be allowed as provided in RCW 35.102.060; if not all of the cities impose a gross receipts tax, the affected cities must allow another credit or allocation system as they and the taxpayer agree.

(2) Gross income derived as royalties from the granting of intangible rights must be allocated to the commercial domicile of the taxpayer.

(3) Gross income derived from activities taxed as services shall be apportioned to a city by multiplying apportionable income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the payroll factor plus the service-income factor and the denominator of which is two.

(a) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid in the city during the tax period by the taxpayer for compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid everywhere during the tax period. Compensation is paid in the city if:

(i) The individual is primarily assigned within the city;

(ii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of business for the tax period and the employee performs fifty percent or more of his or her service for the tax period in the city; or

(iii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of business for the tax period, the individual does not perform fifty percent or more of his or her service in any city, and the employee resides in the city.

(b) The service income factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total service income of the taxpayer in the city during the tax period, and the denominator of which is the total service income of the taxpayer everywhere during the tax period. Service income is in the city if:

(i) The customer location is in the city; or

(ii) The income-producing activity is performed in more than one location and a greater proportion of the service-income-producing activity is performed in the city than in any other location, based on costs of performance, and the taxpayer is not taxable at the customer location; or

(iii) The service-income-producing activity is performed within the city, and the taxpayer is not taxable in the customer location.

(c) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this subsection do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's business activity in the city or cities in which the taxpayer does business, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax administrators may jointly require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's business activity, that one of the following methods be used jointly by the cities to allocate or apportion gross income, if reasonable:

(i) Separate accounting;

(ii) The use of a single factor;

(iii) The inclusion of one or more additional factors that will fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in the city; or

(iv) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's income.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the business taxable under the service classifications of a city's gross receipts tax, including income received from activities outside the city if the income would be taxable under the service classification if received from activities within the city, less any exemptions or deductions available.

(b) "Compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any other form of remuneration paid to individuals for personal services that are or would be included in the individual's gross income under the federal internal revenue code.

(c) "Individual" means any individual who, under the usual common law rules applicable in determining the employer-employee relationship, has the status of an employee of that taxpayer.

(d) "Customer location" means the city or unincorporated area of a county where the majority of the contacts between the taxpayer and the customer take place.

(e) "Primarily assigned" means the business location of the taxpayer where the individual performs his or her duties.

(f) "Service-taxable income" or "service income" means gross income of the business subject to tax under either the service or royalty classification.

(g) "Tax period" means the calendar year during which tax liability is accrued. If taxes are reported by a taxpayer on a basis more frequent than once per year, taxpayers shall calculate the factors for the previous calendar year for reporting in the current calendar year and correct the reporting for the previous year when the factors are calculated for that year, but not later than the end of the first quarter of the following year.

(h) "Taxable in the customer location" means either that a taxpayer is subject to a gross receipts tax in the customer location for the privilege of doing business, or that the government where the customer is located has the authority to subject the taxpayer to gross receipts tax regardless of whether, in fact, the government does so.

Sec. 612. RCW 82.04.060 and 2015 c 169 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means:

(1) Any sale, which is not a sale at retail, of:

(a) Tangible personal property;

(b) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g);

(c) Activities defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(15);

(d) Prewritten computer software;

(e) Services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c);

(f) Extended warranties as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7);

(g) Competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(h) Digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services;

(2) Any charge made for labor and services rendered for persons who are not consumers, in respect to real or personal property, if such charge is expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for consumers. For the purposes of this subsection (2), "real or personal property" does not include any natural products named in RCW 82.04.100; and

(3) The sale of any service for resale, if the sale is excluded from the definition of "sale at retail" and "retail sale" in RCW 82.04.050(14).

Sec. 613. RCW 82.04.190 and 2015 c 169 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Consumer" means the following:

(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the person's business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than for the purpose of:

(a) Resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business;

(b) Incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers;

(c) Consuming such property in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale;

(d) Consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e) Satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person;

(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), other than for resale in the regular course of business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any person who makes a purchase meeting the definition of "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050(15), other than for resale in the regular course of business; (e) any person who purchases or acquires an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course of business; and (f) any person who is an end user of software. For purposes of this subsection (2)(f) and RCW 82.04.050(6), a person who purchases or otherwise acquires prewritten computer software, who provides services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) and who will charge consumers for the right to access and use the prewritten computer software, is not an end user of the prewritten computer software;

(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right-of-way of such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;

(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an easement in real property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition may be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business;

(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person is a consumer within the meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, or any instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a private entity;

(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this section may be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development;

(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the replacement property;

(10) Any person who purchases, acquires, or uses services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) other than:

(a) For resale in the regular course of business; or

(b) For purposes of consuming the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) in producing for sale a new product, but only if such service becomes a component of the new product. For purposes of this subsection (10), "product" means a digital product, an article of tangible personal property, or the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c);

(11)(a) Any end user of a digital product or digital code. "Consumer" does not include any person who is not an end user of a digital product or a digital code and purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any digital product or digital code for purposes of consuming the digital product or digital code in producing for sale a new product, but only if the digital product or digital code becomes a component of the new product. A digital code becomes a component of a new product if the digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of the digital code becomes incorporated into a new product. For purposes of this subsection, "product" has the same meaning as in subsection (10) of this section.

(b)(i) For purposes of this subsection, "end user" means any taxpayer as defined in RCW 82.12.010 other than a taxpayer who receives by contract a digital product for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the product, in whole or in part, to others. A person that purchases digital products or digital codes for the purpose of giving away such products or codes will not be considered to have engaged in the distribution or redistribution of such products or codes and will be treated as an end user;

(ii) If a purchaser of a digital code does not receive the contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is an end user. If the purchaser of the digital code receives the contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is not an end user. A purchaser of a digital code who has the contractual right to further redistribute the digital code is an end user if that purchaser does not have the right to further redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code relates;

(12) Any person who provides services described in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person is a consumer with respect to the purchase, acquisition, or use of the tangible personal property that the person provides along with an operator in rendering services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person may also be a consumer under other provisions of this section;

(13) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses chemical sprays or washes for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, or who purchases feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials, is not a consumer of such items, but only to the extent that the items:

(a) Are used in relation to the person's participation in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;

(b) Are for use by a farmer for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; or

(c) Are for use by a farmer to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land the farmer owns or leases while acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife; and

(14) A regional transit authority is not a consumer with respect to labor, services, or tangible personal property purchased pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

Sec. 614. RCW 82.04.192 and 2010 c 111 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Digital audio works" means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including ringtones.

(2) "Digital audiovisual works" means a series of related images which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any.

(3)(a) "Digital automated service," except as provided in (b) of this subsection (3), means any service transferred electronically that uses one or more software applications.

(b) "Digital automated service" does not include:

(i) Any service that primarily involves the application of human effort by the seller, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service;

(ii) The loaning or transferring of money or the purchase, sale, or transfer of financial instruments. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(ii), "financial instruments" include cash, accounts receivable and payable, loans and notes receivable and payable, debt securities, equity securities, as well as derivative contracts such as forward contracts, swap contracts, and options;

(iii) Dispensing cash or other physical items from a machine;

(iv) Payment processing services;

(v) Parimutuel wagering and handicapping contests as authorized by chapter 67.16 RCW;

(vi) Telecommunications services and ancillary services as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065;

(vii) The internet and internet access as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.297;

(viii) The service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c);

(ix) Online educational programs provided by a:

(A) Public or private elementary or secondary school; or

(B) An institution of higher education as defined in sections 1001 or 1002 of the federal higher education act of 1965 (Title 20 U.S.C. Secs. 1001 and 1002), as existing on July 1, 2009. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(ix)(B), an online educational program must be encompassed within the institution's accreditation;

(x) Live presentations, such as lectures, seminars, workshops, or courses, where participants are connected to other participants via the internet or telecommunications equipment, which allows audience members and the presenter or instructor to give, receive, and discuss information with each other in real time;

(xi) Travel agent services, including online travel services, and automated systems used by travel agents to book reservations;

(xii)(A) A service that allows the person receiving the service to make online sales of products or services, digital or otherwise, using either: (I) The service provider's web site; or (II) the service recipient's web site, but only when the service provider's technology is used in creating or hosting the service recipient's web site or is used in processing orders from customers using the service recipient's web site.

(B) The service described in this subsection (3)(b)(xii) does not include the underlying sale of the products or services, digital or otherwise, by the person receiving the service;

(xiii) Advertising services. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(xiii), "advertising services" means all services directly related to the creation, preparation, production, or the dissemination of advertisements. Advertising services include layout, art direction, graphic design, mechanical preparation, production supervision, placement, and rendering advice to a client concerning the best methods of advertising that client's products or services. Advertising services also include online referrals, search engine marketing and lead generation optimization, web campaign planning, the acquisition of advertising space in the internet media, and the monitoring and evaluation of web site traffic for purposes of determining the effectiveness of an advertising campaign. Advertising services do not include web hosting services and domain name registration;

(xiv) The mere storage of digital products, digital codes, computer software, or master copies of software. This exclusion from the definition of digital automated services includes providing space on a server for web hosting or the backing up of data or other information;

(xv) Data processing services. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(xv), "data processing service" means a primarily automated service provided to a business or other organization where the primary object of the service is the systematic performance of operations by the service provider on data supplied in whole or in part by the customer to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing services include check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities. Data processing does not include the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c); and

(xvi) Digital goods.

(4) "Digital books" means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as books.

(5) "Digital code" means a code that provides a purchaser with the right to obtain one or more digital products, if all of the digital products to be obtained through the use of the code have the same sales and use tax treatment. "Digital code" does not include a code that represents a stored monetary value that is deducted from a total as it is used by the purchaser. "Digital code" also does not include a code that represents a redeemable card, gift card, or gift certificate that entitles the holder to select digital products of an indicated cash value. A digital code may be obtained by any means, including email or by tangible means regardless of its designation as song code, video code, book code, or some other term.

(6)(a) "Digital goods," except as provided in (b) of this subsection (6), means sounds, images, data, facts, or information, or any combination thereof, transferred electronically, including, but not limited to, specified digital products and other products transferred electronically not included within the definition of specified digital products.

(b) The term "digital goods" does not include:

(i) Telecommunications services and ancillary services as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065;

(ii) Computer software as defined in RCW 82.04.215;

(iii) The internet and internet access as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.297;

(iv)(A) Except as provided in (b)(iv)(B) of this subsection (6), the representation of a personal or professional service in electronic form, such as an electronic copy of an engineering report prepared by an engineer, where the service primarily involves the application of human effort by the service provider, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service.

(B) The exclusion in (b)(iv)(A) of this subsection (6) does not apply to photographers in respect to amounts received for the taking of photographs that are transferred electronically to the customer, but only if the customer is an end user, as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11), of the photographs. Such amounts are considered to be for the sale of digital goods; and

(v) Services and activities excluded from the definition of digital automated services in subsection (3)(b)(i) through (xv) of this section and not otherwise described in (b)(i) through (iv) of this subsection (6).

(7) "Digital products" means digital goods and digital automated services.

(8) "Electronically transferred" or "transferred electronically" means obtained by the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media. It is not necessary that a copy of the product be physically transferred to the purchaser. So long as the purchaser may access the product, it will be considered to have been electronically transferred to the purchaser.

(9) "Specified digital products" means electronically transferred digital audiovisual works, digital audio works, and digital books.

(10) "Subscription radio services" means the sale of audio programming by a radio broadcaster as defined in RCW 82.08.02081, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. "Subscription radio services" does not include audio programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service.

(11) "Subscription television services" means the sale of video programming by a television broadcaster as defined in RCW 82.08.02081, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. "Subscription television services" does not include video programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service, but only if the seller is not subject to a franchise fee in this state under the authority of Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a) on the gross revenue derived from the sale.

Sec. 615. RCW 82.04.257 and 2010 c 111 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail or wholesale of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c), as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent in the case of retail sales and by the rate of 0.484 percent in the case of wholesale sales.

(2) Persons providing subscription television services or subscription radio services are subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2) on the gross income of the business received from providing such services.

(3) For purposes of this section, a person is considered to be engaging within this state in the business of making sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c), if the person makes sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c) and the sales are sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 for sales tax purposes or would have been sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 if the sale had been taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW.

(4) A person subject to tax under this section is subject to the mandatory electronic filing and payment requirements in RCW 82.32.080.

Sec. 616. RCW 82.04.258 and 2009 c 535 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any person subject to tax under RCW 82.04.257 engaging both within and outside this state in the business of making sales at retail or wholesale of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c), must apportion to this state that portion of apportionable income derived from activity performed within this state as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, a person is considered to be engaging outside this state in the business of making sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c) if the person makes any sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c) that are sourced to a jurisdiction other than Washington under RCW 82.32.730 for sales tax purposes or would have been sourced to a jurisdiction other than Washington under RCW 82.32.730 if the sale had been a retail sale.

(2) Apportionable income must be apportioned to Washington by multiplying the apportionable income by the sales factor.

(3)(a) The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total receipts of the taxpayer from making sales of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, and services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(((b))) (c) in this state during the tax period, and the denominator of which is the total receipts of the taxpayer derived from such activity everywhere during the tax period.

(b) For purposes of computing the sales factor, sales are considered in this state if the sale was sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 for sales tax purposes or would have been sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 if the sale had been taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW.

(4) For purposes of this section, "apportionable income" means the gross income of the business taxable under RCW 82.04.257, including income received from activities outside this state if the income would be taxable under RCW 82.04.257 if received from activities in this state.

Sec. 617. RCW 82.08.02082 and 2010 c 111 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to a business or other organization for the purpose of making the digital good or digital automated service, including a digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of a digital code, or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) available free of charge for the use or enjoyment of the general public. The exemption provided in this section does not apply unless the purchaser has the legal right to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license, relicense, distribute, redistribute, or exhibit the product, in whole or in part, to the general public.

(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) For purposes of this section, "general public" means all persons and not limited or restricted to a particular class of persons, except that the general public includes:

(a) A class of persons that is defined as all persons residing or owning property within the boundaries of a state, political subdivision of a state, or a municipal corporation; and

(b) With respect to libraries, authorized library patrons.

Sec. 618. RCW 82.08.02088 and 2009 c 535 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) to a buyer that provides the seller with an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use. An exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use must be in a form and contain such information as required by the department.

(2) A buyer is entitled to use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use only if the buyer is a business or other organization and the digital goods or digital automated services purchased, or the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the digital code purchased, or the prewritten computer software or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) purchased will be concurrently available for use within and outside this state. A buyer is not entitled to use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use for digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) purchased for personal use.

(3) A buyer claiming an exemption under this section must report and pay the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 and any local use taxes imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW and RCW 81.104.170 directly to the department in accordance with RCW 82.12.02088 and 82.14.457.

(4) For purposes of this section, "concurrently available for use within and outside this state" means that employees or other agents of the buyer may use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) simultaneously from one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state. A digital code is concurrently available for use within and outside this state if employees or other agents of the buyer may use the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the code simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state.

Sec. 619. RCW 82.12.010 and 2015 c 169 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, has full force and effect with respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, also means any person who distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a consumer as defined in this subsection (1), the use of the property is deemed to be by such consumer.

(2) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7).

(3) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in RCW 82.08.010.

(4)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (4), "retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter.

(ii) "Retailer" does not include a professional employer organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, or a sale of any digital automated service or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c) that is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be the retailer and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client," "covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and "professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.04.540.

(5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW.

(6) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" have their ordinary meaning, and mean:

(a) With respect to tangible personal property, except for natural gas and manufactured gas, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption within this state;

(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the first act within this state after the service has been performed by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible personal property upon which the service was performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;

(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;

(d) With respect to a digital good or digital code, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good or digital code;

(e) With respect to a digital automated service, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, uses, enjoys, or otherwise receives the benefit of the service;

(f) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c), the first act within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, accesses the prewritten computer software;

(g) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(g), the first act within this state after the service has been performed by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good upon which the service was performed; and

(h) With respect to natural gas or manufactured gas, the use of which is taxable under RCW 82.12.022, including gas that is also taxable under the authority of RCW 82.14.230, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer consumes the gas by burning the gas or storing the gas in the taxpayer's own facilities for later consumption by the taxpayer.

(7)(a) "Value of the article used" is the purchase price for the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article used. In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the article used is determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.

(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the articles so used must be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so used is determined according to the retail selling price of such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the article used must be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this subsection.

(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of the articles used is determined according to the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved product, the value of the article used is determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered for sale.

(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used is determined by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax.

(8) "Value of the digital good or digital code used" means the purchase price for the digital good or digital code, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the digital good or digital code is acquired other than by purchase, the value of the digital good or digital code must be determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar digital goods or digital codes of like quality and character under rules the department may prescribe.

(9) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used is determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality and character under rules the department may prescribe.

(10) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the digital automated service or other service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the service used is determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like quality and character under rules the department may prescribe.

Sec. 620. RCW 82.12.020 and 2015 c 169 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer any:

(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within this state;

(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both;

(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), excluding services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) that are provided free of charge;

(d) Extended warranty; or

(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service, including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:

(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of use.

(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.

(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:

(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor;

(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;

(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or

(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services, which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.

(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

(5) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person" includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.

Sec. 621. RCW 82.12.02082 and 2010 c 111 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a business or other organization of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) for the purpose of making the digital good or digital automated service, including a digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of a digital code, or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) available free of charge for the use or enjoyment of the general public. For purposes of this section, "general public" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.02082. The exemption provided in this section does not apply unless the user has the legal right to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license, relicense, distribute, redistribute, or exhibit the product, in whole or in part, to the general public.

Sec. 622. RCW 82.12.02088 and 2009 c 535 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A business or other organization subject to the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 on the use of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) that are concurrently available for use within and outside this state is entitled to apportion the amount of tax due this state based on users in this state compared to users everywhere. The department may authorize or require an alternative method of apportionment supported by the taxpayer's records that fairly reflects the proportion of in-state to out-of-state use by the taxpayer of the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c).

(2) No apportionment under this section is allowed unless the apportionment method is supported by the taxpayer's records kept in the ordinary course of business.

(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Concurrently available for use within and outside this state" means that employees or other agents of the taxpayer may use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state. A digital code is concurrently available for use within and outside this state if employees or other agents of the taxpayer may use the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the code simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state.

(b) "User" means an employee or agent of the taxpayer who is authorized by the taxpayer to use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) in the performance of his or her duties as an employee or other agent of the taxpayer.

Sec. 623. RCW 82.12.0259 and 2009 c 535 s 613 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of personal property or the use of digital automated services or services defined in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (6)(((b))) (c) by corporations that have been incorporated under any act of the congress of the United States and whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to members of the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on a system of national and international relief and to apply the same in mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, flood, and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for preventing the same.

Sec. 624. RCW 82.12.035 and 2015 c 169 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

A credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon the use in this state of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), in the amount that the present user thereof or his or her bailor or donor has paid a legally imposed retail sales or use tax with respect to such property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c) to any other state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

Sec. 625. RCW 82.12.040 and 2015 c 169 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state, must obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and must, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), or making transfers of either possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for use in this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax imposed under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section must be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the purposes of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place of business" includes the solicitation of sales and/or taking of orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state" includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of the United States for this state to require collection of tax under this chapter. The department must in rules specify activities which constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and must keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the Constitution of the United States.

(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by reason of sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), of his or her principals for use in this state, must, at the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the tax imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that purpose is deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.

(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter is deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department, and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed is guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to the department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is nevertheless personally liable to the state for the amount of such tax, unless the seller has taken from the buyer a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.

(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all or any part of the tax levied by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if:

(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted directly or through another person, are limited to:

(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;

(ii) The taking of orders; or

(iii) The processing of payments; and

(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.

(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers.

(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if the person would have been obligated to collect retail sales tax on the sale absent a specific exemption provided in chapter 82.08 RCW, and there is no corresponding use tax exemption in this chapter. Nothing in this subsection (7) may be construed as relieving purchasers from liability for reporting and remitting the tax due under this chapter directly to the department.

(8) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter if the state is prohibited under the Constitution or laws of the United States from requiring the person to collect the tax imposed by this chapter.

(9) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, any licensed dealer facilitating a firearm sale or transfer between two unlicensed persons by conducting background checks under chapter 9.41 RCW is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by this chapter.

Sec. 626. RCW 82.12.860 and 2015 c 169 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to state credit unions with respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((b))) (c), or extended warranty, acquired from a federal credit union, foreign credit union, or out-of-state credit union as a result of a merger or conversion.

(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Federal credit union" means a credit union organized and operating under the laws of the United States.

(b) "Foreign credit union" means a credit union organized and operating under the laws of another country or other foreign jurisdiction.

(c) "Out-of-state credit union" means a credit union organized and operating under the laws of another state or United States territory or possession.

(d) "State credit union" means a credit union organized and operating under the laws of this state.

Sec. 627. RCW 82.14.457 and 2009 c 535 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A business or other organization that is entitled under RCW 82.12.02088 to apportion the amount of state use tax on the use of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((b))) (c) is also entitled to apportion the amount of local use taxes imposed under the authority of this chapter and RCW 81.104.170 on the use of such products or services.

(2) To ensure that the tax base for state and local use taxes is identical, the measure of local use taxes apportioned under this section must be the same as the measure of state use tax apportioned under RCW 82.12.02088.

(3) This section does not affect the sourcing of local use taxes.

Sec. 628. RCW 82.04.4277 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 532 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A health or social welfare organization may deduct from the measure of tax amounts received as compensation for providing mental health services or chemical dependency services under a government-funded program.

(2) A behavioral health organization may deduct from the measure of tax amounts received from the state of Washington for distribution to a health or social welfare organization that is eligible to deduct the distribution under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Chemical dependency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.96A.020 through March 31, 2018, and the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020 beginning April 1, 2018.

(b) "Health or social welfare organization" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.431.

(c) "Mental health services" and "behavioral health organization" have the meanings provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(5) This section expires January 1, 2020.

Sec. 629. RCW 84.12.270 and 2001 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of revenue ((shall)) must annually make an assessment of the operating property of all companies((; and)). Between the fifteenth day of March and the first day of July of each year ((shall)) the department must prepare an initial assessment roll upon which ((it shall)) the department must enter and assess the true and fair value of all the operating property of each of such companies as of the first day of January of the year in which the assessment is made. The department must finalize the assessment roll by the twentieth day of August of each year. For the purpose of determining the true and fair value of such property the department of revenue may inspect the property belonging to ((said)) the companies and may take into consideration any information or knowledge obtained by ((it)) the department from ((such)) an examination and inspection of such property, or of the books, records, and accounts of such companies, the statements filed as required by this chapter, the reports, statements, or returns of such companies filed in the office of any board, office, or commission of this state or any county thereof, the earnings and earning power of such companies, the franchises owned or used by such companies, the true and fair valuation of any and all property of such companies, whether operating or nonoperating property, and whether situated within or outside the state, and any other facts, evidence, or information that may be obtainable bearing upon the value of the operating property((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in no event ((shall)) may any statement or report required from any company by this chapter be conclusive upon the department of revenue in determining the amount, character, and true and fair value of the operating property of such company.

Sec. 630. RCW 84.12.330 and 2001 c 187 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the assessment roll ((shall)) must be placed after the name of each company a general description of the operating property of the company, which ((shall be)) is considered sufficient if described in the language of RCW 84.12.200(((12))) (8), as applied to the company, following which ((shall)) must be entered the true and fair value of the operating property as determined by the department of revenue. No assessment ((shall)) may be invalidated by reason of a mistake in the name of the company assessed, or the omission of the name of the owner or by the entry as owner of a name other than that of the true owner. When the department of revenue ((shall have)) has prepared the assessment roll and entered thereon the true and fair value of the operating property of the company, as herein required, ((it shall)) the department must notify the company by mail of the valuation determined by it and entered upon the roll.

Sec. 631. RCW 84.16.040 and 2001 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of revenue ((shall)) must annually make an assessment of the operating property of each private car company((; and)). Between the first day of May and the first day of July of each year ((shall)) the department must prepare an initial assessment roll upon which ((it shall)) the department must enter and assess the true and fair value of all the operating property of each of such companies as of the first day of January of the year in which the assessment is made. The department must finalize the assessment roll by the twentieth day of August of each year. For the purpose of determining the true and fair value of such property the department of revenue may take into consideration any information or knowledge obtained by ((it)) the department from an examination and inspection of such property, or of the books, records, and accounts of such companies, the statements filed as required by this chapter, the reports, statements, or returns of such companies filed in the office of any board, office, or commission of this state or any county thereof, the earnings and earning power of such companies, the franchises owned or used by such companies, the true and fair valuation of any and all property of such companies, whether operating property or nonoperating property, and whether situated within or without the state, and any other facts, evidences, or information that may be obtainable bearing upon the value of the operating property((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in no event ((shall)) may any statement or report required from any company by this chapter be conclusive upon the department of revenue in determining the amount, character, and true and fair value of the operating property of such company.

Sec. 632. RCW 84.16.090 and 2001 c 187 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon the assessment roll ((shall)) must be placed after the name of each company a general description of the operating property of the company, which ((shall be)) is considered sufficient if described in the language of RCW 84.16.010(3) or otherwise, following which ((shall)) must be entered the true and fair value of the operating property as determined by the department of revenue. No assessment ((shall be)) is invalid by a mistake in the name of the company assessed, by omission of the name of the owner or by the entry of a name other than that of the true owner. When the department of revenue ((shall have)) has prepared the initial assessment roll and entered thereon the true and fair value of the operating property of the company, as required, ((it shall)) the department must notify the company by mail of the valuation determined by it and entered upon the roll; and thereupon such valuation ((shall)) must become the true and fair value of the operating property of the company, subject to revision or correction by the department of revenue as hereinafter provided; and ((shall)) must be the valuation upon which, after equalization by the department of revenue as hereinafter provided, the taxes of such company ((shall be)) are based and computed.

Part VII

Estate tax return filing relief

Sec. 701. RCW 83.100.050 and 2008 c 181 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A Washington return must be filed if((: (a) A federal return is required to be filed; or (b) for decedents dying prior to January 1, 2006, the gross estate exceeds one million five hundred thousand dollars; or (c) for decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006, the gross estate exceeds two million dollars)) the gross estate equals or exceeds the applicable exclusion amount.

(2) If a Washington return is required as provided in subsection (1) of this section:

(a) A person required to file a federal return ((shall)) must file with the department on or before the date the federal return is required to be filed, including any extension of time for filing under subsection (4) or (6) of this section, a Washington return for the tax due under this chapter.

(b) If no federal return is required to be filed, a taxpayer shall file with the department on or before the date a federal return would have been required to be filed, including any extension of time for filing under subsection (5) or (6) of this section, a Washington return for the tax due under this chapter.

(3) A Washington return delivered to the department by United States mail ((shall be)) is considered to have been received by the department on the date of the United States postmark stamped on the cover in which the return is mailed, if the postmark date is within the time allowed for filing the Washington return, including extensions.

(4) In addition to the Washington return required to be filed in subsection (2) of this section, a person((, if required to file a federal return, shall)) must file with the department on or before the date the federal return is ((required to be filed a copy of the federal return along with all supporting documentation)) or would have been required to be filed all supporting documentation for completed Washington return schedules, and, if a federal return has been filed, a copy of the federal return. If the person required to file the federal return has obtained an extension of time for filing the federal return, the person ((shall)) must file the Washington return within the same time period and in the same manner as provided for the federal return. A copy of the federal extension ((shall)) must be filed with the department on or before the date the Washington return is due, not including any extension of time for filing, or within thirty days of issuance, whichever is later.

(5) A person may obtain an extension of time for filing the Washington return as provided by rule of the department, if the person is required to file a Washington return under subsection (2) of this section, but is not required to file a federal return.

(6) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may extend the time for filing a Washington return under this section as the department deems proper.

Part VIII

Clarifying that licensing information may not be disclosed for commercial purposes

Sec. 801. RCW 19.02.115 and 2013 c 144 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((For purposes of this section:)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner licensing information((;)).

(b) "Licensing information" means any information created or obtained by the department in the administration of this chapter and chapters 19.80 and 59.30 RCW, which information relates to any person who: (i) Has applied for or has been issued a license or trade name; or (ii) has been issued an assessment or delinquency fee. Licensing information includes initial and renewal business license applications, and business licenses((;)).

(c) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes the state and the state's departments and institutions((; and)).

(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.

(2) Licensing information is confidential and privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the department nor any other person may disclose any licensing information. Nothing in this chapter requires any person possessing licensing information made confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from such information so as to permit its disclosure.

(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue, or any other person receiving licensing information from the department under this subsection, from:

(a) Disclosing licensing information in a civil or criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:

(i) In which the person about whom such licensing information is sought and the department, another state agency, or a local government are adverse parties in the proceeding; or

(ii) Involving a dispute arising out of the department's administration of chapter 19.80 or 59.30 RCW, or this chapter if the licensing information relates to a party in the proceeding;

(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such licensing information regarding a license applicant or license holder to such license applicant or license holder or to such person or persons as that license applicant or license holder may designate in a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the license applicant's or license holder's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request for information or assistance made by the license applicant or license holder to such other person. However, licensing information not received from the license applicant or holder must not be so disclosed if the director determines that such disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal liability of the license applicant, license holder, or another person, or that such disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies, which agreement requires confidentiality with respect to such information unless such information is required to be disclosed to the license applicant or license holder by the order of any court;

(c) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of particular licensing information;

(d) Disclosing licensing information for official purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry or the professions, or licensing;

(e) Permitting the department's records to be audited and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and employees;

(f) Disclosing any licensing information to a peace officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure is for the purpose of criminal tax or license enforcement. A peace officer or county prosecuting attorney who receives the licensing information may disclose that licensing information only for use in the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court proceeding for which the licensing information originally was sought;

(g) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other licensing information, the name of a license applicant or license holder, entity type, registered trade name, business address, mailing address, unified business identifier number, list of licenses issued to a person through the business licensing system established in this chapter and their issuance and expiration dates, and the dates of opening of a business. This subsection may not be construed as giving authority to the department to give, sell, or provide access to any list of persons for any commercial purpose;

(h) Disclosing licensing information that is also maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;

(i) Disclosing any licensing information when the disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the Revised Code of Washington;

(j) Disclosing licensing information to the proper officer of the licensing or tax department of any city, town, or county of this state, for official purposes. If the licensing information does not relate to a license issued by the city, town, or county requesting the licensing information, disclosure may be made only if the laws of the requesting city, town, or county grants substantially similar privileges to the proper officers of this state; or

(k) Disclosing licensing information to the federal government for official purposes.

(4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a state agency or local government agency may disclose licensing information relating to a license issued on its behalf by the department pursuant to this chapter if the disclosure is authorized by another statute, local law, or administrative rule.

(5) The department, any other state agency, or local government may refuse to disclose licensing information that is otherwise disclosable under subsection (3) of this section if such disclosure would violate federal law or any information sharing agreement between the state or local government and federal government.

(6) Any person acquiring knowledge of any licensing information in the course of his or her employment with the department and any person acquiring knowledge of any licensing information as provided under subsection (3)(d), (e), (f), (j), or (k) of this section, who discloses any such licensing information to another person not entitled to knowledge of such licensing information under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the state, such person must forfeit such office or employment and is incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for a period of two years thereafter.

Part IX

Background investigations

Sec. 901. RCW 82.01.060 and 2011 c 298 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of revenue, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the director, through the department of revenue, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the department, must:

(1) Assess and collect all taxes and administer all programs relating to taxes which are the responsibility of the tax commission at the time chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. takes effect or which the legislature may hereafter make the responsibility of the director or of the department;

(2) Make, adopt and publish such rules as he or she may deem necessary or desirable to carry out the powers and duties imposed upon him or her or the department by the legislature. However, the director may not adopt rules after July 23, 1995, that are based solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule;

(3) Rules adopted by the tax commission before July 23, 1995, remain in force until such time as they may be revised or rescinded by the director;

(4) Provide by general regulations for an adequate system of departmental review of the actions of the department or of its officers and employees in the assessment or collection of taxes;

(5) Maintain a tax research section with sufficient technical, clerical and other employees to conduct constant observation and investigation of the effectiveness and adequacy of the revenue laws of this state and of the sister states in order to assist the governor, the legislature and the director in estimation of revenue, analysis of tax measures, and determination of the administrative feasibility of proposed tax legislation and allied problems;

(6) Recommend to the governor such amendments, changes in, and modifications of the revenue laws as seem proper and requisite to remedy injustice and irregularities in taxation, and to facilitate the assessment and collection of taxes in the most economical manner;

(7) Provide the opportunity for any person feeling aggrieved by any action taken against the person by the department in the administration of chapters 19.02, 19.80, and 59.30 RCW to request a review of the department's action. Such review may be conducted as a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494; and

(8)(a) Establish background investigation policies applicable to those current and prospective department employees and contractors that are or may be authorized by the department to access federal tax information. Such policies must require a criminal history record check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation, at the expense of the department. The record check must include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card, which must be forwarded by the Washington state patrol to the federal bureau of investigation. The department's background investigation policies must also satisfy any specific background investigation standards established by the internal revenue service.

(b) Information received by the department pursuant to this subsection may be used only for the purposes of making, supporting, or defending decisions regarding the appointment, hiring, or retention of persons, or for complying with any requirements from the internal revenue service. Further dissemination or use of the information is prohibited, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

Part X

Revising the date by which the department of revenue is required to provide estimates of the amount of public forestland that is available for timber harvesting

Sec. 1001. RCW 84.33.089 and 2004 c 177 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((shall)) must estimate the number of acres of public forestland that are available for timber harvesting. The department ((shall)) must provide the estimates for each county and for each taxing district within each county by ((August 30th)) October 1st of each year except that the department may authorize a county, at the county's option, to make its own estimates for public forestland in that county. In estimating the number of acres, the department ((shall)) must use the best available information to include public land comparable to private land that qualifies as forestland for assessment purposes and exclude other public lands. The department is not required to update the estimates unless improved information becomes available. The department of natural resources ((shall)) must assist the department with these determinations by providing any data and information in the possession of the department of natural resources on public forestlands, broken out by county and legal description, including a detailed map of each county showing the location of the described lands. The data and information ((shall)) must be provided to the department by July 15th of each year. In addition, the department may contract with other parties to provide data or assistance necessary to implement this section.

(2) To accommodate the phase-in of the county forest excise tax on the harvest of timber from public lands as provided in RCW 84.33.051, the department ((shall)) must adjust its actual estimates of the number of acres of public forestland that are available for timber harvesting. The department ((shall)) must reduce its estimates for the following years by the following amounts:

(a) For calendar year 2005, 70 percent;

(b) For calendar year 2006, 62.5 percent;

(c) For calendar year 2007, 55 percent;

(d) For calendar year 2008, 47.5 percent;

(e) For calendar year 2009, 40 percent;

(f) For calendar year 2010, 32.5 percent;

(g) For calendar year 2011, 22.5 percent;

(h) For calendar year 2012, 15 percent;

(i) For calendar year 2013, 7.5 percent; and

(j) For calendar year 2014 and thereafter, the department ((shall)) may not reduce its estimates of the number of acres of public forestland that are available for timber harvesting.

Part XI

Electronic communication of confidential property tax information

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101. A new section is added to chapter 84.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may provide electronically any assessment, notice, or other information that is subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 84.08.210 or 84.40.340, to any person authorized to receive the information.

(2) The department must use methods reasonably designed to protect information provided electronically as authorized in subsection (1) of this section from unauthorized disclosure. However, the provisions of this subsection (2) may be waived by a taxpayer. The waiver must be in writing and may be provided to the department electronically. A waiver continues until revoked in writing by the taxpayer. Such revocation may be provided to the department electronically in a manner provided or approved by the department.

Part XII

Miscellaneous

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to any provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, part I of this act takes effect January 1, 2018.

(2) Section 102 of this act takes effect April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1203. Part V of this act takes effect January 1, 2018.

--- END ---