BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

Except for services subject to RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.020, 50.44.030, or 50.50.010, as used in this title the term "employment" does not include services performed by a driver providing commercial transportation services as defined in RCW 48.177.005.

--- END ---