BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.160.191 and 2009 c 548 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that the allocation formula results in an adequate ((appropriation)) allocation for low enrollment districts, nonhigh districts, districts involved in cooperative transportation agreements, and cooperative special transportation services operated by educational service districts. If necessary, the superintendent shall develop a separate process to adjust the allocation of the districts.

(2) The superintendent must establish a transportation allocation adjustment process to address underfunded districts operating pupil transportation efficiently. A district operates pupil transportation efficiently if the district's pupil transportation cost per student is less than the statewide average. A pupil transportation allocation adjustment may not exceed the amount of funding necessary to bring the underfunded district up to the state's pupil transportation funding average. For the purpose of this section, the "state's pupil transportation funding average" means state funding for pupil transportation as a percentage of total pupil transportation costs for school districts.

--- END ---