BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.09.530 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The authority is designated as the single state agency for purposes of Title XIX of the federal social security act.

(b) The amount and nature of medical assistance and the determination of eligibility of recipients for medical assistance shall be the responsibility of the authority.

(c) The authority shall establish reasonable standards of assistance and resource and income exemptions which shall be consistent with the provisions of the social security act and federal regulations for determining eligibility of individuals for medical assistance and the extent of such assistance to the extent that funds are available from the state and federal government. The authority shall not consider resources in determining continuing eligibility for recipients eligible under section 1931 of the social security act.

(d) The authority is authorized to collaborate with other state or local agencies and nonprofit organizations in carrying out its duties under this chapter and, to the extent appropriate, may enter into agreements with such other entities.

(2) Individuals eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510(3) shall be transitioned into coverage under that subsection immediately upon their termination from coverage under RCW 74.09.510(2)(a). The authority shall use income eligibility standards and eligibility determinations applicable to children placed in foster care. The authority shall provide information regarding basic health plan enrollment and shall offer assistance with the application and enrollment process to individuals covered under RCW 74.09.510(3) who are approaching their twenty-first birthday.

(3) The authority shall not pursue federal waivers that obligate the state to future spending, create entitlements, or expand the scope of government without legislative authorization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.5222 (Medical assistance—Section 1115 demonstration waiver request) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 30 & 2009 c 545 s 4 are each repealed.

--- END ---