BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.09.310 and 2005 c 387 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the state auditor shall annually audit the statewide combined financial statements prepared by the office of financial management and make post-audits of state agencies. Post-audits of state agencies shall be made at such periodic intervals as is determined by the state auditor. Audits of combined financial statements shall include determinations as to the validity and accuracy of accounting methods, procedures and standards utilized in their preparation, as well as the accuracy of the financial statements themselves. A report shall be made of each such audit and post-audit upon completion thereof, and one copy shall be transmitted to the governor, one to the director of financial management, one to the state agency audited, one to the joint legislative audit and review committee, one each to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate, one to the chief clerk of the house, one to the secretary of the senate, and at least one shall be kept on file in the office of the state auditor. A copy of any report containing findings of noncompliance with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney general and shall be subject to the process provided in section 2 of this act.

(2) Audits of the department of labor and industries must be coordinated with the audits required under RCW 51.44.115 to avoid duplication of audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Within thirty days of receipt of an audit under RCW 43.09.310 containing findings of noncompliance with state law, the subject state agency shall submit a response and a plan for remediation to the office of financial management. Within sixty days of receipt of an audit under RCW 43.09.310 containing findings of noncompliance with state law, the office of financial management shall submit the subject state agency's response and a plan for remediation to the governor, the state auditor, the joint legislative audit and review committee, and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of representatives.

(2) If, at the next succeeding audit of the subject state agency, the state auditor determines that the subject state agency has failed to make substantial progress in remediating the noncompliance with state law, the state auditor shall notify the entities specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Upon receipt of a notification under subsection (2) of this section, a fiscal or policy committee of the senate or house of representatives may refer the matter to the senate committee on facilities and operations or the executive rules committee of the house of representatives, which committee may refer the matter to the attorney general for appropriate legal action under RCW 43.09.330.

--- END ---