BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.117 and 2012 c 80 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing a picture, if the applicant:

(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;

(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and

(c) Pays the required fee. Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the fee is ((forty-five dollars from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, and)) fifty-four dollars ((after June 30, 2013)), unless an applicant is: (i) A recipient of continuing public assistance grants under Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and health services; or (ii) under the age of eighteen and does not have a permanent residence address as determined by the department by rule. For those persons, the fee must be the actual cost of production of the identicard.

(2) Design and term. The identicard must:

(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the official driver's license; and

(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, expire on the sixth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate after issuance.

(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be submitted by means of:

(a) Personal appearance before the department; or

(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired.

An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of the identicard holder.

(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

(5) Alternative issuance/renewal/extension. The department may issue or renew an identicard for a period other than ((five years from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or)) six years ((after June 30, 2013)), or may extend by mail or electronic commerce an identicard that has already been issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the yearly renewal rate of identicard holders. The fee for an identicard issued or renewed for a period other than ((five years from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or)) six years ((after June 30, 2013)), or that has been extended by mail or electronic commerce, is nine dollars for each year that the identicard is issued, renewed, or extended. The department may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.117 and 2014 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing a picture, if the applicant:

(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;

(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and

(c) Pays the required fee. Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the fee is ((forty-five dollars from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, and)) fifty-four dollars ((after June 30, 2013)), unless an applicant is: (i) A recipient of continuing public assistance grants under Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and health services; or (ii) under the age of eighteen and does not have a permanent residence address as determined by the department by rule. For those persons, the fee must be the actual cost of production of the identicard.

(2)(a) Design and term. The identicard must:

(i) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the official driver's license; and

(ii) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, expire on the sixth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate after issuance.

(b) The identicard may include the person's status as a veteran, consistent with RCW 46.20.161(2).

(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be submitted by means of:

(a) Personal appearance before the department; or

(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired.

An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of the identicard holder.

(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

(5) Alternative issuance/renewal/extension. The department may issue or renew an identicard for a period other than ((five years from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or)) six years ((after June 30, 2013)), or may extend by mail or electronic commerce an identicard that has already been issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the yearly renewal rate of identicard holders. The fee for an identicard issued or renewed for a period other than ((five years from October 1, 2012, to June 30, 2013, or)) six years ((after June 30, 2013)), or that has been extended by mail or electronic commerce, is nine dollars for each year that the identicard is issued, renewed, or extended. The department may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires August 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect August 30, 2017.

--- END ---