BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.21.920 and 2010 c 47 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by city or town officials, cities or towns may((,)):

(a) By ordinance, require a state and federal background investigation of license applicants or licensees in occupations specified by ordinance ((for the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by city or town officials));

(b) By ordinance, require a federal background investigation of city or town employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the city or town, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults;

(c) Require a state criminal background investigation of city or town employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the city or town, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults; and

(d) Require a criminal background investigation conducted through a private organization of city or town employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the city or town, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(2) The investigation conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section shall consist of a background check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the federal bureau of investigation. ((These))

(3) The background checks conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section must be done through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol shall serve as the sole source for receipt of fingerprint submissions and the responses to the submissions from the federal bureau of investigation, which must be disseminated to the city or town.

(4) For a criminal background check conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section, the city or town shall transmit appropriate fees for a state and national criminal history check to the Washington state patrol, unless alternately arranged.

(5) The authority for background checks outlined in this section is in addition to any other authority for such checks provided by law.

Sec. 2. RCW 35A.21.370 and 2010 c 47 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by code city officials, code cities may((,)):

(a) By ordinance, require a state and federal background investigation of license applicants or licensees in occupations specified by ordinance ((for the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by code city officials));

(b) By ordinance, require a federal background investigation of code city employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the code city, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults;

(c) Require a state criminal background investigation of code city employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the code city, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults; and

(d) Require a criminal background investigation conducted through a private organization of code city employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the code city, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(2) The investigation conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section shall consist of a background check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the federal bureau of investigation. ((These))

(3) The background checks conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section must be done through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol shall serve as the sole source for receipt of fingerprint submissions and the responses to the submissions from the federal bureau of investigation, which must be disseminated to the code city.

(4) For a criminal background check conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section, the code city shall transmit appropriate fees for a state and national criminal history check to the Washington state patrol, unless alternately arranged.

(5) The authority for background checks outlined in this section is in addition to any other authority for such checks provided by law.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.01.300 and 2010 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by county officials, counties may((,)):

(a) By ordinance, require a state and federal background investigation of license applicants or licensees in occupations specified by ordinance ((for the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by county officials));

(b) By ordinance, require a federal background investigation of county employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the county, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults;

(c) Require a state background investigation of county employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the county, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults; and

(d) Require a criminal background investigation conducted through a private organization of county employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the county, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(2) The investigation conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section shall consist of a background check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the federal bureau of investigation. ((These))

(3) The background checks conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section must be done through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol shall serve as the sole source for receipt of fingerprint submissions and the responses to the submissions from the federal bureau of investigation, which must be disseminated to the county.

(4) For a criminal background check conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section, the county shall transmit appropriate fees for a state and national criminal history check to the Washington state patrol, unless alternately arranged.

(5) The authority for background checks outlined in this section is in addition to any other authority for such checks provided by law.

Sec. 4. RCW 35.61.130 and 2006 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A metropolitan park district has the right of eminent domain, and may purchase, acquire and condemn lands lying within or without the boundaries of said park district, for public parks, parkways, boulevards, aviation landings and playgrounds, and may condemn such lands to widen, alter and extend streets, avenues, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds, to enlarge and extend existing parks, and to acquire lands for the establishment of new parks, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds. The right of eminent domain shall be exercised and instituted pursuant to resolution of the board of park commissioners and conducted in the same manner and under the same procedure as is or may be provided by law for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by incorporated cities and towns of the state of Washington in the acquisition of property rights: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, Funds to pay for condemnation allowed by this section shall be raised only as specified in this chapter.

(2) The board of park commissioners shall have power to employ counsel, and to regulate, manage and control the parks, parkways, boulevards, streets, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds under its control, and to provide for park police, for a secretary of the board of park commissioners and for all necessary employees, to fix their salaries and duties.

(3) The board of park commissioners shall have power to improve, acquire, extend and maintain, open and lay out, parks, parkways, boulevards, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds, within or without the park district, and to authorize, conduct and manage the letting of boats, or other amusement apparatus, the operation of bath houses, the purchase and sale of foodstuffs or other merchandise, the giving of vocal or instrumental concerts or other entertainments, the establishment and maintenance of aviation landings and playgrounds, and generally the management and conduct of such forms of recreation or business as it shall judge desirable or beneficial for the public, or for the production of revenue for expenditure for park purposes; and may pay out moneys for the maintenance and improvement of any such parks, parkways, boulevards, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds as now exist, or may hereafter be acquired, within or without the limits of said city and for the purchase of lands within or without the limits of said city, whenever it deems the purchase to be for the benefit of the public and for the interest of the park district, and for the maintenance and improvement thereof and for all expenses incidental to its duties: PROVIDED, That all parks, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds shall be subject to the police regulations of the city within whose limits they lie.

(4) ((For all employees, volunteers, or independent contractors, who may, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the park district, have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults, or be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card transactions,))

(a) For the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by metropolitan park districts, metropolitan park districts:

(i) Shall establish by resolution the requirements for a state and federal record check of park district employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the park district, may:

(A) Have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults; or

(B) Be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card transactions; and

(ii) May require a criminal background check conducted through a private organization of park district employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the park district, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(b) The investigation under (a)(i) of this subsection shall consist of a background check as allowed through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, the Washington state criminal records act under RCW 10.97.030((,)) and 10.97.050, and ((through)) the federal bureau of investigation((, including a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card)).

(c) The background checks conducted under (a)(i) of this subsection must be done through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol shall serve as the sole source for receipt of fingerprint submissions and the responses to the submissions from the federal bureau of investigation, which must be disseminated to the metropolitan park district.

(d) The park district shall provide a copy of the record report to the employee, volunteer, or independent contractor.

(e) When necessary, as determined by the park district, prospective employees, volunteers, vendors, or independent contractors may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the investigation.

(f) If the prospective employee, volunteer, vendor, or independent contractor has had a record check within the previous twelve months, the park district may waive the requirement upon receiving a copy of the record.

(g) For background checks conducted pursuant to (c) of this subsection, the metropolitan park district must transmit appropriate fees, as the Washington state patrol may require under RCW 10.97.100 and 43.43.838, to the Washington state patrol, unless alternately arranged. The park district may in its discretion require that the employee, prospective employee, volunteer, vendor, or independent contractor pay the costs associated with the record check.

(h) The authority for background checks outlined in this section is in addition to any other authority for such checks provided by law.

--- END ---