BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.54.120 and 2003 c 83 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

A ferry district may construct, purchase, operate, and maintain ((passenger-only)) ferries or wharves at any unfordable stream, lake, estuary, or bay within or bordering the ferry district, or between portions of the ferry district, or between the ferry district and other ferry districts, together with all the necessary boats, grounds, roads, approaches, and landings appertaining thereto under the direction and control of the governing body of the ferry district, free or for toll as the governing body determines by resolution.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.54.130 and 2009 c 551 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To carry out the purposes for which ferry districts are created, the governing body of a ferry district may levy each year an ad valorem tax on all taxable property located in the district not to exceed seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, except a ferry district in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more may not levy at a rate that exceeds seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. The levy must be sufficient for the provision of ferry services as shown to be required by the budget prepared by the governing body of the ferry district.

(2) A tax imposed under this section may be used only for:

(a) Providing ferry services, including the purchase, lease, or rental of ferry vessels and dock facilities;

(b) The operation, maintenance, and improvement of ferry vessels and dock facilities;

(c) Providing shuttle services between the ferry terminal and passenger parking facilities, and other landside improvements directly related to the provision of ((passenger-only)) ferry service; and

(d) Related personnel costs.

Sec. 3. RCW 36.54.135 and 2007 c 223 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county ferry district may incur general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance the construction, purchase, and preservation of ((passenger-only)) ferries and associated terminals and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from the revenues received from the tax levy authorized in RCW 36.54.130.

(2) The ordinance adopted by the county legislative authority creating the county ferry district and authorizing the use of revenues received from the tax levy authorized in RCW 36.54.130 must indicate an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated.

--- END ---