BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the military department shall provide adequate protection for occupants of national guard facilities. For the purposes of this section, national guard facilities means recruiting offices and other facilities not located on a secure military installation. Adequate protection is determined by an assessment of possible threats and vulnerabilities of a facility. Adequate measures to protect occupants include, but are not limited to:

(a) The use of armed security personnel;

(b) Security cameras;

(c) Locking devices;

(d) Obscuration;

(e) Ballistic barriers;

(f) Soft body armor;

(g) Magnetometers;

(h) Other protective equipment; and

(i) Specialized training in avoiding, preparing, or responding to threats facing national guard facilities.

(2) With the exception of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the cost of providing these protections will be one time.

(3) This section does not create a private right of action.

--- END ---