BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

A county, city, or transportation authority imposing a tax under RCW 82.14.045 to fund public transportation services shall provide transportation services, such as paratransit or dial-a-ride, throughout its entire service area to all persons over seventy years of age, to all persons with disabilities as described in RCW 46.19.010(1), and to all persons with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

--- END ---