BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.325 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning with the 2017-18 school year, if an associated student body program has incurred a revenue loss from food or beverage sales in school during school hours or for school-sponsored activities, including food sold a la carte, in school stores, and in vending machines, the state must compensate the associated student body program fund in an amount equal to the largest annual loss of revenue since the school district's implementation of state or federal rules or regulations for healthy food and beverage sales in schools. The state must compensate the associated student body fund annually on a schedule determined by the state.

--- END ---