BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.34.020 and 2011 c 189 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

In the declaration and bylaws, unless specifically provided otherwise or the context requires otherwise, and in this chapter:

(1) "Affiliate" means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the referenced person. A person "controls" another person if the person: (a) Is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the referenced person; (b) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent of the voting interest in the referenced person; (c) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the referenced person; or (d) has contributed more than twenty percent of the capital of the referenced person. A person "is controlled by" another person if the other person: (i) Is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person; (ii) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent of the voting interest in the person; (iii) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person; or (iv) has contributed more than twenty percent of the capital of the person. Control does not exist if the powers described in this subsection are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised.

(2) "Allocated interests" means the undivided interest in the common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the association allocated to each unit.

(3) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable by the association against a unit including, without limitation: (a) Regular and special assessments for common expenses, charges, and fines imposed by the association; (b) interest and late charges on any delinquent account; and (c) costs of collection, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account.

(4) "Association" or "unit owners' association" means the unit owners' association organized under RCW 64.34.300.

(5) "Baseline funding plan" means establishing a reserve funding goal of maintaining a reserve account balance above zero dollars throughout the thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.34.380.

(6) "Board of directors" means the body, regardless of name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.

(7) "Common elements" means all portions of a condominium other than the units.

(8) "Common expense liability" means the liability for common expenses allocated to each unit pursuant to RCW 64.34.224.

(9) "Common expenses" means expenditures made by or financial liabilities of the association, together with any allocations to reserves.

(10) "Condominium" means real property, portions of which are designated for separate ownership and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership solely by the owners of those portions. Real property is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners, and unless a declaration and a survey map and plans have been recorded pursuant to this chapter.

(11) "Contribution rate" means, in a reserve study as described in RCW 64.34.380, the amount contributed to the reserve account so that the association will have cash reserves to pay major maintenance, repair, or replacement costs without the need of a special assessment.

(12) "Conversion condominium" means a condominium (a) that at any time before creation of the condominium was lawfully occupied wholly or partially by a tenant or subtenant for residential purposes pursuant to a rental agreement, oral or written, express or implied, for which the tenant or subtenant had not received the notice described in (b) of this subsection; or (b) that, at any time within twelve months before the conveyance of, or acceptance of an agreement to convey, any unit therein other than to a declarant or any affiliate of a declarant, was lawfully occupied wholly or partially by a residential tenant of a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant and such tenant was not notified in writing, prior to lawfully occupying a unit or executing a rental agreement, whichever event first occurs, that the unit was part of a condominium and subject to sale. "Conversion condominium" shall not include a condominium in which, before July 1, 1990, any unit therein had been conveyed or been made subject to an agreement to convey to any transferee other than a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant.

(13) "Conveyance" means any transfer of the ownership of a unit, including a transfer by deed or by real estate contract and, with respect to a unit in a leasehold condominium, a transfer by lease or assignment thereof, but shall not include a transfer solely for security.

(14) "Dealer" means a person who, together with such person's affiliates, owns or has a right to acquire either six or more units in a condominium or fifty percent or more of the units in a condominium containing more than two units.

(15) "Declarant" means:

(a) Any person who executes as declarant a declaration as defined in subsection (17) of this section; or

(b) Any person who reserves any special declarant right in the declaration; or

(c) Any person who exercises special declarant rights or to whom special declarant rights are transferred; or

(d) Any person who is the owner of a fee interest in the real property which is subjected to the declaration at the time of the recording of an instrument pursuant to RCW 64.34.316 and who directly or through one or more affiliates is materially involved in the construction, marketing, or sale of units in the condominium created by the recording of the instrument.

(16) "Declarant control" means the right of the declarant or persons designated by the declarant to appoint and remove officers and members of the board of directors, or to veto or approve a proposed action of the board or association, pursuant to RCW 64.34.308 (5) or (6).

(17) "Declaration" means the document, however denominated, that creates a condominium by setting forth the information required by RCW 64.34.216 and any amendments to that document.

(18) "Development rights" means any right or combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration to: (a) Add real property or improvements to a condominium; (b) create units, common elements, or limited common elements within real property included or added to a condominium; (c) subdivide units or convert units into common elements; (d) withdraw real property from a condominium; or (e) reallocate limited common elements with respect to units that have not been conveyed by the declarant.

(19) "Dispose" or "disposition" means a voluntary transfer or conveyance to a purchaser or lessee of any legal or equitable interest in a unit, but does not include the transfer or release of a security interest.

(20) "Effective age" means the difference between the estimated useful life and remaining useful life.

(21) "Eligible mortgagee" means the holder of a mortgage on a unit that has filed with the secretary of the association a written request that it be given copies of notices of any action by the association that requires the consent of mortgagees.

(22) "Foreclosure" means a forfeiture or judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a mortgage or a deed in lieu thereof.

(23) "Full funding plan" means setting a reserve funding goal of achieving one hundred percent fully funded reserves by the end of the thirty-year study period described under RCW 64.34.380, in which the reserve account balance equals the sum of the deteriorated portion of all reserve components.

(24) "Fully funded balance" means the current value of the deteriorated portion, not the total replacement value, of all the reserve components. The fully funded balance for each reserve component is calculated by multiplying the current replacement cost of that reserve component by its effective age, then dividing the result by that reserve component's useful life. The sum total of all reserve components' fully funded balances is the association's fully funded balance.

(25) "Identifying number" means the designation of each unit in a condominium.

(26) "Leasehold condominium" means a condominium in which all or a portion of the real property is subject to a lease, the expiration or termination of which will terminate the condominium or reduce its size.

(27) "Limited common element" means a portion of the common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of RCW 64.34.204 (2) or (4) for the exclusive use of one or more but fewer than all of the units.

(28) "Master association" means an organization described in RCW 64.34.276, whether or not it is also an association described in RCW 64.34.300.

(29) "Mortgage" means a mortgage, deed of trust or real estate contract.

(30) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, trust, governmental subdivision or agency, or other legal entity.

(31) "Purchaser" means any person, other than a declarant or a dealer, who by means of a disposition acquires a legal or equitable interest in a unit other than (a) a leasehold interest, including renewal options, of less than twenty years at the time of creation of the unit, or (b) as security for an obligation.

(32) "Real property" means any fee, leasehold or other estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements thereon and easements, rights and interests appurtenant thereto which by custom, usage, or law pass with a conveyance of land although not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance. "Real property" includes parcels, with or without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces that may be filled with air or water.

(33) "Remaining useful life" means the estimated time, in years, before a reserve component will require major maintenance, repair, or replacement to perform its intended function.

(34) "Replacement cost" means the current cost of replacing, repairing, or restoring a reserve component to its original functional condition.

(35) "Reserve component" means a common element whose cost of maintenance, repair, or replacement is infrequent, significant, and impractical to include in an annual budget.

(36) "Reserve study professional" means an independent person who is suitably qualified by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education to prepare a reserve study in accordance with RCW 64.34.380 and 64.34.382.

(37) "Residential purposes" means use for dwelling or recreational purposes, or both.

(38) "Significant assets" means that the current total cost of major maintenance, repair, and replacement of the reserve components is fifty percent or more of the gross budget of the association, excluding reserve account funds.

(39) "Special declarant rights" means rights reserved for the benefit of a declarant to: (a) Complete improvements indicated on survey maps and plans filed with the declaration under RCW 64.34.232; (b) exercise any development right under RCW 64.34.236; (c) maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the condominium, and models under RCW 64.34.256; (d) use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the condominium or within real property which may be added to the condominium under RCW 64.34.260; (e) make the condominium part of a larger condominium or a development under RCW 64.34.280; (f) make the condominium subject to a master association under RCW 64.34.276; or (g) appoint or remove any officer of the association or any master association or any member of the board of directors, or to veto or approve a proposed action of the board or association, during any period of declarant control under RCW 64.34.308(5).

(40) "Timeshare" shall have the meaning specified in the timeshare act, RCW 64.36.010(11).

(41) "Unit" means a physical portion of the condominium designated for separate ownership, the boundaries of which are described pursuant to RCW 64.34.216(1)(d). "Separate ownership" includes leasing a unit in a leasehold condominium under a lease that expires contemporaneously with any lease, the expiration or termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium.

(42) "Unit owner" means a declarant or other person who owns a unit or leases a unit in a leasehold condominium under a lease that expires simultaneously with any lease, the expiration or termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium, but does not include a person who has an interest in a unit solely as security for an obligation. "Unit owner" means the vendee, not the vendor, of a unit under a real estate contract.

(43) "Useful life" means the estimated time, between years, that major maintenance, repair, or replacement is estimated to occur.

(44) "Constructional defect" means a defect in the design, construction, manufacture, repair, or landscaping of a new residence, of an alteration of or addition to an existing residence, or of an appurtenance. "Constructional defect" includes, without limitation, the design, construction, manufacture, repair, or landscaping of a new residence, of an alteration of or addition to an existing residence, or of an appurtenance that:

(a) Presents an unreasonable risk of injury to a person or property; or

(b) Is not completed in a good and workmanlike manner and proximately causes physical damage to the residence, an appurtenance, or the real property to which the residence or appurtenance is affixed.

Sec. 2. RCW 64.34.308 and 2011 c 189 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, subsection (2) of this section, or other provisions of this chapter, the board of directors shall act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the board of directors are required to exercise: (a) If appointed by the declarant, the care required of fiduciaries of the unit owners; or (b) if elected by the unit owners, ordinary and reasonable care.

(2) The board of directors shall not act on behalf of the association to amend the declaration in any manner that requires the vote or approval of the unit owners pursuant to RCW 64.34.264, to terminate the condominium pursuant to RCW 64.34.268, to institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative hearings pursuant to RCW 64.34.304, or to elect members of the board of directors or determine the qualifications, powers, and duties, or terms of office of members of the board of directors pursuant to subsection (7) of this section; but the board of directors may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term.

(3) Within thirty days after adoption of any proposed budget for the condominium, the board of directors shall provide a summary of the budget to all the unit owners and shall set a date for a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the budget not less than fourteen nor more than sixty days after mailing of the summary. Unless at that meeting the owners of units to which a majority of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger percentage specified in the declaration reject the budget, the budget is ratified, whether or not a quorum is present. In the event the proposed budget is rejected or the required notice is not given, the periodic budget last ratified by the unit owners shall be continued until such time as the unit owners ratify a subsequent budget proposed by the board of directors.

(4) As part of the summary of the budget provided to all unit owners, the board of directors shall disclose to the unit owners:

(a) The current amount of regular assessments budgeted for contribution to the reserve account, the recommended contribution rate from the reserve study, and the funding plan upon which the recommended contribution rate is based;

(b) If additional regular or special assessments are scheduled to be imposed, the date the assessments are due, the amount of the assessments per each unit per month or year, and the purpose of the assessments;

(c) Based upon the most recent reserve study and other information, whether currently projected reserve account balances will be sufficient at the end of each year to meet the association's obligation for major maintenance, repair, or replacement of reserve components during the next thirty years;

(d) If reserve account balances are not projected to be sufficient, what additional assessments may be necessary to ensure that sufficient reserve account funds will be available each year during the next thirty years, the approximate dates assessments may be due, and the amount of the assessments per unit per month or year;

(e) The estimated amount recommended in the reserve account at the end of the current fiscal year based on the most recent reserve study, the projected reserve account cash balance at the end of the current fiscal year, and the percent funded at the date of the latest reserve study;

(f) The estimated amount recommended in the reserve account based upon the most recent reserve study at the end of each of the next five budget years, the projected reserve account cash balance in each of those years, and the projected percent funded for each of those years; and

(g) If the funding plan approved by the association is implemented, the projected reserve account cash balance in each of the next five budget years and the percent funded for each of those years.

(5)(a) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by the declarant, may: (i) Appoint and remove the officers and members of the board of directors; or (ii) veto or approve a proposed action of the board or association. A declarant's failure to veto or approve such proposed action in writing within thirty days after receipt of written notice of the proposed action shall be deemed approval by the declarant.

(b) Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of: (i) Sixty days after conveyance of seventy-five percent of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant; (ii) two years after the last conveyance or transfer of record of a unit except as security for a debt; (iii) two years after any development right to add new units was last exercised; or (iv) the date on which the declarant records an amendment to the declaration pursuant to which the declarant voluntarily surrenders the right to further appoint and remove officers and members of the board of directors. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the board of directors before termination of that period pursuant to (i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection (5)(b), but in that event the declarant may require, for the duration of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or board of directors, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

(6) Not later than sixty days after conveyance of twenty-five percent of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one member and not less than twenty-five percent of the members of the board of directors must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant. Not later than sixty days after conveyance of fifty percent of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, not less than thirty-three and one-third percent of the members of the board of directors must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.

(7) Within thirty days after the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect a board of directors of at least three members, at least a majority of whom must be unit owners. The number of directors need not exceed the number of units then in the condominium. The board of directors shall elect the officers. Such members of the board of directors and officers shall take office upon election.

(8) Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, the unit owners, by a two-thirds vote of the voting power in the association present and entitled to vote at any meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the board of directors with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant. The declarant may not remove any member of the board of directors elected by the unit owners. Prior to the termination of the period of declarant control, the unit owners, other than the declarant, may remove by a two-thirds vote, any director elected by the unit owners.

Sec. 3. RCW 64.34.445 and 2004 c 201 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A declarant and any dealer warrants that a unit will be in at least as good condition at the earlier of the time of the conveyance or delivery of possession as it was at the time of contracting, reasonable wear and tear and damage by casualty or condemnation excepted.

(2) A declarant and any dealer impliedly warrants that a unit and the common elements in the condominium are suitable for the ordinary uses of real estate of its type and that any improvements made or contracted for by such declarant or dealer will be:

(a) Free from defective materials;

(b) Constructed in accordance with sound engineering and construction standards;

(c) Constructed in a workmanlike manner; and

(d) Constructed in compliance with all laws then applicable to such improvements.

(3) A declarant and any dealer warrants to a purchaser of a unit that may be used for residential use that an existing use, continuation of which is contemplated by the parties, does not violate applicable law at the earlier of the time of conveyance or delivery of possession.

(4) Warranties imposed by this section may be excluded or modified as specified in RCW 64.34.450.

(5) For purposes of this section, improvements made or contracted for by an affiliate of a declarant, as defined in RCW 64.34.020(1), are made or contracted for by the declarant.

(6) Any conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser all of the declarant's implied warranties of quality.

(7) In a judicial proceeding for breach of any of the obligations arising under this section, the plaintiff must show that the alleged breach has ((adversely affected or will adversely affect the performance)) actually damaged or is likely to cause actual damages of that portion of the unit or common elements alleged to be in breach. ((As used in this subsection, an "adverse effect")) The alleged damages must be more than technical and must be material and significant to a reasonable person. To establish ((an adverse effect)) actual damages or the likelihood of damages, the person alleging the breach is not required to prove that the breach renders the unit or common element uninhabitable or unfit for its intended purpose.

(8) Proof of breach of any obligation arising under this section is not proof of damages. Damages awarded for a breach of an obligation arising under this section are the cost of repairs. However, if it is established that the cost of such repairs is clearly disproportionate to the loss in market value caused by the breach, then damages shall be limited to the loss in market value.

Sec. 4. RCW 64.55.100 and 2005 c 456 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((If the declarant, an association, or a party unit owner demands an arbitration by filing such demand with the court not less than thirty and not more than ninety days after filing or service of the complaint, whichever is later, the parties shall participate in a private arbitration hearing. The declarant, the association, and the party unit owner do not have the right to compel arbitration without giving timely notice in compliance with this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed by the parties,)) The parties to an action subject to this chapter shall engage in mandatory binding arbitration. The arbitration hearing shall commence no more than fourteen months from the later of the filing or service of the complaint.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, claims that in aggregate are for less than one million dollars shall be heard by a single arbitrator and all other claims shall be heard by three arbitrators. As used in this chapter, arbitrator also means arbitrators where applicable.

(3) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the court shall appoint the arbitrator, who shall be a current or former attorney with experience as an attorney, judge, arbitrator, or mediator in construction defect disputes involving the application of Washington law.

(4) Upon conclusion of the arbitration hearing, the arbitrator shall file the decision and award with the clerk of the superior court, together with proof of service thereof on the parties. Within twenty days after the filing of the decision and award, any aggrieved party may file with the clerk a written notice of appeal and demand for a trial de novo in the superior court on all claims between the appealing party and an adverse party. As used in this section, "adverse party" means the party who either directly asserted or defended claims against the appealing party. The demand shall identify the adverse party or parties and all claims between those parties shall be included in the trial de novo. The right to a trial de novo includes the right to a jury, if demanded. The court shall give priority to the trial date for the trial de novo.

(5) If the judgment for damages, not including awards of fees and costs, in the trial de novo is not more favorable to the appealing party than the damages awarded by the arbitrator, not including awards of fees and costs, the appealing party shall pay the nonappealing adverse party's costs and fees incurred after the filing of the appeal, including reasonable attorneys' fees so incurred.

(6) If the judgment for damages, not including awards of fees and costs, in the trial de novo is more favorable to the appealing party than the damages awarded by the arbitrator, not including awards of fees and costs, then the court may award costs and fees, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred after the filing of the request for trial de novo in accordance with applicable law; provided if such a judgment is not more favorable to the appealing party than the most recent offer of judgment, if any, made pursuant to RCW 64.55.160, the court shall not make an award of fees and costs to the appealing party.

(7) If a party is entitled to an award with respect to the same fees and costs pursuant to this section and RCW 64.55.160, then the party shall only receive an award of fees and costs as provided in and limited by RCW 64.55.160. Any award of fees and costs pursuant to subsections (5) or (6) of this section is subject to review in the event of any appeal thereof otherwise permitted by applicable law or court rule.

--- END ---