BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.08.110 and 2009 c 369 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For persons registering under RCW 29A.08.120, 29A.08.123, 29A.08.330, and 29A.08.340, an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the original date of mailing or date of delivery, whichever is applicable. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes. Within sixty days after the receipt of an application or transfer, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first-class nonforwardable mail, an acknowledgment notice identifying the registrant's precinct and containing such other information as may be required by the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to the auditor any card which is not deliverable.

(2) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice shall require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within forty-five days, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the original date of application. The applicant shall not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

A person age eighteen years or older who is a citizen of the United States applying for or renewing an enhanced driver's license or identicard issued under RCW 46.20.202 may be registered to vote or update voter registration information at the time of registration or renewal, by automated process if the department of licensing record associated with the applicant verifies United States citizenship, contains the data required for voter registration under RCW 29A.08.010, and includes a signature image. The person must be informed that his or her record will be used for voter registration, and offered an opportunity to decline to register.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) If the applicant in section 2 of this act does not decline registration, the application is submitted pursuant to RCW 29A.08.340.

(2) For each such application, the secretary of state must obtain a digital copy of the applicant's signature image from the department of licensing.

(3) The secretary of state may employ additional security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter registration applications submitted electronically.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For persons age eighteen years and older registering under section 2 of this act, an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010 and citizenship information. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the original date of application or renewal of a driver's license, identicard, enhanced driver's license, or enhanced identicard issued under RCW 46.20.202. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes. Within sixty days after the receipt of an application or transfer, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first-class nonforwardable mail, an acknowledgment notice identifying the registrant's precinct and containing such other information as may be required by the secretary of state. The United States postal service shall be instructed not to forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to the auditor any card which is not deliverable.

(2) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice shall require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within forty-five days, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the original date of application. The applicant shall not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.

(3) If the prospective registration applicant declines to register to vote or the information provided by the department of licensing does not indicate citizenship, the information shall not be included on the list of registered voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

For persons eighteen years of age or older who the department has determined are citizens of the United States and who are applying for or renewing an enhanced driver's license or identicard under RCW 46.20.202, and have not declined to register to vote, the department shall produce and transmit to the secretary of state the following information from the records of each individual: The name, address, date of birth, gender of the applicant, the driver's license number, signature image, citizenship, and the date on which the application was submitted. The department and the secretary of state shall process information as an automated application on a daily basis.

Sec. 6. RCW 29A.08.350 and 2013 c 11 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of licensing shall produce and transmit to the secretary of state the following information from the records of each individual who requested a voter registration or update at a driver's license facility: The name, address, date of birth, gender of the applicant, the driver's license number, signature image, citizenship, and the date on which the application for voter registration or update was submitted. The secretary of state shall process the registrations and updates as an electronic application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---