BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A landlord shall provide each new residential tenant with a voter registration form or a link to the electronic voter registration form on the secretary of state's web site at the time the tenant signs a lease with the landlord.

(2) The failure of a landlord to comply with this section shall not be construed to affect the validity of the lease or the enforcement of any of the lease provisions.

--- END ---