BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The health care authority, in coordination with the department of health, must create and implement a campaign to educate breast cancer patients about the availability of insurance coverage for breast reconstruction and breast prostheses.

(2) The health care authority and department of health may create new educational materials or make available materials published by for-profit or nonprofit organizations. The materials must provide, at a minimum, all of the following:

(a) Information about the availability of breast reconstruction surgery following a mastectomy including that the breast reconstruction surgery may be performed at the time of a mastectomy or the breast reconstruction surgery may be delayed until a time after the mastectomy.

(b) Information about prostheses or breast forms as alternatives to breast reconstruction surgery.

(c) Information about the requirements of the women's health and cancer rights act of 1998 (P.L. 105-277) including the right to breast reconstruction surgery even if the surgery is delayed.

(3) The educational materials developed or made available under subsection (2) of this section must be distributed by the office of the insurance commissioner and the health care authority to people receiving their services. Distribution may be accomplished through current methods used to inform consumers including posting information online and other methods developed or used by the office of the insurance commissioner and the health care authority.

(4) The department of health must also make the educational materials developed or made available under subsection (2) of this section available to health care professionals for distribution to patients who may qualify for breast reconstruction surgery following a mastectomy. This may be accomplished through current methods used by the department to provide health care professionals with informational materials, including making them available online.

(5) This section does not create a private right of action.

--- END ---