BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.12.015 and 1965 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All determinations of the prevailing rate of wage shall be made by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.

(2) The time period for recovery of any wages owed to a worker affected by the determination is tolled until the prevailing wage determination is final.

--- END ---