BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. FINDINGS. The legislature finds that early learning, child welfare, and juvenile justice services for and involvement with children and families in this state are somewhat fragmented because those services are housed in separate state agencies and, as a result, not always well-coordinated. The legislature believes that to improve the delivery of services as well as the outcomes achieved for children and families through the delivery of these services, they should be housed in one state agency.

The legislature also finds that historically the state agencies responsible for the provision of early learning, child welfare, and juvenile justice services have not been resourced or mandated to offer services or assistance designed to prevent high-risk families from entering the state systems. To reduce the number of high-risk children and families who come into the state system, the legislature finds that an additional focus of this new agency should be on prevention.

The legislature further finds that other states have successfully established integrated departments dedicated to serving children and families. These departments have improved the visibility of children's issues, increased authority and accountability, enabled system improvements, and created a stronger focus on serving children, youth, and families.

PART I

DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES CREATED

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101. (1) The department of children, youth, and families is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this act and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. The department, in partnership with state and local agencies, tribes, and communities, shall protect children, youth, and family well-being with effective, high quality prevention, intervention, and early education services delivered in an equitable manner.

(2)(a) The department is responsible for developing definitions for, work plans to address, and metrics to measure the outcomes of the department. The department must establish short and long-term population-level outcome measures, including metrics regarding reducing disparities by income and race in each outcome. The department must report on outcome measures and progress towards these goals at least annually, beginning December 1, 2018.

(b) The outcome measures must include, but are not limited to:

(i) Improving child and youth safety, permanency, and well-being as measured by: (A) Reducing a child's length of stay in out-of-home care; (B) reducing maltreatment of youth while in out-of-home care; (C) licensing more foster care placements than there are children in foster care; and (D) reducing the number of children that reenter out-of-home care within twelve months;

(ii) Improving reconciliation of children and youth with their families as measured by: (A) Increasing family reunification; (B) increasing the availability of family reconciliation services; and (C) increasing the number of youth, including unaccompanied homeless youth, who are reunified with their family of origin;

(iii) Reducing criminal justice involvement and recidivism as measured by: (A) Increasing the number of youth who successfully complete the terms of his or her diversion or alternative sentencing options; (B) a decrease in the number of youth who commit subsequent crimes; and (C) not discharging youth from institutional settings into homelessness; and

(iv) Improving child development and school readiness through voluntary, high quality early learning opportunities as measured by: (A) Increasing the number and proportion of children kindergarten-ready as measured by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WAKids) assessment; and (B) increasing the proportion of children in state-funded early learning programs that have achieved the level 3 or higher early achiever quality standard.

(3) The department is accountable to the public. To ensure transparency, agency performance data, including outcome data for contracted services, must be available to the public, consistent with protecting the confidentiality of the individuals. Publicly available data must include budget and funding decisions and performance data on metrics identified in this section. Such data must be readily accessible on the department's web site. To further ensure transparency, effectiveness, and quality of contracted and granted services, no funds may be expended by the department unless made pursuant to performance-based contracts or grants.

(4)(a) The department shall establish the oversight board for children, youth, and families. The board is authorized for the purpose of monitoring and ensuring the department's compliance with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to early learning, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and children and family services. To the extent possible, the board shall be collocated with the office of the family and children's ombuds.

(b)(i) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall consist of two senators and two representatives from the legislature with one member from each caucus, three subject matter experts in early learning, child welfare, or juvenile rehabilitation and justice, two parent stakeholder group representatives, including one current or former foster parent and one alumni of the child welfare system, one law enforcement representative, and one judicial representative practicing in family law or other children's matters.

(ii) The senate members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the senate. The house of representatives members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the house. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year.

(iii) The remaining board members shall be nominated by the governor, subject to the approval of the appointed legislators, and serve four-year terms.

(c) The oversight board for children, youth, and families has the following powers:

(i) Selection of its officers and adoption rules for orderly procedure;

(ii) To request investigations by the family and children's ombuds of administrative acts;

(iii) To receive reports of the family and children's ombuds;

(iv)(A) To obtain access to all relevant records in the possession of the family and children's ombuds, except as prohibited by law; and (B) to make recommendations to all branches of government;

(v) To identify potential policy changes and, if necessary, request legislation;

(vi) To conduct hearings into such matters as it deems necessary;

(vii) To request and receive information, outcomes data, documents, materials, and records from the department relating to children and family welfare, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and early learning;

(viii) To request audits by the state auditor of the department relating to all areas of departmental performance including statutory compliance, progress towards meeting stated performance measures and outcomes, personnel matters, and other issues deemed appropriate by the oversight board for children, youth, and families. Upon the receipt of a finding by the auditor that the department is failing to meet its obligation regarding the performance-based contract requirements as provided for in this section, the oversight board for children, youth, and families may notify and direct the director of the office of financial management to revise allotments and appropriation levels for the department;

(ix) In conjunction with the secretary, to identify and establish desired outcomes, performance metrics as stated in this section, and personnel objectives for the department;

(x) To conduct annual reviews of provider contracts and grants to ensure that each contract and grant is performance based and to assess the measures included in each contract.

(d) Upon receipt of records or data from the family and children's ombuds or the department, the oversight board for children, youth, and families is subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as the family and children's ombuds is under RCW 43.06A.050.

(e) The oversight board for children, youth, and families has all general oversight over the performance and policies of the department by providing advice and input to the department. The board shall issue an annual report to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year with an initial report delivered by December 1, 2018. The initial report shall include information regarding the office of innovation and alignment's progress and report on the work of the department as is practicable. Subsequent reports shall include information regarding the department's progress towards meeting stated performance measures, desired performance outcomes, and personnel matters and objectives. The report must also include a review of the department's strategic plan, performance and performance measures, policies, and rules.

(f) The oversight board for children, youth, and families must convene annual stakeholder meetings wherein potentially aggrieved parties may provide feedback to the board regarding contracting with the department, departmental use of local, state, private, and federal funds, and other matters as relating to carrying out the duties of the department.

(g) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall engage in an annual random sampling of surveys from agencies, providers, customers, parent groups, and external services to assess whether the department is meeting annual benchmarks.

(h) The oversight board for children, youth, and families is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW.

(i) The oversight board for children, youth, and families members shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while attending meetings of the board when authorized by the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(j) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall elect, by majority vote, an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board. The executive director is exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board established in this section.

(k) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall maintain a staff not to exceed three full-time equivalent employees. The board-selected executive director of the board is responsible for coordinating staff appointments.

(5) As used in subsection (3) of this section, "performance-based contract" means results-oriented contracting that focuses on the quality or outcomes that tie at least a portion of the contractor's payment, contract extensions, or contract renewals to the achievement of specific measurable performance standards and requirements.

Sec. 102. RCW 43.215.030 and 2006 c 265 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The executive head and appointing authority of the department is the ((director)) secretary. The ((director)) secretary shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. ((The governor shall solicit input from all parties involved in the private-public partnership concerning this appointment.)) The ((director)) secretary shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position of ((director)) secretary while the senate is not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the senate when the governor's nomination for the office of ((director)) secretary shall be presented.

(2) The ((director)) secretary may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to administer this chapter and such other duties as may be authorized by law. The employment of such additional staff shall be in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided. The ((director)) secretary may delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by ((this)) chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (this act) or other law, including authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The internal affairs of the department are under the control of the secretary in order that the secretary may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the secretary has the complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The secretary may create the administrative structures as the secretary deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified in law, and the secretary may employ personnel as may be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. (1) The office of innovation and alignment is created within the office of the governor.

(2) The primary duties and focus of the office of innovation and alignment is on developing and presenting a plan for the establishment of the department of children, youth, and families, including the functions in this subsection:

(a) Coordination between the department of early learning, the department of social and health services, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration including technical and policy work groups to aid in the development of the items in (c) of this subsection;

(b) To convene research institutions, including the education data center, the department of social and health services' research and data analysis office, the Washington state institute for public policy, and the Washington state center for court research, to establish priorities for (c) of this subsection;

(c) Development of an integrated portfolio management and administrative structure for the department of children, youth, and families, to include:

(i) Establishment of mechanisms for effectively partnering with communities, small businesses, providers of services for children and families, and families themselves;

(ii) Establishment of a definition of outcomes that the department of children, youth, and families will be held accountable to in order to measure the performance of the department reforms and the priorities of the department;

(d) Development of a stakeholder advisory system for the department of children, youth, and families. The office of innovation and alignment must review and consult with stakeholder and advisory bodies from the department of early learning, the children's administration, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration in order to devise this system. The office will further develop an external review protocol for the department to ensure effective implementation of the policies and practices established by the office;

(e) In coordination with the office of the chief information officer and the department of social and health services, the development of an information technology design and investment plan required to effectively integrate the department of early learning, the children's administration, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and to meet other goals of this section to be provided to the governor and to the legislature for consideration in the 2018 supplemental budget;

(f) Development of a consultation policy and protocol with the twenty-nine federally recognized tribes in the state of Washington. The office of innovation and alignment must strive to honor and integrate the existing agreements between these tribes and the department of early learning, the children's administration, and the juvenile rehabilitation administration; and

(g) Review existing statutes affecting the department of early learning and the department of social and health services and identify any conflicts or barriers that these statutes present in the execution of the plan in this section.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104. (1) The office of innovation and alignment is transitioned from the office of the governor to be an office within the department. The secretary shall set the agenda and oversee the office.

(2) The primary duties and focus of the office is on continuous improvement to include the functions in this subsection:

(a) To review and recommend implementation of advancements in research;

(b) Alignment and measuring of outcomes including, but not limited to, the use of evidence-based and research-based practices;

(c) Quality assurance and evaluation of programs and services within the department;

(d) To lead partnerships with the community, research and teaching institutions, philanthropic organizations, and nonprofit organizations; and

(e) To produce an annual work plan that includes priorities for ongoing policy, practice and system reform, tracking, and reporting out on the performance of department reforms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105. A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, this chapter does not apply in the department of children, youth, and families to the secretary; the secretary's confidential secretary; deputy, assistant, and regional secretaries, one confidential secretary for each of the aforesaid officers; and any other exempt staff members provided for in chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. (1) The secretary or the secretary's designee has the full authority to administer oaths and take testimony, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before him or her together with all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by those witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation.

(2) Subpoenas issued in adjudicative proceedings are governed by RCW 34.05.588(1).

(3) Subpoenas issued in the conduct of investigations required or authorized by other statutory provisions or necessary in the enforcement of other statutory provisions are governed by RCW 34.05.588(2).

(4) When a judicially approved subpoena is required by law, the secretary or the secretary's designee may apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or in the county where the subpoenaed documents, records, or evidence are located, or in Thurston county. The application must:

(a) State that an order is sought under this section;

(b) Adequately specify the documents, records, evidence, or testimony; and

(c) Include a declaration made under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents, records, evidence, or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's authority.

(5) When an application under subsection (4) of this section is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. When a judicially approved subpoena is required by law, an order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the documents, records, evidence, or testimony.

(6) The secretary or the secretary's designee may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this section without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation. An application for court approval is subject to the fee and process set forth in RCW 36.18.012(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107. The secretary shall administer family services and programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108. The secretary shall make all of the department's evaluation and research materials and data on private nonprofit group homes available to group home contractors. The department may delete any information from the materials that identifies a specific client or contractor, other than the contractor requesting the materials.

Sec. 109. RCW 43.17.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing, (8) the department of enterprise services, (9) the department of commerce, (10) the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions, (16) the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, and (18) the Puget Sound partnership, which shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the legislature may provide.

Sec. 110. RCW 43.17.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the director of enterprise services, (9) the director of commerce, (10) the director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15) the director of financial institutions, (16) the director of the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the ((director)) secretary of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, and (18) the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership.

Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 111. RCW 42.17A.705 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 406 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 317 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer" includes:

(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind, the secretary of children, youth, and families, the director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, ((the director of early learning,)) the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each campus president of each state community college;

(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of trustees of each community college and each technical college, each member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities authority, student achievement council, higher education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, state liquor ((control)) and cannabis board, lottery commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 112. RCW 43.06A.030 and 2013 c 23 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

The ombuds shall perform the following duties:

(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of individuals receiving family and children's services, juvenile justice, juvenile rehabilitation, and child early learning, and on the procedures for providing these services;

(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombuds may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;

(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the department of children, youth, and families to carry out its responsibilities in delivering family and children's services with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's health and safety, achieving juvenile rehabilitation objectives, promoting juvenile justice, and enhancing child early learning;

(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state institutions serving children, youth, and families, and state-licensed facilities or residences;

(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of children, youth, and families ((and children)), juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and child early learning;

(6) Submit annually to the ((committee)) oversight board for children, youth, and families created in section 101 of this act and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing the work of the ((office)) department of children, youth, and families, including recommendations;

(7) Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the possession of the ombuds unless prohibited by law; and

(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

PART II

POWERS AND DUTIES TRANSFERRED FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING

Sec. 201. RCW 43.215.010 and 2016 c 231 s 1 and 2016 c 169 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning services outside a child's own home and includes the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:

(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides early childhood education and early learning services for a group of children for periods of less than twenty-four hours;

(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral; parental education and support; and training and professional development for early learning professionals;

(c) "Family day care provider" means a child care provider who regularly provides early childhood education and early learning services for not more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living quarters;

(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in contributions;

(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.

(2) "Agency" does not include the following:

(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:

(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;

(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law; or

(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, even after the marriage is terminated;

(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;

(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to, advertising such care;

(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one another's children;

(e) Nursery schools that are engaged primarily in early childhood education with preschool children and in which no child is enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;

(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic curriculum, and accept only school age children;

(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged primarily in recreational or educational activities;

(h) Facilities providing child care for periods of less than twenty-four hours when a parent or legal guardian of the child remains on the premises of the facility for the purpose of participating in:

(i) Activities other than employment; or

(ii) Employment of up to two hours per day when the facility is operated by a nonprofit entity that also operates a licensed child care program at the same facility in another location or at another facility;

(i) Any entity that provides recreational or educational programming for school age children only and the entity meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The entity utilizes a drop-in model for programming, where children are able to attend during any or all program hours without a formal reservation;

(ii) The entity does not assume responsibility in lieu of the parent, unless for coordinated transportation;

(iii) The entity is a local affiliate of a national nonprofit; and

(iv) The entity is in compliance with all safety and quality standards set by the associated national agency;

(j) A program operated by any unit of local, state, or federal government;

(k) A program located within the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;

(l) A program located on a federal military reservation, except where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter;

(m) A program that offers early learning and support services, such as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a regular basis.

(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in an agency.

(4) "Conviction information" means criminal history record information relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or other disposition adverse to the applicant.

(5) "Department" means the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families.

(6) (("Director" means the director)) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.

(7) "Early achievers" means a program that improves the quality of early learning programs and supports and rewards providers for their participation.

(8) "Early childhood education and assistance program contractor" means an organization that provides early childhood education and assistance program services under a signed contract with the department.

(9) "Early childhood education and assistance program provider" means an organization that provides site level, direct, and high quality early childhood education and assistance program services under the direction of an early childhood education and assistance program contractor.

(10) "Early start" means an integrated high quality continuum of early learning programs for children birth-to-five years of age. Components of early start include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Home visiting and parent education and support programs;

(b) The early achievers program described in RCW 43.215.100 (as recodified by this act);

(c) Integrated full-day and part-day high quality early learning programs; and

(d) High quality preschool for children whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty level.

(11) "Education data center" means the education data center established in RCW 43.41.400, commonly referred to as the education research and data center.

(12) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the services of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work in an agency.

(13) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension, revocation, modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW 43.215.300(1) (as recodified by this act) or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW 43.215.300(3) (as recodified by this act).

(14) "Extended day program" means an early childhood education and assistance program that offers early learning education for at least ten hours per day, a minimum of two thousand hours per year, at least four days per week, and operates year round.

(15) "Full day program" means an early childhood education and assistance program that offers early learning education for a minimum of one thousand hours per year.

(16) "Low-income child care provider" means a person who administers a child care program that consists of at least eighty percent of children receiving working connections child care subsidy.

(17) "Low-income neighborhood" means a district or community where more than twenty percent of households are below the federal poverty level.

(18) "Negative action" means a court order, court judgment, or an adverse action taken by an agency, in any state, federal, tribal, or foreign jurisdiction, which results in a finding against the applicant reasonably related to the individual's character, suitability, and competence to care for or have unsupervised access to children in child care. This may include, but is not limited to:

(a) A decision issued by an administrative law judge;

(b) A final determination, decision, or finding made by an agency following an investigation;

(c) An adverse agency action, including termination, revocation, or denial of a license or certification, or if pending adverse agency action, the voluntary surrender of a license, certification, or contract in lieu of the adverse action;

(d) A revocation, denial, or restriction placed on any professional license; or

(e) A final decision of a disciplinary board.

(19) "Nonconviction information" means arrest, founded allegations of child abuse, or neglect pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW, or other negative action adverse to the applicant.

(20) "Nonschool age child" means a child who is age six years or younger and who is not enrolled in a public or private school.

(21) "Part day program" means an early childhood education and assistance program that offers early learning education for at least two and one-half hours per class session, at least three hundred twenty hours per year, for a minimum of thirty weeks per year.

(22) "Private school" means a private school approved by the state under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(23) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.

(24) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care to be maintained by an agency.

(25) "School age child" means a child who is five years of age through twelve years of age and is attending a public or private school or is receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW.

(26) "Washington state preschool program" means an education program for children three-to-five years of age who have not yet entered kindergarten, such as the early childhood education and assistance program.

Sec. 202. RCW 43.215.020 and 2016 c 57 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of early learning is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

(2) The primary duties of the department are to)) shall implement state early learning policy and ((to)) coordinate, consolidate, and integrate child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in child care and early learning programs;

(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and caregivers;

(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the nongovernmental private-public partnership;

(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;

(e) To apply data already collected comparing the following factors and make biennial recommendations to the legislature regarding working connections subsidy and state-funded preschool rates and compensation models that would attract and retain high quality early learning professionals:

(i) State-funded early learning subsidy rates and market rates of licensed early learning homes and centers;

(ii) Compensation of early learning educators in licensed centers and homes and early learning teachers at state higher education institutions;

(iii) State-funded preschool program compensation rates and Washington state head start program compensation rates; and

(iv) State-funded preschool program compensation to compensation in similar comprehensive programs in other states;

(f) To serve as the state lead agency for Part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA) and to develop and adopt rules that establish minimum requirements for the services offered through Part C programs, including allowable allocations and expenditures for transition into Part B of the federal individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA);

(g) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits, performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can function in an integrated fashion;

(h) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its goals including providing data and support necessary for the successful work of the partnership;

(i) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early learning council;

(j) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state and local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth transitions between early learning and K-12 programs;

(k) To develop and adopt rules for administration of the program of early learning established in RCW 43.215.455 (as recodified by this act);

(l) To develop a comprehensive birth-to-three plan to provide education and support through a continuum of options including, but not limited to, services such as: Home visiting; quality incentives for infant and toddler child care subsidies; quality improvements for family home and center-based child care programs serving infants and toddlers; professional development; early literacy programs; and informal supports for family, friend, and neighbor caregivers; and

(m) Upon the development of an early learning information system, to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing action information and provider comments through the internet and other means.

(((3))) (2) When additional funds are appropriated for the specific purpose of home visiting and parent and caregiver support, the department must reserve at least eighty percent for home visiting services to be deposited into the home visiting services account and up to twenty percent of the new funds for other parent or caregiver support.

(((4))) (3) Home visiting services must include programs that serve families involved in the child welfare system.

(((5) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the legislature shall fund the expansion in the Washington state preschool program pursuant to RCW 43.215.456 in fiscal year 2014.

(6))) (4) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children, and that recognizes and honors cultural and linguistic diversity. The department shall include parents and legal guardians in the development of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

Sec. 203. RCW 43.215.065 and 2007 c 384 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The ((director of the department of early learning)) secretary shall review current department policies and assess the adequacy and availability of programs targeted at persons who receive assistance who are the children and families of a person who is incarcerated in a department of corrections facility. Great attention shall be focused on programs and policies affecting foster youth who have a parent who is incarcerated.

(b) The ((director)) secretary shall adopt policies that support the children of incarcerated parents and meet their needs with the goal of facilitating normal child development, while reducing intergenerational incarceration.

(2) The ((director)) secretary shall conduct the following activities to assist in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Gather information and data on the recipients of assistance who are the children and families of inmates incarcerated in department of corrections facilities; and

(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory committee and report information obtained under this section to the advisory committee.

Sec. 204. RCW 43.215.070 and 2006 c 265 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to other duties under this chapter, the ((director)) secretary shall actively participate in a nongovernmental private-public partnership focused on supporting government's investments in early learning and ensuring that every child in the state is prepared to succeed in school and in life. Except for licensing as required by Washington state law and to the extent permitted by federal law, the ((director of the department of early learning)) secretary shall grant waivers from the rules of state agencies for the operation of early learning programs requested by the nongovernmental private-public partnership to allow for flexibility to pursue market-based approaches to achieving the best outcomes for children and families.

(2) In addition to other powers granted to the ((director)) secretary, the ((director)) secretary may:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this chapter((; and

(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to implement this chapter, including rules governing child day care and early learning programs under this chapter. This section does not expand the rule-making authority of the director beyond that necessary to implement and administer programs and services existing July 1, 2006, as transferred to the department of early learning under section 501, chapter 265, Laws of 2006. The rule-making authority does not include any authority to set mandatory curriculum or establish what must be taught in child day care centers or by family day care providers)).

Sec. 205. RCW 43.215.200 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the ((director's)) secretary's duty with regard to licensing under this chapter:

(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to designate categories of child care facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any other factor relevant thereto;

(2)(a) In consultation with the state fire marshal's office, the ((director)) secretary shall use an interagency process to address health and safety requirements for child care programs that serve school-age children and are operated in buildings that contain public or private schools that safely serve children during times in which school is in session;

(b) Any requirements in (a) of this subsection as they relate to the physical facility, including outdoor playgrounds, do not apply to before-school and after-school programs that serve only school-age children and operate in the same facilities used by public or private schools;

(3) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of parents or guardians, and persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed under this chapter;

(4) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the ((director)) secretary shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges of each agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure, and other persons having unsupervised access to children in care;

(5) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided for in RCW 43.215.215 (as recodified by this act) and 43.20A.710, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person;

(6) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of care that an agency is authorized to render and the ages and number of children to be served;

(7) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to require regular reports from each licensee;

(8) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements adopted under this chapter;

(9) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation with affected groups for child day care requirements; and

(10) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help them improve their methods and facilities for the care and early learning of children.

Sec. 206. RCW 43.215.215 and 2011 c 295 s 2 and 2011 c 253 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early learning services to children, the department may consider the history of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes. No unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider licensed under this chapter.

(2) In order to determine the suitability of individuals newly applying for an agency license, new licensees, their new employees, and other persons who newly have unsupervised access to children in care, shall be fingerprinted.

(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history record check.

(b)(i) ((Effective July 1, 2012,)) All individuals applying for first-time agency licenses, all new employees, and other persons who have not been previously qualified by the department to have unsupervised access to children in care must be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal history record check pursuant to this section.

(ii) Persons required to be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal (([history])) history record check pursuant to this section must pay for the cost of this check as follows: The fee established by the Washington state patrol for the criminal background history check, including the cost of obtaining the fingerprints; and a fee paid to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. The fee paid to the department must be deposited into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.215.218 (as recodified by this act). The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.

(c) The ((director)) secretary shall use the fingerprint criminal history record check information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for children.

(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the ((director)) secretary such information as they may have and that the ((director)) secretary may require for such purpose.

(e) No later than July 1, 2013, all agency licensees holding licenses prior to July 1, 2012, persons who were employees before July 1, 2012, and persons who have been qualified by the department before July 1, 2012, to have unsupervised access to children in care, must submit a new background application to the department. The department must require persons submitting a new background application pursuant to this subsection (2)(e) to pay a fee to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. This fee must be paid into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.215.218 (as recodified by this act). The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.

(f) The department shall issue a background check clearance card or certificate to the applicant if after the completion of a background check the department concludes the applicant is qualified for unsupervised access to children in child care. The background check clearance card or certificate is valid for three years from the date of issuance. A valid card or certificate must be accepted by a potential employer as proof that the applicant has successfully completed a background check as required under this chapter.

(g) The original applicant for an agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised access to children in care shall submit a new background check application to the department, on a form and by a date as determined by the department.

(h) The applicant and agency shall maintain on-site for inspection a copy of the background check clearance card or certificate.

(i) Individuals who have been issued a background check clearance card or certificate shall report nonconviction and conviction information to the department within twenty-four hours of the event constituting the nonconviction or conviction information.

(j) The department shall investigate and conduct a redetermination of an applicant's or licensee's background clearance if the department receives a complaint or information from individuals, a law enforcement agency, or other federal, state, or local government agency. Subject to the requirements contained in RCW 43.215.300 and 43.215.305 (as recodified by this act) and based on a determination that an individual lacks the appropriate character, suitability, or competence to provide child care or early learning services to children, the department may: (i) Invalidate the background card or certificate; or (ii) suspend, modify, or revoke any license authorized by this chapter.

(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services, each department shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

Sec. 207. RCW 43.215.216 and 2011 c 295 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to appropriation, the department ((of early learning)) shall ((establish and)) maintain an individual-based or portable background check clearance registry ((by July 1, 2012)). Any individual seeking a child care license or employment in any child care facility licensed or regulated under current law shall submit a background application on a form prescribed by the department in rule.

Sec. 208. RCW 43.215.217 and 2011 c 295 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((Effective July 1, 2011,)) All agency licensees shall pay the department a one-time fee established by the department. When establishing the fee, the department must consider the cost of developing and administering the registry, and shall not set a fee which is estimated to generate revenue beyond estimated costs for the development and administration of the registry. Fee revenues must be deposited in the individual-based/portable background check clearance account created in RCW 43.215.218 (as recodified by this act) and may be expended only for the costs of developing and administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry created in RCW 43.215.216 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 209. RCW 43.215.218 and 2011 c 295 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The individual-based/portable background check clearance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All fees collected pursuant to RCW 43.215.215 and 43.215.217 (as recodified by this act) must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for development and administration, and implementation of the individual-based/portable background check registry established in RCW 43.215.216 (as recodified by this act). Only the ((director of the department of early learning or the director's)) secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 210. RCW 43.215.405 and 2014 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.457 and 43.215.900 through 43.215.903 (as recodified by this act).

(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW 43.215.420 (as recodified by this act).

(2) "Approved programs" means those state-supported education and special assistance programs which are recognized by the department as meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the department to qualify under RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.450 and 43.215.900 through 43.215.903 (as recodified by this act) and are designated as eligible for funding by the department under RCW 43.215.430 and 43.215.440 (as recodified by this act).

(3) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the needs of the child and includes education, health, and family support services.

(4) (("Department" means the department of early learning.

(5))) "Eligible child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty level, as published annually by the federal department of health and human services, and includes a child whose family is eligible for public assistance, and who is not a participant in a federal or state program providing comprehensive services; a child eligible for special education due to disability under RCW 28A.155.020; and may include children who are eligible under rules adopted by the department if the number of such children equals not more than ten percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program. Priority for enrollment shall be given to children from families with the lowest income, children in foster care, or to eligible children from families with multiple needs.

(((6))) (5) "Family support services" means providing opportunities for parents to:

(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;

(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting skills;

(c) Further their education and training;

(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;

(e) Increase their self-reliance.

Sec. 211. RCW 43.215.420 and 2006 c 263 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall establish an advisory committee composed of interested parents and representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, ((the division of children and family services within the department of social and health services,)) early childhood education and development staff preparation programs, the head start programs, school districts, and such other community and business organizations as deemed necessary by the department to assist with the establishment of the preschool program and advise the department on matters regarding the ongoing promotion and operation of the program.

Sec. 212. RCW 43.215.495 and 2006 c 265 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the policy of the state of Washington to:

(1) Recognize the family as the most important social and economic unit of society and support the central role parents play in child rearing. All parents are encouraged to care for and nurture their children through the traditional methods of parental care at home. The availability of quality, affordable child care is a concern for working parents, the costs of care are often beyond the resources of working parents, and child care facilities are not located conveniently to workplaces and neighborhoods. Parents are encouraged to participate fully in the effort to improve the quality of child care services.

(2) Promote a variety of culturally and developmentally appropriate child care settings and services of the highest possible quality in accordance with the basic principle of continuity of care. These settings shall include, but not be limited to, family day care homes, mini-centers, centers and schools.

(3) Promote the growth, development and safety of children by working with community groups including providers and parents to establish standards for quality service, training of child care providers, fair and equitable monitoring, and salary levels commensurate with provider responsibilities and support services.

(4) Promote equal access to quality, affordable, socio-economically integrated child care for all children and families.

(5) Facilitate broad community and private sector involvement in the provision of quality child care services to foster economic development and assist industry through the department ((of early learning)).

Sec. 213. RCW 43.215.545 and 2013 c 323 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of early learning)) shall:

(1) Work in conjunction with the statewide child care resource and referral network as well as local governments, nonprofit organizations, businesses, and community child care advocates to create local child care resource and referral organizations. These organizations may carry out needs assessments, resource development, provider training, technical assistance, and parent information and training;

(2) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as grants to the statewide child care resource and referral network and to existing or potential local child care resource and referral organizations;

(3) Adopt rules regarding the application for and distribution of grants to local child care resource and referral organizations. The rules shall, at a minimum, require an applicant to submit a plan for achieving the following objectives:

(a) Provide parents with information about child care resources, including location of services and subsidies;

(b) Carry out child care provider recruitment and training programs, including training under RCW 74.25.040;

(c) Offer support services, such as parent and provider seminars, toy-lending libraries, and substitute banks;

(d) Provide information for businesses regarding child care supply and demand;

(e) Advocate for increased public and private sector resources devoted to child care;

(f) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding employee child care services; and

(g) Serve recipients of temporary assistance for needy families and working parents with incomes at or below household incomes of two hundred percent of the federal poverty line;

(4) Provide staff support and technical assistance to the statewide child care resource and referral network and local child care resource and referral organizations;

(5) Maintain a statewide child care licensing data bank and work with department licensors to provide information to local child care resource and referral organizations about licensed child care providers in the state;

(6) Through the statewide child care resource and referral network and local resource and referral organizations, compile data about local child care needs and availability for future planning and development;

(7) Coordinate with the statewide child care resource and referral network and local child care resource and referral organizations for the provision of training and technical assistance to child care providers;

(8) Collect and assemble information regarding the availability of insurance and of federal and other child care funding to assist state and local agencies, businesses, and other child care providers in offering child care services;

(9) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, ((beginning September 1, 2013,)) increase the base rate for all child care providers by ten percent;

(10) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide tiered subsidy rate enhancements to child care providers if the provider meets the following requirements:

(a) The provider enrolls in quality rating and improvement system levels 2, 3, 4, or 5;

(b) The provider is actively participating in the early achievers program;

(c) The provider continues to advance towards level 5 of the early achievers program; and

(d) The provider must complete level 2 within thirty months or the reimbursement rate returns the level 1 rate; and

(11) Require exempt providers to participate in continuing education, if adequate funding is available.

Sec. 214. RCW 43.215.550 and 2006 c 265 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

An employer liaison position is established in the department ((of early learning)) to be colocated with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce. The employer liaison shall, within appropriated funds:

(1) Staff and assist the child care partnership in the implementation of its duties;

(2) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding child care services, working with and through local resource and referral organizations whenever possible. Such technical assistance shall include at a minimum:

(a) Assessing the child care needs of employees and prospective employees;

(b) Reviewing options available to employers interested in increasing access to child care for their employees;

(c) Developing techniques to permit small businesses to increase access to child care for their employees;

(d) Reviewing methods of evaluating the impact of child care activities on employers; and

(e) Preparing, collecting, and distributing current information for employers on options for increasing involvement in child care; and

(3) Provide assistance to local child care resource and referral organizations to increase their capacity to provide quality technical assistance to employers in their community.

Sec. 215. RCW 28A.150.315 and 2012 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price lunch support in the prior school year. During the 2011-2013 biennium, funding shall continue to be phased-in each year until full statewide implementation of all-day kindergarten is achieved in the 2017-18 school year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in subsequent school years regardless of changes in the school's percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as long as other program requirements are fulfilled. Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support shall agree to the following conditions:

(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;

(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of experiences that assist students in:

(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading, mathematics, and writing;

(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;

(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts, health and physical education, and a world language other than English;

(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;

(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a group; and

(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;

(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally appropriate and promote creativity;

(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early learning community providers; and

(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with early learning providers and parents.

(2)(a) It is the intent of the legislature that administration of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills as required in this subsection (2) and RCW 28A.655.080 replace administration of other assessments being required by school districts or that other assessments only be administered if they seek to obtain information not covered by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.

(b) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this section and to the extent funds are available, beginning with the 2011-12 school year on a voluntary basis, schools must identify the skills, knowledge, and characteristics of kindergarten students at the beginning of the school year in order to support social-emotional, physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children; support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform instruction. Kindergarten teachers shall administer the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills, as directed by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families and in collaboration with the nongovernmental private-public partnership designated in RCW 43.215.070 (as recodified by this act), and report the results to the superintendent. The superintendent shall share the results with the ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families.

(c) School districts shall provide an opportunity for parents and guardians to excuse their children from participation in the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.

(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program. Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

Sec. 216. RCW 28A.155.065 and 2016 c 57 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school district shall provide or contract for early intervention services to all eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of age. Eligibility shall be determined according to Part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act or other applicable federal and state laws, and as specified in the Washington Administrative Code adopted by the state lead agency, which is the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families. School districts shall provide or contract, or both, for early intervention services in partnership with local birth-to-three lead agencies and birth-to-three providers. Services provided under this section shall not supplant services or funding currently provided in the state for early intervention services to eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of age. The state-designated birth-to-three lead agency shall be payor of last resort for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this section.

(2)(a) By October 1, 2016, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of early learning, in its role as state lead agency, with a full accounting of the school district expenditures from the 2013-14 and 2014-15 school years, disaggregated by district, for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this section.

(b) The reported expenditures must include, but are not limited to per student allocations, per student expenditures, the number of children served, detailed information on services provided by school districts and contracted for by school districts, coordination and transition services, and administrative costs.

(3) The services in this section are not part of the state's program of basic education pursuant to Article IX of the state Constitution.

Sec. 217. RCW 28A.210.070 and 2006 c 263 s 908 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170:

(1) "Chief administrator" shall mean the person with the authority and responsibility for the immediate supervision of the operation of a school or day care center as defined in this section or, in the alternative, such other person as may hereafter be designated in writing for the purposes of RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 by the statutory or corporate board of directors of the school district, school, or day care center or, if none, such other persons or person with the authority and responsibility for the general supervision of the operation of the school district, school or day care center.

(2) "Full immunization" shall mean immunization against certain vaccine-preventable diseases in accordance with schedules and with immunizing agents approved by the state board of health.

(3) "Local health department" shall mean the city, town, county, district or combined city-county health department, board of health, or health officer which provides public health services.

(4) "School" shall mean and include each building, facility, and location at or within which any or all portions of a preschool, kindergarten and grades one through twelve program of education and related activities are conducted for two or more children by or in behalf of any public school district and by or in behalf of any private school or private institution subject to approval by the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130, 28A.195.010 through 28A.195.050, and 28A.410.120.

(5) "Day care center" shall mean an agency which regularly provides care for a group of thirteen or more children for periods of less than twenty-four hours and is licensed pursuant to chapter ((74.15)) 43.215 RCW (as recodified by this act).

(6) "Child" shall mean any person, regardless of age, in attendance at a public or private school or a licensed day care center.

Sec. 218. RCW 28A.215.020 and 2006 c 263 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

Expenditures under federal funds and/or state appropriations made to carry out the purposes of RCW 28A.215.010 through 28A.215.050 shall be made by warrants issued by the state treasurer upon order of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall make necessary rules to carry out the purpose of RCW 28A.215.010. ((After being notified by the office of the governor that there is an agency or department responsible for early learning,)) The superintendent shall consult with ((that agency)) the department of children, youth, and families when establishing relevant rules.

Sec. 219. RCW 28A.320.191 and 2010 c 231 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

For the program of early learning established in RCW ((43.215.141)) 43.215.455 (as recodified by this act), school districts:

(1) Shall work cooperatively with program providers to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported; and

(2) May contract with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families to deliver services under the program.

Sec. 220. RCW 28A.400.303 and 2014 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, and their contractors hiring employees who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children shall require a record check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before hiring an employee. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity shall provide a copy of the record report to the applicant. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. If the applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the district, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, or contractor may waive the requirement. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall determine who shall pay costs associated with the record check.

(2) Federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools may use the process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for their employees and applicants for employment.

(3) Individuals who hold a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families consistent with RCW 43.215.215 (as recodified by this act) can meet the requirements in subsection (1) of this section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 221. RCW 28A.410.010 and 2014 c 50 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that the initial application for certification shall require a record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. An individual who holds a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families consistent with RCW 43.215.215 (as recodified by this act) is exempt from the office of the superintendent of public instruction fingerprint background check if the individual provides a true and accurate copy of his or her Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the two years before application. The rules shall permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or suspended certificate to be employed on a conditional basis by a school district with the requirement that the holder must complete any certificate renewal requirements established by the state board of education within two years of initial reemployment.

(b) In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American sign language the board shall consult with the national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.

(c) The board shall develop rules consistent with RCW 18.340.020 for the certification of spouses of military personnel.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board rules.

Sec. 222. RCW 42.56.230 and 2015 c 224 s 2 and 2015 c 47 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following personal information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:

(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare recipients;

(2)(a) Personal information:

(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files maintained by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families;

(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs; or

(iii) For the family members or guardians of a child who is subject to the exemption under this subsection (2) if the family member or guardian has the same last name ((of [as])) as the child or if the family member or guardian resides at the same address ((of [as])) as the child and disclosure of the family member's or guardian's information would result in disclosure of the personal information exempted under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;

(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;

(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;

(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial information as defined in RCW 9.35.005 including social security numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by other law;

(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093;

(7)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential address, social security number, or other personal information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.

(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an applicant declined to register with the selective service system.

(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work, public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW 46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.

(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW 88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse; ((and))

(8) All information related to individual claims resolution structured settlement agreements submitted to the board of industrial insurance appeals under RCW 51.04.063, other than final orders from the board of industrial insurance appeals.

Upon request by the legislature, the department of licensing shall provide a report to the legislature containing all of the information in subsection (7)(c) and (d) of this section that is subject to public disclosure((.)); and

(9) Voluntarily submitted information contained in a database that is part of or associated with enhanced 911 emergency communications systems, or information contained or used in emergency notification systems as provided under RCW 38.52.575 and 38.52.577.

Sec. 223. RCW 43.41.400 and 2016 c 72 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, conduct collaborative analyses of early learning, K-12, and higher education programs and education issues across the P-20 system, which includes the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, the state board of education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the student achievement council, public and private nonprofit four-year institutions of higher education, and the employment security department. The education data center shall conduct collaborative analyses under this section with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and provide data electronically to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, to the extent permitted by state and federal confidentiality requirements. The education data center shall be considered an authorized representative of the state educational agencies in this section under applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of accessing and compiling student record data for research purposes.

(2) The education data center shall:

(a) In consultation with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the agencies and organizations participating in the education data center, identify the critical research and policy questions that are intended to be addressed by the education data center and the data needed to address the questions;

(b) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups, and complete P-20 research projects;

(c) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature in identifying the data to be compiled and analyzed to ensure that legislative interests are served;

(d) Annually provide to the K-12 data governance group a list of data elements and data quality improvements that are necessary to answer the research and policy questions identified by the education data center and have been identified by the legislative committees in (c) of this subsection. Within three months of receiving the list, the K-12 data governance group shall develop and transmit to the education data center a feasibility analysis of obtaining or improving the data, including the steps required, estimated time frame, and the financial and other resources that would be required. Based on the analysis, the education data center shall submit, if necessary, a recommendation to the legislature regarding any statutory changes or resources that would be needed to collect or improve the data;

(e) Monitor and evaluate the education data collection systems of the organizations and agencies represented in the education data center ensuring that data systems are flexible, able to adapt to evolving needs for information, and to the extent feasible and necessary, include data that are needed to conduct the analyses and provide answers to the research and policy questions identified in (a) of this subsection;

(f) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized higher education enrollment system;

(g) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs;

(h) Provide research that focuses on student transitions within and among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors in the P-20 system;

(i) Prepare a regular report on the educational and workforce outcomes of youth in the juvenile justice system, using data disaggregated by age, and by ethnic categories and racial subgroups in accordance with RCW 28A.300.042; and

(j) Make recommendations to the legislature as necessary to help ensure the goals and objectives of this section and RCW 28A.655.210 and 28A.300.507 are met.

(3) The department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, superintendent of public instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce training and education coordinating board, student achievement council, public four-year institutions of higher education, department of social and health services, and employment security department shall work with the education data center to develop data-sharing and research agreements, consistent with applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the work of the center. The education data center shall also develop data-sharing and research agreements with the administrative office of the courts to conduct research on educational and workforce outcomes using data maintained under RCW 13.50.010(12) related to juveniles. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher education that provide programs of education beyond the high school level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each contributing agency or institution.

Sec. 224. RCW 43.43.832 and 2012 c 44 s 2 and 2012 c 10 s 41 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section shall disclose conviction records as follows:

(a) An applicant's conviction record, upon the request of a business or organization as defined in RCW 43.43.830, a developmentally disabled person, or a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 43.43.830 or his or her guardian;

(b) The conviction record of an applicant for certification, upon the request of the Washington professional educator standards board;

(c) Any conviction record to aid in the investigation and prosecution of child, developmentally disabled person, and vulnerable adult abuse cases and to protect children and adults from further incidents of abuse, upon the request of a law enforcement agency, the office of the attorney general, prosecuting authority, or the department of social and health services; and

(d) A prospective client's or resident's conviction record, upon the request of a business or organization that qualifies for exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) and that provides emergency shelter or transitional housing for children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(2) The secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of children, youth, and families must establish rules and set standards to require specific action when considering the information received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and when considering additional information including but not limited to civil adjudication proceedings as defined in RCW 43.43.830 and any out-of-state equivalent, in the following circumstances:

(a) When considering persons for state employment in positions directly responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities;

(b) When considering persons for state positions involving unsupervised access to vulnerable adults to conduct comprehensive assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards;

(c) When licensing agencies or facilities with individuals in positions directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not limited to agencies or facilities licensed under chapter 74.15 or 18.51 RCW;

(d) When contracting with individuals or businesses or organizations for the care, supervision, case management, or treatment, including peer counseling, of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20, 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW;

(e) When individual providers are paid by the state or providers are paid by home care agencies to provide in-home services involving unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW.

(3) The ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families shall investigate the conviction records, pending charges, and other information including civil adjudication proceeding records of current employees and of any person actively being considered for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised access to children, or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards. "Considered for any position" includes decisions about (a) initial hiring, layoffs, reallocations, transfers, promotions, or demotions, or (b) other decisions that result in an individual being in a position that will or may have unsupervised access to children as an employee, an intern, or a volunteer.

(4) The ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families shall adopt rules and investigate conviction records, pending charges, and other information including civil adjudication proceeding records, in the following circumstances:

(a) When licensing or certifying agencies with individuals in positions that will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood education services, including but not limited to licensees, agency staff, interns, volunteers, contracted providers, and persons living on the premises who are sixteen years of age or older;

(b) When authorizing individuals who will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood learning education services in licensed or certified agencies, including but not limited to licensees, agency staff, interns, volunteers, contracted providers, and persons living on the premises who are sixteen years of age or older;

(c) When contracting with any business or organization for activities that will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood learning education services;

(d) When establishing the eligibility criteria for individual providers to receive state paid subsidies to provide child day care or early learning services that will or may involve unsupervised access to children.

(5) Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent contractors on a conditional basis pending completion of the state background investigation. Whenever a national criminal record check through the federal bureau of investigation is required by state law, a person may be employed or engaged as a volunteer or independent contractor on a conditional basis pending completion of the national check. The Washington personnel resources board shall adopt rules to accomplish the purposes of this subsection as it applies to state employees.

(6)(a) For purposes of facilitating timely access to criminal background information and to reasonably minimize the number of requests made under this section, recognizing that certain health care providers change employment frequently, health care facilities may, upon request from another health care facility, share copies of completed criminal background inquiry information.

(b) Completed criminal background inquiry information may be shared by a willing health care facility only if the following conditions are satisfied: The licensed health care facility sharing the criminal background inquiry information is reasonably known to be the person's most recent employer, no more than twelve months has elapsed from the date the person was last employed at a licensed health care facility to the date of their current employment application, and the criminal background information is no more than two years old.

(c) If criminal background inquiry information is shared, the health care facility employing the subject of the inquiry must require the applicant to sign a disclosure statement indicating that there has been no conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842 since the completion date of the most recent criminal background inquiry.

(d) Any health care facility that knows or has reason to believe that an applicant has or may have a disqualifying conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842, subsequent to the completion date of their most recent criminal background inquiry, shall be prohibited from relying on the applicant's previous employer's criminal background inquiry information. A new criminal background inquiry shall be requested pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.842.

(e) Health care facilities that share criminal background inquiry information shall be immune from any claim of defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of this information in accordance with this subsection.

(f) Health care facilities shall transmit and receive the criminal background inquiry information in a manner that reasonably protects the subject's rights to privacy and confidentiality.

Sec. 225. RCW 43.43.837 and 2012 c 164 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in order to determine the character, competence, and suitability of any applicant or service provider to have unsupervised access, the secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at any time, but shall require a fingerprint-based background check when the applicant or service provider has resided in the state less than three consecutive years before application, and:

(a) Is an applicant or service provider providing services to children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) Is an individual residing in an applicant or service provider's home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or

(c) Is an applicant or service provider providing in-home services funded by:

(i) Medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(ii) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(iii) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110; or

(iv) Other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families.

(2) Long-term care workers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, who are hired after January 7, 2012, are subject to background checks under RCW 74.39A.056.

(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided for in RCW 43.215.215 (as recodified by this act) and 43.20A.710, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

(4) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall require a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation when the department seeks to approve an applicant or service provider for a foster or adoptive placement of children in accordance with federal and state law. Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the department of children, youth, and families for applicant and service providers providing foster care as required in RCW 74.15.030.

(5) Any secure facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 71.09 RCW shall require applicants and service providers to undergo a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation.

(6) Service providers and service provider applicants who are required to complete a fingerprint-based background check may be hired for a one hundred twenty-day provisional period as allowed under law or program rules when:

(a) A fingerprint-based background check is pending; and

(b) The applicant or service provider is not disqualified based on the immediate result of the background check.

(7) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the applicable department for applicants or service providers providing:

(a) Services to people with a developmental disability under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) In-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(c) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(d) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110;

(e) Services under other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families; and

(f) Services in, or to residents of, a secure facility under RCW 71.09.115((; and

(g) Foster care as required under RCW 74.15.030)).

(8) Service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 must pay fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for conducting fingerprint-based background checks.

(9) ((Children's administration)) Department of children, youth, and families service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 may not pass on the cost of the background check fees to their applicants unless the individual is determined to be disqualified due to the background information.

(10) The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall develop rules identifying the financial responsibility of service providers, applicants, and the department for paying the fees charged by law enforcement to roll, print, or scan fingerprints-based for the purpose of a Washington state patrol or federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based background check.

(11) For purposes of this section, unless the context plainly indicates otherwise:

(a) "Applicant" means a current or prospective department of social and health services, department of children, youth, and families, or service provider employee, volunteer, student, intern, researcher, contractor, or any other individual who will or may have unsupervised access because of the nature of the work or services he or she provides. "Applicant" includes but is not limited to any individual who will or may have unsupervised access and is:

(i) Applying for a license or certification from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) Seeking a contract with the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, or a service provider;

(iii) Applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or transfer;

(iv) An individual that a department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client chooses to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered; or

(v) A department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families applicant who will or may work in a department-covered position.

(b) "Authorized" means the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families grants an applicant, home, or facility permission to:

(i) Conduct licensing, certification, or contracting activities;

(ii) Have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, juveniles, and children;

(iii) Receive payments from a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families program; or

(iv) Work or serve in a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families-covered position.

(c) (("Department" means the department of social and health services.

(d))) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(((e))) (d) "Secure facility" has the meaning provided in RCW 71.09.020.

(((f))) (e) "Service provider" means entities, facilities, agencies, businesses, or individuals who are licensed, certified, authorized, or regulated by, receive payment from, or have contracts or agreements with the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to vulnerable adults, juveniles, or children. "Service provider" includes individuals whom a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client may choose to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered. "Service provider" does not include those certified under chapter 70.96A RCW.

Sec. 226. RCW 43.43.838 and 2009 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After January 1, 1988, and notwithstanding any provision of RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol shall furnish a transcript of the conviction record pertaining to any person for whom the state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has a record upon the written request of:

(a) The subject of the inquiry;

(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting evaluations under RCW 43.43.832;

(c) The department of social and health services;

(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the office of the attorney general;

(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter ((74.15,)) 18.51, 18.20, or 72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or license a facility which handles vulnerable adults((. However, access to conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(e) does not limit or restrict the ability of the department to obtain additional information regarding conviction records and pending charges as set forth in RCW 74.15.030(2)(b))); or

(f) The department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families for the purpose of meeting responsibilities in chapters 43.215 (as recodified by this act) and 74.15 RCW. However, access to conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(f) does not limit or restrict the ability of department of children, youth, and families to obtain additional information regarding conviction records and pending charges as provided in RCW 74.15.030(2)(b).

(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees for disseminating records under this section to recipients identified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section. The state patrol shall also by rule establish fees for disseminating records in the custody of the national crime information center. The revenue from the fees shall cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state patrol of disseminating the records. No fee shall be charged to a nonprofit organization for the records check. Record checks requested by school districts and educational service districts using only name and date of birth will be provided free of charge.

(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 or 43.43.760.

(4) Before July 26, 1987, the state patrol shall adopt rules and forms to implement this section and to provide for security and privacy of information disseminated under this section, giving first priority to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter. The rules may include requirements for users, audits of users, and other procedures to prevent use of civil adjudication record information or criminal history record information inconsistent with this chapter.

(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in chapter 9.96A RCW.

Sec. 227. RCW 43.88.096 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 32 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section:

(a) "Designated state agency" means the department of social and health services, the department of health, the health care authority, the department of commerce, the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families.

(b) "Federal receipts" means the federal financial assistance, as defined in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 7501 on September 28, 2013, that is reported as part of a single audit.

(c) "Single audit" is as defined in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 7501 on September 28, 2013.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a designated state agency shall prepare as part of the agency's biennial budget submittal under this chapter a report that:

(a) Reports the aggregate value of federal receipts the designated state agency estimated for the ensuing biennium;

(b) Calculates the percentage of the designated state agency's total budget for the ensuing biennium that constitutes federal receipts that the designated state agency received; and

(c) Develops plans for operating the designated state agency if there is a reduction of:

(i) Five percent or more in the federal receipts that the designated state agency receives; and

(ii) Twenty-five percent or more in the federal receipts that the designated state agency receives.

(3) The report required by subsection (2) of this section prepared by the superintendent of public instruction shall include the information required by subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this section for each school district within the state.

PART III

TRANSFER OF CHILD WELFARE POLICIES AND PROGRAMS

Sec. 301. RCW 4.24.595 and 2012 c 259 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Governmental entities, and their officers, agents, employees, and volunteers, are not liable in tort for any of their acts or omissions in emergent placement investigations of child abuse or neglect under chapter 26.44 RCW including, but not limited to, any determination to leave a child with a parent, custodian, or guardian, or to return a child to a parent, custodian, or guardian, unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence. Emergent placement investigations are those conducted prior to a shelter care hearing under RCW 13.34.065.

(2) The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and its employees shall comply with the orders of the court, including shelter care and other dependency orders, and are not liable for acts performed to comply with such court orders. In providing reports and recommendations to the court, employees of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families are entitled to the same witness immunity as would be provided to any other witness.

Sec. 302. RCW 13.34.030 and 2013 c 332 s 2 and 2013 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

((For purposes of)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to forego, for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities despite an ability to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there is no expressed intent to abandon.

(2) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean((s)):

(a) Any individual under the age of eighteen years; or

(b) Any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to receive and who elects to receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031. A youth who remains dependent and who receives extended foster care services under RCW 74.13.031 shall not be considered a "child" under any other statute or for any other purpose.

(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(4) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(5) "Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation, or Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the dependency.

(6) "Dependent child" means any child who:

(a) Has been abandoned;

(b) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a person legally responsible for the care of the child;

(c) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which constitute a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological or physical development; or

(d) Is receiving extended foster care services, as authorized by RCW 74.13.031.

(7) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary of the department of social and health services to be closely related to an intellectual disability or to require treatment similar to that required for individuals with intellectual disabilities, which disability originates before the individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial limitation to the individual.

(8) "Educational liaison" means a person who has been appointed by the court to fulfill responsibilities outlined in RCW 13.34.046.

(9) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other support services the department is authorized to provide under RCW 74.13.031. These services may include placement in licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs; independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or treatment.

(10) "Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding, including a guardian appointed pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under this chapter.

(11) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding under this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by the court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform substantially the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem, shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of this chapter.

(12) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of volunteer guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or found to be dependent. Such management shall include but is not limited to: Recruitment, screening, training, supervision, assignment, and discharge of volunteers.

(13) "Housing assistance" means appropriate referrals by the department or other supervising agencies to federal, state, local, or private agencies or organizations, assistance with forms, applications, or financial subsidies or other monetary assistance for housing. For purposes of this chapter, "housing assistance" is not a remedial service or time-limited family reunification service as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(14) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the federally established poverty level; or

(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the retention of counsel.

(15) "Nonminor dependent" means any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is participating in extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(16) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(17) "Preventive services" means preservation services, as defined in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services, including housing assistance, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting the child.

(18) "Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030.

(19) "Sibling" means a child's birth brother, birth sister, adoptive brother, adoptive sister, half-brother, or half-sister, or as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe for an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040.

(20) "Social study" means a written evaluation of matters relevant to the disposition of the case and shall contain the following information:

(a) A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that intervention is designed to alleviate;

(b) A description of the specific services and activities, for both the parents and child, that are needed in order to prevent serious harm to the child; the reasons why such services and activities are likely to be useful; the availability of any proposed services; and the agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services will be delivered. The description shall identify the services chosen and approved by the parent;

(c) If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons why the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a description of any previous efforts to work with the parents and the child in the home; the in-home treatment programs that have been considered and rejected; the preventive services, including housing assistance, that have been offered or provided and have failed to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home; and the parents' attitude toward placement of the child;

(d) A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a result of removal;

(e) A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize the harm to the child that may result if separation occurs including an assessment of the child's relationship and emotional bond with any siblings, and the agency's plan to provide ongoing contact between the child and the child's siblings if appropriate; and

(f) Behavior that will be expected before determination that supervision of the family or placement is no longer necessary.

(21) "Supervised independent living" includes, but is not limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings. Supervised independent living settings must be approved by the children's administration or the court.

(22) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide case management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020.

(23) "Voluntary placement agreement" means, for the purposes of extended foster care services, a written voluntary agreement between a nonminor dependent who agrees to submit to the care and authority of the department for the purposes of participating in the extended foster care program.

Sec. 303. RCW 13.34.090 and 2000 c 122 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any party has a right to be represented by an attorney in all proceedings under this chapter, to introduce evidence, to be heard in his or her own behalf, to examine witnesses, to receive a decision based solely on the evidence adduced at the hearing, and to an unbiased fact finder.

(2) At all stages of a proceeding in which a child is alleged to be dependent, the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian has the right to be represented by counsel, and if indigent, to have counsel appointed for him or her by the court. Unless waived in court, counsel shall be provided to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, if such person (a) has appeared in the proceeding or requested the court to appoint counsel and (b) is financially unable to obtain counsel because of indigency.

(3) If a party to an action under this chapter is represented by counsel, no order shall be provided to that party for his or her signature without prior notice and provision of the order to counsel.

(4) Copies of department ((of social and health services)) or supervising agency records to which parents have legal access pursuant to chapter 13.50 RCW shall be given to the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel, prior to any shelter care hearing and within fifteen days after the department or supervising agency receives a written request for such records from the parent, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel. These records shall be provided to the child's parents, guardian, legal custodian, or legal counsel a reasonable period of time prior to the shelter care hearing in order to allow an opportunity to review the records prior to the hearing. These records shall be legible and shall be provided at no expense to the parents, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her counsel. When the records are served on legal counsel, legal counsel shall have the opportunity to review the records with the parents and shall review the records with the parents prior to the shelter care hearing.

Sec. 304. RCW 13.34.096 and 2016 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department or supervising agency shall provide the child's foster parents, preadoptive parents, or other caregivers with timely and adequate notice of their right to be heard prior to each proceeding held with respect to the child in juvenile court under this chapter. For purposes of this section, "timely and adequate notice" means notice at the time the department would be required to give notice to parties to the case and by any means reasonably certain of notifying the foster parents, preadoptive parents, or other caregivers, including but not limited to written, telephone, or in person oral notification. For emergency hearings, the department shall give notice to foster parents, preadoptive parents, or other caregivers as soon as is practicable. For six-month review and annual permanency hearings, the department shall give notice to foster parents upon placement or as soon as practicable.

(2) The court shall establish and include in the court record after every hearing for which the department or supervising agency is required to provide notice to the child's foster parents, preadoptive parents, and caregivers whether the department provided adequate and timely notice, whether a caregiver's report was received by the court, and whether the court provided the child's foster parents, preadoptive parents, or caregivers with an opportunity to be heard in court. For purposes of this section, "caregiver's report" means a form provided by the department ((of social and health services)) to a child's foster parents, preadoptive parents, or caregivers that provides an opportunity for those individuals to share information about the child with the court before a court hearing. A caregiver's report shall not include information related to a child's biological parent that is not directly related to the child's well-being.

(3) Absent exigent circumstances, the department shall provide the child's foster family home notice of expected placement changes as required by RCW 74.13.300.

(4) The rights to notice and to be heard apply only to persons with whom a child has been placed by the department or supervising agency and who are providing care to the child at the time of the proceeding. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to any person solely on the basis of such notice and right to be heard.

Sec. 305. RCW 13.34.110 and 2007 c 220 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court shall hold a fact-finding hearing on the petition and, unless the court dismisses the petition, shall make written findings of fact, stating the reasons therefor. The rules of evidence shall apply at the fact-finding hearing and the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child shall have all of the rights provided in RCW 13.34.090(1). The petitioner shall have the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030.

(2) The court in a fact-finding hearing may consider the history of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the family for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of the child on the part of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, or for the purpose of establishing that reasonable efforts have been made by the department to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes.

(3)(a) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child may waive his or her right to a fact-finding hearing by stipulating or agreeing to the entry of an order of dependency establishing that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030. The parent, guardian, or legal custodian may also stipulate or agree to an order of disposition pursuant to RCW 13.34.130 at the same time. Any stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition must be signed by the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and his or her attorney, unless the parent, guardian, or legal custodian has waived his or her right to an attorney in open court, and by the petitioner and the attorney, guardian ad litem, or court-appointed special advocate for the child, if any. If the department ((of social and health services)) is not the petitioner and is required by the order to supervise the placement of the child or provide services to any party, the department must also agree to and sign the order.

(b) Entry of any stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition is subject to approval by the court. The court shall receive and review a social study before entering a stipulated or agreed order and shall consider whether the order is consistent with the allegations of the dependency petition and the problems that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care. No social file or social study may be considered by the court in connection with the fact-finding hearing or prior to factual determination, except as otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence.

(c) Prior to the entry of any stipulated or agreed order of dependency, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child and his or her attorney must appear before the court and the court within available resources must inquire and establish on the record that:

(i) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands the terms of the order or orders he or she has signed, including his or her responsibility to participate in remedial services as provided in any disposition order;

(ii) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands that entry of the order starts a process that could result in the filing of a petition to terminate his or her relationship with the child within the time frames required by state and federal law if he or she fails to comply with the terms of the dependency or disposition orders or fails to substantially remedy the problems that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;

(iii) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands that the entry of the stipulated or agreed order of dependency is an admission that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 and shall have the same legal effect as a finding by the court that the child is dependent by at least a preponderance of the evidence, and that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall not have the right in any subsequent proceeding for termination of parental rights or dependency guardianship pursuant to this chapter or nonparental custody pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW to challenge or dispute the fact that the child was found to be dependent; and

(iv) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian knowingly and willingly stipulated and agreed to and signed the order or orders, without duress, and without misrepresentation or fraud by any other party.

If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian fails to appear before the court after stipulating or agreeing to entry of an order of dependency, the court may enter the order upon a finding that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian had actual notice of the right to appear before the court and chose not to do so. The court may require other parties to the order, including the attorney for the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, to appear and advise the court of the parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's notice of the right to appear and understanding of the factors specified in this subsection. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian may choose to waive his or her presence at the in-court hearing for entry of the stipulated or agreed order of dependency by submitting to the court through counsel a completed stipulated or agreed dependency fact-finding/disposition statement in a form determined by the Washington state supreme court pursuant to General Rule GR 9.

(4) Immediately after the entry of the findings of fact, the court shall hold a disposition hearing, unless there is good cause for continuing the matter for up to fourteen days. If good cause is shown, the case may be continued for longer than fourteen days. Notice of the time and place of the continued hearing may be given in open court. If notice in open court is not given to a party, that party shall be notified by certified mail of the time and place of any continued hearing. Unless there is reasonable cause to believe the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or efforts to reunite the parent and child would be hindered, the court shall direct the department to notify those adult persons who: (a) Are related by blood or marriage to the child in the following degrees: Parent, grandparent, brother, sister, stepparent, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, or aunt; (b) are known to the department as having been in contact with the family or child within the past twelve months; and (c) would be an appropriate placement for the child. Reasonable cause to dispense with notification to a parent under this section must be proved by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

The parties need not appear at the fact-finding or dispositional hearing if the parties, their attorneys, the guardian ad litem, and court-appointed special advocates, if any, are all in agreement.

Sec. 306. RCW 13.34.136 and 2015 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services, including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.

(2) The agency supervising the dependency shall submit a written permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not in agreement with the department's or supervising agency's proposed permanency plan must be provided to the department or supervising agency, all other parties, and the court at least seven days prior to the hearing.

The permanency plan shall include:

(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption, including a tribal customary adoption as defined in RCW 13.38.040; guardianship; permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, if the child is between ages sixteen and eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older. Although a permanency plan of care may only identify long-term relative or foster care for children between ages sixteen and eighteen, children under sixteen may remain placed with relatives or in foster care. The department or supervising agency shall not discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW;

(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(8), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child home, what steps the supervising agency or the department will take to promote existing appropriate sibling relationships and/or facilitate placement together or contact in accordance with the best interests of each child, and what actions the department or supervising agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.

(i) The department's or supervising agency's plan shall specify what services the parents will be offered to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents must meet to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and parental requirement.

(A) If the parent is incarcerated, the plan must address how the parent will participate in the case conference and permanency planning meetings and, where possible, must include treatment that reflects the resources available at the facility where the parent is confined. The plan must provide for visitation opportunities, unless visitation is not in the best interests of the child.

(B) If a parent has a developmental disability according to the definition provided in RCW 71A.10.020, and that individual is eligible for services provided by the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration, the department shall make reasonable efforts to consult with the department of social and health services developmental disabilities administration to create an appropriate plan for services. For individuals who meet the definition of developmental disability provided in RCW 71A.10.020 and who are eligible for services through the developmental disabilities administration, the plan for services must be tailored to correct the parental deficiency taking into consideration the parent's disability and the department shall also determine an appropriate method to offer those services based on the parent's disability.

(ii)(A) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of the child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for parents and children to safely reunify. The supervising agency or department shall encourage the maximum parent and child and sibling contact possible, when it is in the best interest of the child, including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the care of the child while the child is in placement.

(B) Visitation shall not be limited as a sanction for a parent's failure to comply with court orders or services where the health, safety, or welfare of the child is not at risk as a result of the visitation.

(C) Visitation may be limited or denied only if the court determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare. When a parent or sibling has been identified as a suspect in an active criminal investigation for a violent crime that, if the allegations are true, would impact the safety of the child, the department shall make a concerted effort to consult with the assigned law enforcement officer in the criminal case before recommending any changes in parent/child or child/sibling contact. In the event that the law enforcement officer has information pertaining to the criminal case that may have serious implications for child safety or well-being, the law enforcement officer shall provide this information to the department during the consultation. The department may only use the information provided by law enforcement during the consultation to inform family visitation plans and may not share or otherwise distribute the information to any person or entity. Any information provided to the department by law enforcement during the consultation is considered investigative information and is exempt from public inspection pursuant to RCW 42.56.240. The results of the consultation shall be communicated to the court.

(D) The court and the department or supervising agency should rely upon community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other appropriate persons to provide transportation and supervision for visitation to the extent that such resources are available, and appropriate, and the child's safety would not be compromised.

(iii)(A) The department, court, or caregiver in the out-of-home placement may not limit visitation or contact between a child and sibling as a sanction for a child's behavior or as an incentive to the child to change his or her behavior.

(B) Any exceptions, limitation, or denial of contacts or visitation must be approved by the supervisor of the department caseworker and documented. The child, parent, department, guardian ad litem, or court-appointed special advocate may challenge the denial of visits in court.

(iv) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the child's or parents' well-being.

(v) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the department or supervising agency.

(vi) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child, whenever practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster care.

(vii) The supervising agency or department shall provide all reasonable services that are available within the department or supervising agency, or within the community, or those services which the department has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is unable to provide such services; and

(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(8), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The department or supervising agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for the parents or provide services to the parents if the court orders a termination petition be filed. However, reasonable efforts to ensure visitation and contact between siblings shall be made unless there is reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the child or siblings would be jeopardized.

(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest possible date. If the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen of the most recent twenty-two months, and the court has not made a good cause exception, the court shall require the department or supervising agency to file a petition seeking termination of parental rights in accordance with RCW 13.34.145(4)(b)(vi). In cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the termination order.

(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.

(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(6). Whenever the permanency plan for a child is adoption, the court shall encourage the prospective adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents, kinship caregivers, and the department or other supervising agency to seriously consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and his or her siblings of providing for and facilitating continuing postadoption contact between the siblings. To the extent that it is feasible, and when it is in the best interests of the child adoptee and his or her siblings, contact between the siblings should be frequent and of a similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption. If the child adoptee or his or her siblings are represented by an attorney or guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in any other child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each attorney and guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of continuing contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of severing contact. This section does not require the department ((of social and health services)) or other supervising agency to agree to any specific provisions in an open adoption agreement and does not create a new obligation for the department to provide supervision or transportation for visits between siblings separated by adoption from foster care.

(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:

(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.

(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

Sec. 307. RCW 13.34.141 and 2009 c 484 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After entry of a dispositional order pursuant to RCW 13.34.130 ordering placement of a child in out-of-home care, the department shall continue to encourage the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child to engage in services and maintain contact with the child, which shall be accomplished by attaching a standard notice to the services and safety plan to be provided in advance of hearings conducted pursuant to RCW 13.34.138.

(2) The notice shall be photocopied on contrasting paper to distinguish it from the services and safety plan to which it is attached, and shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

If you have not been maintaining consistent contact with your child in out-of-home care, your ability to reunify with your child may be jeopardized. If this is your situation, you need to be aware that you have important legal rights and must take steps to protect your interests.

1. The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families (or other supervising agency) and the court have created a permanency plan for your child, including a primary placement plan and a secondary placement plan, and recommending services needed before your child can be placed in the primary or secondary placement. If you want the court to order that your child be reunified with you, you should notify your lawyer and the department, and you should carefully comply with court orders for services and participate regularly in visitation with your child. Failure to promptly engage in services or to maintain contact with your child may lead to the filing of a petition to terminate your rights as a parent.

2. Primary and secondary permanency plans are intended to run at the same time so that your child will have a permanent home as quickly as possible. Even if you want another parent or person to be the primary placement choice for your child, you should tell your lawyer, the department, and the court if you want to be the secondary placement option, and you should comply with any court orders for services and participate in visitation with your child. Early and consistent involvement in your child's case plan is important for the well-being of your child.

3. Dependency review hearings, and all other dependency case hearings, are legal proceedings with potentially serious consequences. Failure to participate, respond, or comply with court orders may lead to the loss of your parental rights."

Sec. 308. RCW 13.34.180 and 2013 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A petition seeking termination of a parent and child relationship may be filed in juvenile court by any party, including the supervising agency, to the dependency proceedings concerning that child. Such petition shall conform to the requirements of RCW 13.34.040, shall be served upon the parties as provided in RCW 13.34.070(8), and shall allege all of the following unless subsection (3) or (4) of this section applies:

(a) That the child has been found to be a dependent child;

(b) That the court has entered a dispositional order pursuant to RCW 13.34.130;

(c) That the child has been removed or will, at the time of the hearing, have been removed from the custody of the parent for a period of at least six months pursuant to a finding of dependency;

(d) That the services ordered under RCW 13.34.136 have been expressly and understandably offered or provided and all necessary services, reasonably available, capable of correcting the parental deficiencies within the foreseeable future have been expressly and understandably offered or provided;

(e) That there is little likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the child can be returned to the parent in the near future. A parent's failure to substantially improve parental deficiencies within twelve months following entry of the dispositional order shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that there is little likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the child can be returned to the parent in the near future. The presumption shall not arise unless the petitioner makes a showing that all necessary services reasonably capable of correcting the parental deficiencies within the foreseeable future have been clearly offered or provided. In determining whether the conditions will be remedied the court may consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:

(i) Use of intoxicating or controlled substances so as to render the parent incapable of providing proper care for the child for extended periods of time or for periods of time that present a risk of imminent harm to the child, and documented unwillingness of the parent to receive and complete treatment or documented multiple failed treatment attempts;

(ii) Psychological incapacity or mental deficiency of the parent that is so severe and chronic as to render the parent incapable of providing proper care for the child for extended periods of time or for periods of time that present a risk of imminent harm to the child, and documented unwillingness of the parent to receive and complete treatment or documentation that there is no treatment that can render the parent capable of providing proper care for the child in the near future; or

(iii) Failure of the parent to have contact with the child for an extended period of time after the filing of the dependency petition if the parent was provided an opportunity to have a relationship with the child by the department or the court and received documented notice of the potential consequences of this failure, except that the actual inability of a parent to have visitation with the child including, but not limited to, mitigating circumstances such as a parent's current or prior incarceration or service in the military does not in and of itself constitute failure to have contact with the child; and

(f) That continuation of the parent and child relationship clearly diminishes the child's prospects for early integration into a stable and permanent home. If the parent is incarcerated, the court shall consider whether a parent maintains a meaningful role in his or her child's life based on factors identified in RCW 13.34.145(5)(b); whether the department or supervising agency made reasonable efforts as defined in this chapter; and whether particular barriers existed as described in RCW 13.34.145(5)(b) including, but not limited to, delays or barriers experienced in keeping the agency apprised of his or her location and in accessing visitation or other meaningful contact with the child.

(2) As evidence of rebuttal to any presumption established pursuant to subsection (1)(e) of this section, the court may consider the particular constraints of a parent's current or prior incarceration. Such evidence may include, but is not limited to, delays or barriers a parent may experience in keeping the agency apprised of his or her location and in accessing visitation or other meaningful contact with the child.

(3) In lieu of the allegations in subsection (1) of this section, the petition may allege that the child was found under such circumstances that the whereabouts of the child's parent are unknown and no person has acknowledged paternity or maternity and requested custody of the child within two months after the child was found.

(4) In lieu of the allegations in subsection (1)(b) through (f) of this section, the petition may allege that the parent has been convicted of:

(a) Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, or homicide by abuse as defined in chapter 9A.32 RCW against another child of the parent;

(b) Manslaughter in the first degree or manslaughter in the second degree, as defined in chapter 9A.32 RCW against another child of the parent;

(c) Attempting, conspiring, or soliciting another to commit one or more of the crimes listed in (a) or (b) of this subsection; or

(d) Assault in the first or second degree, as defined in chapter 9A.36 RCW, against the surviving child or another child of the parent.

(5) When a parent has been sentenced to a long-term incarceration and has maintained a meaningful role in the child's life considering the factors provided in RCW 13.34.145(5)(b), and it is in the best interest of the child, the department should consider a permanent placement that allows the parent to maintain a relationship with his or her child, such as, but not limited to, a guardianship pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW.

(6) Notice of rights shall be served upon the parent, guardian, or legal custodian with the petition and shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

A petition for termination of parental rights has been filed against you. You have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your interests. This petition could result in permanent loss of your parental rights.

1. You have the right to a fact-finding hearing before a judge.

2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or the supervising agency and other agencies, tell you about the law, help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain local procedure) .

3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.

You should be present at this hearing.

You may call (insert agency) for more information about your child. The agency's name and telephone number are (insert name and telephone number) ."

Sec. 309. RCW 13.34.820 and 2016 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with the attorney general's office and the department ((of social and health services)), shall compile an annual report, providing information about cases that fail to meet statutory guidelines to achieve permanency for dependent children.

(2) The administrative office of the courts shall submit the annual report required by this section to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year, beginning on December 1, 2007. The administrative office of the courts shall also submit the annual report to a representative of the foster parent association of Washington state.

(3) The annual report shall include information regarding whether foster parents received timely notification of dependency hearings as required by RCW 13.34.096 and 13.34.145 and whether caregivers submitted reports to the court.

Sec. 310. RCW 13.36.020 and 2010 c 272 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child" means any individual under the age of eighteen years.

(2) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(3) "Dependent child" means a child who has been found by a court to be dependent in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(4) "Guardian" means a person who: (a) Has been appointed by the court as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding under this chapter; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to court order. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW for the purpose of assisting the court in supervising the dependency.

(5) "Relative" means a person related to the child in the following ways: (a) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great; (b) stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister; (c) a person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law; (d) spouses of any persons named in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, even after the marriage is terminated; (e) relatives, as named in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection, of any half sibling of the child; or (f) extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(6) "Suitable person" means a nonrelative with whom the child or the child's family has a preexisting relationship; who has completed all required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to be suitable and competent to provide care for the child; and with whom the child has been placed pursuant to RCW 13.34.130.

(7) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide case management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020.

Sec. 311. RCW 13.38.040 and 2011 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Active efforts" means the following:

(a) In any foster care placement or termination of parental rights proceeding of an Indian child under chapter 13.34 RCW and this chapter where the department or a supervising agency as defined in RCW 74.13.020 has a statutory or contractual duty to provide services to, or procure services for, the parent or parents or Indian custodian, or is providing services to a parent or parents or Indian custodian pursuant to a disposition order entered pursuant to RCW 13.34.130, the department or supervising agency shall make timely and diligent efforts to provide or procure such services, including engaging the parent or parents or Indian custodian in reasonably available and culturally appropriate preventive, remedial, or rehabilitative services. This shall include those services offered by tribes and Indian organizations whenever possible. At a minimum "active efforts" shall include:

(i) In any dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW seeking out-of-home placement of an Indian child in which the department or supervising agency provided voluntary services to the parent, parents, or Indian custodian prior to filing the dependency petition, a showing to the court that the department or supervising agency social workers actively worked with the parent, parents, or Indian custodian to engage them in remedial services and rehabilitation programs to prevent the breakup of the family beyond simply providing referrals to such services.

(ii) In any dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, in which the petitioner is seeking the continued out-of-home placement of an Indian child, the department or supervising agency must show to the court that it has actively worked with the parent, parents, or Indian custodian in accordance with existing court orders and the individual service plan to engage them in remedial services and rehabilitative programs to prevent the breakup of the family beyond simply providing referrals to such services.

(iii) In any termination of parental rights proceeding regarding an Indian child under chapter 13.34 RCW in which the department or supervising agency provided services to the parent, parents, or Indian custodian, a showing to the court that the department or supervising agency social workers actively worked with the parent, parents, or Indian custodian to engage them in remedial services and rehabilitation programs ordered by the court or identified in the department or supervising agency's individual service and safety plan beyond simply providing referrals to such services.

(b) In any foster care placement or termination of parental rights proceeding in which the petitioner does not otherwise have a statutory or contractual duty to directly provide services to, or procure services for, the parent or Indian custodian, "active efforts" means a documented, concerted, and good faith effort to facilitate the parent's or Indian custodian's receipt of and engagement in services capable of meeting the criteria set out in (a) of this subsection.

(2) "Best interests of the Indian child" means the use of practices in accordance with the federal Indian child welfare act, this chapter, and other applicable law, that are designed to accomplish the following: (a) Protect the safety, well-being, development, and stability of the Indian child; (b) prevent the unnecessary out-of-home placement of the Indian child; (c) acknowledge the right of Indian tribes to maintain their existence and integrity which will promote the stability and security of their children and families; (d) recognize the value to the Indian child of establishing, developing, or maintaining a political, cultural, social, and spiritual relationship with the Indian child's tribe and tribal community; and (e) in a proceeding under this chapter where out-of-home placement is necessary, to prioritize placement of the Indian child in accordance with the placement preferences of this chapter.

(3) "Child custody proceeding" includes:

(a) "Foster care placement" which means any action removing an Indian child from his or her parent or Indian custodian for temporary placement in a foster home, institution, or with a relative, guardian, conservator, or suitable other person where the parent or Indian custodian cannot have the child returned upon demand, but where parental rights have not been terminated;

(b) "Termination of parental rights" which means any action resulting in the termination of the parent-child relationship;

(c) "Preadoptive placement" which means the temporary placement of an Indian child in a foster home or institution after the termination of parental rights but before or in lieu of adoptive placement; and

(d) "Adoptive placement" which means the permanent placement of an Indian child for adoption, including any action resulting in a final decree of adoption.

These terms shall not include a placement based upon an act which, if committed by an adult, would be deemed a crime or upon an award, in a dissolution proceeding of custody to one of the parents.

(4) "Court of competent jurisdiction" means a federal court, or a state court that entered an order in a child custody proceeding involving an Indian child, as long as the state court had proper subject matter jurisdiction in accordance with this chapter and the laws of that state, or a tribal court that had or has exclusive or concurrent jurisdiction pursuant to 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1911.

(5) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and any of its divisions. "Department" also includes supervising agencies as defined in RCW 74.13.020(((12))) with which the department entered into a contract to provide services, care, placement, case management, contract monitoring, or supervision to children subject to a petition filed under chapter 13.34 or 26.33 RCW.

(6) "Indian" means a person who is a member of an Indian tribe, or who is an Alaska native and a member of a regional corporation as defined in 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1606.

(7) "Indian child" means an unmarried and unemancipated Indian person who is under eighteen years of age and is either: (a) A member of an Indian tribe; or (b) eligible for membership in an Indian tribe and is the biological child of a member of an Indian tribe.

(8) "Indian child's family" or "extended family member" means an individual, defined by the law or custom of the child's tribe, as a relative of the child. If the child's tribe does not identify such individuals by law or custom, the term means an adult who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother, sister, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, niece, nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent, even following termination of the marriage.

(9) "Indian child's tribe" means a tribe in which an Indian child is a member or eligible for membership.

(10) "Indian custodian" means an Indian person who under tribal law, tribal custom, or state law((,)) has legal or temporary physical custody of an Indian child, or to whom the parent has transferred temporary care, physical custody, and control of an Indian child.

(11) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community of Indians recognized as eligible for the services provided to Indians by the secretary of the interior because of their status as Indians, including any Alaska native village as defined in 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1602(c).

(12) "Member" and "membership" means a determination by an Indian tribe that a person is a member or eligible for membership in that Indian tribe.

(13) "Parent" means a biological parent or parents of an Indian child or a person who has lawfully adopted an Indian child, including adoptions made under tribal law or custom. "Parent" does not include an unwed father whose paternity has not been acknowledged or established under chapter 26.26 RCW or the applicable laws of other states.

(14) "Secretary of the interior" means the secretary of the United States department of the interior.

(15) "Tribal court" means a court or body vested by an Indian tribe with jurisdiction over child custody proceedings, including but not limited to a federal court of Indian offenses, a court established and operated under the code or custom of an Indian tribe, or an administrative body of an Indian tribe vested with authority over child custody proceedings.

(16) "Tribal customary adoption" means adoption or other process through the tribal custom, traditions, or laws of an Indian child's tribe by which the Indian child is permanently placed with a nonparent and through which the nonparent is vested with the rights, privileges, and obligations of a legal parent. Termination of the parent-child relationship between the Indian child and the biological parent is not required to effect or recognize a tribal customary adoption.

Sec. 312. RCW 13.50.010 and 2016 c 93 s 2, 2016 c 72 s 109, and 2016 c 71 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this chapter:

(a) "Good faith effort to pay" means a juvenile offender has either (i) paid the principal amount in full; (ii) made at least eighty percent of the value of full monthly payments within the period from disposition or deferred disposition until the time the amount of restitution owed is under review; or (iii) can show good cause why he or she paid an amount less than eighty percent of the value of full monthly payments;

(b) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following: Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, detention center, attorney general, the legislative children's oversight committee, the office of the family and children's ombuds, the department of social and health services and its contracting agencies, the department of children, youth, and families and its contracting agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight committee created under RCW 72.05.415;

(c) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions, memorandums, briefs, notices of hearing or appearance, service documents, witness and exhibit lists, findings of the court and court orders, agreements, judgments, decrees, notices of appeal, as well as documents prepared by the clerk, including court minutes, letters, warrants, waivers, affidavits, declarations, invoices, and the index to clerk papers;

(d) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the case;

(e) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the records and reports of the probation counselor.

(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately from the official juvenile court file.

(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to maintain accurate records. To this end:

(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information. Any information in records maintained by the department of social and health services relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;

(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of its records and prevent tampering with them; and

(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies with respect to matters in its files.

(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries concerning records.

(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain confidential.

(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or destroyed.

(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the motion.

(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes. Each person granted permission to inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for research purposes shall present a notarized statement to the court stating that the names of juveniles and parents will remain confidential.

(9) The court shall release to the caseload forecast council the records needed for its research and data-gathering functions. Access to caseload forecast data may be permitted by the council for research purposes only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records or information will be preserved.

(10) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the caseload forecast council upon request. The commission shall not disclose the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records without the named individual's written permission.

(11) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority to compel disclosure shall not apply to the legislative children's oversight committee or the office of the family and children's ombuds.

(12) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the research copy is restricted to the administrative office of the courts for research purposes as authorized by the supreme court or by state statute. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy. Data contained in the research copy may be shared with other governmental agencies as authorized by state statute, pursuant to data-sharing and research agreements, and consistent with applicable security and confidentiality requirements. The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.270 and 13.50.100(3).

(13) The court shall release to the Washington state office of public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records.

(14) The court shall release to the Washington state office of civil legal aid records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.53.045. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of civil legal aid. The Washington state office of civil legal aid shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records, and shall, as soon as possible, destroy any retained notes or records obtained under this section that are not necessary for its functions related to RCW 2.53.045.

(15) For purposes of providing for the educational success of youth in foster care, the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with meeting the educational needs of foster youth to another state agency or state agency's contracted provider responsible under state law or contract for assisting foster youth to attain educational success. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.

(16) For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health and well-being of children in foster care to the department of social and health services, the health care authority, or their contracting agencies. For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and to provide for the coordination of health care and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of social and health services and the health care authority may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care to the department of children, youth, and families, or its contracting agencies. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.

Sec. 313. RCW 13.50.100 and 2014 c 175 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050, 13.50.260, and 13.50.270.

(2) Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall be released only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.

(3) Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the responsibility of supervising the juvenile. Records covered under this section and maintained by the juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of the agency may be entered in the statewide judicial information system. However, truancy records associated with a juvenile who has no other case history, and records of a juvenile's parents who have no other case history, shall be removed from the judicial information system when the juvenile is no longer subject to the compulsory attendance laws in chapter 28A.225 RCW. A county clerk is not liable for unauthorized release of this data by persons or agencies not in his or her employ or otherwise subject to his or her control, nor is the county clerk liable for inaccurate or incomplete information collected from litigants or other persons required to provide identifying data pursuant to this section.

(4) Subject to (a) of this subsection, the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families may release information retained in the course of conducting child protective services investigations to a family or juvenile court hearing a petition for custody under chapter 26.10 RCW.

(a) Information that may be released shall be limited to information regarding investigations in which: (i) The juvenile was an alleged victim of abandonment or abuse or neglect; or (ii) the petitioner for custody of the juvenile, or any individual aged sixteen or older residing in the petitioner's household, is the subject of a founded or currently pending child protective services investigation made by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families subsequent to October 1, 1998.

(b) Additional information may only be released with the written consent of the subject of the investigation and the juvenile alleged to be the victim of abandonment or abuse and neglect, or the parent, custodian, guardian, or personal representative of the juvenile, or by court order obtained with notice to all interested parties.

(5) Any disclosure of records or information by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege attached to the records or information by operation of any state or federal statute or regulation, and any recipient of such records or information shall maintain it in such a manner as to comply with such state and federal statutes and regulations and to protect against unauthorized disclosure.

(6) A contracting agency or service provider of the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, that provides counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or medical services may release to the office of the family and children's ombuds information or records relating to services provided to a juvenile who is dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian of the juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of thirteen years, unless such release is otherwise specifically prohibited by law.

(7) A juvenile, his or her parents, the juvenile's attorney, and the juvenile's parent's attorney, shall, upon request, be given access to all records and information collected or retained by a juvenile justice or care agency which pertain to the juvenile except:

(a) If it is determined by the agency that release of this information is likely to cause severe psychological or physical harm to the juvenile or his or her parents the agency may withhold the information subject to other order of the court: PROVIDED, That if the court determines that limited release of the information is appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the release of the information; or

(b) If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile justice or care agency in connection with the provision of counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or medical services to the juvenile, when the services have been sought voluntarily by the juvenile, and the juvenile has a legal right to receive those services without the consent of any person or agency, then the information or record may not be disclosed to the juvenile's parents without the informed consent of the juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or

(c) That the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families may delete the name and identifying information regarding persons or organizations who have reported alleged child abuse or neglect.

(8) A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any records following an agency determination under subsection (7) of this section may file a motion in juvenile court requesting access to the records. The court shall grant the motion unless it finds access may not be permitted according to the standards found in subsection (7)(a) and (b) of this section.

(9) The person making a motion under subsection (8) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the motion.

(10) Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any party to a proceeding seeking a declaration of dependency or a termination of the parent-child relationship and any party's counsel and the guardian ad litem of any party, shall have access to the records of any natural or adoptive child of the parent, subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section. A party denied access to records may request judicial review of the denial. If the party prevails, he or she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and an amount not less than five dollars and not more than one hundred dollars for each day the records were wrongfully denied.

(11) No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020(1) may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other licensed provider.

Sec. 314. RCW 13.50.140 and 2013 c 23 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any communication or advice privileged under RCW 5.60.060 that is disclosed by the office of the attorney general, the department of children, youth, and families, or the department of social and health services to the office of the family and children's ombuds may not be deemed to be a waiver of the privilege as to others.

Sec. 315. RCW 13.60.010 and 2015 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state patrol shall establish a missing children and endangered person clearinghouse which shall include the maintenance and operation of a toll-free telephone hotline. The clearinghouse shall distribute information to local law enforcement agencies, school districts, the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, and the general public regarding missing children and endangered persons. The information shall include pictures, bulletins, training sessions, reports, and biographical materials that will assist in local law enforcement efforts to locate missing children and endangered persons. The state patrol shall also maintain a regularly updated computerized link with national and other statewide missing person systems or clearinghouses, and within existing resources, shall develop and implement a plan, commonly known as an "amber alert plan" or an "endangered missing person advisory plan" which includes a "silver alert" designation for voluntary cooperation between local, state, tribal, and other law enforcement agencies, state government agencies, radio and television stations, cable and satellite systems, and social media pages and sites to enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering abducted children and missing endangered persons consistent with the state endangered missing person advisory plan.

(2) For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) "Child" or "children" means an individual under eighteen years of age.

(b) "Missing endangered person" means a person who is believed to be in danger because of age, health, mental or physical disability, in combination with environmental or weather conditions, or is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance and who is:

(i) A person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(ii) A vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020(((17))); or

(iii) A person who has been diagnosed as having Alzheimer's disease or other age-related dementia.

(c) "Silver alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing endangered person age sixty or older.

Sec. 316. RCW 13.60.040 and 1999 c 267 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall develop a procedure for reporting missing children information to the missing children clearinghouse on children who are receiving departmental services in each of its administrative regions. The purpose of this procedure is to link parents to missing children. When the department has obtained information that a minor child has been located at a facility funded by the department, the department shall notify the clearinghouse and the child's legal custodian, advising the custodian of the child's whereabouts or that the child is subject to a dependency action. The department shall inform the clearinghouse when reunification occurs.

Sec. 317. RCW 13.64.030 and 1993 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The petitioner shall serve a copy of the filed petition and notice of hearing on the petitioner's parent or parents, guardian, or custodian at least fifteen days before the emancipation hearing. No summons shall be required. Service shall be waived if proof is made to the court that the address of the parent or parents, guardian, or custodian is unavailable or unascertainable. The petitioner shall also serve notice of the hearing on the department of children, youth, and families if the petitioner is subject to dependency disposition order under RCW 13.34.130. The hearing shall be held no later than sixty days after the date on which the petition is filed.

Sec. 318. RCW 13.64.050 and 1993 c 294 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The court shall grant the petition for emancipation, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if the petitioner proves the following facts by clear and convincing evidence: (a) That the petitioner is sixteen years of age or older; (b) that the petitioner is a resident of the state; (c) that the petitioner has the ability to manage his or her financial affairs; and (d) that the petitioner has the ability to manage his or her personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs.

(2) A parent, guardian, custodian, or in the case of a dependent minor, the department of children, youth, and families, may oppose the petition for emancipation. The court shall deny the petition unless it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that denial of the grant of emancipation would be detrimental to the interests of the minor.

(3) Upon entry of a decree of emancipation by the court the petitioner shall be given a certified copy of the decree. The decree shall instruct the petitioner to obtain a Washington driver's license or a Washington identification card and direct the department of licensing make a notation of the emancipated status on the license or identification card.

Sec. 319. RCW 26.33.020 and 1993 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Alleged father" means a person whose parent-child relationship has not been terminated, who is not a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW, and who alleges himself or whom a party alleges to be the father of the child. It includes a person whose marriage to the mother was terminated more than three hundred days before the birth of the child or who was separated from the mother more than three hundred days before the birth of the child.

(2) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.

(3) "Adoptee" means a person who is to be adopted or who has been adopted.

(4) "Adoptive parent" means the person or persons who seek to adopt or have adopted an adoptee.

(5) "Court" means the superior court.

(6) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(7) "Agency" means any public or private association, corporation, or individual licensed or certified by the department as a child-placing agency under chapter 74.15 RCW or as an adoption agency.

(8) "Parent" means the natural or adoptive mother or father of a child, including a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW. It does not include any person whose parent-child relationship has been terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(9) "Legal guardian" means the department, an agency, or a person, other than a parent or stepparent, appointed by the court to promote the child's general welfare, with the authority and duty to make decisions affecting the child's development.

(10) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, not related to a party to the action, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a party who is under a legal disability.

(11) "Relinquish or relinquishment" means the voluntary surrender of custody of a child to the department, an agency, or prospective adoptive parents.

(12) "Individual approved by the court" or "qualified salaried court employee" means a person who has a master's degree in social work or a related field and one year of experience in social work, or a bachelor's degree and two years of experience in social work, and includes a person not having such qualifications only if the court makes specific findings of fact that are entered of record establishing that the person has reasonably equivalent experience.

(13) "Birth parent" means the biological mother or biological or alleged father of a child, including a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW, whether or not any such person's parent-child relationship has been terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction. "Birth parent" does not include a biological mother or biological or alleged father, including a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW, if the parent-child relationship was terminated because of an act for which the person was found guilty under chapter 9A.42 or 9A.44 RCW.

(14) "Nonidentifying information" includes, but is not limited to, the following information about the birth parents, adoptive parents, and adoptee:

(a) Age in years at the time of adoption;

(b) Heritage, including nationality, ethnic background, and race;

(c) Education, including number of years of school completed at the time of adoption, but not name or location of school;

(d) General physical appearance, including height, weight, color of hair, eyes, and skin, or other information of a similar nature;

(e) Religion;

(f) Occupation, but not specific titles or places of employment;

(g) Talents, hobbies, and special interests;

(h) Circumstances leading to the adoption;

(i) Medical and genetic history of birth parents;

(j) First names;

(k) Other children of birth parents by age, sex, and medical history;

(l) Extended family of birth parents by age, sex, and medical history;

(m) The fact of the death, and age and cause, if known;

(n) Photographs;

(o) Name of agency or individual that facilitated the adoption.

Sec. 320. RCW 26.33.345 and 2013 c 321 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of social and health services)), adoption agencies, and independent adoption facilitators shall release the name and location of the court where a relinquishment of parental rights or finalization of an adoption took place to an adult adoptee, a birth parent of an adult adoptee, an adoptive parent, a birth or adoptive grandparent of an adult adoptee, or an adult sibling of an adult adoptee, or the legal guardian of any of these.

(2) The department of health shall make available a noncertified copy of the original birth certificate of a child to the child's birth parents upon request.

(3)(a) For adoptions finalized after October 1, 1993, the department of health shall provide a noncertified copy of the original birth certificate to an adoptee eighteen years of age or older upon request, unless the birth parent has filed an affidavit of nondisclosure before July 28, 2013, or a contact preference form that indicates he or she does not want the original birth certificate released: PROVIDED, That the affidavit of nondisclosure, the contact preference form, or both have not expired.

(b) For adoptions finalized on or before October 1, 1993, the department of health may not provide a noncertified copy of the original birth certificate to the adoptee until after June 30, 2014. After June 30, 2014, the department of health shall provide a noncertified copy of the original birth certificate to an adoptee eighteen years of age or older upon request, unless the birth parent has filed a contact preference form that indicates he or she does not want the original birth certificate released: PROVIDED, That the contact preference form has not expired.

(c) An affidavit of nondisclosure expires upon the death of the birth parent.

(4)(a) Regardless of whether a birth parent has filed an affidavit of nondisclosure or when the adoption was finalized, a birth parent may at any time complete a contact preference form stating his or her preference about personal contact with the adoptee, which, if available, must accompany an original birth certificate provided to an adoptee under subsection (3) of this section.

(b) The contact preference form must include the following options:

(i) I would like to be contacted. I give the department of health consent to provide the adoptee with a noncertified copy of his or her original birth certificate;

(ii) I would like to be contacted only through a confidential intermediary as described in RCW 26.33.343. I give the department of health consent to provide the adoptee with a noncertified copy of his or her original birth certificate;

(iii) I prefer not to be contacted and have completed the birth parent updated medical history form. I give the department of health consent to provide the adoptee with a noncertified copy of his or her original birth certificate; and

(iv) I prefer not to be contacted and have completed the birth parent updated medical history form. I do not want a noncertified copy of the original birth certificate released to the adoptee.

(c) If the birth parent indicates he or she prefers not to be contacted, personally identifying information on the contact preference form must be kept confidential and may not be released.

(d) Nothing in this section precludes a birth parent from subsequently filing another contact preference form to rescind the previous contact preference form and state a different preference.

(e) A contact preference form expires upon the death of the birth parent.

(5) If a birth parent files a contact preference form, the birth parent must also file an updated medical history form with the department of health. Upon request of the adoptee, the department of health must provide the adoptee with the updated medical history form filed by the adoptee's birth parent.

(6) Both a completed contact preference form and birth parent updated medical history form are confidential and must be placed in the adoptee's sealed file.

(7) If a birth parent files a contact preference form within six months after the first time an adoptee requests a copy of his or her original birth certificate as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department of health must forward the contact preference form and the birth parent updated medical history form to the address of the adoptee.

(8) The department of health may charge a fee not to exceed twenty dollars for providing a noncertified copy of a birth certificate to an adoptee.

(9) The department of health must create the contact preference form and an updated medical history form. The contact preference form must provide a method to ensure personally identifying information can be kept confidential. The updated medical history form may not require the birth parent to disclose any identifying information about the birth parent.

(10) If the department of health does not provide an adoptee with a noncertified copy of the original birth certificate because a valid affidavit of nondisclosure or contact preference form has been filed, the adoptee may request, no more than once per year, that the department of health attempt to determine if the birth parent is deceased. Upon request of the adoptee, the department of health must make a reasonable effort to search public records that are accessible and already available to the department of health to determine if the birth parent is deceased. The department of health may charge the adoptee a reasonable fee to cover the cost of conducting a search.

Sec. 321. RCW 26.44.020 and 2012 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.

(2) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of eighteen years of age.

(3) "Child protective services" means those services provided by the department designed to protect children from child abuse and neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports. Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.

(4) "Child protective services section" means the child protective services section of the department.

(5) "Children's advocacy center" means a child-focused facility in good standing with the state chapter for children's advocacy centers and that coordinates a multidisciplinary process for the investigation, prosecution, and treatment of sexual and other types of child abuse. Children's advocacy centers provide a location for forensic interviews and coordinate access to services such as, but not limited to, medical evaluations, advocacy, therapy, and case review by multidisciplinary teams within the context of county protocols as defined in RCW 26.44.180 and 26.44.185.

(6) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister, priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(7) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington, juvenile department.

(8) "Department" means the ((state)) department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(9) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent maltreatment.

(10) "Family assessment response" means a way of responding to certain reports of child abuse or neglect made under this chapter using a differential response approach to child protective services. The family assessment response shall focus on the safety of the child, the integrity and preservation of the family, and shall assess the status of the child and the family in terms of risk of abuse and neglect including the parent's or guardian's or other caretaker's capacity and willingness to protect the child and, if necessary, plan and arrange the provision of services to reduce the risk and otherwise support the family. No one is named as a perpetrator, and no investigative finding is entered in the record as a result of a family assessment.

(11) "Founded" means the determination following an investigation by the department that, based on available information, it is more likely than not that child abuse or neglect did occur.

(12) "Inconclusive" means the determination following an investigation by the department of social and health services, prior to October 1, 2008, that based on available information a decision cannot be made that more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did or did not occur.

(13) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care.

(14) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety, or the office of the sheriff.

(15) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an intent, wish, or design to intimidate, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.

(16) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment in and of itself.

(17) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(18) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner. A person who is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.

(19) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility personnel, and school nurses.

(20) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(21) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child abuse or neglect that the department has determined does not rise to the level of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred for investigation.

(22) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b) allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any person.

(23) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.

(24) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of children, or providing social services to adults or families, including mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(25) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090 or an Indian tribe under RCW 74.15.190 that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide child welfare services.

(26) "Unfounded" means the determination following an investigation by the department that available information indicates that, more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur, or that there is insufficient evidence for the department to determine whether the alleged child abuse did or did not occur.

Sec. 322. RCW 26.44.030 and 2016 c 166 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner, law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist, employee of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee of the department of social and health services, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, state family and children's ombuds or any volunteer in the ombuds's office, or host home program has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.

Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to report under (a) of this subsection.

For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain, whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.

(ii) "Organization" includes a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, association, financial institution, governmental entity, other than the federal government, and any other individual or group engaged in a trade, occupation, enterprise, governmental function, charitable function, or similar activity in this state whether or not the entity is operated as a nonprofit or for-profit entity.

(iii) "Reasonable cause" means a person witnesses or receives a credible written or oral report alleging abuse, including sexual contact, or neglect of a child.

(iv) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing basis with regards to a particular person.

(v) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.44.010.

(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If, as a result of observations or information received in the course of his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or unconsciousness.

(e) The reporting requirement also applies to guardians ad litem, including court-appointed special advocates, appointed under Titles 11 and 13 RCW and this title, who in the course of their representation of children in these actions have reasonable cause to believe a child has been abused or neglected.

(f) The reporting requirement in (a) of this subsection also applies to administrative and academic or athletic department employees, including student employees, of institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and of private institutions of higher education.

(g) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must include the identity of the accused if known.

(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.

(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department ((of social and health services)) as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law enforcement agency, including military law enforcement, if appropriate. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within five days thereafter.

(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement agency.

(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of making the decision.

(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such planning and consultation with those persons required to report under this section if the department determines it is in the best interests of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not directly related to reports required by this section must not be divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.

(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home, the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a second physician, the department may make the selection. If a physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy parenting deficiencies.

(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7) of this section shall not further disseminate or release the information except as authorized by state or federal statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to learn the information required under this subsection, the department shall only investigate cases in which:

(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child;

(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or

(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of receipt of the referral.

(11)(a) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the department shall use one of the following discrete responses to reports of child abuse or neglect that are screened in and accepted for departmental response:

(i) Investigation; or

(ii) Family assessment.

(b) In making the response in (a) of this subsection the department shall:

(i) Use a method by which to assign cases to investigation or family assessment which are based on an array of factors that may include the presence of: Imminent danger, level of risk, number of previous child abuse or neglect reports, or other presenting case characteristics, such as the type of alleged maltreatment and the age of the alleged victim. Age of the alleged victim shall not be used as the sole criterion for determining case assignment;

(ii) Allow for a change in response assignment based on new information that alters risk or safety level;

(iii) Allow families assigned to family assessment to choose to receive an investigation rather than a family assessment;

(iv) Provide a full investigation if a family refuses the initial family assessment;

(v) Provide voluntary services to families based on the results of the initial family assessment. If a family refuses voluntary services, and the department cannot identify specific facts related to risk or safety that warrant assignment to investigation under this chapter, and there is not a history of reports of child abuse or neglect related to the family, then the department must close the family assessment response case. However, if at any time the department identifies risk or safety factors that warrant an investigation under this chapter, then the family assessment response case must be reassigned to investigation;

(vi) Conduct an investigation, and not a family assessment, in response to an allegation that, the department determines based on the intake assessment:

(A) Poses a risk of "imminent harm" consistent with the definition provided in RCW 13.34.050, which includes, but is not limited to, sexual abuse and sexual exploitation as defined in this chapter;

(B) Poses a serious threat of substantial harm to a child;

(C) Constitutes conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim;

(D) The child is an abandoned child as defined in RCW 13.34.030;

(E) The child is an adjudicated dependent child as defined in RCW 13.34.030, or the child is in a facility that is licensed, operated, or certified for care of children by the department under chapter 74.15 RCW((, or by the department of early learning)).

(c) The department may not be held civilly liable for the decision to respond to an allegation of child abuse or neglect by using the family assessment response under this section unless the state or its officers, agents, or employees acted with reckless disregard.

(12)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the date the report is received, unless the investigation is being conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.

(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall adopt the finding in its investigation.

(13) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are responded to through family assessment response, the department shall:

(a) Provide the family with a written explanation of the procedure for assessment of the child and the family and its purposes;

(b) Collaborate with the family to identify family strengths, resources, and service needs, and develop a service plan with the goal of reducing risk of harm to the child and improving or restoring family well-being;

(c) Complete the family assessment response within forty-five days of receiving the report; however, upon parental agreement, the family assessment response period may be extended up to ninety days;

(d) Offer services to the family in a manner that makes it clear that acceptance of the services is voluntary;

(e) Implement the family assessment response in a consistent and cooperative manner;

(f) Have the parent or guardian sign an agreement to participate in services before services are initiated that informs the parents of their rights under family assessment response, all of their options, and the options the department has if the parents do not sign the consent form.

(14)(a) In conducting an investigation or family assessment of alleged abuse or neglect, the department or law enforcement agency:

(i) May interview children. If the department determines that the response to the allegation will be family assessment response, the preferred practice is to request a parent's, guardian's, or custodian's permission to interview the child before conducting the child interview unless doing so would compromise the safety of the child or the integrity of the assessment. The interviews may be conducted on school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. If the allegation is investigated, parental notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation; and

(ii) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the possession of mandated reporters and their employees.

(b) The Washington state school directors' association shall adopt a model policy addressing protocols when an interview, as authorized by this subsection, is conducted on school premises. In formulating its policy, the association shall consult with the department and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(15) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and constitutes the third founded report received by the department within the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the department shall promptly notify the office of the family and children's ombuds of the contents of the report. The department shall also notify the ombuds of the disposition of the report.

(16) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized by state and federal law.

(17)(a) The department shall maintain investigation records and conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out nonabusive cases.

(b) In the family assessment response, the department shall not make a finding as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred. No one shall be named as a perpetrator and no investigative finding shall be entered in the department's child abuse or neglect database.

(18) The department shall use a risk assessment process when investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a risk factor.

(19) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is involved in the reporting.

(20) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW 13.34.030.

(21) The department shall make efforts as soon as practicable to determine the military status of parents whose children are subject to abuse or neglect allegations. If the department determines that a parent or guardian is in the military, the department shall notify a department of defense family advocacy program that there is an allegation of abuse and neglect that is screened in and open for investigation that relates to that military parent or guardian.

Sec. 323. RCW 26.44.040 and 1999 c 176 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

An immediate oral report must be made by telephone or otherwise to the proper law enforcement agency or the department ((of social and health services)) and, upon request, must be followed by a report in writing. Such reports must contain the following information, if known:

(1) The name, address, and age of the child;

(2) The name and address of the child's parents, stepparents, guardians, or other persons having custody of the child;

(3) The nature and extent of the alleged injury or injuries;

(4) The nature and extent of the alleged neglect;

(5) The nature and extent of the alleged sexual abuse;

(6) Any evidence of previous injuries, including their nature and extent; and

(7) Any other information that may be helpful in establishing the cause of the child's death, injury, or injuries and the identity of the alleged perpetrator or perpetrators.

Sec. 324. RCW 26.44.050 and 2012 c 259 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 26.44.030(11), upon the receipt of a report concerning the possible occurrence of abuse or neglect, the law enforcement agency or the department ((of social and health services)) must investigate and provide the protective services section with a report in accordance with chapter 74.13 RCW, and where necessary to refer such report to the court.

A law enforcement officer may take, or cause to be taken, a child into custody without a court order if there is probable cause to believe that the child is abused or neglected and that the child would be injured or could not be taken into custody if it were necessary to first obtain a court order pursuant to RCW 13.34.050. The law enforcement agency or the department ((of social and health services)) investigating such a report is hereby authorized to photograph such a child for the purpose of providing documentary evidence of the physical condition of the child.

Sec. 325. RCW 26.44.063 and 2008 c 267 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to minimize trauma to a child involved in an allegation of sexual or physical abuse. The legislature declares that removing the child from the home or the care of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian often has the effect of further traumatizing the child. It is, therefore, the legislature's intent that the alleged abuser, rather than the child, shall be removed or restrained from the child's residence and that this should be done at the earliest possible point of intervention in accordance with RCW 10.31.100, chapter 13.34 RCW, this section, and RCW 26.44.130.

(2) In any judicial proceeding in which it is alleged that a child has been subjected to sexual or physical abuse, if the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that an incident of sexual or physical abuse has occurred, the court may, on its own motion, or the motion of the guardian ad litem or other parties, issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction restraining or enjoining the person accused of committing the abuse from:

(a) Molesting or disturbing the peace of the alleged victim;

(b) Entering the family home of the alleged victim except as specifically authorized by the court;

(c) Having any contact with the alleged victim, except as specifically authorized by the court;

(d) Knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a specified location.

(3) If the caretaker is willing, and does comply with the duties prescribed in subsection (8) of this section, uncertainty by the caretaker that the alleged abuser has in fact abused the alleged victim shall not, alone, be a basis to remove the alleged victim from the caretaker, nor shall it be considered neglect.

(4) In issuing a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, the court may impose any additional restrictions that the court in its discretion determines are necessary to protect the child from further abuse or emotional trauma pending final resolution of the abuse allegations.

(5) The court shall issue a temporary restraining order prohibiting a person from entering the family home if the court finds that the order would eliminate the need for an out-of-home placement to protect the child's right to nurturance, health, and safety and is sufficient to protect the child from further sexual or physical abuse or coercion.

(6) The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to the party to be restrained or other parties only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until the time for responding has elapsed.

(7) A temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction:

(a) Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding; and

(b) May be revoked or modified.

(8) The person having physical custody of the child shall have an affirmative duty to assist in the enforcement of the restraining order including but not limited to a duty to notify the court as soon as practicable of any violation of the order, a duty to request the assistance of law enforcement officers to enforce the order, and a duty to notify the department ((of social and health services)) of any violation of the order as soon as practicable if the department is a party to the action. Failure by the custodial party to discharge these affirmative duties shall be subject to contempt proceedings.

(9) Willful violation of a court order entered under this section is a misdemeanor. A written order shall contain the court's directive and shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order with actual notice of its terms is a criminal offense under chapter 26.44 RCW, is also subject to contempt proceedings, and will subject a violator to arrest."

(10) If a restraining order issued under this section is modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec. 326. RCW 26.44.105 and 1985 c 183 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a dependency petition is filed by the department ((of social and health services)), it shall advise the parents, and any child over the age of twelve who is subject to the dependency action, of their respective rights under RCW 13.34.090. The parents and the child shall be provided a copy of the dependency petition and a copy of any court orders which have been issued. This advice of rights under RCW 13.34.090 shall be in writing. The department caseworker shall also make reasonable efforts to advise the parent and child of these same rights orally.

Sec. 327. RCW 26.44.140 and 1997 c 344 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The court shall require that an individual who, while acting in a parental role, has physically or sexually abused a child and has been removed from the home pursuant to a court order issued in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, prior to being permitted to reside in the home where the child resides, complete the treatment and education requirements necessary to protect the child from future abuse. The court may require the individual to continue treatment as a condition for remaining in the home where the child resides. Unless a parent, custodian, or guardian has been convicted of the crime for the acts of abuse determined in a fact-finding hearing under chapter 13.34 RCW, such person shall not be required to admit guilt in order to begin to fulfill any necessary treatment and education requirements under this section.

The department ((of social and health services)) or supervising agency shall be responsible for advising the court as to appropriate treatment and education requirements, providing referrals to the individual, monitoring and assessing the individual's progress, informing the court of such progress, and providing recommendations to the court.

The person removed from the home shall pay for these services unless the person is otherwise eligible to receive financial assistance in paying for such services. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create in any person an entitlement to services or financial assistance in paying for services.

Sec. 328. RCW 43.20A.360 and 2001 c 291 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary is hereby authorized to appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The secretary may appoint statewide committees or councils in the following subject areas: (a) Health facilities; (b) ((children and youth services; (c))) blind services; (((d))) (c) medical and health care; (((e))) (d) drug abuse and alcoholism; (((f))) (e) social services; (((g))) (f) economic services; (((h))) (g) vocational services; (((i))) (h) rehabilitative services; and (i) on such other subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities. The statewide councils shall have representation from both major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation. Such committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the secretary in his or her discretion may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall hold office for three years except in the case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve more than two consecutive terms.

(2) Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

Sec. 329. RCW 74.04.800 and 2007 c 384 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The secretary of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall review current department policies and assess the adequacy and availability of programs targeted at persons who receive services through the department who are the children and families of a person who is incarcerated in a department of corrections facility. Great attention shall be focused on programs and policies affecting foster youth who have a parent who is incarcerated.

(b) The secretary of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall adopt policies that encourage familial contact and engagement between inmates of the department of corrections facilities and their children with the goal of facilitating normal child development, while reducing recidivism and intergenerational incarceration. Programs and policies should take into consideration the children's need to maintain contact with his or her parent, the inmate's ability to develop plans to financially support their children, assist in reunification when appropriate, and encourage the improvement of parenting skills where needed. The programs and policies should also meet the needs of the child while the parent is incarcerated.

(2) The secretary of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall conduct the following activities to assist in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Gather information and data on the recipients of public assistance, or children in the care of the state under chapter 13.34 RCW, who are the children and families of inmates incarcerated in department of corrections facilities; and

(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory committee and report information obtained under this section to the advisory committee.

Sec. 330. RCW 26.34.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The "appropriate public authorities" as used in Article III of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall, with reference to this state, mean the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, and said agency shall receive and act with reference to notices required by said Article III.

Sec. 331. RCW 26.34.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in paragraph (a) of Article V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the phrase "appropriate authority in the receiving state" with reference to this state shall mean the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

Sec. 332. RCW 70.02.220 and 2013 c 200 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the identity of any person who has investigated, considered, or requested a test or treatment for a sexually transmitted disease, except as authorized by this section, RCW 70.02.210, or chapter 70.24 RCW.

(2) No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose information and records related to sexually transmitted diseases, except as authorized by this section, RCW 70.02.210, or chapter 70.24 RCW. A person may disclose information related to sexually transmitted diseases about a patient without the patient's authorization, to the extent a recipient needs to know the information, if the disclosure is to:

(a) The subject of the test or the subject's legal representative for health care decisions in accordance with RCW 7.70.065, with the exception of such a representative of a minor fourteen years of age or over and otherwise competent;

(b) The state public health officer as defined in RCW 70.24.017, a local public health officer, or the centers for disease control of the United States public health service in accordance with reporting requirements for a diagnosed case of a sexually transmitted disease;

(c) A health facility or health care provider that procures, processes, distributes, or uses: (i) A human body part, tissue, or blood from a deceased person with respect to medical information regarding that person; (ii) semen, including that was provided prior to March 23, 1988, for the purpose of artificial insemination; or (iii) blood specimens;

(d) Any state or local public health officer conducting an investigation pursuant to RCW 70.24.024, so long as the record was obtained by means of court-ordered HIV testing pursuant to RCW 70.24.340 or 70.24.024;

(e) A person allowed access to the record by a court order granted after application showing good cause therefor. In assessing good cause, the court shall weigh the public interest and the need for disclosure against the injury to the patient, to the physician-patient relationship, and to the treatment services. Upon the granting of the order, the court, in determining the extent to which any disclosure of all or any part of the record of any such test is necessary, shall impose appropriate safeguards against unauthorized disclosure. An order authorizing disclosure must: (i) Limit disclosure to those parts of the patient's record deemed essential to fulfill the objective for which the order was granted; (ii) limit disclosure to those persons whose need for information is the basis for the order; and (iii) include any other appropriate measures to keep disclosure to a minimum for the protection of the patient, the physician-patient relationship, and the treatment services;

(f) Persons who, because of their behavioral interaction with the infected individual, have been placed at risk for acquisition of a sexually transmitted disease, as provided in RCW 70.24.022, if the health officer or authorized representative believes that the exposed person was unaware that a risk of disease exposure existed and that the disclosure of the identity of the infected person is necessary;

(g) A law enforcement officer, firefighter, health care provider, health care facility staff person, department of correction's staff person, jail staff person, or other persons as defined by the board of health in rule pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(4), who has requested a test of a person whose bodily fluids he or she has been substantially exposed to, pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(4), if a state or local public health officer performs the test;

(h) Claims management personnel employed by or associated with an insurer, health care service contractor, health maintenance organization, self-funded health plan, state administered health care claims payer, or any other payer of health care claims where such disclosure is to be used solely for the prompt and accurate evaluation and payment of medical or related claims. Information released under this subsection must be confidential and may not be released or available to persons who are not involved in handling or determining medical claims payment; and

(i) A department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families worker, a child placing agency worker, or a guardian ad litem who is responsible for making or reviewing placement or case-planning decisions or recommendations to the court regarding a child, who is less than fourteen years of age, has a sexually transmitted disease, and is in the custody of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or a licensed child placing agency. This information may also be received by a person responsible for providing residential care for such a child when the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, or a licensed child placing agency determines that it is necessary for the provision of child care services.

(3) No person to whom the results of a test for a sexually transmitted disease have been disclosed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may disclose the test results to another person except as authorized by that subsection.

(4) The release of sexually transmitted disease information regarding an offender or detained person, except as provided in subsection (2)(d) of this section, is governed as follows:

(a) The sexually transmitted disease status of a department of corrections offender who has had a mandatory test conducted pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370 must be made available by department of corrections health care providers and local public health officers to the department of corrections health care administrator or infection control coordinator of the facility in which the offender is housed. The information made available to the health care administrator or the infection control coordinator under this subsection (4)(a) may be used only for disease prevention or control and for protection of the safety and security of the staff, offenders, and the public. The information may be submitted to transporting officers and receiving facilities, including facilities that are not under the department of corrections' jurisdiction according to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this subsection.

(b) The sexually transmitted disease status of a person detained in a jail who has had a mandatory test conducted pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370 must be made available by the local public health officer to a jail health care administrator or infection control coordinator. The information made available to a health care administrator under this subsection (4)(b) may be used only for disease prevention or control and for protection of the safety and security of the staff, offenders, detainees, and the public. The information may be submitted to transporting officers and receiving facilities according to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this subsection.

(c) Information regarding the sexually transmitted disease status of an offender or detained person is confidential and may be disclosed by a correctional health care administrator or infection control coordinator or local jail health care administrator or infection control coordinator only as necessary for disease prevention or control and for protection of the safety and security of the staff, offenders, and the public. Unauthorized disclosure of this information to any person may result in disciplinary action, in addition to the penalties prescribed in RCW 70.24.080 or any other penalties as may be prescribed by law.

(d) Notwithstanding the limitations on disclosure contained in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection, whenever any member of a jail staff or department of corrections staff has been substantially exposed to the bodily fluids of an offender or detained person, then the results of any tests conducted pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370, must be immediately disclosed to the staff person in accordance with the Washington Administrative Code rules governing employees' occupational exposure to blood-borne pathogens. Disclosure must be accompanied by appropriate counseling for the staff member, including information regarding follow-up testing and treatment. Disclosure must also include notice that subsequent disclosure of the information in violation of this chapter or use of the information to harass or discriminate against the offender or detainee may result in disciplinary action, in addition to the penalties prescribed in RCW 70.24.080, and imposition of other penalties prescribed by law.

(e) The staff member must also be informed whether the offender or detained person had any other communicable disease, as defined in RCW 72.09.251(3), when the staff person was substantially exposed to the offender's or detainee's bodily fluids.

(f) The test results of voluntary and anonymous HIV testing or HIV-related condition, as defined in RCW 70.24.017, may not be disclosed to a staff person except as provided in this section and RCW 70.02.050(1)(((e))) (d) and 70.24.340(4). A health care administrator or infection control coordinator may provide the staff member with information about how to obtain the offender's or detainee's test results under this section and RCW 70.02.050(1)(((e))) (d) and 70.24.340(4).

(5) The requirements of this section do not apply to the customary methods utilized for the exchange of medical information among health care providers in order to provide health care services to the patient, nor do they apply within health care facilities where there is a need for access to confidential medical information to fulfill professional duties.

(6) Upon request of the victim, disclosure of test results under this section to victims of sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW must be made if the result is negative or positive. The county prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim of the right to such disclosure. The disclosure must be accompanied by appropriate counseling, including information regarding follow-up testing.

(7) A person, including a health care facility or health care provider, shall disclose the identity of any person who has investigated, considered, or requested a test or treatment for a sexually transmitted disease and information and records related to sexually transmitted diseases to federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the extent the health care provider is required by law to report health care information; when needed to determine compliance with state or federal certification or registration rules or laws; or when needed to protect the public health. Any health care information obtained under this subsection is exempt from public inspection and copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 333. RCW 26.10.135 and 2003 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before granting any order regarding the custody of a child under this chapter, the court shall consult the judicial information system, if available, to determine the existence of any information and proceedings that are relevant to the placement of the child.

(2) Before entering a final order, the court shall:

(a) Direct the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families to release information as provided under RCW 13.50.100; and

(b) Require the petitioner to provide the results of an examination of state and national criminal identification data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal identification system as described in chapter 43.43 RCW for the petitioner and adult members of the petitioner's household.

Sec. 334. RCW 26.50.150 and 2010 c 274 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

Any program that provides domestic violence treatment to perpetrators of domestic violence must be certified by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and meet minimum standards for domestic violence treatment purposes. The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall adopt rules for standards of approval of domestic violence perpetrator programs. The treatment must meet the following minimum qualifications:

(1) All treatment must be based upon a full, complete clinical intake including but not limited to: Current and past violence history; a lethality risk assessment; history of treatment from past domestic violence perpetrator treatment programs; a complete diagnostic evaluation; a substance abuse assessment; criminal history; assessment of cultural issues, learning disabilities, literacy, and special language needs; and a treatment plan that adequately and appropriately addresses the treatment needs of the individual.

(2) To facilitate communication necessary for periodic safety checks and case monitoring, the program must require the perpetrator to sign the following releases:

(a) A release for the program to inform the victim and victim's community and legal advocates that the perpetrator is in treatment with the program, and to provide information, for safety purposes, to the victim and victim's community and legal advocates;

(b) A release to prior and current treatment agencies to provide information on the perpetrator to the program; and

(c) A release for the program to provide information on the perpetrator to relevant legal entities including: Lawyers, courts, parole, probation, child protective services, and child welfare services.

(3) Treatment must be for a minimum treatment period defined by the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families by rule. The weekly treatment sessions must be in a group unless there is a documented, clinical reason for another modality. Any other therapies, such as individual, marital, or family therapy, substance abuse evaluations or therapy, medication reviews, or psychiatric interviews, may be concomitant with the weekly group treatment sessions described in this section but not a substitute for it.

(4) The treatment must focus primarily on ending the violence, holding the perpetrator accountable for his or her violence, and changing his or her behavior. The treatment must be based on nonvictim-blaming strategies and philosophies and shall include education about the individual, family, and cultural dynamics of domestic violence. If the perpetrator or the victim has a minor child, treatment must specifically include education regarding the effects of domestic violence on children, such as the emotional impacts of domestic violence on children and the long-term consequences that exposure to incidents of domestic violence may have on children.

(5) Satisfactory completion of treatment must be contingent upon the perpetrator meeting specific criteria, defined by rule by the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, and not just upon the end of a certain period of time or a certain number of sessions.

(6) The program must have policies and procedures for dealing with reoffenses and noncompliance.

(7) All evaluation and treatment services must be provided by, or under the supervision of, qualified personnel.

(8) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may adopt rules and establish fees as necessary to implement this section.

(9) The department of children, youth, and families may conduct on-site monitoring visits as part of its plan for certifying domestic violence perpetrator programs and monitoring implementation of the rules adopted by the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families to determine compliance with the minimum qualifications for domestic violence perpetrator programs. The applicant or certified domestic violence perpetrator program shall cooperate fully with the department of children, youth, and families in the monitoring visit and provide all program and management records requested by the department of children, youth, and families to determine the program's compliance with the minimum certification qualifications and rules adopted by the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 335. RCW 26.50.160 and 2006 c 138 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

To prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different courts and to give courts needed information for issuance of orders, the judicial information system shall be available in each district, municipal, and superior court by July 1, 1997, and shall include a database containing the following information:

(1) The names of the parties and the cause number for every order of protection issued under this title, every sexual assault protection order issued under chapter 7.90 RCW, every criminal no-contact order issued under chapters 9A.46 and 10.99 RCW, every antiharassment order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, every dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every third-party custody action under chapter 26.10 RCW, every parentage action under chapter 26.26 RCW, every restraining order issued on behalf of an abused child or adult dependent person under chapter 26.44 RCW, every foreign protection order filed under chapter 26.52 RCW, and every order for protection of a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34 RCW. When a guardian or the department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families has petitioned for relief on behalf of an abused child, adult dependent person, or vulnerable adult, the name of the person on whose behalf relief was sought shall be included in the database as a party rather than the guardian or appropriate department;

(2) A criminal history of the parties; and

(3) Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in issuing orders under this chapter as determined by the judicial information system committee.

Sec. 336. RCW 74.09.510 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Medical assistance may be provided in accordance with eligibility requirements established by the authority, as defined in the social security Title XIX state plan for mandatory categorically needy persons and:

(1) Individuals who would be eligible for cash assistance except for their institutional status;

(2) Individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who would be eligible for medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent children and who are in (a) foster care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing facility or an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabilities, or (d) inpatient psychiatric facilities;

(3) Individuals who:

(a) Are under twenty-one years of age;

(b) On or after July 22, 2007, were in foster care under the legal responsibility of the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, or a federally recognized tribe located within the state; and

(c) On their eighteenth birthday, were in foster care under the legal responsibility of the department of children, youth, and families or a federally recognized tribe located within the state;

(4) Persons who are aged, blind, or disabled who: (a) Receive only a state supplement, or (b) would not be eligible for cash assistance if they were not institutionalized;

(5) Categorically eligible individuals who meet the income and resource requirements of the cash assistance programs;

(6) Individuals who are enrolled in managed health care systems, who have otherwise lost eligibility for medical assistance, but who have not completed a current six-month enrollment in a managed health care system, and who are eligible for federal financial participation under Title XIX of the social security act;

(7) Children and pregnant women allowed by federal statute for whom funding is appropriated;

(8) Working individuals with disabilities authorized under section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act for whom funding is appropriated;

(9) Other individuals eligible for medical services under RCW 74.09.700 for whom federal financial participation is available under Title XIX of the social security act;

(10) Persons allowed by section 1931 of the social security act for whom funding is appropriated; and

(11) Women who: (a) Are under sixty-five years of age; (b) have been screened for breast and cervical cancer under the national breast and cervical cancer early detection program administered by the department of health or tribal entity and have been identified as needing treatment for breast or cervical cancer; and (c) are not otherwise covered by health insurance. Medical assistance provided under this subsection is limited to the period during which the woman requires treatment for breast or cervical cancer, and is subject to any conditions or limitations specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

PART IV

TRANSFER OF CHILD WELFARE SERVICES

Sec. 401. RCW 74.13.020 and 2015 c 240 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((For purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Case management" means convening family meetings, developing, revising, and monitoring implementation of any case plan or individual service and safety plan, coordinating and monitoring services needed by the child and family, caseworker-child visits, family visits, and the assumption of court-related duties, excluding legal representation, including preparing court reports, attending judicial hearings and permanency hearings, and ensuring that the child is progressing toward permanency within state and federal mandates, including the Indian child welfare act.

(2) "Child" means:

(a) A person less than eighteen years of age; or

(b) A person age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(3) "Child protective services" has the same meaning as in RCW 26.44.020.

(4) "Child welfare services" means social services including voluntary and in-home services, out-of-home care, case management, and adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or substitute for, parental care and supervision for the purpose of:

(a) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect, abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;

(b) Protecting and caring for dependent, abused, or neglected children;

(c) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and assisting parents who are in conflict with their children, with services designed to resolve such conflicts;

(d) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;

(e) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or facilities.

"Child welfare services" does not include child protection services.

(5) "Committee" means the child welfare transformation design committee.

(6) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(7) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other support services the department is authorized to provide to foster children. These services include, but are not limited to, placement in licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs; independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or treatment.

(8) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent maltreatment.

(9) "Measurable effects" means a statistically significant change which occurs as a result of the service or services a supervising agency is assigned in a performance-based contract, in time periods established in the contract.

(10) "Medical condition" means, for the purposes of qualifying for extended foster care services, a physical or mental health condition as documented by any licensed health care provider regulated by a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040.

(11) "Nonminor dependent" means any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is participating in extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(12) "Out-of-home care services" means services provided after the shelter care hearing to or for children in out-of-home care, as that term is defined in RCW 13.34.030, and their families, including the recruitment, training, and management of foster parents, the recruitment of adoptive families, and the facilitation of the adoption process, family reunification, independent living, emergency shelter, residential group care, and foster care, including relative placement.

(13) "Performance-based contracting" means the structuring of all aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable outcomes. Contracts shall also include provisions that link the performance of the contractor to the level and timing of reimbursement.

(14) "Permanency services" means long-term services provided to secure a child's safety, permanency, and well-being, including foster care services, family reunification services, adoption services, and preparation for independent living services.

(15) "Primary prevention services" means services which are designed and delivered for the primary purpose of enhancing child and family well-being and are shown, by analysis of outcomes, to reduce the risk to the likelihood of the initial need for child welfare services.

(16) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.

(17) "Supervised independent living" includes, but is not limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings. Supervised independent living settings must be approved by the children's administration or the court.

(((17))) (18) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide case management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services, as defined in this section. This definition is applicable on or after December 30, 2015.

(((18))) (19) "Unsupervised" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.43.830.

(((19))) (20) "Voluntary placement agreement" means, for the purposes of extended foster care services, a written voluntary agreement between a nonminor dependent who agrees to submit to the care and authority of the department for the purposes of participating in the extended foster care program.

Sec. 402. RCW 74.13.025 and 1998 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county or group of counties may make application to the department ((of social and health services)) in the manner and form prescribed by the department to administer and provide the services established under RCW 13.32A.197. Any such application must include a plan or plans for providing such services to at-risk youth.

Sec. 403. RCW 74.13.039 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of social and health services)) shall maintain a toll-free hot line to assist parents of runaway children. The hot line shall provide parents with a complete description of their rights when dealing with their runaway child.

Sec. 404. RCW 74.13.062 and 2010 c 272 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall adopt rules consistent with federal regulations for the receipt and expenditure of federal funds and implement a subsidy program for eligible relatives appointed by the court as a guardian under RCW 13.36.050.

(2) For the purpose of licensing a relative seeking to be appointed as a guardian and eligible for a guardianship subsidy under this section, the department shall, on a case-by-case basis, and when determined to be in the best interests of the child:

(a) Waive nonsafety licensing standards; and

(b) Apply the list of disqualifying crimes in the adoption and safe families act, ((rather than the secretary's list of disqualifying crimes,)) unless doing so would compromise the child's safety, or would adversely affect the state's ability to continue to obtain federal funding for child welfare related functions.

(3) Relative guardianship subsidy agreements shall be designed to promote long-term permanency for the child, and may include provisions for periodic review of the subsidy amount and the needs of the child.

Sec. 405. RCW 74.13.1051 and 2016 c 71 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to proactively support foster youth to complete high school, enroll and complete postsecondary education, and successfully implement their own plans for their futures, the department, the student achievement council, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall enter into, or revise existing, memoranda of understanding that:

(a) Facilitate student referral, data and information exchange, agency roles and responsibilities, and cooperation and collaboration among state agencies and nongovernmental entities; and

(b) Effectuate the transfer of responsibilities from the department ((of social and health services)) to the office of the superintendent of public instruction with respect to the programs in RCW 28A.300.592, and from the department ((of social and health services)) to the student achievement council with respect to the program in RCW 28B.77.250 in a smooth, expedient, and coordinated fashion.

(2) The student achievement council and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a set of indicators relating to the outcomes provided in RCW 28A.300.590 and 28A.300.592 to provide consistent services for youth, facilitate transitions among contractors, and support outcome-driven contracts. The student achievement council and the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with nongovernmental contractors and the department to develop a list of the most critical indicators, establishing a common set of indicators to be used in the outcome-driven contracts in RCW 28A.300.590 and 28A.300.592. A list of these indicators must be included in the report provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) By November 1, 2017, and biannually thereafter, the department, the student achievement council, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the nongovernmental entities engaged in public-private partnerships shall submit a joint report to the governor and the appropriate education and human services committees of the legislature regarding each of these programs, individually, as well as the collective progress the state has made toward the following goals:

(a) To make Washington number one in the nation for foster care graduation rates;

(b) To make Washington number one in the nation for foster care enrollment in postsecondary education; and

(c) To make Washington number one in the nation for foster care postsecondary completion.

(4) The department, the student achievement council, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the nongovernmental entities engaged in public-private partnerships, shall also submit one report by November 1, 2018, to the governor and the appropriate education and human service committees of the legislature regarding the transfer of responsibilities from the department ((of social and health services)) to the office of the superintendent of public instruction with respect to the programs in RCW 28A.300.592, and from the department ((of social and health services)) to the student achievement council with respect to the program in RCW 28B.77.250 and whether these transfers have resulted in better coordinated services for youth.

Sec. 406. RCW 74.13.107 and 2013 c 332 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The child and family reinvestment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for improving outcomes related to: (a) Safely reducing entry into the foster care system and preventing reentry; (b) safely increasing reunifications; (c) achieving permanency for children unable to be reunified; and (d) improving outcomes for youth who will age out of the foster care system. Moneys may be expended for shared savings under performance-based contracts.

(2) Revenues to the child and family reinvestment account consist of: (a) Savings to the state general fund resulting from reductions in foster care caseloads and per capita costs, as calculated and transferred into the account under this section; and (b) any other public or private funds appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(3)(a) The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, in collaboration with the office of financial management and the caseload forecast council, shall develop a methodology for calculating the savings under this section. The methodology must be used for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, and for each biennium thereafter. The methodology must establish a baseline for calculating savings. ((In developing the methodology, the department of social and health services shall incorporate the relevant requirements of any demonstration waiver granted to the state under P.L. 112-34.)) The savings must be based on actual caseload and per capita expenditures.

(b) The caseload and the per capita expenditures for youth in extended foster care pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 and as determined under RCW 43.88C.010(9) shall not be included in the following:

(i) The calculation of savings transferred to the account; or

(ii) The capped allocation of the demonstration waiver granted to the state under P.L. 112-34.

(c) ((By December 1, 2012, the department of social and health services shall submit the proposed methodology to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The methodology is deemed approved unless the legislature enacts legislation to modify or reject the methodology.

(d))) The department ((of social and health services)) shall use the methodology established in (a) of this subsection to calculate savings to the state general fund for transfer into the child and family reinvestment account in fiscal year 2014 and each fiscal year thereafter. Savings calculated by the department under this section are not subject to RCW 43.79.460. The department shall report the amount of the state general fund savings achieved to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature at the end of each fiscal year. The office of financial management shall provide notice to the state treasurer of the amount of state general fund savings, as calculated by the department ((of social and health services)), for transfer into the child and family reinvestment account.

(((e))) (d) Nothing in this section prohibits (i) the caseload forecast council from forecasting the foster care caseload under RCW 43.88C.010 or (ii) the department from including maintenance funding in its budget submittal for caseload costs that exceed the baseline established in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 407. RCW 74.13.335 and 1999 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Within available funds and subject to such conditions and limitations as may be established by the department or by the legislature in the omnibus appropriations act, the department ((of social and health services)) shall reimburse foster parents for property damaged or destroyed by foster children placed in their care. The department shall establish by rule a maximum amount that may be reimbursed for each occurrence. The department shall reimburse the foster parent for the replacement value of any property covered by this section. If the damaged or destroyed property is covered and reimbursed under an insurance policy, the department shall reimburse foster parents for the amount of the deductible associated with the insurance claim, up to the limit per occurrence as established by the department.

Sec. 408. RCW 74.15.020 and 2016 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or maintenance outside their own homes, or which places, arranges the placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or placement of children for adoption, and shall include the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for services rendered:

(a) "Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;

(b) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the department is not a community facility;

(c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a temporary protective residential facility operated to perform the duties specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW ((74.13.032 through)) 43.185C.295, 43.185C.300, 43.185C.305, 43.185C.310, 74.13.035, and 74.13.036;

(d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be commonly known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis care for up to seventy-two hours to children who have been admitted by their parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency respite centers may operate for up to twenty-four hours a day, and for up to seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care for children ages birth through seventeen, and for persons eighteen through twenty with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a sibling or siblings through age seventeen. Emergency respite centers may not substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or any other services defined under this section, and may not substitute for services which are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;

(e) "Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly provides care on a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the family abode of the person or persons under whose direct care and supervision the child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental disability is placed;

(f) "Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group of children on a twenty-four hour basis;

(g) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary to provide temporary residential placement and other services to street youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the department and any additional days approved by the department must be based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter 13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;

(h) "Maternity service" means an agency which provides or arranges for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during confinement, or which provides care as needed to mothers and their infants after confinement;

(i) "Resource and assessment center" means an agency that provides short-term emergency and crisis care for a period up to seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays to children who have been removed from their parent's or guardian's care by child protective services or law enforcement;

(j) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by the secretary that provides residential and transitional living services to persons ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor. Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other placement alternative is available and the department approves the placement;

(k) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.

(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:

(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with developmental disability in the following ways:

(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;

(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;

(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection (2), even after the marriage is terminated;

(v) Relatives, as named in (a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection (2), of any half sibling of the child; or

(vi) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four-hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother, or persons with developmental disabilities;

(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or without compensation, where the parent and person providing care on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement in writing and the state is not providing any payment for the care;

(d) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or similar services to exchange students or international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of an exchange student in their home;

(e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or similar services to international children who have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria for medical care as established by the United States citizenship and immigration services, or persons who have the care of such an international child in their home;

(f) Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children and do not accept custody of children;

(g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;

(h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;

(i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;

(j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years prior to June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an endowment or trust fund;

(k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency or court or if a replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the placement has been approved by the court;

(l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal government or an agency licensed by an Indian tribe pursuant to RCW 74.15.190;

(m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile offenders operated by or under contract with the department;

(n) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter;

(o) A host home program, and host home, operated by a tax exempt organization for youth not in the care of or receiving services from the department, if that program: (i) Recruits and screens potential homes in the program, including performing background checks on individuals over the age of eighteen residing in the home through the Washington state patrol or equivalent law enforcement agency and performing physical inspections of the home; (ii) screens and provides case management services to youth in the program; (iii) obtains a notarized permission slip or limited power of attorney from the parent or legal guardian of the youth authorizing the youth to participate in the program and the authorization is updated every six months when a youth remains in a host home longer than six months; (iv) obtains insurance for the program through an insurance provider authorized under Title 48 RCW; (v) provides mandatory reporter and confidentiality training; and (vi) registers with the secretary of state as provided in RCW 24.03.550. A host home is a private home that volunteers to host youth in need of temporary placement that is associated with a host home program. Any host home program that receives local, state, or government funding shall report the following information to the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs annually by December 1st of each year: The number of children the program served, why the child was placed with a host home, and where the child went after leaving the host home, including but not limited to returning to the parents, running away, reaching the age of majority, or becoming a dependent of the state. A host home program shall not receive more than one hundred thousand dollars per year of public funding, including local, state, and federal funding. A host home shall not receive any local, state, or government funding.

(3) "Department" means the ((state)) department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(4) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department under RCW 13.40.185.

(5) "Performance-based contracts" or "contracting" means the structuring of all aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable outcomes. Contracts may also include provisions that link the performance of the contractor to the level and timing of the reimbursement.

(6) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.

(7) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care to be maintained by an agency.

(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of ((social and health services)) the department.

(9) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his or her legally authorized residence.

(10) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090 or an Indian tribe under RCW 74.15.190 that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide child welfare services.

(11) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the extent funds are available, the following:

(a) Educational services, including basic literacy and computational skills training, either in local alternative or public high schools or in a high school equivalency program that leads to obtaining a high school equivalency degree;

(b) Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational training or higher education, job readiness, job search assistance, and placement programs;

(c) Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money management, home management, consumer skills, parenting, health care, access to community resources, and transportation and housing options;

(d) Individual and group counseling; and

(e) Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local organizations such as the United States department of labor, employment and training administration programs including the workforce investment act which administers private industry councils and the job corps; vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.

Sec. 409. RCW 74.15.030 and 2014 c 104 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's duty:

(1) In consultation with the children's services advisory committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to designate categories of facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served, variations in the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant thereto;

(2) In consultation with the children's services advisory committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed.

The minimum requirements shall be limited to:

(a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a license;

(b) Obtaining background information and any out-of-state equivalent, to determine whether the applicant or service provider is disqualified and to determine the character, competence, and suitability of an agency, the agency's employees, volunteers, and other persons associated with an agency;

(c) Conducting background checks for those who will or may have unsupervised access to children((,)) or expectant mothers((, or individuals with a developmental disability)); however, a background check is not required if a caregiver approves an activity pursuant to the prudent parent standard contained in RCW 74.13.710;

(d) Obtaining child protective services information or records maintained in the department case management information system. No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed under this chapter;

(e) Submitting a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol under chapter 10.97 RCW and through the federal bureau of investigation for:

(i) Agencies and their staff, volunteers, students, and interns when the agency is seeking license or relicense;

(ii) Foster care and adoption placements; and

(iii) Any adult living in a home where a child may be placed;

(f) If any adult living in the home has not resided in the state of Washington for the preceding five years, the department shall review any child abuse and neglect registries maintained by any state where the adult has resided over the preceding five years;

(g) The cost of fingerprint background check fees will be paid as required in RCW 43.43.837;

(h) National and state background information must be used solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for children or expectant mothers;

(i) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of care and treatment for which an agency seeks a license;

(j) The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises to provide for the comfort, care and well-being of children((,)) or expectant mothers ((or developmentally disabled persons));

(k) The provision of necessary care, including food, clothing, supervision and discipline; physical, mental and social well-being; and educational, recreational and spiritual opportunities for those served;

(l) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum requirements established pursuant to this chapter (( 74.15 RCW)) and RCW 74.13.031; and

(m) The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission, progress, health and discharge of persons served;

(3) To investigate any person, including relatives by blood or marriage except for parents, for character, suitability, and competence in the care and treatment of children((,)) or expectant mothers((, and developmentally disabled persons)) prior to authorizing that person to care for children((,)) or expectant mothers((, and developmentally disabled persons)). However, if a child is placed with a relative under RCW 13.34.065 or 13.34.130, and if such relative appears otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment the criminal history background check required by this section need not be completed before placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after placement;

(4) On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate agencies in accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care centers and family day-care homes, to determine whether the alleged abuse or neglect has occurred, and whether child protective services or referral to a law enforcement agency is appropriate;

(5) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this chapter (( 74.15 RCW)) and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the category of care which an agency is authorized to render and the ages, sex and number of persons to be served;

(6) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter (( 74.15 RCW)) and RCW 74.13.031 and to require regular reports from each licensee;

(7) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not there is compliance with this chapter (( 74.15 RCW)) and RCW 74.13.031 and the requirements adopted hereunder;

(8) To review requirements adopted hereunder at least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation with affected groups for child day-care requirements and with the children's services advisory committee for requirements for other agencies; and

(9) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help them improve their methods and facilities for the care of children((,)) or expectant mothers ((and developmentally disabled persons)).

Sec. 410. RCW 74.15.060 and 1991 c 3 s 376 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of health shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty:

In consultation with the children's services advisory committee and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to develop minimum requirements pertaining to each category of agency established pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031, necessary to promote the health of all persons residing therein.

The secretary of health or the city, county, or district health department designated by the secretary shall have the power and the duty:

(1) To make or cause to be made such inspections and investigations of agencies as may be deemed necessary; and

(2) To issue to applicants for licenses hereunder who comply with the requirements adopted hereunder, a certificate of compliance, a copy of which shall be presented to the department ((of social and health services)) before a license shall be issued, except that ((a provisional)) an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW 74.15.120.

Sec. 411. RCW 74.15.070 and 1979 c 141 s 358 are each amended to read as follows:

A copy of the articles of incorporation of any agency or amendments to the articles of existing corporation agencies shall be sent by the secretary of state to the department ((of social and health services)) at the time such articles or amendments are filed.

Sec. 412. RCW 74.15.080 and 1995 c 369 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

All agencies subject to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 shall accord the department ((of social and health services)), the secretary of health, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and the director of fire protection, or their designees, the right of entrance and the privilege of access to and inspection of records for the purpose of determining whether or not there is compliance with the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the requirements adopted thereunder.

Sec. 413. RCW 74.15.120 and 1995 c 311 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary ((of social and health services)) may, at his or her discretion, issue an initial license instead of a full license, to an agency or facility for a period not to exceed six months, renewable for a period not to exceed two years, to allow such agency or facility reasonable time to become eligible for full license. An initial license shall not be granted to any foster-family home except as specified in this section. An initial license may be granted to a foster-family home only if the following three conditions are met: (1) The license is limited so that the licensee is authorized to provide care only to a specific child or specific children; (2) the department has determined that the licensee has a relationship with the child, and the child is comfortable with the licensee, or that it would otherwise be in the child's best interest to remain or be placed in the licensee's home; and (3) the initial license is issued for a period not to exceed ninety days.

Sec. 414. RCW 74.15.134 and 1997 c 58 s 858 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department ((of social and health services)) as a person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the secretary's receipt of a release issued by the department ((of social and health services)) stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 415. RCW 74.15.200 and 1987 c 489 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of social and health services)) shall have primary responsibility for providing child abuse and neglect prevention training to parents and licensed child day care providers of preschool age children participating in day care programs meeting the requirements of chapter 74.15 RCW. The department may limit training under this section to trainers' workshops and curriculum development using existing resources.

Sec. 416. RCW 74.15.901 and 1999 c 267 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of social and health services shall seek any necessary federal waivers for federal funding of the programs created under sections 10 through 26, chapter 267, Laws of 1999. The department shall pursue federal funding sources for the programs created under sections 10 through 26, chapter 267, Laws of 1999, and report to the legislature any statutory barriers to federal funding.

(2) The department of children, youth, and families shall seek any necessary federal waivers for federal funding of the programs created under sections 10 through 26, chapter 267, Laws of 1999. The department shall pursue federal funding sources for the programs created under sections 10 through 26, chapter 267, Laws of 1999, and report to the legislature any statutory barriers to federal funding.

Sec. 417. RCW 13.32A.030 and 2013 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any person under circumstances that indicate the child's health, welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.

(2) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center, or his or her designee.

(3) "At-risk youth" means a juvenile:

(a) Who is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive hours without consent of his or her parent;

(b) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; or

(c) Who has a substance abuse problem for which there are no pending criminal charges related to the substance abuse.

(4) "Child," "juvenile," "youth," and "minor" mean any unemancipated individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.

(5) "Child in need of services" means a juvenile:

(a) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person;

(b) Who has been reported to law enforcement as absent without consent for at least twenty-four consecutive hours on two or more separate occasions from the home of either parent, a crisis residential center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement; and

(i) Has exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or

(ii) Has exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person;

(c)(i) Who is in need of: (A) Necessary services, including food, shelter, health care, clothing, or education; or (B) services designed to maintain or reunite the family;

(ii) Who lacks access to, or has declined to use, these services; and

(iii) Whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful efforts to maintain the family structure or are unable or unwilling to continue efforts to maintain the family structure; or

(d) Who is a "sexually exploited child."

(6) "Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department seeking adjudication of placement of the child.

(7) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.

(8) "Custodian" means the person or entity that has the legal right to custody of the child.

(9) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(10) "Extended family member" means an adult who is a grandparent, brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first cousin with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable, and who is willing and available to care for the child.

(11) "Guardian" means the person or agency that (a) has been appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(12) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide assistance and support to a child who is an at-risk youth or a child in need of services and his or her parent. The team must include the parent, a department caseworker, a local government representative when authorized by the local government, and when appropriate, members from the mental health and substance abuse disciplines. The team may also include, but is not limited to, the following persons: Educators, law enforcement personnel, probation officers, employers, church persons, tribal members, therapists, medical personnel, social service providers, placement providers, and extended family members. The team members must be volunteers who do not receive compensation while acting in a capacity as a team member, unless the member's employer chooses to provide compensation or the member is a state employee.

(13) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(14) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right to custody of the child. "Parent" includes custodian or guardian.

(15) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving without permission of the facility staff.

(16) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility, including but not limited to crisis residential centers or specialized foster family homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the department, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator, where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave, his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her return to the center.

(17) "Sexually exploited child" means any person under the age of eighteen who is a victim of the crime of commercial sex abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.100, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.102.

(18) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care facility licensed under rules adopted by the department with a ratio of at least one adult staff member to every two children.

(19) "Temporary out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home placement of not more than fourteen days ordered by the court at a fact-finding hearing on a child in need of services petition.

Sec. 418. RCW 13.32A.178 and 2001 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of social and health services)) shall promulgate rules that create good cause exceptions to the establishment and enforcement of child support from parents of children in out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 or 13.32A RCW that do not violate federal funding requirements. ((The department shall present the rules and the department's plan for implementation of the rules to the appropriate committees of the legislature prior to the 2002 legislative session.))

Sec. 419. RCW 13.36.020 and 2010 c 272 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child" means any individual under the age of eighteen years.

(2) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(3) "Dependent child" means a child who has been found by a court to be dependent in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(4) "Guardian" means a person who: (a) Has been appointed by the court as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding under this chapter; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to court order. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW for the purpose of assisting the court in supervising the dependency.

(5) "Relative" means a person related to the child in the following ways: (a) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great; (b) stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister; (c) a person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law; (d) spouses of any persons named in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, even after the marriage is terminated; (e) relatives, as named in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection, of any half sibling of the child; or (f) extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(6) "Suitable person" means a nonrelative with whom the child or the child's family has a preexisting relationship; who has completed all required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to be suitable and competent to provide care for the child; and with whom the child has been placed pursuant to RCW 13.34.130.

(7) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide case management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020.

PART V

TRANSFER OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES

Sec. 501. RCW 74.13A.075 and 2013 c 23 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080 the following definitions shall apply:

(1) (("Secretary")) "Department" means the ((secretary of the)) department of ((social and health services or his or her designee)) children, youth, and families.

(2) (("Department")) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department ((of social and health services)).

Sec. 502. RCW 74.13A.060 and 1990 c 285 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary may authorize the payment, from the appropriations available from the general fund, of all or part of the nonrecurring adoption expenses incurred by a prospective parent. "Nonrecurring adoption expenses" means those expenses incurred by a prospective parent in connection with the adoption of a difficult to place child including, but not limited to, attorneys' fees, court costs, and agency fees. Payment shall be made in accordance with rules adopted by the department.

((This section shall have retroactive application to January 1, 1987. For purposes of retroactive application, the secretary may provide reimbursement to any parent who adopted a difficult to place child between January 1, 1987, and one year following June 7, 1990, regardless of whether the parent had previously entered into an adoption support agreement with the department.))

Sec. 503. RCW 74.13A.085 and 1997 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of social and health services)) shall establish, within funds appropriated for the purpose, a reconsideration program to provide medical and counseling services through the adoption support program for children of families who apply for services after the adoption is final. Families requesting services through the program shall provide any information requested by the department for the purpose of processing the family's application for services.

(2) A child meeting the eligibility criteria for registration with the program is one who:

(a) Was residing in a preadoptive placement funded by the department or in foster care funded by the department immediately prior to the adoptive placement;

(b) Had a physical or mental handicap or emotional disturbance that existed and was documented prior to the adoption or was at high risk of future physical or mental handicap or emotional disturbance as a result of conditions exposed to prior to the adoption; and

(c) Resides in the state of Washington with an adoptive parent who lacks the necessary financial means to care for the child's special need.

(3) If a family is accepted for registration and meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section, the department may enter into an agreement for services. Prior to entering into an agreement for services through the program, the medical needs of the child must be reviewed and approved by the department.

(4) Any services provided pursuant to an agreement between a family and the department shall be met from the department's medical program. Such services shall be limited to:

(a) Services provided after finalization of an agreement between a family and the department pursuant to this section;

(b) Services not covered by the family's insurance or other available assistance; and

(c) Services related to the eligible child's identified physical or mental handicap or emotional disturbance that existed prior to the adoption.

(5) Any payment by the department for services provided pursuant to an agreement shall be made directly to the physician or provider of services according to the department's established procedures.

(6) The total costs payable by the department for services provided pursuant to an agreement shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars per child.

Sec. 504. RCW 74.13B.005 and 2012 c 205 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The state of Washington and several Indian tribes in the state of Washington assume legal responsibility for abused or neglected children when their parents or caregivers are unable or unwilling to adequately provide for their safety, health, and welfare;

(b) Washington state has a strong history of partnership between the department ((of social and health services)) and contracted service providers who currently serve children and families in the child welfare system. The department and its contracted service providers have responsibility for providing services to address parenting deficiencies resulting in child maltreatment, and the needs of children impacted by maltreatment;

(c) Department caseworkers and contracted service providers each play a critical and complementary role in the child welfare system;

(d) The current system of contracting for services needed by children and families in the child welfare system is fragmented, inflexible, and lacks incentives for improving outcomes for children and families.

(2) The legislature intends:

(a) To reform the delivery of certain services to children and families in the child welfare system by creating a flexible, accountable community-based system of care that utilizes performance-based contracting, maximizes the use of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices, and expands the capacity of community-based agencies to leverage local funding and other resources to benefit children and families served by the department;

(b) To achieve improved child safety, child permanency, including reunification, and child well-being outcomes through the collaborative efforts of the department and contracted service providers and the prioritization of these goals in performance-based contracting; and

(c) To implement performance-based contracting under chapter 205, Laws of 2012 in a manner that supports and complies with the federal and Washington state Indian child welfare act.

Sec. 505. RCW 74.13B.010 and 2012 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Case management" means convening family meetings, developing, revising, and monitoring implementation of any case plan or individual service and safety plan, coordinating and monitoring services needed by the child and family, caseworker-child visits, family visits, and the assumption of court-related duties, excluding legal representation, including preparing court reports, attending judicial hearings and permanency hearings, and ensuring that the child is progressing toward permanency within state and federal mandates, including the Indian child welfare act.

(2) "Child" means:

(a) A person less than eighteen years of age; or

(b) A person age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(3) "Child-placing agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.15.020.

(4) "Child welfare services" means social services including voluntary and in-home services, out-of-home care, case management, and adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or substitute for, parental care and supervision for the purpose of:

(a) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect, abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;

(b) Protecting and caring for dependent, abused, or neglected children;

(c) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and assisting parents who are in conflict with their children, with services designed to resolve such conflicts;

(d) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;

(e) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or facilities.

(5) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(6) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that is cost-effective and includes at least two randomized or statistically controlled evaluations that have demonstrated improved outcomes for its intended population.

(7) "Network administrator" means an entity that contracts with the department to provide defined services to children and families in the child welfare system through its provider network, as provided in RCW 74.13B.020.

(8) "Performance-based contracting" means structuring all aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable outcomes and linking payment for services to contractor performance.

(9) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents, based upon preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice.

(10) "Provider network" means those service providers who contract with a network administrator to provide services to children and families in the geographic area served by the network administrator.

(11) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.

Sec. 506. RCW 74.14B.010 and 2013 c 254 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Caseworkers employed in children services shall meet minimum standards established by the department ((of social and health services)). Comprehensive training for caseworkers shall be completed before such caseworkers are assigned to case-carrying responsibilities without direct supervision. Intermittent, part-time, and standby workers shall be subject to the same minimum standards and training.

(2) Ongoing specialized training shall be provided for persons responsible for investigating child sexual abuse. Training participants shall have the opportunity to practice interview skills and receive feedback from instructors.

(3) The department, the criminal justice training commission, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys shall design and implement statewide training that contains consistent elements for persons engaged in the interviewing of children, including law enforcement, prosecution, and child protective services.

(4) The training shall: (a) Be based on research-based practices and standards; (b) minimize the trauma of all persons who are interviewed during abuse investigations; (c) provide methods of reducing the number of investigative interviews necessary whenever possible; (d) assure, to the extent possible, that investigative interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; (e) recognize needs of special populations, such as persons with developmental disabilities; (f) recognize the nature and consequences of victimization; (g) require investigative interviews to be conducted in a manner most likely to permit the interviewed persons the maximum emotional comfort under the circumstances; (h) address record retention and retrieval; and (i) documentation of investigative interviews.

(5) The identification of domestic violence is critical in ensuring the safety of children in the child welfare system. As a result, ongoing domestic violence training and consultation shall be provided to caseworkers, including how to use the children's administration's practice guide to domestic violence.

Sec. 507. RCW 74.14B.050 and 1987 c 503 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of social and health services)) shall inform victims of child abuse and neglect and their families of the availability of state-supported counseling through the crime victims' compensation program, community mental health centers, domestic violence and sexual assault programs, and other related programs. The department shall assist victims with referrals to these services.

Sec. 508. RCW 74.14B.070 and 1990 c 3 s 1403 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of social and health services)) through its division of children and family services shall, subject to available funds, establish a system of early identification and referral to treatment of child victims of sexual assault or sexual abuse. The system shall include schools, physicians, sexual assault centers, domestic violence centers, child protective services, and foster parents. A mechanism shall be developed to identify communities that have experienced success in this area and share their expertise and methodology with other communities statewide.

Sec. 509. RCW 74.14B.080 and 1991 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the secretary ((of social and health services)) shall provide liability insurance to foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW. The coverage shall be for personal injury and property damage caused by foster parents or foster children that occurred while the children were in foster care. Such insurance shall cover acts of ordinary negligence but shall not cover illegal conduct or bad faith acts taken by foster parents in providing foster care. Moneys paid from liability insurance for any claim are limited to the amount by which the claim exceeds the amount available to the claimant from any valid and collectible liability insurance.

(2) The secretary ((of social and health services)) may purchase the insurance required in subsection (1) of this section or may choose a self-insurance method. The total moneys expended pursuant to this authorization shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars per biennium. If the secretary elects a method of self-insurance, the expenditure shall include all administrative and staff costs. If the secretary elects a method of self-insurance, he or she may, by rule, place a limit on the maximum amount to be paid on each claim.

(3) Nothing in this section or RCW 4.24.590 is intended to modify the foster parent reimbursement plan in place on July 1, 1991.

(4) The liability insurance program shall be available by July 1, 1991.

Sec. 510. RCW 74.14C.005 and 1995 c 311 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature believes that protecting the health and safety of children is paramount. The legislature recognizes that the number of children entering out-of-home care is increasing and that a number of children receive long-term foster care protection. Reasonable efforts by the department to shorten out-of-home placement or avoid it altogether should be a major focus of the child welfare system. It is intended that providing up-front services decrease the number of children entering out-of-home care and have the effect of eventually lowering foster care expenditures and strengthening the family unit.

Within available funds, the legislature directs the department to focus child welfare services on protecting the child, strengthening families and, to the extent possible, providing necessary services in the family setting, while drawing upon the strengths of the family. The legislature intends services be locally based and offered as early as possible to avoid disruption to the family, out-of-home placement of the child, and entry into the dependency system. The legislature also intends that these services be used for those families whose children are returning to the home from out-of-home care. These services are known as family preservation services and intensive family preservation services and are characterized by the following values, beliefs, and goals:

(a) Safety of the child is always the first concern;

(b) Children need their families and should be raised by their own families whenever possible;

(c) Interventions should focus on family strengths and be responsive to the individual family's cultural values and needs;

(d) Participation should be voluntary; and

(e) Improvement of family functioning is essential in order to promote the child's health, safety, and welfare and thereby allow the family to remain intact and allow children to remain at home.

(2) Subject to the availability of funds for such purposes, the legislature intends for these services to be made available to all eligible families on a statewide basis through a phased-in process. Except as otherwise specified by statute, the department ((of social and health services)) shall have the authority and discretion to implement and expand these services as provided in ((this chapter)) RCW 74.14C.010 through 74.14C.100. The department shall consult with the community public health and safety networks when assessing a community's resources and need for services.

(3) It is the legislature's intent that, within available funds, the department develop services in accordance with ((this chapter)) RCW 74.14C.010 through 74.14C.100.

(4) Nothing in ((this chapter)) RCW 74.14C.010 through 74.14C.100 shall be construed to create an entitlement to services nor to create judicial authority to order the provision of preservation services to any person or family if the services are unavailable or unsuitable or that the child or family are not eligible for such services.

Sec. 511. RCW 74.14C.010 and 1996 c 240 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(2) "Community support systems" means the support that may be organized through extended family members, friends, neighbors, religious organizations, community programs, cultural and ethnic organizations, or other support groups or organizations.

(3) "Family preservation services" means in-home or community-based services drawing on the strengths of the family and its individual members while addressing family needs to strengthen and keep the family together where possible and may include:

(a) Respite care of children to provide temporary relief for parents and other caregivers;

(b) Services designed to improve parenting skills with respect to such matters as child development, family budgeting, coping with stress, health, safety, and nutrition; and

(c) Services designed to promote the well-being of children and families, increase the strength and stability of families, increase parents' confidence and competence in their parenting abilities, promote a safe, stable, and supportive family environment for children, and otherwise enhance children's development.

Family preservation services shall have the characteristics delineated in RCW 74.14C.020 (2) and (3).

(4) "Imminent" means a decision has been made by the department that, without intensive family preservation services, a petition requesting the removal of a child from the family home will be immediately filed under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW, or that a voluntary placement agreement will be immediately initiated.

(5) "Intensive family preservation services" means community-based services that are delivered primarily in the home, that follow intensive service models with demonstrated effectiveness in reducing or avoiding the need for unnecessary imminent out-of-home placement, and that have all of the characteristics delineated in RCW 74.14C.020 (1) and (3).

(6) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(7) "Paraprofessional worker" means any individual who is trained and qualified to provide assistance and community support systems development to families and who acts under the supervision of a preservation services therapist. The paraprofessional worker is not intended to replace the role and responsibilities of the preservation services therapist.

(8) "Preservation services" means family preservation services and intensive family preservation services that consider the individual family's cultural values and needs.

(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.

Sec. 512. RCW 74.14C.070 and 2003 c 207 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary ((of social and health services,)) or the secretary's ((regional)) designee((,)) may transfer funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase preservation services and other preventive services for children at imminent risk of out-of-home placement or who face a substantial likelihood of out-of-home placement. This transfer may be made in those regions that lower foster care expenditures through efficient use of preservation services and permanency planning efforts. The transfer shall be equivalent to the amount of reduced foster care expenditures and shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and with the approval of the office of financial management. The department shall present an annual report to the legislature regarding any transfers under this section only if transfers occur. The department shall include caseload, expenditure, cost avoidance, identified improvements to the out-of-home care system, and outcome data related to the transfer in the report. The department shall also include in the report information regarding:

(1) The percent of cases where a child is placed in out-of-home care after the provision of intensive family preservation services or family preservation services;

(2) The average length of time before the child is placed out-of-home;

(3) The average length of time the child is placed out-of-home; and

(4) The number of families that refused the offer of either family preservation services or intensive family preservation services.

Sec. 513. RCW 74.14C.090 and 1995 c 311 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Each department caseworker who refers a client for preservation services shall file a report with his or her direct supervisor stating the reasons for which the client was referred. The caseworker's supervisor shall verify in writing his or her belief that the family who is the subject of a referral for preservation services meets the eligibility criteria for services as provided in this chapter. The direct supervisor shall report monthly to the regional administrator on the provision of these services. The regional administrator shall report to the ((assistant)) secretary quarterly on the provision of these services for the entire region. The ((assistant)) secretary shall ((make)) post on the department's web site a semiannual report ((to the secretary)) on the provision of these services on a statewide basis.

PART VI

TRANSFER OF JUVENILE JUSTICE

Sec. 601. RCW 13.04.011 and 2011 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this title:

(1) "Adjudication" has the same meaning as "conviction" in RCW 9.94A.030, but only for the purposes of sentencing under chapter 9.94A RCW;

(2) Except as specifically provided in RCW 13.40.020 and chapters 13.24 and 13.34 RCW, "juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years;

(3) "Juvenile offender" and "juvenile offense" have the meaning ascribed in RCW 13.40.020;

(4) "Court" when used without further qualification means the juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);

(5) "Parent" or "parents," except as used in chapter 13.34 RCW, means that parent or parents who have the right of legal custody of the child. "Parent" or "parents" as used in chapter 13.34 RCW, means the biological or adoptive parents of a child unless the legal rights of that person have been terminated by judicial proceedings;

(6) "Custodian" means that person who has the legal right to custody of the child;

(7) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 602. RCW 13.04.030 and 2009 c 526 s 1 and 2009 c 454 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, the juvenile courts in this state shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings:

(a) Under the interstate compact on placement of children as provided in chapter 26.34 RCW;

(b) Relating to children alleged or found to be dependent as provided in chapter 26.44 RCW and in RCW 13.34.030 through 13.34.161;

(c) Relating to the termination of a parent and child relationship as provided in RCW 13.34.180 through 13.34.210;

(d) To approve or disapprove out-of-home placement as provided in RCW 13.32A.170;

(e) Relating to juveniles alleged or found to have committed offenses, traffic or civil infractions, or violations as provided in RCW 13.40.020 through 13.40.230, unless:

(i) The juvenile court transfers jurisdiction of a particular juvenile to adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110;

(ii) The statute of limitations applicable to adult prosecution for the offense, traffic or civil infraction, or violation has expired;

(iii) The alleged offense or infraction is a traffic, fish, boating, or game offense, or traffic or civil infraction committed by a juvenile sixteen years of age or older and would, if committed by an adult, be tried or heard in a court of limited jurisdiction, in which instance the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction shall have jurisdiction over the alleged offense or infraction, and no guardian ad litem is required in any such proceeding due to the juvenile's age. If such an alleged offense or infraction and an alleged offense or infraction subject to juvenile court jurisdiction arise out of the same event or incident, the juvenile court may have jurisdiction of both matters. The jurisdiction under this subsection does not constitute "transfer" or a "decline" for purposes of RCW 13.40.110 (1) or (2) or (e)(i) of this subsection. Courts of limited jurisdiction which confine juveniles for an alleged offense or infraction may place juveniles in juvenile detention facilities under an agreement with the officials responsible for the administration of the juvenile detention facility in RCW 13.04.035 and 13.20.060;

(iv) The alleged offense is a traffic or civil infraction, a violation of compulsory school attendance provisions under chapter 28A.225 RCW, or a misdemeanor, and a court of limited jurisdiction has assumed concurrent jurisdiction over those offenses as provided in RCW 13.04.0301; or

(v) The juvenile is sixteen or seventeen years old on the date the alleged offense is committed and the alleged offense is:

(A) A serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of: (I) One or more prior serious violent offenses; (II) two or more prior violent offenses; or (III) three or more of any combination of the following offenses: Any class A felony, any class B felony, vehicular assault, or manslaughter in the second degree, all of which must have been committed after the juvenile's thirteenth birthday and prosecuted separately;

(C) Robbery in the first degree, rape of a child in the first degree, or drive-by shooting, committed on or after July 1, 1997;

(D) Burglary in the first degree committed on or after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of one or more prior felony or misdemeanor offenses; or

(E) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 committed on or after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile is alleged to have been armed with a firearm.

(I) In such a case the adult criminal court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction, except as provided in (e)(v)(E)(II) and (III) of this subsection.

(II) The juvenile court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the disposition of any remaining charges in any case in which the juvenile is found not guilty in the adult criminal court of the charge or charges for which he or she was transferred, or is convicted in the adult criminal court of a lesser included offense that is not also an offense listed in (e)(v) of this subsection. The juvenile court shall enter an order extending juvenile court jurisdiction if the juvenile has turned eighteen years of age during the adult criminal court proceedings pursuant to RCW 13.40.300. However, once the case is returned to juvenile court, the court may hold a decline hearing pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 to determine whether to retain the case in juvenile court for the purpose of disposition or return the case to adult criminal court for sentencing.

(III) The prosecutor and respondent may agree to juvenile court jurisdiction and waive application of exclusive adult criminal jurisdiction in (e)(v)(A) through (E) of this subsection and remove the proceeding back to juvenile court with the court's approval.

If the juvenile challenges the state's determination of the juvenile's criminal history under (e)(v) of this subsection, the state may establish the offender's criminal history by a preponderance of the evidence. If the criminal history consists of adjudications entered upon a plea of guilty, the state shall not bear a burden of establishing the knowing and voluntariness of the plea;

(f) Under the interstate compact on juveniles as provided in chapter 13.24 RCW;

(g) Relating to termination of a diversion agreement under RCW 13.40.080, including a proceeding in which the divertee has attained eighteen years of age;

(h) Relating to court validation of a voluntary consent to an out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW, by the parent or Indian custodian of an Indian child, except if the parent or Indian custodian and child are residents of or domiciled within the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian reservation over which the tribe exercises exclusive jurisdiction;

(i) Relating to petitions to compel disclosure of information filed by the department ((of social and health services)) pursuant to RCW 74.13.042; and

(j) Relating to judicial determinations and permanency planning hearings involving developmentally disabled children who have been placed in out-of-home care pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement between the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families.

(2) The family court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction with the juvenile court over all proceedings under this section if the superior court judges of a county authorize concurrent jurisdiction as provided in RCW 26.12.010.

(3) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction with the family court over child custody proceedings under chapter 26.10 RCW and parenting plans or residential schedules under chapters 26.09 and 26.26 RCW as provided for in RCW 13.34.155.

(4) A juvenile subject to adult superior court jurisdiction under subsection (1)(e)(i) through (v) of this section, who is detained pending trial, may be detained in a detention facility as defined in RCW 13.40.020 pending sentencing or a dismissal.

Sec. 603. RCW 13.04.116 and 1987 c 462 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile shall not be confined in a jail or holding facility for adults, except:

(a) For a period not exceeding twenty-four hours excluding weekends and holidays and only for the purpose of an initial court appearance in a county where no juvenile detention facility is available, a juvenile may be held in an adult facility provided that the confinement is separate from the sight and sound of adult inmates; or

(b) For not more than six hours and pursuant to a lawful detention in the course of an investigation, a juvenile may be held in an adult facility provided that the confinement is separate from the sight and sound of adult inmates.

(2) For purposes of this section a juvenile is an individual under the chronological age of eighteen years who has not been transferred previously to adult courts.

(3) The department ((of social and health services)) shall monitor and enforce compliance with this section.

(4) This section shall not be construed to expand or limit the authority to lawfully detain juveniles.

Sec. 604. RCW 13.04.145 and 2014 c 157 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A program of education shall be provided for by the several counties and school districts of the state for common school-age persons confined in each of the detention facilities staffed and maintained by the several counties of the state under this chapter and chapters 13.16 and 13.20 RCW. The division of duties, authority, and liabilities of the several counties and school districts of the state respecting the educational programs is the same in all respects as set forth in chapter 28A.190 RCW respecting programs of education for state residential school residents. For the purposes of this section, the terms "department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families," "residential school" or "schools," and "superintendent or chief administrator of a residential school" as used in chapter 28A.190 RCW shall be respectively construed to mean "the several counties of the state," "detention facilities," and "the administrator of juvenile court detention services." Nothing in this section shall prohibit a school district from utilizing the services of an educational service district subject to RCW 28A.310.180.

Sec. 605. RCW 13.40.020 and 2016 c 136 s 2 and 2016 c 106 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Assessment" means an individualized examination of a child to determine the child's psychosocial needs and problems, including the type and extent of any mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders, and recommendations for treatment. "Assessment" includes, but is not limited to, drug and alcohol evaluations, psychological and psychiatric evaluations, records review, clinical interview, and administration of a formal test or instrument;

(2) "Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following: Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling, outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs to prevent animal cruelty, or other services including, when appropriate, restorative justice programs; or attendance at school or other educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to available funds;

(3) "Community-based sanctions" may include one or more of the following:

(a) A fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars;

(b) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of community restitution;

(4) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or through work crews;

(5) "Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an order granting a deferred disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may be for a period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of the existence of this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized program comprised of one or more of the following:

(a) Community-based sanctions;

(b) Community-based rehabilitation;

(c) Monitoring and reporting requirements;

(d) Posting of a probation bond;

(e) Residential treatment, where substance abuse, mental health, and/or co-occurring disorders have been identified in an assessment by a qualified mental health professional, psychologist, psychiatrist, or chemical dependency professional and a funded bed is available. If a child agrees to voluntary placement in a state-funded long-term evaluation and treatment facility, the case must follow the existing placement procedure including consideration of less restrictive treatment options and medical necessity.

(i) A court may order residential treatment after consideration and findings regarding whether:

(A) The referral is necessary to rehabilitate the child;

(B) The referral is necessary to protect the public or the child;

(C) The referral is in the child's best interest;

(D) The child has been given the opportunity to engage in less restrictive treatment and has been unable or unwilling to comply; and

(E) Inpatient treatment is the least restrictive action consistent with the child's needs and circumstances.

(ii) In any case where a court orders a child to inpatient treatment under this section, the court must hold a review hearing no later than sixty days after the youth begins inpatient treatment, and every thirty days thereafter, as long as the youth is in inpatient treatment;

(6) "Confinement" means physical custody by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department. Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(7) "Court," when used without further qualification, means the juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);

(8) "Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a) The allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of two or more charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest charge from among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this chapter; or

(b) The criminal complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions of this chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(9) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families;

(10) "Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county, for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense or an adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order. "Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(11) "Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person, community accountability board, youth court under the supervision of the juvenile court, or other entity except a law enforcement official or entity, with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local community;

(12) "Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the department, or other legally authorized care;

(13) "Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(14) "Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that requires intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and support in order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit further offenses;

(15) "Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110, unless the individual was convicted of a lesser charge or acquitted of the charge for which he or she was previously transferred pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is not otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(16) "Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(17) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;

(18) "Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0-30 days of confinement; (b) 0-12 months of community supervision; (c) 0-150 hours of community restitution; or (d) $0-$500 fine;

(19) "Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;

(20) "Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or entering specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation officer as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not include confinement;

(21) "Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state if the act occurred in that state;

(22) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or physical intervention to control a juvenile offender or limit a juvenile offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited force and designed to:

(a) Prevent a juvenile offender from completing an act that would result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;

(b) Remove a disruptive juvenile offender who is unwilling to leave the area voluntarily; or

(c) Guide a juvenile offender from one location to another;

(23) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician determines is necessary for healing after the youth leaves the hospital, birthing center, or clinic;

(24) "Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance at required court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community supervision or conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if approved by the court;

(25) "Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have committed an offense;

(26) "Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the victim or offender;

(27) "Restorative justice" means practices, policies, and programs informed by and sensitive to the needs of crime victims that are designed to encourage offenders to accept responsibility for repairing the harm caused by their offense by providing safe and supportive opportunities for voluntary participation and communication between the victim, the offender, their families, and relevant community members;

(28) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:

(a) Physical restraint; or

(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons;

(29) "Screening" means a process that is designed to identify a child who is at risk of having mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention, or more comprehensive assessment. A screening may be undertaken with or without the administration of a formal instrument;

(30) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department ((of social and health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary for juvenile rehabilitation for the department));

(31) "Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(32) "Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW 9.94A.030;

(33) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification;

(34) "Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the county having jurisdiction of the case;

(35) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an incarcerated pregnant youth from the institution or detention facility to another location from the moment she leaves the institution or detention facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated youth from the institution or detention facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to the other location;

(36) "Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult, must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which do not include incarceration;

(37) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(38) "Youth court" means a diversion unit under the supervision of the juvenile court.

Sec. 606. RCW 13.40.040 and 2002 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A juvenile may be taken into custody:

(a) Pursuant to a court order if a complaint is filed with the court alleging, and the court finds probable cause to believe, that the juvenile has committed an offense or has violated terms of a disposition order or release order; or

(b) Without a court order, by a law enforcement officer if grounds exist for the arrest of an adult in identical circumstances. Admission to, and continued custody in, a court detention facility shall be governed by subsection (2) of this section; or

(c) Pursuant to a court order that the juvenile be held as a material witness; or

(d) Where the secretary or the secretary's designee has suspended the parole of a juvenile offender.

(2) A juvenile may not be held in detention unless there is probable cause to believe that:

(a) The juvenile has committed an offense or has violated the terms of a disposition order; and

(i) The juvenile will likely fail to appear for further proceedings; or

(ii) Detention is required to protect the juvenile from himself or herself; or

(iii) The juvenile is a threat to community safety; or

(iv) The juvenile will intimidate witnesses or otherwise unlawfully interfere with the administration of justice; or

(v) The juvenile has committed a crime while another case was pending; or

(b) The juvenile is a fugitive from justice; or

(c) The juvenile's parole has been suspended or modified; or

(d) The juvenile is a material witness.

(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, and within available funds, a juvenile who has been found guilty of one of the following offenses shall be detained pending disposition: Rape in the first or second degree (RCW 9A.44.040 and 9A.44.050); or rape of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.073).

(4) Upon a finding that members of the community have threatened the health of a juvenile taken into custody, at the juvenile's request the court may order continued detention pending further order of the court.

(5) Except as provided in RCW 9.41.280, a juvenile detained under this section may be released upon posting a probation bond set by the court. The juvenile's parent or guardian may sign for the probation bond. A court authorizing such a release shall issue an order containing a statement of conditions imposed upon the juvenile and shall set the date of his or her next court appearance. The court shall advise the juvenile of any conditions specified in the order and may at any time amend such an order in order to impose additional or different conditions of release upon the juvenile or to return the juvenile to custody for failing to conform to the conditions imposed. In addition to requiring the juvenile to appear at the next court date, the court may condition the probation bond on the juvenile's compliance with conditions of release. The juvenile's parent or guardian may notify the court that the juvenile has failed to conform to the conditions of release or the provisions in the probation bond. If the parent notifies the court of the juvenile's failure to comply with the probation bond, the court shall notify the surety. As provided in the terms of the bond, the surety shall provide notice to the court of the offender's noncompliance. A juvenile may be released only to a responsible adult or the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families. Failure to appear on the date scheduled by the court pursuant to this section shall constitute the crime of bail jumping.

Sec. 607. RCW 13.40.045 and 1997 c 338 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary((, assistant secretary,)) or the secretary's designee shall issue arrest warrants for juveniles who escape from department residential custody. The secretary((, assistant secretary,)) or the secretary's designee may issue arrest warrants for juveniles who abscond from parole supervision or fail to meet conditions of parole. These arrest warrants shall authorize any law enforcement, probation and parole, or peace officer of this state, or any other state where the juvenile is located, to arrest the juvenile and to place the juvenile in physical custody pending the juvenile's return to confinement in a state juvenile rehabilitation facility.

Sec. 608. RCW 13.40.185 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 524 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any term of confinement imposed for an offense which exceeds thirty days shall be served under the supervision of the department. If the period of confinement imposed for more than one offense exceeds thirty days but the term imposed for each offense is less than thirty days, the confinement may, in the discretion of the court, be served in a juvenile facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state or a county.

(2) Whenever a juvenile is confined in a detention facility or is committed to the department, the court may not directly order a juvenile into a particular county or state facility. The juvenile court administrator and the secretary((, assistant secretary,)) or the secretary's designee, as appropriate, has the sole discretion to determine in which facility a juvenile should be confined or committed. The counties may operate a variety of detention facilities as determined by the county legislative authority subject to available funds.

Sec. 609. RCW 13.40.210 and 2014 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile committed to its custody. The release date shall be within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW 13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days prior to the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the department shall be tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has absented himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.

(2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the state's juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes that in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one hundred five percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such specification, as specified by the department in rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to the governor. On certification by the governor that the recommended reductions are necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release those offenders who have served the greatest proportion of their sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular case at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is no responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to release the offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted release under the provisions of this subsection.

(3)(a) Following the release of any juvenile under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may require the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be administered by the department in his or her community which shall last no longer than eighteen months, except that in the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for offenders released under subsection (2) of this section and for offenders who receive a juvenile residential commitment sentence for theft of a motor vehicle, possession of a stolen motor vehicle, or taking a motor vehicle without permission 1. A juvenile adjudicated for unlawful possession of a firearm, possession of a stolen firearm, theft of a firearm, or drive-by shooting may participate in aggression replacement training, functional family therapy, or functional family parole aftercare if the juvenile meets eligibility requirements for these services. The decision to place an offender in an evidence-based parole program shall be based on an assessment by the department of the offender's risk for reoffending upon release and an assessment of the ongoing treatment needs of the juvenile. The department shall prioritize available parole resources to provide supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.

(b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this goal shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon and refrain from committing new offenses and may require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training, or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii) submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix) refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified class of individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole officer to further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community restitution. Community restitution for the purpose of this section means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender. Community restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or through work crews.

(c) The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection and shall also be required to comply with the following additional terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed by the community case manager related to participating in the intensive supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision program, the secretary may require day reporting.

(d) After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be discharged from the department's supervision.

(4)(a) The department may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which he or she would be entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall order one of the following which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting requirements; (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v) the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.

(b) The secretary may modify parole and order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for up to twenty-four weeks if the offender was sentenced for a sex offense as defined under RCW ((9A.44.130)) 9A.44.128 and is known to have violated the terms of parole. Confinement beyond thirty days is intended to only be used for a small and limited number of sex offenders. It shall only be used when other graduated sanctions or interventions have not been effective or the behavior is so egregious it warrants the use of the higher level intervention and the violation: (i) Is a known pattern of behavior consistent with a previous sex offense that puts the youth at high risk for reoffending sexually; (ii) consists of sexual behavior that is determined to be predatory as defined in RCW 71.09.020; or (iii) requires a review under chapter 71.09 RCW, due to a recent overt act. The total number of days of confinement for violations of parole conditions during the parole period shall not exceed the number of days provided by the maximum sentence imposed by the disposition for the underlying offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.0357. The department shall not aggregate multiple parole violations that occur prior to the parole revocation hearing and impose consecutive twenty-four week periods of confinement for each parole violation. The department is authorized to engage in rule making pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement this subsection, including narrowly defining the behaviors that could lead to this higher level intervention.

(c) If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the department shall modify the parole under (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state or any county.

(5) A parole officer of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under his or her supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer would be authorized to arrest the person.

(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

Sec. 610. RCW 13.40.220 and 1995 c 300 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever legal custody of a child is vested in someone other than his or her parents, under this chapter, and not vested in the department ((of social and health services)), after due notice to the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child, and after a hearing, the court may order and decree that the parent or other legally obligated person shall pay in such a manner as the court may direct a reasonable sum representing in whole or in part the costs of support, treatment, and confinement of the child after the decree is entered.

(2) If the parent or other legally obligated person willfully fails or refuses to pay such sum, the court may proceed against such person for contempt.

(3) Whenever legal custody of a child is vested in the department under this chapter, the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the child shall be liable for the costs of support, treatment, and confinement of the child, in accordance with the department's reimbursement of cost schedule. The department shall adopt a reimbursement of cost schedule based on the costs of providing such services, and shall determine an obligation based on the responsible parents' or other legally obligated person's ability to pay. The department is authorized to adopt additional rules as appropriate to enforce this section.

(4) To enforce subsection (3) of this section, the department shall serve on the parents or other person legally obligated to care for and support the child a notice and finding of financial responsibility requiring the parents or other legally obligated person to appear and show cause in an adjudicative proceeding why the finding of responsibility and/or the amount thereof is incorrect and should not be ordered. This notice and finding shall relate to the costs of support, treatment, and confinement of the child in accordance with the department's reimbursement of cost schedule adopted under this section, including periodic payments to be made in the future. The hearing shall be held pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, and the rules of the department.

(5) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall be served in the same manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action or may be served on the parent or legally obligated person by certified mail, return receipt requested. The receipt shall be prima facie evidence of service.

(6) If the parents or other legally obligated person objects to the notice and finding of financial responsibility, then an application for an adjudicative hearing may be filed within twenty days of the date of service of the notice. If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed, the presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the past liability and responsibility, if any, of the parents or other legally obligated person and shall also determine the amount of periodic payments to be made in the future. If the parents or other legally responsible person fails to file an application within twenty days, the notice and finding of financial responsibility shall become a final administrative order.

(7) Debts determined pursuant to this section are subject to collection action without further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing officer. The department may collect the debt in accordance with RCW 43.20B.635, 43.20B.640, 74.20A.060, and 74.20A.070. The department shall exempt from payment parents receiving adoption support under RCW ((74.13.100 through 74.13.145)) 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, parents eligible to receive adoption support under RCW ((74.13.150)) 74.13A.085, and a parent or other legally obligated person when the parent or other legally obligated person, or such person's child, spouse, or spouse's child, was the victim of the offense for which the child was committed.

(8) An administrative order entered pursuant to this section shall supersede any court order entered prior to June 13, 1994.

(9) The department shall be subrogated to the right of the child and his or her parents or other legally responsible person to receive support payments for the benefit of the child from any parent or legally obligated person pursuant to a support order established by a superior court or pursuant to RCW 74.20A.055. The department's right of subrogation under this section is limited to the liability established in accordance with its cost schedule for support, treatment, and confinement, except as addressed in subsection (10) of this section.

(10) Nothing in this section precludes the department from recouping such additional support payments from the child's parents or other legally obligated person as required to qualify for receipt of federal funds. The department may adopt such rules dealing with liability for recoupment of support, treatment, or confinement costs as may become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds unless such rules would be expressly prohibited by law. If any law dealing with liability for recoupment of support, treatment, or confinement costs is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds, such conflicting law is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

Sec. 611. RCW 13.40.280 and 1989 c 410 s 2 and 1989 c 407 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections, has the authority to transfer a juvenile presently or hereafter committed to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families to the department of corrections for appropriate institutional placement in accordance with this section.

(2) The secretary of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families may, with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections, transfer a juvenile offender to the department of corrections if it is established at a hearing before a review board that continued placement of the juvenile offender in an institution for juvenile offenders presents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution. The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall establish rules for the conduct of the hearing, including provision of counsel for the juvenile offender.

(3) Assaults made against any staff member at a juvenile corrections institution that are reported to a local law enforcement agency shall require a hearing held by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families review board within ten judicial working days. The board shall determine whether the accused juvenile offender represents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution.

(4) Upon conviction in a court of law for custodial assault as defined in RCW 9A.36.100, the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families review board shall conduct a second hearing, within five judicial working days, to recommend to the secretary of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families that the convicted juvenile be transferred to an adult correctional facility if the review board has determined the juvenile offender represents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution.

The juvenile has the burden to show cause why the transfer to an adult correctional facility should not occur.

(5) A juvenile offender transferred to an institution operated by the department of corrections shall not remain in such an institution beyond the maximum term of confinement imposed by the juvenile court.

(6) A juvenile offender who has been transferred to the department of corrections under this section may, in the discretion of the secretary of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections, be transferred from an institution operated by the department of corrections to a facility for juvenile offenders deemed appropriate by the secretary.

Sec. 612. RCW 13.40.285 and 1983 c 191 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

A juvenile offender ordered to serve a term of confinement with the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families who is subsequently sentenced to the department of corrections may, with the consent of the department of corrections, be transferred by the secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families to the department of corrections to serve the balance of the term of confinement ordered by the juvenile court. The juvenile and adult sentences shall be served consecutively. In no case shall the secretary credit time served as a result of an adult conviction against the term of confinement ordered by the juvenile court.

Sec. 613. RCW 13.40.300 and 2005 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In no case may a juvenile offender be committed by the juvenile court to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families for placement in a juvenile correctional institution beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first birthday. A juvenile may be under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or the authority of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families beyond the juvenile's eighteenth birthday only if prior to the juvenile's eighteenth birthday:

(a) Proceedings are pending seeking the adjudication of a juvenile offense and the court by written order setting forth its reasons extends jurisdiction of juvenile court over the juvenile beyond his or her eighteenth birthday;

(b) The juvenile has been found guilty after a fact finding or after a plea of guilty and an automatic extension is necessary to allow for the imposition of disposition;

(c) Disposition has been held and an automatic extension is necessary to allow for the execution and enforcement of the court's order of disposition. If an order of disposition imposes commitment to the department, then jurisdiction is automatically extended to include a period of up to twelve months of parole, in no case extending beyond the offender's twenty-first birthday; or

(d) While proceedings are pending in a case in which jurisdiction has been transferred to the adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.04.030, the juvenile turns eighteen years of age and is subsequently found not guilty of the charge for which he or she was transferred, or is convicted in the adult criminal court of a lesser included offense, and an automatic extension is necessary to impose the disposition as required by RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v)(E).

(2) If the juvenile court previously has extended jurisdiction beyond the juvenile offender's eighteenth birthday and that period of extension has not expired, the court may further extend jurisdiction by written order setting forth its reasons.

(3) In no event may the juvenile court have authority to extend jurisdiction over any juvenile offender beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first birthday except for the purpose of enforcing an order of restitution or penalty assessment.

(4) Notwithstanding any extension of jurisdiction over a person pursuant to this section, the juvenile court has no jurisdiction over any offenses alleged to have been committed by a person eighteen years of age or older.

Sec. 614. RCW 13.40.310 and 1991 c 326 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of social and health services)) may contract with a community-based nonprofit organization to establish a three-step transitional treatment program for gang and drug-involved juvenile offenders committed to the custody of the department under this chapter (( 13.40 RCW)). Any such program shall provide six to twenty-four months of treatment. The program shall emphasize the principles of self-determination, unity, collective work and responsibility, cooperative economics, and creativity. The program shall be culturally relevant and appropriate and shall include:

(a) A culturally relevant and appropriate institution-based program that provides comprehensive drug and alcohol services, individual and family counseling, and a wilderness experience of constructive group living, rigorous physical exercise, and academic studies;

(b) A culturally relevant and appropriate community-based structured group living program that focuses on individual goals, positive community involvement, coordinated drug and alcohol treatment, coordinated individual and family counseling, academic and vocational training, and employment in apprenticeship, internship, and entrepreneurial programs; and

(c) A culturally relevant and appropriate transitional group living program that provides support services, academic services, and coordinated individual and family counseling.

(2) Participation in any such program shall be on a voluntary basis.

(3) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement any such program.

Sec. 615. RCW 13.40.320 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of social and health services)) may establish a medium security juvenile offender basic training camp program. This program for juvenile offenders serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department is exempt from the licensing requirements of chapter 74.15 RCW.

(2) The department may contract under this chapter with private companies, the national guard, or other federal, state, or local agencies to operate the juvenile offender basic training camp.

(3) The juvenile offender basic training camp shall be a structured and regimented model emphasizing the building up of an offender's self-esteem, confidence, and discipline. The juvenile offender basic training camp program shall provide participants with basic education, prevocational training, work-based learning, work experience, work ethic skills, conflict resolution counseling, substance abuse intervention, anger management counseling, and structured intensive physical training. The juvenile offender basic training camp program shall have a curriculum training and work schedule that incorporates a balanced assignment of these or other rehabilitation and training components for no less than sixteen hours per day, six days a week.

The department shall develop standards for the safe and effective operation of the juvenile offender basic training camp program, for an offender's successful program completion, and for the continued after-care supervision of offenders who have successfully completed the program.

(4) Offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp option shall be those with a disposition of not more than sixty-five weeks. Violent and sex offenders shall not be eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp program.

(5) If the court determines that the offender is eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp option, the court may recommend that the department place the offender in the program. The department shall evaluate the offender and may place the offender in the program. The evaluation shall include, at a minimum, a risk assessment developed by the department and designed to determine the offender's suitability for the program. No juvenile who is assessed as a high risk offender or suffers from any mental or physical problems that could endanger his or her health or drastically affect his or her performance in the program shall be admitted to or retained in the juvenile offender basic training camp program.

(6) All juvenile offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp sentencing option shall spend one hundred twenty days of their disposition in a juvenile offender basic training camp. This period may be extended for up to forty days by the secretary if a juvenile offender requires additional time to successfully complete the basic training camp program. If the juvenile offender's activities while in the juvenile offender basic training camp are so disruptive to the juvenile offender basic training camp program, as determined by the secretary according to standards developed by the department, as to result in the removal of the juvenile offender from the juvenile offender basic training camp program, or if the offender cannot complete the juvenile offender basic training camp program due to medical problems, the secretary shall require that the offender be committed to a juvenile institution to serve the entire remainder of his or her disposition, less the amount of time already served in the juvenile offender basic training camp program.

(7) All offenders who successfully graduate from the juvenile offender basic training camp program shall spend the remainder of their disposition on parole in a department juvenile rehabilitation ((administration)) intensive aftercare program in the local community. Violation of the conditions of parole is subject to sanctions specified in RCW 13.40.210(4). The program shall provide for the needs of the offender based on his or her progress in the aftercare program as indicated by ongoing assessment of those needs and progress. The intensive aftercare program shall monitor postprogram juvenile offenders and assist them to successfully reintegrate into the community. In addition, the program shall develop a process for closely monitoring and assessing public safety risks. The intensive aftercare program shall be designed and funded by the department ((of social and health services)).

(8) The department shall also develop and maintain a database to measure recidivism rates specific to this incarceration program. The database shall maintain data on all juvenile offenders who complete the juvenile offender basic training camp program for a period of two years after they have completed the program. The database shall also maintain data on the criminal activity, educational progress, and employment activities of all juvenile offenders who participated in the program.

Sec. 616. RCW 13.40.460 and 2003 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary((, assistant secretary,)) or the secretary's designee shall manage and administer the department's juvenile rehabilitation responsibilities, including but not limited to the operation of all state institutions or facilities used for juvenile rehabilitation.

The secretary or ((assistant secretary)) the secretary's designee shall:

(1) Prepare a biennial budget request sufficient to meet the confinement and rehabilitative needs of the juvenile rehabilitation program, as forecast by the office of financial management;

(2) Create by rule a formal system for inmate classification. This classification system shall consider:

(a) Public safety;

(b) Internal security and staff safety;

(c) Rehabilitative resources both within and outside the department;

(d) An assessment of each offender's risk of sexually aggressive behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470; and

(e) An assessment of each offender's vulnerability to sexually aggressive behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470;

(3) Develop agreements with local jurisdictions to develop regional facilities with a variety of custody levels;

(4) Adopt rules establishing effective disciplinary policies to maintain order within institutions;

(5) Develop a comprehensive diagnostic evaluation process to be used at intake, including but not limited to evaluation for substance addiction or abuse, literacy, learning disabilities, fetal alcohol syndrome or effect, attention deficit disorder, and mental health;

(6) Develop placement criteria:

(a) To avoid assigning youth who present a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping quarters as youth assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization under RCW 13.40.470(1)(c); and

(b) To avoid placing a juvenile offender on parole status who has been assessed as a moderate to high risk for sexually aggressive behavior in a department community residential program with another child who is: (i) Dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW, or an at-risk youth or child in need of services under chapter 13.32A RCW; and (ii) not also a juvenile offender on parole status;

(7) Develop a plan to implement, by July 1, 1995:

(a) Substance abuse treatment programs for all state juvenile rehabilitation facilities and institutions;

(b) Vocational education and instruction programs at all state juvenile rehabilitation facilities and institutions; and

(c) An educational program to establish self-worth and responsibility in juvenile offenders. This educational program shall emphasize instruction in character-building principles such as: Respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness; accountability; work ethics; good citizenship; and life skills; and

(8)(a) The ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department shall develop uniform policies related to custodial assaults consistent with RCW 72.01.045 and 9A.36.100 that are to be followed in all juvenile rehabilitation ((administration)) facilities; and

(b) The ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department will report assaults in accordance with the policies developed in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 617. RCW 13.40.462 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration)) shall establish a reinvesting in youth program that awards grants to counties for implementing research-based early intervention services that target juvenile justice-involved youth and reduce crime, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.

(2) Effective July 1, 2007, any county or group of counties may apply for participation in the reinvesting in youth program.

(3) Counties that participate in the reinvesting in youth program shall have a portion of their costs of serving youth through the research-based intervention service models paid for with moneys from the reinvesting in youth account established pursuant to RCW 13.40.466.

(4) The department ((of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration)) shall review county applications for funding through the reinvesting in youth program and shall select the counties that will be awarded grants with funds appropriated to implement this program. The department, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, shall develop guidelines to determine which counties will be awarded funding in accordance with the reinvesting in youth program. At a minimum, counties must meet the following criteria in order to participate in the reinvesting in youth program:

(a) Counties must match state moneys awarded for research-based early intervention services with nonstate resources that are at least proportional to the expected local government share of state and local government cost avoidance that would result from the implementation of such services;

(b) Counties must demonstrate that state funds allocated pursuant to this section are used only for the intervention service models authorized pursuant to RCW 13.40.464;

(c) Counties must participate fully in the state quality assurance program established in RCW 13.40.468 to ensure fidelity of program implementation. If no state quality assurance program is in effect for a particular selected research-based service, the county must submit a quality assurance plan for state approval with its grant application. Failure to demonstrate continuing compliance with quality assurance plans shall be grounds for termination of state funding; and

(d) Counties that submit joint applications must submit for approval by the department ((of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration)) multicounty plans for efficient program delivery.

Sec. 618. RCW 13.40.464 and 2006 c 304 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In order to receive funding through the reinvesting in youth program established pursuant to RCW 13.40.462, intervention service models must meet the following minimum criteria:

(i) There must be scientific evidence from at least one rigorous evaluation study of the specific service model that measures recidivism reduction;

(ii) There must be evidence that the specific service model's results can be replicated outside of an academic research environment;

(iii) The evaluation or evaluations of the service model must permit dollar cost estimates of both benefits and costs so that the benefit-cost ratio of the model can be calculated; and

(iv) The public taxpayer benefits to all levels of state and local government must exceed the service model costs.

(b) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008, the Washington state institute for public policy shall publish a list of service models that are eligible for reimbursement through the investing in youth program. As authorized by the board of the institute and to the extent necessary to respond to new research and information, the institute shall periodically update the list of service models. The institute shall use the technical advisory committee established in RCW 13.40.462(5) to review and provide comments on the list of service models that are eligible for reimbursement.

(2) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008, the Washington state institute for public policy shall review and update the methodology for calculating cost savings resulting from implementation of this program. As authorized by the board of the institute and to the extent necessary to respond to new research and information, the institute shall periodically further review and update the methodology. As authorized by the board of the institute, when the institute reviews and updates the methodology for calculating cost savings, the institute shall provide an estimate of savings and avoided costs resulting from this program, along with a projection of future savings and avoided costs, to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The institute shall use the technical advisory committee established in RCW 13.40.462(5) to review and provide comments on its methodology and cost calculations.

(3) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008, the department ((of social and health services' juvenile rehabilitation administration)) shall establish a distribution formula to provide funding to local governments that implement research-based intervention services pursuant to this program. The department shall periodically update the distribution formula. The distribution formula shall require that the state allocation to local governments be proportional to the expected state government share of state and local government cost avoidance that would result from the implementation of such services based on the methodology maintained by the Washington state institute for public policy pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The department shall use the technical advisory committee established in RCW 13.40.462(5) to review and provide comments on its proposed distribution formula.

(((4) The department of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide a report to the legislature on the initial cost savings calculation methodology and distribution formula by October 1, 2006.))

Sec. 619. RCW 13.40.466 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 953 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The reinvesting in youth account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account shall be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to reimburse local governments for the implementation of the reinvesting in youth program established in RCW 13.40.462 and 13.40.464. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the reinvesting in youth account for juvenile rehabilitation purposes.

(2) Revenues to the reinvesting in youth account consist of revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.

(3) The department ((of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration)) shall review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group of counties that is funded, in whole or in part, with funds provided through the reinvesting in youth account. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with RCW 13.40.462 and 13.40.464.

Sec. 620. RCW 13.40.468 and 2006 c 304 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration)) shall establish a state quality assurance program. The ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department shall monitor the implementation of intervention services funded pursuant to RCW 13.40.466 and shall evaluate adherence to service model design and service completion rate.

Sec. 621. RCW 13.40.510 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to receive funds under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540, local governments may, through their respective agencies that administer funding for consolidated juvenile services, submit proposals that establish community juvenile accountability programs within their communities. These proposals must be submitted to the ((juvenile rehabilitation administration of the)) department ((of social and health services)) for certification.

(2) The proposals must:

(a) Demonstrate that the proposals were developed with the input of the local law and justice councils established under RCW 72.09.300;

(b) Describe how local community groups or members are involved in the implementation of the programs funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540;

(c) Include a description of how the grant funds will contribute to the expected outcomes of the program and the reduction of youth violence and juvenile crime in their community. Data approaches are not required to be replicated if the networks have information that addresses risks in the community for juvenile offenders.

(3) A local government receiving a grant under this section shall agree that any funds received must be used efficiently to encourage the use of community-based programs that reduce the reliance on secure confinement as the sole means of holding juvenile offenders accountable for their crimes. The local government shall also agree to account for the expenditure of all funds received under the grant and to submit to audits for compliance with the grant criteria developed under RCW 13.40.520.

(4) The ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department, in consultation with the Washington association of juvenile court administrators and the state law and justice advisory council, shall establish guidelines for programs that may be funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540. The guidelines must:

(a) Target diverted and adjudicated juvenile offenders;

(b) Include assessment methods to determine services, programs, and intervention strategies most likely to change behaviors and norms of juvenile offenders;

(c) Provide maximum structured supervision in the community. Programs should use natural surveillance and community guardians such as employers, relatives, teachers, clergy, and community mentors to the greatest extent possible;

(d) Promote good work ethic values and educational skills and competencies necessary for the juvenile offender to function effectively and positively in the community;

(e) Maximize the efficient delivery of treatment services aimed at reducing risk factors associated with the commission of juvenile offenses;

(f) Maximize the reintegration of the juvenile offender into the community upon release from confinement;

(g) Maximize the juvenile offender's opportunities to make full restitution to the victims and amends to the community;

(h) Support and encourage increased court discretion in imposing community-based intervention strategies;

(i) Be compatible with research that shows which prevention and early intervention strategies work with juvenile offenders;

(j) Be outcome-based in that it describes what outcomes will be achieved or what outcomes have already been achieved;

(k) Include an evaluation component; and

(l) Recognize the diversity of local needs.

(5) The state law and justice advisory council may provide support and technical assistance to local governments for training and education regarding community-based prevention and intervention strategies.

Sec. 622. RCW 13.40.520 and 1997 c 338 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state may make grants to local governments for the provision of community-based programs for juvenile offenders. The grants must be made under a grant formula developed by the ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department, in consultation with the Washington association of juvenile court administrators.

(2) Upon certification by the ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department that a proposal satisfies the application and selection criteria, grant funds will be distributed to the local government agency that administers funding for consolidated juvenile services.

Sec. 623. RCW 13.40.540 and 1997 c 338 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each community juvenile accountability program approved and funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540 shall comply with the information collection requirements in subsection (2) of this section and the reporting requirements in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The information collected by each community juvenile accountability program must include, at a minimum for each juvenile participant: (a) The name, date of birth, gender, social security number, and, when available, the juvenile information system (JUVIS) control number; (b) an initial intake assessment of each juvenile participating in the program; (c) a list of all juveniles who completed the program; and (d) an assessment upon completion or termination of each juvenile, including outcomes and, where applicable, reasons for termination.

(3) The ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department shall annually compile the data and report to the legislature on: (a) The programs funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540; (b) the total cost for each funded program and cost per juvenile; and (c) the essential elements of the program.

Sec. 624. RCW 13.40.560 and 1999 c 182 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The juvenile accountability incentive account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Federal awards for juvenile accountability incentives received by the secretary of the department ((of social and health services)) shall be deposited into the account. Interest earned from the inception of the trust account shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes specified in the federal award or awards. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 625. RCW 74.14A.030 and 1983 c 192 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of children, youth, and families shall address the needs of juvenile offenders whose standard range sentences do not include commitment by developing nonresidential community-based programs designed to reduce the incidence of manifest injustice commitments when consistent with public safety.

Sec. 626. RCW 74.14A.040 and 1983 c 192 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of children, youth, and families shall involve a juvenile offender's family as a unit in the treatment process. The department need not involve the family as a unit in cases when family ties have by necessity been irrevocably broken. When the natural parents have been or will be replaced by a foster family or guardian, the new family will be involved in the treatment process.

Sec. 627. RCW 72.01.045 and 2002 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this section only, "assault" means an unauthorized touching of an employee by a resident, patient, or juvenile offender resulting in physical injury to the employee.

(2) In recognition of the hazardous nature of employment in state institutions, the legislature hereby provides a supplementary program to reimburse employees of the department of social and health services, the department of natural resources, the department of children, youth, and families, and the department of veterans affairs for some of their costs attributable to their being the victims of assault by residents, patients, or juvenile offenders. This program shall be limited to the reimbursement provided in this section.

(3) An employee is only entitled to receive the reimbursement provided in this section if the secretary of social and health services, the commissioner of public lands, the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, or the director of the department of veterans affairs, or the secretary's, commissioner's, or director's designee, finds that each of the following has occurred:

(a) A resident or patient has assaulted the employee and as a result thereof the employee has sustained demonstrated physical injuries which have required the employee to miss days of work;

(b) The assault cannot be attributable to any extent to the employee's negligence, misconduct, or failure to comply with any rules or conditions of employment; and

(c) The department of labor and industries has approved the employee's workers' compensation application pursuant to chapter 51.32 RCW.

(4) The reimbursement authorized under this section shall be as follows:

(a) The employee's accumulated sick leave days shall not be reduced for the workdays missed;

(b) For each workday missed for which the employee is not eligible to receive compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall receive full pay; and

(c) In respect to workdays missed for which the employee will receive or has received compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall be reimbursed in an amount which, when added to that compensation, will result in the employee receiving full pay for the workdays missed.

(5) Reimbursement under this section may not last longer than three hundred sixty-five consecutive days after the date of the injury.

(6) The employee shall not be entitled to the reimbursement provided in subsection (4) of this section for any workday for which the secretary, commissioner, director, or applicable designee, finds that the employee has not diligently pursued his or her compensation remedies under chapter 51.32 RCW.

(7) The reimbursement shall only be made for absences which the secretary, commissioner, director, or applicable designee believes are justified.

(8) While the employee is receiving reimbursement under this section, he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and the reimbursement amount shall be considered as salary or wages.

(9) All reimbursement payments required to be made to employees under this section shall be made by the employing department. The payments shall be considered as a salary or wage expense and shall be paid by the department in the same manner and from the same appropriations as other salary and wage expenses of the department.

(10) Should the legislature revoke the reimbursement authorized under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled thereafter to receive the reimbursement as a matter of contractual right.

Sec. 628. RCW 72.01.050 and 1992 c 7 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of social and health services shall have full power to manage and govern the following public institutions: The western state hospital, the eastern state hospital, the northern state hospital, ((the state training school, the state school for girls,)) Lakeland Village, the Rainier school, and such other institutions as authorized by law, subject only to the limitations contained in laws relating to the management of such institutions.

(2) The secretary of corrections shall have full power to manage, govern, and name all state correctional facilities, subject only to the limitations contained in laws relating to the management of such institutions.

(3) If any state correctional facility is fully or partially destroyed by natural causes or otherwise, the secretary of corrections may, with the approval of the governor, provide for the establishment and operation of additional residential correctional facilities to place those inmates displaced by such destruction. However, such additional facilities may not be established if there are existing residential correctional facilities to which all of the displaced inmates can be appropriately placed. The establishment and operation of any additional facility shall be on a temporary basis, and the facility may not be operated beyond July 1 of the year following the year in which it was partially or fully destroyed.

(4) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall have full power to manage and govern Echo Glen, the Green Hill school, and such other institutions as authorized by law, subject only to the limitations contained in laws relating to the management of such institutions.

Sec. 629. RCW 13.16.100 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 807 are each amended to read as follows:

Motion pictures unrated after November 1968 or rated R, X, or NC-17 by the motion picture association of America shall not be shown in juvenile detention facilities or facilities operated by the ((division of juvenile rehabilitation in the)) department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

Sec. 630. RCW 72.09.337 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of corrections, the secretary of social and health services, the secretary of children, youth, and families, and the indeterminate sentence review board may adopt rules to implement chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

PART VII

TRANSFER OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH RESIDENTIAL AND CUSTODIAL SERVICES

Sec. 701. RCW 72.05.010 and 1985 c 378 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The purposes of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210 are: To provide for every child with behavior problems, mentally and physically handicapped persons, and hearing and visually impaired children, within the purview of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210, as now or hereafter amended, such care, guidance and instruction, control and treatment as will best serve the welfare of the child or person and society; to insure nonpolitical and qualified operation, supervision, management, and control of the Green Hill school, ((the Maple Lane school,)) the Naselle Youth Camp, ((the Mission Creek Youth Camp,)) Echo Glen, ((the Cascadia Diagnostic Center,)) Lakeland Village, Rainier school, the Yakima Valley school, ((Interlake school,)) Fircrest school, ((the Francis Haddon Morgan Center,)) the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of western state hospital, and like residential state schools, camps, and centers hereafter established((, and to place them under the department of social and health services except where specified otherwise)); and to provide for the persons committed or admitted to those schools that type of care, instruction, and treatment most likely to accomplish their rehabilitation and restoration to normal citizenship.

(2) To further such purposes, Green Hill School, Echo Glen, Naselle Youth Camp, and such other juvenile rehabilitation facilities, as may hereafter be established, are placed under the department of children, youth, and families; Lakeland Village, Rainier school, the Yakima Valley school, Fircrest school, the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of western state hospital, and like residential state schools, camps, and centers, hereafter established, are placed under the department of social and health services.

Sec. 702. RCW 72.05.020 and 2010 c 181 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the department is not a community facility.

(2) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(3) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department under RCW 13.40.185.

(4) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix.

(5) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or physical intervention to control an offender or limit a juvenile offender's freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact, without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited force and designed to:

(a) Prevent a juvenile offender from completing an act that would result in potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;

(b) Remove a disruptive juvenile offender who is unwilling to leave the area voluntarily; or

(c) Guide a juvenile offender from one location to another.

(6) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician determines is necessary for healing after the youth leaves the hospital, birthing center, or clinic.

(7) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a person's body or limbs and includes:

(a) Physical restraint; or

(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.

(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.

(9) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.

(((9))) (10) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an incarcerated pregnant woman or youth from the institution or community facility to another location from the moment she leaves the institution or community facility to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the escorting of the pregnant incarcerated woman or youth from the institution or community facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to the other location.

Sec. 703. RCW 72.05.130 and 1990 c 33 s 592 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall establish, maintain, operate and administer a comprehensive program for the custody, care, education, treatment, instruction, guidance, control, and rehabilitation of all persons who may be committed or admitted to institutions, schools, or other facilities ((controlled and operated by the department)), placed under the control of each, except for the programs of education provided pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.050 which shall be established, operated, and administered by the school district conducting the program, and in order to accomplish these purposes, the powers and duties of the secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families for the institutions placed under the respective department shall include the following:

(1) The assembling, analyzing, tabulating, and reproduction in report form, of statistics and other data with respect to children with behavior problems in the state of Washington, including, but not limited to, the extent, kind, and causes of such behavior problems in the different areas and population centers of the state. Such reports shall not be open to public inspection, but shall be open to the inspection of the governor and to the superior court judges of the state of Washington.

(2) The establishment and supervision of diagnostic facilities and services in connection with the custody, care, and treatment of mentally and physically handicapped, and behavior problem children who may be committed or admitted to any of the institutions, schools, or facilities controlled and operated by the department, or who may be referred for such diagnosis and treatment by any superior court of this state. Such diagnostic services may be established in connection with, or apart from, any other state institution under the supervision and direction of the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families. Such diagnostic services shall be available to the superior courts of the state for persons referred for such services by them prior to commitment, or admission to, any school, institution, or other facility. Such diagnostic services shall also be available to other departments of the state. When the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families determines it necessary, the secretary of the department of social and health services or the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may create waiting lists and set priorities for use of diagnostic services for juvenile offenders on the basis of those most severely in need.

(3) The supervision of all persons committed or admitted to any institution, school, or other facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families, and the transfer of such persons from any such institution, school, or facility to any other such school, institution, or facility: PROVIDED, That where a person has been committed to a minimum security institution, school, or facility by any of the superior courts of this state, a transfer to a close security institution shall be made only with the consent and approval of such court.

(4) The supervision of parole, discharge, or other release, and the post-institutional placement of all persons committed to Green Hill school ((and Maple Lane school)), or such as may be assigned, paroled, or transferred therefrom to other facilities operated by the department. Green Hill school ((and Maple Lane school are)) is hereby designated as a "close security" institution((s)) to which shall be given the custody of children with the most serious behavior problems.

Sec. 704. RCW 72.05.154 and 2012 c 117 s 460 are each amended to read as follows:

From and after July 1, 1973, any inmate working in a juvenile forest camp established and operated pursuant to RCW 72.05.150, pursuant to an agreement between the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and the department of natural resources shall be eligible for the benefits provided by Title 51 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, relating to industrial insurance, with the exceptions provided by this section.

No inmate as described in RCW 72.05.152, until released upon an order of parole by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, or discharged from custody upon expiration of sentence, or discharged from custody by order of a court of appropriate jurisdiction, or his or her dependents or beneficiaries, shall be entitled to any payment for temporary disability or permanent total disability as provided for in RCW 51.32.090 or 51.32.060 respectively, as now or hereafter amended, or to the benefits of chapter 51.36 RCW relating to medical aid: PROVIDED, That RCW 72.05.152 and ((72.05.154)) this section shall not affect the eligibility, payment or distribution of benefits for any industrial injury to the inmate which occurred prior to his or her existing commitment to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

Any and all premiums or assessments as may arise under this section pursuant to the provisions of Title 51 RCW shall be the obligation of and be paid by the state department of natural resources.

Sec. 705. RCW 72.05.415 and 1998 c 269 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Promptly following the report due under section 17, chapter 269, Laws of 1998,)) The secretary shall develop a process with local governments that allows each community to establish a community placement oversight committee. The department may conduct community awareness activities. The community placement oversight committees developed pursuant to this section shall be implemented no later than September 1, 1999.

(2) The community placement oversight committees may review and make recommendations regarding the placement of any juvenile who the secretary proposes to place in the community facility.

(3) The community placement oversight committees, their members, and any agency represented by a member shall not be liable in any cause of action as a result of its decision in regard to a proposed placement of a juvenile unless the committee acts with gross negligence or bad faith in making a placement decision.

(4) Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) Except as provided in RCW 13.40.215, at least seventy-two hours prior to placing a juvenile in a community facility the secretary shall provide to the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction in which the community facility is sited: (a) The name of the juvenile; (b) the juvenile's criminal history; and (c) such other relevant and disclosable information as the law enforcement officer may require.

Sec. 706. RCW 72.05.435 and 1998 c 269 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish by rule a policy for the common use of residential group homes for juvenile offenders under the jurisdiction of the ((juvenile rehabilitation administration and the children's administration)) department.

(2) A juvenile confined under the jurisdiction of the ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department who is convicted of a class A felony is not eligible for placement in a community facility operated by ((children's administration)) the department that houses juveniles ((who are not under the jurisdiction of juvenile rehabilitation administration)) under the department's care pursuant to a dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW unless:

(a) The juvenile is housed in a separate living unit solely for juvenile offenders;

(b) The community facility is a specialized treatment program and the youth is not assessed as sexually aggressive under RCW 13.40.470; or

(c) The community facility is a specialized treatment program that houses one or more sexually aggressive youth and the juvenile is not assessed as sexually vulnerable under RCW 13.40.470.

Sec. 707. RCW 72.05.440 and 1998 c 269 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person shall not be eligible for an employed or volunteer position within the ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department of children, youth, and families or any agency with which it contracts in which the person may have regular access to juveniles under the jurisdiction of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or the department of corrections if the person has been convicted of one or more of the following:

(a) Any felony sex offense;

(b) Any violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only to persons hired by the department or any of its contracting agencies after September 1, 1998.

(3) Any person employed by the ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) department of children, youth, and families, or by any contracting agency, who may have regular access to juveniles under the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and families or the department of corrections and who is convicted of an offense set forth in this section after September 1, 1998, shall report the conviction to his or her supervisor. The report must be made within seven days of conviction. Failure to report within seven days of conviction constitutes misconduct under Title 50 RCW.

(4) For purposes of this section "may have regular access to juveniles" means access for more than a nominal amount of time.

(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 708. RCW 72.19.010 and 1979 c 141 s 222 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby established under the supervision and control of the secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families a correctional institution for the confinement and rehabilitation of juveniles committed by the juvenile courts to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families. Such institution shall be situated upon publicly owned lands within King county, under the supervision of the department of natural resources, which land is located in the vicinity of Echo Lake and more particularly situated in Section 34, Township 24 North, Range 7 East W.M. and that portion of Section 3, Township 23 North, Range 7 East W.M. lying north of U.S. Highway 10, together with necessary access routes thereto, all of which tract is leased by the department of natural resources to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families for the establishment and construction of the correctional institution authorized and provided for in this chapter.

Sec. 709. RCW 72.19.020 and 1979 c 141 s 223 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of children, youth, and families may make, amend, and repeal rules ((and regulations)) for the administration of the juvenile correctional institution established by this chapter in furtherance of the provisions of this chapter and not inconsistent with law.

Sec. 710. RCW 72.19.030 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 41 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of the correctional institution established by this chapter shall be appointed by the secretary of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 711. RCW 72.19.040 and 2012 c 117 s 461 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent, subject to the approval of the secretary of children, youth, and families, shall appoint such associate superintendents as shall be deemed necessary. In the event the superintendent shall be absent from the institution, or during periods of illness or other situations incapacitating the superintendent from properly performing his or her duties, one of the associate superintendents of such institution shall act as superintendent during such period of absence, illness, or incapacity as may be designated by the secretary of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 712. RCW 72.19.050 and 1993 c 281 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent shall have the following powers, duties and responsibilities:

(1) Subject to the rules of the department of children, youth, and families, the superintendent shall have the supervision and management of the institution, of the grounds and buildings, the subordinate officers and employees, and of the juveniles received at such institution and the custody of such persons until released or transferred as provided by law.

(2) Subject to the rules of the department of children, youth, and families and the ((Washington personnel resources board)) office of financial management, appoint all subordinate officers and employees.

(3) The superintendent shall be the custodian of the personal property of all juveniles in the institution and shall make rules governing the accounting and disposition of all moneys received by such juveniles, not inconsistent with the law, and subject to the approval of the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 713. RCW 72.19.060 and 1979 c 141 s 227 are each amended to read as follows:

The plans and construction of the juvenile correctional institution established by this chapter shall provide for adequate separation of the residential housing of the male juvenile from the female juvenile. In all other respects, the juvenile correctional programs for both boys and girls may be combined or separated as the secretary of children, youth, and families deems most reasonable and effective to accomplish the reformation, training and rehabilitation of the juvenile offender, realizing all possible economies from the lack of necessity for duplication of facilities.

Sec. 714. RCW 72.72.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created, in the state treasury, an institutional impact account. The secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families. Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.

(2) The secretary of corrections may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections. Such reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.

Sec. 715. RCW 72.72.040 and 1983 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and the secretary of corrections shall each promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW regarding the reimbursement process for their respective agencies.

(2) Reimbursement shall not be made if otherwise provided pursuant to other provisions of state law.

Sec. 716. RCW 13.06.020 and 1983 c 191 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

From any state moneys made available for such purpose, the state of Washington, through the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, shall, in accordance with this chapter and applicable departmental rules, share in the cost of providing services to juveniles.

Sec. 717. RCW 13.06.030 and 1983 c 191 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall adopt rules prescribing minimum standards for the operation of consolidated juvenile services programs for juvenile offenders and such other rules as may be necessary for the administration of the provisions of this chapter. Consolidated juvenile services is a mechanism through which the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families supports local county comprehensive program plans in providing services to offender groups. Standards shall be sufficiently flexible to support current programs which have demonstrated effectiveness and efficiency, to foster development of innovative and improved services for juvenile offenders, to permit direct contracting with private vendors, and to encourage community support for and assistance to local programs. The secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall seek advice from appropriate juvenile justice system participants in developing standards and procedures for the operation of consolidated juvenile services programs and the distribution of funds under this chapter.

Sec. 718. RCW 13.06.040 and 1983 c 191 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county or group of counties may make application to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families in the manner and form prescribed by the department for financial aid for the cost of consolidated juvenile services programs. Any such application must include a plan or plans for providing consolidated services to juvenile offenders in accordance with standards of the department.

Sec. 719. RCW 13.06.050 and 1993 c 415 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

No county shall be entitled to receive any state funds provided by this chapter until its application and plan are approved, and unless and until the minimum standards prescribed by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families are complied with and then only on such terms as are set forth in this section. In addition, any county making application for state funds under this chapter that also operates a juvenile detention facility must have standards of operations in place that include: Intake and admissions, medical and health care, communication, correspondence, visiting and telephone use, security and control, sanitation and hygiene, juvenile rights, rules and discipline, property, juvenile records, safety and emergency procedures, programming, release and transfer, training and staff development, and food service.

(1) The distribution of funds to a county or a group of counties shall be based on criteria including but not limited to the county's per capita income, regional or county at-risk populations, juvenile crime or arrest rates, rates of poverty, size of racial minority populations, existing programs, and the effectiveness and efficiency of consolidating local programs towards reducing commitments to state correctional facilities for offenders whose standard range disposition does not include commitment of the offender to the department and reducing reliance on other traditional departmental services.

(2) The secretary of children, youth, and families will reimburse a county upon presentation and approval of a valid claim pursuant to the provisions of this chapter based on actual performance in meeting the terms and conditions of the approved plan and contract. Funds received by participating counties under this chapter shall not be used to replace local funds for existing programs.

(3) The secretary of children, youth, and families, in conjunction with the human rights commission, shall evaluate the effectiveness of programs funded under this chapter in reducing racial disproportionality. The secretary shall investigate whether implementation of such programs has reduced disproportionality in counties with initially high levels of disproportionality. The analysis shall indicate which programs are cost-effective in reducing disproportionality in such areas as alternatives to detention, intake and risk assessment standards pursuant to RCW 13.40.038, alternatives to incarceration, and in the prosecution and adjudication of juveniles. The secretary shall report his or her findings to the legislature by ((December 1, 1994, and)) December 1st of each year ((thereafter)).

Sec. 720. RCW 28A.190.010 and 2014 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A program of education shall be provided for by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and the several school districts of the state for common school-age persons who have been admitted to facilities staffed and maintained or contracted pursuant to RCW 13.40.320 by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families for the education and treatment of juveniles who have been diverted or who have been found to have committed a juvenile offense. The division of duties, authority, and liabilities of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and the several school districts of the state respecting the educational programs shall be the same in all respects as set forth in this chapter respecting programs of education for state residential school residents. For the purposes of this section, the term "residential school" or "schools" as used in this chapter shall be construed to mean a facility staffed and maintained by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or a program established under RCW 13.40.320, for the education and treatment of juvenile offenders on probation or parole. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a school district from utilizing the services of an educational service district subject to RCW 28A.310.180.

Sec. 721. RCW 28A.190.020 and 2014 c 157 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The term "residential school" as used in this chapter and RCW 72.01.200, 72.05.010, and 72.05.130 means Green Hill school, ((Maple Lane school,)) Naselle Youth Camp, ((Cedar Creek Youth Camp, Mission Creek Youth Camp,)) Echo Glen, Lakeland Village, Rainier school, Yakima Valley school, Interlake school, Fircrest school, Francis Haddon Morgan Center, the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of western state hospital, and such other schools, camps, and centers as are now or hereafter established by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for the diagnosis, confinement and rehabilitation of juveniles committed by the courts or for the care and treatment of persons who are exceptional in their needs by reason of mental and/or physical deficiency: PROVIDED, That the term shall not include the state schools for the deaf and blind or adult correctional institutions.

Sec. 722. RCW 28A.190.040 and 1990 c 33 s 173 are each amended to read as follows:

The duties and authority of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and of each superintendent or chief administrator of a residential school to support each program of education conducted by a school district pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030, shall include the following:

(1) The provision of transportation for residential school students to and from the sites of the program of education through the purchase, lease or rental of school buses and other vehicles as necessary;

(2) The provision of safe and healthy building and playground space for the conduct of the program of education through the construction, purchase, lease or rental of such space as necessary;

(3) The provision of furniture, vocational instruction machines and tools, building and playground fixtures, and other equipment and fixtures for the conduct of the program of education through construction, purchase, lease or rental as necessary;

(4) The provision of heat, lights, telephones, janitorial services, repair services, and other support services for the vehicles, building and playground spaces, equipment and fixtures provided for in this section;

(5) The employment, supervision and control of persons to transport students and to maintain the vehicles, building and playground spaces, equipment and fixtures, provided for in this section;

(6) Clinical and medical evaluation services necessary to a determination by the school district of the educational needs of residential school students; and

(7) Such other support services and facilities as are reasonably necessary for the conduct of the program of education.

Sec. 723. RCW 28A.190.050 and 1990 c 33 s 174 are each amended to read as follows:

Each school district required to conduct a program of education pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030, and the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall hereafter negotiate and execute a written contract for each school year or such longer period as may be agreed to which delineates the manner in which their respective duties and authority will be cooperatively performed and exercised, and any disputes and grievances resolved. Any such contract may provide for the performance of duties by a school district in addition to those set forth in RCW 28A.190.030 (1) through (5), including duties imposed upon the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families and its agents pursuant to RCW 28A.190.040: PROVIDED, That funds identified in RCW 28A.190.030(6) and/or funds provided by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families are available to fully pay the direct and indirect costs of such additional duties and the district is otherwise authorized by law to perform such duties in connection with the maintenance and operation of a school district.

Sec. 724. RCW 28A.190.060 and 2014 c 157 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall provide written notice on or before April 15th of each school year to the superintendent of each school district conducting a program of education pursuant to this chapter of any foreseeable residential school closure, reduction in the number of residents, or any other cause for a reduction in the school district's staff for the next school year. In the event the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families fails to provide notice as prescribed by this section, the department shall be liable and responsible for the payment of the salary and employment related costs for the next school year of each school district employee whose contract the school district would have nonrenewed but for the failure of the department to provide notice.

Sec. 725. RCW 71.34.795 and 1985 c 354 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

When in the judgment of the department of children, youth, and families the welfare of any person committed to or confined in any state juvenile correctional institution or facility necessitates that the person be transferred or moved for observation, diagnosis, or treatment to an evaluation and treatment facility, the secretary of children, youth, and families or the secretary's designee is authorized to order and effect such move or transfer for a period of up to fourteen days, provided that the secretary notifies the original committing court of the transfer and the evaluation and treatment facility is in agreement with the transfer. No person committed to or confined in any state juvenile correctional institution or facility may be transferred to an evaluation and treatment facility for more than fourteen days unless that person has been admitted as a voluntary patient or committed for one hundred eighty-day treatment under this chapter or ninety-day treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW if eighteen years of age or older. Underlying jurisdiction of minors transferred or committed under this section remains with the state correctional institution. A voluntary admitted minor or minors committed under this section and no longer meeting the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be returned to the state correctional institution to serve the remaining time of the underlying dispositional order or sentence. The time spent by the minor at the evaluation and treatment facility shall be credited towards the minor's juvenile court sentence.

Sec. 726. RCW 72.01.010 and 1981 c 136 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

"Department" means the departments of social and health services, children, youth, and families, and corrections; and

"Secretary" means the secretaries of social and health services, children, youth, and families, and corrections.

The powers and duties granted and imposed in this chapter, when applicable, apply to ((both)) the departments of social and health services, children, youth, and families, and corrections and the secretaries of social and health services, children, youth, and families and corrections, for institutions under their control. A power or duty may be exercised or fulfilled jointly if joint action is more efficient, as determined by the secretaries.

Sec. 727. RCW 72.01.210 and 2008 c 104 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of corrections shall appoint institutional chaplains for the state correctional institutions for convicted felons. Institutional chaplains shall be appointed as employees of the department of corrections. The secretary of corrections may further contract with chaplains to be employed as is necessary to meet the religious needs of those inmates whose religious denominations are not represented by institutional chaplains and where volunteer chaplains are not available.

(2) Institutional chaplains appointed by the department of corrections under this section shall have qualifications necessary to function as religious program coordinators for all faith groups represented within the department. Every chaplain so appointed or contracted with shall have qualifications consistent with community standards of the given faith group to which the chaplain belongs and shall not be required to violate the tenets of his or her faith when acting in an ecclesiastical role.

(3) The secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall appoint chaplains for the correctional institutions for juveniles found delinquent by the juvenile courts; and the secretary of corrections and the secretary of social and health services shall appoint one or more chaplains for other custodial, correctional, and mental institutions under their control.

(4) Except as provided in this section, the chaplains so appointed under this section shall have the qualifications and shall be compensated in an amount as recommended by the appointing department and approved by the Washington personnel resources board.

Sec. 728. RCW 72.01.410 and 2015 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any child under the age of eighteen is convicted as an adult in the courts of this state of a crime amounting to a felony, and is committed for a term of confinement, that child shall be initially placed in a facility operated by the department of corrections to determine the child's earned release date.

(a) If the earned release date is prior to the child's twenty-first birthday, the department of corrections shall transfer the child to the custody of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, or to such other institution as is now, or may hereafter be authorized by law to receive such child, until such time as the child completes the ordered term of confinement or arrives at the age of twenty-one years.

(i) While in the custody of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, the child must have the same treatment, housing options, transfer, and access to program resources as any other child committed directly to that juvenile correctional facility or institution pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW. Treatment, placement, and program decisions shall be at the sole discretion of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families. The youth shall only be transferred back to the custody of the department of corrections with the approval of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or when the child reaches the age of twenty-one.

(ii) If the child's sentence includes a term of community custody, the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall not release the child to community custody until the department of corrections has approved the child's release plan pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(b). If a child is held past his or her earned release date pending release plan approval, the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall retain custody until a plan is approved or the child completes the ordered term of confinement prior to age twenty-one.

(iii) If the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families determines that retaining custody of the child presents a safety risk, the child may be returned to the custody of the department of corrections.

(b) If the child's earned release date is on or after the child's twenty-first birthday, the department of corrections shall, with the consent of the secretary of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families, transfer the child to a facility or institution operated by the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families. Despite the transfer, the department of corrections retains authority over custody decisions and must approve any leave from the facility. When the child turns age twenty-one, he or she must be transferred back to the department of corrections. The department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families has all routine and day-to-day operations authority for the child while in its custody.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, an offender under the age of eighteen who is convicted in adult criminal court and who is committed to a term of confinement at the department of corrections must be placed in a housing unit, or a portion of a housing unit, that is separated from offenders eighteen years of age or older, until the offender reaches the age of eighteen.

(b) An offender who reaches eighteen years of age may remain in a housing unit for offenders under the age of eighteen if the secretary of corrections determines that: (i) The offender's needs and the correctional goals for the offender could continue to be better met by the programs and housing environment that is separate from offenders eighteen years of age and older; and (ii) the programs or housing environment for offenders under the age of eighteen will not be substantially affected by the continued placement of the offender in that environment. The offender may remain placed in a housing unit for offenders under the age of eighteen until such time as the secretary of corrections determines that the offender's needs and correctional goals are no longer better met in that environment but in no case past the offender's twenty-first birthday.

(c) An offender under the age of eighteen may be housed in an intensive management unit or administrative segregation unit containing offenders eighteen years of age or older if it is necessary for the safety or security of the offender or staff. In these cases, the offender must be kept physically separate from other offenders at all times.

PART VIII

ADMINISTRATIVE AND MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801. (1) The secretary shall investigate the conviction records, pending charges, and disciplinary board final decisions of any current employee or applicant seeking or being considered for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised access to children. This includes, but is not limited to, positions conducting comprehensive assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards.

(2) The secretary shall require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation as provided in RCW 43.43.837. Unless otherwise authorized by law, the secretary shall use the information solely for the purpose of determining the character, suitability, and competence of the applicant.

(3) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such information as they may have and that the secretary may require for such purpose.

(4) Any person whose criminal history would otherwise disqualify the person under this section from a position that will or may have unsupervised access to children shall not be disqualified if the department of social and health services reviewed the person's otherwise disqualifying criminal history through the department of social and health services' background assessment review team process conducted in 2002 and determined that such person could remain in a position covered by this section, or if the otherwise disqualifying conviction or disposition has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802. (1) The department of early learning is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the department of children, youth, and families. All references to the secretary or the department of early learning in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department of children, youth, and families.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of early learning shall be delivered to the custody of the department of children, youth, and families. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of early learning shall be made available to the department of children, youth, and families. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of early learning shall be assigned to the department of children, youth, and families.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of early learning shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department of children, youth, and families.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of early learning are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and families. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of children, youth, and families to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of early learning shall be continued and acted upon by the department of children, youth, and families. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of early learning shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7)(a) The bargaining units of employees at the department of early learning existing on the effective date of this section that are transferred to the department of children, youth, and families shall be considered separate appropriate units within the department of children, youth, and families unless and until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the bargaining units of employees at the department of early learning existing on the effective date of this section shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

(b) The public employment relations commission may review the appropriateness of the collective bargaining units that are a result of the transfer from the department of early learning to the department of children, youth, and families under chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (this act). The employer or the exclusive bargaining representative may petition the public employment relations commission to review the bargaining units in accordance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services pertaining to child welfare services under chapters 13.34, 13.36, 13.38, 13.50, 13.60, 13.64, 26.33, 26.44, 74.13, 74.13A, 74.14B, 74.14C, and 74.15 RCW are transferred to the department of children, youth, and families. All references to the secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department of children, youth, and families when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of children, youth, and families. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the department of children, youth, and families. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the department of children, youth, and families.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department of children, youth, and families.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and families. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of children, youth, and families to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of children, youth, and families. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7)(a) The portions of any bargaining units of employees at the department of social and health services existing on the effective date of this section that are transferred to the department of children, youth, and families shall be considered separate appropriate units within the department of children, youth, and families unless and until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of social and health services existing on the effective date of this section shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

(b) The public employment relations commission may review the appropriateness of the collective bargaining units that are a result of the transfer from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families under chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (this act). The employer or the exclusive bargaining representative may petition the public employment relations commission to review the bargaining units in accordance with this section.

Sec. 804. RCW 9.96A.060 and 2001 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter is not applicable to the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families when employing a person, who in the course of his or her employment, has or may have unsupervised access to any person who is under the age of eighteen, who is under the age of twenty-one and has been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families under chapter 13.40 RCW, who is a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34 RCW, or who is a vulnerable person. For purposes of this section "vulnerable person" means an adult of any age who lacks the functional, mental, or physical ability to care for himself or herself.

Sec. 805. RCW 9.97.020 and 2016 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, no state, county, or municipal department, board, officer, or agency authorized to assess the qualifications of any applicant for a license, certificate of authority, qualification to engage in the practice of a profession or business, or for admission to an examination to qualify for such a license or certificate may disqualify a qualified applicant, solely based on the applicant's criminal history, if the qualified applicant has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity and the applicant meets all other statutory and regulatory requirements, except as required by federal law or exempted under this subsection. Nothing in this section is interpreted as restoring or creating a means to restore any firearms rights or eligibility to obtain a firearm dealer license pursuant to RCW 9.41.110 or requiring the removal of a protection order.

(a)(i) Criminal justice agencies, as defined in RCW 10.97.030, and the Washington state bar association are exempt from this section.

(ii) This section does not apply to the licensing, certification, or qualification of the following professionals: Accountants, RCW 18.04.295; assisted living facilities employees, RCW 18.20.125; bail bond agents, RCW 18.185.020; escrow agents, RCW 18.44.241; long-term care workers, RCW 18.88B.080; nursing home administrators, RCW 18.52.071; nursing, chapter 18.79 RCW; physicians and physician assistants, chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; private investigators, RCW 18.165.030; receivers, RCW 7.60.035; teachers, chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410 RCW; notaries public, chapter 42.44 RCW; private investigators, chapter 18.165 RCW; real estate brokers and salespersons, chapters 18.85 and 18.86 RCW; security guards, chapter 18.170 RCW; and vulnerable adult care providers, RCW 43.43.842.

(iii) To the extent this section conflicts with the requirements for receipt of federal funding under the adoption and safe families act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 671, this section does not apply.

(b) Unless otherwise addressed in statute, in cases where an applicant would be disqualified under RCW 43.20A.710, and the applicant has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity, the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families may, after review of relevant factors, including the nature and seriousness of the offense, time that has passed since conviction, changed circumstances since the offense occurred, and the nature of the employment or license sought, at ((its)) their discretion:

(i) Allow the applicant to have unsupervised access to children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities if the applicant is otherwise qualified and suitable; or

(ii) Disqualify the applicant solely based on the applicant's criminal history.

(c) If the practice of a profession or business involves unsupervised contact with vulnerable adults, children, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities, or populations otherwise defined by statute as vulnerable, the department of health may, after review of relevant factors, including the nature and seriousness of the offense, time that has passed since conviction, changed circumstances since the offense occurred, and the nature of the employment or license sought, at its discretion:

(i) Disqualify an applicant who has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity, for a license, certification, or registration to engage in the practice of a health care profession or business solely based on the applicant's criminal history; or

(ii) If such applicant is otherwise qualified and suitable, credential or credential with conditions an applicant who has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity for a license, certification, or registration to engage in the practice of a health care profession or business.

(d) The state of Washington, any of its counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations, the department of health, and its officers, employees, contractors, and agents are immune from suit in law, equity, or any action under the administrative procedure act based upon its exercise of discretion under this section. This section does not create a protected class; private right of action; any right, privilege, or duty; or change to any right, privilege, or duty existing under law. This section does not modify a licensing or certification applicant's right to a review of an agency's decision under the administrative procedure act or other applicable statute or agency rule. A certificate of restoration of opportunity does not remove or alter citizenship or legal residency requirements already in place for state agencies and employers.

(2) A qualified court has jurisdiction to issue a certificate of restoration of opportunity to a qualified applicant.

(a) A court must determine, in its discretion whether the certificate:

(i) Applies to all past criminal history; or

(ii) Applies only to the convictions or adjudications in the jurisdiction of the court.

(b) The certificate does not apply to any future criminal justice involvement that occurs after the certificate is issued.

(c) A court must determine whether to issue a certificate by determining whether the applicant is a qualified applicant as defined in RCW 9.97.010.

(3) An employer or housing provider may, in its sole discretion, determine whether to consider a certificate of restoration of opportunity issued under this chapter in making employment or rental decisions. An employer or housing provider is immune from suit in law, equity, or under the administrative procedure act for damages based upon its exercise of discretion under this section or the refusal to exercise such discretion. In any action at law against an employer or housing provider arising out of the employment of or provision of housing to the recipient of a certificate of restoration of opportunity, evidence of the crime for which a certificate of restoration of opportunity has been issued may not be introduced as evidence of negligence or intentionally tortious conduct on the part of the employer or housing provider. This subsection does not create a protected class, private right of action, any right, privilege, or duty, or to change any right, privilege, or duty existing under law related to employment or housing except as provided in RCW 7.60.035.

(4)(a) Department of social and health services: A certificate of restoration of opportunity does not apply to the state abuse and neglect registry. No finding of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property may be removed from the registry based solely on a certificate. The department must include such certificates as part of its criminal history record reports, qualifying letters, or other assessments pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.838. The department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.

(b) Washington state patrol: The Washington state patrol is not required to remove any records based solely on a certificate of restoration of opportunity. The state patrol must include a certificate as part of its criminal history record report.

(c) Court records:

(i) A certificate of restoration of opportunity has no effect on any other court records, including records in the judicial information system. The court records related to a certificate of restoration of opportunity must be processed and recorded in the same manner as any other record.

(ii) The qualified court where the applicant seeks the certificate of restoration of opportunity must administer the court records regarding the certificate in the same manner as it does regarding all other proceedings.

(d) Effect in other judicial proceedings: A certificate of restoration of opportunity may only be submitted to a court to demonstrate that the individual met the specific requirements of this section and not for any other procedure, including evidence of character, reputation, or conduct. A certificate is not an equivalent procedure under Rule of Evidence 609(c).

(e) Department of health: The department of health must include a certificate of restoration of opportunity on its public web site if:

(i) Its web site includes an order, stipulation to informal disposition, or notice of decision related to the conviction identified in the certificate of restoration of opportunity; and

(ii) The credential holder has provided a certified copy of the certificate of restoration of opportunity to the department of health.

(f) Department of children, youth, and families: A certificate of restoration of opportunity does not apply to founded findings of child abuse or neglect. No finding of child abuse or neglect may be destroyed based solely on a certificate. The department of children, youth, and families must include such certificates as part of its criminal history record reports, qualifying letters, or other assessments pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.838. The department of children, youth, and families shall adopt rules to implement this subsection (4)(f).

(5) In all cases, an applicant must provide notice to the prosecutor in the county where he or she seeks a certificate of restoration of opportunity of the pendency of such application. If the applicant has been sentenced by any other jurisdiction in the five years preceding the application for a certificate, the applicant must also notify the prosecuting attorney in those jurisdictions. The prosecutor in the county where an applicant applies for a certificate shall provide the court with a report of the applicant's criminal history.

(6) Application for a certificate of restoration of opportunity must be filed as a civil action.

(7) A superior court in the county in which the applicant resides may decline to consider the application for certificate of restoration of opportunity. If the superior court in which the applicant resides declines to consider the application, the court must dismiss the application without prejudice and the applicant may refile the application in another qualified court. The court must state the reason for the dismissal on the order. If the court determines that the applicant does not meet the required qualifications, then the court must dismiss the application without prejudice and state the reason(s) on the order. The superior court in the county of the applicant's conviction or adjudication may not decline to consider the application.

(8) Unless the qualified court determines that a hearing on an application for certificate of restoration is necessary, the court must decide without a hearing whether to grant the certificate of restoration of opportunity based on a review of the application filed by the applicant and pleadings filed by the prosecuting attorney.

(9) The clerk of the court in which the certificate of restoration of opportunity is granted shall transmit the certificate of restoration of opportunity to the Washington state patrol identification section, which holds criminal history information for the person who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol shall update its records to reflect the certificate of restoration of opportunity.

(10)(a) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and prepare instructions, forms, and an informational brochure designed to assist applicants applying for a certificate of restoration of opportunity.

(b) The instructions must include, at least, a sample of a standard application and a form order for a certificate of restoration of opportunity.

(c) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a master copy of the instructions, informational brochure, and sample application and form order to all county clerks and a master copy of the application and order to all superior courts by January 1, 2017.

(d) The administrative office of the courts shall determine the significant non-English-speaking or limited English-speaking populations in the state. The administrator shall then arrange for translation of the instructions, which shall contain a sample of the standard application and order, and the informational brochure into languages spoken by those significant non-English-speaking populations and shall distribute a master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures to the county clerks by January 1, 2017.

(e) The administrative office of the courts shall update the instructions, brochures, standard application and order, and translations when changes in the law make an update necessary.

Sec. 806. RCW 41.06.475 and 2007 c 387 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall adopt rules, in cooperation with the ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, for the background investigation of current employees and of persons being actively considered for positions with the department who will or may have unsupervised access to children. The director shall also adopt rules, in cooperation with the ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, for background investigation of positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards. "Considered for positions" includes decisions about (1) initial hiring, layoffs, reallocations, transfers, promotions, or demotions, or (2) other decisions that result in an individual being in a position that will or may have unsupervised access to children as an employee, an intern, or a volunteer.

Sec. 807. RCW 41.56.030 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW 70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded long-term care programs.

(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in their employment relations with employers.

(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or 74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor program.

(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters, including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.

(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the commission.

(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours; (b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) under chapter 43.215 RCW (as recodified by this act), is either licensed by the state ((under RCW 74.15.030)) or is exempt from licensing ((under chapter 74.15 RCW)).

(8) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.

(9) "Institution of higher education" means the University of Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.

(10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor who provides spoken language interpreter services for department of social and health services appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments, or department of children, youth, and families appointments, or provided these services on or after January 1, 2009, and before June 10, 2010, whether paid by a broker, language access agency, or the department.

(b) "Language access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or employee of a broker or a language access agency.

(11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or (ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from a bargaining unit.

(12) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission, council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district court or superior court.

(13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(9), by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency medical services, or both; (h) employees in the several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer; or (i) court marshals of any county who are employed by, trained for, and commissioned by the county sheriff and charged with the responsibility of enforcing laws, protecting and maintaining security in all county-owned or contracted property, and performing any other duties assigned to them by the county sheriff or mandated by judicial order.

Sec. 808. RCW 41.56.510 and 2010 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter applies to the governor with respect to language access providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the governor is the public employer of language access providers who, solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees. The governor or the governor's designee shall represent the public employer for bargaining purposes.

(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, between the governor and language access providers, except as follows:

(a) A statewide unit of all language access providers is the only unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW 41.56.060;

(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of language access providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW 41.56.070.

Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention filed under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW;

(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for language access providers under this section is limited solely to: (i) Economic compensation, such as the manner and rate of payments; (ii) professional development and training; (iii) labor-management committees; and (iv) grievance procedures. Retirement benefits are not subject to collective bargaining. By such obligation neither party may be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter;

(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of language access providers, except that:

(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;

(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not binding on the state;

(e) Language access providers do not have the right to strike.

(3) Language access providers who are public employees solely for the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining relationship between the employer and language access providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4) Each party with whom the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families contracts for language access services and each of their subcontractors shall provide to the department an accurate list of language access providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, including their names, addresses, and other contact information, annually by January 30th, except that initially the lists must be provided within thirty days of June 10, 2010. The department shall, upon request, provide a list of all language access providers, including their names, addresses, and other contact information, to a labor union seeking to represent language access providers.

(5) This section does not create or modify:

(a) The department's obligation to comply with the federal statute and regulations; and

(b) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to the delivery of state services under chapter 74.04 RCW. The governor may not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights described in this subsection.

(6) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW 43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement.

(7) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under this section may not be submitted by the governor to the legislature unless the request has been:

(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October 1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section, the request may not be submitted before July 1, 2011; and

(b) Certified by the director of financial management as financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this section.

(8) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the agreement.

(9) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(10) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement.

(11) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the joint activities of language access providers and their exclusive bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 809. RCW 43.20A.090 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 515 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary shall appoint a deputy secretary, a department personnel director and such assistant secretaries as shall be needed to administer the department. The deputy secretary shall have charge and general supervision of the department in the absence or disability of the secretary, and in case of a vacancy in the office of secretary, shall continue in charge of the department until a successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor shall appoint an acting secretary. ((The secretary shall appoint an assistant secretary to administer the juvenile rehabilitation responsibilities required of the department by chapters 13.04, 13.40, and 13.50 RCW.)) The officers appointed under this section, and exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law by the terms of RCW 41.06.076, shall be paid salaries to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the procedure established by law for the fixing of salaries for officers exempt from the operation of the state civil service law.

Sec. 810. RCW 70.02.200 and 2015 c 267 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the disclosures authorized by RCW 70.02.050 and 70.02.210, a health care provider or health care facility may disclose health care information, except for information and records related to sexually transmitted diseases and information related to mental health services which are addressed by RCW 70.02.220 through 70.02.260, about a patient without the patient's authorization, to:

(a) Any other health care provider or health care facility reasonably believed to have previously provided health care to the patient, to the extent necessary to provide health care to the patient, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;

(b) Immediate family members of the patient, including a patient's state registered domestic partner, or any other individual with whom the patient is known to have a close personal relationship, if made in accordance with good medical or other professional practice, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;

(c) A health care provider or health care facility who is the successor in interest to the health care provider or health care facility maintaining the health care information;

(d) A person who obtains information for purposes of an audit, if that person agrees in writing to:

(i) Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with the purpose of the audit, information that would enable the patient to be identified; and

(ii) Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish the audit or report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in payment for health care by a health care provider or patient, or other unlawful conduct by the health care provider;

(e) Provide directory information, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health care facility not to make the disclosure;

(f) Fire, police, sheriff, or other public authority, that brought, or caused to be brought, the patient to the health care facility or health care provider if the disclosure is limited to the patient's name, residence, sex, age, occupation, condition, diagnosis, estimated or actual discharge date, or extent and location of injuries as determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious when admitted;

(g) Federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities and the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor believes in good faith that the health care information disclosed constitutes evidence of criminal conduct that occurred on the premises of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor;

(h) Another health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor for the health care operations of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor that receives the information, if each entity has or had a relationship with the patient who is the subject of the health care information being requested, the health care information pertains to such relationship, and the disclosure is for the purposes described in RCW 70.02.010(17) (a) and (b);

(i) An official of a penal or other custodial institution in which the patient is detained; and

(j) Any law enforcement officer, corrections officer, or guard supplied by a law enforcement or corrections agency who is accompanying a patient pursuant to RCW 10.110.020, only to the extent the disclosure is incidental to the fulfillment of the role of the law enforcement officer, corrections officer, or guard under RCW 10.110.020.

(2) In addition to the disclosures required by RCW 70.02.050 and 70.02.210, a health care provider shall disclose health care information, except for information related to sexually transmitted diseases and information related to mental health services which are addressed by RCW 70.02.220 through 70.02.260, about a patient without the patient's authorization if the disclosure is:

(a) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the extent the health care provider is required by law;

(b) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities, upon receipt of a written or oral request made to a nursing supervisor, administrator, or designated privacy official, in a case in which the patient is being treated or has been treated for a bullet wound, gunshot wound, powder burn, or other injury arising from or caused by the discharge of a firearm, or an injury caused by a knife, an ice pick, or any other sharp or pointed instrument which federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe to have been intentionally inflicted upon a person, or a blunt force injury that federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe resulted from a criminal act, the following information, if known:

(i) The name of the patient;

(ii) The patient's residence;

(iii) The patient's sex;

(iv) The patient's age;

(v) The patient's condition;

(vi) The patient's diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as determined by a health care provider;

(vii) Whether the patient was conscious when admitted;

(viii) The name of the health care provider making the determination in (b)(v), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection;

(ix) Whether the patient has been transferred to another facility; and

(x) The patient's discharge time and date;

(c) Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW 70.02.060.

(3) To the extent they retain health care information subject to this chapter, the department of social and health services and the health care authority shall disclose to the department of children, youth, and families health care information, except for information and records related to sexually transmitted diseases and information related to mental health services that are addressed by RCW 70.02.220 through 70.02.260, about a patient without the patient's authorization, for the purpose of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect and providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care. Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act.

Sec. 811. RCW 70.02.230 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 417 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, RCW 70.02.050, 71.05.445, 74.09.295, 70.02.210, 70.02.240, 70.02.250, and 70.02.260, or pursuant to a valid authorization under RCW 70.02.030, the fact of admission to a provider for mental health services and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing mental health services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or private agencies must be confidential.

(2) Information and records related to mental health services, other than those obtained through treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW, may be disclosed only:

(a) In communications between qualified professional persons to meet the requirements of chapter 71.05 RCW, in the provision of services or appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings if provided to a professional person:

(i) Employed by the facility;

(ii) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;

(iii) Who is a designated crisis responder;

(iv) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(v) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where the person is confined or supervised; or

(vi) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of a facility in which the patient resides or will reside;

(c)(i) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian, designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such a designation;

(ii) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any:

(A) The information that the person is presently a patient in the facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;

(B) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and

(iii) Other information requested by the next of kin or attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator;

(d)(i) To the courts as necessary to the administration of chapter 71.05 RCW or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter 10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(ii) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter 10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for the purpose of competency restoration.

(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(e)(i) When a mental health professional or designated crisis responder is requested by a representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the mental health professional or designated crisis responder shall, if requested to do so, advise the representative in writing of the results of the investigation including a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person investigated. The written report must be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs later.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(f) To the attorney of the detained person;

(g) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2), 71.05.340(1)(b), and 71.05.335. The prosecutor must be provided access to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis, medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in the best interest of the committed person or others. Information must be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the person's counsel;

(h)(i) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure must be made by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or his or her designee and must include the dates of commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only any other information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(i)(i) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public. The mental health service agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act;

(j) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes described in those sections;

(k) Upon the death of a person. The person's next of kin, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, must be notified. Next of kin who are of legal age and competent must be notified under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children, brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient are governed by RCW 70.02.140;

(l) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after the death of a patient;

(m) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii). The extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:

(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1), must be disclosed upon request;

(ii) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii);

(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(n) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of the disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee;

(o) Pursuant to lawful order of a court;

(p) To qualified staff members of the department, to the director of behavioral health organizations, to resource management services responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment modality or facility;

(q) Within the mental health service agency where the patient is receiving treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to perform their duties;

(r) Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse of persons who are under the supervision of the department;

(s) Between the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, and the health care authority as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse of persons who are under the supervision of the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(t) To a licensed physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner who has determined that the life or health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the information and records related to mental health services could be injurious to the patient's health. Disclosure must be limited to the portions of the records necessary to meet the medical emergency;

(((t))) (u) Consistent with the requirements of the federal health information portability and accountability act, to a licensed mental health professional or a health care professional licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.71A, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.79, or 18.36A RCW who is providing care to a person, or to whom a person has been referred for evaluation or treatment, to assure coordinated care and treatment of that person. Psychotherapy notes may not be released without authorization of the person who is the subject of the request for release of information;

(((u))) (v) To administrative and office support staff designated to obtain medical records for those licensed professionals listed in (((t))) (u) of this subsection;

(((v))) (w) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from one evaluation and treatment facility to another. The release of records under this subsection is limited to the information and records related to mental health services required by law, a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary. The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's complete treatment record;

(((w))) (x) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(((x))) (y) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional information must notify the patient's resource management services in writing of the request and of the resource management services' right to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not obtain the additional information;

(((y))) (z) To all current treating providers of the patient with prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for the patient within the last twelve months. For purposes of coordinating health care, the department may release without written authorization of the patient, information acquired for billing and collection purposes as described in RCW 70.02.050(1)(d). The department shall notify the patient that billing and collection information has been released to named providers, and provide the substance of the information released and the dates of such release. The department may not release counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and alcohol treatment information without a signed written release from the client;

(((z))) (aa)(i) To the secretary of social and health services for either program evaluation or research, or both so long as the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or research, or both. Such rules must include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding persons who have received services such that the person who received such services is identifiable.

I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . ."

(ii) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary.

(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the information and records related to mental health services of any patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(4) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information about a particular person who is committed to the department of social and health services under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(4)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.

(5) The fact of admission to a provider of mental health services, as well as all records, files, evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside that chapter without the written authorization of the person who was the subject of the proceeding except as provided in RCW 70.02.260, in a subsequent criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(4)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial, in a civil commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor, a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW must be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be maintained.

(6)(a) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, any person may bring an action against an individual who has willfully released confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation of the provisions of this section, for the greater of the following amounts:

(i) One thousand dollars; or

(ii) Three times the amount of actual damages sustained, if any.

(b) It is not a prerequisite to recovery under this subsection that the plaintiff suffered or was threatened with special, as contrasted with general, damages.

(c) Any person may bring an action to enjoin the release of confidential information or records concerning him or her or his or her ward, in violation of the provisions of this section, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in this subsection.

(d) The court may award to the plaintiff, should he or she prevail in any action authorized by this subsection, reasonable attorney fees in addition to those otherwise provided by law.

(e) If an action is brought under this subsection, no action may be brought under RCW 70.02.170.

Sec. 812. RCW 74.04.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) For the protection of applicants and recipients, the department, the authority, and the county offices and their respective officers and employees are prohibited, except as hereinafter provided, from disclosing the contents of any records, files, papers and communications, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of the programs of this title. In any judicial proceeding, except such proceeding as is directly concerned with the administration of these programs, such records, files, papers and communications, and their contents, shall be deemed privileged communications and except for the right of any individual to inquire of the office whether a named individual is a recipient of welfare assistance and such person shall be entitled to an affirmative or negative answer.

(b) Unless prohibited by federal law, for the purpose of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect and providing for the health care coordination and well-being of children in foster care, the department and the authority shall disclose to the department of children, youth, and families the following information: Developmental disabilities administration client records; home and community services client records; long-term care facility or certified community residential supports records; health care information; child support information; food assistance information; and public assistance information. Disclosure under this subsection (1)(b) is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act.

(c) Upon written request of a parent who has been awarded visitation rights in an action for divorce or separation or any parent with legal custody of the child, the department shall disclose to him or her the last known address and location of his or her natural or adopted children. The secretary shall adopt rules which establish procedures for disclosing the address of the children and providing, when appropriate, for prior notice to the custodian of the children. The notice shall state that a request for disclosure has been received and will be complied with by the department unless the department receives a copy of a court order which enjoins the disclosure of the information or restricts or limits the requesting party's right to contact or visit the other party or the child. Information supplied to a parent by the department shall be used only for purposes directly related to the enforcement of the visitation and custody provisions of the court order of separation or decree of divorce. No parent shall disclose such information to any other person except for the purpose of enforcing visitation provisions of the said order or decree.

(((c))) (d) The department shall review methods to improve the protection and confidentiality of information for recipients of welfare assistance who have disclosed to the department that they are past or current victims of domestic violence or stalking.

(2) The county offices shall maintain monthly at their offices a report showing the names and addresses of all recipients in the county receiving public assistance under this title, together with the amount paid to each during the preceding month.

(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to duly designated representatives of approved private welfare agencies, public officials, members of legislative interim committees and advisory committees when performing duties directly connected with the administration of this title, such as regulation and investigation directly connected therewith: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any information so obtained by such persons or groups shall be treated with such degree of confidentiality as is required by the federal social security law.

(4) It shall be unlawful, except as provided in this section, for any person, body, association, firm, corporation or other agency to solicit, publish, disclose, receive, make use of, or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in or acquiesce in the use of any lists or names for commercial or political purposes of any nature. The violation of this section shall be a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 813. RCW 74.34.063 and 2005 c 274 s 354 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall initiate a response to a report, no later than twenty-four hours after knowledge of the report, of suspected abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect of a vulnerable adult.

(2) When the initial report or investigation by the department indicates that the alleged abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect may be criminal, the department shall make an immediate report to the appropriate law enforcement agency. The department and law enforcement will coordinate in investigating reports made under this chapter. The department may provide protective services and other remedies as specified in this chapter.

(3) The law enforcement agency or the department shall report the incident in writing to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for appropriate action whenever the investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed.

(4) The department and law enforcement may share information contained in reports and findings of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, and neglect of vulnerable adults, consistent with RCW 74.04.060, chapter 42.56 RCW, and other applicable confidentiality laws.

(5) Unless prohibited by federal law, the department of social and health services may share with the department of children, youth, and families information contained in reports and findings of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, and neglect of vulnerable adults.

(6) The department shall notify the proper licensing authority concerning any report received under this chapter that alleges that a person who is professionally licensed, certified, or registered under Title 18 RCW has abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected a vulnerable adult.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 814. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.20A.780 (Administration of family services and programs) and 1992 c 198 s 9;

(2) RCW 43.20A.850 (Group homes—Availability of evaluations and data) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 322; and

(3) RCW 43.215.040 (Director—Power and duties) and 2006 c 265 s 105.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 815. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 13.40.800 (Juvenile offenses with firearms—Data—Reports);

(2) RCW 43.215.005 (Finding—Purpose);

(3) RCW 43.215.125 (Washington head start program proposal—Report);

(4) RCW 43.215.907 (Evaluation of department by joint legislative audit and review committee);

(5) RCW 72.05.300 (Parental schools—Leases, purchases—Powers of school district); and

(6) RCW 74.14B.900 (Captions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 816. The following sections are recodified in the new chapter created in section 817 of this act in the following order with the following subchapter headings:

GENERAL PROVISIONS

RCW 43.215.010

RCW 43.215.020

RCW 43.215.030

RCW 43.215.050

RCW 43.215.060

RCW 43.215.065

RCW 43.215.070

RCW 43.215.080

RCW 43.215.090

RCW 43.215.099

RCW 43.215.100

RCW 43.215.1001

RCW 43.215.101

RCW 43.215.102

RCW 43.215.103

RCW 43.215.105

RCW 43.215.110

RCW 43.215.120

RCW 43.215.130

RCW 43.215.135

RCW 43.215.1351

RCW 43.215.1352

RCW 43.215.136

RCW 43.215.137

RCW 43.215.140

RCW 43.215.145

RCW 43.215.146

RCW 43.215.147

RCW 43.215.195

LICENSING

RCW 43.215.200

RCW 43.215.201

RCW 43.215.205

RCW 43.215.210

RCW 43.215.215

RCW 43.215.216

RCW 43.215.217

RCW 43.215.218

RCW 43.215.220

RCW 43.215.230

RCW 43.215.240

RCW 43.215.250

RCW 43.215.255

RCW 43.215.260

RCW 43.215.270

RCW 43.215.280

RCW 43.215.290

RCW 43.215.300

RCW 43.215.305

RCW 43.215.307

RCW 43.215.308

RCW 43.215.310

RCW 43.215.320

RCW 43.215.330

RCW 43.215.335

RCW 43.215.340

RCW 43.215.350

RCW 43.215.355

RCW 43.215.360

RCW 43.215.370

RCW 43.215.371

EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION AND ASSISTANCE

RCW 43.215.400

RCW 43.215.405

RCW 43.215.410

RCW 43.215.415

RCW 43.215.420

RCW 43.215.425

RCW 43.215.430

RCW 43.215.435

RCW 43.215.440

RCW 43.215.445

RCW 43.215.450

RCW 43.215.455

RCW 43.215.456

RCW 43.215.457

RCW 43.215.460

RCW 43.215.470

RCW 43.215.472

RCW 43.215.474

RCW 43.215.476

CHILD CARE

RCW 43.215.490

RCW 43.215.492

RCW 43.215.495

RCW 43.215.500

RCW 43.215.502

RCW 43.215.505

RCW 43.215.510

RCW 43.215.520

RCW 43.215.525

RCW 43.215.530

RCW 43.215.532

RCW 43.215.535

RCW 43.215.540

RCW 43.215.545

RCW 43.215.550

RCW 43.215.555

RCW 43.215.560

RCW 43.215.562

RCW 43.215.564

TECHNICAL PROVISIONS

RCW 43.215.900

RCW 43.215.901

RCW 43.215.903

RCW 43.215.905

RCW 43.215.908

RCW 43.215.909

NEW SECTION. Sec. 817. Sections 101, 104, 106 through 108, and 801 through 803 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 818. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 819. Section 103 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 820. Sections 101, 102, 104 through 111, 201 through 227, 301 through 336, 401 through 419, 501 through 513, and 801 through 818 of this act take effect July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 821. Sections 601 through 630 and 701 through 728 of this act take effect July 1, 2019.

--- END ---