BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

School districts are not liable for civil damages resulting from criminal acts committed by any of their students that occur outside of the district's custody or supervision. However, nothing in this section alters a school district's duty to protect its students from being sexually assaulted by another student who is a registered sex offender during school or school-sponsored activities.

--- END ---