BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16A.010 and 2010 c 161 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Commercial motor vehicle," for the purposes of requiring a department of transportation number, means the same as defined in RCW 46.25.010(6), or a motor vehicle used in commerce when the motor vehicle: (a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or more) inclusive of a towed unit of a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds or more); (b) has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or more); or (c) is used in the transportation of hazardous materials, as defined in RCW 46.25.010(13);

(2) "Department of transportation number" means a department of transportation number from the federal motor carrier safety administration;

(3) "Interstate commercial motor vehicle" means a commercial vehicle that operates in more than one state;

(4) "Intrastate commercial motor vehicle" means a commercial vehicle that operates exclusively within the state of Washington;

(5) "Motor carrier" means a person or entity who has been issued a department of transportation number and who owns a commercial motor vehicle;

(6) "Registration year" means the effective period of a vehicle registration issued by the department. A registration year begins at 12:01 a.m. on the date of the calendar year designated by the department and ends at 12:00 a.m. the same day the following year unless otherwise specified;

(7) "Renewal notice" means the notice to renew a vehicle registration sent to the registered owner by the department;

(8) "Two-year registration period" means the effective period of a vehicle registration issued by the department for a two-year period. A two-year registration period begins at 12:01 a.m. on the date of the calendar year designated by the department and ends at 12:00 a.m. the same day two years later unless otherwise specified.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16A.020 and 2014 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may designate either a one-year registration or a two-year registration when registering a vehicle that is eligible for a two-year registration period. If a two-year registration is designated by the registered owner, all applicable taxes and fees must be collected for a twenty-four month period instead of a twelve-month period. The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall assign a new registration year or two-year registration period to a vehicle if:

(a) The registered ownership of the vehicle is being transferred, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The renewed vehicle registration is valid for a full ((twelve-month)) registration year or two-year registration period unless: (i) The vehicle changes ownership during the ((twelve-month)) registration year or two-year registration period, in which case the registration expires; or (ii) a specific expiration date is required by law, rule, or program; or

(b) The Washington vehicle registration has expired and the registered owner:

(i) Is a member of the United States armed forces;

(ii) Was stationed outside of Washington under military orders during the prior vehicle registration year or two-year registration period; and

(iii) Provides the department a copy of the military orders.

(2) Each registration year may be divided into twelve registration months. Each two-year registration period may be divided into twenty-four registration months. Each registration month begins at 12:01 a.m. on a day of the month assigned by the department and ends at 12:00 a.m. on the same day the following month.

(3) A registration period extends through the end of the next business day when the final day of a registration year or two-year registration period or month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(4) A vehicle registration does not expire when a change in vehicle ownership is the result of one or more of the following circumstances:

(a) When adding a lien holder to the certificate of title or removing a lien holder from the certificate of title;

(b) When a vehicle is transferred from one spouse or registered domestic partner to another;

(c) When removing a deceased spouse or registered domestic partner from the certificate of title;

(d) When a vehicle is transferred by gift or inheritance to one or more members of the registered owner's immediate family;

(e) When a vehicle is transferred into or out of a trust in which the registered owner or one or more immediate family members of the registered owner is the beneficiary;

(f) When a leaseholder buys out the leased vehicle; or

(g) When a person changes his or her name.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.16A.110 and 2014 c 80 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner or the registered owner's authorized representative must apply for a renewal vehicle registration to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form approved by the director. The application for a renewal vehicle registration must be accompanied by a draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash for all fees and taxes required by law for the application for a renewal vehicle registration.

(2)(a) When a vehicle changes ownership, the person taking ownership or his or her authorized representative must apply for a renewal vehicle registration as provided in subsection (1) of this section and, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, pay all the taxes and fees that are due at the time of registration renewal. For the purposes of this section, when a vehicle is sold to a vehicle dealer for resale, the application for a renewal registration need not be made until the vehicle is sold by the vehicle dealer.

(b) The person taking ownership or his or her authorized representative must be given credit for the portion of a motor vehicle excise tax, including the motor vehicle excise tax collected under RCW 81.104.160, that reflects the remaining period for which the tax was initially paid by the previous owner.

(3) An application and the fees and taxes for a renewal vehicle registration must be handled in the same manner as an original vehicle registration application. The registration does not need to show the name of the lien holder when the application for renewal vehicle registration becomes the renewal registration upon validation.

(4) A person expecting to be out of state during the normal renewal period of a vehicle registration may renew a vehicle registration and have license plates or tabs preissued by applying for a renewal as described in subsection (1) of this section. A vehicle registration may be renewed for the subsequent registration year or two-year registration period up to eighteen months before the current expiration date and must be displayed from the date of issue or from the day of the expiration of the current registration year or two-year registration period, whichever date is later.

(5) An application for a renewal vehicle registration is not required for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by:

(a) The state of Washington, or by any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington; or

(b) A governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state and recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department of the interior.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.16A.180 and 2013 c 157 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registration certificate must be:

(a) Signed by the registered owner, or if a firm or corporation, the signature of one of its officers or other authorized agent, to be valid;

(b) Carried in the vehicle for which it is issued; and

(c) Provided to law enforcement and the department by the operator of the vehicle upon demand.

(((d))) (2) The registration certificate required by this section may be provided in either paper or electronic format. Acceptable electronic formats include the display of electronic images on a cellular phone or any other type of portable electronic device.

(((2))) (3) It is unlawful for any person to operate or be in possession of a vehicle without carrying a registration certificate for the vehicle. Any person in charge of a vehicle shall, upon demand of any of the local authorities or of any police officer or of any representative of the department, permit an inspection of the vehicle registration certificate. This section does not apply to a vehicle for which registration is not required to be renewed annually or biennially and is a publicly owned vehicle marked as required under RCW 46.08.065.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.17.005 and 2010 c 161 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall pay a three dollar filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(2) A person who applies for a certificate of title shall pay a four dollar filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(3) The filing fees established in this section must be distributed under RCW 46.68.400.

(4) The filing fees provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be paid for a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and must be doubled appropriately to cover the cost of that twenty-four month period.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.17.015 and 2010 c 161 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall pay a twenty-five cent license plate technology fee for a vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a fifty cent license plate technology fee for a vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The license plate technology fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.370.

(2) A vehicle registered under RCW 46.16A.455 or 46.17.330 is not subject to the license plate technology fee.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.17.025 and 2010 c 161 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall pay a fifty cent license service fee for a vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a one dollar license service fee for a vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The license service fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.220.

(2) A vehicle registered under RCW 46.16A.455 or 46.17.330 is not subject to the license service fee.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.17.040 and 2014 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect a service fee of:

(a) Twelve dollars for changes in a certificate of title, with or without registration renewal, or for verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the certificate of title application or transfer; and

(b) Five dollars for a registration renewal, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this section.

(2) Service fees collected under this section by the department or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director must be credited to the capital vessel replacement account under RCW 47.60.322.

(3) Service fees provided in subsection (1) of this section may be paid for a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and must be doubled appropriately to cover the cost of that twenty-four month period.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.17.210 and 2013 c 329 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration under chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a personalized license plate shall pay an initial fee of fifty-two dollars and forty-two dollars for each renewal. The personalized license plate fee must be distributed as provided in RCW 46.68.435.

(2) Any holder of a personalized license plate who registers his or her vehicle for a two-year registration period as defined in RCW 46.16A.020 shall pay two times the appropriate fee amount listed in subsection (1) of this section to cover the cost of that twenty-four month period.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.17.220 and 2016 c 36 s 2, 2016 c 31 s 2, 2016 c 30 s 3, 2016 c 16 s 2, and 2016 c 15 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate annual special license plate fee as listed in this section. Any holder of a special license plate who registers his or her vehicle for a two-year registration period as defined in RCW 46.16A.020 shall pay two times the appropriate fee amount listed in this section to cover the cost of that twenty-four month period.

PLATE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) 4-H

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(b) Amateur radio license

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(c) Armed forces

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(d) Baseball stadium

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

Subsection (2) of this section

(e) Breast cancer awareness

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(f) Collector vehicle

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Collegiate

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.430

(h) Endangered wildlife

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(i) Gonzaga University alumni association

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(j) Helping kids speak

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(k) Horseless carriage

$ 35.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(l) Keep kids safe

$ 45.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(m) Law enforcement memorial

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(n) Military affiliate radio system

$ 5.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(o) Music matters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(p) Purple Heart

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(q) Professional firefighters and paramedics

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(r) Ride share

$ 25.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.030

(s) Seattle Seahawks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(t) Seattle Sounders FC

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(u) Seattle University

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(v) Share the road

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(w) Ski & ride Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(x) Square dancer

$ 40.00

N/A

RCW 46.68.070

(y) State flower

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(z) Volunteer firefighters

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(aa) Washington farmers and ranchers

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(bb) Washington lighthouses

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(cc) Washington state parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(dd) Washington state wrestling

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(ee) Washington tennis

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(ff) Washington's fish collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(gg) Washington's national parks

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(hh) Washington's wildlife collection

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(ii) We love our pets

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.420

(jj) Wild on Washington

$ 40.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW 82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the state general fund.

Sec. 11. RCW 46.17.305 and 2010 c 161 s 522 are each amended to read as follows:

Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for a boat trailer, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay a three dollar aquatic weed fee for a boat trailer subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a six dollar aquatic weed fee for a boat trailer subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The ((three dollar)) aquatic weed fee must be deposited in the freshwater aquatic weeds account created in RCW 43.21A.650.

Sec. 12. RCW 46.17.323 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for an annual vehicle registration renewal for a vehicle that both (a) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (b) is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant to pay a one hundred dollar fee for an electric vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a two hundred dollar fee for an electric vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The ((one hundred dollar)) fee is due only at the time of annual or biennial registration renewal.

(2) This section only applies to a vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at a speed of more than thirty-five miles per hour.

(3)(a) The fee under this section is imposed to provide funds to mitigate the impact of vehicles on state roads and highways and for the purpose of evaluating the feasibility of transitioning from a revenue collection system based on fuel taxes to a road user assessment system, and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees. Proceeds from the fee must be used for highway purposes, and must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070, subject to (b) of this subsection.

(b) If in any year the amount of proceeds from the fee collected under this section exceeds one million dollars, the excess amount over one million dollars must be deposited as follows:

(i) Seventy percent to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070;

(ii) Fifteen percent to the transportation improvement account created in RCW 47.26.084; and

(iii) Fifteen percent to the rural arterial trust account created in RCW 36.79.020.

(4)(a) In addition to the fee established in subsection (1) of this section, before accepting an application for an annual vehicle registration renewal for a vehicle that both (i) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (ii) is capable of traveling at least thirty miles using only battery power, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant to pay a fifty dollar fee for an electric vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a one hundred dollar fee for an electric vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010.

(b) The fee required under (a) of this subsection must be distributed as follows:

(i) The first one million dollars raised by the fee must be deposited into the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070; and

(ii) Any remaining amounts must be deposited into the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(5) This section applies to annual or biennial vehicle registration renewals until the effective date of enacted legislation that imposes a vehicle miles traveled fee or tax.

Sec. 13. RCW 46.17.350 and 2014 c 30 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE

INITIAL FEE

RENEWAL FEE

DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper

$ 4.90

$ 3.50

RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer

$ 34.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats or less

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered)

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle trailer

$ 15.00

$ 15.00

RCW 46.68.035

(l) Snowmobile

$ 50.00

$ 50.00

RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, vintage

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.68.350

(n) Sport utility vehicle

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(o) Tow truck

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(q) Travel trailer

$ 30.00

$ 30.00

RCW 46.68.030

(r) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, on-road use

$ 12.00

$ 12.00

RCW 46.09.540

(s) Wheeled all-terrain vehicle, off-road use

$ 18.00

$ 18.00

RCW 46.09.510

(2) The vehicle license fees required in subsection (1) of this section may be doubled and paid biennially under a two-year registration period as defined in RCW 46.16A.010.

(3) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, and any other fee or tax required by law.

Sec. 14. RCW 46.17.355 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due before July 1, 2016, in lieu of the vehicle license fee required under RCW 46.17.350 and before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for motor vehicles described in RCW 46.16A.455, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following license fee by weight:

WEIGHT

SCHEDULE A

SCHEDULE B

4,000 pounds

$ 38.00

$ 38.00

6,000 pounds

$ 48.00

$ 48.00

8,000 pounds

$ 58.00

$ 58.00

10,000 pounds

$ 60.00

$ 60.00

12,000 pounds

$ 77.00

$ 77.00

14,000 pounds

$ 88.00

$ 88.00

16,000 pounds

$ 100.00

$ 100.00

18,000 pounds

$ 152.00

$ 152.00

20,000 pounds

$ 169.00

$ 169.00

22,000 pounds

$ 183.00

$ 183.00

24,000 pounds

$ 198.00

$ 198.00

26,000 pounds

$ 209.00

$ 209.00

28,000 pounds

$ 247.00

$ 247.00

30,000 pounds

$ 285.00

$ 285.00

32,000 pounds

$ 344.00

$ 344.00

34,000 pounds

$ 366.00

$ 366.00

36,000 pounds

$ 397.00

$ 397.00

38,000 pounds

$ 436.00

$ 436.00

40,000 pounds

$ 499.00

$ 499.00

42,000 pounds

$ 519.00

$ 609.00

44,000 pounds

$ 530.00

$ 620.00

46,000 pounds

$ 570.00

$ 660.00

48,000 pounds

$ 594.00

$ 684.00

50,000 pounds

$ 645.00

$ 735.00

52,000 pounds

$ 678.00

$ 768.00

54,000 pounds

$ 732.00

$ 822.00

56,000 pounds

$ 773.00

$ 863.00

58,000 pounds

$ 804.00

$ 894.00

60,000 pounds

$ 857.00

$ 947.00

62,000 pounds

$ 919.00

$ 1,009.00

64,000 pounds

$ 939.00

$ 1,029.00

66,000 pounds

$ 1,046.00

$ 1,136.00

68,000 pounds

$ 1,091.00

$ 1,181.00

70,000 pounds

$ 1,175.00

$ 1,265.00

72,000 pounds

$ 1,257.00

$ 1,347.00

74,000 pounds

$ 1,366.00

$ 1,456.00

76,000 pounds

$ 1,476.00

$ 1,566.00

78,000 pounds

$ 1,612.00

$ 1,702.00

80,000 pounds

$ 1,740.00

$ 1,830.00

82,000 pounds

$ 1,861.00

$ 1,951.00

84,000 pounds

$ 1,981.00

$ 2,071.00

86,000 pounds

$ 2,102.00

$ 2,192.00

88,000 pounds

$ 2,223.00

$ 2,313.00

90,000 pounds

$ 2,344.00

$ 2,434.00

92,000 pounds

$ 2,464.00

$ 2,554.00

94,000 pounds

$ 2,585.00

$ 2,675.00

96,000 pounds

$ 2,706.00

$ 2,796.00

98,000 pounds

$ 2,827.00

$ 2,917.00

100,000 pounds

$ 2,947.00

$ 3,037.00

102,000 pounds

$ 3,068.00

$ 3,158.00

104,000 pounds

$ 3,189.00

$ 3,279.00

105,500 pounds

$ 3,310.00

$ 3,400.00

(b) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, in lieu of the vehicle license fee required under RCW 46.17.350 and before accepting an application for a vehicle registration for motor vehicles described in RCW 46.16A.455, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to pay the following license fee by weight:

WEIGHT

SCHEDULE A

SCHEDULE B

4,000 pounds

$ 53.00

$ 53.00

6,000 pounds

$ 73.00

$ 73.00

8,000 pounds

$ 93.00

$ 93.00

10,000 pounds

$ 93.00

$ 93.00

12,000 pounds

$ 81.00

$ 81.00

14,000 pounds

$ 88.00

$ 88.00

16,000 pounds

$ 100.00

$ 100.00

18,000 pounds

$ 152.00

$ 152.00

20,000 pounds

$ 169.00

$ 169.00

22,000 pounds

$ 183.00

$ 183.00

24,000 pounds

$ 198.00

$ 198.00

26,000 pounds

$ 209.00

$ 209.00

28,000 pounds

$ 247.00

$ 247.00

30,000 pounds

$ 285.00

$ 285.00

32,000 pounds

$ 344.00

$ 344.00

34,000 pounds

$ 366.00

$ 366.00

36,000 pounds

$ 397.00

$ 397.00

38,000 pounds

$ 436.00

$ 436.00

40,000 pounds

$ 499.00

$ 499.00

42,000 pounds

$ 519.00

$ 609.00

44,000 pounds

$ 530.00

$ 620.00

46,000 pounds

$ 570.00

$ 660.00

48,000 pounds

$ 594.00

$ 684.00

50,000 pounds

$ 645.00

$ 735.00

52,000 pounds

$ 678.00

$ 768.00

54,000 pounds

$ 732.00

$ 822.00

56,000 pounds

$ 773.00

$ 863.00

58,000 pounds

$ 804.00

$ 894.00

60,000 pounds

$ 857.00

$ 947.00

62,000 pounds

$ 919.00

$ 1,009.00

64,000 pounds

$ 939.00

$ 1,029.00

66,000 pounds

$ 1,046.00

$ 1,136.00

68,000 pounds

$ 1,091.00

$ 1,181.00

70,000 pounds

$ 1,175.00

$ 1,265.00

72,000 pounds

$ 1,257.00

$ 1,347.00

74,000 pounds

$ 1,366.00

$ 1,456.00

76,000 pounds

$ 1,476.00

$ 1,566.00

78,000 pounds

$ 1,612.00

$ 1,702.00

80,000 pounds

$ 1,740.00

$ 1,830.00

82,000 pounds

$ 1,861.00

$ 1,951.00

84,000 pounds

$ 1,981.00

$ 2,071.00

86,000 pounds

$ 2,102.00

$ 2,192.00

88,000 pounds

$ 2,223.00

$ 2,313.00

90,000 pounds

$ 2,344.00

$ 2,434.00

92,000 pounds

$ 2,464.00

$ 2,554.00

94,000 pounds

$ 2,585.00

$ 2,675.00

96,000 pounds

$ 2,706.00

$ 2,796.00

98,000 pounds

$ 2,827.00

$ 2,917.00

100,000 pounds

$ 2,947.00

$ 3,037.00

102,000 pounds

$ 3,068.00

$ 3,158.00

104,000 pounds

$ 3,189.00

$ 3,279.00

105,500 pounds

$ 3,310.00

$ 3,400.00

(2) Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.

(3) If the resultant gross weight is not listed in the table provided in subsection (1) of this section, it must be increased to the next higher weight.

(4) The license fees provided in subsection (1) of this section and the freight project fee provided in subsection (6) of this section are in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005 and any other fee or tax required by law.

(5) The license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(6) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, in addition to the license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant with a vehicle with a declared gross weight of more than 10,000 pounds, unless specifically exempt, to pay a freight project fee equal to fifteen percent of the license fee provided in subsection (1) of this section, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, which must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(7) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2022, in addition to the license fee based on declared gross weight as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant with a vehicle with a declared gross weight of less than or equal to 12,000 pounds, unless specifically exempt, to pay an additional weight fee of ten dollars, which must be distributed under RCW 46.68.035.

(8) The license fees provided in subsections (1) and (7) of this section for vehicles that are twelve thousand pounds or less and subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, are doubled and must be paid biennially.

Sec. 15. RCW 46.17.365 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person applying for a motor vehicle registration and paying the vehicle license fee required in RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (h), (j), (n), and (o) shall pay a motor vehicle weight fee in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law.

(a) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due before July 1, 2016, the motor vehicle weight fee:

(i) Must be based on the motor vehicle scale weight;

(ii) Is the difference determined by subtracting the vehicle license fee required in RCW 46.17.350 from the license fee in Schedule B of RCW 46.17.355, plus two dollars; and

(iii) Must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.

(b) For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2016, the motor vehicle weight fee:

(i) Must be based on the motor vehicle scale weight as follows:

WEIGHT

FEE

4,000 pounds

$ 25.00

6,000 pounds

$ 45.00

8,000 pounds

$ 65.00

16,000 pounds and over

$ 72.00;

(ii) If the resultant motor vehicle scale weight is not listed in the table provided in (b)(i) of this subsection, must be increased to the next highest weight; and

(iii) Must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415 unless prior to July 1, 2023, the actions described in (b)(iii)(A) or (B) of this subsection occur, in which case the portion of the revenue that is the result of the fee increased in this subsection must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395.

(A) Any state agency files a notice of rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW for a rule regarding a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.

(B) Any state agency otherwise enacts, adopts, orders, or in any way implements a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.

(C) Nothing in this subsection acknowledges, establishes, or creates legal authority for the department of ecology or any other state agency to enact, adopt, order, or in any way implement a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.

(2) A person applying for a motor home vehicle registration shall, in lieu of the motor vehicle weight fee required in subsection (1) of this section, pay a motor home vehicle weight fee of seventy-five dollars for a motor home subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a motor home vehicle weight fee of one hundred fifty dollars for a motor home subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law. The motor home vehicle weight fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2022, in addition to the motor vehicle weight fee as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require an applicant to pay an additional weight fee of ten dollars, which must be distributed to the multimodal transportation account under RCW 47.66.070 unless prior to July 1, 2023, the actions described in (a) or (b) of this subsection occur, in which case the portion of the revenue that is the result of the fee increased in this subsection must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395.

(a) Any state agency files a notice of rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW for a rule regarding a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.

(b) Any state agency otherwise enacts, adopts, orders, or in any way implements a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.

(c) Nothing in this subsection acknowledges, establishes, or creates legal authority for the department of ecology or any other state agency to enact, adopt, order, or in any way implement a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.

(4) The department shall:

(a) Rely on motor vehicle empty scale weights provided by vehicle manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine the weight of each motor vehicle; and

(b) Adopt rules for determining weight for vehicles without manufacturer empty scale weights.

Sec. 16. RCW 46.17.375 and 2010 c 161 s 534 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before accepting an application for registration for a recreational vehicle, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require an applicant to pay a three dollar sanitary disposal fee for a recreational vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or a six dollar sanitary disposal fee for a recreational vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The recreational vehicle sanitary disposal fee must be deposited in the RV account created in RCW 46.68.170.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "recreational vehicle" means a camper, motor home, or travel trailer.

Sec. 17. RCW 46.68.030 and 2016 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall forward all fees for vehicle registrations under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW, unless otherwise specified by law, to the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit these moneys to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(2) Proceeds from vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license fees must be deposited by the state treasurer as follows:

(a) $23.60 of each initial or renewal vehicle license fee for a vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and $47.20 of each initial or renewal vehicle license fee for a vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, must be deposited in the state patrol highway account in the motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license fees, renewal vehicle license fees, and all other funds in the state patrol highway account must be for the sole use of the Washington state patrol for highway activities of the Washington state patrol, subject to proper appropriations and reappropriations.

(b) $2.02 of each initial vehicle license fee for a vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and $4.04 of each initial vehicle license fee for a vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and $0.93 of each renewal vehicle license fee for a vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and $1.86 of each renewal vehicle license fee for a vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, must be deposited each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations account.

(c) Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal vehicle license fees that are not distributed otherwise under this section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

(3) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state patrol highway account to the connecting Washington account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the state patrol highway account.

Sec. 18. RCW 82.44.060 and 2010 c 161 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any locally imposed excise tax:

(a) Is due at the time of registration of a vehicle;

(b) Must be paid in full before any registration certificate or license tab may be issued;

(c) Is in addition to any other vehicle license fees required by law;

(d) Must be collected by the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director of licensing before issuing the registration certificate;

(e) Must be collected for each registration year or two-year registration period; and

(f) Must be levied for one full registration year or two-year registration period beginning on the date of the calendar year designated by the department and ending on the same date of the next or second succeeding calendar year. For vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, proportional registration, and for vehicle dealer plates issued under chapter 46.70 RCW, the registration year is the period provided in those chapters. However, the tax shall in no case be less than two dollars except for proportionally registered vehicles.

(2) A vehicle is deemed registered for the first time in this state when the vehicle was not previously registered by this state for the registration year or two-year registration period immediately preceding the registration year or two-year registration period in which the application for registration is made or when the vehicle has been registered in another jurisdiction subsequent to any prior registration in this state.

(3) An additional tax may not be imposed under this chapter on any vehicle when the certificate of title is being transferred if the tax has already been paid for the registration year or two-year registration period or fraction of a registration year or two-year registration period in which transfer of ownership occurs.

Sec. 19. RCW 82.50.460 and 1979 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior to the end of any registration year or two-year registration period of a vehicle, the director shall cause to be mailed to the owners of travel trailers or campers, of record, notice of the amount of tax payable during the succeeding registration year or two-year registration period. The notice shall contain a legal description of the travel trailer or camper, prominent notice of due dates, and such other information as may be required by the director.

Sec. 20. RCW 82.80.140 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 310 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars for a vehicle subject to a registration year, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, or two hundred dollars for a vehicle subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, per vehicle registered in the district, for each vehicle subject to vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (g), (h), (j), or (n) through (q) and for each vehicle subject to gross weight license fees under RCW 46.17.355 with a scale weight of six thousand pounds or less.

(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the district may impose an annual fee by a majority vote of the governing board of the district up to: (i) Twenty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section, (ii) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section if a twenty dollar vehicle fee has been imposed for at least twenty-four months, or (iii) fifty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section if a vehicle fee of forty dollars has been imposed for at least twenty-four months and a district has met the requirements of RCW 36.73.065(6). Annual vehicle fees imposed by a transportation benefit district may be subject to a two-year registration period, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and paid biennially.

If the district is countywide, the revenues of the fee must be distributed to each city within the district by interlocal agreement. The interlocal agreement is effective when approved by the district and sixty percent of the cities representing seventy-five percent of the population of the cities within the district in which the countywide fee is collected.

(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2):

(i) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement unless the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within the jurisdiction of the district; or

(ii) That, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district within its boundaries under RCW 36.73.065(4)(a)(i), exceeds fifty dollars.

If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection (2) that, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district within its boundaries, exceeds fifty dollars, the district shall provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that the combined vehicle fee does not exceed fifty dollars.

(3) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to the district on a monthly basis.

(4) No fee under this section may be collected until six months after approval under RCW 36.73.065.

(5) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when renewing a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.

(6) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under this section:

(a) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;

(b) Farm tractors or farm vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181;

(c) Mopeds, as defined in RCW 46.04.304;

(d) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.365;

(e) Private use single-axle trailer, as defined in RCW 46.04.422;

(f) Snowmobiles, as defined in RCW 46.04.546; and

(g) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the international registration plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each year the department must submit, as part of its regular annual reporting to the legislature, a report on the number of one-year and two-year vehicle registrations as summarized by month.

(2) By January 1, 2021, the department must submit a report to the legislature on the implementation of two-year registration periods for vehicles and the department's performance measurements implemented for two-year registration periods.

Sec. 22. RCW 88.02.310 and 2010 c 161 s 1001 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the business of selling vessels at wholesale or retail in this state.

(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(4) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security interest, and means registered owner where the reference to owner may be construed as either to registered or legal owner.

(5) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.405.

(6) "Two-year registration period" means the effective period of a vessel registration issued by the department for a two-year period. A two-year registration period begins at 12:01 a.m. on the date of the calendar year designated by the department and ends at 12:00 a.m. the same day two years later unless otherwise specified.

(7) "Vessel" means every watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water, other than a seaplane.

(((7))) (8) "Waters of this state" means any waters within the territorial limits of this state as described in 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1312.

Sec. 23. RCW 88.02.560 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 215 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An application for a vessel registration must be made by the owner or the owner's authorized representative to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on a form furnished or approved by the department. The application must contain:

(a) The name and address of each owner of the vessel;

(b) Other information the department may require; and

(c) The signature of at least one owner.

(2) The application for vessel registration must be accompanied by the:

(a) Vessel registration fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(k);

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee under RCW 88.02.640(1)(b) and derelict vessel removal surcharge required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(c);

(c) Filing fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(f);

(d) License plate technology fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(g);

(e) License service fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(h);

(f) Watercraft excise tax required under chapter 82.49 RCW; and

(g) Beginning January 1, 2016, service fee required under RCW 46.17.040.

(3) Upon receipt of an application for vessel registration and the required fees and taxes, the department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for each vessel. The registration number and decal must be issued and affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels required in 33 C.F.R. Part 174. A valid decal affixed as prescribed must indicate compliance with the annual or two-year registration requirements of this chapter.

(4) Vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of either one year or two years, except that the director may extend or diminish vessel registration periods and vessel decals for the purpose of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the registration period.

(5) Vessel registrations are renewable every year or two years in a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the fees and taxes described in subsection (2) of this section. Upon renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal to be affixed as prescribed by the department.

(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information must be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation commission in a form ready for distribution. The form must be developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.

(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for transfer of the vessel registration, and the application must be accompanied by a transfer fee as required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(o).

(8) Taxes and fees required in subsection (2) of this section may be doubled and paid biennially under a two-year registration period.

Sec. 24. RCW 88.02.640 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 216, 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 803, and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE

AMOUNT

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit

$5.00

RCW 88.02.800(2)

General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

(c) Derelict vessel removal surcharge

$1.00

Subsection (4) of this section

Subsection (4) of this section

(d) Duplicate certificate of title

$1.25

RCW 88.02.530(1)(c)

General fund

(e) Duplicate registration

$1.25

RCW 88.02.590(1)(c)

General fund

(f) Filing

RCW 46.17.005

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate technology

RCW 46.17.015

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service

RCW 46.17.025

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel permit

Subsection (5) of this section

RCW 88.02.620(4)

Subsection (5) of this section

(j) Quick title service

$50.00

RCW 88.02.540(3)

Subsection (7) of this section

(k) Registration

$10.50

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal

$1.25

RCW 88.02.595(1)(c)

General fund

(m) Service fee

RCW 46.17.040

RCW 88.02.515 and 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.17.040

(n) Title application

$5.00

RCW 88.02.515

General fund

(o) Transfer

$1.00

RCW 88.02.560(7)

General fund

(p) Vessel visitor permit

$30.00

RCW 88.02.610(3)

Subsection (6) of this section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time application for registration is made.

(3) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be distributed as follows:

(a) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;

(b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667;

(c) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and

(d) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(4) In addition to other fees required in this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar, or a derelict vessel removal surcharge of two dollars for a two-year registration period, must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels accumulated in Washington waters that pose a threat to the health and safety of the people and to the environment and must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(5)(a) The amount of the nonresident vessel permit fee is:

(i) For a vessel owned by a nonresident natural person, twenty-five dollars; and

(ii) For a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person, the fee is equal to:

(A) Twenty-five dollars per foot for vessels between thirty and ninety-nine feet in length;

(B) Thirty dollars per foot for vessels between one hundred and one hundred twenty feet in length; and

(C) Thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents per foot for vessels between one hundred twenty-one and one hundred sixty-four feet in length. The fee must be multiplied by the extreme length of the vessel in feet, rounded up to the nearest whole foot.

(b) The fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs to administer the permit must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.

(c) A nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person may not obtain more than two nonresident vessel permits under RCW 88.02.620 within any thirty-six month period.

(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;

(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing the vessel visitor permit;

(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and

(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and registration of vessels.

(7)(a) The fifty dollar quick title service fee must be distributed as follows:

(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the general fund.

(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(iii) If the fee is paid to a subagent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remaining twenty-five dollars must be distributed as follows: Twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the subagent.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

(8) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the service fee under subsection (1)(m) of this section beginning January 1, 2016.

(9) The vessel fees and surcharges required in subsection (1) (b), (c), (f), (g), (h), (k), and (m) of this section may be doubled and paid biennially under a two-year registration period.

Sec. 25. RCW 88.02.640 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 216 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE

AMOUNT

AUTHORITY

DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit

$5.00

RCW 88.02.800(2)

General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

Subsection (3) of this section

(c) Derelict vessel removal surcharge

$1.00

Subsection (4) of this section

Subsection (4) of this section

(d) Duplicate certificate of title

$1.25

RCW 88.02.530(1)(c)

General fund

(e) Duplicate registration

$1.25

RCW 88.02.590(1)(c)

General fund

(f) Filing

RCW 46.17.005

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.400

(g) License plate technology

RCW 46.17.015

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.370

(h) License service

RCW 46.17.025

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.68.220

(i) Nonresident vessel permit

$25.00

RCW 88.02.620(3)

Subsection (5) of this section

(j) Quick title service

$50.00

RCW 88.02.540(3)

Subsection (7) of this section

(k) Registration

$10.50

RCW 88.02.560(2)

RCW 88.02.650

(l) Replacement decal

$1.25

RCW 88.02.595(1)(c)

General fund

(m) Service fee

RCW 46.17.040

RCW 88.02.515 and 88.02.560(2)

RCW 46.17.040

(n) Title application

$5.00

RCW 88.02.515

General fund

(o) Transfer

$1.00

RCW 88.02.560(7)

General fund

(p) Vessel visitor permit

$30.00

RCW 88.02.610(3)

Subsection (6) of this section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time application for registration is made.

(3) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be distributed as follows:

(a) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;

(b) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667;

(c) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and

(d) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(4) In addition to other fees required in this section, an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of one dollar, or a derelict vessel removal surcharge of two dollars for a two-year registration period, must be charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels accumulated in Washington waters that pose a threat to the health and safety of the people and to the environment and must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100.

(5) The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing the identification document by the department. Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.

(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed as follows:

(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;

(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing the vessel visitor permit;

(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and

(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and registration of vessels.

(7)(a) The fifty dollar quick title service fee must be distributed as follows:

(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited to the general fund.

(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

(iii) If the fee is paid to a subagent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars must be deposited to the general fund. The remaining twenty-five dollars must be distributed as follows: Twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and twelve dollars and fifty cents must be retained by the subagent.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

(8) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall charge the service fee under subsection (1)(m) of this section beginning January 1, 2016.

(9) The vessel fees and surcharges required in subsection (1) (b), (c), (f), (g), (h), (k), and (m) of this section may be doubled and paid biennially under a two-year registration period.

Sec. 26. RCW 82.49.010 and 2014 c 195 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An excise tax is imposed for the privilege of using a vessel upon the waters of this state, except vessels exempt under RCW 82.49.020. The annual amount of the excise tax is one-half of one percent of fair market value, as determined under this chapter, or five dollars, whichever is greater. The annual amount of the excise tax may be doubled and paid biennially under a two-year registration period as defined in RCW 88.02.310. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

(2) A person who is required under chapter 88.02 RCW to register a vessel in this state and who fails to register the vessel in this state or registers the vessel in another state or foreign country and avoids the Washington watercraft excise tax is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and is liable for such unpaid excise tax. The department of revenue may assess and collect the unpaid excise tax under chapter 82.32 RCW, including the penalty imposed in RCW 82.49.080 and penalties and interest provided in chapter 82.32 RCW.

(3) The excise tax upon a vessel registered for the first time in this state shall be imposed for a twelve-month period, including the month in which the vessel is registered, unless the director of licensing extends or diminishes vessel registration periods for the purpose of staggered renewal periods under RCW 88.02.560. A vessel is registered for the first time in this state when the vessel was not registered in this state for the immediately preceding registration year, or when the vessel was registered in another jurisdiction for the immediately preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27. A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each year the department must submit, as part of its regular annual reporting to the legislature, a report on the number of one-year and two-year vessel registrations as summarized by month.

(2) By January 1, 2021, the department must submit a report to the legislature on the implementation of two-year registration periods for vessels and the department's performance measurements implemented for two-year registration periods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28. Except for section 25 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29. Section 24 of this act expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30. Section 25 of this act takes effect July 1, 2019.

--- END ---