BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, a pilot program is established for the supervision of offenders convicted of felonies relating to the theft or taking of a motor vehicle.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 9.94A.701, until June 30, 2021, a participating court may sentence an offender to community custody for a term of one year when the court sentences the person to the custody of the department for theft of a motor vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065), possession of a stolen vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068), taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.070), taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.075), or a crime against property with a prior conviction for one of the preceding motor vehicle crimes.

(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 9.94A.501, the department shall supervise any offender sentenced to community custody pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(4) No later than November 1, 2022, the department must submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature analyzing the effectiveness of supervision in reducing recidivism among offenders committing felonies relating to the theft or taking of a motor vehicle. The department shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy in guiding its data tracking efforts and preparing the report.

(5) For purposes of this section, "participating court" means the Spokane county superior court, provided Spokane county has agreed with the department to participate in the pilot program.

(6) This section expires December 31, 2022.

--- END ---