BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 86.09.418 and 1985 c 396 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon completion of the control works of the district or of any unit thereof, the board of directors of the district may, with the written consent of the county legislative authority of the county within which the major portion of the district is situated, and upon petition signed by landowners representing twenty-five percent of the acreage of the lands in the district or twenty-five percent of the value of the assessments of the district shall, appoint three qualified persons who shall be approved in writing by the county legislative authority, to act as a board of appraisers and who shall reconsider and revise and/or reaffirm the classification and relative percentages, or any part or parts thereof, in the same manner and with the same legal effect as that provided herein for the determination of such matters in the first instance: PROVIDED, That such reexamination shall have no legal effect on any assessments regularly levied prior to the order of appraisal by the reexamining board of appraisers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 86.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Upon completion of the control works of the district or of any unit of the district, when there is any subdivision, short subdivision, parcel segregation or merger, lot-line adjustment, or other change in the land use characteristics of any tract or tracts of land within the boundaries of the district, occurring after completion of the most recent examination or reexamination of the benefit classification of the lands within the boundaries of the district pursuant to RCW 86.09.388 through 86.09.418, the board of directors of the district may, with the written consent of the county legislative authority of the county within which the major portion of the district is situated, and without a landowner petition or formation of a board of appraisers, reconsider and revise and/or reaffirm the classification and relative percentages assigned to such a tract or tracts consistent with the current district classifications and benefit percentages, in the same manner and with the same legal effect as provided for in this chapter for the determination of these matters originally. However, such a reexamination has no legal effect on any assessment regularly levied prior to the order of appraisal by the reexamining board of directors.

(2) The reexamination process provided in subsection (1) of this section may occur no more than once per calendar year.

--- END ---