BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person may file a voluntary waiver of firearm rights with the clerk of the court in any county in Washington state. The clerk of the court must request photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to accepting the form. The person filing the form may provide an alternate person to be contacted if a voluntary waiver of firearm rights is revoked. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the accepted form for entry into the Washington state patrol electronic database. The Washington state patrol must enter the voluntary waiver of firearm rights into the Washington state patrol electronic database within twenty-four hours of receipt. Copies and records of the voluntary waiver of firearm rights shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

(2) No sooner than seven calendar days after filing a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, the person may file a revocation of the voluntary waiver of firearm rights in the same county where the voluntary waiver of firearm rights was filed. The clerk of the court must request photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to accepting the form. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the form requesting that the Washington state patrol remove the person's voluntary waiver of firearm rights from the Washington state patrol electronic database to the Washington state patrol and to any contact person listed on the voluntary waiver of firearm rights and destroy all records of the voluntary waiver. After receiving a revocation of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, the Washington state patrol must remove the person from the Washington state patrol electronic database within seven days of receipt, unless the person is otherwise ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040, and destroy all records of the voluntary waiver.

(3) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding their identity on the voluntary waiver of firearm rights form or revocation of waiver of firearm rights form is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(4) Neither a voluntary waiver of firearm rights nor a revocation of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights shall be considered by a court in any legal proceeding.

(5) A voluntary waiver of firearm rights may not be required of an individual as a condition for receiving employment, benefits, or services.

(6) All records obtained and all reports produced, as required by this section, are not subject to disclosure through the public records act under chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The administrator for the courts, under the direction of the chief justice, shall develop a voluntary waiver of firearm rights form and a revocation of voluntary waiver of firearm rights form by January 1, 2019.

(2) The forms must include all of the information necessary for identification and entry of the person into the Washington state patrol electronic database and the voluntary waiver of firearm rights form must include the following language:

Because you have filed this voluntary waiver of firearm rights, effective immediately you may not purchase or receive any firearm. You may revoke this voluntary waiver of firearm rights any time after at least seven calendar days have elapsed since the time of filing.

(3) The forms must be made available on the administrator for the courts web site, at all county clerk offices, and must also be made widely available at firearm and ammunition dealers and health care provider locations.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.41.080 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:

No person may deliver a firearm to any person whom he or she has reasonable cause to believe: (1) Is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm or (2) has signed a valid voluntary waiver of firearm rights that has not been revoked under section 1 of this act. Any person violating this section is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.41.092 and 2015 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a licensed dealer may not deliver any firearm to a purchaser or transferee until the earlier of:

(1) The results of all required background checks are known and the purchaser or transferee (a) is not prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm under federal or state law and (b) does not have a voluntary waiver of firearm rights currently in effect; or

(2) Ten business days have elapsed from the date the licensed dealer requested the background check. However, for sales and transfers of pistols if the purchaser or transferee does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or state identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, then the time period in this subsection shall be extended from ten business days to sixty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Sections 1 and 4 of this act take effect January 1, 2019.

--- END ---