BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that educational entities, such as school districts, educational service districts, and state-level education agencies, can benefit from adopting a common performance assessment standard. The legislature further finds that the most efficient and effective standardized performance assessment is the education sector excellence assessment framework developed by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce. As a result, the legislature intends to have school districts, educational service districts, and educational state agencies implement the education sector excellence assessment framework over the next three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2018-19 school year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall select ten school districts with at least five thousand students or more to pilot implementation of the education sector excellence assessment framework developed by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce. Each school district shall receive a ten thousand dollar grant for the purpose of implementing the education sector excellence assessment framework, including contracting with a trained national or state examiner to assess the operational performance of the school district using the education sector excellence assessment framework.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a phased-in schedule whereby all school districts with at least five thousand students or more have implemented the education sector excellence assessment framework by the 2020-21 school year. The schedule developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction must phase in all applicable school districts in order to ensure availability of trained national or state excellence assessment examiners. Each school district shall receive a ten thousand dollar grant at the start of the school year for which the district was selected to implement the education sector excellence assessment framework.

(3) School districts that have implemented the education sector excellence assessment framework shall contract with a trained examiner every three years with the goal of achieving within nine years a score of seventy percent or higher on the scoring guidelines published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

(4) Beginning in the 2019-20 school year, each school district that has implemented the education sector excellence assessment framework shall report the results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The school district must include in its report a summary of the results of each operational performance assessment. School districts shall continue to implement the education sector excellence assessment framework and report the results every three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Develop a standardized manner for school districts to report the results of the implementation of the education sector excellence assessment framework as required under section 2 of this act; and

(2) Analyze the school district reports to identify processes to streamline or eliminate in order to improve the school district results. The analysis must be shared with the school districts and take into consideration information obtained through any operational performance assessments conducted in previous years as required in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.310 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2019, all educational service districts must implement the education sector excellence assessment framework published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

(2) Each educational service district must contract with a trained national or state excellence assessment examiner within a year of implementation, and every three years thereafter, with the goal of reaching a score of seventy percent or higher based on the scoring guidelines published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce, within a nine-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2019, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must implement the education sector excellence assessment framework published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must contract with a trained national or state excellence assessment examiner within a year of implementation, and every three years thereafter, with the goal of reaching a score of seventy percent or higher based on the scoring guidelines published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce, within a nine-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2019, the state board of education must implement the education sector excellence assessment framework published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

(2) The state board of education must contract with a trained national or state excellence assessment examiner within a year of implementation, and every three years thereafter, with the goal of reaching a score of seventy percent or higher based on the scoring guidelines published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce, within a nine-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2019, the professional educator standards board must implement the education sector excellence assessment framework published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

(2) The professional educator standards board must contract with a trained national or state excellence assessment examiner within a year of implementation, and every three years thereafter, with the goal of reaching a score of seventy percent or higher based on the scoring guidelines published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce, within a nine-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 28A.345 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2019, the Washington state school directors' association must implement the education sector excellence assessment framework published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

(2) The Washington state school directors' association must contract with a trained national or state excellence assessment examiner within a year of implementation, and every three years thereafter, with the goal of reaching a score of seventy percent or higher based on the scoring guidelines published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce, within a nine-year period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 43.06B RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2019, the office of the education ombuds must implement the education sector excellence assessment framework published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

(2) The office of the education ombuds must contract with a trained national or state excellence assessment examiner within a year of implementation, and every three years thereafter, with the goal of reaching a score of seventy percent or higher based on the scoring guidelines published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce, within a nine-year period.

--- END ---