BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

The creation of a protected class in housing is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No city or town may enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions that create additional protected classes against whom housing discrimination is declared to be an unfair practice by the law against discrimination. This section must not be construed as prohibiting any city or town from entering into agreements with private persons that create groups to protect from discrimination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

The creation of a protected class in housing is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No code city may enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions that create additional protected classes against whom housing discrimination is declared to be an unfair practice by the law against discrimination. This section must not be construed as prohibiting any code city from entering into agreements with private persons that create groups to protect from discrimination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

The creation of a protected class in housing is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No county may enact, maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions that create additional protected classes against whom housing discrimination is declared to be an unfair practice by the law against discrimination. This section must not be construed as prohibiting any county from entering into agreements with private persons that create groups to protect from discrimination.

--- END ---