BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All public schools must offer students the opportunity to compost their food waste. School districts must have the choice to either provide on-site composting or contracting out with the local waste management company.

(2) All public schools in the state must offer their students the opportunity to recycle.

(3) The state must provide free pickup of compost and provide supplies such as bins and compost bags for all public schools that do not currently have the pickup and supplies needed.

--- END ---