BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.105.331 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall appoint a state interoperability executive committee, the membership of which must include, but not be limited to, representatives of the military department, the Washington state patrol, the department of transportation, the office of the state chief information officer, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of health, the department of corrections, city and county governments, state and local fire chiefs, police chiefs, and sheriffs, ((and)) state and local emergency management directors, tribal nations, and public safety answering points, commonly known as 911 call centers. The chair and legislative members of the board will serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the committee. Voting membership may not exceed ((fifteen)) twenty-two members.

(2) The director shall appoint the chair of the committee from among the voting members of the committee.

(3) The state interoperability executive committee has the following responsibilities:

(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the office for technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems, including emergency communications systems. The standards must address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking into account both existing and future systems and technologies;

(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the office the licensing and use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and serve as the point of contact with the federal communications commission and the first responders network authority on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of radio spectrum;

(c) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio communications system equipment to ensure that:

(i) ((After the transition from a radio over internet protocol network,)) Any new trunked radio system shall be, at a minimum, project-25; and

(ii) Any new land-mobile radio system that requires advanced digital features shall be, at a minimum, project-25; ((and

(iii) Any new system or equipment purchases shall be, at a minimum, upgradable to project-25;))

(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for state-sponsored wireless communications systems;

(e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;

(f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and emergency response organizations;

(g) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response wireless communications systems; and

(h) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the director to promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.

(4) The office shall provide administrative support to the committee.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.105.020 and 2016 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency" means the consolidated technology services agency.

(2) "Board" means the technology services board.

(3) "Customer agencies" means all entities that purchase or use information technology resources, telecommunications, or services from the consolidated technology services agency.

(4) "Director" means the state chief information officer, who is the director of the consolidated technology services agency.

(5) "Enterprise architecture" means an ongoing activity for translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise change. It is a continuous activity. Enterprise architecture creates, communicates, and improves the key principles and models that describe the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution.

(6) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities used in information processing, including but not limited to computers, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the operation of such equipment.

(7) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text, voice, and video.

(8) "Information security" means the protection of communication and information resources from unauthorized access, use, disclosure, disruption, modification, or destruction in order to:

(a) Prevent improper information modification or destruction;

(b) Preserve authorized restrictions on information access and disclosure;

(c) Ensure timely and reliable access to and use of information; and

(d) Maintain the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of information.

(9) "Information technology" includes, but is not limited to, all electronic technology systems and services, automated information handling, system design and analysis, conversion of data, computer programming, information storage and retrieval, telecommunications, requisite system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, radio technologies, and all related interactions between people and machines.

(10) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a strategic management process documenting relationships between agency missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.

(11) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW 43.41.391.

(12) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi-municipal corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.

(13) "Office" means the office of the state chief information officer within the consolidated technology services agency.

(14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology resources and telecommunications.

(15) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or license.

(16) "Public agency" means any agency of this state or another state; any political subdivision or unit of local government of this state or another state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service districts; any public benefit nonprofit corporation; any agency of the United States; and any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal government.

(17) "Public benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state, or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state.

(18) "Public record" has the definitions in RCW 42.56.010 and chapter 40.14 RCW and includes legislative records and court records that are available for public inspection.

(19) "Public safety" refers to any entity or services that ensure the welfare and protection of the public.

(20) "Security incident" means an accidental or deliberative event that results in or constitutes an imminent threat of the unauthorized access, loss, disclosure, modification, disruption, or destruction of communication and information resources.

(((20))) (21) "State agency" means every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency, including offices headed by a statewide elected official.

(((21))) (22) "Telecommunications" includes, but is not limited to, wireless or wired systems for transport of voice, video, and data communications, network systems, requisite facilities, equipment, system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all related interactions between people and machines.

(((22))) (23) "Utility-based infrastructure services" includes personal computer and portable device support, servers and server administration, security administration, network administration, telephony, email, and other information technology services commonly used by state agencies.

--- END ---