BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.96A.140 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When a designated chemical dependency specialist receives information alleging that a person presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled as a result of ((chemical dependency)) a substance use disorder, the designated chemical dependency specialist, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of the information, may file a petition for commitment of such person with the superior court, district court, or in another court permitted by court rule.

If a petition for commitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or custodian who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by the designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court. The parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the designated chemical dependency specialist's report.

If the designated chemical dependency specialist finds that the initial needs of such person would be better served by placement within the mental health system, the person shall be referred to either a designated mental health professional or an evaluation and treatment facility as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020.

(b) If placement in a ((chemical dependency)) substance use disorder treatment program is available and deemed appropriate, the petition shall allege that: The person is chemically dependent and presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled by alcohol or drug addiction, or that the person has twice before in the preceding twelve months been admitted for withdrawal management, sobering services, or ((chemical dependency)) substance use disorder treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.110 or 70.96A.120, and is in need of a more sustained treatment program, or that the person ((is chemically dependent)) has a substance use disorder and has threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm on another and is likely to inflict physical harm on another unless committed. A refusal to undergo treatment, by itself, does not constitute evidence of lack of judgment as to the need for treatment.

(c) If involuntary detention is sought, the petition must state facts that support a finding of the grounds identified in (b) of this subsection and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of such person or others. The petition must state specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought, the petition must state facts that support a finding of the grounds for commitment identified in (b) of this subsection and set forth the proposed less restrictive alternative.

(d)(i) The petition must be signed by:

(A) ((Two physicians;)) One physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(B) ((One physician and a mental health professional;

(C) One physician assistant and a mental health professional; or

(D) One psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner and a mental health professional.

(ii) The persons signing the petition must have examined the person)) One physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or chemical dependency professional.

(2) Upon filing the petition, the court shall fix a date for a hearing no less than two and no more than seven days after the date the petition was filed unless the person petitioned against is presently being detained in a program, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.120, 71.05.210, or 71.34.710, in which case the hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of the filing of the petition((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). The ((above specified)) seventy-two hours shall be computed by excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That,)). The court may, upon motion of the person whose commitment is sought, or upon motion of petitioner with written permission of the person whose commitment is sought, or his or her counsel and, upon good cause shown, extend the date for the hearing. A copy of the petition and of the notice of the hearing, including the date fixed by the court, shall be served ((by the designated chemical dependency specialist)) on the person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, a parent or his or her legal guardian if he or she is a minor, and any other person the court believes advisable. A copy of the petition and certificate shall be delivered to each person notified.

(3) At the hearing the court shall hear all relevant testimony including, if possible, the testimony, which may be telephonic, of at least one licensed physician, ((psychiatric)) advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or ((mental health)) chemical dependency professional who has examined the person whose commitment is sought. Communications otherwise deemed privileged under the laws of this state are deemed to be waived in proceedings under this chapter when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that the waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public. The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person, or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to introduce medical, nursing, or psychological records of detained persons so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met, except that portions of the record that contain opinions as to whether the detained person ((is chemically dependent)) has a substance use disorder shall be deleted from the records unless the person offering the opinions is available for cross-examination. The person shall be present unless the court believes that his or her presence is likely to be injurious to him or her; in this event the court may deem it appropriate to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent him or her throughout the proceeding. If deemed advisable, the court may examine the person out of courtroom. If the person has refused to be examined by a licensed physician, ((psychiatric)) advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or ((mental health)) chemical dependency professional, he or she shall be given an opportunity to be examined by a court appointed licensed physician, ((psychiatric)) advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or other professional person qualified to provide such services. If he or she refuses and there is sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, or if the court believes that more medical evidence is necessary, the court may make a temporary order committing him or her to the department for a period of not more than five days for purposes of a diagnostic examination.

(4)(a) If, after hearing all relevant evidence, including the results of any diagnostic examination, the court finds that grounds for involuntary commitment have been established by a preponderance of the evidence and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interest of the person or others, it shall make an order of commitment to an approved substance use disorder treatment program. It shall not order commitment of a person unless it determines that an approved substance use disorder treatment program is available and able to provide adequate and appropriate treatment for him or her.

(b) If the court finds that the grounds for commitment have been established by a preponderance of the evidence, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive course of treatment. The less restrictive order may impose treatment conditions and other conditions that are in the best interest of the respondent and others. A copy of the less restrictive order must be given to the respondent, the designated chemical dependency specialist, and any program designated to provide less restrictive treatment. If the program designated to provide the less restrictive treatment is other than the program providing the initial involuntary treatment, the program so designated must agree in writing to assume such responsibility. The court may not order commitment of a person to a less restrictive course of treatment unless it determines that an approved substance use disorder treatment program is available and able to provide adequate and appropriate treatment for him or her.

(5) A person committed to inpatient treatment under this section shall remain in the program for treatment for a period of fourteen days unless sooner discharged. A person committed to a less restrictive course of treatment under this section shall remain in the program of treatment for a period of ninety days unless sooner discharged. At the end of the fourteen-day period, or ninety-day period in the case of a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment, he or she shall be discharged automatically unless the program or the designated chemical dependency specialist, before expiration of the period, files a petition for his or her recommitment upon the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section for a further period of ninety days of inpatient treatment or ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment unless sooner discharged. The petition for ninety-day inpatient or less restrictive alternative treatment must be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment.

If a petition for recommitment is not filed in the case of a minor, the parent, guardian, or custodian who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision made by the designated chemical dependency specialist in superior or district court. The parent, guardian, or custodian shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the treatment progress report.

If a person has been committed because he or she ((is chemically dependent)) has a substance use disorder and is likely to inflict physical harm on another, the program or designated chemical dependency specialist shall apply for recommitment if after examination it is determined that the likelihood still exists.

(6) Upon the filing of a petition for recommitment under subsection (5) of this section, the court shall fix a date for hearing no less than two and no more than seven days after the date the petition was filed((: PROVIDED, That,)). The court may, upon motion of the person whose commitment is sought and upon good cause shown, extend the date for the hearing. A copy of the petition and of the notice of hearing, including the date fixed by the court, shall be served by the treatment program on the person whose commitment is sought, his or her next of kin, the original petitioner under subsection (1) of this section if different from the petitioner for recommitment, one of his or her parents or his or her legal guardian if he or she is a minor, and his or her attorney and any other person the court believes advisable. At the hearing the court shall proceed as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, except that the burden of proof upon a hearing for recommitment must be proof by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

(7) The approved substance use disorder treatment program shall provide for adequate and appropriate treatment of a person committed to its custody on an inpatient or outpatient basis. A person committed under this section may be transferred from one approved public treatment program to another if transfer is medically advisable.

(8) A person committed to a program for treatment shall be discharged at any time before the end of the period for which he or she has been committed and he or she shall be discharged by order of the court if either of the following conditions are met:

(a) In case of a ((chemically dependent)) person with a substance use disorder committed on the grounds of likelihood of infliction of physical harm upon himself, herself, or another, the likelihood no longer exists; or further treatment will not be likely to bring about significant improvement in the person's condition, or treatment is no longer adequate or appropriate.

(b) In case of a ((chemically dependent)) person with a substance use disorder committed on the grounds of the need of treatment and incapacity, that the incapacity no longer exists.

(9) The court shall inform the person whose commitment or recommitment is sought of his or her right to contest the application, be represented by counsel at every stage of any proceedings relating to his or her commitment and recommitment, and have counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court, if he or she wants the assistance of counsel and is unable to obtain counsel. If the court believes that the person needs the assistance of counsel, the court shall require, by appointment if necessary, counsel for him or her regardless of his or her wishes. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear the costs of such legal service; otherwise such legal service shall be at public expense. The person whose commitment or recommitment is sought shall be informed of his or her right to be examined by a licensed physician, ((psychiatric)) advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or other professional person of his or her choice who is qualified to provide such services. If the person is unable to obtain a qualified person and requests an examination, the court shall employ a licensed physician, ((psychiatric)) advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or other professional person to conduct an examination and testify on behalf of the person.

(10) A person committed under this chapter may at any time seek to be discharged from commitment by writ of habeas corpus in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(11) The venue for proceedings under this section is the county in which person to be committed resides or is present.

(12) When in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the program providing involuntary inpatient treatment under this chapter, the committed patient can be appropriately served by less restrictive treatment before expiration of the period of commitment, then the less restrictive care may be required as a condition for early release for a period which, when added to the initial treatment period, does not exceed the period of commitment. If the program designated to provide the less restrictive treatment is other than the program providing the initial involuntary treatment, the program so designated must agree in writing to assume such responsibility. A copy of the conditions for early release shall be given to the patient, the designated chemical dependency specialist of original commitment, and the court of original commitment. The program designated to provide less restrictive care may modify the conditions for continued release when the modifications are in the best interests of the patient. If the program providing less restrictive care and the designated chemical dependency specialist determine that a conditionally released patient is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release, or that substantial deterioration in the patient's functioning has occurred, then the designated chemical dependency specialist shall notify the court of original commitment and request a hearing to be held no less than two and no more than seven days after the date of the request to determine whether or not the person should be returned to more restrictive care. The designated chemical dependency specialist shall file a petition with the court stating the facts substantiating the need for the hearing along with the treatment recommendations. The patient shall have the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for the original involuntary treatment proceedings. The issues to be determined at the hearing are whether the conditionally released patient did or did not adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release to less restrictive care or that substantial deterioration of the patient's functioning has occurred and whether the conditions of release should be modified or the person should be returned to a more restrictive program. The hearing may be waived by the patient and his or her counsel and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, but may not be waived unless all such persons agree to the waiver. Upon waiver, the person may be returned for involuntary treatment or continued on conditional release on the same or modified conditions. The grounds and procedures for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment ordered by the court must be the same as those set forth in this section for less restrictive care arranged by an approved substance use disorder treatment program as a condition for early release.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.020 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 204 and 2016 c 155 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(3) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(4) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(5) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(6) "Chemical dependency" means:

(a) Alcoholism;

(b) Drug addiction; or

(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires;

(7) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(8) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(9) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(10) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed by the department of health and certified by the department of social and health services under RCW 71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization;

(11) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(12) "Department" means the department of social and health services;

(13) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the behavioral health organization to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(14) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(15) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary;

(16) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(5);

(17) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(18) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(19) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the department. The department may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(20) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(21) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(22) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(23) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(24) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(25) "Information related to mental health services" means all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental health service provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;

(26) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(27) "In need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment" means that a person, as a result of a mental disorder: (a) Has been committed by a court to detention for involuntary mental health treatment at least twice during the preceding thirty-six months, or, if the person is currently committed for involuntary mental health treatment, the person has been committed to detention for involuntary mental health treatment at least once during the thirty-six months preceding the date of initial detention of the current commitment cycle; (b) is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient treatment without an order for less restrictive alternative treatment, in view of the person's treatment history or current behavior; (c) is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision; (d) is likely to benefit from less restrictive alternative treatment; and (e) requires less restrictive alternative treatment to prevent a relapse, decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely disabled within a reasonably short period of time. For purposes of (a) of this subsection, time spent in a mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction is excluded from the thirty-six month calculation;

(28) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(29) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public mental health and substance use disorder service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(30) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585;

(31) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(32) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(33) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder;

(34) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(35) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(36) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental disorders or substance use disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery systems or behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW, approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section, secure detoxification facilities as defined in this section, and correctional facilities operated by state and local governments;

(37) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(38) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.57A or 18.71A RCW;

(39) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders;

(40) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, chemical dependency professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(41) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(42) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(43) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(44) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure detoxification facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(45) "Registration records" include all the records of the department, behavioral health organizations, treatment facilities, and other persons providing services to the department, county departments, or facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness or substance use disorders;

(46) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(47) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(48) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services, or his or her designee;

(49) "Secure detoxification facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that:

(a) Provides for intoxicated persons:

(i) Evaluation and assessment, provided by certified chemical dependency professionals;

(ii) Acute or subacute detoxification services; and

(iii) Discharge assistance provided by certified chemical dependency professionals, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Is certified as such by the department;

(50) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;

(51) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(52) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(53) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(54) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(55) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed by the department of health and certified by the department of social and health services under RCW 71.24.035, which is designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and must meet department of health residential treatment facility standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or involuntary placement facility;

(56) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.210 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 224 and 2016 c 155 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:

(a) Shall, within twenty-four hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:

(i) One physician ((and a mental health professional)), physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse professional; and

(ii) One ((physician assistant and a)) mental health professional((; or

(iii) One advanced registered nurse practitioner and a mental health)) or chemical dependency professional; and

(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to seventy-two hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for seventy-two hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or chemical dependency professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment ((facility)) program, or, if detained to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement; however, a person may only be referred to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is an available secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space for the person.

(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than fourteen days.

(4) A person detained, accepted, or admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility must be evaluated by a mental health professional. A person detained, accepted, or admitted to a secure detox facility or approved substance use disorder treatment facility must be evaluated by a chemical dependency professional.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.210 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 225 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:

(a) Shall, within twenty-four hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:

(i) One physician ((and a mental health professional)), physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse professional; and

(ii) One ((physician assistant and a)) mental health professional((; or

(iii) One advanced registered nurse practitioner and a mental health)) or chemical dependency professional; and

(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to seventy-two hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for seventy-two hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.

(2) If, after examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or chemical dependency professional and licensed physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a substance use disorder treatment ((facility)) program, or, if detained to a secure detoxification facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement.

(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure detoxification facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than fourteen days.

(4) A person detained, accepted, or admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility must be evaluated by a mental health professional. A person detained, accepted, or admitted to a secure detox facility or approved substance use disorder treatment facility must be evaluated by a chemical dependency professional.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.230 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 230, 2016 c 155 s 5, and 2016 c 45 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

A person detained or committed for seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment or for an outpatient evaluation for the purpose of filing a petition for a less restrictive alternative treatment order may be committed for not more than fourteen additional days of involuntary intensive treatment or ninety additional days of a less restrictive alternative to involuntary intensive treatment. A petition may only be filed if the following conditions are met:

(1) The professional staff of the agency or facility providing evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that the condition is caused by mental disorder or substance use disorder and results in a likelihood of serious harm, results in the person being gravely disabled, or results in the person being in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment, and are prepared to testify those conditions are met; and

(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she has not in good faith volunteered; and

(3) The agency or facility providing intensive treatment or which proposes to supervise the less restrictive alternative is certified to provide such treatment by the department; and

(4) The professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated crisis responder has filed a petition with the court for a fourteen day involuntary detention or a ninety day less restrictive alternative. The petition must be signed ((either)) by:

(a) ((Two physicians)) One physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner; and

(b) One physician ((and a)), physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, mental health professional((;

(c) One physician assistant and a mental health professional; or

(d) One psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner and a mental health professional)), or chemical dependency professional. The persons signing the petition must have examined the person. If the person is detained for the purpose of mental health treatment, the person must be examined by a mental health professional. If involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a mental disorder or substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of such person or others. The petition shall state specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought, the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a mental disorder or as a result of a substance use disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, is gravely disabled, or is in need of assisted outpatient mental health treatment, and shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services; and

(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained or committed person, his or her attorney and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, prior to the probable cause hearing; and

(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person if no other counsel has appeared; and

(7) The petition reflects that the person was informed of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed for mental health treatment; and

(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated crisis responder may petition for an additional period of either ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment or ninety days of involuntary intensive treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.290; and

(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment has agreed to assume such responsibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) Sections 2, 3, and 5 of this act take effect April 1, 2018.

(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) Section 1 of this act expires April 1, 2018.

(2) Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2026.

--- END ---