BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health plan issued on or after the effective date of this section must, at a minimum, provide coverage for the same preventive services required to be covered under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-13 (2016) and any federal rules or guidance in effect on December 31, 2016, implementing 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-13.

(2) The health plan may not impose cost-sharing requirements for the preventive services required to be covered under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The commissioner may, by rule, add preventive services to this requirement based on changes in federal law.

--- END ---