BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

Any ordinance adopted by a city or town does not apply to a department of transportation project on a state highway as defined in RCW 46.04.560.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

Any ordinance adopted by a code city does not apply to a department of transportation project on a state highway as defined in RCW 46.04.560.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

Any ordinance adopted by a county does not apply to a department of transportation project on a state highway as defined in RCW 46.04.560.

--- END ---