BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.400.303 and 2014 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, and their contractors hiring employees who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children or developmentally disabled persons shall require a record check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before hiring an employee. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity ((shall)) may provide a copy of the record report to the applicant at the applicant's request. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. If the applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the district, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, or contractor may waive the requirement. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall determine who shall pay costs associated with the record check.

(2) Federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools may use the process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for their employees and applicants for employment.

(3)(a) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, schools that are the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW, and their contractors may use the process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for any prospective volunteer who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children under eighteen years of age or developmentally disabled persons, during the course of his or her involvement with the school or organization under circumstances where access will or may involve the following:

(i) Groups of five or fewer children under twelve years of age;

(ii) Groups of three or fewer children between twelve and eighteen years of age; or

(iii) Developmentally disabled persons.

(b) For purposes of (a) of this subsection, "unsupervised" means not in the presence of:

(i) Another employee or volunteer from the same school or organization; or

(ii) Any relative or guardian of any of the children or developmentally disabled persons to which the prospective employee or volunteer has access during the course of his or her involvement with the school or organization.

(4) Individuals who hold a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of early learning consistent with RCW 43.215.215 can meet the requirements in subsection (1) of this section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) The cost of record checks must include: The fees established by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for the criminal history background checks; a fee paid to the superintendent of public instruction for the cost of administering this section and RCW 28A.195.080 and 28A.410.010; and other applicable fees for obtaining the fingerprints.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.400.305 and 2010 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW ((on record check information)) to implement RCW 28A.400.303. The rules shall include, but not be limited to the following:

(1) Written procedures providing a school district, approved private school, Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, state school for the blind, ((or)) federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded school employee, charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW, or applicant for certification or employment access to and review of information obtained based on the record check required under RCW 28A.400.303; and

(2) Written procedures limiting access to the superintendent of public instruction record check database to only those individuals processing record check information at the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the appropriate school district or districts, approved private schools, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school for the blind, the appropriate educational service district or districts, ((and)) the appropriate federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools, the appropriate charter schools, and the appropriate state-tribal education compact schools.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.410.010 and 2014 c 50 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that the initial application for certification shall require, at the applicant's expense, a criminal history record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation ((at the applicant's expense)). The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. An individual who holds a valid portable background check clearance card issued by the department of early learning consistent with RCW 43.215.215 is exempt from the office of the superintendent of public instruction fingerprint background check if the individual provides a true and accurate copy of his or her Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background report results to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the two years before application. The superintendent of public instruction shall use the fingerprint criminal history record check information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a certificate under this section. The rules shall permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or suspended certificate to be employed on a conditional basis by a school district with the requirement that the holder must complete any certificate renewal requirements established by the state board of education within two years of initial reemployment.

(b) In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American sign language the board shall consult with the national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.

(c) The board shall develop rules consistent with RCW 18.340.020 for the certification of spouses of military personnel.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board rules.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.410.090 and 2013 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any certificate or permit authorized under the provisions of this chapter, chapter 28A.405 RCW, or rules promulgated thereunder may be revoked or suspended by the authority authorized to grant the same based upon a criminal records report authorized by law, or upon the complaint of the professional educator standards board or any school district superintendent, educational service district superintendent, or private school administrator for ((immorality)) lack of good moral character or personal fitness, violation of written contract, unprofessional conduct, intemperance, or crime against the law of the state. A reprimand may be issued as an alternative to suspension or revocation of a certificate or permit. School district superintendents, educational service district superintendents, the professional educator standards board, or private school administrators may file a complaint concerning any certificated employee of a school district, educational service district, or private school and this filing authority is not limited to employees of the complaining superintendent or administrator. Such written complaint shall state the grounds and summarize the factual basis upon which a determination has been made that an investigation by the superintendent of public instruction is warranted.

(b) If the superintendent of public instruction has reasonable cause to believe that an alleged violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it has occurred based on a written complaint alleging physical abuse or sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee filed by a parent or another person, but no complaint has been forwarded to the superintendent by a school district superintendent, educational service district superintendent, or private school administrator, and that a school district superintendent, educational service district superintendent, or private school administrator has sufficient notice of the alleged violation and opportunity to file a complaint, the superintendent of public instruction may cause an investigation to be made of the alleged violation, together with such other matters that may be disclosed in the course of the investigation related to certificated personnel.

(2) A parent or another person may file a written complaint with the superintendent of public instruction alleging physical abuse or sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee if:

(a) The parent or other person has already filed a written complaint with the educational service district superintendent concerning that employee;

(b) The educational service district superintendent has not caused an investigation of the allegations and has not forwarded the complaint to the superintendent of public instruction for investigation; and

(c) The written complaint states the grounds and factual basis upon which the parent or other person believes an investigation should be conducted.

(3) Any certificate or permit authorized under the provisions of this chapter, chapter 28A.405 RCW, or rules adopted thereunder may be revoked or suspended by the authority authorized to grant the same upon complaint from the professional educator standards board alleging unprofessional conduct in the form of a fraudulent submission of a test for educators. A reprimand may be issued as an alternative to suspension or revocation of a certificate or permit. The professional educator standards board must issue to the superintendent of public instruction a written complaint stating the grounds and factual basis upon which the professional educator standards board believes an investigation should be conducted pursuant to this section. In all cases under this subsection, the person whose certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be heard and has the right to appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100.

(4)(a) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be revoked by the authority authorized to grant the certificate upon a guilty plea or the conviction of any felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322, in accordance with this section. The person whose certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be heard.

(b) Mandatory permanent revocation upon a guilty plea or the conviction of felony crimes specified under RCW 28A.400.322(1) shall apply to such convictions or guilty pleas which occur after July 23, 1989, and before July 26, 2009.

(c) Mandatory permanent revocation upon a guilty plea or conviction of felony crimes specified under RCW 28A.400.322(2) shall apply to such convictions or guilty pleas that occur on or after July 26, 2009.

(d) Revocation of any certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW for a guilty plea or criminal conviction of a crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322 occurring prior to July 23, 1989, shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

(5)(a) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be suspended or revoked, according to the provisions of this subsection, by the authority authorized to grant the certificate upon a finding that an employee has engaged in an unauthorized use of school equipment to intentionally access material depicting sexually explicit conduct or has intentionally possessed on school grounds any material depicting sexually explicit conduct; except for material used in conjunction with established curriculum. A first time violation of this subsection shall result in either suspension or revocation of the employee's certificate or permit as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. A second violation shall result in a mandatory revocation of the certificate or permit.

(b) In all cases under this subsection (5), the person whose certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be heard and has the right to appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100. Certificates or permits shall be suspended or revoked under this subsection only if findings are made on or after July 24, 2005. For the purposes of this subsection, "sexually explicit conduct" has the same definition as provided in RCW 9.68A.011.

(6) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be revoked by the authority authorized to grant the certificate upon a finding that the certificate holder obtained the certificate through fraudulent means, including fraudulent misrepresentation of required academic credentials or prior criminal record. In all cases under this subsection, the person whose certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be heard and has the right to appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100. Certificates or permits shall be revoked under this subsection only if findings are made on or after July 26, 2009.

(7)(a) In determining whether an individual lacks good moral character or personal fitness under this chapter, the superintendent of public instruction may consider founded reports of child abuse or neglect made by the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW 26.44.030.

(b) The department of social and health services shall furnish the superintendent with reports of founded findings of child abuse or neglect in a timely fashion, but shall not disclose to the superintendent screened-out, inconclusive, or unfounded reports as defined in RCW 26.44.020.

(c) If the department of social and health services inadvertently furnishes the superintendent with a screened-out, inconclusive, or unfounded report in violation of this section, the superintendent shall:

(i) Not consider the information contained in the reports for any purpose;

(ii) Notify the department of social and health services of the violation of this section;

(iii) Notify the subject of the reports at his or her last known address of the department of social and health service's violation; and

(iv) Destroy the improperly disclosed reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

The K-12 criminal background check account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All fees collected by the office of the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.400.303 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the purpose of administering the office of the superintendent of public instruction's duties under RCW 28A.400.303 and 28A.410.010. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 6. RCW 43.215.215 and 2011 c 295 s 2 and 2011 c 253 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early learning services to children, the department may consider the history of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes. No unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider licensed under this chapter.

(2) In order to determine the suitability of individuals newly applying for an agency license, new licensees, their new employees, and other persons who newly have unsupervised access to children in care, shall be fingerprinted.

(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history record check.

(b)(i) Effective July 1, 2012, all individuals applying for first-time agency licenses, all new employees, and other persons who have not been previously qualified by the department to have unsupervised access to children in care must be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal history record check pursuant to this section.

(ii) Persons required to be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal (([history])) history record check pursuant to this section must pay for the cost of this check as follows: The fee established by the Washington state patrol for the criminal background history check, including the cost of obtaining the fingerprints; and a fee paid to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. The fee paid to the department must be deposited into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.215.218. The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.

(c) The director shall use the fingerprint criminal history record check information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for children.

(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director such information as they may have and that the director may require for such purpose.

(e) No later than July 1, 2013, all agency licensees holding licenses prior to July 1, 2012, persons who were employees before July 1, 2012, and persons who have been qualified by the department before July 1, 2012, to have unsupervised access to children in care, must submit a new background application to the department. The department must require persons submitting a new background application pursuant to this subsection (2)(e) to pay a fee to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. This fee must be paid into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.215.218. The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.

(f) The department shall issue a background check clearance card or certificate to the applicant if after the completion of a background check the department concludes the applicant is qualified for unsupervised access to children in care. The background check clearance card or certificate is valid for three years from the date of issuance. A valid card or certificate must be accepted by a potential employer as proof that the applicant has successfully completed a background check as required under this chapter.

(g) The original applicant for an agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised access to children in care shall submit a new background check application to the department, on a form and by a date as determined by the department.

(h) The applicant and agency shall maintain on-site for inspection a copy of the background check clearance card or certificate.

(i) Individuals who have been issued a background check clearance card or certificate shall report nonconviction and conviction information to the department within twenty-four hours of the event constituting the nonconviction or conviction information.

(j) The department shall investigate and conduct a redetermination of an applicant's or licensee's background clearance if the department receives a complaint or information from individuals, a law enforcement agency, or other federal, state, or local government agency. Subject to the requirements contained in RCW 43.215.300 and 43.215.305 and based on a determination that an individual lacks the appropriate character, suitability, or competence to provide child care or early learning services to children, the department may: (i) Invalidate the background card or certificate; or (ii) suspend, modify, or revoke any license authorized by this chapter.

(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements of the department of early learning, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of social and health services, each department shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow ((both)) these departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. ((Neither)) These departments may not share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

(4) Individuals who have completed a fingerprint background check as required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, consistent with RCW 28A.400.303, and have been continuously employed by the same school district or educational service district, can meet the requirements in subsection (2) of this section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background check report results to the department or if the school district or the educational service district provides an affidavit to the department that the individual has been authorized to work by the school district or educational service district after completing a record check consistent with RCW 28A.400.303. The department may require that additional background checks be completed that do not require additional fingerprinting and may charge a fee for these additional background checks.

--- END ---