BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.103.090 and 2007 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council may:

(a) Meet at such times and places as may be designated by a majority vote of the councilmembers or, if a majority cannot agree, by the chair;

(b) Adopt rules governing the council and the conduct of its meetings;

(c) Require reports from the chief of the Washington state patrol on matters pertaining to the bureau of forensic laboratory services;

(d) Authorize the expenditure of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars per biennium from the council's death investigations account appropriation for the purpose of assisting local jurisdictions in the investigation of multiple deaths involving unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic events, or involving multiple jurisdictions. The council shall adopt rules consistent with this subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;

(e) Authorize the expenditure of up to twenty-five thousand dollars per biennium from the council's death investigations account appropriation for the purpose of assisting local jurisdictions to secure forensic anthropology services or other testing, to determine the identity of human remains upon a showing of financial need. The council shall adopt rules consistent with this subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;

(f) Authorize expenditures from the council's death investigations account appropriation for the purpose of funding a statewide case management system for coroners and medical examiners. The council shall confer with the state association of coroners and medical examiners in the selection of a statewide system. The council may adopt rules consistent with this subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;

(g) Do anything, necessary or convenient, which enables the council to perform its duties and to exercise its powers; and

(((g))) (h) Be actively involved in the preparation of the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget and approve the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget prior to formal submission to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

(2) The council shall:

(a) Prescribe qualifications for the position of director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, after consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol. The council shall submit to the chief of the Washington state patrol a list containing the names of up to three persons who the council believes meet its qualifications to serve as director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. Minimum qualifications for the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services must include successful completion of a background investigation and polygraph examination. If requested by the chief of the Washington state patrol, the forensic investigations council shall submit one additional list of up to three persons who the forensic investigations council believes meet its qualifications. The appointment must be from one of the lists of persons submitted by the forensic investigations council, and the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services shall report to the office of the chief of the Washington state patrol;

(b) After consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol and the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, the council shall appoint a toxicologist as state toxicologist, who shall report to the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. The appointee shall meet the minimum standards for employment with the Washington state patrol including successful completion of a background investigation and polygraph examination;

(c) Establish, after consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol, the policies, objectives, and priorities of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, to be implemented and administered within constraints established by budgeted resources by the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services;

(d) Set the salary for the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services; and

(e) Set the salary for the state toxicologist.

--- END ---