BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After July 1, 2017, no rule, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, or policy of any state agency may be enforced unless and until the rule or policy has been adopted pursuant to this chapter, codified in the Washington Administrative Code, and either:

(a) Ratified by act of the legislature; or

(b) Adopted by an agency that has successfully completed an excellence assessment by an independent examiner.

(2) For the purpose of this section "excellence assessment" means an assessment of agency operational performance by a trained national or state examiner using an excellence framework published by the national institutes of standards and technology, United States department of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---