BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.29A.030 and 1998 c 300 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 19.29A.040, an electric utility shall:

(1) Provide notice to all of its retail electric customers that the disclosures required in RCW 19.29A.020 are available without charge upon request. Such notice shall be provided at the time service is established and either included as a prominent part of each customer's bill or in a written notice mailed to each customer at least once a year thereafter. Required disclosures shall be provided without charge, in writing using plain language that is understandable to an ordinary customer, and presented in a form that is clear and conspicuous((.));

(2) Provide written or electronic notice of public hearings where changes in electricity rates will be considered or approved by the commission or governing body, in a form and manner as may be required by the commission or governing body;

(3) Disclose on each billing statement the rate of tax imposed upon the electric utility under RCW 35.21.870, if any, and the amount of such tax to be paid directly by the retail electric customer through the billing statement;

(4) Disclose the following information in a prominent manner on all billing statements sent to retail electric customers, or by a separate written notice mailed to all retail electric customers at least quarterly and at the same time as a billing statement: "YOUR BILL INCLUDES CHARGES FOR ELECTRICITY, DELIVERY SERVICES, GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND OVERHEAD, METERING, TAXES, CONSERVATION EXPENSES, AND OTHER ITEMS."

--- END ---