BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.20.744 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7043 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section provides an alternative process for awarding contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of university buildings and facilities in which critical patient care or highly specialized medical research is located. These provisions may be used, in lieu of other procedures to award contracts for such work, when the estimated cost of the work is equal to or less than five million dollars and the project involves construction, renovation, remodeling, or alteration of improvements within a building that is used directly for critical patient care or highly specialized medical research.

(2) The university may create a single critical patient care or specialized medical research facilities roster or may create multiple critical patient care or specialized medical research facilities rosters for different trade specialties or categories of anticipated work. At least once a year, the university shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation and with the office of minority and women's business enterprises, a notice of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit a statement of qualifications from contractors who wish to be on the roster or rosters of prime contractors. In addition, qualified contractors shall be added to the roster or rosters at any time they submit a written request, necessary records, and meet the qualifications established by the university. The university may require eligible contractors desiring to be placed on a roster to keep current records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the university with input from the women-owned and minority-owned business community as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. Placement on a roster shall be on the basis of qualifications.

(3) The public solicitation of qualifications shall include but not be limited to:

(a) A description of the types of projects to be completed and where possible may include programmatic, performance, and technical requirements and specifications;

(b) The reasons for using the critical patient care and specialized medical research roster process;

(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of a contractor, including submission of an accident prevention program;

(d) A description of the process the university will use to evaluate qualifications, including evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors;

(e) The form of the contract to be awarded;

(f) A description of the administrative process by which the required qualifications, evaluation process, and project types may be appealed; and

(g) A description of the administrative process by which decisions of the university may be appealed.

(4) The university shall establish a committee that includes one representative from the minority-owned business community and one representative from the women-owned business community to evaluate the contractors submitting qualifications. Evaluation criteria for selection of the contractor or contractors to be included on a roster shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Ability of a contractor's professional personnel;

(b) A contractor's past performance on similar projects, including but not limited to medical facilities, and involving either negotiated work or other public works contracts;

(c) The contractor's ability to meet time and budget requirements;

(d) The contractor's ability to provide preconstruction services, as appropriate;

(e) The contractor's capacity to successfully complete the project;

(f) The contractor's approach to executing projects;

(g) The contractor's approach to safety and the contractor's safety history; ((and))

(h) The contractor's record of performance, integrity, judgment, and skills;

(i) The contractor's record of including office of minority and women's business enterprises-certified, minority, women, veteran, and small businesses; and

(j) The contractor's past history of use of small business entities, disadvantaged business enterprises, minority business enterprises, women business enterprises, and minority women business enterprises over the last five years on projects of five million dollars or less and the contractor's proposed outreach plan and commitment to include such firms.

(5) Contractors meeting the evaluation committee's criteria for selection must be placed on the applicable roster or rosters.

(6) When a project is selected for delivery through this roster process, the university must establish a procedure for securing written quotations from all contractors on a roster to assure that a competitive price is established. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials and equipment to be furnished. Plans and specifications must be included in the invitation but may not be detailed. Award of a project must be made to the responsible bidder submitting the lowest responsive bid.

(7) The university shall make an effort to solicit proposals from certified minority or certified woman-owned contractors. The university business diversity program shall establish aspirational goals for small business entities, disadvantaged business enterprises, minority business enterprises, women business enterprises, and minority women business enterprises for each roster based on the projected subcontracting opportunities and to the extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400.

(8) Beginning in September 2010 and every other September thereafter, the university shall provide a report to the capital projects advisory review board which must, at a minimum, include a list of rosters used, contracts awarded, ((and a description of outreach to and participation by women and minority-owned businesses)) office of minority and women's business enterprises-certified small business entities, disadvantaged business enterprises, veterans, and women and minority-owned business use rates on the projects.

(9) Beginning in September 2015 and every September thereafter, the university shall report to the office of minority and women's business enterprises and to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees the number of qualified women and minority-owned business contractors on the roster or rosters and the number of contracts awarded to women and minority-owned businesses.

(10) The university shall require contractors to solicit proposals from office of minority and women's business enterprises-certified firms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.131.413 (Alternative process for awarding contracts—University buildings and facilities for critical patient care or specialized medical research—Termination) and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7041 & 2010 c 245 s 12; and

(2) RCW 43.131.414 (Alternative process for awarding contracts—University buildings and facilities for critical patient care or specialized medical research—Repeal) and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7042 & 2010 c 245 s 13.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2017.

--- END ---