BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.360 and 2013 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person commits retail theft with special circumstances if he or she commits theft of property from a mercantile establishment with one of the following special circumstances:

(a) To facilitate the theft, the person leaves the mercantile establishment through a designated emergency exit;

(b) The person was, at the time of the theft, in possession of an item, article, implement, or device used, under circumstances evincing an intent to use or employ, or designed to overcome security systems including, but not limited to, lined bags or tag removers; or

(c) The person committed theft at three or more separate and distinct mercantile establishments within a one hundred eighty-day period.

(2) A person is guilty of retail theft with special circumstances in the first degree if the theft involved constitutes theft in the first degree. Retail theft with special circumstances in the first degree is a class B felony.

(3) A person is guilty of retail theft with special circumstances in the second degree if the theft involved constitutes theft in the second degree. Retail theft with special circumstances in the second degree is a class C felony.

(4) A person is guilty of retail theft with special circumstances in the third degree if the theft involved constitutes theft in the third degree. Retail theft with special circumstances in the third degree is a class C felony.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "special circumstances" means the particular aggravating circumstances described in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

--- END ---