BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.245 RCW to read as follows:

For skill center cooperatives receiving any state capital funding after July 1, 2017, the host district of the skill center must maintain a separate capital account, into which the participating school districts shall make annual deposits, to pay for future minor repair and maintenance costs for the skill center. The annual deposits may be a per pupil facility fee charged by the host district to the participating district.

--- END ---