BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.24.131 and 2011 c 349 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any time before the close of business on the Monday following the last day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with the officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot. There shall be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed during special filing periods held under this title. No filing fee may be refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not refundable shall be given to each candidate at the time he or she files.

(2) If an incumbent officeholder who has filed for reelection pursuant to RCW 29A.24.050 later withdraws his or her candidacy pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, declarations of candidacy may be filed for that office until seventy-two hours after the close of business on the Monday following the last day for candidates to withdraw described in subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---