BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.93.150 and 2012 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board, upon review of any proposed action, shall take such of the following actions as it deems necessary to best carry out the intent of this chapter:

(1) Approve the proposal as submitted.

(2) Subject to RCW 35.02.170, modify the proposal by adjusting boundaries to add or delete territory. Subject to the requirements of this chapter, a board may modify a proposal by adding territory that would increase the total area of the proposal before the board. A board, however, may not modify a proposal for annexation of territory to a city or town by adding an amount of territory that constitutes more than one hundred percent of the total area of the proposal before the board. Any modifications shall not interfere with the authority of a city, town, or special purpose district to require or not require preannexation agreements, covenants, or petitions. A board shall not modify the proposed incorporation of a city with an estimated population of seven thousand five hundred or more by removing territory from the proposal, or adding territory to the proposal, that constitutes ten percent or more of the total area included within the proposal before the board. However, a board shall remove territory in the proposed incorporation that is located outside of an urban growth area or is annexed by a city or town, and may remove territory in the proposed incorporation if a petition or resolution proposing the annexation is filed or adopted that has priority over the proposed incorporation, before the area is established that is subject to this ten percent restriction on removing or adding territory. A board shall not modify the proposed incorporation of a city with a population of seven thousand five hundred or more to reduce the territory in such a manner as to reduce the population below seven thousand five hundred.

(3) Determine a division of assets and liabilities between two or more governmental units where relevant.

(4) Determine whether, or the extent to which, functions of a special purpose district are to be assumed by an incorporated city or town, metropolitan municipal corporation, or another existing special purpose district.

(5) Allow all affected jurisdictions to enter into any agreements necessary to address conflicts with the board's factors and objectives prior to ruling on the annexation proposal.

(6) Disapprove the proposal except that the board shall not have jurisdiction: (a) To disapprove the dissolution or disincorporation of a special purpose district which is not providing services but shall have jurisdiction over the determination of a division of the assets and liabilities of a dissolved or disincorporated special purpose district; (b) over the division of assets and liabilities of a special purpose district that is dissolved or disincorporated pursuant to chapter 36.96 RCW; nor (c) to disapprove the incorporation of a city with an estimated population of seven thousand five hundred or more, but the board may recommend against the proposed incorporation of a city with such an estimated population.

Unless the board disapproves a proposal, it shall be presented under the appropriate statute for approval of a public body and, if required, a vote of the people. A proposal that has been modified shall be presented under the appropriate statute for approval of a public body and if required, a vote of the people. If a proposal, other than that for a city, town, or special purpose district annexation, after modification does not contain enough signatures of persons within the modified area, as are required by law, then the initiating party, parties or governmental unit has thirty days after the modification decision to secure enough signatures to satisfy the legal requirement. If the signatures cannot be secured then the proposal may be submitted to a vote of the people, as required by law.

The addition or deletion of property by the board shall not invalidate a petition which had previously satisfied the sufficiency of signature provisions of RCW 35.13.130 or 35A.14.120. When the board, after due proceedings held, disapproves a proposed action, such proposed action shall be unavailable, the proposing agency shall be without power to initiate the same or substantially the same as determined by the board, and any succeeding acts intended to or tending to effectuate that action shall be void, but such action may be reinitiated after a period of twelve months from date of disapproval and shall again be subject to the same consideration.

The board shall not modify or deny a proposed action unless there is evidence on the record to support a conclusion that the action is inconsistent with one or more of the objectives under RCW 36.93.180. The board may not increase the area of a city or town annexation unless it holds a separate public hearing on the proposed increase and provides ten or more days' notice of the hearing to the registered voters and property owners residing within the area subject to the proposed increase. Every such determination to modify or deny a proposed action shall be made in writing pursuant to a motion, and shall be supported by appropriate written findings and conclusions, based on the record.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.93.170 and 1997 c 429 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

In reaching a decision on a proposal or an alternative, the board shall consider the factors affecting such proposal, which shall include, but not be limited to the following:

(1) Population and territory; population density; land area and land uses; comprehensive plans and zoning, as adopted under chapter 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW; comprehensive plans and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW; applicable service agreements entered into under chapter 36.115 or 39.34 RCW; applicable interlocal annexation agreements between a county and its cities; per capita assessed valuation; topography, natural boundaries and drainage basins, proximity to other populated areas; the existence and preservation of prime agricultural soils and productive agricultural uses; the likelihood of significant growth in the area and in adjacent incorporated and unincorporated areas during the next ten years; location and most desirable future location of community facilities;

(2) Municipal services; need for municipal services; effect of ordinances, governmental codes, regulations and resolutions on existing uses; present cost and adequacy of governmental services and controls in area; prospects of governmental services from other sources; probable future needs for such services and controls; probable effect of proposal or alternative on cost and adequacy of services and controls in area and adjacent area; the effect on the ((finances)) revenues, expenses, debt structure, and contractual obligations and rights of all affected governmental units; ((and))

(3) The effect of the proposal or alternative on adjacent areas, on mutual economic, fiscal, and social interests, and on the local governmental structure of the county; and

(4) The logical and reasonable nature of the annexation boundaries to ensure that they do not create or result in unincorporated islands, peninsulas, or other jurisdictional irregularities.

The provisions of chapter 43.21C RCW, State Environmental Policy, shall not apply to incorporation proceedings covered by chapter 35.02 RCW.

--- END ---