BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 27.34.395 and 2007 c 138 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature affirms that the Washington state historical society is the state's designated partner representative for the Vancouver national historic reserve. Accordingly, the Washington state historical society shall:

(1) Participate in the regularly scheduled coordination meetings of the Vancouver national historic reserve partners;

(2) Participate in the development of management, education, and interpretive plans and policies associated with the Vancouver national historic reserve; and

(3) ((Partner with Washington State University and other agencies for purposes of managing the center for Columbia river history, headquartered on the Vancouver national historic reserve, and with the department for preservation and rehabilitation of the site; and

(4))) Develop and submit to the office of financial management and the legislature operating and capital budget requests concurrent with the biennial cycle and oversee the management of all funds appropriated by the state for the Vancouver national historic reserve.

Sec. 2. RCW 27.34.900 and 1993 c 101 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The building and grounds designated as Block 2, Grainger's Addition to the City of Olympia, County of Thurston, acquired by the state under senate joint resolution No. 18, session of 1939, is hereby designated a part of the state capitol, to be known as the ((state capital historical museum. This structure is to be used to house and interpret the collection of the Washington state historical society. This section does not limit the society's use of other structures)) historic Lord mansion.

--- END ---