BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. FINDINGS—INTENT. The legislature finds that training for teachers in public schools to provide civics education is not available in all districts due to limited budgets and competing demands for funding.

It is the intent of the legislature to develop an in-depth and interactive teacher training program to improve the ability of teachers throughout the state to implement the legislatively mandated 0.5 credit civics education graduation requirement. This expanded civics education program should include components assuring that students have basic knowledge about national, state, tribal, and local governments, and thus become well prepared to become informed, active citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.415 RCW to read as follows:

EXPANDED CIVICS EDUCATION PROGRAM. (1) An expanded civics education teacher training program is established within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) The expanded civics education program must provide for the selection of a team of qualified social studies teachers from across the state who will:

(a) Develop teacher training materials using an existing textbook that includes civic engagement with national, state, tribal, and local government;

(b) Provide teacher training across the state using the tools established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction including the "Six Proven Practices for Enhancing Civic Education," the "(C3) Instructional Framework found in the College, Career, and Civic Life," "The Guardian of Democracy-Successor Report to the Civic Mission of Schools," and "CIRCLE: The Center for Information and Research on Civic Learning and Engagement"; and

(c) Develop a process for sustaining and building teacher capacity.

(3) The program shall assure:

(a) An increase in the number of teachers with the knowledge and skills to effectively engage students in civic education;

(b) An increase in the number of students who have a basic understanding of how governments work; and

(c) An increase in the number of students from every demographic and socioeconomic group who know their rights and responsibilities within society and are prepared to exercise them.

(4) To implement the program in this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with a Washington state-based 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization that has an extensive track record of nonpartisan, fact-based federal, tribal, state, and local civic education of students and adults.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may accept gifts and grants to assist with the establishment and implementation of the program in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

--- END ---