BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.46.0321 and 1987 c 4 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized primarily for purposes other than the conduct of such activities are hereby authorized to conduct bingo, raffles, and amusement games, without obtaining a license to do so from the commission but only when:

(1) Such activities are held in accordance with all other requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the commission;

(2) Said activities are((, alone or in any combination,)) conducted no more than four times each calendar year for raffles and twice each calendar year for bingo and amusement games; and over a period of no more than twelve consecutive days each time, notwithstanding the limitations of RCW 9.46.0205: PROVIDED, That a raffle conducted under this subsection may be conducted for a period longer than twelve days;

(3) Only bona fide members of that organization, who are not paid for such services, participate in the management or operation of the activities;

(4) Gross revenues to the organization from ((all the activities together)) raffles do not exceed ten thousand dollars during any calendar year;

(5) Gross revenues to the organization from bingo and amusement games do not exceed five thousand dollars during any calendar year;

(((5))) (6) All revenue therefrom, after deducting the cost of prizes and other expenses of the activity, is devoted solely to the purposes for which the organization qualifies as a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization;

(((6))) (7) The organization gives notice at least five days in advance of the conduct of any of the activities to the local police agency of the jurisdiction within which the activities are to be conducted of the organization's intent to conduct the activities, the location of the activities, and the date or dates they will be conducted; and

(((7))) (8) The organization conducting the activities maintains records for a period of one year from the date of the event which accurately show at a minimum the gross revenue from each activity, details of the expenses of conducting the activities, and details of the uses to which the gross revenue therefrom is put.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations authorized to conduct activities under this chapter may offer raffle tickets purchased as part of a multiple ticket package to be purchased at a discount. The organization may offer different levels of discounts based on the volume of tickets sold in the multiple packages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations authorized to conduct activities under this chapter who are engaging in a gambling activity where the participants select their own numbered, physical item, to hold pending a random selection of winning numbers, are not required to attach an individual numbered ticket with the item.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.46.0277 and 2009 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Raffle," as used in this chapter, means a game in which tickets bearing an individual number are sold for not more than one hundred dollars each and in which a prize or prizes are awarded on the basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons conducting the game, when the game is conducted by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization, no person other than a bona fide member of the organization takes any part in the management or operation of the game, and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person other than the organization conducting the game. For the purposes of section 3 of this act, "raffle" also means a game in which a numbered, physical item is used without a ticket attached.

--- END ---