BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.08.160 and 1961 c 12 s 46.08.160 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol ((shall be)) is the chief enforcing officer to assure the proper enforcement of such rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to RCW 46.08.150. However, the director of enterprise services has the authority to enforce such rules and regulations that relate to parking on the state capitol grounds, and collect and retain any penalties that the director establishes pursuant to RCW 46.08.150. Any penalties collected under this subsection must be deposited into the state vehicle parking account established under RCW 43.01.225.

(2) The director of enterprise services may by rule provide for internal adjudication of matters involving parking infractions established by rule under RCW 46.08.150. If the director provides for internal adjudication of parking infractions, a person charged with a parking infraction who seeks to contest the infraction must use the internal adjudication process before seeking review in district court pursuant to RCW 46.08.170. A person charged with a parking infraction who deems himself or herself aggrieved by the final decision in an internal adjudication may, within ten days after written notice of the final decision, appeal by filing a written notice with the director. Any documents relating to the appeal must immediately be forwarded to the district court of Thurston county, which has jurisdiction over such offense as provided in RCW 46.08.170. The appeal must be heard de novo.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.01.225 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 253 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby established an account in the state treasury to be known as the "state vehicle parking account." All parking rental income resulting from parking fees established by the department of enterprise services under RCW 46.08.172 at state-owned or leased property and receipts from penalties established by the department of enterprise services under RCW 46.08.150 shall be deposited in the "state vehicle parking account." Revenue deposited in the "state vehicle parking account" shall be first applied to pledged purposes. Unpledged ((parking)) revenues deposited in the "state vehicle parking account" may be used to:

(1) Pay costs incurred in the operation, maintenance, regulation, and enforcement of vehicle parking and parking facilities;

(2) Support the lease costs and/or capital investment costs of vehicle parking and parking facilities; and

(3) Support agency commute trip reduction programs under RCW 70.94.521 through 70.94.551.

--- END ---