BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

ACCOUNTABILITY

Sec. 101. RCW 28A.305.130 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy and strategic oversight of public education; ((implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student academic achievement;)) establish high school graduation requirements; approve school districts as charter school authorizers; accredit, approve, and oversee private schools; and provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles((; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210)). In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:

(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public business;

(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently conduct the work of the board;

(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding the work of the board;

(4) ((For purposes of statewide accountability:

(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students from disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b)(i) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment and, for high school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose.

(ii) By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of academic achievement on the tenth grade English language arts assessment and the end-of-course mathematics assessments developed in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070 to be used as the state transitions to high school assessments developed with a multistate consortium.

(iii) By the end of the 2014-15 school year, establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of academic achievement on the high school English language arts assessment and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with a multistate consortium in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070. To determine the appropriate score, the state board shall review the transition experience of Washington students to the consortium-developed assessments, examine the student scores used in other states that are administering the consortium-developed assessments, and review the scores in other states that require passage of an eleventh grade assessment as a high school graduation requirement. The scores established by the state board of education for the purposes of earning a certificate of academic achievement and graduation from high school may be different from the scores used for the purpose of determining a student's career and college readiness.

(iv) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards for the high school statewide student assessment. Any changes recommended by the board in the performance standards for the high school assessment shall be presented to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the middle school level performance standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from the previous ten years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's web site;

(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and

(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals adopted by the board;

(5))) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve. However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials;

(((6))) (5) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;

(((7))) (6) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be appointed as provided by ((RCW 28A.300.020)) section 702 of this act. The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and

(((8))) (7) Adopt a seal ((that shall be kept in the office of the superintendent of public instruction)) and such bylaws and rules as the board deems necessary for its own government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102. A new section is added to chapter 28A.657 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of statewide accountability the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, as the superintendent deems appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students from disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic backgrounds. The superintendent may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through twelve. The superintendent shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the superintendent shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(2)(a) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment and, for high school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The superintendent shall consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The superintendent shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the state board of education and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose.

(b) Establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of academic achievement on the tenth grade English language arts assessment and the end-of-course mathematics assessments developed in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070 to be used as the state transitions to high school assessments developed with a multistate consortium.

(c) Establish the scores students must achieve to meet the standard and earn a certificate of academic achievement on the high school English language arts assessment and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with a multistate consortium in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070. To determine the appropriate score, the superintendent shall review the transition experience of Washington students to the consortium-developed assessments, examine the student scores used in other states that are administering the consortium-developed assessments, and review the scores in other states that require passage of an eleventh grade assessment as a high school graduation requirement. The scores established by the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of earning a certificate of academic achievement and graduation from high school may be different from the scores used for the purpose of determining a student's career and college readiness.

(d) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards for the high school statewide student assessment. Any changes recommended by the superintendent in the performance standards for the high school assessment shall be presented to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the middle school level performance standards. The superintendent must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the superintendent changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, he or she must recalculate the results from the previous ten years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's web site;

(3) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and identify any improvements needed to the system; and

(4) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals adopted by the superintendent.

Sec. 103. RCW 28A.657.030 and 2013 c 159 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in January ((2011)) 2017, the superintendent of public instruction shall annually ((recommend to the state board of education school districts for designation)) designate school districts as required action districts. A district with at least one school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school according to the criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.657.020 shall be designated as a required action district. However, a school district shall not be ((recommended for designation)) designated as a required action district if the district was awarded a federal school improvement grant by the superintendent in 2010 or 2011 and for three consecutive years following receipt of the grant implemented a federal school intervention model at each school identified for improvement. The ((state board of education)) superintendent may designate a district that received a school improvement grant in 2010 or 2011 as a required action district if after three years of voluntarily implementing a plan the district continues to have a school identified as persistently lowest-achieving and meets the criteria for designation established by the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a school district superintendent with written notice of ((the recommendation for designation)) his or her designation of the district as a required action district by certified mail or personal service. A school district superintendent may request reconsideration of the superintendent of public instruction's ((recommendation)) designation. The reconsideration shall be limited to a determination of whether the school district met the criteria ((for being recommended as a required action district)). A request for reconsideration must be in writing and served on the superintendent of public instruction within ten days of service of the notice of the superintendent's ((recommendation)) designation.

(3) ((The state board of education shall annually designate those districts recommended by the superintendent in subsection (1) of this section as required action districts.)) A district designated as a required action district shall be required to notify all parents of students attending a school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school in the district of the ((state board of education's)) superintendent's designation of the district as a required action district and the process for complying with the requirements set forth in RCW 28A.657.040 through 28A.657.100.

Sec. 104. RCW 28A.657.050 and 2013 c 159 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The local district superintendent and local school board of a school district designated as a required action district must submit a required action plan to the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction for approval. Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan must be submitted under a schedule as required by the ((state board)) superintendent. A required action plan must be developed in collaboration with administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions representing any employees within the district, students, and other representatives of the local community.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a district with assistance in developing its plan if requested, and shall develop and publish guidelines for the development of required action plans. The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, shall also publish a list of research and evidence-based school improvement models, consistent with turnaround principles, that are approved for use in required action plans.

(c) The school board must conduct a public hearing to allow for comment on a proposed required action plan. The local school district shall submit the plan first to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to review and approve that the plan is consistent with federal and state guidelines, as applicable. After the office of the superintendent of public instruction has approved that the plan is consistent with federal and state guidelines, the local school district must submit its required action plan to the state board of education for approval.

(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:

(a) Implementation of an approved school improvement model required for the receipt of federal or state funds for school improvement for those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be focusing on for required action. The approved school improvement model selected must address the concerns raised in the academic performance audit and be intended to improve student performance to allow a school district to be removed from the list of districts designated as a required action district by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction within three years of implementation of the plan. The required action plan for districts with multiple persistently lowest-achieving schools must include separate plans for each school as well as a plan for how the school district will support the schools collectively;

(b) Submission of an application for federal or state funds for school improvement to the superintendent of public instruction;

(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the model selected and any other requirements of the plan;

(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all students enrolled in the school and how the district intends to address the findings of the academic performance audit; and

(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school, which include closing the educational opportunity gap, improving mathematics and reading or English language arts student achievement, and improving graduation rates as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.

(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 10, 2010, must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to implement a required action plan. For any district applying to participate in a collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project under RCW 28A.630.104, the parties to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 7, 2012, must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to implement an innovation and success plan.

(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall request the public employment relations commission to, and the commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th. All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and representatives of all affected bargaining units.

(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation, but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred, the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision by the superior court in the county where the school district is located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be limited to the issues certified by the executive director.

(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d) must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues for a decision by the superior court.

(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues were certified, setting forth the following:

(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district and its principal representative;

(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee organizations and their principal representatives;

(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;

(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive director for a final and binding decision by the court; and

(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district in the case of a required action district, or the comprehensive needs assessment in the case of a collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project.

(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order be implemented in a required action plan or innovation and success plan for the district for each issue certified by the executive director. Contemporaneously with the filing of the proposal, a party must file a brief with the court setting forth the reasons why the court should order implementation of its proposal in the final plan.

(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties, the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition. The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.

(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows for the award of federal or state funds for school improvement to the district from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement an approved school improvement model. In the case of an innovation and success plan, the court must enter an order selecting the proposal for inclusion in the plan that best responds to the issues raised in the school's comprehensive needs assessment. The court's decision must be issued no later than June 15th of the year in which the petition is filed and is final and binding on the parties; however the court's decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it does not allow the school district to implement a required action plan consistent with the requirements for the award of federal or state funds for school improvement by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees incurred under this statute.

(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have waived its right to object.

(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an employee must be consistent with this section and allow school districts designated as required action districts to implement an approved school improvement model in a required action plan.

Sec. 105. RCW 28A.657.050 and 2013 c 159 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The local district superintendent and local school board of a school district designated as a required action district must submit a required action plan to the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction for approval. Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan must be submitted under a schedule as required by the ((state board)) superintendent. A required action plan must be developed in collaboration with administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions representing any employees within the district, students, and other representatives of the local community.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a district with assistance in developing its plan if requested, and shall develop and publish guidelines for the development of required action plans. The superintendent of public instruction((, in consultation with the state board of education,)) shall also publish a list of research and evidence-based school improvement models, consistent with turnaround principles, that are approved for use in required action plans.

(c) The ((school board)) superintendent of public instruction must conduct a public hearing to allow for comment on a proposed required action plan. The local school district shall submit the plan ((first)) to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to review and approve that the plan is consistent with federal and state guidelines, as applicable. ((After the office of the superintendent of public instruction has approved that the plan is consistent with federal and state guidelines, the local school district must submit its required action plan to the state board of education for approval.))

(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:

(a) Implementation of an approved school improvement model required for the receipt of federal or state funds for school improvement for those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be focusing on for required action. The approved school improvement model selected must address the concerns raised in the academic performance audit and be intended to improve student performance to allow a school district to be removed from the list of districts designated as a required action district by the state board of education within three years of implementation of the plan. The required action plan for districts with multiple persistently lowest-achieving schools must include separate plans for each school as well as a plan for how the school district will support the schools collectively;

(b) Submission of an application for federal or state funds for school improvement to the superintendent of public instruction;

(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the model selected and any other requirements of the plan;

(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all students enrolled in the school and how the district intends to address the findings of the academic performance audit; and

(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school, which include closing the educational opportunity gap, improving mathematics and reading or English language arts student achievement, and improving graduation rates as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.

(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 10, 2010, must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to implement a required action plan.

(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall request the public employment relations commission to, and the commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th. All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and representatives of all affected bargaining units.

(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation, but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred, the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision by the superior court in the county where the school district is located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be limited to the issues certified by the executive director.

(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d) must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues for a decision by the superior court.

(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues were certified, setting forth the following:

(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district and its principal representative;

(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee organizations and their principal representatives;

(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;

(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive director for a final and binding decision by the court; and

(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district.

(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order be implemented in a required action plan for the district for each issue certified by the executive director. Contemporaneously with the filing of the proposal, a party must file a brief with the court setting forth the reasons why the court should order implementation of its proposal in the final plan.

(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties, the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition. The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.

(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows for the award of federal or state funds for school improvement to the district from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement an approved school improvement model. The court's decision must be issued no later than June 15th of the year in which the petition is filed and is final and binding on the parties; however the court's decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it does not allow the school district to implement a required action plan consistent with the requirements for the award of federal or state funds for school improvement by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees incurred under this statute.

(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have waived its right to object.

(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an employee must be consistent with this section and allow school districts designated as required action districts to implement an approved school improvement model in a required action plan.

Sec. 106. RCW 28A.657.060 and 2013 c 159 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

A required action plan developed by a district's school board and superintendent must be submitted to the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction for approval. The ((state board)) superintendent must accept for inclusion in any required action plan the final decision by the superior court on any issue certified by the executive director of the public employment relations commission under the process in RCW 28A.657.050. The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction shall approve a plan proposed by a school district only if the plan meets the requirements in RCW 28A.657.050 and provides sufficient remedies to address the findings in the academic performance audit to improve student achievement. Any addendum or modification to an existing collective bargaining agreement, negotiated under RCW 28A.657.050 or by agreement of the district and the exclusive bargaining unit, related to student achievement or school improvement shall not go into effect until approval of a required action plan by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction. If the ((state board)) superintendent of public instruction does not approve a proposed plan, it must notify the local school board and local district's superintendent in writing with an explicit rationale for why the plan was not approved. Nonapproval by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction of the local school district's initial required action plan submitted is not intended to trigger any actions under RCW 28A.657.080. With the assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent and school board of the required action district shall either: (1) Submit a new plan to the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction for approval within forty days of notification that its plan was rejected, or (2) submit a request to the required action plan review panel established under RCW 28A.657.070 for reconsideration of the ((state board's)) superintendent's rejection within ten days of the notification that the plan was rejected. If federal or state funds for school improvement are not available, the plan is not required to be implemented until such funding becomes available. If federal or state funds for this purpose are available, a required action plan must be implemented in the immediate school year following the district's designation as a required action district.

Sec. 107. RCW 28A.657.090 and 2013 c 159 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A school district must implement a required action plan upon approval by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide the required action district with technical assistance and federal or state funds for school improvement, if available, to implement an approved plan. The district must submit a report to the superintendent of public instruction that provides the progress the district is making in meeting the student achievement goals based on the state's assessments, identifying strategies and assets used to solve audit findings, and establishing evidence of meeting plan implementation benchmarks as set forth in the required action plan.

Sec. 108. RCW 28A.657.100 and 2013 c 159 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction must provide a report twice per year to the state board of education regarding the progress made by all school districts designated as required action districts.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction must ((recommend to the state board of education that a school district be released)) release a school district from the designation as a required action district after the district implements a required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction using the criteria adopted under RCW 28A.657.020 including progress in closing the educational opportunity gap; and no longer has a school within the district identified as persistently lowest-achieving. ((The state board shall release a school district from the designation as a required action district upon confirmation that the district has met the requirements for a release.))

(3) If the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction determines that the required action district has not met the requirements for release after at least three years of implementing a required action plan, the ((board)) superintendent may ((recommend)) direct that the district remain in required action and submit a new or revised plan under the process in RCW 28A.657.050, or the ((board)) superintendent may direct that the school district be assigned to level two of the required action process as provided in RCW 28A.657.105. If the required action district received a federal school improvement grant for the same persistently lowest-achieving school in 2010 or 2011, the ((board)) superintendent may direct that the school district be assigned to level two of the required action process after one year of implementing a required action plan under this chapter if the district is not making progress. Before making a determination of whether to recommend that a school district that is not making progress remain in required action or be assigned to level two of the required action process, the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction must submit its findings to the education accountability system oversight committee under RCW 28A.657.130 and provide an opportunity for the oversight committee to review and comment.

Sec. 109. RCW 28A.657.105 and 2013 c 159 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts assigned by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction to level two of the required action process under this chapter are those with one or more schools that have remained as persistently lowest-achieving for more than three years and have not demonstrated recent and significant improvement or progress toward exiting persistently lowest-achieving status, despite implementation of a required action plan.

(2) Within ninety days following assignment of a school district to level two of the required action process, the superintendent of public instruction shall direct that a needs assessment and review be conducted to determine the reasons why the previous required action plan did not succeed in improving student achievement.

(3)(a) Based on the results of the needs assessment and review, the superintendent of public instruction shall work collaboratively with the school district board of directors to develop a revised required action plan for level two.

(b) The level two required action plan must explicitly address the reasons why the previous plan did not succeed and must specify the interventions that the school district must implement, which may include assignment or reassignment of personnel, reallocation of resources, use of specified curriculum or instructional strategies, use of a specified school improvement model, or any other conditions determined by the superintendent of public instruction to be necessary for the level two required action plan to succeed, which conditions shall be binding on the school district. The level two required action plan shall also include the specific technical assistance and support to be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which may include assignment of school improvement specialists to have a regular on-site presence in the school and technical assistance provided through the educational service district. Individuals assigned as on-site school improvement specialists must have demonstrated experience in school turnaround and cultural competence.

(c) The level two required action plan must be submitted to the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction for approval.

(4) If the superintendent of public instruction and the school district board of directors are unable to come to an agreement on a level two required action plan within ninety days of the completion of the needs assessment and review conducted under subsection (2) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall complete and ((submit)) approve a level two required action plan ((directly to the state board of education for approval)). The school district board of directors may submit a request to the required action plan review panel established under RCW 28A.657.070 for reconsideration of the superintendent's level two required action plan within ten days of the ((submission of the plan to the state board of education)) superintendent's approval of the plan. ((After the state board of education considers)) The superintendent shall consider the recommendations of the required action plan review panel and, at his or her discretion, decide to maintain or modify the plan. The decision of the ((board)) superintendent regarding the level two required action plan is final and not subject to further reconsideration.

(5) If changes to a collective bargaining agreement are necessary to implement a level two required action plan, the parties must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, using the process outlined under RCW 28A.657.050. If the level two required action plan is developed by the superintendent of public instruction under subsection (4) of this section, a designee of the superintendent shall participate in the discussions among the parties to the collective bargaining agreement.

(6) While a school district is assigned to level two of the required action process under this chapter, the superintendent of public instruction is responsible and accountable for assuring that the level two required action plan is implemented with fidelity. The superintendent of public instruction shall defer to the school district board of directors as the governing authority of the school district and continue to work in partnership with the school district to implement the level two required action plan. However, if the superintendent of public instruction finds that the level two required action plan is not being implemented as specified, including the implementation of any binding conditions within the plan, the superintendent may direct actions that must be taken by school district personnel to implement the level two required action plan or the binding conditions. If necessary, the superintendent of public instruction may exercise authority under RCW 28A.505.120 regarding allocation of funds.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall include in the budget estimates and information submitted to the governor under RCW 28A.300.170 a request for sufficient funds to support implementation of the level two required action plans established under this section.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction must ((recommend to the state board of education that a school district be released)) release a school district from assignment to level two of the required action process after the district implements the level two required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction using the criteria established under RCW 28A.657.020; and no longer has a school within the district identified as persistently lowest-achieving. The ((state board of education)) superintendent shall release a school district from the level two assignment upon confirmation that the school district has met the requirements for a release.

Sec. 110. RCW 28A.657.080 and 2010 c 235 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state board of education may direct the)) superintendent of public instruction ((to)) may require a school district that has not submitted a final required action plan for approval, or has submitted but not received ((state board of education)) the superintendent's approval of a required action plan by the beginning of the school year in which the plan is intended to be implemented, to redirect the district's Title I funds based on the academic performance audit findings.

Sec. 111. RCW 28A.150.550 and 2013 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following statewide indicators of educational system health are established:

(a) The percentage of students demonstrating the characteristics of entering kindergartners in all six areas identified by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills administered in accordance with RCW 28A.655.080;

(b) The percentage of students meeting the standard on the fourth grade statewide reading assessment administered in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070;

(c) The percentage of students meeting the standard on the eighth grade statewide mathematics assessment administered in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070;

(d) The four-year cohort high school graduation rate;

(e) The percentage of high school graduates who during the second quarter after graduation are either enrolled in postsecondary education or training or are employed, and the percentage during the fourth quarter after graduation who are either enrolled in postsecondary education or training or are employed; and

(f) The percentage of students enrolled in precollege or remedial courses in college.

(2) The statewide indicators established in subsection (1) of this section shall be disaggregated as provided under RCW 28A.300.042.

(3) The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction, with assistance from the ((office of the superintendent of public instruction)) state board of education, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, and the student achievement council, shall establish a process for identifying realistic but challenging system-wide performance goals and measurements, if necessary, for each of the indicators established in subsection (1) of this section, including for subcategories of students as provided under subsection (2) of this section. The performance goal for each indicator must be set on a biennial basis, and may only be adjusted upward.

(4) The state board of education, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the student achievement council shall each align their strategic planning and education reform efforts with the statewide indicators and performance goals established under this section.

(5)(a) The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction, with assistance from the ((office of the superintendent of public instruction)) state board of education, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, and the student achievement council, shall submit a report on the status of each indicator in subsection (1) of this section and recommend revised performance goals and measurements, if necessary, by December 1st of each even-numbered year((, except that the initial report establishing baseline values and initial goals shall be delivered to the education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013)).

(b) If the educational system is not on target to meet the performance goals on any individual indicator, the report must recommend evidence-based reforms intended to improve student achievement in that area.

(c) To the extent data is available, the performance goals for each indicator must be compared with national data in order to identify whether Washington student achievement results are within the top ten percent nationally or are comparable to results in peer states with similar characteristics as Washington. If comparison data show that Washington students are falling behind national peers on any indicator, the report must recommend evidence-based reforms targeted at addressing the indicator in question.

Sec. 112. RCW 28A.657.110 and 2013 c 159 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By November 1, ((2013)) 2018, the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction shall propose rules for adoption establishing an accountability framework that creates a unified system of support for challenged schools that aligns with basic education, increases the level of support based upon the magnitude of need, and uses data for decisions. The ((board)) superintendent must seek input from the public and interested groups in developing the framework. Based on the framework, the superintendent of public instruction shall design a comprehensive system of specific strategies for recognition, provision of differentiated support and targeted assistance, and, if necessary, requiring intervention in schools and school districts. The superintendent shall submit the system design to the state board of education for review. The state board of education shall ((recommend approval or modification of)) make recommendations regarding the system design to the superintendent no later than January 1, ((2014)) 2018, and the system must be implemented statewide no later than the ((2014-15)) 2018-19 school year. To the extent state funds are appropriated for this purpose, the system must apply equally to Title I, Title I-eligible, and non-Title I schools in the state.

(2) The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction shall develop a Washington achievement index to identify schools and school districts for recognition, for continuous improvement, and for additional state support. The index shall be based on criteria that are fair, consistent, and transparent. Performance shall be measured using multiple outcomes and indicators including, but not limited to, graduation rates and results from statewide assessments. The index shall be developed in such a way as to be easily understood by both employees within the schools and school districts, as well as parents and community members. It is the legislature's intent that the index provide feedback to schools and school districts to self-assess their progress, and enable the identification of schools with exemplary performance and those that need assistance to overcome challenges in order to achieve exemplary performance.

(3) The ((state board of education, in cooperation with the office of the)) superintendent of public instruction, shall annually recognize schools for exemplary performance as measured on the Washington achievement index. The ((state board of education)) superintendent shall have ongoing collaboration with the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee regarding the measures used to measure the closing of the achievement gaps and the recognition provided to the school districts for closing the achievement gaps.

(4) ((In coordination with the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education shall seek approval from the United States department of education for use of the Washington achievement index and the state system of differentiated support, assistance, and intervention to replace the federal accountability system under P.L. 107-110, the no child left behind act of 2001.

(5))) The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction shall work with the education data center established within the office of financial management ((and the technical working group established in RCW 28A.290.020)) to determine the feasibility of using the prototypical funding allocation model as not only a tool for allocating resources to schools and school districts but also as a tool for schools and school districts to report to the state legislature and the state board of education on how the state resources received are being used.

PART II

ASSESSMENTS AND HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 201. RCW 28A.230.093 and 2009 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((If, after July 26, 2009, the state board of education increases the number of course credits in social studies that are required for high school graduation under RCW 28A.230.090, the board shall also)) The superintendent of public instruction shall require that at least one-half credit of ((that)) the social studies requirement be coursework in civics.

(2) The content of the civics requirement must include, but not be limited to:

(a) Federal, state, and local government organization and procedures;

(b) Rights and responsibilities of citizens addressed in the Washington state and United States Constitutions;

(c) Current issues addressed at each level of government; and

(d) Electoral issues, including elections, ballot measures, initiatives, and referenda.

Sec. 202. RCW 28A.230.097 and 2014 c 217 s 204 and 2014 c 217 s 102 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Each high school or school district board of directors shall adopt course equivalencies for career and technical high school courses offered to students in high schools and skill centers. A career and technical course equivalency may be for whole or partial credit. Each school district board of directors shall develop a course equivalency approval procedure. Boards of directors must approve AP computer science courses as equivalent to high school mathematics or science, and must denote on a student's transcript that AP computer science qualifies as a math-based quantitative course for students who take the course in their senior year. In order for a board to approve AP computer science as equivalent to high school mathematics, the student must be concurrently enrolled in or have successfully completed algebra II. Beginning no later than the 2015-16 school year, a school district board of directors must, at a minimum, grant academic course equivalency in mathematics or science for a high school career and technical course from the list of courses approved by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.700.070, but is not limited to the courses on the list. If the list of courses is revised after the 2015-16 school year, the school district board of directors must grant academic course equivalency based on the revised list beginning with the school year immediately following the revision.

(2) Career and technical courses determined to be equivalent to academic core courses, in full or in part, by the high school or school district shall be accepted as meeting core requirements, including graduation requirements, if the courses are recorded on the student's transcript using the equivalent academic high school department designation and title. Full or partial credit shall be recorded as appropriate. The high school or school district shall also issue and keep record of course completion certificates that demonstrate that the career and technical courses were successfully completed as needed for industry certification, college credit, or preapprenticeship, as applicable. The certificate shall be part of the student's high school and beyond plan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and make available electronic samples of certificates of course completion.

Sec. 203. RCW 28A.655.061 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 42 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment for each content area.

(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of academic achievement shall be obtained and is evidence that the students have successfully met the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate. With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only requirement for graduation.

(3)(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 through the graduating class of 2015, with the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics high school statewide student assessment shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. The mathematics assessment shall be the end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics that assesses the standards common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I or the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics that assesses standards common to geometry and integrated mathematics II.

(b) As the state transitions from reading and writing assessments to an English language arts assessment and from end-of-course assessments to a comprehensive assessment for high school mathematics, a student in a graduating class of 2016 through 2018 shall earn a certificate of academic achievement if the student meets the state standard as follows:

(i) Students in the graduating class of 2016 may use the results from:

(A) The reading and writing assessment or the English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and

(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium.

(ii) Students in the graduating classes of 2017 and 2018 may use the results from:

(A) The tenth grade English language arts assessment developed by the superintendent of public instruction using resources from the multistate consortium or the English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium; and

(B) The end-of-course assessment for the first year of high school mathematics, the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics, or the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium.

(c) Beginning with the graduating class of 2019, a student who meets the state standards on the high school English language arts assessment developed with the multistate consortium and the comprehensive mathematics assessment developed with the multistate consortium shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(d) If a student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the content area at least twice a year at no cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the state standards for that content area if the student has taken the statewide student assessment at least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2017, a student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide student assessment, a retake, or the objective alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.

(5) The state board of education and the superintendent of public instruction may not require the acquisition of the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.

(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.

(7) School districts must make available to students the following options:

(a) To retake the statewide student assessment at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or

(b) To retake the statewide student assessment at least twice a year in the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these programs can be assessed.

(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the superintendent of public instruction.

(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be available to each school district.

(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop options for implementing objective alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores, for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.

(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction shall identify the scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on the statewide student assessment. A student's score on the science portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the SAT may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section as soon as the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction determines that sufficient data is available to identify reliable equivalent scores for the science content area of the statewide student assessment. After the first scores are established, the ((state board)) superintendent may increase but not decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.

(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the statewide student assessment; and for the English language arts portion of the assessment developed with the multistate consortium, once established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition, macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history, world history, United States government and politics, or comparative government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for the reading portion of the statewide student assessment; and for the English language arts portion of the assessment developed with the multistate consortium, once established in the 2014-15 school year. A score of three on the AP examination in biology, physics, chemistry, or environmental science may be used as an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide student assessment.

(iii) A student who scores at least a four on selected externally administered international baccalaureate (IB) examinations may use the score as an objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that the student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for any of the IB English language and literature courses or for any of the IB individuals and societies courses may be used as an alternative assessment for the reading, writing, or English language arts portions of the statewide student assessment. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for any of the IB mathematics courses may be used as an alternative assessment for the mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of four on the higher level IB examinations for IB biology, chemistry, or physics may be used as an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide student assessment.

(11) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the family. The plan shall include the following information as applicable:

(a) The student's results on the state assessment;

(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;

(c) Any credit deficiencies;

(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;

(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local graduation requirements;

(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for graduation;

(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options available to students, including informing students of the option to continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until the age of twenty-one;

(h) The alternative assessment options available to students under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;

(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and technical education options available for students to meet graduation requirements; and

(j) Available programs offered through skill centers or community and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma options under RCW 28B.50.535.

Sec. 204. RCW 28A.655.065 and 2009 c 556 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic standards for receipt of a high school diploma. The primary way that students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading, writing, mathematics, and science is through the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)). Only objective assessments that are comparable in rigor to the state assessment are authorized as an alternative assessment. Before seeking an alternative assessment, the legislature expects students to make a genuine effort to meet state standards, through regular and consistent attendance at school and participation in extended learning and other assistance programs.

(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the 2006-07 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall implement objective alternative assessment methods as provided in this section for students to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)). A student may access an alternative if the student meets applicable eligibility criteria in RCW 28A.655.061 and this section and other eligibility criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction, including but not limited to attendance criteria and participation in the remediation or supplemental instruction contained in the student learning plan developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school district may waive attendance and/or remediation criteria for special, unavoidable circumstances.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this section.

(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest score on the high school ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)), as provided in this subsection. A student is eligible to apply for the alternative assessment method under this subsection (4) if the student has a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.2 on a four point grading scale. The superintendent of public instruction shall determine which high school courses are applicable to the alternative assessment method and shall issue guidelines to school districts.

(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of students identified in this manner, the district shall select the comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly exceeded the state standard on the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)).

(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.

(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison cohort.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an alternative assessment method that shall be an evaluation of a collection of work samples prepared and submitted by the applicant. Effective September 1, 2009, collection of work samples may be submitted only in content areas where meeting the state standard on the high school assessment is required for purposes of graduation.

(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content area that may be submitted as a collection of evidence that the applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written products. ((The superintendent shall submit the guidelines for approval by the state board of education.))

(b) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher. ((The superintendent shall submit the protocols for approval by the state board of education.))

(c) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for evaluating the collection of work samples ((and submit the scoring criteria for approval by the state board of education)). Collections shall be scored at the state level or regionally by a panel of educators selected and trained by the superintendent to ensure objectivity, reliability, and rigor in the evaluation. An educator may not score work samples submitted by applicants from the educator's school district. If the panel awards an applicant's collection of work samples the minimum required score, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.

(d) ((Using)) The superintendent of public instruction shall use an open and public process that includes consultation with district superintendents, school principals, and other educators((, the state board of education shall consider)) when developing the guidelines, protocols, scoring criteria, and other information regarding the collection of work samples ((submitted by the superintendent of public instruction)) provided for in this section. The collection of work samples may be implemented as an alternative assessment after the ((state board of education)) superintendent has approved the guidelines, protocols, and scoring criteria and determined that the collection of work samples: (i) Will meet professionally accepted standards for a valid and reliable measure of the grade level expectations and the essential academic learning requirements; and (ii) is comparable to or exceeds the rigor of the skills and knowledge that a student must demonstrate on the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) in the applicable content area. ((The state board shall make an approval decision and determination no later than December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase the required rigor of the collection of work samples.))

(e) By September of 2006, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop informational materials for parents, teachers, and students regarding the collection of work samples and the status of its development as an alternative assessment method. The materials shall provide specific guidance regarding the type and number of work samples likely to be required, include examples of work that meets the state learning standards, and describe the scoring criteria and process for the collection. The materials shall also encourage students in the graduating class of 2008 to begin creating a collection if they believe they may seek to use the collection once it is implemented as an alternative assessment.

(6)(a) For students enrolled in a career and technical education program approved under RCW 28A.700.030, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop additional guidelines for collections of work samples that are tailored to different career and technical programs. The additional guidelines shall:

(i) Provide multiple examples of work samples that are related to the particular career and technical program;

(ii) Permit work samples based on completed activities or projects where demonstration of academic knowledge is inferred; and

(iii) Provide multiple examples of work samples drawn from career and technical courses.

(b) The purpose of the additional guidelines is to provide a clear pathway toward a certificate of academic achievement for career and technical students by showing them applied and relevant opportunities to demonstrate their knowledge and skills, and to provide guidance to teachers in integrating academic and career and technical instruction and assessment and assisting career and technical students in compiling a collection. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and disseminate additional guidelines for no fewer than ten career and technical education programs representing a variety of program offerings by no later than September 1, 2008. Guidelines for ten additional programs shall be developed and disseminated no later than June 1, 2009.

(c) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical colleges, employers, the workforce training and education coordinating board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts in career and technical education to create appropriate guidelines and examples of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical student's knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the assessments should they be implemented.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement:

(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score they received on the high school assessments; and

(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington public school in their junior or senior year with the intent of obtaining a public high school diploma, or (ii) have special, unavoidable circumstances.

(9) The state board of education shall examine opportunities for additional alternative assessments, including the possible use of one or more standardized norm-referenced student achievement tests and the possible use of the reading, writing, or mathematics portions of the ACT ASSET and ACT COMPASS test instruments as objective alternative assessments for demonstrating that a student has met the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board shall submit its findings and recommendations to the education committees of the legislature by January 10, 2008.

(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 205. RCW 28A.700.070 and 2014 c 217 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall support school district efforts under RCW 28A.230.097 to adopt course equivalencies for career and technical courses by:

(a) Recommending career and technical curriculum suitable for course equivalencies;

(b) Publicizing best practices for high schools and school districts in developing and adopting course equivalencies; and

(c) In consultation with the Washington association for career and technical education, providing professional development, technical assistance, and guidance for school districts seeking to expand their lists of equivalent courses.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide professional development, technical assistance, and guidance for school districts to develop career and technical course equivalencies that also qualify as advanced placement courses.

(3) The ((office of the)) superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with one or more technical working groups convened for this purpose, shall develop and approve curriculum frameworks for a selected list of career and technical courses that may be offered by high schools or skill centers whose content in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics is considered equivalent in full or in part to science or mathematics courses that meet high school graduation requirements. The content of the courses must be aligned with state essential academic learning requirements in mathematics as adopted by the superintendent of public instruction in July 2011 and the essential academic learning requirements in science as adopted in October 2013, and industry standards. ((The office)) Prior to the superintendent's approval, he or she shall submit the list of equivalent career and technical courses and their curriculum frameworks to the state board of education for review((,)) and an opportunity for public comment((, and approval)). The first list of courses under this subsection must be developed and approved before the 2015-16 school year. Thereafter, the ((office)) superintendent may periodically update or revise the list of courses using the process in this subsection.

(4) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the ((office of the)) superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grant funds to school districts to increase the integration and rigor of academic instruction in career and technical courses. Grant recipients are encouraged to use grant funds to support teams of academic and technical teachers using a research-based professional development model supported by the national research center for career and technical education. The ((office of the)) superintendent of public instruction may require that grant recipients provide matching resources using federal Carl Perkins funds or other fund sources.

PART III

BASIC EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 301. RCW 28A.150.220 and 2014 c 217 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The program established under this section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.

(2) Each school district shall make available to students the following minimum instructional offering each school year:

(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for students enrolled in grades nine through twelve and at least one thousand instructional hours for students in grades one through eight, all of which may be calculated by a school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional hours over grades one through twelve; and

(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each school district shall include:

(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.655.070;

(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete twenty-four credits for high school graduation, beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in RCW 28A.230.090. Course distribution requirements may be established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;

(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian languages;

(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065;

(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled students and exited students whose primary language is other than English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;

(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and

(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030.

(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.

(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one hundred eighty school days per school year according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent involvement component of the inventory.

(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the one hundred eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school upon the request of a student. All such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as offering additional instruction or providing additional services, programs, or activities that the school district determines to be appropriate for the education of the school district's students.

(7) The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement and ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental program approval requirements as the ((state board)) superintendent may establish.

Sec. 302. RCW 28A.150.230 and 2010 c 235 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is the intent and purpose of this section to guarantee that each common school district board of directors, whether or not acting through its respective administrative staff, be held accountable for the proper operation of their district to the local community and its electorate. In accordance with the provisions of this title ((28A RCW)), as now or hereafter amended, each common school district board of directors shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting of policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its educational program and that such program provide students with the opportunity to achieve those skills which are generally recognized as requisite to learning.

(2) In conformance with the provisions of this title ((28A RCW)), as now or hereafter amended, it shall be the responsibility of each common school district board of directors to adopt policies to:

(a) Establish performance criteria and an evaluation process for its superintendent, classified staff, certificated personnel, including administrative staff, and for all programs constituting a part of such district's curriculum. Each district shall report annually to the superintendent of public instruction the following for each employee group listed in this subsection (2)(a): (i) Evaluation criteria and rubrics; (ii) a description of each rating; and (iii) the number of staff in each rating;

(b) Determine the final assignment of staff, certificated or classified, according to board enumerated classroom and program needs and data, based upon a plan to ensure that the assignment policy: (i) Supports the learning needs of all the students in the district; and (ii) gives specific attention to high-need schools and classrooms;

(c) Provide information to the local community and its electorate describing the school district's policies concerning hiring, assigning, terminating, and evaluating staff, including the criteria for evaluating teachers and principals;

(d) Determine the amount of instructional hours necessary for any student to acquire a quality education in such district, in not less than an amount otherwise required in RCW 28A.150.220, or rules of the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction;

(e) Determine the allocation of staff time, whether certificated or classified;

(f) Establish final curriculum standards consistent with law and rules of the superintendent of public instruction, relevant to the particular needs of district students or the unusual characteristics of the district, and ensuring a quality education for each student in the district; and

(g) Evaluate teaching materials, including text books, teaching aids, handouts, or other printed material, in public hearing upon complaint by parents, guardians or custodians of students who consider dissemination of such material to students objectionable.

Sec. 303. RCW 28A.225.010 and 2014 c 168 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and under eighteen years of age shall cause such child to attend the public school of the district in which the child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session unless:

(a) The child is attending an approved private school for the same time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW 28A.195.010(4);

(b) The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (4) of this section;

(c) The child is attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(d) The school district superintendent of the district in which the child resides shall have excused such child from attendance because the child is physically or mentally unable to attend school, is attending a residential school operated by the department of social and health services, is incarcerated in an adult correctional facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent: PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress: PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as full-time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220;

(e) The child is excused from school subject to approval by the student's parent for a reason of faith or conscience, or an organized activity conducted under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization, for up to two days per school year without any penalty. Such absences may not mandate school closures. Students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as full-time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and may not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220; or

(f) The child is sixteen years of age or older and:

(i) The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that the child should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;

(ii) The child has already met graduation requirements in accordance with state board of education rules ((and regulations)); or

(iii) The child has received a certificate of educational competence under rules ((and regulations)) established by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction under ((RCW 28A.305.190)) section 308 of this act.

(2) A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.

(3) An approved private school for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under ((regulations)) rules established by the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.

(4) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW, instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and supervised instructional and related educational activities, including a curriculum and instruction in the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level established for approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such activities are:

(a) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and are supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated person" means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of objectives consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the certificated person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person. The number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or

(b) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours or its equivalent in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or

(c) Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based instruction by the superintendent of the local school district in which the child resides.

(5) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less structured and more experiential than the instruction normally provided in a classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section relating to the nature and quantity of instructional and related educational activities shall be liberally construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to waivers authorized under section 601 of this act and RCW 28A.655.180, the superintendent of public instruction may grant waivers from the requirement for a one hundred eighty-day school year under RCW 28A.150.220 to school districts that propose to operate one or more schools on a flexible calendar for purposes of economy and efficiency as provided in this section. The requirement under RCW 28A.150.220 that school districts offer minimum instructional hours may not be waived.

(2) A school district seeking a waiver under this section must submit an application that includes:

(a) A proposed calendar for the school day and school year that demonstrates how the instructional hour requirement will be maintained;

(b) An explanation and estimate of the economies and efficiencies to be gained from compressing the instructional hours into fewer than one hundred eighty days;

(c) An explanation of how monetary savings from the proposal will be redirected to support student learning;

(d) A summary of comments received at one or more public hearings on the proposal and how concerns will be addressed;

(e) An explanation of the impact on students who rely upon free and reduced-price school child nutrition services and the impact on the ability of the child nutrition program to operate an economically independent program;

(f) An explanation of the impact on employees in education support positions and the ability to recruit and retain employees in education support positions;

(g) An explanation of the impact on students whose parents work during the missed school day; and

(h) Other information that the superintendent of public instruction may request to assure that the proposed flexible calendar will not adversely affect student learning.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt criteria to evaluate waiver requests under this section. A waiver may be effective for up to three years and may be renewed for subsequent periods of three or fewer years. After each school year in which a waiver has been granted under this section, the superintendent of public instruction must analyze empirical evidence to determine whether the reduction is affecting student learning. If the superintendent of public instruction determines that student learning is adversely affected, the school district must discontinue the flexible calendar as soon as possible but not later than the beginning of the next school year after the determination has been made.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction may grant waivers authorized under this section to five or fewer school districts. Of the five waivers that may be granted, two must be reserved for districts with student populations of less than one hundred fifty students, and three must be reserved for districts with student populations of between one hundred fifty-one and five hundred students.

Sec. 305. RCW 28A.150.250 and 2009 c 548 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) From those funds made available by the legislature for the current use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school district of the state operating a basic education instructional program approved by the ((state board of education)) superintendent an amount based on the formulas provided in RCW 28A.150.260, 28A.150.390, and 28A.150.392 which, when combined with an appropriate portion of such locally available revenues, other than receipts from federal forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual average full-time equivalent student enrolled.

(2) The instructional program of basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260, 28A.150.390, and 28A.150.392 to fund those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.410.

(3) If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.260 and 28A.150.220, the ((state board of education shall require the)) superintendent of public instruction ((to)) shall withhold state funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until program compliance is assured. However, the ((state board of education)) superintendent may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack of classroom space.

Sec. 306. RCW 28A.230.010 and 2014 c 217 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School district boards of directors shall identify and offer courses with content that meet or exceed: (a) The basic education skills identified in RCW 28A.150.210; (b) the graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090; (c) the courses required to meet the minimum college entrance requirements under RCW 28A.230.130; and (d) the course options for career development under RCW 28A.230.130. Such courses may be applied or theoretical, academic, or vocational.

(2) School district boards of directors must provide high school students with the opportunity to access at least one career and technical education course that is considered equivalent to a mathematics course or at least one career and technical education course that is considered equivalent to a science course as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction ((and the state board of education)) in RCW 28A.700.070. Students may access such courses at high schools, interdistrict cooperatives, skill centers or branch or satellite skill centers, or through online learning or applicable running start vocational courses.

(3) School district boards of directors of school districts with fewer than two thousand students may apply to the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction for a waiver from the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction may grant a waiver from the provisions of RCW 28A.230.010(2) based on an application from a board of directors of a school district with fewer than two thousand students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules governing the eligibility of a child sixteen years of age and under nineteen years of age to take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 if the child provides a substantial and warranted reason for leaving the regular high school education program, if the child was home-schooled, or if the child is an eligible student enrolled in a dropout reengagement program under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.

Sec. 309. RCW 28B.50.250 and 1991 c 238 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board for community and technical colleges and the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction are hereby authorized to permit, on an ad hoc basis, the common school districts to conduct pursuant to RCW 28B.50.530 a program in adult education in behalf of a college district when such program will not conflict with existing programs of the same nature and in the same geographical area conducted by the college districts: PROVIDED, That federal programs for adult education shall be administered by the state board for community and technical colleges, which agency is hereby declared to be the state educational agency primarily responsible for supervision of adult education in the public schools as defined by RCW ((28B.50.020)) 28B.50.030.

Sec. 310. RCW 28B.50.535 and 2009 c 524 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A community or technical college may issue a high school diploma or certificate as provided under this section.

(1) An individual who satisfactorily meets the requirements for high school completion shall be awarded a diploma from the college, subject to rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction ((and the state board of education)).

(2) An individual enrolled through the option established under RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400 who satisfactorily completes an associate degree, including an associate of arts degree, associate of science degree, associate of technology degree, or associate in applied science degree, shall be awarded a diploma from the college upon written request from the student.

(3) An individual, twenty-one years or older, who enrolls in a community or technical college for the purpose of obtaining an associate degree and who satisfactorily completes an associate degree, including an associate of arts degree, associate of science degree, associate of technology degree, or associate in applied science degree, shall be awarded a diploma from the college upon written request from the student. Individuals under this subsection are not eligible for funding provided under chapter 28A.150 RCW.

Sec. 311. RCW 28B.50.536 and 2013 c 39 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to rules adopted by the ((state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190)) superintendent of public instruction under section 308 of this act, the state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules governing the eligibility of persons sixteen years of age and older to take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate, rules governing the administration of the test, and rules governing the issuance of a high school equivalency certificate to persons who successfully complete the test.

(2) A high school equivalency certificate is a certificate issued jointly by the college board and the office of the superintendent of public instruction that indicates that the holder has attained standard scores at or above the minimum proficiency level prescribed by the college board on a high school equivalency test. The college board must identify and accept a high school equivalency test that is at least as rigorous as the general educational development test. The high school equivalency test identified by the college board must cover reading, writing, mathematics, science, and social studies subject areas.

(3) High school equivalency certificates issued under this section shall be issued in such form and substance as agreed upon by the state board for community and technical colleges and superintendent of public instruction.

PART IV

PRIVATE SCHOOLS

Sec. 401. RCW 28A.195.010 and 2009 c 548 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for private schools except as hereinafter in this section provided.

Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school districts shall file each year with the state ((superintendent of public instruction)) board of education a statement certifying that the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After review of the statement, the ((state superintendent)) board will notify schools or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the requirements. The state board of education shall not require private school students to meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from high school, to master the essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to have their students master these essential academic learning requirements, take the assessments, and obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement. Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum instructional hour offerings, with a school-wide annual average total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours for students enrolled in grades one through twelve, and at least four hundred fifty hours for students enrolled in kindergarten.

(2) The school day shall be the same as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.

(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification except as follows:

(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach those courses.

(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction reporting and explaining such circumstances.

(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of the approved private school who is ((certified)) certificated under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b) The planning by the ((certified)) certificated person and the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c) The ((certified)) certificated person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;

(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the ((certified)) certificated person; and

(e) The ((certified)) certificated employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.

(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against loss or damage.

(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.

(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.

(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school district.

All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility of the administration and administrators of the particular private school involved.

Sec. 402. RCW 28A.195.030 and 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any private school may appeal the actions of the ((state superintendent of public instruction or)) state board of education as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 403. RCW 28A.195.050 and 1984 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((superintendent of public instruction)) state board of education is hereby directed to appoint a private school advisory committee that is broadly representative of educators, legislators, and various private school groups in the state of Washington.

Sec. 404. RCW 28A.195.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of the administrative or executive authority of every private school in this state to report to the educational service district superintendent on or before the thirtieth day of June in each year, on a form to be furnished, such information as may be required by the ((superintendent of public instruction)) state board of education, to make complete the records of education work pertaining to all children residing within the state.

PART V

EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICT BOUNDARIES

Sec. 501. RCW 28A.310.020 and 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 513 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction upon ((its)) his or her own initiative, or upon petition of any educational service district board, or upon petition of at least half of the district superintendents within an educational service district, or upon request of the ((superintendent of public instruction)) state board of education, may make changes in the number and boundaries of the educational service districts, including an equitable adjustment and transfer of any and all property, assets, and liabilities among the educational service districts whose boundaries and duties and responsibilities are increased and/or decreased by such changes, consistent with the purposes of RCW 28A.310.010: PROVIDED, That no reduction in the number of educational service districts will take effect after June 30, 1995, without a majority approval vote by the affected school directors voting in such election by mail ballot. Prior to making any such changes, the ((state board)) superintendent of public instruction, or his or her designee, shall hold at least one public hearing on such proposed action and shall consider any recommendations on such proposed action.

The ((state board)) superintendent of public instruction in making any change in boundaries shall give consideration to, but not be limited by, the following factors: Size, population, topography, and climate of the proposed district.

The superintendent of public instruction shall furnish personnel, material, supplies, and information necessary to enable educational service district boards and superintendents to consider the proposed changes.

PART VI

WAIVERS FOR EFFECTIVE EDUCATION PROGRAMS AND INNOVATION SCHOOLS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction may grant waivers to school districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to:

(a) Implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students in the district an effective education system that is designed to enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for students who experience difficulty with the regular education program;

(b) Implement an innovation school or innovation zone designated under RCW 28A.630.081; or

(c) Implement a collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project approved under RCW 28A.630.104.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for the waiver or waivers.

Sec. 602. RCW 28A.630.083 and 2011 c 260 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction ((and the state board of education, each within the scope of their statutory authority,)) may grant waivers of state statutes and administrative rules for designated innovation schools and innovation zones as follows:

(i) ((Waivers may be granted under RCW 28A.655.180 and 28A.305.140;

(ii))) Waivers may be granted to permit the commingling of funds appropriated by the legislature on a categorical basis for such programs as, but not limited to, highly capable students, transitional bilingual instruction, and learning assistance; and

(((iii))) (ii) Waivers may be granted of other administrative rules that in the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction ((or the state board of education)) are necessary to be waived to implement an innovation school or innovation zone.

(b) State administrative rules dealing with public health, safety, and civil rights, including accessibility for individuals with disabilities, may not be waived.

(2) At the request of a school district, the superintendent of public instruction may petition the United States department of education or other federal agencies to waive federal regulations necessary to implement an innovation school or innovation zone.

(3) The ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction may grant waivers for innovation schools or innovation zones of administrative rules pertaining to calculation of course credits for high school courses.

(4) Waivers may be granted under this section for a period not to exceed the duration of the designation of the innovation school or innovation zone.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction ((and the state board of education)) shall provide an expedited review of requests for waivers for designated innovation schools and innovation zones. Requests may be denied if the superintendent of public instruction ((or the state board of education)) conclude that the waiver:

(a) Is likely to result in a decrease in academic achievement in the innovation school or innovation zone;

(b) Would jeopardize the receipt of state or federal funds that a school district would otherwise be eligible to receive, unless the school district submits a written authorization for the waiver acknowledging that receipt of these funds could be jeopardized; or

(c) Would violate state or federal laws or rules that are not authorized to be waived.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 603. RCW 28A.655.180 and 2012 c 53 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((state board of education, where appropriate, or the)) superintendent of public instruction((, where appropriate,)) may grant waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and other administrative rules that in the opinion of the ((state board of education or the opinion of the)) superintendent of public instruction may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for restructuring its educational program or the educational program of individual schools within the district or to implement an innovation school or innovation zone designated under RCW 28A.630.081 or to implement a collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project approved under RCW 28A.630.104.

(2) School districts may use the application process in ((RCW 28A.305.140)) section 601 of this act to apply for the waivers under this section.

Sec. 604. RCW 28A.655.180 and 2009 c 543 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((state board of education, where appropriate, or the)) superintendent of public instruction((, where appropriate,)) may grant waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and other administrative rules that in the opinion of the ((state board of education or the opinion of the)) superintendent of public instruction may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for restructuring its educational program or the educational program of individual schools within the district.

(2) School districts may use the application process in ((RCW 28A.305.140)) section 601 of this act to apply for the waivers under this section.

Sec. 605. RCW 28A.300.545 and 2011 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a condensed compliance report form for second-class districts by August 1, 2011. The report form shall allow districts the option of indicating one of the following for each funded program:

(a) The district has complied or received a ((state board of education-approved)) superintendent of public instruction-approved waiver;

(b) The district has not complied, accompanied by an explanation or the steps taken to comply; or

(c) The district has received a grant for less than half of a full-time equivalent instructional staff.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may conduct random audits of second-class districts that submit a condensed compliance report under RCW 28A.330.250. The purpose of the audit is to determine whether documentation exists to support a school district superintendent's condensed compliance report.

PART VII

STATE BOARD GOVERNANCE

Sec. 701. RCW 28A.300.020 and 2005 c 497 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction may appoint assistant superintendents of public instruction, a deputy superintendent of public instruction, and may employ such other assistants and clerical help as are necessary to carry out the duties of the superintendent ((and the state board of education. However, the superintendent shall employ without undue delay the executive director of the state board of education and other state board of education office assistants and clerical help, appointed by the state board under RCW 28A.305.130, whose positions are allotted and funded in accordance with moneys appropriated exclusively for the operation of the state board of education. The rate of compensation and termination of any such executive director, state board office assistants, and clerical help shall be subject to the prior consent of the state board of education)). The assistant superintendents, deputy superintendent, and such other officers and employees as are exempted from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent or at the pleasure of the superintendent ((and the state board of education as provided in this section. Expenditures by the superintendent of public instruction for direct and indirect support of the state board of education are valid operational expenditures by and in behalf of the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

The state board of education shall employ without undue delay the executive director of the state board of education and other state board of education office assistants and clerical help, appointed by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130, whose positions are allotted and funded in accordance with moneys appropriated exclusively for the operation of the state board of education. The rate of compensation and termination of any such executive director, state board office assistants, and clerical help shall be subject to the prior consent of the state board of education. Officers and employees exempted from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW shall serve at the pleasure of the state board of education as provided in this section.

Sec. 703. RCW 28A.305.021 and 2005 c 497 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The election of state board of education members by school directors and private school board members shall be conducted by the ((office of the superintendent of public instruction)) state board for the members of the state board who begin serving on January 1, 2006, and thereafter.

(1) The ((superintendent)) state board of education shall adopt rules for the conduct of elections, which shall include, but need not be limited to: The definition of the eastern Washington and western Washington geographic regions of the state for the purpose of determining board member positions; the weighting of votes cast by the number of students in the school director's school district or board member's private school; election and dispute resolution procedures; the process for filling vacancies; and election timelines. The election timeline shall include calling for elections no later than the twenty-fifth of August, and notification of the election results no later than the fifteenth of December.

(2) State board member positions one and two shall be filled by residents of the eastern Washington region and positions three, four, and five shall be filled by residents of the western Washington region.

(3) A school director shall be eligible to vote only for a candidate for each position in the geographic region within which the school director resides.

(4) Initial terms of the individuals elected by the school directors shall be for terms of two to four years in length as follows: Two members, one from eastern Washington and one from western Washington, shall be elected to two-year terms; two members, one from eastern Washington and one from western Washington, shall be elected to four-year terms; and one member from western Washington shall be elected to a three-year term. The term of the private school member shall be two years. All terms shall expire on the second Monday of January of the applicable year.

(5) No person employed in any public or private school, college, university, or other educational institution or any educational service district superintendent's office or in the office of the superintendent of public instruction is eligible for membership on the state board of education. No member of a board of directors of a local school district or private school may continue to serve in that capacity after having been elected to the state board.

Sec. 704. RCW 28A.525.025 and 2006 c 263 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To maintain citizen oversight on issues pertaining to school facilities and funding for school construction, a school facilities citizen advisory panel shall be created by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction. The panel shall advise and make recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding school facilities, funding for school construction, joint planning and financing of educational facilities, facility plans and programs for nonhigh school districts, and determinations of remote and necessary schools.

(2) The membership of the school facilities citizen advisory panel shall be as follows:

(a) One member of the state board of education;

(b) Two school district directors representing school districts of various sizes and geographic locations, who are appointed by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction and selected from a list of five names submitted to the ((board)) superintendent by the Washington state school directors' association; and

(c) Four additional citizen members appointed by the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction.

(3) Members of the panel shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) In addition to the school facilities citizen advisory panel, the superintendent of public instruction may convene a technical advisory group including representatives from school business officers, building and construction contracting and trade organizations, architecture and engineering organizations, and other organizations with expertise in school facilities.

PART VIII

STUDENTS WITH MEDICAL CONDITIONS

Sec. 801. RCW 28A.210.320 and 2006 c 263 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The attendance of every child at every public school in the state shall be conditioned upon the presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance at a particular school of a medication or treatment order addressing any life-threatening health condition that the child has that may require medical services to be performed at the school. Once such an order has been presented, the child shall be allowed to attend school.

(2) The chief administrator of every public school shall prohibit the further presence at the school for any and all purposes of each child for whom a medication or treatment order has not been provided in accordance with this section if the child has a life-threatening health condition that may require medical services to be performed at the school and shall continue to prohibit the child's presence until such order has been provided. The exclusion of a child from a school shall be accomplished in accordance with rules of the ((state board of education)) superintendent of public instruction. Before excluding a child, each school shall provide written notice to the parents or legal guardians of each child or to the adults in loco parentis to each child, who is not in compliance with the requirements of this section. The notice shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a) The requirements established by this section; (b) the fact that the child will be prohibited from further attendance at the school unless this section is complied with; and (c) such procedural due process rights as are established pursuant to this section.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the state board of health shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that establish the procedural and substantive due process requirements governing the exclusion of children from public schools under this section. The rules shall include any requirements under applicable federal laws.

(4) As used in this section, "life-threatening condition" means a health condition that will put the child in danger of death during the school day if a medication or treatment order and a nursing plan are not in place.

(5) As used in this section, "medication or treatment order" means the authority a registered nurse obtains under RCW 18.79.260(2).

PART IX

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 901. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28A.305.140 (Waiver from provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 authorized) and 2012 c 53 s 8, 2011 c 260 s 8, 1990 c 33 s 267, (1992 c 141 s 302 expired September 1, 2000), & 1985 c 349 s 6;

(2) RCW 28A.305.141 (Waiver from one hundred eighty-day school year requirement—Criteria) and 2016 c 99 s 1, 2014 c 171 s 1, & 2009 c 543 s 2;

(3) RCW 28A.305.142 (Waiver from career and technical course equivalency requirement) and 2014 c 217 s 104; and

(4) RCW 28A.305.190 (Eligibility to take test to earn a high school equivalency certificate) and 2013 c 39 s 8, 2010 c 20 s 6, 1993 c 218 s 1, 1991 c 116 s 5, & 1973 c 51 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902. A new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The transfer of powers, duties, and functions of the state board of education pursuant to chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (this act) do not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(2) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfer of powers, duties, and functions directed by chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (this act), the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(3) Unless otherwise provided, nothing contained in chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (this act) may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903. Sections 104 and 603 of this act expire June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904. Sections 105 and 604 of this act take effect June 30, 2019.

--- END ---