BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Every community youth athletic program must provide written notice to the parent or guardian of any youth participating in the program regarding the program's policies relating to whether the program obtains criminal background checks for hired or volunteer coaches, or both.

(2) If criminal background checks are obtained for hired or volunteer coaches, the written notice must also contain the following:

(a) A statement regarding whether the criminal background check includes state and federal criminal history information and whether the program obtains subsequent arrest notification for those individuals; and

(b) Contact information regarding where the parent or guardian of a child participating in the community youth athletic program can obtain additional information about the program's background check policy, such as the entity providing the criminal background check obtained by the community youth athletic program and the nature of the type of offenses the program looks for.

(3) As used in this section:

(a) A "community youth athletic program" means an organization:

(i) Whose primary purpose is the promotion or provision of athletic activities for youth under eighteen years of age; and

(ii) That has employees or volunteers who have supervisory or disciplinary power over one or more youth under eighteen years of age.

(b) "Written notice" includes posting on the community youth athletic program's internet web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---