BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.101 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 901 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or

(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.

(c) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(d) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(e) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules.

(f)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.

(2) The term does not include:

(i) a controlled substance;

(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(g) "Deliver" or "delivery((,))" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.

(h) "Department" means the department of health.

(i) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(j) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.

(k) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(l) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

(m) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(n) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

(o) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.

(p) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.

(q) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

(r) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (dd)(5) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(s) "Lot" means a definite quantity of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.

(t) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of marijuana, marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused product.

(u) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or

(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(v) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.

(w) "Marijuana concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.

(x) "Marijuana processor" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to process marijuana into marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products, package and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at wholesale to marijuana retailers.

(y) "Marijuana producer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce and sell marijuana at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers.

(z) "Marijuana products" means useable marijuana, marijuana concentrates, and marijuana-infused products as defined in this section.

(aa) "Marijuana researcher" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to produce, process, and possess marijuana for the purposes of conducting research on marijuana and marijuana-derived drug products.

(bb) "Marijuana retailer" means a person licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in a retail outlet.

(cc) "Marijuana-infused products" means products that contain marijuana or marijuana extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from marijuana as defined in subsection (v) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "marijuana-infused products" does not include either useable marijuana or marijuana concentrates.

(dd) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.

(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6) Cocaine base.

(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(ee) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(ff) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

(gg) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(hh) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(ii) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

(jj) "Practitioner" means:

(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical quality assurance commission or equivalent and his or her supervising physician, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.

(kk) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(ll) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(mm) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(nn) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

(oo) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the state liquor and cannabis board for the retail sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

(pp) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(qq) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(rr) "THC concentration" means percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of marijuana product, or the combined percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.

(ss) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(tt) "Useable marijuana" means dried marijuana flowers. The term "useable marijuana" does not include either marijuana-infused products or marijuana concentrates.

(uu) "Cannabis health and beauty aid" means a product containing parts of the cannabis plant and which:

(1) Is intended for use only as a topical application;

(2) Contains a THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent;

(3) Does not cause psychoactivity; and

(4) Is not intended for ingestion by humans or animals.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.575 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A cannabis health and beauty aid permit is established that allows the holder to process and possess marijuana for the purposes of manufacturing cannabis health and beauty aids.

(2) A cannabis health and beauty aid permit holder may only produce cannabis health and beauty aids for sale in retail outlets and in the general retail market. A cannabis health and beauty aid permit holder may purchase marijuana and marijuana byproducts such as stems, roots, and leaves from a marijuana producer to process into cannabis health and beauty aids. Marijuana and marijuana byproducts purchased from a marijuana producer may not be sold, traded, or donated to any person or entity.

(3) In establishing a cannabis health and beauty aid permit, the state liquor and cannabis board may adopt rules on the following:

(a) Application requirements;

(b) Permit renewal requirements;

(c) Conditions for permit revocation;

(d) Security measures to ensure marijuana is not diverted to purposes other than production of cannabis health and beauty aids;

(e) Amounts of marijuana a permit holder may have on its premises;

(f) Permit holder reporting requirements;

(g) A seed to sale traceability system that permits the state liquor and cannabis board to track sales of marijuana and marijuana byproducts from marijuana producers to cannabis health and beauty aid permit holders. Cannabis health and beauty aid permit holders must keep records of sales of cannabis health and beauty aid products to retail outlets and the general retail market and make these records available to the state liquor and cannabis board upon request;

(h) Random testing requirements of cannabis health and beauty aids including requirements that cannabis health and beauty aids are tested to ensure a THC level of 0.3 percent or less; and

(i) Additional requirements deemed necessary or appropriate by the state liquor and cannabis board.

(4) In addition to the labeling requirements adopted in rule under RCW 69.50.342, cannabis health and beauty aids must comply with the labeling requirements of this subsection (4).

(a) Labels for cannabis health and beauty aids must not:

(i) Use any word, symbol, or image commonly used in or by medical or pharmaceutical professions including, but not limited to: Depiction of a caduceus, staff of Asclepius, bowl of Hygieia, or mortar and pestle; or the use of the word "prescription" or letters "RX";

(ii) State or imply any specific medical or therapeutic benefit; or

(iii) Mimic a brand of over-the-counter or legend drug.

(b) Labels for cannabis health and beauty aids must prominently display the following statement: "This product is not approved by the FDA to treat, cure, or prevent any disease."

(5) The processing and possession of marijuana in accordance with this section and the rules adopted to implement this section by a cannabis health and beauty aid permit holder is not a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every cannabis health and beauty aid permit must be issued in the name of the applicant, must specify the location at which the applicant intends to operate, which must be in the state of Washington, and the permit holder may not allow any other person to use the permit.

(6) The application fee for a cannabis health and beauty aid permit is two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a cannabis health and beauty aid permit is to be determined on a sliding scale based on the amount of cannabis health and beauty aid products to be annually produced by the permit holder.

(7) The delivery, distribution, and sale of cannabis health and beauty aids are not subject to the regulations and penalties of this chapter that apply to marijuana, marijuana concentrates, or marijuana-infused products.

(((2) For purposes of this section, "cannabis health and beauty aid" means a product containing parts of the cannabis plant and which:

(a) Is intended for use only as a topical application to provide therapeutic benefit or to enhance appearance;

(b) Contains a THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent;

(c) Does not cross the blood-brain barrier; and

(d) Is not intended for ingestion by humans or animals.))

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.325 and 2016 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a marijuana producer's license to produce marijuana for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and other marijuana producers and to produce marijuana plants for sale to cooperatives as described under RCW 69.51A.250, regulated by the state liquor and cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. Marijuana producers may also sell at wholesale marijuana and marijuana byproducts such as stems, roots, and leaves to cannabis health and beauty aid permit holders. The production, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana producer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the marijuana producer intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana producer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana producer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana producer intends to produce marijuana.

(2) There shall be a marijuana processor's license to process, package, and label marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products for sale at wholesale to marijuana processors and marijuana retailers, regulated by the state liquor and cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The processing, packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana, useable marijuana, marijuana-infused products, and marijuana concentrates in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW and the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, by a validly licensed marijuana processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana processor's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana processor's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana processor's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana processor intends to process marijuana.

(3) There shall be a marijuana retailer's license to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products at retail in retail outlets, regulated by the state liquor and cannabis board and subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed marijuana retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every marijuana retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a marijuana retailer's license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a marijuana retailer's license shall be one thousand dollars. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a marijuana retailer intends to sell marijuana concentrates, useable marijuana, and marijuana-infused products.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.580 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applicants for a marijuana producer's, marijuana processor's, marijuana researcher's ((or)), marijuana retailer's license, or cannabis health and beauty aid permit under this chapter must display a sign provided by the state liquor and cannabis board on the outside of the premises to be licensed notifying the public that the premises are subject to an application for such license or permit. The sign must:

(a) Contain text with content sufficient to notify the public of the nature of the pending license or permit application, the date of the application, the name of the applicant, and contact information for the state liquor and cannabis board;

(b) Be conspicuously displayed on, or immediately adjacent to, the premises subject to the application and in the location that is most likely to be seen by the public;

(c) Be of a size sufficient to ensure that it will be readily seen by the public; and

(d) Be posted within seven business days of the submission of the application to the state liquor and cannabis board.

(2) The state liquor and cannabis board must adopt such rules as are necessary for the implementation of this section, including rules pertaining to the size of the sign and the text thereon, the textual content of the sign, the fee for providing the sign, and any other requirements necessary to ensure that the sign provides adequate notice to the public.

(3)(a) A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance requiring individual notice by an applicant for a marijuana producer's, marijuana processor's, marijuana researcher's, or marijuana retailer's license under this chapter, sixty days prior to issuance of the license, to any elementary or secondary school, playground, recreation center or facility, child care center, church, public park, public transit center, library, or any game arcade admission to which is not restricted to persons aged twenty-one years or older, that is within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the grounds of the establishment seeking licensure. The notice must provide the contact information for the liquor and cannabis board where any of the owners or operators of these entities may submit comments or concerns about the proposed business location.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "church" means a building erected for and used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection therewith.

--- END ---