BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that it directed the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene a work group for one year to recommend comprehensive benchmarks for developmentally appropriate interpersonal and decision-making knowledge and skills of social and emotional learning for grades kindergarten through high school that build upon what is being done in early learning. The legislature acknowledges that the social emotional learning benchmarks work group submitted guiding principles, standards, and benchmarks, but the work group needs more time to complete additional work. The legislature intends to support the development and implementation of social emotional learning across the state by continuing this work group for two more years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall continue to convene the social emotional learning benchmarks work group until June 30, 2019.

(2) The work group must develop indicators to provide concrete examples of what it might look like when a student meets a social emotional learning benchmark. These indicators must be culturally responsive, inclusive, developmentally appropriate, and aligned with the proposed social emotional learning standards and benchmarks.

(3) The work group must develop resources to support school districts and schools with implementing social and emotional learning.

(4) The work group must continue to engage with stakeholders and seek feedback.

(5) In compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the work group shall provide a report to the legislature by June 30, 2018, and June 30, 2019, that summarizes the work group's accomplishments, measures its progress, and includes recommendations regarding social emotional learning.

(6) Members of the work group must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) This section expires August 1, 2019.

--- END ---