BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 44.68.010 and 2007 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Administrative committee" means the joint legislative ((systems)) technology administrative committee created under RCW 44.68.030.

(2) (("Center")) "Office" means the office of legislative ((service center)) technology solutions established under RCW 44.68.060.

(3) (("Coordinator")) "Director" means the legislative ((systems coordinator)) technology director employed under RCW 44.68.040.

(4) "((Systems)) Technology committee" means the joint legislative ((systems)) technology committee created under RCW 44.68.020.

Sec. 2. RCW 44.68.020 and 1993 c 332 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The joint legislative ((systems)) technology committee is created to oversee the direction of the information processing and communications systems of the legislature and to enforce the policies, procedures, and standards established under this chapter. The ((systems)) technology committee consists of four members as follows:

(a) A member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(b) A member from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, appointed by the majority leader of the senate.

(2) Members shall serve two-year terms, beginning with their appointment in the regular legislative session held in an odd-numbered year and continuing until their successors are appointed and qualified. In case of a vacancy, the original appointing authority shall appoint another member of the same party as the vacating member.

(3) The ((systems)) technology committee shall choose its own presiding officer and other necessary officers from among its membership, and shall make rules for orderly procedure.

Sec. 3. RCW 44.68.030 and 2007 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The joint legislative ((systems)) technology administrative committee is created to manage the information processing and communications systems of the legislature. The administrative committee consists of five members appointed as follows:

(a) The secretary of the senate, and another senate staff person appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the secretary;

(b) The chief clerk of the house of representatives, and another house of representatives staff person appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the chief clerk; and

(c) The code reviser, or the code reviser's designee, serving in a nonvoting capacity.

(2) The ((coordinator)) director shall serve as the secretary of the administrative committee.

Sec. 4. RCW 44.68.035 and 2001 c 259 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The administration of the ((joint legislative systems)) technology committee is subject to RCW 44.04.260.

Sec. 5. RCW 44.68.040 and 2007 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW 44.04.260:

(1) The ((systems)) technology committee, after consultation with the administrative committee, shall employ a legislative ((systems coordinator)) technology director. The ((coordinator)) director shall serve at the pleasure of the ((systems)) technology committee, which shall fix the ((coordinator's)) director's salary.

(2)(a) The ((coordinator)) director shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the ((center)) office, and shall assist the administrative committee in managing the information processing and communications systems of the legislature as directed by the administrative committee;

(b) In accordance with an adopted personnel plan, the ((coordinator)) director shall employ or engage and fix the compensation for personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(c) The ((coordinator)) director shall enter into contracts for: (i) The sale, exchange, or acquisition of equipment, supplies, services, and facilities required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and (ii) the distribution of legislative information.

Sec. 6. RCW 44.68.050 and 2007 c 18 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrative committee shall, subject to the approval of the ((systems)) technology committee and subject to RCW 44.04.260:

(1) Adopt policies, procedures, and standards regarding the information processing and communications systems of the legislature;

(2) Establish appropriate charges for services, equipment, and publications provided by the legislative information processing and communications systems, applicable to legislative and nonlegislative users as determined by the administrative committee;

(3) Adopt a compensation plan for personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(4) Approve strategic and tactical ((information)) technology plans and provide guidance in operational matters required to carry out (a) the purposes of this chapter; and (b) the distribution of legislative information;

(5) Generally assist the ((systems)) technology committee in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter, as directed by the ((systems)) technology committee.

Sec. 7. RCW 44.68.060 and 2007 c 18 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The administrative committee, subject to the approval of the ((systems)) technology committee, shall establish ((a legislative service center)) the office of legislative technology solutions. The ((center)) office shall provide automatic data processing services, equipment, training, and support to the legislature and legislative agencies. The ((center)) office may also, by agreement, provide services to agencies of the judicial and executive branches of state government and other governmental entities, and provide public access to legislative information. All operations of the ((center)) office shall be subject to the general supervision of the administrative committee in accordance with the policies, procedures, and standards established under RCW 44.68.050.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (3) of this section, determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of information placed or maintained ((in the center)) by the office shall rest solely with the originator and shall be made in accordance with any law regulating the disclosure of such information. The originator is the person who directly places information in the ((center)) office.

(3) When utilizing the ((center)) office to carry out the bill drafting functions required under RCW 1.08.027, the code reviser shall be considered the originator as defined in ((RCW 44.68.060)) this section. However, determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of drafts placed or maintained ((in the center)) by the office shall be made by the person requesting the code reviser's services and the code reviser, acting as the originator, shall comply with and carry out such determinations as directed by that person. A measure once introduced shall not be considered a draft under this subsection.

Sec. 8. RCW 44.68.065 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((legislative service center)) office, under the direction of the ((joint legislative systems)) technology committee and the ((joint legislative systems)) administrative committee, shall:

(1) Develop a legislative information technology portfolio consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.105.341;

(2) Participate in the development of an enterprise-based statewide information technology strategy;

(3) Ensure the legislative ((information)) technology portfolio is organized and structured to clearly indicate participation in and use of enterprise-wide information technology strategies;

(4) As part of the biennial budget process, submit the legislative ((information)) technology portfolio to the chair and ranking member of the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the office of financial management, and the consolidated technology services agency.

Sec. 9. RCW 44.68.080 and 1986 c 61 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((information)) technology and communications functions of the legislature and legislative agencies are subject to the requirements of this chapter, and the standards, policies, and procedures established under this chapter.

Sec. 10. RCW 44.68.085 and 2007 c 18 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all expenses incurred, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided and signed by the ((coordinator)) director. Vouchers may be drawn on funds appropriated by law for the ((systems)) technology committee, administrative committee, and ((center)) office: PROVIDED, That the senate, house of representatives, and code reviser may authorize the ((systems)) technology committee, administrative committee, and ((center)) office to draw on funds appropriated by the legislature for related information technology expenses. The senate and house of representatives may transfer moneys appropriated for legislative expenses to the ((systems)) technology committee, administrative committee, and ((center)) office, in addition to charges made under RCW 44.68.050(2).

Sec. 11. RCW 44.68.090 and 1986 c 61 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Members of the ((systems)) technology committee and of the administrative committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120 or 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, as appropriate, while attending meetings of their respective committees or on other official business authorized by their respective committees.

Sec. 12. RCW 44.68.100 and 1996 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature and legislative agencies through the ((joint legislative systems)) technology committee, shall:

(1) Continue to plan for and implement processes for making legislative information available electronically;

(2) Promote and facilitate electronic access to the public of legislative information and services;

(3) Establish technical standards for such services;

(4) Consider electronic public access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of information systems;

(5) Develop processes to determine which legislative information the public most wants and needs;

(6) Increase capabilities to receive information electronically from the public and transmit forms, applications, and other communications and transactions electronically;

(7) Use technologies that allow continuous access twenty-four hours a day, seven days per week, involve little or no cost to access, and are capable of being used by persons without extensive technology ability; and

(8) Consider and incorporate wherever possible ease of access to electronic technologies by persons with disabilities.

Sec. 13. RCW 44.68.105 and 2007 c 18 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((systems)) technology committee, administrative committee, and ((center)) office are hereby expressly exempted from the provisions of chapter 43.105 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. RCW 44.68.900 (Effective date—2007 c 18) is decodified.

--- END ---