BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.08.010 and 2013 c 113 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Whenever any board, council, commission, trustees, or body acting for the state or any county or municipality or any public body must contract with any person or corporation to do any work for the state, county, or municipality, or other public body, city, town, or district, such board, council, commission, trustees, or body must require the person or persons with whom such contract is made to make, execute, and deliver to such board, council, commission, trustees, or body a good and sufficient bond, with a surety company as surety, conditioned that such person or persons must:

(i) Faithfully perform all the provisions of such contract;

(ii) Pay all laborers, mechanics, and subcontractors and material suppliers, and all persons who supply such person or persons, or subcontractors, with provisions and supplies for the carrying on of such work; and

(iii) Pay the taxes, increases, and penalties incurred on the project under Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW on: (A) Projects referred to in RCW 60.28.011(1)(b); and/or (B) projects for which the bond is conditioned on the payment of such taxes, increases, and penalties.

(b) The bond, in cases of cities and towns, must be filed with the clerk or comptroller thereof, and any person or persons performing such services or furnishing material to any subcontractor has the same right under the provisions of such bond as if such work, services, or material was furnished to the original contractor.

(2) The provisions of RCW 39.08.010 through 39.08.030 do not apply to any money loaned or advanced to any such contractor, subcontractor, or other person in the performance of any such work.

(3) On contracts of ((thirty-five)) one hundred fifty thousand dollars or less, at the option of the contractor or the general contractor/construction manager as defined in RCW 39.10.210, the respective public entity may, in lieu of the bond, retain ((fifty)) ten percent of the contract amount for a period of thirty days after date of final acceptance, or until receipt of all necessary releases from the department of revenue, the employment security department, and the department of labor and industries and settlement of any liens filed under chapter 60.28 RCW, whichever is later. The recovery of unpaid wages and benefits must be the first priority for any actions filed against retainage held by a state agency or authorized local government.

(4) For contracts of one hundred fifty thousand dollars or less, the public entity may accept a full payment and performance bond from an individual surety or sureties.

(5) The surety must agree to be bound by the laws of the state of Washington and subjected to the jurisdiction of the state of Washington.

--- END ---