BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.15.030 and 2005 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The association of Washington generals is organized as a private, nonprofit, nonpartisan((,)) corporation in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW and this section.

(2) The purpose of the association of Washington generals is to:

(a) Provide the state a means of extending formal recognition for an individual's outstanding services to the state; ((and))

(b) Bring together those individuals to serve the state as ambassadors of trade, tourism, and international goodwill; and

(c) Expand educational and/or employment opportunities for youth, veterans, and people with disabilities in Washington state.

(3) The association of Washington generals may conduct activities in support of their mission, including but not limited to:

(a) Establishing selection criteria for selecting Washington generals;

(b) Operating a statewide ((essay competition)) study abroad and college readiness fellowship called the Washington world fellows program;

(c) Training Washington generals as ambassadors of the state of Washington, nationally and internationally; and

(d) Promoting Washington generals as ambassadors of the state of Washington.

(4) The association of Washington generals is governed by a board of directors. The board is composed of the governor, lieutenant governor, and the secretary of state, who serve as ex officio, nonvoting members, and other officers and members as the association of Washington generals designates.

(5) Members of the board are compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and are reimbursed for their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6) The board shall:

(a) Review nominations for and be responsible for the selection of Washington generals; and

(b) Establish the title of honorary Washington general to honor worthy individuals from outside the state of Washington.

(((5))) (7) The lieutenant governor's office may provide technical and financial assistance for the association of Washington generals.

(((6))) (8) The legislature may make appropriations in support of the Washington generals subject to the availability of funds.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.420 and 2017 c 25 s 3 and 2017 c 11 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall:

(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;

(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and

(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.

(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fee amounts for each special license plate to the following appropriate account as created in this section in the custody of the state treasurer:

ACCOUNT

CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

4-H programs

Support Washington 4-H programs

Fred Hutch

Support cancer research at the Fred Hutchinson cancer research center

Gonzaga University alumni association

Scholarship funds to needy and qualified students attending or planning to attend Gonzaga University

Helping kids speak

Provide free diagnostic and therapeutic services to families of children who suffer from a delay in language or speech development

Law enforcement memorial

Provide support and assistance to survivors and families of law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty and to organize, finance, fund, construct, utilize, and maintain a memorial on the state capitol grounds to honor those fallen officers

Lighthouse environmental programs

Support selected Washington state lighthouses that are accessible to the public and staffed by volunteers; provide environmental education programs; provide grants for other Washington lighthouses to assist in funding infrastructure preservation and restoration; encourage and support interpretive programs by lighthouse docents

Music matters awareness

Promote music education in schools throughout Washington

Seattle Seahawks

Provide funds to InvestED and the association of Washington generals created in RCW 43.15.030 in the following manner: (a) Seventy-five percent, to InvestED, to encourage secondary students who have economic needs to stay in school, return to school, or get involved within their learning community; and (b) up to twenty-five percent, to the association of Washington generals, to create equity focused educational opportunities, including the Washington world fellows program

Seattle Sounders FC

Provide funds to Washington state mentors and the association of Washington generals created in RCW 43.15.030 in the following manner: (a) Seventy percent and the remaining proceeds, if any, to Washington state mentors, to increase the number of mentors in the state by offering mentoring grants throughout Washington state that foster positive youth development and academic success, with up to twenty percent of these proceeds authorized for program administration costs; and (b) up to thirty percent, not to exceed forty-thousand dollars annually as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management, to the association of Washington generals, to develop Washington state educational, veterans, international relations, and civics projects and to recognize the outstanding public service of individuals or groups in the state of Washington

Seattle University

Fund scholarships for students attending or planning to attend Seattle University

Share the road

Promote bicycle safety and awareness education in communities throughout Washington

Ski & ride Washington

Promote winter snowsports, such as skiing and snowboarding, and related programs, such as ski and ride safety programs, underprivileged youth ski and ride programs, and active, healthy lifestyle programs

State flower

Support Meerkerk Rhododendron Gardens and provide for grants to other qualified nonprofit organizations' efforts to preserve rhododendrons

Volunteer firefighters

Receive and disseminate funds for purposes on behalf of volunteer firefighters, their families, and others deemed in need

Washington farmers and ranchers

Provide funds to the Washington FFA Foundation for educational programs in Washington state

Washington state aviation

Provide funds to the department of transportation to support infrastructure improvements at public use airports in Washington state

Washington state council of firefighters benevolent fund

Receive and disseminate funds for charitable purposes on behalf of members of the Washington state council of firefighters, their families, and others deemed in need

Washington state wrestling

Provide funds to the Washington state wrestling foundation to fund new and existing college wrestling programs

((Washington state council of firefighters benevolent fund

Receive and disseminate funds for charitable purposes on behalf of members of the Washington state council of firefighters, their families, and others deemed in need))

Washington tennis

Provide funds to cities to assist in the construction and maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. A city is eligible for construction funds if the city does not already have a public or private facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. Funds for construction must first be made available to the most populous eligible city, according to the most recent census, for a time period not to exceed five years after January 1, 2017. After the five-year time period, the funds for construction must be made available to the next most populous eligible city. Funds for the maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts must first be made available to the first eligible city that utilizes funds for construction provided by chapter 16, Laws of 2016

Washington's national park fund

Build awareness of Washington's national parks and support priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parks

We love our pets

Support and enable the Washington federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery of Washington state pets in order to reduce pet population

(3) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the accounts described in subsection (2) of this section. The accounts are subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(4) Funds in the special license plate accounts described in subsection (2) of this section must be disbursed subject to the conditions described in subsection (2) of this section and under contract between the department and qualified nonprofit organizations that provide the services described in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit organization" means a not-for-profit corporation operating in Washington that has received a determination of tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3). The qualified nonprofit organization must meet all the requirements under RCW 46.18.100(1).

--- END ---