BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 16.57.220 and 2010 c 66 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided for in ((RCW 16.65.090 and otherwise in)) this section, the fee for livestock inspection is one dollar and sixty cents per head for cattle and three dollars and fifty cents for horses or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.

(2) When cattle are identified with the owner's brand or other form of identification specified by the director by rule, the fee for livestock inspection is one dollar and ten cents per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.

(3) No inspection fee is charged for a calf that is inspected before moving out-of-state under an official temporary grazing permit if the calf is part of a cow-calf unit and the calf is identified with the owner's Washington-recorded brand or other form of identification specified by the director by rule.

(4) The fee for inspection of cattle at a processing plant with a daily capacity of no more than five hundred head of cattle where the United States department of agriculture maintains a meat inspection program is ((four)) six dollars per head.

(5) When a single inspection certificate issued for thirty or more horses belonging to one person, the fee for livestock inspection is two dollars per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.

(6) The fee for individual identification certificates is twenty dollars for an annual certificate and sixty dollars for a lifetime certificate or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater. However, the fee for an annual certificate listing thirty or more animals belonging to one person is five dollars per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater. A lifetime certificate shall not be issued until the fee has been paid to the director.

(7) The minimum fee for the issuance of an inspection certificate by the director is ((five)) ten dollars. The minimum fee does not apply to livestock consigned to a public livestock market or special sale or inspected at a cattle processing plant.

(8) For purposes of this section, "the time and mileage fee" means ((seventeen dollars)) twenty-seven dollars and fifty cents per hour and the current mileage rate set by the office of financial management.

Sec. 2. RCW 16.65.090 and 2003 c 326 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

The director shall provide for livestock inspection. When livestock inspection is required the licensee shall collect from the consignor and pay to the department ((an)) a per head inspection fee, as provided ((by law)) in RCW 16.57.220, for each animal inspected or the time and mileage fee provided in RCW 16.57.220, whichever is greater. ((However, if in any one sale day the total fees collected for inspection do not exceed one hundred dollars, then the licensee shall pay one hundred dollars for the inspection services.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 16.65 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall submit a report pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by November 30th of each year to the appropriate committees of the legislature having oversight over agriculture. The report must also be submitted to the livestock identification advisory board created in RCW 16.57.015. The report must include amounts collected, a report on program expenditures, and any recommendations for improving the program or making it more efficient.

--- END ---