BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a study to determine the following information for each county in Washington:

(a) The cost per county resident to provide the core services and functions of the following county offices:

(i) Assessor;

(ii) Auditor;

(iii) Clerk;

(iv) Coroner or medical examiner;

(v) Treasurer;

(vi) Sheriff;

(vii) Courts;

(viii) Prosecuting attorney; and

(ix) County legislative authority.

Core services and functions are those required for all counties to carry out the Constitution and laws of the state of Washington.

(b) The funding sources for all funds, including all state funds, used by the county offices in (a) of this subsection to provide core services and functions. The funding sources must be listed separately for each county office.

(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee must use the county population data released by the office of financial management as of the effective date of this section when determining costs per county resident.

(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee must issue a report to the legislature by November 1, 2017.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2018.

--- END ---