BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:

All records, documents, data, materials, and other writings prepared, owned, used, or retained by volunteers who have not been appointed by the agency to an agency board, commission, internship, or supervisory role that has delegated agency authority, and that are not otherwise required to be retained by the agency, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

--- END ---