BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.73.015 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "City" means a city or town.

(2) "District" means a transportation benefit district created under this chapter.

(3) "Low-income" means household income set by the district creating the rebate program that is at or below seventy-five percent of the median household income, adjusted for household size, for the district in which the fees, taxes, or tolls were imposed.

(4) "Rebate program" means an optional program established by a transportation benefit district that includes a city with a population of ((five hundred)) seventy-five thousand ((persons)) or more for the purpose of providing rebates to low-income individuals for fees, taxes, and/or tolls imposed by such transportation benefit district for: (a) Vehicle fees imposed under RCW 36.73.040(3)(b); (b) sales and use taxes imposed under RCW 36.73.040(3)(a); and/or (c) tolls imposed under RCW 36.73.040(3)(d).

(5) "Supplemental transportation improvement" or "supplemental improvement" means any project, work, or undertaking to provide public transportation service, in addition to a district's existing or planned voter-approved transportation improvements, proposed by a participating city member of the district under RCW 36.73.180.

(6) "Transportation improvement" means a project contained in the transportation plan of the state, a regional transportation planning organization, city, county, or eligible jurisdiction as identified in RCW 36.73.020(2). A project may include investment in new or existing highways of statewide significance, principal arterials of regional significance, high capacity transportation, public transportation, and other transportation projects and programs of regional or statewide significance including transportation demand management. Projects may also include the operation, preservation, and maintenance of these facilities or programs.

Sec. 2. RCW 36.73.067 and 2012 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A district that: (a) Includes a city with a population of ((five hundred)) seventy-five thousand ((persons)) or more; and (b) imposes a vehicle fee under RCW 36.73.040(3)(b), sales and use taxes under RCW 36.73.040(3)(a), or tolls under RCW 36.73.040(3)(d), may establish a rebate program for the purposes of providing rebates of up to forty percent of the actual fee, tax, or toll paid by a low-income individual.

(2) Funds collected from a vehicle fee under RCW 36.73.040(3)(b), sales and use tax under RCW 36.73.040(3)(a) or tolls under RCW 36.73.040(3)(d) may be used for a rebate program established under this section.

(3) A district that establishes a rebate program is responsible for the development and administration of the program and all functions and costs associated with the rebate program.

(4) A district that establishes a rebate program under this section must report back to the legislature two years after the program takes effect. The report must include, but is not limited to, a detailed description of the structure of the program, the average rebate, the total amount of rebates issued, and the number of people that received rebates.

--- END ---