BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person:

(a) To purchase a firearm unless, at the time of the purchase, the purchaser presents to the seller proof that the purchaser is covered by a qualified liability insurance policy;

(b) To sell a firearm unless, at the time of the sale, the seller verifies that the purchaser is covered by a qualified liability insurance policy; and

(c) Who owns a firearm purchased on or after the effective date of this section not to be covered by a qualified liability insurance policy.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the purchase or sale of a firearm for the use of the United States or any department or agency of the United States, or the state or any department, agency, or political subdivision of the state.

(3) A person who violates this section is subject to a fine in an amount of up to ten thousand dollars.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "qualified liability insurance policy" means, with respect to the purchaser of a firearm, a policy that:

(a) Provides liability insurance covering the purchaser specifically for losses resulting from use of the firearm while it is owned by the purchaser; and

(b) Is issued by an insurer licensed or authorized by the office of the insurance commissioner to provide the coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2018.

--- END ---