BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that executive orders issued in January of 2017 by the federal administration addressing the citizenship and immigration status of persons living and working in this country directly impact many Washington residents and their family members, as well as Washington educational institutions and businesses. The legislature finds that these executive orders create uncertainty, fear, and confusion regarding employment, education, residency, and the personal safety of those individuals. The legislature further finds that our businesses and educational institutions benefit significantly from contributions of noncitizens, and that our communities are immeasurably enriched through diversity and cultural awareness. Finally, the legislature finds that it is in the best interest of our communities and businesses and educational institutions to create a safe and secure resource for persons seeking assistance in determining their own legal rights as noncitizens, or the legal rights of their family members, employees, or students, by providing a single point of contact for obtaining referral information related to immigration and citizenship issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

The commission, in consultation with relevant state agencies, and individuals or groups having experience and knowledge of immigration law and the provision of immigration and citizenship related assistance, including those with experience providing culturally appropriate services to populations that have traditionally been underserved or unserved, shall establish a toll-free telephone hotline and a web site with the capacity to refer callers and users to sources of information and assistance for immigration and citizenship related matters.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.56.230 and 2015 c 224 s 2 and 2015 c 47 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The following personal information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:

(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare recipients;

(2)(a) Personal information:

(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files maintained by the department of early learning;

(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs; or

(iii) For the family members or guardians of a child who is subject to the exemption under this subsection (2) if the family member or guardian has the same last name ((of [as])) as the child or if the family member or guardian resides at the same address ((of [as])) as the child and disclosure of the family member's or guardian's information would result in disclosure of the personal information exempted under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;

(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;

(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;

(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial information as defined in RCW 9.35.005 including social security numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by other law;

(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093;

(7)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential address, social security number, or other personal information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.

(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an applicant declined to register with the selective service system.

(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work, public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW 46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.

(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW 88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse; ((and))

(8) All information related to individual claims resolution structured settlement agreements submitted to the board of industrial insurance appeals under RCW 51.04.063, other than final orders from the board of industrial insurance appeals.

Upon request by the legislature, the department of licensing shall provide a report to the legislature containing all of the information in subsection (7)(c) and (d) of this section that is subject to public disclosure((.));

(9) Voluntarily submitted information contained in a database that is part of or associated with enhanced 911 emergency communications systems, or information contained or used in emergency notification systems as provided under RCW 38.52.575 and 38.52.577; and

(10) All information revealing the identity of any person or entity requesting immigration and citizenship related information or assistance via the hotline or web site established under section 2 of this act. Identifying information includes the person's or entity's name, address, phone number, or other contact information, location, national origin or religion, and immigration or citizenship status.

--- END ---