BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.335.090 and 2001 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board of directors of each school district shall have exclusive control of all school property, real or personal, belonging to the district; said board shall have power, subject to RCW 28A.335.120, in the name of the district, to convey by deed all the interest of their district in or to any real property of the district which is no longer required for school purposes. For school districts with more than fifty thousand students, school district property shall be subject to state and local landmark or historic preservation regulations only to the extent explicitly approved by the board of directors of each school district. The board of directors of each such school district must consult with relevant state and local landmark or historic preservation authorities. Except as otherwise specially provided by law, and RCW 28A.335.120, the board of directors of each school district may purchase, lease, receive and hold real and personal property in the name of the district, and rent, lease or sell the same, and all conveyances of real estate made to the district shall vest title in the district.

(2) Any purchase of real property by a school district shall be preceded by a market value appraisal by a professionally designated real estate appraiser as defined in RCW 74.46.020 or by a general real estate appraiser certified under chapter 18.140 RCW who was selected by the board of directors.

--- END ---