BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.16A.175 and 2010 c 161 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to registering vehicles by this state, including the display of license plates and registration certificates, do not apply to vehicles owned or leased by the governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state and recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department of the interior if:

(a) The vehicle is used exclusively in tribal government service;

(b) The vehicle has been registered under a law adopted by the tribal government;

(c) License plates issued by the tribe showing the initial or abbreviation of the name of the tribe are displayed on the vehicle as required in this state;

(d) The tribe has not elected to receive Washington state license plates for tribal government service vehicles as authorized in RCW 46.16A.170; and

(e) If required by the department, the tribe provides the department with vehicle description and ownership information similar to that required for vehicles registered in this state, which may include the model year, make, model series, body type, type of power, vehicle identification number, and the license plate number assigned to each government service vehicle registered by that tribe.

(2) This section applies only if the laws of the tribe:

(a) Allow similar exemptions and privileges to all vehicles registered under the laws of this state on all tribal roads within the tribe's reservation; and

(b) Do not require persons operating vehicles registered by this state to pay a registration fee or to carry or display license plates or a registration certificate issued by the tribe.

(3) A vehicle registered to an address that is outside of Indian country and is not owned or leased by a tribal government is subject to the registration requirements of this chapter and must display a license plate and valid registration issued by the department. For purposes of this subsection, "Indian country" has the same meaning as provided in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section. Failure of a resident, as defined in RCW 46.16A.140, to register a vehicle as required in this chapter is subject to the penalties provided under RCW 46.16A.030.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.16A.030 and 2011 c 171 s 43 and 2011 c 96 s 31 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Vehicles must be registered as required by this chapter and must display license plates or decals assigned by the department.

(2) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle on a public highway of this state without having in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle registration and displaying license plates on the vehicle.

(3) Vehicle license plates or registration certificates, whether original issues or duplicates, may not be issued or furnished by the department until the applicant makes satisfactory application for a certificate of title or presents satisfactory evidence that a certificate of title covering the vehicle has been previously issued.

(4) Failure to make initial registration before operating a vehicle on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction. A person committing this infraction must pay a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced. This fine is in addition to any delinquent taxes and fees that must be deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion. The five hundred twenty-nine dollar fine must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250.

(5) Failure to renew an expired registration before operating a vehicle on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction.

(6) It is a gross misdemeanor for a resident, as identified in RCW 46.16A.140, to register a vehicle in another state or in Indian country as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, evading the payment of any tax or vehicle license fee imposed in connection with registration. It is punishable, in lieu of the fine in subsection (4) of this section, as follows:

(a) For a first offense:

(i) Up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail;

(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any applicable assessments, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced. The fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250;

(iii) A fine of one thousand dollars to be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced; and

(iv) The delinquent taxes and fees, which must be deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion, and which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced;

(b) For a second or subsequent offense:

(i) Up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail;

(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any applicable assessments, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced. The fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250;

(iii) A fine of five thousand dollars to be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced; and

(iv) The amount of delinquent taxes and fees, which must be deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a timely fashion, and which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced.

(7) A vehicle with an expired registration of more than forty-five days parked on a public street may be impounded by a police officer under RCW 46.55.113(2).

--- END ---