BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.295.010 and 2011 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Coal tar")) "Asphalt pavement sealer" means a viscous substance obtained by the destructive distillation of coal and containing levels of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons in excess of ((ten thousand milligrams)) one milligram per kilogram. (("Coal tar")) "Asphalt pavement sealer" includes, but is not limited to, refined coal tar, high temperature coal tar, coal tar pitch, or any substance identified by chemical abstract number 65996-93-2.

(2) (("Coal tar pavement product")) "Asphalt pavement sealer products" means a material that contains coal tar that is intended for use as a pavement sealant.

(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.

--- END ---