BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that Sasquatch has made immeasurable contributions to Washington state's cultural heritage and ecosystem. The state of Washington further recognizes the importance of preserving the legacy of Sasquatch.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The species of cryptid commonly called "Sasquatch" or "Bigfoot" or "Forest Yeti" is hereby designated as the official cryptid of the state of Washington.

--- END ---