BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that state agencies and local governments increasingly rely on high-resolution aerial imagery to conduct their business. Local disaster agencies use aerial images for public safety efforts. County assessors use oblique pictures as an integral part of their valuation activities. State department officials rely on aerial images for the development of commerce plans and to manage natural resources effectively.

(2) The legislature further finds that there are impediments to agencies acquiring high-quality aerial imagery. Typical barriers for local governments are the cost of acquiring and managing the tool, a lack of technical expertise to obtain, install, and maintain the resource, and a lack of legal and pragmatic infrastructure to facilitate sharing.

(3) The legislature further finds that successful decisions depend on reliable, accurate, and timely information. When imagery is not timely updated, government decisions may be made based on inaccurate information. Creating a statewide repository for high-quality aerial imagery for distribution between state and local governments would result in lower costs to all users, better informed decisions, more frequent updating of data, and reduced waste from duplication of efforts by multiple agencies.

(4) The legislature further finds that the mission and key role of the department of natural resources is to convene local, state, and regional governments to enhance and promote sustainable community in Washington state. The department of natural resources understands and supports the diverse needs of local leaders in cities, towns, and counties across the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of natural resources shall conduct an aerial imagery needs assessment study for state agencies and local governments statewide. The purpose of the study is to identify the needs of state agencies and local governments and to determine the appropriate agency for hosting a statewide imagery repository. Ultimately, this imagery information is being collected so that state and local officials have better information available as they conduct everyday business, protect property, assist citizens, conduct emergency planning, and respond to disasters. The information should be available in one repository to ensure that all cities, counties, and taxing districts have access.

(b) The assessment study must evaluate the need by determining a minimum resolution level that best serves the majority of users statewide. Individual counties requiring greater topographical resolution can satisfy those needs independently.

(2) The assessment study must, at a minimum:

(a) Include an assessment of:

(i) Aerial imagery needs of state agencies and local governments;

(ii) Types of imagery needed;

(iii) Frequency that various types of imagery are needed;

(iv) The current amount of funds that agencies spend on imagery;

(v) The best available mechanism for cost sharing and managing the acquisition of imagery;

(vi) The best methods of maximizing the accurate display of aerial photography through light detection and ranging or the global positioning system;

(vii) Capturing both orthoimages and oblique images;

(viii) A cost-benefit analysis of frequency of flights for more current data; and

(ix) The most effective organization to act as a central repository for shared imagery and provide a secured means to share between public bodies; and

(b) Identify and interview a sample of state department representatives and county officials to assess their needs and priorities for the future development and use for the imagery data provided.

(3) The department of natural resources must convene and define the scope of the assessment study and assist in the design of information collection. The department of commerce may complete its work directly or utilize the services of consultants to complete its assignment or portions of the assignment. However, the final delivered product must be issued by the department of natural resources.

(4) The assessment study must include recommendations on current sources that provide imagery data, further steps to improve the collection of aerial imagery data, and steps necessary to implement a comprehensive, cost-efficient, aerial imagery collection and distribution system to serve state and county officials in a statewide system.

(5) By October 15, 2017, the assessment study must be completed and the results reported to the legislature in accordance with the requirements of RCW 43.01.036.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2018.

--- END ---