BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 67.28.080 and 2013 c 196 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Acquisition" includes, but is not limited to, siting, acquisition, design, construction, refurbishing, expansion, repair, and improvement, including paying or securing the payment of all or any portion of general obligation bonds, leases, revenue bonds, or other obligations issued or incurred for such purpose or purposes under this chapter.

(2) "Municipality" means any county, city or town of the state of Washington.

(3) "Operation" includes, but is not limited to, operation, management, and marketing.

(4) "Person" means the federal government or any agency thereof, the state or any agency, subdivision, taxing district or municipal corporation thereof other than county, city or town, any private corporation, partnership, association, or individual.

(5) "Tourism" means economic activity resulting from tourists, which may include the combination of the sales of overnight lodging, meals, tours, gifts, or souvenirs.

(6) "Tourism promotion" means activities, operations, and expenditures designed to increase tourism, including but not limited to advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for the purpose of attracting and welcoming tourists; developing strategies to expand tourism; operating tourism promotion agencies; and funding the marketing of or the operation of special events and festivals designed to attract tourists.

(7) "Tourism-related facility" means real or tangible personal property with a usable life of three or more years, or constructed with volunteer labor that is: (a)(i) Owned by a public entity; (ii) owned by a nonprofit organization described under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; or (iii) owned by a nonprofit organization described under section 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, a business organization, destination marketing organization, main street organization, lodging association, or chamber of commerce and (b) used to support tourism, performing arts, or to accommodate tourist activities.

(8) "Tourist" means a person who travels for business or pleasure on a trip:

(a) Away from the person's place of residence or business and stays overnight in paid accommodations; or

(b) To a place fifty miles away or more one way by driving-distance from the person's place of residence or business for the day or stays overnight. However, island communities without land access are exempt from the mileage requirement under this subsection (8)(b); or

(c) From another country or state outside of the person's place of residence or business.

Sec. 2. RCW 67.28.1816 and 2013 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Lodging tax revenues under this chapter may be used, directly by any municipality or indirectly through a convention and visitors bureau or destination marketing organization in accordance with the process established in subsection (2)(b) of this section for:

(a) Tourism marketing;

(b) The marketing and operations of special events and festivals designed to attract tourists;

(c) Supporting the operations and capital expenditures of tourism-related facilities owned or operated by a municipality or a public facilities district created under chapters 35.57 and 36.100 RCW; or

(d) Supporting the operations of tourism-related facilities owned or operated by nonprofit organizations described under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) and 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, applicants applying for use of revenues in this chapter must provide the municipality to which they are applying estimates of how any moneys received will result in increases in the number of people traveling for business or pleasure on a trip:

(i) Away from their place of residence or business and staying overnight in paid accommodations;

(ii) To a place fifty miles or more one way by driving-distance from their place of residence or business for the day or staying overnight. However, island communities without land access are exempt from the mileage requirement under this subsection (2)(a); or

(iii) From another country or state outside of their place of residence or their business.

(b)(i) In a municipality with a population of five thousand or more, applicants applying for use of revenues in this chapter must submit their applications and estimates described under (a) of this subsection to the local lodging tax advisory committee.

(ii) The local lodging tax advisory committee must select the candidates from amongst the applicants applying for use of revenues in this chapter and provide a list of such candidates and recommended amounts of funding to the municipality for final determination. The municipality may choose only recipients from the list of candidates and recommended amounts provided by the local lodging tax advisory committee.

(c)(i) All recipients must submit a report to the municipality describing the actual number of tourists, which details the number of people traveling for business or pleasure on a trip:

(A) Away from their place of residence or business and staying overnight in paid accommodations;

(B) To a place fifty miles or more one way from their place of residence or business for the day or staying overnight; or

(C) From another country or state outside of their place of residence or their business. A municipality receiving a report must: Make such report available to the local legislative body and the public; and furnish copies of the report to the joint legislative audit and review committee and members of the local lodging tax advisory committee.

(ii) The joint legislative audit and review committee must on a biennial basis report to the economic development committees of the legislature on the use of lodging tax revenues by municipalities. Reporting under this subsection must begin in calendar year 2015.

(iii) Any recipient that does not submit the report required in this subsection (2)(c) is ineligible to receive funds under this chapter until such report is received. Any applicant who received funds under this chapter prior to the effective date of this section is ineligible, as of the effective date of this section, to receive any additional funds under this chapter, unless such applicant complies with this subsection and submits the report required herein.

(d) This section does not apply to the revenues of any lodging tax authorized under this chapter imposed by a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more.

--- END ---