BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.78.010 and 2006 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the demands of the workplace and of families need to be balanced to promote family stability and economic security. Workplace leave policies are desirable to accommodate changes in the workforce such as rising numbers of dual-career couples, working single parents, and an aging population. In addition, given the mobility of American society, many people no longer have available community or family support networks and therefore need additional flexibility in the workplace. The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to provide reasonable paid family leave for medical reasons, for the birth or placement of a child for adoption or foster care with the employee, ((and)) for the care of a family member who has a serious health condition, and for a qualifying exigency under the federal family and medical leave act.

--- END ---