BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the well-being of girls and women is a reliable indicator of overall community health. On a national basis, girls and young women experience higher rates of sexual abuse and like forms of victimization relative to boys and young men. Research findings document a relationship between childhood victimization and juvenile justice system involvement.

(2) The legislature intends that the services provided across the child welfare and juvenile justice systems for the target population consisting of dually involved females should be research-based and data-driven in order to identify effective prevention strategies, best practices for intervention, and system improvements. The services provided to the target population should address state and local needs for efficient use of limited financial resources and reduce reliance on costly and ineffective placement and incarceration.

(3) The legislature acknowledges that baseline information on the target population of dually involved females is not presently available. Data identifying the prevalence and characteristics of the target population of dually involved females and their families, access to trauma-informed interventions, and academic support will inform understanding of the root causes of the complex issues impacting their well-being and development. There is a need for gender-specific data collection across Washington's child welfare, juvenile justice, and education systems. There is also a need for data examination identifying potential best practices and system changes leading to improved outcomes for dually involved females.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a statewide study on the needs of dually involved females. The study must review available data for the following purposes:

(a) Understanding the prevalence and demographics of the dually involved female population and their families;

(b) Tracking outcomes for this population including, but not limited to, academic, social, and vocational achievement; and

(c) Surveying other states' systems that address and treat the needs of this population.

(2) To the extent possible, the data should be disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation and gender identity, county of residence, and other relevant variables.

(3) To the extent possible, the study should include a cost-benefit analysis of programs for dually involved females that would show evidence of avoidance of costs associated with public welfare programs or would demonstrate higher educational attainment.

(4) By July 1, 2019, the Washington state institute for public policy shall submit its study findings to the legislative fiscal and policy committees with responsibility for child welfare and juvenile justice issues and the work group created in subsection (5) of this section.

(5)(a) Effective July 1, 2019, the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state supreme court gender and justice commission shall convene a work group to develop, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, an implementation plan for policies, best practices, and system improvements based on the study findings of the Washington state institute for public policy under this section.

(b) The work group shall also: Evaluate the capabilities and limitations of current systems to serve the dually involved female population effectively; and identify opportunities for collaboration across systems with respect to alternatives to formal case processing, and opportunities for coordinated service plans, case planning, and management. The plan should include an evaluation rubric and accountability standards for measuring success in reduced recidivism, use of and length of stay in detention, improved learning support, increased stability in home or placement, and increased development of social competencies.

(c) By December 1, 2019, the work group shall report to the legislative fiscal and policy committees with responsibility for child welfare and juvenile justice issues on its implementation plan and:

(i) Effective protocols and procedures to ensure consistent use of targeted evidence-based interventions; and

(ii) Promising best practices for improving academic, social, and vocational achievement.

(6) For purposes of this section, "dually involved female" means any female person under eighteen years of age who has concurrent involvement, whether diversionary, formal, or a combination of the two, with both the child welfare and the juvenile justice systems in Washington state.

--- END ---