BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. INTENT. The legislature intends to update the existing Washington state equal pay act, which has not been modified since 1943, but should reflect the equal status of all workers in Washington state. The legislature finds that in order to establish equality among workers, men and women in the same job must be compensated as equals. Further, although not currently allowed under federal law, some employers institute various policies to discourage employees from discussing their wages. The legislature intends to ensure that employees have the opportunity to exercise their rights in this area.

--- END ---