BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of transportation is encouraged to engage in a transparent, public process to reexamine its rules surrounding access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. This process must consider the benefits and impacts of allowing vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW into the high occupancy vehicle lanes.

(2) By January 1, 2019, the department of transportation shall report progress of the public rule reexamination process in subsection (1) of this section to the transportation committees of the legislature with sufficient time for review before the conclusion of the process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act expires August 1, 2019.

--- END ---