BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

(1) It is the policy of the state that travel awards earned by state officers and state employees while conducting state business shall be used to reduce the costs of travel expenses of veterans in need of medical and health care. Whenever public funds are used to pay for travel or accommodations by a state officer or state employee, any travel award issued by any airline or hotel must accrue to the benefit of the state. In the event the issuing airline or hotel will not honor a transfer or assignment of any travel award, the state officer or employee shall report receipt of the travel award to the agency issuing the initial payment within ninety days of receipt. Travel awards earned by state officers and state employees must be transmitted by the receiving agency to the director within ninety days of receipt.

(2) The director shall be the custodian of travel awards earned by state officers and state employees and shall expend travel awards for the benefit of veterans who must travel to receive medical and health care purchased with state and federal funds by the department.

(3) The department shall develop procedures to manage travel awards, including collecting travel awards from agencies or directly from airlines and hotels, making most efficient use of travel awards, and expending travel awards to reduce travel and accommodation costs for eligible veterans.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Agency," "state employee," and "state officer" have the same meanings as in RCW 42.52.010.

(b) "Travel award" means any object of value awarded by any business providing commercial transportation or accommodations that can be used to reduce the cost of travel including, but not limited to, frequent flier miles, hotel points, discounts, and coupons.

(c) "Veteran" has the same meaning as in RCW 41.04.005 and 41.04.007.

(5) The department shall engage in rule making and have procedures in place by the effective date of this section.

(6) This section takes effect January 1, 2018.

--- END ---