BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish outcome and performance measures for the management of substance use disorder treatment services for clients with publicly funded medical coverage through its contracts with behavioral health organizations according to the timeline below.

(2) By January 1, 2018, contracts between behavioral health organizations and substance use disorder treatment providers must require that the programs be managed with the outcome goal of elimination of disordered substance use for clients. Disordered substance use means any use of a substance which is prohibited by state law or which leads to clinically significant impairment or distress. By December 1, 2017, the department shall establish a standard means by which an approved substance use disorder treatment program certified by the department must measure the presence of disordered substance use for clients with publicly funded medical coverage.

(3) By March 1, 2018, the department must require collection and reporting of data at specified intervals by rule relating to disordered substance use among clients with publicly funded medical coverage to commence. This data shall be collected by providers measuring the status of current and former clients at intervals of six months and twelve months following initiation of treatment, and at other times that may be established by the department by rule, and reported to the department. Data collected through the end of 2018 must be used to establish baseline performance data for substance use disorder treatment system providers. The department must share performance data collected with behavioral health organizations.

(4) Starting January 1, 2019, the department must require behavioral health organizations to utilize performance-based contracts with substance use disorder treatment providers in their network which require the providers to achieve performance targets for elimination of disordered substance use among clients who receive publicly funded substance use disorder treatment. The contracts must be structured to tie provider payment to the achievement of performance improvement goals.

(5) Contract terms established under subsection (4) of this section must not penalize a provider for serving high acuity clients or provide a financial incentive to withhold medically necessary care to individual clients. The department must provide technical assistance to behavioral health organizations to develop standard contract terms that fulfill the requirements of this section.

(6) By ninety days after the effective date of this section, the department must establish an annual reporting schedule to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature to describe its progress and the performance of substance use disorder treatment providers measured under this section.

--- END ---