BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is the intent of the legislature that regional transit authority voters are given an opportunity to reaffirm or withdraw their support for an authority to continue collecting revenue and constructing capital projects if any capital projects are delivered at greater than one hundred percent over the original project cost estimate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

An authority must provide initial engineer estimates for the cost to complete each capital project within a voter-approved capital program on its web site or another publicly accessible location. If two years after beginning construction of a voter-approved capital program the overall capital program budget is found to be greater than one hundred percent over the initial estimate, an authority must place on the next ballot a ballot proposition to reauthorize any taxes approved by authority voters after January 1, 2015, as provided in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, 81.104.170, and 81.104.175.

--- END ---