BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Digital breast tomosynthesis, also called three-dimensional mammography, is the latest advancement in breast imaging. Studies indicate that digital breast tomosynthesis can result in a forty-one percent increase in invasive cancer detection, a fifteen percent decrease in the recall rate from screening mammography, and a twenty-nine percent increase in the detection of all breast cancers. In addition, the American college of radiology has indicated that tomosynthesis is no longer investigational. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure women have access to the most effective breast imaging and to clarify that the existing mandate for mammography must include tomosynthesis.

(2) The legislature directs the office of the insurance commissioner to clarify that the existing mandates for mammography in RCW 48.20.393, 48.21.225, 48.44.325, and 48.46.275 include coverage for tomosynthesis under the same terms and conditions currently allowed for mammography. The application of a deductible and cost sharing is prohibited, consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300-gg-13.

(3) The legislature also directs the health care authority to clarify that the existing mandate for mammography in RCW 41.05.180 includes coverage for tomosynthesis under the same terms and conditions currently allowed for mammography. The application of a deductible and cost sharing is prohibited, consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300-gg-13.

--- END ---