BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that international baccalaureate and Cambridge international coursework prepares students for postsecondary success and provides opportunities for them to earn college credit or secure placement in advanced courses.

Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a policy for granting as many undergraduate course credits as possible to students who have earned a minimum score of four on standard-level international baccalaureate and a minimum score of E on their Cambridge international exams and clearly communicate credit awarding policies and course equivalencies to students. The goal of the policy is to award course credit in all appropriate instances and maximize the number of college students given college credit for international baccalaureate and Cambridge international exam scores.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The institutions of higher education must establish a coordinated, evidence-based policy for granting as many undergraduate college credits as possible and practical to students who have earned a minimum score of four on standard-level international baccalaureate exams or earned a minimum score of E on Cambridge international exams.

(2) Credit policy regarding all international baccalaureate and Cambridge international exams must be posted on campus web sites effective for the 2018 fall academic term. The institutions of higher education must conduct biennial reviews of their international baccalaureate and Cambridge international credit policy and report noncompliance to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1st of each year, beginning November 1, 2020.

--- END ---