BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.95.020 and 2016 c 69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Academic year" means the regular nine-month, three-quarter, or two-semester period annually occurring between August 1st and July 31st.

(2) "Account" means the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account established for the deposit of all money received by the office from eligible purchasers and interest earnings on investments of funds in the account, as well as for all expenditures on behalf of eligible beneficiaries for the redemption of tuition units and for the development of any authorized college savings program pursuant to RCW 28B.95.150.

(3) "Advisor sold" means a channel through which a broker dealer, investment advisor, or other financial intermediary recommends the Washington college savings program established pursuant to RCW 28B.95.010 to eligible investors and assists with the opening and servicing of individual college savings program accounts.

(4) "College savings program account" means the Washington college savings program account established pursuant to RCW ((28B.95.010)) 28B.95.085.

(5) "Committee on advanced tuition payment and college savings" or "committee" means a committee of the following members: The state treasurer, the director of the office of financial management, the director of the office, or their designees, and two members to be appointed by the governor, one representing program participants and one private business representative with marketing, public relations, or financial expertise.

(6) "Contractual obligation" means a legally binding contract of the state with the purchaser and the beneficiary establishing that purchases of tuition units in the advanced college tuition payment program will be worth the same number of tuition units at the time of redemption as they were worth at the time of the purchase, except as provided in RCW 28B.95.030(7).

(7) "Dual credit fees" means any fees charged to a student for participation in college in the high school under RCW 28A.600.290 or running start under RCW 28A.600.310.

(8) "Eligible beneficiary" means the person designated as the individual whose education expenses are to be paid from the advanced college tuition payment program or the college savings program. Qualified organizations, as allowed under section 529 of the federal internal revenue code, purchasing tuition unit contracts as future scholarships need not designate a beneficiary at the time of purchase.

(9) "Eligible contributor" means an individual or organization that contributes money for the purchase of tuition units, and for an individual college savings program account established pursuant to this chapter for an eligible beneficiary.

(10) "Eligible purchaser" means an individual or organization that has entered into a tuition unit contract with the governing body for the purchase of tuition units in the advanced college tuition payment program for an eligible beneficiary, or that has entered into a participant college savings program account contract for an eligible beneficiary. The state of Washington may be an eligible purchaser for purposes of purchasing tuition units to be held for granting Washington college bound scholarships.

(11) "Full-time tuition charges" means resident tuition charges at a state institution of higher education for enrollments between ten credits and eighteen credit hours per academic term.

(12) "Governing body" means the committee empowered by the legislature to administer the Washington advanced college tuition payment program and the Washington college savings program.

(13) "Individual college savings program account" means the formal record of transactions relating to a Washington college savings program beneficiary.

(14) "Institution of higher education" means an institution that offers education beyond the secondary level and is recognized by the internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code.

(15) "Investment board" means the state investment board as defined in chapter 43.33A RCW.

(16) "Investment manager" means the state investment board, another state, or any other entity as selected by the governing body, including another college savings plan established pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code.

(17) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance as defined in chapter 28B.76 RCW.

(18) "Owner" means the eligible purchaser or the purchaser's successor in interest who shall have the exclusive authority to make decisions with respect to the tuition unit contract or the individual college savings program contract. The owner has exclusive authority and responsibility to establish and change the asset investment options for a beneficiaries' individual college savings program account.

(19) "Participant college savings program account contract" means a contract to participate in the Washington college savings program between an eligible purchaser and the office.

(20) "State institution of higher education" means institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(21) "Tuition and fees" means undergraduate tuition and services and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 rounded to the nearest whole dollar. For purposes of this chapter, services and activities fees do not include fees charged for the payment of bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or installing any lands, buildings, or facilities.

(22) "Tuition unit contract" means a contract between an eligible purchaser and the governing body, or a successor agency appointed for administration of this chapter, for the purchase of tuition units in the advanced college tuition payment program for a specified beneficiary that may be redeemed at a later date for an equal number of tuition units, except as provided in RCW 28B.95.030(7).

(23) "Unit cash value price" means the total value of assets under management in the advanced college tuition payment program in which eligible purchasers opened accounts before July 1, 2015, divided by the total number outstanding credits purchased by eligible purchasers that opened accounts before July 1, 2015.

(24) "Unit purchase price" means the minimum cost to purchase one tuition unit in the advanced college tuition payment program for an eligible beneficiary. Generally, the minimum purchase price is one percent of the undergraduate tuition and fees for the current year, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, adjusted for the costs of administration and adjusted to ensure the actuarial soundness of the account. The analysis for price setting shall also include, but not be limited to consideration of past and projected patterns of tuition increases, program liability, past and projected investment returns, and the need for a prudent stabilization reserve.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.95.030 and 2016 c 69 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall be administered by the committee on advanced tuition payment which shall be chaired by the director of the office. The committee shall be supported by staff of the office.

(2)(a) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall consist of the sale of tuition units, which may be redeemed by the beneficiary at a future date for an equal number of tuition units regardless of any increase in the price of tuition, that may have occurred in the interval, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(b) Each purchase shall be worth a specific number of or fraction of tuition units at each state institution of higher education as determined by the governing body, except as provided in subsections (7) and (8) of this section.

(c) The number of tuition units necessary to pay for a full year's, full-time undergraduate tuition and fee charges at a state institution of higher education shall be set by the governing body at the time a purchaser enters into a tuition unit contract, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(d) The governing body may limit the number of tuition units purchased by any one purchaser or on behalf of any one beneficiary, however, no limit may be imposed that is less than that necessary to achieve four years of full-time, undergraduate tuition charges at a state institution of higher education. The governing body also may, at its discretion, limit the number of participants, if needed, to ensure the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.

(e) While the Washington advanced college tuition payment program is designed to help all citizens of the state of Washington, the governing body may determine residency requirements for eligible purchasers and eligible beneficiaries to ensure the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.

(3)(a) No tuition unit may be redeemed until two years after the purchase of the unit.

(b) Units may be redeemed for enrollment at any institution of higher education that is recognized by the internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code. Units may also be redeemed to pay for dual credit fees.

(c) Units redeemed at a nonstate institution of higher education or for graduate enrollment shall be redeemed at the rate for state public institutions in effect at the time of redemption.

(4) The governing body shall determine the conditions under which the tuition benefit may be transferred to another family member. In permitting such transfers, the governing body may not allow the tuition benefit to be bought, sold, bartered, or otherwise exchanged for goods and services by either the beneficiary or the purchaser.

(5) The governing body shall administer the Washington advanced college tuition payment program in a manner reasonably designed to be actuarially sound, such that the assets of the trust will be sufficient to defray the obligations of the trust including the costs of administration. The governing body may, at its discretion, discount the minimum purchase price for certain kinds of purchases such as those from families with young children, as long as the actuarial soundness of the account is not jeopardized.

(6) The governing body shall annually determine current value of a tuition unit.

(7) For the 2015-16 and 2016-17 academic years only, the governing body shall set the payout value for units redeemed during that academic year only at one hundred seventeen dollars and eighty-two cents per unit. For academic years after the 2016-17 academic year, the governing body shall make program adjustments it deems necessary and appropriate to ensure that the total payout value of each account on October 9, 2015, is not decreased or diluted as a result of the initial application of any changes in tuition under section 3, chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. In the event the committee or governing body provides additional units under chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., the committee and governing body shall also increase the maximum number of units that can be redeemed in any year to mitigate the reduction in available account value during any year as a result of chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. The governing body must notify holders of tuition units after the adjustment in this subsection is made and must include a statement concerning the adjustment.

(8) Once the Washington college savings plan is established, the governing body shall allow eligible purchasers to redeem units at the unit cash value price provided that all of the redeemed funds are deposited immediately into an eligible Washington college savings plan established by the governing body. Eligible purchasers may redeem units at the cash value price for the first six months after the Washington college savings plan has been established. Once the Washington college savings plan has been established for six months, tuition units may only be redeemed for the payout value determined by the governing board.

(9) The governing body shall promote, advertise, and publicize the Washington advanced college tuition payment program. Materials and online publications advertising the Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall include a disclaimer that the Washington advanced college tuition payment program's guarantee is that one hundred tuition units will equal one year of full-time, resident, undergraduate tuition at the most expensive state institution of higher education, and that if resident, undergraduate tuition is reduced, a tuition unit may lose monetary value.

(((9))) (10) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the governing body may:

(a) Impose reasonable limits on the number of tuition units or units that may be used in any one year;

(b) Determine and set any time limits, if necessary, for the use of benefits under this chapter;

(c) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in connection with any transaction under this chapter;

(d) Appoint and use advisory committees and the state actuary as needed to provide program direction and guidance;

(e) Formulate and adopt all other policies and rules necessary for the efficient administration of the program;

(f) Consider the addition of an advanced payment program for room and board contracts and also consider a college savings program;

(g) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in the state, to provide for coverage against any loss in connection with the account's property, assets, or activities or to further insure the value of the tuition units;

(h) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of its powers and duties under this chapter;

(i) Contract for the provision for all or part of the services necessary for the management and operation of the program with other state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state;

(j) Contract for other services or for goods needed by the governing body in the conduct of its business under this chapter;

(k) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter;

(l) Solicit and accept cash donations and grants from any person, governmental agency, private business, or organization; and

(m) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties and responsibilities of this program under this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.95.045 and 2016 c 69 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The committee shall create an expedited process by which owners can complete a direct rollover of a 529 account from (a) a state-sponsored prepaid tuition plan to a state-sponsored college savings plan, (b) a state-sponsored college savings plan to a state-sponsored prepaid tuition plan, or (c) a state-sponsored prepaid tuition plan or a state-sponsored college savings plan to an out-of-state eligible 529 plan. Owners may only rollover units purchased in the Washington advanced college tuition payment program at the unit cash value price when the funds are deposited immediately into an eligible Washington college savings account for the first six months that the Washington college savings account is open. Credits may not be distributed at the unit cash value price when deposited into an out-of-state eligible 529 plan.

(2) The committee shall report annually to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on (a) the number of accounts that have been rolled into the Washington college savings program from out of state and (b) the number of accounts rolled out of the Washington college savings program to 529 plans into other states.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.95.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 172 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall be a discrete nontreasury account retaining its interest earnings in accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the governing body shall deposit in the account all money received for the program. The state treasurer must track funds associated with any new Washington advanced college tuition payment program accounts created after July 1, 2017, separately from those accounts created June 30, 2015, or earlier. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of payments received from purchasers of tuition units and funds received from other sources, public or private. With the exception of investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money by the investment board paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160, the account shall be credited with all investment income earned by the account. Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program administration is subject to the allotment of all expenditures. However, an appropriation is not required for such expenditures. Program administration shall include, but not be limited to: The salaries and expenses of the program personnel including lease payments, travel, and goods and services necessary for program operation; contracts for program promotion and advertisement, audits, and account management; and other general costs of conducting the business of the program.

(b) All money received by the program from the office for the GET ready for math and science scholarship program shall be deposited in the GET ready for math and science scholarship account created in RCW 28B.105.110.

(3) The assets of the account may be spent without appropriation for the purpose of making payments to institutions of higher education on behalf of the qualified beneficiaries, making refunds, transfers, or direct payments upon the termination of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program. Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the authorization of the governing body.

(4) With regard to the assets of the account, the state acts in a fiduciary, not ownership, capacity. Therefore the assets of the program are not considered state money, common cash, or revenue to the state.

Sec. 5. RCW 28B.95.092 and 2016 c 69 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body shall begin and continue to accept applications for new tuition unit contracts and authorize the sale of new tuition units ((by July 1, 2017)) once the state opens the Washington college savings program. Upon reopening the advanced college tuition payment program, in any year in which the total annual sale of tuition units is below five hundred thousand, the governing body shall determine how to reinvigorate the advanced college tuition payment program to incentivize Washingtonians to enter into tuition unit contracts and purchase tuition units.

--- END ---