BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.02.420 and 2003 c 334 s 225 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that the state's community and technical colleges need a dedicated source of revenue to augment other sources of capital improvement funding. The intent of this section is to ensure that the forestland purchased under section 310, chapter 16, Laws of 1990 1st ex. sess. and known as the community and technical college forest reserve land base, is managed in perpetuity and in the same manner as state forestlands for sustainable commercial forestry and multiple use of lands consistent with RCW 79.10.120. These lands will also be managed to provide an outdoor education and experience area for organized groups. The lands will provide a source of revenue for the long-term capital improvement needs of the state community and technical college system.

(2) There has been increasing pressure to convert forestlands within areas of the state subject to population growth. Loss of forestland in urbanizing areas reduces the production of forest products and the available supply of open space, watershed protection, habitat, and recreational opportunities. The land known as the community and technical college forest reserve land base is forever reserved from sale. However, the timber and other products on the land may be sold, or the land may be leased in the same manner and for the same purposes as authorized for state granted lands if the department finds the sale or lease to be in the best interest of this forest reserve land base and approves the terms and conditions of the sale or lease.

(3) The land exchange and acquisition powers provided in RCW 79.17.020 may be used by the department to reposition land within the community and technical college forest reserve land base consistent with subsection (1) of this section.

(4) By June 30, 2019, the department must exchange land within the community and technical college forest reserve for land of equal value held for the benefit of charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions that is currently leased to certain community and technical colleges under section 1, chapter 168, Laws of 1985 and section 1, chapter 198, Laws of 2004. The department must transfer the community and technical college forest reserve land that the department acquires in the exchange out of the community and technical college forest reserve, and the department must transfer ownership of that land to the state board for community and technical colleges to be managed for educational purposes.

(5) Up to twenty-five percent of the revenue from these lands, as determined by the board, will be deposited in the forest development account to reimburse the forest development account for expenditures from the account for management of these lands.

(((5))) (6) The community college forest reserve account, created under section 310, chapter 16, Laws of 1990 1st ex. sess., is renamed the community and technical college forest reserve account. The remainder of the revenue from these lands must be deposited in the community and technical college forest reserve account. Money in the account may be appropriated by the legislature for the capital improvement needs of the state community and technical college system or to acquire additional forest reserve lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---