BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.51A.--- and 2017 c ... (ESSB 5131) s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Qualifying patients and designated providers((,)) who hold a recognition card and have been entered into the medical marijuana authorization database((,)) may purchase immature plants ((or)), clones, or marijuana seeds from a licensed marijuana producer as defined in RCW 69.50.101. ((Qualifying patients and designated providers may also purchase marijuana seeds from a licensed marijuana producer.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 23, 2017.

--- END ---