BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not prohibit a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 from authorizing the siting of a school serving students residing within urban growth areas outside of urban growth areas in rural areas, and does not prohibit local jurisdictions from extending utilities to serve the rural school, if the following requirements are met:

(1) Any extension of utilities to serve a rural school must be limited to the size and scale needed to support the current and long-term needs of the school, and costs must be borne by the school district;

(2) The land surrounding a new rural school must maintain its rural character and housing density, as specified in the rural element of the existing county comprehensive plan and any related development regulations, or as the plan and regulations are later amended consistent with this chapter;

(3) The school district has made a finding, with the concurrence of the county legislative authority and the legislative authorities of any affected cities, that the district's proposed site is suitable to site the school and any associated recreational facilities and that there is no suitable land within the urban growth areas;

(4) The school district has conducted a total cost analysis of potential school sites including, but not limited to, the costs of land acquisition, school construction, and the extension of utilities to the sites; and

(5) Any impacts associated with the siting of the school are mitigated as required by the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.

--- END ---