BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.220 and 2010 c 8 s 9020 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to rent a motor vehicle of any kind including a motorcycle to any other person unless the latter person is then duly licensed as a vehicle driver for the kind of motor vehicle being rented in this state or, in case of a nonresident, then that he or she is duly licensed as a driver under the laws of the state or country of his or her residence except a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that a motor vehicle driver be licensed((;)).

(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to rent a motor vehicle to another person until he or she has: (a) Inspected the vehicle driver's license of such other person and compared and verified the signature thereon with the signature of such other person written in his or her presence; (b) compared and verified the identity of such other person to a photo on the driver's license; or (c) compared and verified the identity of such other person as indicated on the driver's license using other photo identification in combination with credit or debit card information.

(3) Every person renting a motor vehicle to another person shall keep a record of the ((vehicle)) license plate number of the motor vehicle so rented, the name and address of the person to whom the motor vehicle is rented, the number of the vehicle driver's license of the person renting the vehicle and the date and place when and where such vehicle driver's license was issued. Such record shall be open to inspection by any police officer or anyone acting for the director.

(4) Any person who rents a motor vehicle to another person and does not comply with the requirements of this section may be held liable for negligent entrustment. However, this subsection must not be construed to require any person renting a motor vehicle to confirm the: (a) Validity of the driver's license of the person renting the motor vehicle beyond confirming that the driver's license is facially valid and the signature on the driver's license matches the signature of the person renting the vehicle; (b) identity of the person renting to a photo on the driver's license; or (c) identity of the person renting as indicated on the driver's license by other photo identification in combination with credit or debit card information.

--- END ---