BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2016 c 223 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections 2 through 6 of this act expire June 30, ((2017)) 2019.

Sec. 2. 2016 c 223 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section 14 of this act expires June 30, ((2017)) 2019.

Sec. 3. 2016 c 223 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire June 30, ((2017)) 2019.

Sec. 4. RCW 77.12.712 and 2016 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall create and administer a Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead endorsement program. The program must facilitate continued and, to the maximum extent possible, improved recreational salmon and steelhead selective fishing opportunities on the Columbia river and its tributaries by supplementing the resources available to the department to carry out the scientific monitoring and evaluation, data collection, permitting, reporting, enforcement, and other activities necessary to provide such opportunities. Program funds may not be used to acquire land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---