BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.28.310 and 2015 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from providing retailers branded promotional items which are of nominal value, singly or in the aggregate. Such items include but are not limited to: Trays, lighters, blotters, postcards, pencils, coasters, menu cards, meal checks, napkins, clocks, mugs, glasses, bottles or can openers, corkscrews, matches, printed recipes, shirts, hats, visors, and other similar items. Branded promotional items:

(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or its employees in a manner consistent with its license;

(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the industry member only, except imprinted advertising matter of the industry member can include the logo of a professional sports team which the industry member is licensed to use;

(iii) May be provided by industry members only to retailers and their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or their employees to retail customers; and

(iv) May not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.

(b) An industry member is not obligated to provide any such branded promotional items, and a retailer may not require an industry member to provide such branded promotional items as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retailer.

(c) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting that the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of this subsection has resulted or is more likely than not to result in undue influence or an adverse impact on public health and safety, or is otherwise inconsistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may file a complaint with the board. Upon receipt of a complaint the board may conduct such investigation as it deems appropriate in the circumstances. If the investigation reveals the provision of branded promotional items has resulted in or is more likely than not to result in undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result in an adverse impact on public health and safety or is otherwise inconsistent with (a) of this subsection the board may issue an administrative violation notice to the industry member, to the retailer, or both. The recipient of the administrative violation notice may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:

(a) An industry member from providing to a special occasion licensee and a special occasion licensee from receiving services for:

(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising;

(ii) Advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or wine tasting exhibition or judging event; or

(iii) Pouring or dispensing of spirits by a licensed domestic distiller or the accredited representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed under RCW 66.24.310; or

(b) Special occasion licensees from paying for beer, wine, or spirits immediately following the end of the special occasion event; or

(c) Wineries, breweries, or distilleries that are participating in a special occasion event from paying reasonable booth fees to the special occasion licensee.

(3) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits industry members from performing, and retailers from accepting the service of building, rotating, and restocking displays and stockroom inventories; rotating and rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products; providing point of sale material and brand signs; pricing case goods of their own brands; and performing such similar business services consistent with board rules, or personal services as described in subsection (5) of this section.

(4) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:

(a) Industry members from listing on their internet web sites information related to retailers who sell or promote their products, including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and

(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information related to industry members whose products those retailers sell or promote, including direct links to the industry members' web sites; or

(c) Industry members and retailers from producing, jointly or together with regional, state, or local industry associations, brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which contain information regarding retail licensees, industry members, and their products.

(5) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate of approval holder to retailers when the personal services are (a) conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform, educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's products. The performance of personal services may include participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other similar informational or educational activities at the premises of a retailer holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or beer restaurant license, a specialty wine shop license, a special occasion license, a grocery store license with a tasting endorsement, or a private club license. A domestic winery or certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform any such personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a domestic winery or certificate of approval holder to conduct any personal service as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retail licensee, or as a condition for including any product of the domestic winery or certificate of approval holder in any tasting conducted by the licensee. Except as provided in RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder or any distributor.

(6) Nothing in ((this section)) RCW 66.28.305 prohibits wineries, breweries, microbreweries, distillers, craft distilleries, manufacturer's licensees, certificate of approval holders, and retail licensees from identifying the producers on private labels ((authorized under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.360, and 66.24.371)).

(((6))) (7) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from entering into an arrangement with any holder of a sports entertainment facility license or an affiliated business for brand advertising at the licensed facility or promoting events held at the sports entertainment facility as authorized under RCW 66.24.570.

(((7))) (8) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal services offered from time to time by a domestic brewery, microbrewery, or beer certificate of approval holder to grocery store licensees with a tasting endorsement when the personal services are (a) conducted at a licensed premises in conjunction with a tasting event, and (b) intended to inform, educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's products. The performance of personal services may include participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other similar informational or educational activities. A domestic brewery, microbrewery, or beer certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform any such personal services, and a grocery store licensee may not require the performance of any personal service as a condition for including any product in any tasting conducted by the licensee.

(((8))) (9) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an arrangement between a domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.400 to waive a corkage fee.

(((9))) (10) Nothing in this section prohibits professional sports teams who hold a retail liquor license or their agents from accepting bona fide liquor advertising from manufacturers, importers, distributors, or their agents for use in the sporting arena. Professional sports teams who hold a retail liquor license or their agents may license the manufacturer, importer, distributor, or their agents to use the name and trademarks of the professional sports team in their advertising and promotions, under the following conditions:

(a) Such advertising must be paid for by said manufacturer, importer, distributor, or their agent at the published advertising rate or at a reasonable fair market value.

(b) Such advertising may carry with it no express or implied offer on the part of the manufacturer, importer, distributor, or their agent, or promise on the part of the retail licensee whose operation is directly or indirectly part of the sporting arena, to stock or list any particular brand of liquor to the total or partial exclusion of any other brand.

(((10))) (11) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits a licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery from providing branded promotional items which are of nominal value, singly or in the aggregate, to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code as it existed on July 24, 2015, for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption.

(12) Beer, wine, or spirits private label items may be produced, distributed, or sold by any person to the same extent that person is otherwise properly licensed to produce, distribute, or sell beer, wine, or spirits generally.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.140 and 2017 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is a license to distillers, including blending, rectifying, and bottling; fee two thousand dollars per annum, unless provided otherwise as follows:

(a) For distillers producing one hundred fifty thousand gallons or less of spirits with at least half of the raw materials used in the production grown in Washington, the license fee must be reduced to one hundred dollars per annum;

(b) The board must license stills used and to be used solely and only by a commercial chemist for laboratory purposes, and not for the manufacture of liquor for sale, at a fee of twenty dollars per annum;

(c) The board must license stills used and to be used solely and only for laboratory purposes in any school, college, or educational institution in the state, without fee; and

(d) The board must license stills that have been duly licensed as fruit and/or wine distilleries by the federal government, used and to be used solely as fruit and/or wine distilleries in the production of fruit brandy and wine spirits, at a fee of two hundred dollars per annum.

(2) Any distillery licensed under this section may:

(a) Sell spirits of its own production for consumption off the premises. A distillery selling spirits under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers;

(b) Contract distilled spirits for, and sell contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers' licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export; and

(c) Provide samples subject to the following conditions:

(i) For the purposes of this subsection, the maximum amount of alcohol per person per day is two ounces;

(ii) Provide free or for a charge one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of its own production to persons on the premises of the distillery. Spirits samples may be adulterated with nonalcoholic mixers, mixers with alcohol of the distiller's own production, water, and/or ice;

(iii) Sell adulterated samples of spirits of their own production, water, and/or ice to persons on the premises at the distillery; ((and))

(iv) Every person who participates in any manner in the service of these samples must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit; and

(v) Produce and sell spirits carrying a private label exclusive to a restaurant or private club holding a license under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, or 66.24.450, or a spirits retail licensee holding a license under RCW 66.24.630.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.145 and 2015 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any craft distillery may sell spirits of its own production for consumption off the premises.

(b) A craft distillery selling spirits under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers.

(2) Any craft distillery may contract distilled spirits for, and sell contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers' licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export.

(3) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may provide, free or for a charge, one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of its own production to persons on the premises of the distillery. The maximum total per person per day is two ounces. Every person who participates in any manner in the service of samples must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit. Spirits samples may be adulterated with nonalcoholic mixers, water, and/or ice.

(4)(a) A distillery or craft distillery licensee may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell spirits of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.

(b) For each month during which a distillery or craft distillery will sell spirits at a qualifying farmers market, the distillery or craft distillery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled spirits may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the spirits may be offered for sale at a qualifying farmers market.

(c) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the distillery or craft distillery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection do not include tasting or sampling privileges. The distillery or craft distillery may not store spirits at a farmers market beyond the hours that the bottled spirits are offered for sale. The distillery or craft distillery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.

(d) Before a distillery or craft distillery may sell bottled spirits at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any distillery or craft distillery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to sell bottled spirits at retail at the farmers market. This application must include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved distillery or craft distillery may sell bottled spirits; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled spirits may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved distillery or craft distillery to sell bottled spirits at retail at its farmers market location, the board must notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (4)(d) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.

(e) For the purposes of this subsection (4), "qualifying farmers market" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.170.

(5) The board must adopt rules to implement the alcohol server permit requirement and may adopt additional rules to implement this section.

(6) Distilling is an agricultural practice.

(7) A craft distillery may produce and sell spirits carrying a private label exclusive to a restaurant or private club holding a license under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, or 66.24.450, or a spirits retail licensee holding a license under RCW 66.24.630.

Sec. 4. RCW 66.24.150 and 1997 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license to manufacturers of liquor, including all kinds of manufacturers except those licensed as distillers, domestic brewers, microbreweries, wineries, and domestic wineries, authorizing such licensees to manufacture, import, sell, and export liquor from the state; fee five hundred dollars per annum.

(2) A licensee manufacturing spirits pursuant to this section may produce and sell spirits carrying a private label exclusive to a restaurant or private club holding a license under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, or 66.24.450, or a spirits retail licensee holding a license under RCW 66.24.630.

Sec. 5. RCW 66.24.055 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is a license for spirits distributors to (a) sell spirits purchased from manufacturers, distillers, or suppliers including, without limitation, licensed Washington distilleries, licensed spirits importers, other Washington spirits distributors, or suppliers of foreign spirits located outside of the United States, to spirits retailers including, without limitation, spirits retail licensees, special occasion license holders, interstate common carrier license holders, restaurant spirits retailer license holders, spirits, beer, and wine private club license holders, hotel license holders, sports entertainment facility license holders, and spirits, beer, and wine nightclub license holders, and to other spirits distributors; and (b) export the same from the state.

(2) By January 1, 2012, the board must issue spirits distributor licenses to all applicants who, upon December 8, 2011, have the right to purchase spirits from a spirits manufacturer, spirits distiller, or other spirits supplier for resale in the state, or are agents of such supplier authorized to sell to licensees in the state, unless the board determines that issuance of a license to such applicant is not in the public interest.

(3)(a) As limited by (b) of this subsection and subject to (c) of this subsection, each spirits distributor licensee must pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee calculated as follows:

(i) In each of the first twenty-seven months of licensure, ten percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made during the month for which the fee is due, respectively; and

(ii) In the twenty-eighth month of licensure and each month thereafter, five percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made during the month for which the fee is due, respectively.

(b) The fee required under this subsection (3) is calculated only on sales of items which the licensee was the first spirits distributor in the state to have received:

(i) In the case of spirits manufactured in the state, from the distiller; or

(ii) In the case of spirits manufactured outside the state, from an authorized out-of-state supplier.

(c) By March 31, 2013, all persons holding spirits distributor licenses on or before March 31, 2013, must have paid collectively one hundred fifty million dollars or more in spirits distributor license fees. If the collective payment through March 31, 2013, totals less than one hundred fifty million dollars, the board must, according to rules adopted by the board for the purpose, collect by May 31, 2013, as additional spirits distributor license fees the difference between one hundred fifty million dollars and the actual receipts, allocated among persons holding spirits distributor licenses at any time on or before March 31, 2013, ratably according to their spirits sales made during calendar year 2012. Any amount by which such payments exceed one hundred fifty million dollars by March 31, 2013, must be credited to future license issuance fee obligations of spirits distributor licensees according to rules adopted by the board.

(d) A retail licensee selling for resale must pay a distributor license fee under the terms and conditions in this section on resales of spirits the licensee has purchased on which no other distributor license fee has been paid. The board must establish rules setting forth the frequency and timing of such payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with payments due quarterly in arrears.

(e) No spirits inventory may be subject to calculation of more than a single spirits distributor license issuance fee.

(4) In addition to the payment set forth in subsection (3) of this section, each spirits distributor licensee renewing its annual license must pay an annual license renewal fee of one thousand three hundred twenty dollars for each licensed location.

(5) There is no minimum facility size or capacity for spirits distributor licenses, and no limit on the number of such licenses issued to qualified applicants. License applicants must provide physical security of the product that is substantially as effective as the physical security of the distribution facilities currently operated by the board with respect to preventing pilferage. License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations promulgated thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing distributor premises licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for spirits distributor licenses.

(6) A distributor licensed under this section must, to the extent it is reasonably practicable for the distributor to do so, make any product the distributor acquires for resale available to any person legally entitled to purchase such product.

Sec. 6. RCW 66.24.200 and 2004 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license for wine distributors to sell wine, purchased from licensed Washington wineries, wine certificate of approval holders, licensed wine importers, or suppliers of foreign wine located outside of the United States, to licensed wine retailers and other wine distributors and to export the same from the state; fee six hundred sixty dollars per year for each distributing unit.

(2) A distributor licensed under this section must, to the extent it is reasonably practicable for the distributor to do so, make any product the distributor acquires for resale available to any person legally entitled to purchase such product.

Sec. 7. RCW 66.24.250 and 2004 c 160 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license for beer distributors to sell beer and strong beer, purchased from licensed Washington breweries, beer certificate of approval holders, licensed beer importers, or suppliers of foreign beer located outside of the United States, to licensed beer retailers and other beer distributors and to export same from the state of Washington; fee six hundred sixty dollars per year for each distributing unit.

(2) A distributor licensed under this section must, to the extent it is reasonably practicable for the distributor to do so, make any product the distributor acquires for resale available to any person legally entitled to purchase such product.

--- END ---