BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.070 (Intangible personal property—Appraisal) and 1997 c 181 s 1, 1974 ex.s. c 118 s 1, & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.070 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---