BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2019-2021 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(2) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2017, from the 2015-2017 biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Spokane Court Facility Upgrade (92000001)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$66,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

WWRP and State Land Acquisition Study (92000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1001, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

(2) $235,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to the Spokane river forum. The department shall not execute a contract with the grant recipient unless the Spokane river forum is in receipt of all permits by March 1, 2018. If the terms and conditions of this subsection are not met by March 1, 2018, the funding provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,187,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (20074009)

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$199,435,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$199,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Development Fund (20084850)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,867,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (30000013)

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$129,895,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$129,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered by the department of commerce.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,447,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund (30000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1026, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$49,523,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program (30000103)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$17,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,896,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,024,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State. . . .$16,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,630,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$38,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000185)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1041, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., provided that the "New Life Community Development Agency" project may be combined with the "New Life CDA" project in project number 30000188. If the department of commerce and the grantee have not executed a contract by September 1, 2018, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,691,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Grants (30000188)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1072, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., provided that the "New Life CDA" project may be combined with the "New Life Community Development Agency" project in project number 30000185. If the department of commerce and the grantee have not executed a contract by September 1, 2018, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,252,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000190)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1070, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$8,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$250,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2013-2015 Energy Efficiency Grants (30000193)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,061,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,415,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$31,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,924,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building for the Arts Program (30000731)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,707,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Youth Recreational Facilities Program (30000792)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1030, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,105,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Building Communities Fund Program (30000803)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1031, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,502,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,859,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Trust Fund Appropriation (30000833)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$59,701,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$62,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,299,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$83,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2015-2017 Community Economic Revitalization Board Program (30000834)

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$10,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000835)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,724,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ultra-Efficient Affordable Housing Demonstration (30000836)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Matchmaker Program (30000838)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,220,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Energy Efficiency Program (30000845)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1039, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,918,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,082,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Housing Improvement Program (30000863)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,536,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 302, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,442,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Sand Point Building 9 (91000446)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1068, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,703,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Mental Health Beds (91000447)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1071, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,671,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1064, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,963,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1065, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (91000582)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,052,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Econ Dev, Innovation & Expo Grants (92000096)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 304, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,340,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$25,774,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$5,368,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,741,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Youth & Families (92000227)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1079, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,327,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$89,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,904,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Behavioral Health Beds - Acute & Residential (92000344)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$38,857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,542,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$88,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,965,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Disaster Emergency Response (92000377)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1074, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$67,687,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$87,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,853,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,147,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cost Effective K-3 Classrooms Assessment (30000053)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$70,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation (30000722)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1088, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,141,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,550,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,691,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,727,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Capitol - Exterior and Interior Repairs (30000724)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$314,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$360,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

West Campus Historic Buildings Exterior Preservation (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Exterior Lighting Upgrades (30000736)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1098, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Furnishings Preservation Committee Projects (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$68,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Critical Network Standardization & Connectivity (30000732)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1093, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

K-3 Modular Classrooms (91000437)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000702)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,584,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,473,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,057,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,541,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program - 2015-2017 Biennium (30000744)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$14,235,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,332,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,567,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,049,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,097,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$865,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,273,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,235,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000010)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,031,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,469,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Acquisition/Rehabilitation of Historic Matsuda and Mukai Sites (91000006)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$118,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall redesign the kitchen and commissary building to account for a reduced client population at western state hospital.

(2) This facility shall house a kitchen, commissary, medical supply, and pharmacy operations to improve operational efficiency at western state hospital and at the special commitment center.

(3) The department shall submit an updated project proposal by October 15, 2017 and return any excess funds.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,190,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School - Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$150,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study & Treatment Center - Orcas: Acute Treatment Addition (30002733)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Building Systems Replacement (30002735)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$3,905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$545,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen - Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$375,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Westlake: Nurse Call System (30002739)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$440,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School: New Acute Mental Health Unit (30002745)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,681,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,031,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Water System: Improvements (30003215)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$575,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - South Hall: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003240)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Wards Preservation & Renewal (30003241)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$245,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: Building Systems Replacement (30003244)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital - Eastlake: Emergency Generator Replacement (30003326)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Western State Hospital (30003388)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH - All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,769,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,369,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (91000037)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Lab Conversion (30000302)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$141,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$5,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000336)

Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$28,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,506,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,875,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Eastern Washington Cemetery Upgrade (30000152)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$640,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,692,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000174)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,120,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,095,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$139,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Roof and Equipment Replacement (30000195)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,748,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Security Video System (30000791)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,568,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Security Video System (30000795)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,143,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Security Video System (30000800)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$599,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Security Video System (30000801)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$631,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: SOU IMU Security Video (30000803)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,265,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: MSU Bathroom Renovation (30000975)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$540,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30001013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,896,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$509,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,044,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Prison Capacity Expansion (30001105)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2059, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,819,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,800,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:

State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water Supply Facilities)—State. . . .$295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,255,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account—State. . . .$8,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,883,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$593,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$99,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,697,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$3,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$88,281,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$624,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$98,276,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$102,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$92,367,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3054, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,013,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$373,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,623,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$5,239,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$757,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$69,113,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. and section 3002, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$1,014,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$549,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,563,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$39,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3003, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$2,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,614,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$22,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$40,521,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3004, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,488,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3005, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$258,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,944,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation (30000278)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$52,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$3,011,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,636,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$135,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,390,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Mercury Switch Removal (30000323)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$362,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$13,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,338,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—Federal. . . .$4,032,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—State. . . .$154,280,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$158,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$91,688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$9,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,007,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000332)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$221,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,834,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$624,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3044, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$9,238,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$122,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$9,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$36,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$2,578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,123,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Tax Bond Water Supply

Development Account—State. . . .$2,194,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$5,463,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,657,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$66,843,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,812,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,288,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$25,385,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,152,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$62,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial Clean Water Program (30000427)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,858,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,852,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000428)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000429)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3010, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,152,000

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$347,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,001,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000431)

Reappropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$9,413,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$487,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$45,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,271,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000490)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,679,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$321,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000534)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

State. . . .$139,671,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$189,671,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$13,329,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$203,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$31,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000536)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$34,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$734,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)

Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$7,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,449,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$12,763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,618,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000587)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3067, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,746,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$254,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3068, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$4,957,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State. . . .$2,189,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$7,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,854,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,053,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,660,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$17,713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,287,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,342,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,942,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,400,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,024,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,525,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$51,528,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$70,053,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,947,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$97,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3069, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,910,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lower Yakima GWMA Program Development (92000085)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$414,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)

Reappropriation:

State Drought Preparedness Account—State. . . .$1,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Treatment Plant (Lakewood) (92000156)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,319,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Tacoma Arkema/Dunlap Mound (92000158)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$803,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,097,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State. . . .$538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,262,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)

Reappropriation:

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving

Account—State. . . .$9,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$950,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$242,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Parking (30000522)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,870,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Road Improvements, Stage 2D (30000693)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,823,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,929,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$708,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,707,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Flaming Geyser State Park Infrastructure (30000810)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$590,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Belfair Replace Failing Electrical Supply to Main Camp Loop (30000813)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000839)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$827,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,098,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facility and Infrastructure Preservation (30000845)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,708,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sequim Bay Address Failing Retaining Wall (30000861)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$182,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Nordic Area Improvements & Horse Camp Development (30000877)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$77,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$182,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Cabins, Yurts, and Associated Park Improvement (30000883)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$523,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructures (30000947)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,008,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,109,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,117,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$41,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation From Harms Way (30000959)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$273,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$111,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$384,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Maintenance Shop Relocate From Center of Hist District (30000960)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$811,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,071,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes - Dry Falls - Upgrade Failing Water Supply Systems (30000962)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Riverside Fisk Property Lk Spokane (Long Lake) Initial Pk Access (30000971)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$932,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$140,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000975)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$445,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$46,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane Guest Services (91000429)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3146, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$96,905,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,949,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$423,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$67,073,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A, developed May 24, 2011.

Reappropriation:

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$1,867,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$2,216,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$4,083,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$37,917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,804,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,269,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,073,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$64,989,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, revised April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,206,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3149, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,575,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3150, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,837,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3161, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$2,080,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$10,072,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$7,344,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$759,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$20,255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$44,745,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$16,250,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,553,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$18,803,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$56,197,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000207)

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$1,197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,166,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$1,162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,838,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,596,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3168, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$642,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,503,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000218)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,881,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-1, developed June 30, 2015.

Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$2,572,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$15,423,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$13,633,000

Riparian Protection Account—State. . . .$3,163,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$34,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$20,532,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$55,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3164, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$36,117,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,493,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$48,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$66,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000222)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3024, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$9,989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,221,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000223)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$9,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,567,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3167, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,302,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000225)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2015-2, developed June 30, 2015.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,897,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000226)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3169, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$27,521,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,479,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,451,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000228)

Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$333,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$247,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,005,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000230)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000231)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$155,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000233)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,408,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,485,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation and Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to purchase replacement properties for Blanchard mountain trust lands core-zone.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$4,108,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,148,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (30000009)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resources Investment for the Economy and Environment (30000010)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program (30000011)

Reappropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$49,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding (30000012)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,062,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$19,600,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,962,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$23,562,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,438,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (30000018)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch & Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3188, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$412,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,522,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

R&D Grant - Deep Furrow Conservation Drill to Conserve Soil/Water (92000008)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3205, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,350,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,900,000

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$19,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$84,612,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$104,362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Renovate Adult Handling Facilities (30000480)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,600,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,600,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$14,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Edmonds Pier Renovation (30000664)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$535,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Marblemount Hatchery - Renovating Jordan Creek Intake (30000666)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,068,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Whatcom Hatchery - Replace Intake and Pipeline (30000667)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$154,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fir Island Farm Estuary Restoration Project (30000673)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$180,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$14,820,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hoodsport Hatchery Adult Pond Renovation (30000686)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Production Shift (30000723)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,570,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000727)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$450,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,628,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,475,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,857,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,864,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$376,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$87,518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$89,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000207)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000224)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3230, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,900,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Blanchard Working Forest (30000231)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2015-2017 Minor Works Preservation (30000238)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,951,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,836,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Contaminated Sites Cleanup and Settlement (30000240)

Reappropriation:

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$95,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$836,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000241)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,815,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (91000040)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,673,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget SoundCorps (91000046)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,954,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,454,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Access Road Reconstruction (30000059)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$140,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Campus Communication Infrastructure Improvement (30000101)

Reappropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$188,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2007-09 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$98,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$747,225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$747,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,995,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$389,439,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$389,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$528,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$530,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$47,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,470,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,517,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (30000091)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$64,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$19,144,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,208,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$87,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,814,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$37,201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,181,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$387,382,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skills Center East Growth (30000159)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$209,100,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$92,767,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$301,867,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$248,519,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$550,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Pilot Program (91000402)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5026, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,262,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (91000404)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5027, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,872,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids - Healthy Schools Grants (91000406)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5014, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,664,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,336,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$269,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,231,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

NEWTECH Skill Center (Spokane Area Professional-Technical) (92000005)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,450,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,638,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite (92000013)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,987,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5028, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$209,571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,929,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$234,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General Campus Preservation (30000088)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5036, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$370,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

School of Nursing Simulation Learning Lab (30000600)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Interprofessional Education Classroom (30000602)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Computer Science and Engineering Expansion (30000603)

Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000604)

Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$23,175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$418,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Reappropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Troy Hall Renovation (20061030)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,500,000

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$27,303,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$32,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2015-17 Minor Works - Preservation (30001188)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$27,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Plant Sciences Building (REC#5) (30000519)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$3,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$350,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Everett University Center (91000026)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$59,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$64,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Inventory and Condition of Schools Data Collection (91000033)

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,391,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,191,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal I (30000506)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,124,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000513)

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,017,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,017,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (30000516)

Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$29,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,957,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$61,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,078,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000684)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,935,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Bouillon Hall Renovation (30000711)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,977,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program (30000723)

Reappropriation:

CWU Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,477,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Lind Hall Renovation (30000738)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Old Heat - Plant Annex (30000767)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Science Center - Lab I Basement Renovation (30000118)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$719,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (30000457)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,195,000

TESC Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$2,217,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,412,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,936,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,348,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program (30000487)

Reappropriation:

TESC Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$725,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,164,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lecture Hall Remodel (30000493)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$719,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$17,142,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$17,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$62,874,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$71,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000615)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,825,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$3,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,856,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,881,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000170)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,348,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Facilities Preservation - Minor Works Projects (30000222)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,534,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington Heritage Grants (30000237)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5099, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,653,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,347,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000038)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$702,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$43,887,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$44,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,258,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$351,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$31,375,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center (20082703)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,339,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (20082704)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$15,531,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building (20082705)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$78,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,974,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,052,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy (30000120)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,465,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,779,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$18,461,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,966,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,142,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,464,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,606,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Dev Center (30000126)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,012,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,588,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,892,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$12,426,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal (30000129)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$24,744,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton Technical College: Automotive Complex Renovation (30000134)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$61,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$16,772,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$16,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,613,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,207,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$7,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,759,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,822,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional - Technical Education Center (30000981)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,047,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5132, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,823,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,564,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,368,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,932,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover Park: Center for Advanced Manufacturing Technologies (30000984)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5140, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,791,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$353,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,144,000

(End of part)

PART 6

SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET

Sec. 6001. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library - Archives Building (30000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign to determine: (a) Necessary program space for the state library currently located in Tumwater, and additional archive space; (b) capital budget requirements, including the use of fees collected by the secretary of state that will support a certificate of participation for the financing of the construction of the facility, and future operating costs; and (c) projected efficiencies of electronic document storage in determining necessary space.

(2) The study must consider the use of the general administration building site as a possible location; and any benefits or consequences may be identified at this site or other sites considered; and lease options.

(3) The office of financial management shall determine the maximum use of the site and consider the consolidation of other state agencies, including separately elected officials.

(4) The building must be a high performance building as described in section 7008 of this act and the construction must be procured using a performance based method including design-build or design-build-operate-maintain.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($400,000))

﻿ $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,428,000

TOTAL. . . .(($55,828,000))

﻿ $55,728,000

Sec. 6002. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Renton Aerospace Training Center (30000724)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3, chapter 1, Laws of 2013 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $1,089,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($10,000,000))

﻿ $1,089,000

Sec. 6003. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 1028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or otherwise increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive bidding processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects;

(b) Require that all expenditures be used for projects that develop and acquire asset that have a useful life of at least thirteen years; and

(c) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require an applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employed by, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of a contract.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a contractor either in procuring or performing under the contract, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the contract by written notice. If the contract is terminated, the department must be entitled to pursue the same remedies against the contractor as it could pursue in the event of a breach of the contract by the contractor.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) The department may not obligate or expend any of the amounts provided in this section on new projects that involve the Snohomish county public utilities district or its subcontractors until the executive ethics board responds to the department's June 17, 2015, request for an advisory opinion on poststate employment.

(6)(a) (($10,000,000)) $16,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that will provide matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The department must select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(d) Loan applications must disclose all sources of public funds invested in the project. The nonprofit lender must make loans available to the following types of projects that include, but are not limited to: Residential, commercial, industrial, and agricultural energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass as a fuel source.

(e) State funds may not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher percentage of nonstate match funds.

(7) (($6,600,000)) $100,000 of the state taxable building construction account is provided solely for credit enhancements of advanced solar and renewable energy manufacturing within Washington state. The department shall develop an application process to competitively select projects.

(8)(a) $13,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to advance clean and renewable energy technologies and advance transmission and distribution control system improvements for increased reliability, resiliency, and enabling integration of distributed and renewable resources and technology by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) The department shall convene an advisory panel of electric utility representatives to identify program objectives, near term priorities and long term goals.

(d) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(e) Grant funds must be used for research, development, or demonstration projects that integrate intermittent renewables through energy storage, information technology or other smart grid technologies, dispatch energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use demand response, transactive control, or the thermal properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district energy systems to store energy, reduce transmission congestion or otherwise improve system reliability and resiliency and enable integration of distributed and renewable energy sources.

(9)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for grants to match federal funds or other nonstate funding sources used to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the program. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects including, but not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, advancing bioenergy, developing new lightweight materials, and advancing renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(10) $400,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely for capital funding of competitively selected wood energy conversion projects at public facilities.

(11) The department must report on number and results of projects that receive grants or loans through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor and the legislature, by November 1, 2016.

(12) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved, to the house of representatives technology & economic development committee and the senate energy, environment & telecommunications committee. The report must include these metrics from other states.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$17,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,400,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$40,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$240,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$280,400,000

Sec. 6004. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 1008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) As the most trade dependent state in the nation, the legislature recognizes the significant statewide benefits to be gained from the proposed Asia Pacific cultural center. The multipurpose facility will serve as a needed cultural resource for Washington's Asian and Pacific Islander community; provide affordable housing and educational opportunities; strengthen relations with our Asia-Pacific trading partners; and deliver economic growth as a commercial and tourist destination. The legislature intends to support the development of the project through a grant to be used for project coordination and development of a sustainable financial plan, which the legislature intends as a prerequisite to consideration of any further state capital commitment.

(8) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the 242 home development corporation to develop mental health housing, first and broad, Seattle.

(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Airway Heights Recreational Complex (Airway Heights)

$200,000

Algona Community Center (Algona)

$500,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Ruston)

$200,000

Bellevue Boys & Girls Club (Bellevue)

$200,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center (Vancouver)

$750,000

Central Alarm System (Cook)

$1,000

Chehalis Boys & Girls Club New Facility (Chehalis)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Entrance (Yacolt)

$200,000

Chelatchie Prairie RR Museum & Building Maintenance (Yacolt)

$300,000

Coastal Resiliency Project (Ocean Shores)

$200,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation (DuPont)

$21,000

Edmonds Veterans Plaza (Edmonds)

$77,000

Ellensburg Train Station (Ellensburg)

$400,000

Evergreen Pool Improvements (White Center)

$90,000

Fort Steilacoom Park (pave and stripe parking lot) (Lakewood)

$257,000

Goldendale Senior Center (Goldendale)

$155,000

Grays Harbor Gateway Center (Aberdeen)

$550,000

Historic Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia)

$250,000

Historic Ship Preservation Project (Bremerton)

$300,000

Holocaust Center for Humanity (Seattle)

$200,000

Kingston Green Community Village (Kingston)

$85,000

Kitsap Peninsula Water Trails (Multiple, along peninsula)

$52,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens)

$309,000

Lyle Activity Center Restoration (Lyle)

$270,000

Mason County Veterans Shelter / Housing (Shelton)

$206,000

Meals on Wheels Kitchen and Café Equipment (Richland)

$206,000

Mental Health Housing, First and ((Denny)) Broad (Seattle)

$500,000

Mill Creek Parks and Public Works Shop (Mill Creek)

$257,000

Mother Joseph Academy Roof Replacement (Vancouver)

$1,000,000

Parkland Prairie Nature Preserve (Parkland)

$30,000

Pasco Early Learning Center (Pasco)

$300,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden)

$400,000

Performing Arts & Event Center (Federal Way)

$52,000

Port of Sunnyside Demolish Carnation Building (Sunnyside)

$100,000

RAC-Covered Bleachers Project (Lacey)

$26,000

Riverwalk Trail Phase VI (Puyallup)

$500,000

Scott Hill Park of Woodland (Woodland)

$500,000

Shelter and Navigation Center (Seattle)

$600,000

Skagit County Children's Advocacy Center (Mount Vernon)

$318,000

Skyline Community Meeting Space (White Salmon)

$172,000

South Kitsap High School NJROTC (Port Orchard)

$30,000

SR 542 Kendall, Columbia Valley Trail (Kendall)

$77,000

Tenino Depot Museum Roof (Tenino)

$22,000

Wesley Homes (Des Moines)

$100,000

Westport Marina Dredging (Westport)

$200,000

Total

$11,363,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,363,000

Sec. 6005. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3187 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Nutrient Demonstration Low Interest Loans (92000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for low interest loans for two or more dairy nutrient management demonstration projects, with at least one located west of the cascades and one east of the cascades.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))

﻿ $0

Sec. 6006. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3188 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation Commission Ranch and Farmland Preservation Projects (92000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of ranch land preservation projects:

Lust family farm and ranch preservation. . . .(($1,619,000))

$2,210,000

Imrie ranches Rock creek agricultural easement. . . .$4,913,000

Kelley ranches agricultural easement. . . .(($2,316,000))

$55,000

Dungeness watershed farmland protection phase 3. . . .$344,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($9,192,000))

﻿ $7,522,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($9,192,000))

﻿ $7,522,000

Sec. 6007. 2016 sp.s c 35 s 2011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New Civil Ward (92000022)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($450,000))

﻿ $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($450,000))

﻿ $0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

Sec. 6009. 2016 sp.s c 35 s 3018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low Interest Loans for Drought Wells (92000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall establish a low-interest loan program to allow agricultural or public entities to drill or retrofit wells to mitigate the effects of drought. For loans that are repaid within five years, the interest rate must be thirty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index, and for loans that are repaid between five and twenty years, the rate must be sixty percent of the average rate for twenty year municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer index. A well that is funded by this program may be operated only during a drought declaration.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010. A new section is added to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCCCW: Critical DNR Replacement Space (30001170)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$375,000

Sec. 6011. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3198 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($500,000))

﻿ $93,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($11,722,000))

﻿ $13,222,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,222,000))

﻿ $13,315,000

Sec. 6012. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3200 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($250,000))

﻿ $105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($7,948,000))

﻿ $8,948,000

TOTAL. . . .(($8,198,000))

﻿ $9,053,000

Sec. 6013. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 3202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

((Nasselle)) Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($275,000))

﻿ $132,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($13,556,000))

﻿ $17,056,000

TOTAL. . . .(($13,831,000))

﻿ $17,188,000

Sec. 6014. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (90000301)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($7,000,000))

﻿ $6,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($7,000,000))

﻿ $6,662,000

Sec. 6015. RCW 70.340.130 and 2016 c 161 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On July 1, 2016, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars, up to a transfer of ten million dollars, from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. If ten million dollars is not available to be transferred on July 1, 2016, then by the end of fiscal year 2017, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. The total amount transferred in fiscal year 2017 from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account may not exceed ten million dollars.

(2) On July 1, 2017, and every two years thereafter at the start of each successive biennium, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), up to a transfer of twenty million dollars, from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. If twenty million dollars is not available to be transferred at the beginning of the first fiscal year of the biennium, ((on July 1st)) by the end of the subsequent fiscal year, if the cash balance amount in the pollution liability insurance program trust account exceeds seven million five hundred thousand dollars after excluding the reserves under RCW 70.148.020(2), the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account. The total amount transferred in a biennium from the pollution liability insurance program trust account into the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account may not exceed twenty million dollars.

Sec. 6016. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account. . . .$24,000,000

Local toxics control account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account. . . .$30,000,000

(1) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(2) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts from the cleanup settlement account established in RCW 70.105D.130 to the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account or the environmental legacy stewardship account to maintain positive account balances up to an amount not to exceed $23,000,000 that must be considered an ((inter fund)) interfund loan that must be repaid with interest to the cleanup settlement account in three equal repayments in fiscal years ((2019,)) 2020, ((and)) 2021, and 2022.

(3) If, after using the ((inter-fund)) interfund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of clean-up projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, or need to ensure geographic distribution.

(4) By June 30, 2017, the department must submit a list of projects that were delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions, may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. For facilities with an area of 5,000 square feet or greater, the results of a life-cycle cost analysis of building systems must be a primary consideration in the selection of a building design. Construction may proceed only upon providing to the office of financial management the life-cycle costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be determined by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. (1) Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(a) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Considers all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(b) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(c) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, reduce the energy use by fifty percent below prerenovations baseline.

(d) On-site renewable energy: Meet at least thirty percent of the hot water demand through the installation of solar hot water heaters, when life-cycle cost effective. Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(e) Measurement and verification: Install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(f) Benchmarking: Compare actual performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool for laboratory buildings. Web-based data collection and dashboards must also be provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---