BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.95.020 and 2016 c 69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Academic year" means the regular nine-month, three-quarter, or two-semester period annually occurring between August 1st and July 31st.

(2) "Account" means the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account established for the deposit of all money received by the office from eligible purchasers and interest earnings on investments of funds in the account, as well as for all expenditures on behalf of eligible beneficiaries for the redemption of tuition units and for the development of any authorized college savings program pursuant to RCW 28B.95.150.

(3) "Advisor sold" means a channel through which a broker dealer, investment advisor, or other financial intermediary recommends the Washington college savings program established pursuant to RCW 28B.95.010 to eligible investors and assists with the opening and servicing of individual college savings program accounts.

(4) "College savings program account" means the Washington college savings program account established pursuant to RCW ((28B.95.010)) 28B.95.085.

(5)(a) "Committee on advanced tuition payment and college savings" or "committee" means a committee of the following members:

(i) The state treasurer((,)) or the state treasurer's designee;

(ii) The director of ((the office of)) financial management((,)) or the director's designee;

(iii) The director of the office((,)) or ((their)) the director's designee((s,));

(iv) Two ex officio members representing each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by the majority and minority leaders of their respective caucuses, with at least one member from each caucus a member of the house of representatives appropriations committee and at least one member from each caucus a member of the house of representatives higher education committee;

(v) Two ex officio members representing each of the two largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the majority and minority leaders of their respective caucuses, with at least one member from each caucus a member of the senate ways and means committee and at least one member from each caucus a member of the senate higher education committee; and

(vi) Two citizen members to be appointed by the governor, ((one representing)) with the consent of the senate. One of the citizen members must represent program participants and ((one)) the other must represent private business ((representative)) with marketing, public relations, or financial expertise. By December 31, 2018, the governor must appoint two new members to the committee. The two new members appointed pursuant to this subsection (5)(a)(vi) shall each serve a four-year term from the date of his or her appointment.

(b) Five voting members of the committee constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the term, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment and the successor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term.

(c) The committee shall appoint its own chair and vice chair. The chair and vice chair must be legislative members and may not represent the same political party or the same chamber.

(6) "Contractual obligation" means a legally binding contract of the state with the purchaser and the beneficiary establishing that purchases of tuition units in the advanced college tuition payment program will be worth the same number of tuition units at the time of redemption as they were worth at the time of the purchase, except as provided in RCW 28B.95.030(7).

(7) "Dual credit fees" means any fees charged to a student for participation in college in the high school under RCW 28A.600.290 or running start under RCW 28A.600.310.

(8) "Eligible beneficiary" means the person designated as the individual whose education expenses are to be paid from the advanced college tuition payment program or the college savings program. Qualified organizations, as allowed under section 529 of the federal internal revenue code, purchasing tuition unit contracts as future scholarships need not designate a beneficiary at the time of purchase.

(9) "Eligible contributor" means an individual or organization that contributes money for the purchase of tuition units, and for an individual college savings program account established pursuant to this chapter for an eligible beneficiary.

(10) "Eligible purchaser" means an individual or organization that has entered into a tuition unit contract with the governing body for the purchase of tuition units in the advanced college tuition payment program for an eligible beneficiary, or that has entered into a participant college savings program account contract for an eligible beneficiary. The state of Washington may be an eligible purchaser for purposes of purchasing tuition units to be held for granting Washington college bound scholarships.

(11) "Full-time tuition charges" means resident tuition charges at a state institution of higher education for enrollments between ten credits and eighteen credit hours per academic term.

(12) "Governing body" means the committee empowered by the legislature to administer the Washington advanced college tuition payment program and the Washington college savings program.

(13) "Individual college savings program account" means the formal record of transactions relating to a Washington college savings program beneficiary.

(14) "Institution of higher education" means an institution that offers education beyond the secondary level and is recognized by the internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code.

(15) "Investment board" means the state investment board as defined in chapter 43.33A RCW.

(16) "Investment manager" means the state investment board, another state, or any other entity as selected by the governing body, including another college savings plan established pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code.

(17) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance as defined in chapter 28B.76 RCW.

(18) "Owner" means the eligible purchaser or the purchaser's successor in interest who shall have the exclusive authority to make decisions with respect to the tuition unit contract or the individual college savings program contract. The owner has exclusive authority and responsibility to establish and change the asset investment options for a beneficiaries' individual college savings program account.

(19) "Participant college savings program account contract" means a contract to participate in the Washington college savings program between an eligible purchaser and the office.

(20) "State institution of higher education" means institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(21) "Tuition and fees" means undergraduate tuition and services and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 rounded to the nearest whole dollar. For purposes of this chapter, services and activities fees do not include fees charged for the payment of bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or installing any lands, buildings, or facilities.

(22) "Tuition unit contract" means a contract between an eligible purchaser and the governing body, or a successor agency appointed for administration of this chapter, for the purchase of tuition units in the advanced college tuition payment program for a specified beneficiary that may be redeemed at a later date for an equal number of tuition units, except as provided in RCW 28B.95.030(7).

(23) "Unit purchase price" means the minimum cost to purchase one tuition unit in the advanced college tuition payment program for an eligible beneficiary. Generally, the minimum purchase price is one percent of the undergraduate tuition and fees for the current year, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, adjusted for the costs of administration and adjusted to ensure the actuarial soundness of the account. The analysis for price setting shall also include, but not be limited to consideration of past and projected patterns of tuition increases, program liability, past and projected investment returns, and the need for a prudent stabilization reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 28B.95.170 (Legislative advisory committee) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 12 s 6 are each repealed.

--- END ---