BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1) To facilitate public inspection of state collective bargaining agreements, the office of financial management must maintain a web site that is accessible to the public of all agreements collectively bargained with state employees under the authority of chapters 28B.52, 41.56, 41.76, 41.80, and 47.64 RCW. In addition, the web site must contain all agreements collectively bargained with persons who are state employees solely for the purpose of collective bargaining under RCW 41.56.026, 41.56.028, 41.56.029, 41.56.473, 41.56.510, and 74.39A.270. Tentatively agreed to collective bargaining agreements must be posted to the web site in a searchable format within forty-five days of being submitted to the office of financial management. Revisions and modification to agreements must be posted to the web site within fifteen days of the agreement being signed by both parties.

(2) To facilitate public understanding of state collective bargaining agreements, the office of financial management must prepare a summary of each agreement subject to subsection (1) of this section for posting on the web site by December 20th of the year in which the agreement was negotiated, but no later than the date that the governor submits a request for funding to the legislature. The summary must identify the following information for each agreement:

(a) The term of the agreement;

(b) The bargaining units covered by the agreement by state agency;

(c) Base compensation;

(d) Provisions for and rate of overtime pay;

(e) Provisions for and rate of compensatory time;

(f) Provisions for and rate of any other compensation including, but not limited to, shift premium pay, on-call pay, stand-by pay, assignment pay, special pay, or employer-provided housing or meals;

(g) Provisions for and rate of pay for each paid leave provision;

(h) Provisions for and rate of pay for any cash out provisions for compensatory time or paid leave;

(i) Temporary layoff provision;

(j) Any impasse procedure subject to bargaining;

(k) Health care benefits provisions expressed as a percentage of cost or as a dollar amount, or in the case of contributions to a third-party benefit fund, the hourly contribution rate to the fund;

(l) Any retirement benefit subject to bargaining, or in the case of contributions to a third-party benefit fund, the hourly contribution rate to the fund;

(m) For compensation or fringe benefits with an anticipated cost of fifty thousand dollars or more, a brief description of each component and its cost that comprises the amount funded by the legislature to implement in accordance with RCW 41.80.010(3);

(n) Number of bargaining unit members covered by the agreement as of the date submitted to the office of financial management;

(o) Content of any agency-specific supplemental agreements affecting (a) through (m) of this subsection; and

(p) Any contract provisions that allow the contract to be reopened during the contract term.

(3) For collective bargaining agreements negotiated by institutions of higher education, the institution of higher education must:

(a) Provide the office of financial management with a searchable version of the tentatively agreed to collective bargaining agreements to be posted on the web site identified in subsection (1) of this section to within forty days of submitting the agreements to the office of financial management.

(b) Submit revisions and modifications to agreements to the office of financial management to be posted to the web site identified in subsection (1) of this section within ten days of the agreement being signed by both parties.

(c) Submit a summary of each agreement to the office of financial management by December 10th of the year in which a master agreement was negotiated or within fifteen days of a contract revision. The summary must include the information identified in subsection (2)(a) through (p) of this section.

(4) The office of financial management must also include on the web site any additional information identified in budget instructions developed by the office of financial management or that is otherwise required under RCW 43.88.030.

(5) Information on the web site may include links to salary schedules, pay ranges, and other information on state or federal agency web sites to summarize information. Information may include links to specific language within an agreement to summarize information.

(6) By January 1, 2018, the information under this section must be incorporated into the state expenditure information web site maintained by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee under RCW 44.48.150.

(7) The summaries of collective bargaining agreements created under this section must not disclose personally identifiable information of any bargaining unit member.

(8) The summaries of collective bargaining agreements created under this section have no legal effect on the interpretation of the agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A joint committee on employment relations is established, composed of the following members:

(a) Two members with leadership positions in the house of representatives, representing each of the two largest caucuses;

(b) The chair and ranking minority member of the house appropriations committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses;

(c) Two members with leadership positions in the senate, representing each of the two largest caucuses;

(d) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses; and

(e) One nonvoting member, appointed by the governor, representing the office of financial management.

(2) The committee shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson.

(3) The governor or a designee shall convene meetings of the committee. The committee must meet at least six times, generally every two months, for the purpose of consulting with the governor or the governor's designee and institutions of higher education on matters related to collective bargaining with state employees conducted under the authority of this chapter and chapters 41.56, 47.64, and 74.39A RCW. The governor or the governor's designee or the institution of higher education may not share internal bargaining notes.

(4) In years when master collective bargaining agreements are negotiated, the committee must meet prior to the start of bargaining to identify goals and objectives for public employee collective bargaining that the governor may take into consideration during negotiations.

(5) One meeting must be convened following the governor's budget submittal to the legislature to consult with the committee regarding the appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreements and to advise the committee on the elements of the agreements and on any legislation necessary to implement the agreements.

(6) The committee shall, by a majority of the members, adopt rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate, including reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the committee, ensuring reasonable advance notice of each meeting, and providing for the right of the public to attend each such meeting with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and confidential information used or to be used in collective bargaining, including the specific details of bargaining proposals.

(7) The committee may, by a majority of the members, meet more or less frequently. A quorum of the joint committee is not required for the meeting to take place. Meetings may take place by conference telephone or similar communications equipment so that all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time. Participation by that method constitutes presence in person at a meeting.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.80.010 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 923 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of negotiating collective bargaining agreements under this chapter, the employer shall be represented by the governor or governor's designee, except as provided for institutions of higher education in subsection (4) of this section.

(2)(a) If an exclusive bargaining representative represents more than one bargaining unit, the exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate with each employer representative as designated in subsection (1) of this section one master collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive bargaining representative represents. For those exclusive bargaining representatives who represent fewer than a total of five hundred employees each, negotiation shall be by a coalition of all those exclusive bargaining representatives. The coalition shall bargain for a master collective bargaining agreement covering all of the employees represented by the coalition. The governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of agency-specific issues for inclusion in or as an addendum to the master collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining. This section does not prohibit cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more exclusive bargaining representatives.

(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to exclusive bargaining representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher education, except when the institution of higher education has elected to exercise its option under subsection (4) of this section to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(c) If five hundred or more employees of an independent state elected official listed in RCW 43.01.010 are organized in a bargaining unit or bargaining units under RCW 41.80.070, the official shall be consulted by the governor or the governor's designee before any agreement is reached under (a) of this subsection concerning supplemental bargaining of agency specific issues affecting the employees in such bargaining unit.

(3) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the provisions of bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(a) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(b) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 41.80.090.

(4)(a)(i) For the purpose of negotiating agreements for institutions of higher education, the employer shall be the respective governing board of each of the universities, colleges, or community colleges or a designee chosen by the board to negotiate on its behalf.

(ii) A governing board of a university or college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section, except that:

(A) The governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of a university or college that the representative represents; or

(B) If the parties mutually agree, the governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of more than one university or college that the representative represents.

(iii) A governing board of a community college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

(b) Prior to entering into negotiations under this chapter, the institutions of higher education or their designees shall consult with the director of the office of financial management regarding financial and budgetary issues that are likely to arise in the impending negotiations.

(c)(i) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between institutions of higher education other than the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the bargaining agreements, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.

(ii) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of a bargaining agreement, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in this subsection (4)(c)(ii) and as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.

(A) If appropriations of less than ten thousand dollars are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered.

(B) If appropriations of ten thousand dollars or more are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request:

(I) Has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered; and

(II) Has been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

(C) If the director of the office of financial management does not certify a request under (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection as being feasible financially for the state, the parties shall enter into collective bargaining solely for the purpose of reaching a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement necessary to address the absence of those requested funds. The legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the modified collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(iii) In the case of a bargaining unit of employees of institutions of higher education in which the exclusive bargaining representative is certified during or after the conclusion of a legislative session, the legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the unit's initial collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.

(5) ((There is hereby created a joint committee on employment relations, which consists of two members with leadership positions in the house of representatives, representing each of the two largest caucuses; the chair and ranking minority member of the house appropriations committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses; two members with leadership positions in the senate, representing each of the two largest caucuses; and the chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses. The governor shall periodically consult with the committee regarding appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreements, and upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements of the agreements and on any legislation necessary to implement the agreements.

(6))) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

(((7))) (6) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(((8))) (7) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, a collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits negotiated between the employer and coalition pursuant to RCW 41.80.020(3) regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee shall be a separate agreement for which the governor may request funds necessary to implement the agreement. The legislature may act upon a 2013-2015 collective bargaining agreement related to employee health care benefits if an agreement is reached and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

(((9))) (8)(a) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the governor may request funds to implement:

(i) Modifications to collective bargaining agreements as set forth in a memorandum of understanding negotiated between the employer and the service employees international union healthcare 1199nw, an exclusive bargaining representative, that was necessitated by an emergency situation or an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety or health of the clients, employees, or both the clients and employees.

(ii) Unilaterally implemented modifications to collective bargaining agreements, resulting from the employer being prohibited from negotiating with an exclusive bargaining representative due to a pending representation petition, necessitated by an emergency situation or an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety or health of the clients, employees, or both the clients and employees.

(iii) Modifications to collective bargaining agreements as set forth in a memorandum of understanding negotiated between the employer and the union of physicians of Washington, an exclusive bargaining representative, that was necessitated by an emergency situation or an imminent jeopardy determination by the center for medicare and medicaid services that relates to the safety or health of the clients, employees, or both the clients and employees. If the memorandum of understanding submitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document is rejected by the legislature, and the parties reach a new memorandum of understanding by June 30, 2016, within the funds, conditions, and limitations provided in section 204, chapter 36, Laws of 2016 sp. sess., the new memorandum of understanding shall be considered approved by the legislature and may be retroactive to December 1, 2015.

(iv) Modifications to collective bargaining agreements as set forth in a memorandum of understanding negotiated between the employer and the teamsters union local 117, an exclusive bargaining representative, for salary adjustments for the state employee job classifications of psychiatrist, psychiatric social worker(([,])), and psychologist.

(b) For the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may act upon the request for funds for modifications to a 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreement under (a)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection if funds are requested by the governor before final legislative action on the supplemental omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.

(c) The request for funding made under this subsection and any action by the legislature taken pursuant to this subsection is limited to the modifications described in this subsection and may not otherwise affect the original terms of the 2015-2017 collective bargaining agreement.

(d) ((Subsections [Subsection])) Subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to requests for funding made pursuant to this subsection.

--- END ---