BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 4.20.020 and 2011 c 336 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

Every such action shall be for the benefit of the wife, husband, state registered domestic partner, child or children, including stepchildren, of the person whose death shall have been so caused. If there be no wife, husband, state registered domestic partner, or such child or children, such action may be maintained for the benefit of the parents, sisters, or brothers, who may be dependent upon the deceased person for support((, and who are resident within the United States at the time of his or her death)).

In every such action the jury may give such damages as, under all circumstances of the case, may to them seem just.

--- END ---