BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 28 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(2) ((Part I)) Sections 101 through 106 of this act ((is)) are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take((s)) effect August 1, 2017.

(3) Section 213 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 23, 2017.

(4) Part III of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2017.

(5) Sections 107 through 109 and 502 of this act take((s)) effect January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---