BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2019, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2018" or "FY 2018" means the period beginning July 1, 2017, and ending June 30, 2018.

(b) "Fiscal year 2019" or "FY 2019" means the period beginning July 1, 2018, and ending June 30, 2019.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2019-2021 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2017, from previous biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS

Division III Roof Replacement and Maintenance (30000003)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

Capital Budget Staffing Study (92000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the appropriation in this section, or as much thereof as may be needed, is provided solely for a study of staff funded by capital budget appropriations. The study must address, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The number of full time equivalent state employees funded by:

(a) Direct capital budget appropriations for capital program administration;

(b) Funds used for administration of grants and loans;

(c) Grants and loans for capital projects; and

(d) Any other capital budget appropriation;

(2) The number of full time equivalent state employees funded through bonds; and

(3) The number of full time equivalent state employees funded through other sources.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Library - Archives Building (30000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for design. The design of the facility must consider the state printer remaining at the current location, or the design of the facility at a new location.

(2) All capital budget expenses, less current and previous appropriations, must be financed with a certificate of participation or other financing method fully supported using fees collected by the secretary of state. The secretary of state may consider the adjustment of fees, including the heritage center account, to support construction, future operating costs, and projected efficiencies of electronic document storage in determining necessary space, must be developed for construction funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Ballot Boxes (91000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants for distressed rural counties that have difficulty implementing chapter 327, Laws of 2017 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5472). Grants must be administered to counties at no more than $1,000 per location by the secretary of state.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Appropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$8,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$5,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$13,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $58,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $44,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and $5,370,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $24,370,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively. The grants may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than fifteen years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent area median income.

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(c) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people at or below 80 percent of the area median income who have been displaced by a natural disaster declared by the governor, including people who have been displaced within the last two biennia.

(d) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the communities of concern commission to focus on creating capital assets that will help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities using the communities' cultural understanding and vision. The funding must be used for predevelopment costs for capital projects identified by the commission and for other activities to assist communities in developing capacity to create community-owned capital assets.

(e) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for a nonprofit, public development authority, local government, or housing authority to purchase the south annex properties located at 1531 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 Pine street owned by the state board of community and technical colleges. The property must be used to provide services and housing for homeless youth.

(f) $21,987,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(i) Cross Laminated Timber Spokane Housing Predesign. . . .$500,000

(ii) El Centro de la Raza. . . .$737,000

(iii) Highland Village Preservation. . . .$1,500,000

(iv) King County Modular Housing Project. . . .$3,000,000

(v) Nisqually Tribal Housing. . . .$1,250,000

(vi) Othello Homesight Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(vii) $6,000,000 is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing, and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a twenty-five year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting. Mental health and substance abuse counseling services must be offered to residents of housing projects supported by appropriations in this subsection.

(viii) $6,000,000 is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: $3,000,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for a King county housing project.

(g) Of the amounts appropriated remaining after (a) through (e) of this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(ii) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(iii) 5 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities;

(iv) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, and seniors.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$44,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$58,000,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .$5,370,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$106,770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$506,770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants (30000873)

Appropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State. . . .$6,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (30000875)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Cocoon House (Colby Avenue Youth Center). . . .$438,000

Boys and Girls Club of Chehalis (Growing Places Farm

and Energy Park). . . .$200,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of Snohomish County (Lake Stevens

Boys & Girls Club Teen Center Expansion). . . .$120,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of Southwest Washington (Teen

Expansion at the Clinton & Gloria John Club). . . .$328,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of Snohomish County (Arlington

Boys & Girls Club Expansion). . . .$99,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of the Olympic Peninsula

(Port Angeles Boys & Girls Club). . . .$1,000,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of South Puget Sound

(Eastside Branch). . . .$1,200,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle (Kent YMCA Youth

Recreational Facilities Grant). . . .$1,170,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle (Auburn Valley YMCA Youth

Recreational Facilities Grant). . . .$763,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle (University YMCA Youth

Recreational Facilities Grant). . . .$1,114,000

Friends of Lopez Island Pool (Lopez Island Pool). . . .$175,000

Spokane Valley HUB (HUB Capital Campaign). . . .$300,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,907,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$27,628,000

TOTAL. . . .$34,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building for the Arts Grant Program (30000877)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Town Hall Association (Campaign for Town Hall). . . .$1,520,000

Pacific Northwest Ballet Association (Replacement

PNB School at the Francia Russell Center). . . .$1,520,000

Seattle Art Museum (Asian Art Museum Renovation). . . .$1,520,000

Chewelah PACA (Chewelah Center for the Arts). . . .$97,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle Opera at the Center). . . .$1,520,000

Tacoma Art Museum (Benaroya Building Project). . . .$1,020,000

Fort Worden Foundation (Sage Arts and Education

Building). . . .$1,270,000

Seattle Repertory Theatre (Renovating the PONCHO

Forum). . . .$258,000

Richard Hugo House (Hugo House: Building an Enduring

Home for Words). . . .$1,032,000

Washington Center for the Performing Arts (Theater

and Interior Revitalization). . . .$689,000

Admiral Theatre Foundation (Admiral Theatre

Renovation Part II). . . .$150,000

Pratt Fine Arts Center (Pratt's Campus Expansion). . . .$520,000

Northwest Choirs (Northwest Choirs - Building

for Today and Tomorrow). . . .$75,000

Power House Theatre Walla Walla Inc. (Power House

Theatre Walla Walla Acquisition). . . .$335,000

Delridge Neighborhoods Development Association (DNDA)

(Youngstown Theater & Kitchen Renovation Project). . . .$140,000

iDiOM Theater/Sylvia Center for the Arts (Sylvia Center

for the Arts). . . .$334,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$36,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of public works projects:

180th St SE SR 527 Brook Blvd (Everett). . . .$3,000,000

35th Ave SE Phase II SR 524 to 180th St SE

(Everett). . . .$3,000,000

61st/190th Culvert Replacement & Embankment Repair

(Kenmore). . . .$1,500,000

Automated Meter Reading System (Birch Bay). . . .$1,500,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill North Flare Statn

Repair (Seattle). . . .$1,583,000

Cedar Hills Regional Landfill Pump Station Repairs

(Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

City Street Light Conversion to Light Emitting Diode

(Vancouver). . . .$4,816,000

Fairview Ave N Bridge Replacement (Seattle). . . .$10,000,000

Georgetown Wet Weather Treatment Station (Seattle). . . .$3,500,000

Isaacs Avenue Improvements - Phase 2 (Walla Walla). . . .$3,962,000

Kennewick Automated Meter Reading Project

(Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

Landslide Repairs (Aberdeen). . . .$373,000

McKinnon Creek Wellfield Infrastructure Improvements

(Lake Forest). . . .$200,000

Miller Street Re-Alignment and Storm Repairs

(Wenatchee). . . .$4,826,000

NE 10th Avenue (Vancouver). . . .$10,000,000

Ostrich Creek Culvert Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$4,688,000

Pine Basin Watershed Storm Sewer Improvements

(Bremerton). . . .$3,881,000

Slater Road/Jordan Creek Fish Passage Project

(Bellingham). . . .$5,000,000

South Fork McCorkle Creek Stormwater Detention

Facility (Kelso). . . .$4,700,000

Sudbury Landfill Area 7 Cell 3 Construction

(Walla Walla). . . .$2,978,000

Sunset Reservoir Rehabilitation (Spokane). . . .$1,412,000

Thurston Co. PUD No. 1 Replacement and Upgrades

(Olympia). . . .$1,028,000

Tipping Floor Restoration & Safety Upgrades

(Davenport). . . .$156,000

US 395/Ridgeline Interchange (Kennewick). . . .$6,000,000

Wastewater Reuse Project (Quincy). . . .$10,000,000

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$97,103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$97,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,000,000 is provided solely for lead remediation projects, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) $5,000,000 is provided solely for projects pursuant to chapter 285, Laws of 2017 (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5647), and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose. The department may prioritize rehabilitation projects in coordination with weatherization projects.

(3) $5,000,000 is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners to make sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support via training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$16,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$21,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$101,000,000

Sec. 1012. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003 of this act.

(2) $13,650,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy, and transportation electrification technologies, including electric vehicle charging infrastructure and equipment for cars, trucks, and buses, upgrades to facilitate such as equipment and infrastructure, and acquisition of zero-emission buses and class 4-8 vehicles, including but not limited to trucks and passenger shuttles, now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(3) $3,250,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the Pacific northwest national laboratory to use demand side management and analyze electricity use by the department of corrections. After the analysis is performed, any remaining funds may be used for reducing energy use of the department of corrections. The department must make energy records available.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,061,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,415,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$31,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,924,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(2) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(3)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past twenty-four months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(4) The requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(5) $11,000,000 of the state building construction account, is provided solely for grid modernization grants for projects that advance clean and renewable energy technologies, and transmission and distribution control systems; that support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources, and sustainable microgrids; and that increase utility customer options for energy sources, energy efficiency, energy equipment, and utility services.

(a) Projects must be implemented by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible utilities may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding.

(b) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, allow smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding.

(c) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(6) $7,900,000 of the state building construction account and $3,100,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to demonstrate new approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a) Projects must be implemented by local governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department of commerce must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects the department of transportation is developing and projects funded by the Volkswagen consent decree, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems.

(b) Priorities must be given to eligible technologies that reduce the top two hundred hours of demand and the demand side.

(c) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(i) Electric vehicle and transportation system charging and open source control infrastructure, including inductive charging systems;

(ii) Electric vehicle sharing in low-income, multi-unit housing communities in urban areas;

(iii) Grid-related vehicle electrification, connecting vehicle fleets to grid operations, including school and transit buses;

(iv) Electric vehicle fleet management tools with open source software;

(v) Maritime electrification, such as electric ferries, water taxis, and shore power infrastructure.

(7)(a) $8,600,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies, as needed to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies.

(b) The department shall consult and coordinate with the University of Washington, Washington State University, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory and other clean energy organizations to design the grant program unless the organization prefers to compete for the grants. If the organization prefers to receive grants from the program they may not participate in the consultant process determining how the grant process is structured. The program shall offer matching funds for competitively selected clean energy projects, including but not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, battery components recycling, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies. Criteria for the grant program must include life cycle cost analysis for projects that are part of the competitive process.

(c) $750,000 of this subsection (7) is provided solely for the state efficiency and environmental program.

(8) $8,000,000 of the state taxable construction account is provided solely for scientific instruments to help accelerate research in advanced materials at the proposed science laboratories infrastructure facility at the Pacific Northwest national laboratory. These state funds are contingent on securing federal funds for the new facility, and are provided as match to the federal funding. The instruments will support researchers at the bioproducts sciences and engineering laboratory, the joint center for deployment research in earth abundant materials, the center for advanced materials and clean energy technology, and other energy and materials collaborations with the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(9) $1,600,000 of the state building construction account and $2,400,000 of the energy efficiency account are provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds for the deployment of solar projects located in Washington state.

(a) Priority must be given to distribution side projects that reduce peak electricity demand.

(b) Projects must be capable of generating at least five hundred kilowatts of direct current generating capacity.

(c) Grants shall not exceed $200,000 per megawatt of direct current generating capacity and total grant funds per project shall not exceed $1,000,000 per applicant. Applicants may not use other state grants.

(d) At least 25 percent of the total allocation of a project shall be provided solely for projects that provide direct benefits to low-income residents or communities. The department must attempt to prioritize an equal geographic distribution.

(e) Priority must be given to major components made in Washington.

(10) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for a project which, when fully deployed, will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by a minimum of seven hundred fifty thousand tons per year, increase energy efficiency, and protect or create manufacturing jobs located in a county with a population of less than three hundred thousand.

(11) $1,100,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the public utility district no. 1 of Klickitat county for the remediation, survey, and evaluation of a closed-loop pump storage hydropower project at the John Day pool.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$32,600,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State. . . .$5,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$46,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$246,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $3,675,000 for fiscal year 2018 and $3,675,000 for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(b) At least twenty percent of each competitive grant round must be awarded to small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of nonstate funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy savings, the higher the project ranking.

(d) For school district applicants, priority consideration must be given to school districts that demonstrate improved health and safety through: (i) Reduced exposure to polychlorinated biphenyl; or (ii) replacing outdated heating systems that use oil or propane as fuel sources as identified by the Washington State University extension energy program. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(2) $1,750,000 is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher education institutions, school districts, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(3) $1,400,000 is provided solely for energy efficiency improvements to minor works and stand-alone projects at state-owned facilities that repair or replace existing building systems including, but not limited to HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the cost to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request will be added to the project appropriation after construction bids are received. The department of commerce shall coordinate with the office of financial management to develop a process for project submittal, review, approval criteria, tracking project budget adjustments, and performance measures.

(4) $500,000 is provided solely for resource conservation managers in the department of enterprise services to coordinate with state agencies and school districts to assess and adjust existing building systems and operations to optimize the efficiency in use of energy and other resources in state-owned facilities. The department of commerce will oversee an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services to fund the resource conservation managers.

(5) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts and provide a report of the metrics, including at a minimum the current energy used by the building, the energy use after efficiencies are completed, and cost of energy saved. The report must include these metrics from other states.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,500,000

Energy Efficiency Account—State. . . .$5,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$71,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Building Communities Fund Grant (30000883)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Boys & Girls Clubs of Snohomish County (Inchelium Boys

& Girls Club Expansion). . . .$27,000

Cocoon House (Colby Avenue Youth Center). . . .$635,000

Mercy Housing Northwest (Historic Building 9 Center

Building). . . .$1,000,000

Skagit Valley Family YMCA (New Skagit Valley Family

YMCA). . . .$3,500,000

Edmonds Senior Center (Edmonds Waterfront Center). . . .$2,250,000

Opportunity Council (East Whatcom Regional Resource

Center Phase 2). . . .$500,000

Filipino Community of Seattle (Filipino Community

Innovation Learning Center). . . .$600,000

Amara (Amara Building Renovation/Addition). . . .$1,550,000

YMCA of Yakima (Yakima YMCA/Aquatic Center). . . .$3,500,000

Northwest Indian College (Health and Wellness

Center). . . .$1,750,000

Lydia Place (Bell Tower Service Center). . . .$96,000

Tacoma Community House (Tacoma Community House). . . .$2,500,000

Peace Community Center (Peace Community Center

Renovation and Expansion). . . .$330,000

North Kitsap Fishline Food Bank (Transforming Lives

in North Kitsap). . . .$530,000

Martha & Mary Health Services (Martha & Mary Health

and Rehab Campus Renovation). . . .$1,000,000

Share (Share Day Center). . . .$180,000

Country Doctor Community Clinic (Campaign for Country

Doctor). . . .$1,575,000

CDM Caregiving Services (Aging with Dignity). . . .$395,000

Friends of Youth (Friends of Youth Snoqualmie Office). . . .$300,000

Helping Hands Food Bank (Helping Hands Food Bank

Building). . . .$350,000

Catholic Community Services of King County (New

Hope House). . . .$190,000

Bridgeview Housing (Bridgeview Education & Employment

Resource Center). . . .$700,000

Aging in PACE Washington (Aging in PACE). . . .$3,000,000

YMCA of Greater Seattle (Kent YMCA Building

Communities Grant). . . .$3,000,000

Brigid Collins House - (Brigid Collins

Family Support Center). . . .$42,000

Step By Step Family Support Center. . . .$1,400,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$102,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aberdeen Gateway Center (Aberdeen). . . .$1,750,000

Adams County Industrial Wastewater and Treatment

Center (Othello). . . .$1,250,000

Adna Elementary Playshed (Chehalis). . . .$104,000

Airway Heights Recreation Complex (Airway Heights). . . .$515,000

Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Bickelton). . . .$500,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$26,000

Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$556,000

ARC Community Center Renovation (Bremerton). . . .$81,000

Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District

(Arlington). . . .$46,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

Belfair Sewer Extension to Puget Sound Industrial

Ctr (Belfair). . . .$515,000

Billy Frank Jr. Heritage Center (Olympia). . . .$206,000

Bloodworks NW Bloodmobiles. . . .$425,000

Bothell Parks Projects (Bothell). . . .$309,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000

Camp Schechter New Infrastructure and Dining Hall

(Tumwater). . . .$200,000

Capitol Campus E. WA Butte (Olympia). . . .$52,000

Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$225,000

Carnation Central Business District Revitalization

(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000

Castle Rock Fair LED Lighting (Castle Rock). . . .$10,000

Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1 (Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Centerville Grange Renovation (Centerville). . . .$134,000

Centralia Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia). . . .$299,000

Chamber Economic Development Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Chelatchie Prairie Railroad Maintenance Bldg.

Phase 2 (Yacolt). . . .$250,000

Cherry St. Fellowship (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Children's Playgarden (Seattle). . . .$315,000

Chimacum Ridge Forest Pilot (Port Townsend). . . .$3,400,000

City of Brewster Manganese Abatement (Brewster). . . .$752,000

Cityview Conversion to Residential Treatment

(Moses Lake). . . .$250,000

Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000

Clymer Museum and Gallery Remodel (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Coastal Harvest Roof Replacement (Hoquiam). . . .$206,000

Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement

(College Place). . . .$900,000

Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000

Confluence Park Improvements (P2&3) (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

Coordinated and Safe Service Center (Redmond). . . .$309,000

Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$280,000

Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development

(Covington). . . .$820,000

Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Daffodil Heritage Float Barn (Puyallup). . . .$103,000

Darrington Rodeo Grounds (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Disaster Response Communications Project (Colville). . . .$1,000,000

District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000

Downtown Pocket Park at Rockwell (Port Orchard). . . .$309,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation HVAC (DuPont). . . .$53,000

East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000

East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eastside Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,550,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access

(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

Emmanuel Life Center Kitchen (Spokane). . . .$155,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Evergreen Pool Resurfacing (White Center). . . .$247,000

Fall City Wastewater Infrastructure Planning & Design

(Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Family Medicine Remodel (Goldendale). . . .$195,000

Federal Way Camera Replacement (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Federal Way Senior Center (Federal Way). . . .$175,000

Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$286,000

Food Lifeline Food Bank. . . .$1,250,000

Forestry Museum Building (Tenino). . . .$16,000

Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation

(Fox Island). . . .$17,000

Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000

Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project

(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000

FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Gig Harbor Sports Complex (Gig Harbor). . . .$206,000

Goodwill Job Training & Resource Center (Pasco). . . .$132,000

Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition

(Granger). . . .$255,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial Foundation

(Maple Valley). . . .$258,000

GreenBridge/4th Ave Streetscaping (White Center). . . .$1,195,000

Harmony Sports Complex Infrastructure & Safety Imprve

(Vancouver). . . .$1,177,000

Harrington School District #204, Pool Renovation

(Harrington). . . .$97,000

Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000

Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000

Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000

HopeWorks TOD Center (Everett). . . .$2,760,000

Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000

HUB Sports Center (Liberty Lake). . . .$516,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Road Improvements (George). . . .$412,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements

(George). . . .$700,000

Inland Northwest Rail Museum (Reardan). . . .$170,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000

Interbay PDAC (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Intrepid Spirit Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Islandwood Comm Dining Hall and Kitchen

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000

Japanese Gulch Creek Restoration Project (Mukilteo). . . .$721,000

Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Lakebay). . . .$515,000

Kitchen Upgrade Belfair Senior Center Meals on Wheels

(Belfair). . . .$12,000

Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library

(Silverdale). . . .$250,000

Kona Kai Coffee Training Center (Tukwila). . . .$407,000

La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000

Lacey Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$30,000

Lake Chelan Community Hospital & Clinic Replacement

(Chelan). . . .$300,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000

Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$300,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Legacy Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$696,000

Lake Tye All-Weather Fields (Monroe). . . .$800,000

Lakewood Playhouse Lighting System Upgrade (Lakewood). . . .$60,000

Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Larson Playfield Lighting Renovation (Moses Lake). . . .$146,000

Lewis Co Fire Dist #1 Emergency Svcs Bldg & Resrce Ctr

(Onalaska). . . .$80,000

LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$411,000

Longbranch Marina (Longbranch). . . .$248,000

Longview Police Department Range and Training

(Castle Rock). . . .$271,000

Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000

Magnuson Community Center Renovation (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000

Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Millionair Club Charity Kitchen (Seattle). . . .$167,000

Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$773,000

Mount Baker Properties Cleanup Site (Seattle). . . .$1,100,000

Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000

Mukilteo Tank Farm Remediation (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000

Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000

NE Snohomish County Community Services Campus

(Granite Falls). . . .$375,000

NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000

New Fire Station at Lake Lawrence (Yelm). . . .$252,000

North Cove Erosion Control (South Bend). . . .$650,000

Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000

Northwest Improvement Company Building (Roslyn). . . .$1,000,000

Olmstead-Smith Historical Gardens Replacement Well

(Ellensburg). . . .$17,000

Orting's Pedestrian Evacuation Crossing SR162 (Orting). . . .$500,000

Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000

Paradise Point Water Supply System Phase IV

(Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden). . . .$3,035,000

Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Pioneer Village ADA Accessible Pathways (Ferndale). . . .$154,000

Ponders Wells Treatment Replacement (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

Port Ilwaco/Port Chinook Marina Mtce Drdg & Matl Disps

(Chinook). . . .$77,000

Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000

Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000

Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$250,000

R.A. Long Park (Longview). . . .$296,000

Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000

Rochester Boys & Girls Club upgrades (Rochester). . . .$26,000

Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000

Schilling Road Fire Station (Lyle). . . .$448,000

Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle). . . .$465,000

Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project (Shelton). . . .$1,500,000

Skagit Co Public Safety Emgcy Commun Ctr Exp/Remodel

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$525,000

Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

Skagit Valley YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$400,000

Snohomish JROTC Program (Snohomish). . . .$189,000

South Gorge Trail (Spokane). . . .$250,000

South Snohomish County Community Resource Center

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000

South Thurston County Meals on Wheels Kitchen

Upgrade (Yelm). . . .$30,000

Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$618,000

Southwest Washington Fair Grange Building Re-Roof

(Chehalis). . . .$54,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan (Spanaway). . . .$26,000

Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Steilacoom Historical Museum Storage Building

(Steilacoom). . . .$31,000

Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside). . . .$2,000,000

Sunset Career Center (Renton). . . .$412,000

Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000

Tacoma's Historic Theater District (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000

Toledo Beautification (Toledo). . . .$52,000

Trout Lake School/Community Soccer & Track Facility

(Trout Lake). . . .$77,000

Tumwater Boys and Girls Club (Olympia). . . .$36,000

Turning Pointe Domestic Violence Svc: Shelter Imprv/Rep

(Shelton). . . .$27,000

Twisp Civic Building (Twisp). . . .$750,000

University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$354,000

Washington Agricultural Education Center (Lynden). . . .$1,500,000

Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000

Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System

(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000

Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacemnt

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000

Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000

Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000

Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000

Weyerhaeuser Land Preservation (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Whidbey Island Youth Project (Oak Harbor). . . .$300,000

White Pass Country Historical Museum (Packwood). . . .$283,000

Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000

Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000

Winlock HS Track (Winlock). . . .$103,000

Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development

(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000

Wishram School CTE Facility (Wishram). . . .$150,000

Yakima Valley SunDome Repairs (Yakima). . . .$206,000

Yelm City Park Playground Modernization (Yelm). . . .$247,000

Youth Eastside Services (Bellevue). . . .$26,000

YWCA Family Justice Center (Spokane). . . .$103,000

(8) $26,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of the Spanaway lake management plan, contingent on commitment of local funding to support the on-going operational costs of the project, including but not limited to the creation of a lake management district.

(9) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the planning, development, acquisition, and other activities pursing open space conservation strategies for the historic Federal Way Weyerhaeuser campus. The grant recipient must be a regional nonprofit nature conservancy that works to conserve keystone properties selected by the city of Federal Way.

(10)(a) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an Interbay public development advisory committee. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function.

(b) The Interbay public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.

(c) The Interbay advisory committee consists of seven persons appointed as follows:

(i) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(ii) One person appointed by the president of the senate; and

(iii) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.

(d) The Interbay public development advisory committee must:

(i) Work in collaboration with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:

(A) Current uses;

(B) Future needs of the units currently at this location;

(C) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and

(D) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;

(ii) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:

(A) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;

(B) Environmental issues and associated costs;

(C) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;

(D) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and

(E) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;

(iii) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:

(A) Any potential private partners or investors;

(B) Necessary real estate transactions;

(C) Federal funding opportunities; and

(D) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs;

(iv) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay public development advisory committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay advisory committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs; and

(v) Provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations for each area described in this subsection (10)(d) by June 29, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee created in this section.

(e) The Interbay advisory committee created in this section terminates June 30, 2019.

(f) Nothing in this section authorizes the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.

(g) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay advisory committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.

(h) Legislative members of the Interbay advisory committee are reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.

(12) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Federal Way chamber of commerce for two economic development projects focused in the south Puget Sound area. The amounts in this section must be used for a business retention and expansion program to conduct economic research in collaboration with stakeholders, develop data-driven economic strategies, and produce a written evaluation; and a tourism enhancement program to develop and inventory the Federal Way area tourism sector, analyze data regarding visitation, and produce a written evaluation.

(13) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."

(14) $1,177,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Harmony sports complex infrastructure and safety improvements in Vancouver and is contingent upon the facility being open to the public.

(15) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma. These state funds are contingent on securing at least $1,000,000 in private funds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$130,661,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,661,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,504,000 of the early learning facilities development account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects in the following amounts:

Pasco Early Learning Center. . . .$1,030,000

Discover! Children's Museum. . . .$1,030,000

West Hills Early Learning Center. . . .$464,000

Franklin Pierce Early Learning Center. . . .$980,000

(2) $11,996,000 of the early learning facilities revolving account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for early learning facility grants and loans specified in sections 3 through 11, chapter 12, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess. to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations.

(3) If the bill referenced in subsection (2) of this section is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

Early Learning Facilities Development

Account—State. . . .$3,504,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving

Account—State. . . .$11,996,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$52,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$67,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding provided in this section may be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a ten-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.

(b) $12,538,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in (a) of this subsection:

Community Health Association of Spokane

(Spokane Valley). . . .$581,000

Community Health Association of Spokane

(Clarkston). . . .$391,000

Community Health of Central Washington

(Ellensburg). . . .$1,800,000

Columbia Valley Community Health (Chelan). . . .$753,000

East Central Community Center (Spokane). . . .$500,000

HealthPoint (Federal Way). . . .$900,000

International Community Health Services (Shoreline). . . .$605,000

Jefferson Healthcare Dental Clinic (Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

Neighborcare (Seattle). . . .$1,388,000

North East Washington Health Programs (Springdale). . . .$465,000

North Olympia Healthcare Network (Port Angeles). . . .$610,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Poulsbo). . . .$395,000

Sea Mar (Burien). . . .$252,000

Sea Mar (Seattle). . . .$183,000

Sea Mar (Oak Harbor). . . .$149,000

Sea Mar (Tacoma). . . .$149,000

Sea Mar (Vancouver). . . .$167,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$250,000

Valley View Health Center (Chehalis). . . .$1,000,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$1,000,000

(c) $2,800,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects to increase the capacity of dental residencies:

Spokane Dental Residency (Spokane). . . .$2,000,000

St. Peter Dental Residency (Olympia). . . .$800,000

(d) In order to assess the impact these projects may have on the omnibus operating appropriations act, the department must, in consultation with the medical assistance forecast work group, assess each federally qualified health center project to determine the impact the project may have on state expenditures from the expansion of dental clinic capacity, including the additional impact of change of scope of service for the receiving clinics. Each project must be assessed no later than December 1, 2017. The department must report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the results of the assessments by January 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,338,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

PWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 is provided solely for the public works board's emergency loan program.

(2) $14,000,000 is provided solely for the public works board's preconstruction loan program.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, to issue grants to community hospitals or other community entities to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health organizations, as defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds; and

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (3), the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services and behavioral health organizations, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(3) $36,600,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

(a) $4,600,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of geriatric or traumatic brain injury patients and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with secure detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with acute detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $11,400,000 is provided solely for crisis diversion or stabilization facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. At least two of the facilities must be located in King county and one must be located within a five-mile radius of the junction of Interstate 5 and state route 512 and in connection with the crisis diversion/stabilization facility currently being planned by the Pierce county government;

(e) $10,000,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment providers to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety or one hundred eighty day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the department of social and health services;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The department of social and health services has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes; and

(f) $6,600,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community providers to develop psychiatric residential treatment beds to serve individuals being diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the department of health, and the local behavioral health organization jurisdiction for which a proposal has been submitted and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the behavioral health organization in the region;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The behavioral health organization has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes.

(4) $26,000,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Denny

Youth Center. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Substance

Use Disorder Intensive Treatment. . . .$5,000,000

Bellingham Mental Health Triage . . . .$5,000,000

Bellingham Acute Detox. . . .$2,000,000

SWWA Diversion Crisis and Involuntary Treatment. . . .$3,000,000

Daybreak Center for Adolescent Recovery. . . .$3,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$500,000

Valley City Recovery Place. . . .$2,000,000

Geriatric Diversion. . . .$500,000

(5) $3,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to a joint venture between MultiCare-Franciscan to provide community based behavioral health services. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section. The department of commerce may not release funding for this project unless MultiCare-Franciscan enters into a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services by October 31, 2017, to collaborate on development and implementation of strategies to expand the behavioral health workforce in the region. At a minimum, the agreement must include strategies for increasing recruitment of health professionals required to staff psychiatric inpatient facilities, including psychiatrists, psychologists, nurses and other health care professionals. The agreement must also identify opportunities for coordination between the parties to expand access to clinical skill development and training opportunities in the region and strategies for collaborative service delivery between the parties when possible. To objectively evaluate the efficacy of the strategies implemented to achieve the desired outcomes of the agreement, performance measures and targets must be established to include:

(a) MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work collaboratively to decrease vacancy rates for hard-to-recruit health care professionals employed by each facility. The parties must develop strategies to attract more qualified health care professionals to the area and ensure comparable exposure to the benefits of working for each organization. The parties must measure the success of these strategies by the decrease in vacancy rate for health care professionals necessary to provide safe, quality inpatient psychiatric care in MultiCare-Franciscan and department facilities following the first year as the baseline of the partnership/consortium and with updated goals for each subsequent year. MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work to increase the competency and skills of health care professionals across both facilities by establishing organized joint- and cross-training programs. The parties must measure the success of this strategy by the number of health care professionals in total and by discipline complete cross-training activities and by the number and hours of cross-training opportunities offered under the agreement.

(6) The department of commerce shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(7) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, shall establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, detox, or secure detox.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$65,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$65,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the community economic revitalization board may make grants and loans to local governments and federally recognized tribes to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, with a minimum of 25 megabits per second download speed, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development.

(1) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, public port districts, quasi-municipal corporations, and special purpose districts.

(2) "Broadband" means networks of deployed telecommunications equipment and technologies necessary to provide high-speed Internet access and other advanced telecommunications services.

(3) The board is authorized to make rural broadband loans to local governments and to federally recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of financing the cost to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development. Grants may also be authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe, and subject to a finding by the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move forward. However, no more than 25 percent of all financial assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants to local governments and federally recognized Indian tribes.

(4) Application for funding must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board must conform to the following requirements:

(a) The board may not provide financial assistance:

(i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.

(ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote gambling.

(iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant local government or federally recognized Indian tribe.

(v) For equipment or facilities which would enable a public entity to provide retail telecommunications services or services that the entity is not authorized by statute to provide.

(vi) For the deployment of publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure ("backbone") solely for the sake of creating competitive, publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure.

(b) The board may provide financial assistance only:

(i) For projects demonstrating convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(C) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county; or

(ii) For a project that does not meet the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection but is a project that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Is part of a local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements;

(C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard economic principles; and

(D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county;

(c) The board must develop guidelines for local participation and allowable match and activities.

(d) An application must demonstrate local match and local participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.

(e) An application must be approved by the local government and supported by the local associate development organization or local workforce development council or approved by the governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.

(f) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the project.

(g) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.

(h) The board must prioritize each proposed project according to:

(i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed, but also giving consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be located;

(ii) The rate of return of the state's investment, including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;

(iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of employees;

(iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary transportation improvements;

(v) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance; and

(vi) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.

(i) A responsible official of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe must be present during board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(5) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic revitalization board.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seismic Inventory: Unreinforced Masonry Buildings (91000959)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the department to contract for a seismic study regarding suspected unreinforced masonry buildings in Washington state. The study must include a list and map of suspected unreinforced masonry buildings, excluding single-family housing, and be produced by utilizing existing survey and data sources to the greatest extent possible. The study may incorporate random sampling, site visits, and other means to inform the study. The study must be provided to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Stormwater Pilot Project (91001099)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce to establish a community-based public-private partnership stormwater pilot program using the United States environmental protection agency guidelines for local governments. The department must establish goals and geographical areas and identify ongoing revenue structures, as well as develop a request for qualifications with the department of ecology using the environmental protection agency guidelines to support future stormwater public-private partnerships. The department must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2018, regarding the establishment of the pilot project and any barriers in implementing projects using this model.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

Sec. 1024. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(2) $1,500,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the basin 3 sewer rehabilitation project rather than the city of Shelton wastewater project.

Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State. . . .$5,368,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$8,368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$28,741,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,229,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$1,229,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,458,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,458,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$611,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$611,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (30000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project. For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

Sec. 1028. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Contingency Pool (90000300)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1077, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

(2) The Carver academic renovation project, funded in section 5048, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., is an eligible construction project pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,853,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,147,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Contingency Pool (91000436)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for state parks projects that are reduced. The state parks and recreation commission must provide sufficient evidence that a project cannot move forward without additional funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Evaluation of Law Enforcement Training by Community Colleges (92000022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract with an external consultant to develop a plan that provides required basic law enforcement training through student paid programs with training provided by community and technical colleges. The consultant must review the costs, benefits, and risks to the state of Washington and review models from other states. The consultant must provide a report with an implementation plan and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 10, 2017.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Behavioral Health Statewide Plan (91000434)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management, in collaboration with the department of commerce, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and behavioral health organizations, shall establish a statewide plan to inform future grant allocations by assessing and prioritizing facility needs and gaps in the behavioral health continuum of care. The department must provide the plan to the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2018. The plan must include:

(1) An assessment of the continuum of care, including new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced service facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities for short-term detention services through the publicly funded mental health system, crisis walk-in clinics, residential treatment facilities, and supportive housing units;

(2) A prioritization of facility type by geographic region covering the full continuum of care defined in subsection (1) of this section;

(3) A systematic method to distribute resources across geographical regions so that over time all regions are moving forward in strengthening the local continuum of behavioral health facilities; and

(4) An assessment of the feasibility of establishing state-operated, community-based mental health hospitals.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

State Parks Capital Projects Study (91000437)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The office of financial management, in consultation with the state parks and recreation commission, shall develop a study of the commission's capital budget process. The study shall be contracted to an independent third-party consultant with expertise in the state capital budget development process, capital project cost estimating, value engineering, and related professional fields. The study must be provided to the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 1, 2018. The purpose of the study is to evaluate commission practices in comparison with best practices in public sector capital program design and execution.

The study must include an assessment of:

(1) The commission's capital budget development process for its 2019-2021 biennial budget and ten-year capital plan, including analysis of:

(a) Project identification and scoping processes;

(b) Project cost estimation methods and tools; and

(c) Project prioritization criteria and methods.

(2) State parks capital budget staffing compared to other public and private industry standards, including the percent of project funding that is used for staff FTEs and the number and function of:

(a) Design professionals (including engineers and landscape architects);

(b) Construction and Design project managers; and

(c) Other staff supported by capital funds.

(3) Historical capital project funding including, at a minimum:

(a) 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 capital budgets and expenditures;

(b) An analysis of actual project costs in comparison to budgeted costs including the percentage that projects were over and under the construction cost estimate and the total project cost estimate, both individually and in aggregate; and

(c) Percentage of reappropriations.

(4) The basis for cabin and comfort station project costs to include:

(a) Project objectives and customer requirements;

(b) Project elements (scale, materials, utilities, location, aesthetics, and other considerations significantly affecting project costs); and

(c) Operational fiscal analysis including projected operating costs and revenue from cabins; and

(d) Detailed cost estimates of previous and future cabin and comfort station projects.

(5) Costs compared to at least two other states with similar state parks and two other Washington state or local governments.

(6) An analysis of development costs associated with state park projects that differ from other public works projects and commercial private sector projects.

(7) Alternative procurement options for cabins, including premanufactured cabins, cabin kits, tiny homes, and modular construction.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Higher Education and State Facility Financing Study (92000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management shall submit a higher education capital facility study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2018. In designing and conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult with legislative and fiscal committee leadership, the department of revenue, the state investment board, the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the public four-year institutions of higher education. The study must include:

(a) A review of the methods that are used to fund higher education facility expansion and improvements in other states and the relative portions of such expenditures that are borne by students, state taxpayers, federal grants, and private contributions;

(b) An examination of alternatives for reducing facility construction and maintenance expenditures per student through strategies such as expansion of distance learning opportunities, increased scheduling of classes during evenings and weekends, the establishment of expected cost benchmarks by facility type, and other means;

(c) An assessment of the strengths and weaknesses of potential new revenue sources that might be applied to the funding of higher education facilities. These alternative sources must include, but not be limited to, adjusting student fees to support a larger share of the cost of such facilities, bonding against student fee revenues, utilizing local tax revenues to support local higher education capital needs, promoting business participation in the financing of programs strongly linked to area economic development, and other means;

(d) Learning space utilization standards for higher education facilities. The standards may include, but are not limited to:

(i) Percentage of hours utilized per scheduling window;

(ii) Percentage of seats utilized;

(iii) Square feet per seat; and

(iv) Type of technology utilized in learning spaces;

(e) Reasonableness of cost standards for higher education capital facilities. The standards may include, but are not limited to:

(i) Costs per square feet per type of facility; and

(ii) Expected life-cycle costs; and

(f) A criteria scoring and weighting tool for use by four-year higher education institutions and other decision makers that measures two components:

(i) A measure of achievement of higher education capital projects criteria; and

(ii) A measure to weigh the importance of those criteria.

(2) The office of financial management shall submit a state capital facility financing study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2018. In designing and conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult with legislative and fiscal committee leadership. The study must include the establishment of expected cost benchmarks by facility type.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

East Plaza - Water Infiltration and Elevator Repairs (30000548)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,168,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,103,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,120,000

TOTAL. . . .$19,391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall develop an environmental impact statement to consider alternatives for Capitol Lake. The alternatives considered must include, at a minimum, a lake option, an estuary option, and a hybrid option. The environmental impact statement will also consider sediment transport and locations within lower Budd Inlet. The department must work with affected stakeholders to develop mitigation plans. The environmental impact statement must also consider an expanded area around Capitol Lake and Budd Inlet including the Port of Olympia for the economic analysis. The environmental impact statement must consider the use of equal funding from nonstate entities including, but not limited to, local governments, special purpose districts, tribes, and not-for-profit organizations.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$940,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Transportation Building Preservation (30000777)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $350,000 is provided solely for a predesign, to include an evaluation of temporary work space options for employees displaced by the proposed renovation.

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,889,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,871,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Elevator Modernization (30000786)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,971,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,971,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Systems Rehabilitation (30000791)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .$993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security and Safety Improvements (30000812)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a study to include: (1) An assessment of current capitol campus security, to include infrastructure, technology, and staffing; (2) an assessment of security systems at comparable state capitol campuses; (3) options for security to meet the needs of the capitol campus; and (4) a phased plan for improving campus physical security and safety, including estimated costs. The following must be included in the development of the study: House of representatives security personnel, senate security personnel, legislative building facility and security personnel, and temple of justice security personnel. The study must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 31, 2018.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .$314,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,664,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .$80,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,058,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,970,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,028,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Building Envelope Repairs (30000829)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,364,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,936,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000889)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each fiscal year, the department must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each manager compared to previous biennia;

(b) Projects that were not completed on schedule and the reasons for the delays; and

(c) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order.

(3) At least twice per year, the department shall convene a group of private sector architects, contractors, and state agency facilities personnel to share, at a minimum, information on high performance methods, ideas, operating and maintenance issues, and cost. The facilities personnel must be from the community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher education, and any other state agencies that have recently completed a new building or are currently in the construction phase.

(4) The department shall create a plan for scheduled renovations on the capitol campus, to include phasing and swing space for the predesigns for the department of transportation building, temple of justice, and employment security building.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,220,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$2,680,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$12,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Next Century Capitol Campus (40000028)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign to analyze the current heat and power configuration and compare it to a minimum of two new configurations on the capitol campus. A life-cycle cost analysis shall identify the preferred option over thirty years.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

1063 Building Furniture and Equipment (40000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,414,000 is provided solely for the department for furniture, fixtures, and equipment for common areas in the building.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$2,414,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,414,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Childcare Center (40000030)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a predesign. The report must evaluate, at a minimum, the following criteria: (1) A minimum of two locations on the capitol campus or Heritage Park; (2) a survey of employees on the capitol campus to determine the need and capacity; (3) the necessary rate to support operations, maintenance, and debt service; (4) the existing child care capacity within a five mile radius of the capitol campus; and (5) a description of a public private partnership and the competitive process used to select the contractor to operate the facility.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Conservatory Demolition (91000442)

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .$650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capital Campus Utility Renewal Plan (92000012)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,686,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,220,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,556,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Relocate Mural from GA to 1063 (92000018)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$33,315,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,863,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$375,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$41,553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$41,553,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2017-19 Biennium (30000811)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$3,776,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,821,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2017-19 Biennium (30000812)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,171,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,661,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$12,832,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,832,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center - Land (30000808)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Centralia Readiness Center Major Renovation (30000818)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,375,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,375,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$4,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic Cemetery Grant Program (30000021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,060,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Heritage Barn Preservation Program 2017-19 (92000010)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,060,000

TOTAL. . . .$2,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Historic County Courthouse Grants Program 2017-19 (92000011)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Pacific County. . . .$364,041

Lewis County. . . .$230,000

Grant County. . . .$543,576

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,537,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (30000021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$740,000

Sec. 2002. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 2001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1) The department shall redesign the kitchen and commissary building to account for a reduced client population at western state hospital.

(2))) This facility shall house a kitchen, commissary, medical supply, and pharmacy operations to improve operational efficiency at western state hospital and at the special commitment center.

(((3) The department shall submit an updated project proposal by October 15, 2017 and return any excess funds.))

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,190,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: New Boiler Plant (30000468)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$565,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide (30001859)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,145,000

TOTAL. . . .$21,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$171,510,000

TOTAL. . . .$183,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo Glen - Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide - RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Kitchen & Dining Room Upgrades (20081506)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School - Multiple Buildings: Roofing Replacement & Repairs (30002752)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$12,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center - King County SCTF: Expansion (30003564)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: No funds may be allotted until the department consults with the city of Seattle.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

State Psychiatric Hospitals: Compliance with Federal Requirements (30003569)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department shall submit a report on the use of this funding, to include the identification of the institution, project scope, associated federal requirements, and the remaining balance. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature at the end of each fiscal year.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Master Plan Update (30003571)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a master plan for western state hospital and the child study and treatment center. The master plan shall assume a reduced client population at western state hospital that is focused on forensic commitments.

(2) By June 30, 2019, the department of social and health services must transfer deed of the property known as the Fort Steilacoom park to the city of Lakewood. The city of Lakewood will receive the land covered by its current lease. Liabilities existing on the land at the time of transfer will transfer with the land. The transfer must be at no cost to the city. The department may reserve easements in the transferred property at no cost to the department. When the deed is transferred to the city, the lease expires. The department may include a restriction on the property requiring the city of Lakewood to maintain and operate the land as a park.

(3) By June 30, 2019, the department of social and health services must transfer deed of the property known as the Pierce College Fort Steilacoom campus to Pierce College. Pierce College will receive the land covered by its current lease. The transfer must be at no cost to the college. When the deed is transferred to the college, the lease expires.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - East Campus: New Security Fence (30003578)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Multiple Buildings: Fire Suppression (30003579)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Campus: Security & Surveillance Upgrades (30003580)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Multiple Buildings: Windows Security (30003585)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is for the fircrest school campus master plan and rezone.

(2) At any time during the 2017-2019 biennium, the department of social and health services may transfer to the department of health approximately five acres east of the existing department of health property for the purpose of future expansion of the public health laboratory by the department of health, in accordance with the master plans of both agencies. Funds appropriated in this section may be used for expenses incidental to the transfer of the property.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Forensic Services: Roofing Replacement (30003603)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: Emergency Electrical System Upgrades (30003616)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Building 28: Treatment & Recovery Center (40000024)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,475,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Forensic Ward (91000050)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center - Community Facilities: New Capacity (30003577)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must consult with the communities that are potential sites for these facilities.

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$12,760,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island - Infrastructure: Water System Replacement (30003213)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH - All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: 30 Forensic Beds (91000049)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Newborn Screening Wing Addition (30000301)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Preservation (30000382)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$593,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$593,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Minor Works - Program (30000383)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$868,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of health must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State. . . .$118,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$472,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$590,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for grants to well-managed, publicly-owned group A water utilities for the repair and consolidation of group A and B water systems under the following conditions:

(1) A grant can be provided when a water system has been voluntarily transferred to a publicly owned water utility within the last three years. The grant may be used for repair and consolidation costs.

(2) The grant applicant must provide the department of health with an accounting of rehabilitation costs and the value of the system. The grant must be used primarily to cover project design and construction costs, and only in limited cases to cover the cost of system acquisitions, as determined by the department of health in evaluating grant applications.

(3) Grants must primarily be used to cover project construction costs that customers benefiting from the project cannot afford to repay through loans, as determined by the department of health and the publicly owned utility receiving the grant to complete the project.

(4) Applicants must provide a plan demonstrating that project completion will occur within three years of the grant contract execution.

(5) Each grant must be less than twenty-five percent of the total appropriation.

(6) The primary purpose of this appropriation is to fund water system repair and consolidation construction costs. However, the department may use a limited amount of funds under this section for grants for feasibility review of water system repair and consolidation projects that would meet the objectives of this section and RCW 70.119A.190.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program - State Match (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely as state match for federal drinking water funds. $10,000,000 of the appropriation must be transferred into the drinking water assistance account.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Othello Water Supply and Storage (40000008)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Assistance Program 2017-19 (92000025)

Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal. . . .$32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$128,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$160,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,085,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Program (30000131)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,609,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC Additional Internment Vaults and Roadway (30000215)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,700,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Boiler Replacement (30000130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a predesign. The department shall develop a predesign for replacing the current boilers. The alternatives must include replacing the current boiler configuration with three or less boilers with a life cycle cost analysis that identifies the most efficient solution over thirty years. At least one alternative must consider cogeneration. The office of financial management must approve the predesign before design funds are alloted.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,833,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SCCC: Replace Heat Exchangers (30000523)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,032,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,032,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC Replace Roofs (30000654)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,540,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,810,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,685,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30001114)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,909,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$55,712,000

TOTAL. . . .$66,621,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC ADA Compliance Retrofit (30001118)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW IMU Recreation Yard Improvement (30001123)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Security Electronics Network Renovation (30001124)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

AVWR: WR Bed Capacity - 41 Beds at WR Facility (30001166)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MLCC: 128 Bed Minimum Camp (30001168)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must establish a mental health program for women offenders. The program must at a minimum provide programs and treatment for female offenders diagnosed with a mental illness.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,551,000

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$1,790,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$4,341,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Correctional Industries: Laundry Feasibility Study (40000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall conduct a feasibility study to assess whether correctional industries can efficiently provide laundry services to Lakeland Village, eastern state hospital, and/or the Spokane veteran's home.

The study shall include: (a) The identification of the resources required, including the estimated capital and operating investment costs and ongoing operating costs for the department at the airway heights corrections center to provide laundry services to the facilities referenced in this section; (b) an assessment of contraband management and the resources needed to do so; (c) an assessment of how the department will meet health regulations for laundry in a hospital setting; (d) the advantages and disadvantages of the department providing laundry services to the facilities referenced in this section; and (e) identification of logistics and operations to meet the demands.

The department shall provide the feasibility study to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2018.

(2) The department of social and health services and the department of veterans affairs shall provide to the department of corrections detailed information on their current laundry operations at Lakeland Village, eastern state hospital and the Spokane veteran's home including but not limited to pounds of laundry per day, staffing, equipment inventory, materials purchased, and estimated utility costs.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

Building Systems Preservation (30000004)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a predesign of the employment security department headquarters renovation. The predesign shall incorporate the findings of the recently completed investment grade audit and shall include an evaluation of temporary work space options for employees displaced by the proposed renovation.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$34,241,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 ss 3043 and 3059 (uncodified) are repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$25,476,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,271,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,747,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000670)

Appropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State. . . .$28,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,599,000

TOTAL. . . .$51,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000671)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for projects that are not eligible for the Volkswagen "clean diesel" marketing, sales practice, and products liability litigation settlement.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000672)

Appropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000673)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reducing Toxic Woodstove Emissions (30000674)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-2017 Restored Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000704)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,436,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,436,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Centennial Clean Water Program (30000705)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial program grant.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded clean water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$155,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000706)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,389,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (30000708)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The terms of any land acquisition contract executed pursuant to this section must include requirements, such as covenants or easements, that the land be managed in a manner that provides for long-term sustainable timber growth and harvest on the property. Use of the property must prioritize forest practices that provide for sufficient feedstock timber to any sawmills adjacent to the property.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000709)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000710)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution control state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The agency must encourage local government use of federally funded clean water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture - rural development.

Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

Federal. . . .$50,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Account—

State. . . .$160,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$210,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$840,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,050,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000711)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$31,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$76,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$107,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the east Columbia irrigation district.

(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for a forty-seven and one-half mile pipeline for full capacity. Funds must be prioritized to constructing the distribution system to a capacity serving no less than eleven thousand acres. Any remaining funds must be directed to the Odessa groundwater replacement program.

(3) $2,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for Icicle Creek integrated planning.

(4) $16,800,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the department to fund existing projects and staffing.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,550,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$12,250,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue Recovery

Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$33,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$105,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Lacey Headquarters Facility Preservation Projects (30000713)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$635,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000714)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriation is provided solely for activities that improve rural water supplies and help achieve instream flows by implementing locally developed projects and watershed plans, as follows:

(1) Surface or ground water storage projects. The department shall consult with the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife before issuing water storage grants.

(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and fish restoration purposes.

(3) Agricultural water supply projects that improve water conservation and water use efficiency.

(4) Purchase and installation of water measuring devices in water-short basins, salmon critical basins, other basins participating in the department of fish and wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance program, and basins where watershed plans call for additional water use measurement.

(5) Acquisition of water to achieve instream flows or to establish water banks. The department must give priority to acquisitions in water short basins. The department must place acquired water into the state's trust water rights program pursuant to chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000740)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The department and the state conservation commission shall give preference to projects located in the 16 fish critical basins, other water-short or drought impacted basins, and basins with significant water resource and instream flow issues. Projects that are not within the basins described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.

(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not exceed eighty-five percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.

(3) Up to $300,000 of the appropriation in this section may be allocated for the purchase and installation of flow meters that are implemented in cooperation with the Washington state department of fish and wildlife fish screening program authorized under RCW 77.57.070.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Regional Office Improvements and Storm Water Treatment (30000741)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,682,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-2017 Restored Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000763)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$120,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$145,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-2017 Restored Stormwater Financial Assistance (30000797)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$30,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$30,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Catastrophic Flood Relief (40000006)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Up to $30,400,000 of the appropriation is for advancing the long-term strategy for the Chehalis basin projects to reduce flood damage and restore aquatic species including project level environmental review, data collection, engineering design of future construction projects, feasibility analysis, and engagement of state agencies, tribes, and other parties.

(2) Up to $19,600,000 of the state building construction account appropriation and $10,000,000 from the federal account is for construction of local priority flood protection and habitat restoration projects.

(3) The office of Chehalis basin board has discretion to allocate the funding between subsections (1) and (2) of this section if needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation.

(4) Up to one and a half percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000,000

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$260,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Pollution Control State Match (40000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely as state match for federal clean water funds. $10,000,000 of the appropriation must be transferred into the water pollution control revolving account.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The legislature finds that it is appropriate to provide a framework for the administration of mitigation funds provided to the state as a beneficiary under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years. The legislature deems the department of ecology the responsible agency for the administration and expenditure of funds provided by the trustee under the terms of the consent decrees, including the development of a mitigation plan to guide the use of the funds, whether or not the department receives funds directly for projects included in the plan.

(2)(a) The department of ecology shall develop the mitigation plan through an open, transparent public process consistent with direction in the consent decrees. The department shall provide ample opportunity using a variety of engagement options, as appropriate, for stakeholders and the public to shape, review, and comment throughout the development of the mitigation plan, including at least two meetings of the legislative advisory group as described in (c) of this subsection.

(b) The department of ecology shall work collaboratively with other agencies to develop and implement the elements of the mitigation plan that address categories of projects for which other agencies have already developed programs or expertise. In doing so, the department of ecology must consider and utilize, where appropriate and to the extent possible, the following existing programs for alternative fuels and zero emission vehicles:

(i) The department of transportation's electric vehicle infrastructure bank program;

(ii) The state alternative fuel commercial vehicle tax credit;

(iii) The state sales and use tax exemption for clean vehicles; and

(iv) Public transportation grant programs administered by the department of transportation.

(c)(i) For the purposes of providing legislative input and gathering public feedback on the development of the mitigation plan, a legislative advisory group is established. The advisory group is comprised of eight legislators, including the chairs and ranking members, or designees of the chairs and ranking members, of the transportation and capital budget committees in the House and in the Senate; the director of the department of ecology; and the secretary of the department of transportation.

(ii) The advisory group must select a chair from among its membership. Meetings of the advisory group must be open to the public and allow for public comment.

(iii) The advisory group must meet at least twice, once immediately prior to the date that the draft mitigation plan is released publicly, and again after public comment has been incorporated but before the department submits the plan to the trustee.

(iv) The office of program research and the senate committee services must provide staff support to the advisory group. The department of ecology staff must provide technical support, as needed. Legislative members of the advisory group are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, government entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW. Advisory group expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(3) The mitigation plan and the stewardship of project implementation must adhere to the following principles:

(a) Maximize air quality and public health benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions;

(b) Give priority to projects that improve air quality relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions in areas that bear a disproportionate share of the burden from nitrogen oxides emissions;

(c) Achieve substantial additional air quality benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions beyond that which would already occur, absent trust funding;

(d) Investments in clean vehicles or investments in clean engine replacements must be shown to be cost-effective. For the purposes of leveraging funding, investments in clean vehicles may not exceed the incremental cost of the clean vehicle, relative to the cost of a similar conventionally fueled vehicle. To incentivize the replacement of standard engines, investments may be made up to the full cost of the clean engine replacement;

(e) Consideration must be given to investments across a range of fueling technologies and emissions reduction technologies; and

(f) Priority must be given to projects that have the highest benefit-cost ratios, in terms of the amount of nitrogen oxides emissions reduced per dollar invested.

(4) Funding must be allocated to eligible projects under the terms of the consent decrees in the following manner:

(a)(i) No more than thirty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class four through eight transit buses, shuttle buses, and school buses;

(ii) No more than thirty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class eight local freight trucks and port drayage trucks;

(iii) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class four through seven local freight trucks;

(iv) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for airport ground support equipment;

(v) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for ocean-going vessels' shore power;

(vi) No more than fifteen percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for light duty, zero emission vehicle supply equipment;

(vii) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for nonfederal matching funds for projects eligible under the diesel emission reduction act option; and

(viii) For each of the other categories of mitigation actions that are eligible under the consent decrees but not otherwise specified under this subsection (4)(a), no more than ten percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium.

(b) Projects that receive funding under subsection (4)(a)(ii) and (iii) of this section and ocean-going vessels shorepower projects that receive funding under subsection (4)(a)(viii) of this section must include electric technologies, if practicable.

(5) To the extent this section conflicts with the consent decrees, the consent decrees supersede it.

(6) The department of ecology may modify the mitigation plan as needed to comply with trustee requirements, including to the extent these modifications conflict with this section. In making any adjustments, the department of ecology shall consult with the department of transportation and the office of the superintendent of public instruction and provide notice to the steering committee of any significant changes to the plan submitted.

(7) The department of ecology shall provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, on any plans or efforts to change the mitigation plan, its progress in implementing the mitigation plan, and the specific projects funded through these mitigation funds for the previous fiscal year.

(8) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Project" means an eligible mitigation action under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years.

(b) "Trustee" means the entity selected under the terms of the consent decrees to administer the disbursement of funds to eligible projects for the purposes of mitigating nitrogen oxides emission pollution.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Integrated Planning Grant: Port Townsend (91000338)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for an integrated planning grant to the port of Port Townsend to perform an environmental site assessment and development plan to guide redevelopment of the marina and shipyard.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Availability (91000343)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for water infrastructure projects or projects designed to measure or improve stream flow. If the section of chapter . . . (Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5239), Laws of 2017 creating the water resources project account does not become law by August 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

Water Resources Project Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,525,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .$11,528,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,053,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,947,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$97,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)

Appropriation:

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving

Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000669)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,106,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twin Harbors State Park: Renovation (30000086)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,986,000

TOTAL. . . .$26,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,823,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Casey - Lighthouse Historic Preservation (30000109)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,399,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Simcoe - Historic Officers Quarters Renovation (30000155)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,478,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,516,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,516,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine Facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$541,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,639,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$401,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,817,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Beacon Rock Entrance Road Realignment (30000647)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$348,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$17,346,000

TOTAL. . . .$17,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,250,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,812,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Clean Vessel Boating Pump-Out Grants (30000856)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—Private/Local. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden – Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$234,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Replace Failing Bridge (30000876)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,032,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Pier & Marine Learning Center Improve or Replace (30000950)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,072,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,769,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program for new Firelight toilets. The commission may sole source for the equipment. The commission must operate and maintain the equipment for a minimum of two years and report annually to legislative fiscal committees on: (1) The ease of use by parks patrons and (2) the cost and time to maintain the equipment.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation From Harms Way (30000959)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,018,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,018,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,093,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,859,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,073,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Ocean City - Replace Non-Compliant Comfort Stations (30000970)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,526,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$152,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,678,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$718,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The commission must grant access to the Iron Horse/John Wayne trail for any person who owns land adjacent to the trail and applies for access or easement for agricultural purposes. The commission may request twenty-four hour notice prior to any agricultural use for transporting goods or machinery along the length of the trail. No prior notice may be required of adjacent landowners to cross the trail. Access may not be unreasonably denied and must be granted within one month of application or within thirty days of the effective date of this section for applications previously submitted from landowners.

Appropriation:

Parkland Acquisition Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000977)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructure (30000978)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,591,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000979)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,845,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$964,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$964,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$428,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,359,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,568,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,996,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,471,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,016,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,254,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,058,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$297,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,114,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Trail Renovations (Footbridges) (30001021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$266,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$798,000

TOTAL. . . .$1,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Replace Failing Water Lines (30001022)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$358,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,817,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30001031)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steptoe Butte Road Improvements (30001076)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,789,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,232,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Buildings and Ground Improvements (40000005)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

St Edward State Park Environmental Learning Center (92000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $75,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a strategic plan to develop an environmental learning center at Saint Edward state park.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $170,000 of the state building construction account—state is provided solely to execute a Lean study to bring efficiencies to the project development and prioritization process, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for predesign planning grants for lead entities, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(3) $641,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for predesign planning grants for regional fisheries enhancement groups, and this is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$50,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,711,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$69,711,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$320,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$389,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document number 2017-42, developed July 20, 2017.

(2) One percent of the farm and forest account—state is provided solely for the prioritized list of projects to be provided by the recreation and conservation funding board by November 1, 2017, pursuant to section 11, chapter 149, Laws of 2016, and the appropriated funds may be spent after the board provides the list.

Appropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$36,000,000

Farm and Forest Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State. . . .$36,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$80,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$340,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$420,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $220,000 of the recreation resources account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Garfield for the central ferry boat launch.

Appropriation:

Boating Activities Account—State. . . .$10,000

Recreation Resources Account—State. . . .$17,165,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$17,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$68,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$85,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .$13,195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$52,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$65,995,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,077,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Barnum Point waterfront.

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$180,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$220,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000415)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000416)

Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State. . . .$813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,100,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,913,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000417)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000418)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Land and Water Conservation (30000419)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document number 2017-4H, developed June 30, 2017.

(2) The board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated for this section for its office for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed four and twelve one-hundredths percent of the appropriation.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$57,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Public Lands Inventory Update (30000422)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to update the public lands inventory with current information on state agency habitat and recreation land acquisitions and easements and to further develop the inventory to respond to the recommendations of the joint legislative audit and review committee for a single source of information about land acquisitions.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Brian Abbott Fish Passage Barrier Removal Board (91000566)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the list of projects identified in LEAP capital document number 2017-5H, developed June 30, 2017.

(2) The board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated for this section for its office for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed four and twelve one-hundredths percent of the appropriation.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,747,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$59,747,000

Sec. 3086. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation and Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The appropriation in this section is provided solely to purchase replacement properties for Blanchard mountain trust lands core-zone.))

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3026, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

(2) A maximum of $1,100,000 of unused funds in this reappropriation may be used for the willows road regional trail connect, without requiring matching resources.

(3) A maximum of $500,000 of unused funds in this reappropriation may be used for the Wilburton trestle section of the eastside rail corridor, without requiring matching resources.

Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State. . . .$4,108,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,148,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$30,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match 2017-19 (91000009)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP Riparian Contract Funding 2017-19 (91000010)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$16,028,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,328,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy Distillation Grants (92000010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the commission to make competitive grants available for dairy nutrient projects assisting dairy owners to address impacts to soil, water, or air. The purpose of the funding is to test the technologies that can solve the potential environmental problems associated with the disposal of manure that is in excess of what can be effectively used in the growing of crops. The technology must:

(a) Pose no risk of pollution to soil, water, or air;

(b) Be cost effective; and

(c) Produce clean water that can be effectively used on dairy farms and/or solids which can either be marketed or disposed of without risk of the environment.

(2) The grants must fund at least one dairy nutrient management innovation project east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one west of the crest of the Cascade mountains. The commission shall report about the challenges and opportunities of the granted projects to the appropriate committees of the legislature at the conclusion of the last project or at least by December 1, 2020. The report should cover the acquisition, maintenance, and operating costs for the technology; how costs can be mitigated by any marketable byproducts, such as nitrogen, phosphorous, electricity, etc.; the cost of processing remaining materials to avoid contamination of soil, water, or air; and the ability to adapt the equipment for various size of dairies.

(3) When providing funding for specific technologies, the commission shall enter into appropriate agreements to support the state's interest in advancing innovation solutions to environmental issues while ensuring compliance with Article VIII, section 5 and Article XII, section 9 of the state Constitution.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment 2017-19 (92000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas 2017-19 (92000012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program 2017-19 (92000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(2) The commission will, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and development of the regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,752,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

CREP PIP Loan Program 2017-19 (92000014)

Appropriation:

Conservation Assistance Revolving Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$200,000

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3134 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Appropriation:

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,680,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Spring Hatchery Renovation (30000214)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$93,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,410,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,903,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,699,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,547,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$105,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,167,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,584,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,084,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wallace River Hatchery - Replace Intakes and Ponds (30000660)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Cooperative Elk Damage Fencing (30000662)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hazard Fuel Reductions, Forest Health and Ecosystem Improvement (30000665)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$132,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$15,673,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hoodsport Hatchery Adult Pond Renovation (30000686)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,756,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation (30000756)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$9,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works - Programmatic (30000782)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must submit the completed feasibility study report to the office of financial management and the legislature by October 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,660,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$615,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,921,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

PSNERP Match (30000846)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$4,950,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,590,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$8,540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$428,676,000

TOTAL. . . .$437,216,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Replace Raceways and P A System (30000848)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,463,000

TOTAL. . . .$7,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (91000151)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clarks Creek Hatchery Rebuild (92000038)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to rebuild the Clarks creek (Puyallup) hatchery and fulfill Washington department of transportation mitigation requirements as agreed to with the Puyallup Indian nation for the widening of Interstate 5. The new hatchery must be devoted to salmon production. The department must relocate trout production to other hatcheries.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$11,420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$11,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding 2017-19 (92000048)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal. . . .$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local. . . .$1,000,000

State Wildlife Account—State. . . .$500,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$67,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (30000261)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,302,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Fire Communications Base Stations & Mountain Top Repeaters (30000262)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,640,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Sustainable Recreation (30000263)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Replacement (30000264)

Appropriation:

Resources Management Cost Account—State. . . .$30,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement—State. . . .$30,000,000

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$61,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$61,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000266)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Puget SoundCorps (30000267)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (30000269)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely to the department of natural resources to transfer from trust status certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for state parks, fish and wildlife habitats, natural area preserves, natural resources conservation areas, department of natural resources community forest open spaces, or recreation purposes. The approved property for transfer is identified in the LEAP capital document no. 2017-2H, developed June 30, 2017.

(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value. By September 30, 2018, the department must deposit in the common school construction account the portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties. This transfer must be made in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the value of the land transferred must be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.

(3) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations. Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs, and may not exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.

(4) By June 30, 2018, land within the common school trust shall be exchanged for land of equal value held for other trust beneficiaries of the property identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section. Fee transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that perpetually restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are compatible with the originally intended public purpose and the department and legislature approves such uses.

(6) The department shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section.

(7) By June 30, 2019, the state treasurer shall transfer to the common school construction account any unexpended balance of the appropriation in this section.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State Forest Land Replacement (30000277)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $60,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to assess options to replace timber trust revenues for counties with populations of twenty-five thousand or fewer that are subject to timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act. The department must consult with the qualifying counties and other stakeholders in conducting the assessment. The department shall report the findings of its assessment, including recommendations for addressing decreased revenues from state forestlands and improving the forest products economy in the qualifying counties, by December 15, 2017.

(2)(a) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely to the department to transfer from state forestland status to natural resources conservation area status certain state forestlands in counties:

(i) With a population of twenty-five thousand or fewer; and

(ii) With risks of timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species act.

(b) This appropriation must be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forestlands in the qualifying counties.

(3) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy replacement state forestland, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.

(4) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department shall execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (2) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties identified in subsection (2) of this section must include terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.

(5) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of this section. The department will identify eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsections (2) and (3) of this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and will not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2017-2019 Minor Works Preservation (30000278)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program (FREP) (30000279)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$27,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (RHOSP) (30000284)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$15,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2017-2019 Minor Works Programmatic (30000287)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,990,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway Working Forest (30000289)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (30000290)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,300,000 is provided solely to: Reduce hazards to public safety; establish new firewise communities; implement forest health treatments, prioritized pursuant to chapter 76.06 RCW as amended in chapter 95, Laws of 2017 and chapter 248, Laws of 2017, on state lands and state forestlands, high-risk private lands, and federal lands, including implementation of the "good neighbor" agreement signed with the United States forest service and "good neighbor" cross boundary competitive grants to forest collaboratives; and implement at least one controlled burning treatment project.

(2) $1,000,000 is provided solely to administer the forest health treatments pursuant to subsection (1) of this section with the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must contract with the Washington conservation corps, to include veterans, to provide forest health treatments that may include providing thinning, pruning, and brush disposal, and other firewise services; and

(b) The department must work in conjunction with communities, counties, fire districts, and conservation districts in implementing firewise activities.

(3) $250,000 is provided solely for the forest collaborative infrastructure pilot, which will provide contract services, such as technical analysis, facilitation, and logistical support.

(4) $1,000,000 is provided solely for state trust land reforestation in wildfire-damaged areas.

(5) $450,000 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 248, Laws of 2017 (prioritizing lands to receive forest health treatments).

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$78,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$91,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Federal ESA Mitigation Grants (91000087)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Statewide Stormwater & Impervious Surface Study (91000088)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the Washington State University-Puyallup research and extension center, to conduct a statewide stormwater and impervious surface study of its facilities. The department shall report its findings and recommendations, including a statewide strategy to mitigate impacts of stormwater and impervious surfaces of its facilities in the most cost-effective manner, by October 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Public School Seismic Safety Assessment (91000091)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department, in consultation with the office of emergency management, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education, shall develop a prioritized seismic risk assessment that includes seismic safety surveys of public facilities that are subject to high seismic risk as a consequence of high earthquake hazard and soils that amplify that hazard. The seismic safety surveys must be conducted for the following types of public facilities in the following order:

(a) Facilities that have a capacity of two hundred fifty or more persons and are routinely used for student activities by kindergarten through twelfth grade public schools; and

(b) Fire stations located within a one-mile radius of a facility described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(2) The initial phase of the prioritized seismic needs assessment of the facilities specified in subsections (1)(a) and (b) shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) An on-site assessment, under the supervision of licensed geologists, of the seismic site class of the soils at the facilities;

(b) An on-site inspection of the facility buildings, including structural systems using structural plans where available, condition, maintenance, and nonstructural seismic hazards following standardized methods by licensed structural engineers;

(c) An estimate of costs to retrofit facilities specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section to life safety standards as defined by the American society of civil engineers; and

(d) An estimate of costs to retrofit facilities specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section to immediate occupancy standards as defined by the American society of civil engineers.

(3) The department shall develop geographic information system databases of survey data and must share that data with the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate legislative committees.

(4) The statewide seismic needs assessment specified in this section shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Legacy 2017-19 (92000032)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Craft Brewing and Distilling Center (91000006)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Grants to Improve Safety and Access at Fairs (92000003)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Stormwater Remediation (30000030)

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Aviation Revitalization Loans (92000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for deposit into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account created in section 7028 of this act for direct loans to political subdivisions of the state and privately owned airports for the purpose of improvements at public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities.

(2) The department must convene a community aviation revitalization board to develop criteria for selecting loan recipients, to develop a process for evaluating applications, and to make decisions. The board must consist of the capital budget chair and ranking minority member of the capital budget committee of the house of representatives and the senate ways and means committee, and a representative from both the department of transportation's aviation division and the department of commerce. The board must also consist of the following members appointed by the secretary of transportation: One port district official, one county official, one city official, one representative of airport managers, and one representative of pilots. The chair of the board must be selected by the secretary of transportation. The members of the board must elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director of commerce and the secretary of transportation must serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3) The board may provide loans to privately owned airports for the purpose of airport improvements only if the state is receiving commensurate public benefit, such as guaranteed long-term public access to the airport as a condition of the loan. For purposes of this subsection, "public use airports that primarily support general aviation activities" means all public use airports not listed as having more than fifty thousand annual commercial air service passenger enplanements as published by the federal aviation administration.

(4) An application for loan funds under this section must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. When evaluating loan applications, the board must prioritize applications that provide conclusive justification that completion of the loan application project will create revenue-generating opportunities. The board is not limited to, but must also use, the following expected outcome conditions when evaluating loan applications:

(a) A specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the aviation facility improvement is made;

(b) The loan application project results in the creation of jobs or private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(c) The loan application project improves opportunities for the successful maintenance, operation, or expansion of an airport or adjacent airport business park;

(d) The loan application project results in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(e) The loan application project results in leveraging additional federal funding for an airport.

(5) The repayment of any loan made from the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account under the contracts for aviation loans must be paid into the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Emergency Repairs and Equal Access Grants for K-12 Public Schools (30000182)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $3,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for urgent repair grants to address non-reoccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $200,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems; abatement of potentially hazardous materials; and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $100,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids/Healthy Schools (30000184)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts and the department of health, shall develop criteria for providing funding for specific projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools may apply for grants but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation;

(b) Any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and

(c) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(2) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the appropriation may be used for the replacement of lead-contaminated drinking water fixtures.

(3) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the appropriation may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's physical health and may include, but is not limited to: Fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation.

(4) A maximum of $250,000 of the appropriation may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's awareness and participation in sustaining efficient schools and may include, but is not limited to: Dashboards that display energy savings, composting systems, and recycling stations.

(5) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's nutrition and may include, but is not limited to: Garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skill Centers - Minor Works (30000187)

Appropriation:

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skill Center - Core Growth (30000197)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: This project must undergo a budget evaluation study, using a budget evaluation study team approach incorporating value engineering techniques. Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of financial management through an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to cover the cost of the study.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Classrooms and Labs (30000203)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,800,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Federal Way school district to merge STEM facilities.

(2) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the contract with the statewide STEM organization described in subsection (5) of this section.

(3) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide STEM classrooms and labs grants to school districts for public school facilities serving students in grades nine through twelve, or any combination thereof, to construct classrooms, or labs, as additions to existing school buildings or to modernize specialized STEM facilities.

(4) The superintendent shall award grants to school districts under the following conditions:

(a) Districts eligible to receive STEM classrooms and labs grants include:

(i) Districts that demonstrate a lack of sufficient space of STEM classrooms or labs to provide opportunities for students to meet statutory graduation requirements;

(ii) Districts that demonstrate that their current STEM classrooms or labs are insufficient to provide opportunities for students to meet statutory graduation requirements;

(iii) Districts that have not received state capital funding assistance in the previous ten years for the STEM classrooms or labs project proposals; and

(iv) Districts that have secured private donations of cash, like-kind, or equipment in a value of no less than $100,000. Prior to receiving grant funding, the district must provide verification of the donation to the superintendent within ninety days of notification of grant award.

(b) Allowable project costs under the grant program include design, renovation, or modernization of existing science labs or classrooms; project management costs; furnishings, fixtures, and equipment; and necessary utility and information technology systems upgrades to support specialized STEM facilities.

(c) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in southwest Washington;

(d) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in the Puget Sound region; and

(e) At least two grant awards are made to school districts located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

(5) The STEM classrooms and labs grants program must be administered by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance specified in RCW 28A.188.030 and the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050. The superintendent of public instruction must develop grant application materials and criteria in consultation with the statewide STEM organization, must review applications for accuracy and financial reasonableness, and must administer awarded grants. With funding specifically appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction must contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050 to evaluate applications against the criteria developed for the program and develop a single prioritized list. The superintendent of public instruction must award grants within the appropriated funding and may depart from the recommended prioritized list only after consulting with the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Priority for school districts that have experienced decreased enrollments of more than ten percent over the previous five year period due to interdistrict transfers to schools with STEM facilities constructed or modernized in that same period of time;

(b) Priority for applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program;

(c) Economic conditions within the school district that limits their ability to finance the modernization of STEM classrooms and labs from local funding sources;

(d) Educational benefits of proposed projects;

(e) Age and condition of existing STEM classroom and lab space, if applicable;

(f) The extent that existing STEM facilities are inadequate including the lack of adequate STEM facilities to meet graduation requirements in RCW 28A.150.220;

(g) Financial reasonableness based on total project cost per square foot; and

(h) Demonstration of readiness to proceed that may include, but is not limited to:

(i) A demonstration that existing STEM faculty are in place and are qualified to deliver an interactive, project-based STEM curriculum in the proposed specialized STEM facilities; or

(ii) A plan and budget in place to recruit or train such STEM faculty.

(6) For purposes of grant applications made in the 2017-2019 biennium, additional square footage funded through this grant program is excluded from the school district's inventory of available educational space for determining eligibility for state assistance for new construction until the earlier of:

(a) Five years following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors; or

(b) The date of the final review of the latest study and survey of the affected school district following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors.

(7) Each school district is limited to one grant award, which may be used for more than one school facility within the district, of no more than $2,000,000.

(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may charge fees consistent with capital budget guidelines established by the office of financial management for administering the grants.

(9) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$93,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$672,423,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$255,581,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$1,559,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$932,563,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,136,856,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,069,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (40000007)

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$3,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,097,000

TOTAL. . . .$16,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Career and Technical Education Equipment Grants (91000408)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $72,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Bellevue school district for career and technical education equipment.

(2) $50,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Issaquah school district for career and technical education equipment.

(3) $30,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Elma school district for career and technical education equipment.

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide career and technical education equipment grants to school districts. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with school districts and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop criteria for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the following priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools must demonstrate that the request provides necessary equipment to deliver career and technical education;

(b) Districts or schools must demonstrate a consistent commitment to maintaining school facilities and equipment by participating in the asset preservation program administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(c) Prioritizing applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program.

(5) The superintendent must award grants to applicants on a first-come, first-serve basis if the district or school demonstrates that the request meets the criteria set by the office of superintendent of public instruction as described in subsection (4) of this section and the site is prepared to receive the equipment.

(6) No single district may receive more than $100,000 of the appropriation.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Small Rural District Modernization Grants (92000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for grants to assist small, rural school districts with total enrollments of one thousand students or less, with school facilities with significant building systems deficiencies, and with such low property values that replacing or modernizing the school facility through the school construction assistance program would present an extraordinary tax burden on property owners or would exceed allowable debt for the district.

(2) $11,198,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for projects in small rural districts where the school facility does not need to be replaced or require an extensive modernization, but does have significant building system deficiencies. Grants may not exceed $5,000,000. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare an expedited grant application process in selecting the grant recipients funded by this subsection.

(3) $23,802,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:

Mount Adams School District. . . .$14,277,000

South Bend School District. . . .$7,712,000

Lopez Island School District. . . .$1,813,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $20,086,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for Seattle public schools to address challenges related to extraordinary growth and to maintain and repair existing buildings.

(2) $1,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Black Diamond elementary school.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$21,186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Agricultural Science in Schools Grant to FFA Foundation (92000122)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Everett Pathways to Medical Education (92000123)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2017-19 Campus Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,755,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

2017-19 Minor Public Works (30000029)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$307,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,307,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Burke Museum (20082850)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$24,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,800,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma (20102002)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for predesign, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits.

(2) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(3) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7009 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$51,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$54,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health Sciences Education - T-Wing Renovation/Addition (30000486)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$50,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

2017-19 Minor Works - Preservation (30000736)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$30,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$304,108,000

TOTAL. . . .$334,583,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$14,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$44,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Evans School - Parrington Hall Renovation (30000810)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Population Health Sciences Building (30000811)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000019)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$103,300,000

TOTAL. . . .$129,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - Plant Sciences Building (REC#5) (30000519)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$52,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Vancouver - Life Sciences Building (30000840)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building

Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$58,500,000

TOTAL. . . .$59,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Tri-Cities - Academic Building (30001190)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$27,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Global Animal Health Building (30001322)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$36,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$59,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Washington State University Pullman - STEM Teaching Labs (30001326)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building

Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$19,600,000

TOTAL. . . .$20,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

2017-19 Minor Works - Preservation (MCR) (30001342)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—State. . . .$22,295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$22,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000037)

Appropriation:

Washington State University Building

Account—State. . . .$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Joint Center for Deployment and Research in Earth Abundant Materials (91000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding is provided solely for capital improvements, infrastructure, and equipment, to support: (a) A transformative program in earth-abundant materials to accelerate the development of next generation clean energy and transportation technologies in Washington; (b) a coordinated framework and resources that can facilitate and promote multi-institution collaborations to drive research, development, and deployment efforts in the use of earth-abundant materials for manufactured clean technologies or recycling of advanced materials used in clean technologies; and (c) environmentally responsible processes in the areas of manufacturing and recycling of advanced materials used in clean technologies.

(2) Administration of the appropriation is under the authority of Washington State University in collaboration with the University of Washington. Washington State University and the University of Washington, in consultation with the regional universities, the Pacific Northwest national laboratory, and industry experts, shall develop criteria for providing grant funding for specific projects at public four-year institutions of higher education to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section. Funding for administrative offices may be provided for administrative offices west of the crest of the Cascade mountains only.

(3) The office of the state treasurer must manage the issuance of bonds associated with these grants so as to incur the lowest possible cost of funds in recognition of the short useful life of the equipment purchased with the bond proceeds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Engineering Building (30000556)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,695,000

TOTAL. . . .$57,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Interdisciplinary Science Center (30000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$67,009,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$67,009,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Maintenance/Backlog Reduction (30000615)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (91000019)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$28,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (91000021)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$26,400,000

TOTAL. . . .$49,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000783)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$33,915,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000017)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000612)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,803,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,633,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Critical Power, Safety, and Security Systems (30000613)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Health and Counseling Center (30000614)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,100,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (91000010)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$37,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Access Control Security Upgrades (30000604)

Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Sciences Building Addition & Renovation (30000768)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$85,568,000

TOTAL. . . .$91,568,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2017-19 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000769)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$6,180,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$470,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$6,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Elevator Preservation Safety and ADA Upgrades (30000772)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,188,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$3,188,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000781)

Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$6,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$36,179,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000010)

Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,456,000

TOTAL. . . .$18,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000288)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Adventuress Centennial Restoration Project. . . .$394,000

The Paramount Theatre Upgrades. . . .$573,000

Stimson-Green Mansion Rehabilitation. . . .$193,000

German American Bank Building Restoration. . . .$45,000

Capitol Theater Roof Replacement and Awning Restoration. . . .$118,000

Fort Ward Community Hall (Heritage Bakery Building). . . .$92,000

Lighthouse No. 83 (Swiftsure) Rehabilitation. . . .$299,000

Gladish Community and Cultural Center Restoration. . . .$131,000

University Heights Center Historic Preservation. . . .$750,000

Railroads, Waterfowl, Field Trips and Family Outings. . . .$497,000

Fort Worden's Historic Warehouses Rehabilitation. . . .$750,000

Yamasaki Courtyard Renewal Project. . . .$30,000

Longview Shay Pavilion Completion. . . .$60,000

5th Avenue Theatre Upgrade. . . .$750,000

Museum of Flight Roof Repair Project. . . .$376,000

Tumwater Old Brewhouse Tower Rehabilitation. . . .$507,000

Historic Purse Seiner Shenandoah Restoration.. . . .$58,000

The Quincy Valley Community Heritage Barn. . . .$205,000

Georgetown Steam Plant Historic Concrete Restoration. . . .$750,000

Pacific Northwest Railroad Archives Bldg Energy

Efficiencies & Security. . . .$52,000

Tollgate Farmhouse Rehabilitation. . . .$279,000

Illuminating the Balfour Dock Building. . . .$560,000

Port Hadlock Heritage Campus - Growing Public Access

to Traditional Boatbuilding Skills & Education. . . .$360,000

The Old Hotel Art Gallery Renovation & Upgrades. . . .$56,000

Kirkman House Museum. . . .$90,000

Northwest Railway Museum - Restoring the Golden Age of

Rail Travel.. . . .$201,000

Cornish Playhouse Theater Renovation. . . .$354,000

Mount Baker Community Club Energy and Life

Safety Improvements. . . .$141,000

Hubble House Restoration. . . .$41,000

Nikkei Heritage Association of Washington - Facilities

Preservation and Long Term Operations Plan. . . .$21,000

Princess Theater and the Green Room at the Princess

Rehabilitation. . . .$114,000

M.V. Lotus Deck Replacement. . . .$29,000

Woodland Theatre Repair and Restoration. . . .$44,000

Pacific County Historical Society - Annex Storage Building. . . .$32,000

Historic Schooner Suva Preservation. . . .$34,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$8,986,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,986,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Strategic Facility Master Plan (40000004)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (40000001)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: North County Satellite (30000135)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$5,212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$48,603,000

TOTAL. . . .$53,815,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds Community College: Science, Engineering, Technology Bldg (30000137)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$37,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$37,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$33,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$33,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Big Bend: Professional - Technical Education Center (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$35,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$35,063,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for predesign and design, which may also serve as bridging documents, design, competition honoraria, project management, and other planning activities including permits.

(2) Criteria for selecting the design-build contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs, or energy use index. Contractors and architectural and engineering firms may be eligible for additional points during the scoring process if they have experience with the state agency, or if they are considered a small business.

(3) The building must be built using sustainable building standards as defined in section 7009 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$24,919,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$24,919,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$23,372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$23,372,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,772,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,048,000

TOTAL. . . .$31,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic: Shop Building Renovation (30000986)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$929,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,368,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation - Phase 3 (30000987)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$29,982,000

TOTAL. . . .$33,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,873,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$39,208,000

TOTAL. . . .$42,358,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$35,972,000

TOTAL. . . .$39,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30001291)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$91,200,000

TOTAL. . . .$114,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (30001293)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$8,433,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$8,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (30001294)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,218,000

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$25,458,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$26,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,676,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (30001295)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,166,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,166,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (30001368)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$26,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (30001369)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$21,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$34,728,000

TOTAL. . . .$37,494,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle College Student Housing (92000028)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the college to implement the initial steps for student housing.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

(End of part)

PART 6

RESERVED

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are forty-three million five hundred ninety-three thousand dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, two hundred seventy-four million nine hundred ninety-two thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, and three hundred eighty-four million four hundred seventy-five thousand dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services:

(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $5,323,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to repair the east plaza garage in Olympia.

(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for Tacoma Rhodes elevators.

(4) Washington state patrol:

(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for furnishings and equipment at the 1063 building.

(5) Department of labor and industries: Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to modernize a lab and training facility.

(6) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Cascadia College for up to $29,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a parking structure.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Community College for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire property in Renton.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Seattle College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student wellness and fitness center.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $31,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build student housing.

(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park Technical College for up to $33,288,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a center for advanced manufacturing technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003. To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000, or $10,000,000 for higher education institutions, may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. The results of life-cycle cost analysis must be a primary consideration in the selection of a building design. Construction may proceed only upon providing to the office of financial management the life-cycle costs. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004. (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.

(2) Agencies shall develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative must be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.

(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.

(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be determined by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

(5) The transfer authority granted in this section does not apply to appropriations for projects for the state parks and recreation commission. Appropriations for commission projects may be spent only for the specified projects, and funding may not be transferred from one commission project to another or from other sources to a commission project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. (1) Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(a) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Considers all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(b) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(c) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, reduce the energy use by fifty percent below prerenovations baseline.

(d) On-site renewable energy: Meet at least thirty percent of the hot water demand through the installation of solar hot water heaters, when life-cycle cost effective. Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(e) Measurement and verification: Install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(f) Benchmarking: Compare actual performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool for laboratory buildings. Web-based data collection and dashboards must also be provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011. Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2017-2019 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $150,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

Sec. 7013. RCW 28B.10.027 and 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6008 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission with the approval of the board of regents or trustees for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) For projects funded in the 2015-2017 capital budget and the 2017-2019 capital budget, an institution of higher education, working with the Washington arts commission, may expend up to ten percent of the projected art allocation for a project during the design phase in order to select an artist and design art to be integrated in the building design. The one-half of one percent to be expended by the Washington arts commission must be adjusted downward by the amount expended by a university or college during the design phase of the capital project.

(3) The works of art may be placed on public lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, detached within or outside a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.

(4) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other buildings of a temporary nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7015. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter . . ., Laws of 2017 (Substitute House Bill No. 1080, the general obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7018. COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS. Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account to the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be made.

Sec. 7019. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7025 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7020. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7028 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7021. (1) Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be allotted until final project lists are submitted to the office of financial management. Revisions to the project lists are allowed for projects not anticipated at the time of budget development but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment and must include an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be expended on the revisions. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(2)(a) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. All projects must meet the criteria included in this subsection (2)(a). These projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

(b) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7022. STATE TREASURER TRANSFER AUTHORITY

State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account, $13,000,000 for

fiscal year 2018 and $13,000,000 for fiscal year 2019. . . .$26,000,000

Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

environmental legacy stewardship account, $15,250,000 in

fiscal year 2018 and $15,250,000 in fiscal year 2019. . . .$30,500,000

(1)(a) As directed by the department of ecology in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer amounts among the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account as needed during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium to maintain positive account balances in all three accounts.

(b) If, after using the interfund transfer authority granted in this section, the department of ecology determines that further reductions are needed to maintain positive account balances in the state toxics control account, the local toxics control account, and the environmental legacy stewardship account, the department is authorized to delay the start of any projects based on acuity of need, readiness to proceed, cost-efficiency, purposes of increasing affordable housing, or need to ensure geographic distribution. If the department uses this authority, the department must submit a prioritized list of projects that may be delayed to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) As directed by the pollution liability insurance agency in consultation with the office of financial management, the state treasurer shall transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account to the underground storage tank revolving account the lesser of $20,000,000 or the balance of the fund exceeding $7,500,000 after excluding the reserves during the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7023. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7024. The energy efficiency account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the energy recovery act account shall be appropriated and expended for loans, loan guarantees, and grants for projects that encourage the establishment and use of innovative and sustainable industries for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology. The balance of state funds, federal funds, and loan repayments, from the energy recovery act account, are deposited in this account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7025. The department of enterprise services must sell the property known as Tacoma Rhodes complex for at least fair market value. The property consists of the Broadway building, the market building, and the parking garage. The department must use the surplus property operations requirements for the sale process in RCW 43.17.400. The department must retain federal obligations and may retain appraisal costs, debt service, and closing costs. The remaining net proceeds from the sale must be deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7026. JOINT LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON IMPROVING STATE FUNDING FOR SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION. (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on improving state funding for school construction is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate from the senate committees on ways and means and early learning and K-12 education.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives from the house of representatives committees on capital budget and education.

(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall ensure that at least three of the eight members appointed pursuant to (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection serve legislative districts located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(iv) The chair of the task force selected pursuant to (b) of this subsection may appoint one additional member representing large school districts and one additional member representing small, rural school districts as voting members of the task force.

(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership. The chair of the house of representatives committee on capital budget shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. All meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the requirements of both the senate and the house of representatives.

(2) The task force shall review the following issues:

(a) Improvements to state financial assistance for K-12 school construction to be implemented over several fiscal biennia;

(b) Utilization of school spaces for multiple purposes;

(c) School design and construction approaches that support effective teaching and learning by delivering education through innovative, sustainable, cost-effective, and enduring design and construction methods; and

(d) Recent reports on school construction, including but not limited to the school construction cost study from the educational service district 112 and the efforts of collecting inventory and condition of schools data by the Washington state university extension energy office.

(3) In consideration of the findings pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the task force must recommend a state school construction financial assistance program that:

(a) Supports the construction and preservation of schools; and

(b) Balances the state and local share of school construction and preservation costs considering local school districts' financial capacity, based on measures of relative wealth recommended pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section, and the state's limited bond capacity and common school trust land revenue.

(4) In making recommendations pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the task force must, at a minimum, also recommend:

(a) A methodology to project needs for state financial assistance for school construction and preservation over a ten-year period;

(b) Measures of relative wealth of a school district, including but not limited to assessed land value per student, eligible free and reduced price meal enrollments, income per capita per school district, and costs of construction;

(c) Education specifications recognized by the state for the purpose of providing guidance to school districts when designing school construction projects;

(d) A capital asset model for K-12 school construction that considers space and usage needs to calculate construction assistance for:

(i) New schools to accommodate enrollment growth;

(ii) Major modernization projects to address aging facilities;

(iii) Replacement and renewal of major building systems based on achieving lowest life-cycle building costs, provided that standards of routine maintenance are achieved by local districts; and

(iv) Specialized facility improvements including but not limited to STEM facilities, career and technical education facilities, skills centers, and computer labs; and

(e) Alternative means to fund and accommodate increased classroom capacity to meet K-3 class-size reduction objectives.

(5)(a) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial management shall cooperate with the task force and maintain liaison representatives, who are nonvoting members.

(c) The task force, where appropriate, may consult with individuals from public schools or related organizations or ask the individuals to establish a committee for technical advice and assistance. Members of such an advisory committee are not entitled to expense reimbursement.

(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(8) The task force must report its preliminary findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017. The task force must report its final findings and recommendations to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2018.

(9) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 7027. RCW 43.19.501 and 2016 c 202 s 58 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by the department in Thurston county. ((For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for predesign identified in section 1037, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.)) For the 2015-2017 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for studies related to real estate.

((During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the Thurston county capital facilities account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.)) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the Thurston county capital facilities account may be appropriated for costs associated with staffing to support capital budget and project activities and lease and facility oversight activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7028. The public use general aviation airport loan revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys collected under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes described in section 4002 of this act. Only the community aviation revitalization board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7029. The Washington state parks and recreation commission, with guidance and instruction from the office of financial management, must create a reporting structure to track the success and progress of addressing the maintenance backlog of state parks facilities. The reporting structure must provide a forecast of new project proposals, the status of current funded projects and a list of completed projects. The report must also include a facilities condition index that illustrates changes to the overall quality of facilities of state parks. The legislature intends to receive future biennia capital budget requests that address facility maintenance backlog from the commission in the form of this new report structure as additional information to the current format for agency budget submittal requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7030. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT-WATER RESOURCES PROJECT ACCOUNT

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure into the water resources project account created in chapter . . . (Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5239), Laws of 2017 (water availability). Moneys in the account are provided solely for water infrastructure projects, or projects designed to measure or improve stream flow. If the section of chapter . . . (Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5239), Laws of 2017 creating the water resources project account does not become law by August 31, 2017, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7031. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7032. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---