BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50A.--.--- and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Employees are eligible for family and medical leave benefits as provided in this chapter after working for at least eight hundred twenty hours in employment during the qualifying period.

(2)(a) Employees may opt out of the family and medical leave provisions provided in this chapter either prior to January 1, 2018, and annually thereafter by December 31st of each year, or within thirty days of being hired by a new employer.

(b) Employees who have elected to opt out of the family and medical leave provisions are not liable for the payment of any premiums assessed under RCW 50A.--.--- (section 8, chapter 5, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.). Employers of employees who opt out of the family and medical leave provisions are also not liable for the payment of any premiums assessed for that employee under RCW 50A.--.--- (section 8, chapter 5, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.).

--- END ---