BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.42.100 and 2005 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a controlled substance if the person knowingly or intentionally permits a dependent child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale, or have contact with ((methamphetamine or)) a Schedule I or Schedule II controlled substance under chapter 69.50 RCW including ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or anhydrous ammonia, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, that are being used in the manufacture of methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. Endangerment with a controlled substance does not include exposure, ingestion, inhalation, or contact with a controlled substance as administered pursuant to a prescription for a dependent child or dependent adult as outlined in chapter 69.50 RCW.

(2) Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.

--- END ---