BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislative authority of a city with a population of ten thousand persons or less may impose a fee on the furnishing of lodging to be used exclusively for the purposes of public safety and public works.

(2) In no case may the rate under this section be in excess of three dollars per night of stay.

(3) A legislative authority must contract, prior to the effective date of an ordinance imposing a lodging fee under this section, for the administration and collection of the fee by the state department of revenue. The department may deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, for administration.

(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(b) "Public safety" means law enforcement services, emergency medical services, and fire protection services.

(c) "Public works" means new construction, reconstruction, and expansion of roads, streets, and other transportation infrastructure.

--- END ---