BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that dependent children with high acuity behavioral and mental health needs require robust and consistent behavioral rehabilitation services in order to address their needs and ensure stable, permanent outcomes. The legislature also finds that a reliable network of providers is critical to ensuring our highest needs children receive prompt and appropriate services. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that behavioral rehabilitation services rates are established that are sufficient to assure there is enough provider capacity to serve the highest needs children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The children and families services program, of the department of social and health services through June 30, 2018, and of the department of children, youth, and families effective July 1, 2018, shall facilitate a stakeholder work group in a collaborative effort to design a behavioral rehabilitation services rate payment methodology that is based on actual provider costs of care. The work group may consider the findings of a contracted rate analysis in designing the methodology. By November 30, 2018, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of children, youth, and families must submit a report with the final work group findings to the appropriate legislative committees.

(2) This section expires December 31, 2018.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.88C.010 and 2015 c 128 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.

(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:

(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support;

(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) The number of children who are eligible, as defined in RCW ((43.215.405)) 43.216.505, to participate in, and the number of children actually served by, the early childhood education and assistance program.

(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary assistance for needy families and the working connections child care programs as a courtesy.

(9) The caseload forecast council shall forecast youth participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 separately from other children who are residing in foster care and who are under eighteen years of age.

(10) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of youth expected to receive behavioral rehabilitation services while involved in the foster care system.

(11) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter, expenditures for behavioral rehabilitation services placements must be forecasted and budgeted as maintenance level costs.

--- END ---