BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.94.040 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 95 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a city shall determine, by resolution of its legislative authority, that any lands, property, or equipment originally acquired for public utility purposes is surplus to the city's needs and is not required for providing continued public utility service and has an estimated value of greater than fifty thousand dollars, then such legislative authority by resolution and after a public hearing may cause such lands, property, or equipment to be leased, sold, or conveyed. Such resolution shall state the fair market value or the rent or consideration to be paid and such other terms and conditions for such disposition as the legislative authority deems to be in the best public interest.

The provisions of RCW 35.94.020 and 35.94.030 shall not apply to dispositions authorized by this section. The provisions of this section and RCW 35.94.020 and 35.94.030 shall not apply to the disposition of any lands, property, or equipment originally acquired for public utility purposes that is surplus to the city's needs and is not required for providing continued public utility service and has an estimated value of fifty thousand dollars or less.

--- END ---