BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes the increasing strain on road infrastructure in the Puget Sound area and the need for alternative strategies to provide reliable regional travel times. The legislature also recognizes the unique geography of the Puget Sound area and the potential to further utilize its waterways as travel options.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The department shall complete a consultant study on the feasibility, need, and potential governance and funding structures for passenger-only ferry service between the cities of Olympia and Seattle. The study shall include consideration of a direct fast service and a slower service with additional limited stops. The department shall work with stakeholders, including origin and destination transit agencies, cities, and transportation planning organizations, and submit a final study to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 7, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2018, in the supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---