BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) ((At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2015-2017 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by August 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.)) Section 5 of this act applies to the appropriations in chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. and chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Sec. 2. 2018 c 2 s 7012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) ((At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2017-2019 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. Art allocations not expended within the ensuing two biennia will lapse. The commission may use up to $150,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(5) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 15th. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.)) Section 5 of this act applies to the appropriations in chapter 2, Laws of 2018.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.10.027 and 2018 c 2 s 7013 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission with the approval of the board of regents or trustees for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) For projects funded in the ((2015-2017 capital budget and the 2017-2019)) capital budget, an institution of higher education, working with the Washington state arts commission, may expend up to ten percent of the projected art allocation for a project during the design phase in order to select an artist and design art to be integrated in the building design. The one-half of one percent to be expended by the Washington state arts commission must be adjusted downward by the amount expended by a university or college during the design phase of the capital project.

(3) The works of art may be placed on public lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, detached within or outside a public building or structure of institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.

(4) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other buildings of a temporary nature.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All state agencies including all state departments, boards, councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) For projects funded in the capital budget, a state agency, working with the Washington state arts commission, may expend up to ten percent of the projected art allocation for a project during the design phase in order to select an artist and design art to be integrated in the building design. The one-half of one percent to be expended by the Washington state arts commission must be adjusted downward by the amount expended by a state agency during the design phase of the capital project.

(3) The works of art may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.

(4) In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include highway construction sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during each biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use up to two hundred thousand dollars of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. Art allocations lapse if not expended within the two biennia following the biennium of allocation.

(2) The executive director of the arts commission shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works of art purchased or commissioned as required by RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200. The findings of the review must be reported annually to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by September 15th of each fiscal year. The review must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Projects purchased or commissioned per biennium; (b) partner agencies; (c) funding sources by fiscal year; (d) artwork costs; (e) administrative costs; (f) collection care costs; and (g) project status.

--- END ---