BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.21C.470 and 2015 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department (([of ecology])) of ecology must amend the categorical exemption available to Washington department of transportation projects under WAC 197-11-800(26) as of July 24, 2015, so that the same categorical exemption applies to structurally deficient city, town, or county bridge repair or replacement projects.

(2) For purposes of this section, "structurally deficient" means a bridge that is classified as in poor condition under the state bridge condition rating system and ((is reported by the state to the national bridge inventory as having)) has a deck, superstructure, or substructure rating of four or below. Structurally deficient bridges are characterized by deteriorated conditions of significant bridge elements and potentially reduced load-carrying capacity. Bridges deemed structurally deficient typically require significant maintenance and repair to remain in service, and require major rehabilitation or replacement to address the underlying deficiency.

--- END ---