BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 15.74.060 and 1991 c 67 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

To provide for permanent funding of the Washington hardwoods commission, agricultural commodity assessments shall be levied by the commission on processors of hardwoods.

An assessment is hereby levied on hardwood processors operating within the state of Washington. The assessment ((categories)) shall be based on the hardwood processor's production per calendar quarter. The assessment shall be ((levied based upon the following schedule:

CATEGORY

QUARTERLY

PRODUCTION

(THOUSAND TONS)

QUARTERLY

ASSESSMENT

1

5 to 7.5

$ 150

2

7.5 to 15

$ 300

3

15 to 25

$ 600

4

25 to 35

$ 900

5

35 to 45

$ 1,200

6

45 to 62.5

$ 1,500

7

62.5 to 82.5

$ 2,250

8

82.5 to 125

$ 3,000

9

125 to 175

$ 4,500

10

175 to 250

$ 6,000

11

250 to 350

$ 9,000

12

350 to 450

$12,000

13

450 to 625

$15,000

14

625 to 875

$22,500

15

875 to 1125

$30,000

16

Over 1125

$35,000))

four cents per ton produced.

The commission may develop by rule formulas for converting other units of measure to ((thousands of)) tons of production for determining the appropriate production ((category)) per calendar quarter. The assessment shall be calculated based upon calendar quarters ((with the first assessment period beginning July 1, 1991)). Beginning July 1, 2019, and every July 1st thereafter, the assessment must be adjusted to reflect the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce by September 25th of the year before the assessments are payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---