BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 80.60.020 and 2007 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An electric utility:

(a) Shall offer to make net metering available to eligible customers-generators on a first-come, first-served basis until the cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems equals 0.25 percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996. On January 1, 2014, the cumulative generating capacity available to net metering systems will equal ((0.5)) four percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996. Not less than one-half of the utility's 1996 peak demand available for net metering systems shall be reserved for the cumulative generating capacity attributable to net metering systems that generate renewable energy;

(b) Shall allow net metering systems to be interconnected using a standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of electricity in two directions, unless the commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment:

(i) That the use of additional metering equipment to monitor the flow of electricity in each direction is necessary and appropriate for the interconnection of net metering systems, after taking into account the benefits and costs of purchasing and installing additional metering equipment; and

(ii) How the cost of purchasing and installing an additional meter is to be allocated between the customer-generator and the utility;

(c) Shall charge the customer-generator a minimum monthly fee that is the same as other customers of the electric utility in the same rate class, but shall not charge the customer-generator any additional standby, capacity, interconnection, or other fee or charge unless the commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment that:

(i) The electric utility will incur direct costs associated with interconnecting or administering net metering systems that exceed any offsetting benefits associated with these systems; and

(ii) Public policy is best served by imposing these costs on the customer-generator rather than allocating these costs among the utility's entire customer base.

(2) If a production meter and software is required by the electric utility to provide meter aggregation under RCW 80.60.030(4), the customer-generator is responsible for the purchase of the production meter and software.

Sec. 2. RCW 80.60.030 and 2007 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, the net energy measurement must be calculated in the following manner:

(1) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity produced or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with normal metering practices.

(2) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the electricity generated by the customer-generator and fed back to the electric utility during the billing period, the customer-generator shall be billed for the net electricity supplied by the electric utility, in accordance with normal metering practices.

(3) If electricity generated by the customer-generator exceeds the electricity supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator:

(a) Shall be billed for the appropriate customer charges for that billing period, in accordance with RCW 80.60.020; and

(b) Shall be credited for the excess kilowatt-hours generated during the billing period, with this kilowatt-hour credit appearing on the bill for the following billing period.

(4) If a customer-generator requests, an electric utility shall provide meter aggregation.

(a) For customer-generators participating in meter aggregation, kilowatt-hours credits earned by a net metering system during the billing period first shall be used to offset electricity supplied by the electric utility.

(b) Not more than a total of one hundred kilowatts shall be aggregated among all customer-generators participating in a generating facility under this subsection.

(c) Excess kilowatt-hours credits earned by the net metering system, during the same billing period, shall be credited equally by the electric utility to remaining meters located on all premises of a customer-generator at the designated rate of each meter.

(d) Meters so aggregated shall not change rate classes due to meter aggregation under this section.

(5) On ((April 30th)) March 31st of each calendar year, any remaining unused kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous year shall be granted to the electric utility to be used to assist qualified low-income residential customers of the electric utility in paying their electricity bills, without any compensation to the customer-generator.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.16.090 and 1988 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any customer billing issued by a light or power business or gas distribution business that serves a total of more than twenty thousand customers and operates within the state shall include the following information:

(1) The rates and amounts of taxes paid directly by the customer upon products or services rendered by the light and power business or gas distribution business; ((and))

(2) The rate, origin and approximate amount of each tax levied upon the revenue of the light and power business or gas distribution business and added as a component of the amount charged to the customer. Taxes based upon revenue of the light and power business or gas distribution business to be listed on the customer billing need not include taxes levied by the federal government or taxes levied under chapters 54.28, 80.24, or 82.04 RCW; and

(3) The total amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity consumed for the most recent twelve-month period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The state building code council, in consultation with the department of commerce and local governments, shall conduct a study of the state building code and adopt changes necessary to encourage greater use of renewable energy systems as defined in RCW 82.16.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) The department of commerce shall convene a work group to identify issues and laws associated with the future of net metering. The work group shall include representatives from consumer-owned utilities, investor-owned utilities, the utilities and transportation commission, the solar industry, and any other relevant participants. The department of commerce shall report the work group's recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2019. The work group recommendations must identify the specific circumstances in which changes in compensation for net metering systems would be warranted and what the policy should be for customer-generators in the same rate class. As part of the recommendations, the work group must consider the reduction in utility income associated with different levels of net metering and must consider if there are any cost shifts to ratepayers associated with net metering. The work group shall also provide an inventory of other state's net metering laws.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2020.

--- END ---