BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.112.010 and 2015 c 252 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advisory board" means the family medicine education advisory board created in RCW 70.112.080.

(2) "Affiliated" means established or developed in cooperation with the schools of medicine.

(3) "Health professional shortage areas" has the same definition as in RCW 28B.115.020.

(4) "Residency programs" means community-based residency educational programs in family medicine, either in existence or established under this chapter and that are certified by the accreditation council for graduate medical education or by the American osteopathic association.

(5) "Schools of medicine" means the University of Washington school of medicine located in Seattle, Washington; the Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences located in Yakima, Washington; the Washington State University college of medicine located in Spokane, Washington; and any other such medical schools that are accredited by the liaison committee on medical education or the American osteopathic association's commission on osteopathic college accreditation, and that locate their entire four-year medical program in Washington.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.112.080 and 2015 c 252 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a family medicine education advisory board, which must consist of the following ((eleven)) twelve members:

(a) One member appointed by the dean of the school of medicine at the University of Washington school of medicine;

(b) One member appointed by the dean of the school of medicine at the Pacific Northwest University of Health Sciences;

(c) One member appointed by the dean of the college of medicine at Washington State University;

(d) Two citizen members, one from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, to be appointed by the governor;

(((d))) (e) One member appointed by the Washington state medical association;

(((e))) (f) One member appointed by the Washington osteopathic medical association;

(((f))) (g) One member appointed by the Washington state academy of family physicians;

(((g))) (h) One hospital administrator representing those Washington hospitals with family medicine residency programs, appointed by the Washington state hospital association;

(((h))) (i) One director representing the directors of community-based family medicine residency programs, appointed by the family medicine residency network;

(((i))) (j) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house; and

(((j))) (k) One member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate.

(2) The ((two)) three members of the advisory board appointed by the deans of the schools and colleges of medicine shall serve as chairs of the advisory board.

(3) The cochairs of the advisory board, appointed by the deans of the schools of medicine, shall serve as permanent members of the advisory board without specified term limits. The deans of the schools of medicine have the authority to replace the chair representing their school. The deans of the schools of medicine shall appoint a new member in the event that the member representing their school vacates his or her position.

(4) Other members must be initially appointed as follows: Terms of the two public members must be two years; terms of the members appointed by the medical association and the hospital association must be three years; and the remaining members must be four years. Thereafter, terms for the nonpermanent members must be four years. Members may serve two consecutive terms. New appointments must be filled in the same manner as for original appointments. Vacancies must be filled for an unexpired term in the manner of the original appointment.

--- END ---