BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2019, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec. 1001. 2018 c 2 s 1006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $58,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation, $43,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation, and $5,370,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing and preservation of affordable housing. Of the amounts in this subsection:

(a) $24,370,000 is provided solely for housing projects that provide supportive housing and case-management services to persons with chronic mental illness. The department must prioritize low-income supportive housing unit proposals that provide services or include a partner community behavioral health treatment provider;

(b) $10,000,000 is provided solely for housing preservation grants or loans to be awarded competitively. The grants may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require that a capital needs assessment is performed to estimate the cost of the preservation project at contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. To receive grants, housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(i) The property is more than fifteen years old;

(ii) At least 50 percent of the housing units are occupied by families and individuals at or below 30 percent area median income.

(iii) The improvements will result in reduction of operating or utilities costs, or both; and

(iv) Other criteria that the department considers necessary to achieve the purpose of this program.

(c) $5,000,000 is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people at or below 80 percent of the area median income who have been displaced by a natural disaster declared by the governor, including people who have been displaced within the last two biennia.

(d) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the communities of concern commission to focus on creating capital assets that will help reduce poverty and build stronger and more sustainable communities using the communities' cultural understanding and vision. The funding must be used for predevelopment costs for capital projects identified by the commission and for other activities to assist communities in developing capacity to create community-owned capital assets.

(e) $1,000,000 of the Washington housing trust account—state appropriation is provided solely for a nonprofit, public development authority, local government, or housing authority to purchase the south annex properties located at 1531 Broadway, 1534 Broadway, and 909 Pine street owned by the state board of community and technical colleges. The property must be used to provide services and housing for homeless youth.

(f) $21,987,000 is provided solely for the following list of housing projects:

(i) Cross Laminated Timber Spokane Housing Predesign. . . .$500,000

(ii) El Centro de la Raza. . . .$737,000

(iii) Highland Village Preservation. . . .$1,500,000

(iv) King County Modular Housing Project. . . .(($3,000,000))

$1,500,000

(v) Nisqually Tribal Housing. . . .$1,250,000

(vi) Othello Homesight Community Center. . . .$3,000,000

(vii) $6,000,000 is provided solely for grants for high quality low-income housing projects that will quickly move people from homelessness into secure housing, and are significantly less expensive to construct than traditional housing. It is the intent of the legislature that these grants serve projects with a total project development cost per housing unit of less than $125,000, excluding the value of land, and with a commitment by the applicant to maintain the housing units for at least a twenty-five year period. Amounts provided that are subject to this subsection must be used to plan, predesign, design, provide technical assistance and financial services, purchase land for, and build innovative low-income housing units. $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing in Shelton and $3,000,000 of the appropriation that is subject to this subsection is provided solely for innovative affordable housing for veterans in Orting. Mental health and substance abuse counseling services must be offered to residents of housing projects supported by appropriations in this subsection. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Shelton can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded. $500,000 of the appropriation for housing units in Orting can be released for purchase of land, planning, or predesign services before the project is fully funded.

(viii) $6,000,000 is provided solely for grants to the following organizations using innovative methods to address homelessness: $3,000,000 for THA Arlington drive youth campus in Tacoma and $3,000,000 for a King county housing project.

(ix) $1,500,000 is provided solely for Valley Cities modular housing project in Auburn.

(g) Of the amounts appropriated remaining after (a) through (f) of this subsection, the department must allocate the funds as follows:

(i) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit veterans;

(ii) 10 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit homeownership;

(iii) 5 percent is provided solely for housing projects that benefit people with developmental disabilities;

(iv) The remaining amount is provided solely for projects that serve low-income and special needs populations in need of housing, including, but not limited to, homeless families with children, homeless youth, farmworkers, and seniors.

(2) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(3) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($43,400,000))

﻿ $38,770,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—State. . . .$58,000,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State. . . .(($5,370,000))

﻿ $10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$106,770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$506,770,000

Sec. 1002. 2018 c 2 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aberdeen Gateway Center (Aberdeen). . . .$1,750,000

Adams County Industrial Wastewater and Treatment

Center (Othello). . . .$1,250,000

Adna Elementary Playshed (Chehalis). . . .$104,000

Airway Heights Recreation Complex (Airway Heights). . . .$515,000

Alder Creek Pioneer Museum Expansion (Bickelton). . . .$500,000

Anderson Island Historical Society (Anderson Island). . . .$26,000

Appleway Trail Amenities (Spokane Valley). . . .$556,000

ARC Community Center Renovation (Bremerton). . . .$81,000

Arlington Pocket Park Downtown Business District

(Arlington). . . .$46,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center Design and

Preconstruction (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

Belfair Sewer Extension to Puget Sound Industrial

Ctr (Belfair). . . .$515,000

Billy Frank Jr. Heritage Center (Olympia). . . .$206,000

Bloodworks NW Bloodmobiles. . . .$425,000

Bothell Parks Projects (Bothell). . . .$309,000

Bridgeview Education and Employment Resource Center

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Brier ADA Ramp Updates Phase (Brier). . . .$115,000

Camp Schechter New Infrastructure and Dining Hall

(Tumwater). . . .$200,000

Capitol Campus E. WA Butte (Olympia). . . .$52,000

Captain Joseph House (Port Angeles). . . .$225,000

Carnation Central Business District Revitalization

(Carnation). . . .$1,545,000

Castle Rock Fair LED Lighting (Castle Rock). . . .$10,000

Centennial Trail - Southern Extension #1 (Snohomish). . . .$1,000,000

Centerville Grange Renovation (Centerville). . . .$134,000

Centralia Fox Theatre Restoration (Centralia). . . .$299,000

Chamber Economic Development Project (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Chelan County Emergency Operations Center (Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Chelatchie Prairie Railroad Maintenance Bldg.

Phase 2 (Yacolt). . . .$250,000

Cherry St. Fellowship (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Children's Playgarden (Seattle). . . .$315,000

Chimacum Ridge Forest Pilot (Port Townsend). . . .$3,400,000

City of Brewster Manganese Abatement (Brewster). . . .$752,000

Cityview Conversion to Residential Treatment

(Moses Lake). . . .$250,000

Clark County Historical Museum (Vancouver). . . .$300,000

Clymer Museum and Gallery Remodel (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Coastal Harvest Roof Replacement (Hoquiam). . . .$206,000

Cocoon House (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

College Place Well Consolidation and Replacement

(College Place). . . .$900,000

Columbia River Trail (Washougal). . . .$1,000,000

Confluence Park Improvements (P2&3) (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

((Coordinated and Safe Service Center (Redmond). . . .$309,000))

Country Doctor Community Health Centers (Seattle). . . .$280,000

Covington Town Center Civic Plaza Development

(Covington). . . .$820,000

Cross Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,500,000

Daffodil Heritage Float Barn (Puyallup). . . .$103,000

Darrington Rodeo Grounds (Darrington). . . .$250,000

Des Moines Marina Bulkhead & Fishing Pier Renovation

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Disaster Response Communications Project (Colville). . . .$1,000,000

District 5 Public Safety Center (Sultan). . . .$1,500,000

Downtown Pocket Park at Rockwell (Port Orchard). . . .$309,000

DuPont Historical Museum Renovation HVAC (DuPont). . . .$53,000

East Grays Harbor Fiber Project (Elma). . . .$463,000

East Hill YMCA/Park Renovation (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eastside Community Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,550,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail and Shoreline Access

(Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

Emmanuel Life Center Kitchen (Spokane). . . .$155,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Senior Housing (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Evergreen Pool Resurfacing (White Center). . . .$247,000

Fall City Wastewater Infrastructure Planning & Design

(Fall City). . . .$1,000,000

Family Medicine Remodel (Goldendale). . . .$195,000

Federal Way Camera Replacement (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Federal Way Senior Center (Federal Way). . . .$175,000

Flood Protection Wall & Storage Building (Sultan). . . .$286,000

Food Lifeline Food Bank. . . .$1,250,000

Forestry Museum Building (Tenino). . . .$16,000

Fox Island Catastrophic Emergency Preparation

(Fox Island). . . .$17,000

Francis Anderson Center Roofing Project (Edmonds). . . .$391,000

Freeland Water and Sewer District Sewer Project

(Freeland). . . .$1,500,000

FUSION Transitional Hse Pgm/FUSION Decor Boutique

(Federal Way). . . .$500,000

Gig Harbor Sports Complex (Gig Harbor). . . .$206,000

Granger Historical Society Museum Acquisition

(Granger). . . .$255,000

Greater Maple Valley Veterans Memorial Foundation

(Maple Valley). . . .$258,000

GreenBridge/4th Ave Streetscaping (White Center). . . .$1,195,000

Harmony Sports Complex Infrastructure & Safety Imprve

(Vancouver). . . .$1,177,000

Harrington School District #204, Pool Renovation

(Harrington). . . .$97,000

Historic Mukai Farm and Garden Restoration (Vashon). . . .$250,000

Holly Ridge Center Building (Bremerton). . . .$475,000

Honor Point Military and Aerospace Museum (Spokane). . . .$100,000

HopeWorks TOD Center (Everett). . . .$2,760,000

Hoquiam Library (Hoquiam). . . .$250,000

HUB Sports Center (Liberty Lake). . . .$516,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Road Improvements (George). . . .$412,000

Industrial Park No. 5 Water System Improvements

(George). . . .$700,000

Inland Northwest Rail Museum (Reardan). . . .$170,000

Innovative Health Care Learning Center (Yakima). . . .$1,000,000

Interbay PDAC (Seattle). . . .$900,000

Intrepid Spirit Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Islandwood Comm Dining Hall and Kitchen

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$200,000

((Japanese Gulch Creek Restoration Project (Mukilteo). . . .$721,000))

Kenmore Public Boathouse (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Key Peninsula Civic Center Generator (Vaughn). . . .$60,000

Key Peninsula Elder Community (Lakebay). . . .$515,000

Kitchen Upgrade Belfair Senior Center Meals on Wheels

(Belfair). . . .$12,000

Kitsap Reg. Library Foundation, Silverdale Library

(Silverdale). . . .$250,000

Kona Kai Coffee Training Center (Tukwila). . . .$407,000

La Conner New Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$500,000

Lacey Boys and Girls Club (Lacey). . . .$30,000

Lake Chelan Community Hospital & Clinic Replacement

(Chelan). . . .$300,000

Lake City Comm Center, Renovate Magnuson Comm Center

(Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center (Lake Stevens). . . .$3,100,000

Lake Stevens Food Bank (Lake Stevens). . . .$300,000

Lake Sylvia State Park Legacy Pavilion (Montesano). . . .$696,000

Lake Tye All-Weather Fields (Monroe). . . .$800,000

Lakewood Playhouse Lighting System Upgrade (Lakewood). . . .$60,000

Lambert House Purchase (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Larson Playfield Lighting Renovation (Moses Lake). . . .$146,000

Lewis Co Fire Dist #1 Emergency Svcs Bldg & Resrce Ctr

(Onalaska). . . .$80,000

LIGO STEM Exploration Center (Richland). . . .$411,000

Longbranch Marina (Longbranch). . . .$248,000

Longview Police Department Range and Training

(Castle Rock). . . .$271,000

Lyon Creek, SR 104 Fish Barrier Removal

(Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,200,000

Maury Island Open Space Remediation (Maury Island). . . .$2,000,000

McChord Airfield North Clear Zone (Lakewood). . . .$2,000,000

Mill Creek Flood Control Project (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Millionair Club Charity Kitchen (Seattle). . . .$167,000

Moorlands Park Improvements (Kenmore). . . .$250,000

Morrow Manor (Poulsbo). . . .$773,000

Mount Baker Properties Cleanup Site (Seattle). . . .$1,100,000

Mount Rainier Early Warning System (Pierce County). . . .$1,751,000

Mukilteo Tank Farm Remediation (Mukilteo). . . .$257,000

Multicultural Community Center (Seattle). . . .$1,300,000

NE Snohomish County Community Services Campus

(Granite Falls). . . .$375,000

NeighborCare Health (Vashon). . . .$3,000,000

New Fire Station at Lake Lawrence (Yelm). . . .$252,000

North Cove Erosion Control (South Bend). . . .$650,000

Northshore Athletic Fields (Woodinville). . . .$400,000

Northwest Improvement Company Building (Roslyn). . . .$1,000,000

Olmstead-Smith Historical Gardens Replacement Well

(Ellensburg). . . .$17,000

Orting's Pedestrian Evacuation Crossing SR162 (Orting). . . .$500,000

Othello Regional Water Project (Othello). . . .$1,000,000

Paradise Point Water Supply System Phase IV

(Ridgefield). . . .$500,000

Pepin Creek Realignment (Lynden). . . .$3,035,000

Performing Arts & Events Center (Federal Way). . . .$1,000,000

Pioneer Village ADA Accessible Pathways (Ferndale). . . .$154,000

Ponders Wells Treatment Replacement (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

Port Ilwaco/Port Chinook Marina Mtce Drdg & Matl Disps

(Chinook). . . .$77,000

Port Orchard Marina Breakwater Refurbishment

(Port Orchard). . . .$1,019,000

Poulsbo Outdoor Salmon Observation Area (Poulsbo). . . .$475,000

Puyallup Meeker Mansion Public Plaza (Puyallup). . . .$500,000

Quincy Square on 4th (Bremerton). . . .$250,000

R.A. Long Park (Longview). . . .$296,000

Redondo Beach Rocky Reef (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

Ridgefield Outdoor Recreation Complex (Ridgefield). . . .$750,000

Rochester Boys & Girls Club upgrades (Rochester). . . .$26,000

Save the Old Tower (Pasco). . . .$300,000

Schilling Road Fire Station (Lyle). . . .$448,000

Scott Hill Park (Woodland). . . .$750,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Seattle Opera (Seattle). . . .$465,000

Shelton Basin 3 Sewer Rehabilitation Project (Shelton). . . .$1,500,000

Skagit Co Public Safety Emgcy Commun Ctr Exp/Remodel

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$525,000

Skagit County Veterans Community Park (Sedro-Woolley). . . .$500,000

Skagit Valley YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$400,000

Snohomish JROTC Program (Snohomish). . . .$189,000

South Gorge Trail (Spokane). . . .$250,000

South Snohomish County Community Resource Center

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,210,000

South Thurston County Meals on Wheels Kitchen

Upgrade (Yelm). . . .$30,000

Southwest WA Agricultural Business Park (Tenino). . . .$618,000

Southwest Washington Fair Grange Building Re-Roof

(Chehalis). . . .$54,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan (Spanaway). . . .$26,000

Squalicum Waterway Maintenance Dredging (Bellingham). . . .$750,000

Steilacoom Historical Museum Storage Building

(Steilacoom). . . .$31,000

Sunnyside Community Hospital (Sunnyside). . . .$2,000,000

Sunset Career Center (Renton). . . .$412,000

Sunset Neighborhood Park (Renton). . . .$3,050,000

Tacoma's Historic Theater District (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Tam O'Shanter Athletic Arena (Kelso). . . .$1,000,000

Toledo Beautification (Toledo). . . .$52,000

Trout Lake School/Community Soccer & Track Facility

(Trout Lake). . . .$77,000

Tumwater Boys and Girls Club (Olympia). . . .$36,000

Turning Pointe Domestic Violence Svc: Shelter Imprv/Rep

(Shelton). . . .$27,000

Twisp Civic Building (Twisp). . . .$750,000

University YMCA (Seattle). . . .$600,000

Veterans Memorial Museum (Chehalis). . . .$354,000

Washington Agricultural Education Center

(Lynden). . . .(($1,500,000)) $1,800,000

Washington Care Services (Seattle). . . .$400,000

Washington State Horse Park Covered Arena (Cle Elum). . . .$2,000,000

Waste Treatment and Sewer Collection System

(Toppenish). . . .$1,405,000

Wastewater Collection & Water Distribution Replacemnt

(Carbonado). . . .$1,500,000

Water Treatment for Kidney Dialysis. . . .$499,000

Wayne Golf Course Region Park (Bothell). . . .$1,000,000

Wesley Homes Bradley Park (Puyallup). . . .$1,380,000

Westport Marina (Westport). . . .$2,500,000

Weyerhaeuser Land Preservation (Federal Way). . . .$250,000

Whidbey Island Youth Project

(Oak Harbor and Coupeville). . . .$300,000

White Pass Country Historical Museum (Packwood). . . .$283,000

Whitehouse Additional Capital Campaign (Pasco). . . .$1,500,000

Willows Road Regional Trail Connection (Kirkland). . . .$1,442,000

Winlock HS Track (Winlock). . . .$103,000

Winlock Industrial Infrastructure Development

(Winlock). . . .$1,500,000

Wishram School CTE Facility (Wishram). . . .$150,000

Yakima Valley SunDome Repairs (Yakima). . . .$206,000

Yelm City Park Playground Modernization (Yelm). . . .$247,000

Youth Eastside Services (Bellevue). . . .$26,000

YWCA Family Justice Center (Spokane). . . .$103,000

(8) $26,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for implementation of the Spanaway lake management plan, contingent on commitment of local funding to support the on-going operational costs of the project, including but not limited to the creation of a lake management district.

(9) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the planning, development, acquisition, and other activities pursing open space conservation strategies for the historic Federal Way Weyerhaeuser campus. The grant recipient must be a regional nonprofit nature conservancy that works to conserve keystone properties selected by the city of Federal Way.

(10)(a) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for an Interbay public development advisory committee. It is the intent of the legislature to examine current and future needs of a state entity that performs an essential public function on state-owned property located in one of the state's designated manufacturing industrial centers. The legislature further intends to explore the potential future uses of this state-owned property in the event that the state entity determines that it must relocate in order to protect its ability to perform its essential public function.

(b) The Interbay public development advisory committee is created to make recommendations regarding the highest public benefit and future economic development uses for the Washington army national guard armory facility in the city of Seattle, pier 91 property, located at the descriptions referred to in the quit claim deeds for two parcels of land, 24.75 acres total, dated January 8, 1971, and December 22, 2009.

(c) The Interbay advisory committee consists of seven persons appointed as follows:

(i) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(ii) One person appointed by the president of the senate; and

(iii) Five persons appointed by the governor, who must collectively have experience in forming public-private partnerships to develop workforce housing or affordable housing; knowledge of project financing options for public-private partnerships related to housing; architectural design and development experience related to industrial lands and mixed-use zoning to include housing; and experience leading public processes to engage communities and other stakeholders in public discussions regarding economic development decisions.

(d) The Interbay public development advisory committee must:

(i) Work in collaboration with the military department to determine the needs of the military department if it is relocated from the land described in subsection (1) of this section, including identifying:

(A) Current uses;

(B) Future needs of the units currently at this location;

(C) Potential suitable publicly owned sites in Washington for relocation of current units; and

(D) The costs associated with acquisition, construction, and relocation to another site or sites for these units;

(ii) Explore the future economic development opportunities if the land described in subsection (1) of this section is vacated by the military department, and make recommendations, including identifying:

(A) Suitable and unsuitable future uses for the land;

(B) Environmental issues and associated costs;

(C) Current public infrastructure availability, future public infrastructure plans by local or regional entities, and potential public infrastructure needs;

(D) Transportation corridors in the immediate area and any potential right-of-way needs; and

(E) Existing zoning regulations for the land and potential future zoning needs to evaluate workforce housing, affordable housing, and other commercial and industrial development compatible with the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center designation;

(iii) Explore the potential funding sources and partners as well as any needed transactions, and make recommendations, including:

(A) Any potential private partners or investors;

(B) Necessary real estate transactions;

(C) Federal funding opportunities; and

(D) State and local funding sources, including any tax-related programs;

(iv) Conduct at least three public meetings at a location within the Ballard-Interbay manufacturing industrial center, where a quorum of the Interbay public development advisory committee members are present, at which members of the public are invited to present to the Interbay advisory committee regarding the future uses of the site and potential issues such as industrial land use, commercial development, residential zoning, and public infrastructure needs; and

(v) Provide a report to the legislature and office of the governor with recommendations for each area described in this subsection (10)(d) by June 29, 2019. The Interbay advisory committee's recommendations must include recommendations regarding the structure, composition, and scope of authority of any subsequent state public development authority that may be established to implement the recommendations of the Interbay advisory committee created in this section.

(e) The Interbay advisory committee created in this section terminates June 30, 2019.

(f) Nothing in this section authorizes the solicitation of interest or bids for work related to the purposes of this section.

(g) The department of commerce shall provide staff support to the Interbay advisory committee. The department may contract with outside consultants to provide any needed expertise.

(h) Legislative members of the Interbay advisory committee are reimbursed for travel in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the city of Lakewood for the purchase of property within the federally designated north clear zone at joint base Lewis-McChord. Once acquired, the property must be zoned for use compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. The city may lease or resell the acquired property for fair market value, but any such lease or sale must include restrictions or covenants ensuring that the use of the property is safely compatible with the mission and activity of McChord airfield. If the city subsequently resells, rezones, develops, or leases the property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the north clear zone, the city must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of the property in its entirety within ten years.

(12) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Federal Way chamber of commerce for two economic development projects focused in the south Puget Sound area. The amounts in this section must be used for a business retention and expansion program to conduct economic research in collaboration with stakeholders, develop data-driven economic strategies, and produce a written evaluation; and a tourism enhancement program to develop and inventory the Federal Way area tourism sector, analyze data regarding visitation, and produce a written evaluation.

(13) $400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore athletic field which shall be named "Andy Hill Sports Complex."

(14) $1,177,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Harmony sports complex infrastructure and safety improvements in Vancouver and is contingent upon the facility being open to the public.

(15) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Asia Pacific cultural center in Tacoma. These state funds are contingent on securing at least $1,000,000 in private funds.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($130,529,000))

﻿ $129,799,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($130,529,000))

﻿ $129,799,000

Sec. 1003. 2018 c 2 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding provided in this section may be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a ten-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.

(b) $12,286,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in (a) of this subsection:

Community Health Association of Spokane

(Spokane Valley). . . .$581,000

Community Health Association of Spokane

(Clarkston). . . .$391,000

Community Health of Central Washington

(Ellensburg). . . .$1,800,000

Columbia Valley Community Health (Chelan). . . .$753,000

East Central Community Center (Spokane). . . .$500,000

HealthPoint (Federal Way). . . .$900,000

International Community Health Services (Shoreline). . . .$605,000

Jefferson Healthcare Dental Clinic (Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

Neighborcare (Seattle). . . .$1,388,000

North East Washington Health Programs (Springdale). . . .$465,000

North ((Olympia)) Olympic Healthcare Network

(Port Angeles). . . .$610,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Poulsbo). . . .$395,000

Sea Mar (Seattle). . . .$183,000

Sea Mar (Oak Harbor). . . .$149,000

Sea Mar (Tacoma). . . .$149,000

Sea Mar (Vancouver). . . .$167,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$250,000

Valley View Health Center (Chehalis). . . .$1,000,000

VIMO Clinic Expansion and Remodel (Port Angeles). . . .$698,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$1,000,000

(c) $2,800,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects to increase the capacity of dental residencies:

Spokane Dental Residency (Spokane). . . .$2,000,000

St. Peter Dental Residency (Olympia). . . .$800,000

(d) In order to assess the impact these projects may have on the omnibus operating appropriations act, the department must, in consultation with the medical assistance forecast work group, assess each federally qualified health center project to determine the impact the project may have on state expenditures from the expansion of dental clinic capacity, including the additional impact of change of scope of service for the receiving clinics. Each project must be assessed no later than December 1, 2018. The department must report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on the results of the assessments by January 1, 2019.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($15,086,000))

﻿ $15,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($15,086,000))

﻿ $15,784,000

Sec. 1004. 2018 c 2 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to issue grants to community hospitals or other community entities to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities, and consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services. The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more behavioral health organizations, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, or entities that assume the responsibilities of behavioral health organizations in regions in which the health care authority is purchasing medical and behavioral health services through fully integrated contracts pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(d) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility for at least a ten-year period;

(e) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(f) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds; and

(g) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (3), the department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and behavioral health organizations, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(3) (($36,600,000)) $69,600,000 is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

(a) $4,600,000 is provided solely for at least two enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of ((geriatric or traumatic brain injury)) patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with secure detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely for at least one facility with acute detox treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) (($11,400,000)) $12,700,000 is provided solely for crisis diversion or stabilization facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. At least two of the facilities must be located in King county and one must be located in Pierce county. The facility in Pierce county shall receive no less than $3,200,000;

(e) $10,000,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment providers to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on ninety or one hundred eighty day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the department of social and health services;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The department of social and health services has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes; and

(f) $6,600,000 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community providers to develop psychiatric residential treatment beds to serve individuals being diverted or transitioned from the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, the department of health, and the local behavioral health organization jurisdiction for which a proposal has been submitted and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the behavioral health organization in the region or entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the department of social and health services that it is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The behavioral health organization or entity that assumes the responsibilities of the behavioral health organization pursuant to RCW 71.24.380 has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes.

(4) $26,000,000 is provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Denny

Youth Center. . . .$5,000,000

North Sound Behavioral Health Organization Substance

Use Disorder Intensive Treatment. . . .$5,000,000

Bellingham Mental Health Triage . . . .$5,000,000

Bellingham Acute Detox. . . .$2,000,000

SWWA Diversion Crisis and Involuntary Treatment. . . .$3,000,000

Daybreak Center for Adolescent Recovery. . . .$3,000,000

Nexus Youth and Families. . . .$500,000

Valley City Recovery Place. . . .$2,000,000

Geriatric Diversion. . . .$500,000

(5) $3,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to a joint venture between MultiCare-Franciscan to provide community based behavioral health services. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section. The department of commerce may not release funding for this project unless MultiCare-Franciscan enters into a memorandum of understanding with the department of social and health services by October 31, 2018, to collaborate on development and implementation of strategies to expand the behavioral health workforce in the region. At a minimum, the agreement must include strategies for increasing recruitment of health professionals required to staff psychiatric inpatient facilities, including psychiatrists, psychologists, nurses and other health care professionals. The agreement must also identify opportunities for coordination between the parties to expand access to clinical skill development and training opportunities in the region and strategies for collaborative service delivery between the parties when possible. To objectively evaluate the efficacy of the strategies implemented to achieve the desired outcomes of the agreement, performance measures and targets must be established to include:

(a) MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work collaboratively to decrease vacancy rates for hard-to-recruit health care professionals employed by each facility. The parties must develop strategies to attract more qualified health care professionals to the area and ensure comparable exposure to the benefits of working for each organization. The parties must measure the success of these strategies by the decrease in vacancy rate for health care professionals necessary to provide safe, quality inpatient psychiatric care in MultiCare-Franciscan and department facilities following the first year as the baseline of the partnership/consortium and with updated goals for each subsequent year. MultiCare-Franciscan and the department of social and health services must work to increase the competency and skills of health care professionals across both facilities by establishing organized joint- and cross-training programs. The parties must measure the success of this strategy by the number of health care professionals in total and by discipline complete cross-training activities and by the number and hours of cross-training opportunities offered under the agreement.

(6) The department of commerce shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(7) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, shall establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, detox, or secure detox.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($65,600,000))

﻿ $98,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($65,600,000))

﻿ $98,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Rehabilitation Services Capacity Grants (92000611)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) Funding provided in this section may be used for the renovation or construction directly associated with behavioral rehabilitation services settings. The funding provided in this section is limited to projects at facilities that are not state owned that add capacity to address unmet need and are maintained as behavioral rehabilitation services capacity available to the state for at least a five-year period.

(b) It is the goal of the legislature to achieve an additional twenty-four beds of behavioral rehabilitation services capacity by the conclusion of the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium. To the maximum extent possible, the department shall prioritize the use of the funding provided in this section in a manner that facilitates achieving this goal, and consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues.

(c) The department shall consult as needed with the children and families services program of the department of social and health services through June 30, 2018, and the department of children, youth, and families effective July 1, 2018, to ensure that, to the maximum extent possible, the use of funding provided in this section facilitates placements that will better accommodate permanency plans, including but not limited to parent-child visitation.

(d) The department, in consultation with the children and families services program of the department of social and health services through June 30, 2018, and the department of children, youth, and families effective July 1, 2018, shall evaluate the department of social and health services proposal for renovation of the Pine Lodge facility to a behavioral rehabilitation services setting. No later than January 1, 2019, the department shall submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that includes their findings and recommendations for how this facility may be utilized for multiple uses including, at a minimum, behavioral rehabilitation services and as an unsecured crisis residential center.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

Sec. 1006. 2018 c 2 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the community economic revitalization board may make grants and loans to local governments and federally recognized tribes to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, with a minimum of 25 megabits per second download speed, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development or community development.

(1) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, public port districts, quasi-municipal corporations, and special purpose districts.

(2) "Broadband" means networks of deployed telecommunications equipment and technologies necessary to provide high-speed Internet access and other advanced telecommunications services.

(3) The board is authorized to make rural broadband loans and grants to local governments and to federally recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of financing the cost to build infrastructure to provide high-speed, open-access broadband service, to rural and underserved communities, for the purpose of economic development or community development. ((Grants may also be authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe, and subject to a finding by the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move forward.)) However, no more than ((25)) 50 percent of all financial assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants to local governments and federally recognized Indian tribes. A state loan or grant under this program shall not exceed $250,000.

(4) Application for funding must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board must conform to the following requirements:

(a) The board may not provide financial assistance:

(i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.

(ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote gambling.

(iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant local government or federally recognized Indian tribe.

(v) For equipment or facilities which would enable a public entity to provide retail telecommunications services or services that the entity is not authorized by statute to provide.

(vi) For the deployment of publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure ("backbone") solely for the sake of creating competitive, publicly-owned telecommunication network infrastructure.

(b) The board may provide financial assistance only((:

(i) For projects demonstrating convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities; and

(C) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county; or

(ii) For a project that does not meet the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection but is a project that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Is part of a local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements;

(C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard economic principles; and

(D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county;

(c) The board must develop guidelines for local participation and allowable match and activities.

(d) An application must demonstrate local match and local participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.

(e))) for projects located in a rural community as defined by the board, or located in a rural county, that encourage, foster, develop, and improve broadband within the state in order to:

(i) Drive job creation, promote innovation, and expand markets for local businesses; or

(ii) Serve the ongoing and growing needs of local education systems, health care system, public safety system, industries and businesses, governmental operations, and citizens; and

(iii) Improve accessibility for underserved communities and populations.

(c) An application must be approved by the local government and supported by the local associate development organization or local workforce development council or approved by the governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.

(((f))) (d) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the project.

(((g) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.

(h) The board must prioritize each proposed project according to:

(i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed, but also giving consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be located;

(ii) The rate of return of the state's investment, including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;

(iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of employees;

(iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary transportation improvements;

(v) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance; and

(vi) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.

(i))) (e) When evaluating and prioritizing projects, the board must give consideration, at a minimum, to the following factors:

(i) The project's value to the community, including evidence of support from affected local businesses and government;

(ii) The project's feasibility, using standard economic principles;

(iii) Commitment of local matching resources and local participation;

(iv) The project's inclusion in a capital facilities plan, comprehensive plan, or local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements; and

(v) The project's readiness to proceed.

(5) A responsible official of the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe must be present during board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(((5) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the local government or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic revitalization board.))

Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State. . . .$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall include provisions which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Arlington Drive Youth Campus (Tacoma) (92000605)

$750,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Ruston) (92000576)

$250,000

Capitol Campus Improvements (Olympia) (92000586)

$249,000

Centralia Founder Statue George & Mary Jane (Centralia) (92000591)

$75,000

Cheney Well #3 Re-Drill (Cheney) (92000589)

$750,000

Clinton & Gloria John Teen Club (Vancouver) (92000557)

$500,000

College Place Well No. 2 Relocation (College Place) (92000604)

$618,000

Crisis Services Renovation (Kennewick) (92000607)

$200,000

Derelict Vessel Deconstruction Boatyard (Ilwaco) (92000614)

$950,000

Duvall Civic Stage (Duvall) (92000577)

$50,000

East Blaine Infrastructure Extension Project (Blaine) (92000592)

$1,200,000

Edmonds Community & Senior Center (Edmonds) (92000556)

$500,000

Family First Community Center (Renton) (92000587)

$500,000

Fennel Creek Trail Extension (Bonney Lake) (92000593)

$500,000

Fircrest Community Pool (Fircrest) (92000598)

$750,000

Five Acre Woods Park Acquisition (Lake Forest Park) (92000560)

$300,000

Full Capacity Generator (Vashon) (92000567)

$230,000

Grace Children's Center Renew & Remodel (Des Moines) (92000563)

$25,000

Granger Splash Park (Granger) (92000596)

$30,000

House of Charity Homeless Shelter Outdoor Annex (Spokane) (92000555)

$235,000

Issaquah Teen Cafe (Issaquah) (92000566)

$100,000

Kirkland Performance Center Modernization/Enhancement (Kirkland) (92000584)

$500,000

Kitsap Humane Society Animal Shelter Expansion (Silverdale) (92000570)

$300,000

KRYS Thin Air Community Radio Expansion (Spokane) (92000574)

$100,000

Lacey Food Bank (Lacey) (92000590)

$750,000

Lake Sammamish State Park EIS and Predesign (Issaquah) (92000582)

$200,000

Lakewood Colonial Plaza (Lakewood) (92000558)

$500,000

Lincoln County E911 (Davenport) (92000609)

$500,000

Lopez Island Pool (Lopez) (92000580)

$500,000

Lyons Ferry State Park Campground Design & Permitting (Washtucna) (92000608)

$400,000

Main Street Reconstruction - Phase 2 (Mountlake Terrace) (92000568)

$500,000

Mary's Place Burien Hub (Burien) (92000613)

$500,000

Moshier Park Sports Field Improvements & Stormwater (Burien) (92000581)

$500,000

Mt. Spokane Guest Services Improvements (Mead) (92000599)

$309,000

Mukilteo Peace Park Construction (Mukilteo)

$400,000

Mukilteo Waterfront Parking Lot (Mukilteo) (92000565)

$500,000

North Mason Teen Center (Belfair) (92000602)

$412,000

Oak Harbor Windjammer Park Restoration (Oak Harbor) (92000588)

$750,000

PFAS Remediation Pilot (Issaquah) (92000572)

$206,000

Pioneer Park Pool House (Connell) (92000601)

$25,000

Port of Sunnyside (Sunnyside) (92000610)

$1,000,000

Redmond Central Connector Phase III (Kirkland) (92000559)

$721,000

ReWA Capital Campaign (Seattle) (92000571)

$1,000,000

Roof and Skylight Repair (Spokane) (92000575)

$80,000

Sedro-Woolley Regional Library (Sedro-Woolley) (92000603)

$1,500,000

Skagit Children's Advocacy & Family Support Center (Mount Vernon) (92000569)

$310,000

Skamania County Fair Horse Stall Panels (Stevenson) (92000595)

$40,000

Snohomish Carnegie Project (Snohomish) (92000573)

$500,000

Sno-Isle Libraries Mariner Library Preliminary Design (Everett)

$321,000

SOZO Sports Center of Central Washington (Yakima) (92000606)

$500,000

St. Mark Tiny Homes for Homeless High School Students (Lacey) (92000562)

$200,000

Staging for Success! (Silverdale) (92000579)

$500,000

Starfire Sports Ignite STEM Passion (Tukwila) (92000578)

$250,000

Summit Park (Maple Valley) (92000583)

$331,000

TXL Lake Hills Clubhouse Acquisition Boys & Girls Club (Bellevue) (92000564)

$200,000

Washougal Steamboat Landing Dock Replacement (Washougal) (92000600)

$750,000

Wenatchee WRIA 45 Pilot Project (Wenatchee) (92000594)

$350,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$25,167,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$25,167,000

Sec. 1008. 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 1012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is released for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and shall not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) $2,209,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project, including the purchase of twenty acres of land by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights for development of affordable housing and the purchase of mobile home parks by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights in order to reduce the use of the accident potential zone for residential purposes. There shall be no limitations on the sequence of the purchase of mobile home parks. If Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights subsequently rezones, develops, and leases the mobile home park property for commercial or industrial uses contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone, Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights must repay to the state the amount spent on the purchase of mobile home parks in its entirety within ten years. Mobile home parks purchased under the provisions of this subsection may be sold by Spokane county or the city of Airway Heights, provided that the uses of the mobile home park property are not contrary to the allowed uses in the accident potential zone. Any moneys from this sale must be used to purchase other mobile home parks in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. The twenty acres of land purchased under this subsection for development as affordable housing may be sold, in whole or in part, by the recipient, provided the property sold is used for affordable housing as required in the Fairchild air force base protection and community empowerment project. Recipients of funds provided under this subsection are not required to demonstrate that the project site is under their control for a minimum of ten years but they must demonstrate that the project site is under their control through ownership or long-term lease. Projects funded under this subsection are not required to meet the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125(6) and subsection (5) of this section.

(8) $850,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the White River restoration project. Design solutions for flooding reductions in the lower White River must include a floodplain habitat design that both reduces flood risks and restores salmon habitat by reconnecting the river with its floodplain and a sustainable riparian corridor. Project designs and plans must also identify lands for acquisition needed for floodplain reconnection where pending or existing development eliminates the potential for riparian and aquatic habitat restoration. The city shall work cooperatively with the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe and the Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and develop a plan collaboratively to achieve both flood reduction and habitat restoration.

(9) Up to (($150,000)) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section for the veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter project may be spent on preconstruction or preacquisition activities, including, but not limited to, building inspections, design of necessary renovations, cost estimation, and other activities necessary to identify and select a facility appropriate for the program. The remainder of the appropriation must be used for eventual acquisition and renovations of a facility.

(10) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the mercy housing and health care center at Sand Point. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the center may not house any community health care training organization that has been investigated by and has paid settlement fees to the attorney general's office for alleged medicaid fraud.

(11) The Lake Chelan land use plan must be developed without adverse impacts on agricultural operations.

(12) $1,300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for phase one of the main street revitalization project in the city of Mountlake Terrace.

(13) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the city of Stanwood to acquire property for a new city hall/public safety facility.

(14) Up to 30 percent of the funding for the Kennewick boys and girls club may be used for land acquisition.

(15) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Projects

Amounts

Algona senior center

$500,000

All-accessible destination playground

$750,000

Appleway trail

$1,000,000

Basin 3 sewer rehabilitation

$1,500,000

Bellevue downtown park inspiration playground and sensory garden

$1,000,000

Bender fields parking lot and restrooms

$1,000,000

Blackhills community soccer complex safety projects

$750,000

Bremerton children's dental clinic

$396,000

Brewster reservoir replacement

$1,250,000

Brookville gardens

$1,200,000

Camas-Washougal Babe Ruth youth baseball improve Louis Bloch park

$10,000

Cancer immunotherapy facility-Seattle children's research inst.

$7,000,000

Caribou trail apartments

$100,000

Carnegie library imprv for the rapid recidivism reduction program

$1,000,000

Cavelero park - regional park facility/skateboard park

$500,000

CDM caregiving services: Clark county aging resource center

$1,200,000

Centerville school heating upgrades

$46,000

Chambers Creek regional park pier extension and moorage

$1,750,000

City of LaCenter parks & rec community center

$1,500,000

City of Lynden pipeline

$2,000,000

City of Lynden-Riverview road construction

$850,000

City of Lynden-safe routes to school and Kaemingk trail gap elim.

$300,000

City of Mt. Vernon downtown flood protect project & riverfront trail

$1,500,000

City of Olympia - Percival Landing renovation

$950,000

City of Pateros water system

$1,838,000

City of Stanwood City hall/public safety facility property acquisition

$300,000

Classroom door barricade - nightlock

$45,000

Confluence area parks upgrade and restoration

$1,000,000

Corbin senior center elevator

$300,000

Covington community park

$5,000,000

Cross Kirkland corridor trail connection 52nd St.

$1,069,000

Dawson place child advocacy center building completion project

$161,000

Dekalb street pier

$500,000

DNR/City of Castle Rock exchange

$80,000

Dr. Sun Yat Sen memorial statue

$10,000

Drug abuse and prevention center - Castle Rock

$96,000

DuPont historical museum renovation

$46,000

East Tacoma community center

$1,000,000

Edmonds center for the arts: Gym climate control & roof repairs

$250,000

Edmonds senior & community center

$1,250,000

Emergency generator for kidney resource center

$226,000

Enumclaw expo center

$350,000

Fairchild air force base protection & comm empowerment project

$2,209,000

Federal Way PAC center

$2,000,000

Filipino community of Seattle village (innovative learning center)

$1,200,000

Franklin Pierce early learning center

$2,000,000

Gateway center project

$1,000,000

Gilda club repairs

$800,000

Granite Falls boys & girls club

$1,000,000

Gratzer park ball fields

$200,000

Grays Harbor navigation improvement project

$2,500,000

Green river gorge open space buffer, Kummer connection

$750,000

Guy Cole center revitalization

$450,000

Historic renovation Maryhill museum

$1,000,000

Hopelink at Ronald commons

$750,000

Irvine slough storm water separation

$500,000

Kahlotus highway sewer force main

$2,625,000

Kennewick boys and girls club

$500,000

Kent east hill YMCA

$500,000

Key Pen civics center

$50,000

KiBe high school parking

$125,000

Kitsap humane society - shelter renovation

$90,000

Lacey boys & girls club

$29,000

Lake Chelan land use plan

$75,000

LeMay car museum ADA access improvements

$500,000

Lyman city park renovation

$167,000

Lyon creek flood reduction project

$400,000

Marine terminal rail investments

$1,000,000

Martin Luther King Jr. family outreach center expansion project

$85,000

Mason county Belfair wastewater system rate relief

$1,500,000

McAllister museum

$660,000

Mercer arena energy savings & sustainability funding

$450,000

Mercy housing and health center at Sand Point

$2,500,000

Meridian center for health

$2,500,000

Minor Road water reservoir replacement

$1,500,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway Tiger Mountain access improvements

$300,000

Mountlake Terrace Main street revitalization project

$1,300,000

Mt. Spokane guest services building & preservation/maintenance of existing facilities

$520,000

Boys & girls club of Snohomish county (Brewster, Sultan, Granite Falls, Arlington, and Mukilteo)

$1,000,000

Mukilteo tank farm clean-up

$250,000

New Shoreline medical-dental clinic

$1,500,000

Nordic heritage museum

$2,000,000

North Kitsap fishline foodbank

$625,000

Northwest native canoe center project

$250,000

Oak Harbor clean water facility

$2,500,000

Okanogan emergency communications

$400,000

Onalaska community tennis and sports courts

$80,000

Opera house ADA elevator

$357,000

Orcas Island library expansion

$1,400,000

Pacific community center

$250,000

PCAF's building for the future

$350,000

Pe Ell second street

$197,000

Perry technical school

$1,000,000

Pike Place Market front project

$800,000

Police station security/hardening

$38,000

Port of Centralia - Centralia station

$500,000

Port of Sunnyside demolish the carnation building

$450,000

PROVAIL TBI residential facility

$450,000

Quincy water reuse

$1,500,000

Redmond downtown park

$3,000,000

Redondo boardwalk repairs

$1,500,000

Renovate senior center

$400,000

Rochester boys & girls club

$38,000

Rockford wastewater treatment

$1,200,000

Roslyn renaissance-NW improve company bldg renovation project

$900,000

Sammamish rowing association boathouse

$500,000

SE 240th St. watermain system improvement project

$700,000

SE Seattle financial & economic opportunity center

$1,500,000

SeaTac international marketplace & transit-oriented community

$1,250,000

Seattle theatre group

$131,000

Snohomish veterans memorial rebuild

$10,000

Snoqualmie riverfront project

$1,520,000

South 228th street inter-urban trail connector

$500,000

Splash pad/foundation: Centralia outdoor pool restoration project

$200,000

Spokane women's club

$300,000

Springbrook park neighborhood connection project

$300,000

SR 532 flood berm and bike/ped path

$85,000

St. Vincent food bank & community services construction project

$400,000

Stan & Joan cross park

$750,000

Steilacoom Sentinel Way repairs

$450,000

Stilly Valley youth project Arlington B&G club

$2,242,000

Sunset neighborhood park

$1,750,000

Support, advocacy & resource center for victims of violence

$750,000

The gathering house job training café

$14,000

The Salvation Army Clark County: Corps community center

$1,200,000

Thurston county food bank

$500,000

Tulalip water pipeline, (final of 8 segments)

$2,000,000

Twin Bridges museum rehab Lyle Wa

$64,000

Twisp civic building

$500,000

Vancouver, Columbia waterfront project

$2,500,000

Vantage point senior apartments

$2,000,000

Veterans center

$500,000

Veterans helping veterans: Emergency transition shelter

$600,000

Waitsburg Main Street bridge replacement

$1,700,000

Washington green schools

$105,000

Washougal roof repair

$350,000

Water meter and system improvement program

$500,000

Water reservoir and transmission main

$500,000

Wayne golf course land preservation

$500,000

White River restoration project

$850,000

Willapa behavioral health safety improvement project

$75,000

WSU LID frontage - local and economic benefits

$500,000

Yakima children's museum center

$50,000

Yakima SunDome

$2,000,000

Yelm community center

$500,000

Yelm senior center

$80,000

Youth wellness campus gymnasium renovation

$1,000,000

Total

$130,169,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$130,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$130,169,000

Sec. 1009. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 1003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section 131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

(2) $235,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to the Spokane river forum. The department shall not execute a contract with the grant recipient unless the Spokane river forum is in receipt of all permits by ((March)) June 1, 2018. If the terms and conditions of this subsection are not met by ((March)) June 1, 2018, the funding provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$45,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$45,892,000

Sec. 1010. 2018 c 2 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Oversight of State Facilities (30000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is contingent upon the office of financial management evaluating how warm-closed facilities throughout the state can be better utilized. The office of financial management shall submit a report that includes their findings and recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,229,000))

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .(($1,229,000))

﻿ $2,458,000

((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,458,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,458,000

Sec. 1011. 2018 c 2 s 1027 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

OFM Capital Budget Staff (30000040)

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$611,000))

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .(($611,000))

﻿ $1,222,000

((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,222,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,222,000

Sec. 1012. 2018 c 2 s 1031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Evaluation of Law Enforcement Training by Community Colleges (92000022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of financial management to contract with an external consultant to develop a plan that provides required basic law enforcement training through student paid programs with training provided by community and technical colleges. The consultant must review the costs, benefits, and risks to the state of Washington and review models from other states. The consultant must provide a report with an implementation plan and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by ((December 10, 2018)) January 31, 2019.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

Sec. 1013. 2018 c 2 s 1032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Behavioral Health Statewide Plan (91000434)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management, in collaboration with the department of commerce, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, the department of health, and behavioral health organizations, shall establish a statewide plan to inform future grant allocations by assessing and prioritizing facility needs and gaps in the behavioral health continuum of care. The department must provide the plan to the fiscal committees of the legislature by ((September 1, 2018)) December 31, 2018. The plan must include:

(1) An assessment of the continuum of care, including new community hospital inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced service facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities for short-term detention services through the publicly funded mental health system, crisis walk-in clinics, residential treatment facilities, and supportive housing units;

(2) A prioritization of facility type by geographic region covering the full continuum of care defined in subsection (1) of this section;

(3) A systematic method to distribute resources across geographical regions so that over time all regions are moving forward in strengthening the local continuum of behavioral health facilities; and

(4) An assessment of the feasibility of establishing state-operated, community-based mental health hospitals.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. 2018 c 2 s 1030 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. 2018 c 2 s 1033 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Higher Education Facility Study (92000026)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall submit a higher education facility study to the governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2018. In designing and conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult with legislative and fiscal committee leadership, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the public four-year institutions of higher education.

The study must include:

(1) Learning space utilization standards for higher education facilities. The standards may include, but are not limited to:

(a) The percentage of hours utilized per scheduling window;

(b) The percentage of seats utilized;

(c) Square feet per seat; and

(d) Type of technology utilized in learning spaces.

(2) Reasonableness of cost standards for higher education capital facilities. The standards may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Costs per square feet per type of facility; and

(b) Expected life-cycle costs.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$150,000

Sec. 1017. 2018 c 2 s 1040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security and Safety Improvements (30000812)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a study to include: (1) An assessment of current capitol campus security, to include infrastructure, technology, and staffing; (2) an assessment of security systems at comparable state capitol campuses; (3) options for security to meet the needs of the capitol campus; and (4) a phased plan for improving campus physical security and safety, including estimated costs. The following must be included in the development of the study: House of representatives security personnel, senate security personnel, legislative building facility and security personnel, and temple of justice security personnel. The study must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by August 31, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,040,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .(($550,000))

﻿ $710,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($550,000))

﻿ $2,750,000

Sec. 1018. 2018 c 2 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Statewide Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000825)

Appropriation:

Enterprise Services Account—State. . . .(($314,000))

﻿ $321,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,664,000))

﻿ $5,112,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State. . . .(($80,000))

﻿ $82,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($3,058,000))

﻿ $5,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($9,970,000))

﻿ $0

TOTAL. . . .(($13,028,000))

﻿ $5,515,000

Sec. 1019. 2018 c 2 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Building Envelope Repairs (30000829)

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,364,000))

﻿ $2,611,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($4,936,000))

﻿ $2,611,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($8,300,000))

﻿ $5,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($8,300,000))

﻿ $5,222,000

Sec. 1020. 2018 c 2 s 1045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

1063 Building Furniture and Equipment (40000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (($2,414,000)) $1,560,000 is provided solely for the department for furniture, fixtures, and equipment for common areas in the building.

Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State. . . .(($2,414,000))

﻿ $1,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,414,000))

﻿ $1,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Roof Replacement - Cherberg and Insurance Buildings (40000032)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,097,000

Sec. 1022. 2018 c 2 s 1049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Relocate Mural from GA to 1063 (92000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund—private/local account appropriation is contingent upon the receipt of funds from nonstate entities to relocate the mosaic mural from the general administration building to the 1063 block replacement building.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$275,000

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .$118,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$393,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($275,000))

﻿ $393,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Newhouse Replacement (92000020)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a predesign study to determine space needs and cost estimates necessary to replace the Irv Newhouse Building with a building to serve the legislative office needs on west campus.

(1) In determining the program space required the predesign will consider:

(a) The necessary program space required to support senate offices and support functions;

(b) The necessary program space required to support house offices and support functions; and

(c) Parking impacts of new office space construction.

(2) The study will consider, at a minimum the following three options:

(a) A 50,000 to 70,000 square foot office building to support senate offices, with four levels of underground parking.

(b) A 115,000 to 140,000 square foot office building to support both house and senate offices with four levels of underground parking.

(c) A 50,000 to 70,000 square foot office building to support senate offices, with no parking.

(3) The building must be a high performance building and meet net-zero-ready standards, with an energy use intensity of no greater than 35. The building construction must be procured using a performance-based method such as design build and must include an energy performance guarantee comparing actual performance data with the energy design target.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

Sec. 1024. 2018 c 2 s 1050 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .$33,315,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($7,863,000))

﻿ $8,600,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .(($375,000))

﻿ $802,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($41,553,000))

﻿ $42,717,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($41,553,000))

﻿ $42,717,000

Sec. 1025. 2018 c 2 s 1051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2017-19 Biennium (30000811)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($3,776,000))

﻿ $3,933,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$51,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,821,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($5,597,000))

﻿ $5,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($5,597,000))

﻿ $5,805,000

Sec. 1026. 2018 c 2 s 1052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2017-19 Biennium (30000812)

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal. . . .(($10,171,000))

﻿ $21,961,000

Military Department Capital Account—State. . . .$75,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,661,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($12,832,000))

﻿ $24,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($12,832,000))

﻿ $24,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Senate Chamber Skylight Restoration (92000023)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State

Appropriation. . . .$327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,256,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,583,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Telecommunication Systems Modernization (30002746)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .$3,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,470,000

TOTAL. . . .$4,620,000

Sec. 2002. 2018 c 2 s 2009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide - RA Community Facilities: Safety & Security Improvements (30002737)

Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign to provide options for replacing the existing nursing facilities at Fircrest school. At a minimum, the predesign must explore the remodel of an existing building on the Fircrest campus, construction of a new building on the Fircrest campus, and purchase of a recently closed nursing facility in King county. Two of the options explored in the predesign, the remodel of an existing building and the construction of a new building, must include space that can at least handle the laundry needs for nursing facility clients, and potentially handle the laundry needs for other clients on the Fircrest campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Naselle Youth Camp-Medical & Dental Facility (30002758)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,640,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,890,000

Sec. 2005. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 2009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($590,000))

﻿ $521,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$26,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,210,000))

﻿ $1,279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,800,000))

﻿ $28,670,000

Sec. 2006. 2018 c 2 s 2012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green Hill School - Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,312,000))

﻿ $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($12,312,000))

﻿ $12,200,000

Sec. 2007. 2018 c 2 s 2025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Forensic Ward (91000050)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,800,000))

﻿ $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,800,000))

﻿ $3,000,000

Sec. 2008. 2018 c 2 s 2026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,560,000))

﻿ $1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,600,000

TOTAL. . . .(($11,160,000))

﻿ $11,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School-Multiple Buildings: Safety Improvements (30003573)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

Sec. 2010. 2018 c 2 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6008, chapter 4, Laws of 2017, 3rd sp. sess.))

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,720,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,280,000))

﻿ $6,280,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($6,000,000))

﻿ $10,500,000

Sec. 2011. 2018 c 2 s 2024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital - Building 28: Treatment & Recovery Center (40000024)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$6,475,000

TOTAL. . . .(($7,475,000))

﻿ $7,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Renovations for Treatment Recovery Center (40000029)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,875,000

TOTAL. . . .$5,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. 2018 c 2 s 2030 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-Nursing Facility (92000027)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a predesign to provide options for creating a nursing facility at Rainier school. At a minimum, the predesign must explore the remodel of an existing building on the Rainier campus, construction of a new building on the Rainier campus, and purchase of a recently closed nursing facility in Pierce county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil Building 10 (40000004)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Replace Fire Alarm System (30000748)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$355,000

Sec. 2017. 2018 c 2 s 2046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CBCC: Access Road Culvert Replacement and Road Resurfacing (30001078)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,100,000))

﻿ $2,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,100,000))

﻿ $2,180,000

Sec. 2018. 2018 c 2 s 2047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Program and Support Building (30001101)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($8,685,000))

﻿ $9,685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($8,685,000))

﻿ $9,685,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

L&I HQ Elevators (30000018)

Appropriation:

Accident Account—State. . . .$517,000

Medical Aid Account—State. . . .$517,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,034,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,900,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,934,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$23,615,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$9,132,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$52,747,000

Sec. 3002. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The ((reappropriation)) appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .(($31,200,000))

﻿ $11,200,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$31,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Leaking Tank Model Remedies (30000669)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,800,000

TOTAL. . . .$8,843,000

Sec. 3004. 2018 c 2 s 3010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design 2017-19 (30000706)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $75,000 is provided solely for the Washington state department of ecology to convene and facilitate a stakeholder process to review and make recommendations for the statutory authorization and improvement of the floodplains by design grant program. The review must include analysis of:

(a) Statewide funding needs;

(b) Program design, including criteria, information, and coordination required for projects to proceed through the selection and funding processes in a transparent and efficient manner; and

(c) Mechanisms to improve efficiency and transparency of project funding and implementation;

(2) The department of ecology may convene stakeholders and facilitate activities as needed. The department must develop recommendations in consultation with the Puget Sound partnership. The department must seek input and meaningfully involve a broad base of tribal governments and interested stakeholders, including city and county governments, and agricultural, flood risk reduction, and conservation interests. The department must seek broad and diverse legislative input and invite interested legislators to provide information and ideas including, at a minimum, the majority and minority leadership of the committees responsible for the capital budget in the senate and house of representatives.

(3) The final report must include recommended statutory and policy changes to the appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($35,389,000))

﻿ $35,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($35,389,000))

﻿ $35,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Local Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$4,877,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$5,877,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$305,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000742)

Appropriation:

State Toxics Control Account—State. . . .$1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,740,000

Sec. 3007. 2018 c 2 s 3025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1) The legislature finds that it is appropriate to provide a framework for the administration of mitigation funds provided to the state as a beneficiary under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years. The legislature deems the department of ecology the responsible agency for the administration and expenditure of funds provided by the trustee under the terms of the consent decrees, including the development of a mitigation plan to guide the use of the funds, whether or not the department receives funds directly for projects included in the plan.

(2)(a) The department of ecology shall develop the mitigation plan through an open, transparent public process consistent with direction in the consent decrees. The department shall provide ample opportunity using a variety of engagement options, as appropriate, for stakeholders and the public to shape, review, and comment throughout the development of the mitigation plan, including at least two meetings of the legislative advisory group as described in (c) of this subsection.

(b) The department of ecology shall work collaboratively with other agencies to develop and implement the elements of the mitigation plan that address categories of projects for which other agencies have already developed programs or expertise. In doing so, the department of ecology must consider and utilize, where appropriate and to the extent possible, the following existing programs for alternative fuels and zero emission vehicles:

(i) The department of transportation's electric vehicle infrastructure bank program;

(ii) The state alternative fuel commercial vehicle tax credit;

(iii) The state sales and use tax exemption for clean vehicles; and

(iv) Public transportation grant programs administered by the department of transportation.

(c)(i) For the purposes of providing legislative input and gathering public feedback on the development of the mitigation plan, a legislative advisory group is established. The advisory group is comprised of eight legislators, including the chairs and ranking members, or designees of the chairs and ranking members, of the transportation and capital budget committees in the House and in the Senate; the director of the department of ecology; and the secretary of the department of transportation.

(ii) The advisory group must select a chair from among its membership. Meetings of the advisory group must be open to the public and allow for public comment.

(iii) The advisory group must meet at least twice, once immediately prior to the date that the draft mitigation plan is released publicly, and again after public comment has been incorporated but before the department submits the plan to the trustee.

(iv) The office of program research and the senate committee services must provide staff support to the advisory group. The department of ecology staff must provide technical support, as needed. Legislative members of the advisory group are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, government entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW. Advisory group expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(3) The mitigation plan and the stewardship of project implementation must adhere to the following principles:

(a) Maximize air quality and public health benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions;

(b) Give priority to projects that improve air quality relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions in areas that bear a disproportionate share of the burden from nitrogen oxides emissions;

(c) Achieve substantial additional air quality benefits relating to the reduction of nitrogen oxides emissions beyond that which would already occur, absent trust funding;

(d) Investments in clean vehicles or investments in clean engine replacements must be shown to be cost-effective. For the purposes of leveraging funding, investments in clean vehicles may not exceed the incremental cost of the clean vehicle, relative to the cost of a similar conventionally fueled vehicle. To incentivize the replacement of standard engines, investments may be made up to the full cost of the clean engine replacement;

(e) Consideration must be given to investments across a range of fueling technologies and emissions reduction technologies; and

(f) Priority must be given to projects that have the highest benefit-cost ratios, in terms of the amount of nitrogen oxides emissions reduced per dollar invested.

(4) Funding must be allocated to eligible projects under the terms of the consent decrees in the following manner:

(a)(i) No more than thirty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class four through eight transit buses, shuttle buses, and school buses;

(ii) No more than thirty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class eight local freight trucks and port drayage trucks;

(iii) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for commercial vehicle class four through seven local freight trucks;

(iv) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for airport ground support equipment;

(v) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for ocean-going vessels' shore power;

(vi) No more than fifteen percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for light duty, zero emission vehicle supply equipment;

(vii) No more than twenty percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium for nonfederal matching funds for projects eligible under the diesel emission reduction act option; and

(viii) For each of the other categories of mitigation actions that are eligible under the consent decrees but not otherwise specified under this subsection (4)(a), no more than ten percent of funding provided during the 2017-2019 biennium.

(b) Projects that receive funding under subsection (4)(a)(ii) and (iii) of this section and ocean-going vessels shorepower projects that receive funding under subsection (4)(a)(viii) of this section must include electric technologies, if practicable.

(5) To the extent this section conflicts with the consent decrees, the consent decrees supersede it.

(6) The department of ecology may modify the mitigation plan as needed to comply with trustee requirements, including to the extent these modifications conflict with this section. In making any adjustments, the department of ecology shall consult with the department of transportation and the office of the superintendent of public instruction and provide notice to the steering committee of any significant changes to the plan submitted.

(7) The department of ecology shall provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2018, and each year thereafter, on any plans or efforts to change the mitigation plan, its progress in implementing the mitigation plan, and the specific projects funded through these mitigation funds for the previous fiscal year.

(8) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Project" means an eligible mitigation action under the terms of the consent decrees entered into by the United States, Volkswagen AG, and other participating parties that settle emissions-related claims for 2.0 and 3.0 liter diesel vehicles of certain models and years.

(b) "Trustee" means the entity selected under the terms of the consent decrees to administer the disbursement of funds to eligible projects for the purposes of mitigating nitrogen oxides emission pollution.)) (1) The appropriation is provided solely to implement the requirements of the Volkswagen "clean diesel" marketing, sales practice, and products liability litigation settlement.

(2) All expenditures from this appropriation must:

(a) Be consistent with the terms of this settlement;

(b) Be consistent with the state of Washington beneficiary mitigation plan adopted by the department and approved by the Volkswagen settlement trustee; and

(c) Help achieve the state's results Washington goal of fifty thousand electric vehicles on the road by 2020.

(3) Fifteen percent of this appropriation must be spent on projects for the acquisition, installation, operation, and maintenance of new light duty zero emission vehicle supply equipment and infrastructure. The department of ecology shall work with the department of transportation to select projects and distribute funding contained in this subsection.

(4) The remaining eighty-five percent of this appropriation must be spent on projects as defined by the eligible categories in attachment A, appendix D-2 of the Volkswagen settlement and upon approval by the settlement trustee. The department of ecology shall use a competitive process to identify and select projects that maximize total air pollution reduction and health benefits; improve air quality in areas disproportionately affected by air pollution; leverage additional matching funds; achieve substantial emission reductions beyond what would occur absent this funding; accelerate fleet turnover to the cleanest engines, and accelerate adoption of electric vehicles, equipment, and vessels. The department of ecology shall work with the department of transportation as appropriate to select projects and distribute funding contained in this subsection.

Appropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $112,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $112,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000108)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to enter into and administer grants or other funding agreements for contaminated site identification, planning, investigation, or cleanup by local government as defined in RCW 70.105D.020, to ensure the safe and healthy development of property suitable for affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510(3).

(2) Funding recipients must restrict the use of the cleaned up property to affordable housing.

(3) The department, in collaboration with the department of commerce, shall develop a competitive process to select projects for funding, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts from the department of ecology and the department of commerce. The criteria used to determine the scoring and priority for funding must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Contaminated sites must be within the urban growth area boundaries;

(b) Contaminated sites must be zoned for residential or mixed-used;

(c) Locational suitability of contaminated sites for the development of affordable housing;

(d) Degree of contamination and complexity of contaminated sites;

(e) Timing of delivery of affordable housing units; and

(f) The extent to which the project leverages other funds.

(4) By October 1, 2018, the department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislature. At a minimum, the report must identify:

(a) Program application and selection process;

(b) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested for this program; and

(c) A list of projects, description of projects, and location and number of affordable housing units developed or to be developed.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$46,915,000

TOTAL. . . .$53,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department of ecology to enter into and administer grants to scrap and replace old, high-polluting diesel school buses, transit buses, and other public vehicles with low-emission and zero-emission vehicles.

(2) All expenditures from this appropriation must be spent on projects that will reduce air pollution, improve public health for thousands of Washington residents, help prevent violations of federal air quality standards, reduce operating costs, and improve transportation reliability for public fleet operators.

(3) Up to $12,000,000 of the appropriation is for scrapping and replacing pre-2001, high polluting school buses across the state with diesel or alternate fueled (propane, compressed natural gas, etc.) school buses that meet current federal emissions standards.

(4) Up to $9,750,000 of the appropriation is for scrapping and replacing pre-2007 diesel, high polluting transit buses across the state with new electric, zero-emission buses.

(5) Up to $6,650,000 of the appropriation is for replacing state government-owned gas or diesel powered passenger vehicles with all electric vehicles.

Appropriation:

Air Pollution Control Account—State. . . .$28,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$28,400,000

Sec. 3010. 2018 c 2 s 3027 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Availability (91000343)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for watershed restoration and enhancement projects. ((If chapter 1 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6091 (water availability)), Laws of 2018 is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.)) $5,475,000 of the amount appropriated in this section is provided solely for the department to implement the requirements of chapter 1, Laws of 2018 (water availability) in water resource inventory area 59, the Colville river watershed.

Appropriation:

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State. . . .$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$280,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$300,000,000

Sec. 3011. 2018 c 2 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$18,525,000

Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account—State. . . .(($11,528,000))

﻿ $1,475,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($30,053,000))

﻿ $20,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($40,000,000))

﻿ $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($26,947,000))

﻿ $20,852,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($97,000,000))

﻿ $76,189,000

Sec. 3012. 2018 c 2 s 3031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Twin Harbors State Park: Renovation (30000086)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($471,000))

﻿ $496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,986,000

TOTAL. . . .(($26,457,000))

﻿ $26,482,000

Sec. 3013. 2018 c 2 s 3032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - WW1 Historic Facilities Preservation (30000100)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,217,000))

﻿ $3,386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($3,823,000))

﻿ $3,992,000

TOTAL. . . .(($7,040,000))

﻿ $7,378,000

Sec. 3014. 2018 c 2 s 3033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Casey - Lighthouse Historic Preservation (30000109)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($206,000))

﻿ $217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,399,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,605,000))

﻿ $1,616,000

Sec. 3015. 2018 c 2 s 3034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Simcoe - Historic Officers Quarters Renovation (30000155)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($277,000))

﻿ $292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,478,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,755,000))

﻿ $1,770,000

Sec. 3016. 2018 c 2 s 3035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,516,000))

﻿ $1,596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,516,000))

﻿ $1,596,000

Sec. 3017. 2018 c 2 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Marine Facilities - Various Locations Moorage Float Replacement (30000496)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($541,000))

﻿ $569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$10,639,000

TOTAL. . . .(($11,180,000))

﻿ $11,208,000

Sec. 3018. 2018 c 2 s 3037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Willapa Hills Trail Develop Safe Multi-Use Trail Crossing at SR 6 (30000519)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($401,000))

﻿ $422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,817,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,218,000))

﻿ $4,239,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Schafer Relocate Campground (30000532)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$742,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,829,000

TOTAL. . . .$3,571,000

Sec. 3020. 2018 c 2 s 3038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Beacon Rock Entrance Road Realignment (30000647)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($348,000))

﻿ $366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$17,346,000

TOTAL. . . .(($17,694,000))

﻿ $17,712,000

Sec. 3021. 2018 c 2 s 3039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Goldendale Observatory - Expansion (30000709)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,250,000))

﻿ $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,250,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,500,000))

﻿ $4,950,000

Sec. 3022. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 3072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steamboat Rock Build Dunes Campground (30000729)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$2,707,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,499,000))

﻿ $3,671,000

Sec. 3023. 2018 c 2 s 3040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($5,538,000))

﻿ $5,619,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($296,000))

﻿ $592,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,812,000

TOTAL. . . .(($8,646,000))

﻿ $9,023,000

Sec. 3024. 2018 c 2 s 3044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden – Replace Failing Sewer Lines (30000860)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,204,000))

﻿ $2,320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($234,000))

﻿ $468,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,438,000))

﻿ $2,788,000

Sec. 3025. 2018 c 2 s 3045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Birch Bay - Replace Failing Bridge (30000876)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($320,000))

﻿ $337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,032,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,352,000))

﻿ $1,369,000

Sec. 3026. 2018 c 2 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden - Pier & Marine Learning Center Improve or Replace (30000950)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($697,000))

﻿ $734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$9,072,000

TOTAL. . . .(($9,769,000))

﻿ $9,806,000

Sec. 3027. 2018 c 2 s 3047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst and Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program for new Firelight toilets. The commission may sole source for the equipment. The commission must operate and maintain the equipment for a minimum of two years and report annually to legislative fiscal committees on: (1) The ease of use by parks patrons and (2) the cost and time to maintain the equipment.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,109,000))

﻿ $1,167,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,109,000))

﻿ $1,167,000

Sec. 3028. 2018 c 2 s 3048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation From Harms Way (30000959)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,018,000))

﻿ $2,124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,018,000))

﻿ $2,124,000

Sec. 3029. 2018 c 2 s 3049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Depression Era Structures Restoration Assessment (30000966)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,093,000))

﻿ $1,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$121,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,859,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,073,000))

﻿ $5,131,000

Sec. 3030. 2018 c 2 s 3051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Dash Point - Replace Bridge (Pedestrian) (30000972)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($553,000))

﻿ $582,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($718,000))

﻿ $747,000

Sec. 3031. 2018 c 2 s 3055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program (30000979)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($1,845,000))

﻿ $1,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,845,000))

﻿ $1,491,000

Sec. 3032. 2018 c 2 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Moran Summit Learning Center - Interpretive Facility (30000980)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($964,000))

﻿ $1,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($964,000))

﻿ $1,015,000

Sec. 3033. 2018 c 2 s 3057 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Penrose Point Sewer Improvements (30000981)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($428,000))

﻿ $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($428,000))

﻿ $450,000

Sec. 3034. 2018 c 2 s 3058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($209,000))

﻿ $220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,359,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,568,000))

﻿ $4,579,000

Sec. 3035. 2018 c 2 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,622,000))

﻿ $2,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,622,000))

﻿ $2,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - ADA Compliance (30000985)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

Sec. 3037. 2018 c 2 s 3060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Water System Renovation (30001016)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($475,000))

﻿ $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$4,996,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,471,000))

﻿ $5,496,000

Sec. 3038. 2018 c 2 s 3061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Septic System Renovation (30001017)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($238,000))

﻿ $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,016,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,254,000))

﻿ $5,266,000

Sec. 3039. 2018 c 2 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electrical System Renovation (30001018)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($713,000))

﻿ $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,058,000

TOTAL. . . .(($5,771,000))

﻿ $5,808,000

Sec. 3040. 2018 c 2 s 3063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($297,000))

﻿ $313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$11,114,000

TOTAL. . . .(($11,411,000))

﻿ $11,427,000

Sec. 3041. 2018 c 2 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Trail Renovations (Footbridges) (30001021)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($266,000))

﻿ $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$798,000

TOTAL. . . .(($1,064,000))

﻿ $1,078,000

Sec. 3042. 2018 c 2 s 3065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden Replace Failing Water Lines (30001022)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($358,000))

﻿ $377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,817,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,175,000))

﻿ $4,194,000

Sec. 3043. 2018 c 2 s 3067 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Steptoe Butte Road Improvements (30001076)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($443,000))

﻿ $466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,789,000

TOTAL. . . .(($4,232,000))

﻿ $4,255,000

Sec. 3044. 2018 c 2 s 3068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment North Head Buildings and Ground Improvements (40000005)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,560,000))

﻿ $2,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,560,000))

﻿ $2,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Fish Barrier Removal (40000010)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000

TOTAL. . . .$700,000

Sec. 3046. 2018 c 2 s 3073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)

Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State. . . .(($13,195,000))

﻿ $11,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($52,800,000))

﻿ $45,220,000

TOTAL. . . .(($65,995,000))

﻿ $56,520,000

Sec. 3047. 2018 c 2 s 3075 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Barnum Point waterfront.))

Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$10,725,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$11,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($1,000,000))

﻿ $11,725,000

Sec. 3048. 2018 c 2 s 3092 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program 2017-19 (92000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a state match to the United States department of agriculture regional conservation partnership.

(2) The commission will, to the greatest extent possible, leverage other state and local projects in funding the match and development of the regional conservation partnership program grant applications.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($1,752,000))

﻿ $3,504,000

TOTAL. . . .(($3,752,000))

﻿ $7,504,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. 2018 c 2 s 3030 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,849,000

TOTAL. . . .$6,649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NE Region Storm Damage Road Repair (40000002)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$429,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$429,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Scatter Creek Wildlife Area Fire Damage (40000005)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,331,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Southern Resident Killer Whales Recovery Projects (40000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to $130,000 of the appropriation is provided to review state hatcheries to identify opportunities to increase salmon production with a focus on the needs of the southern resident killer whale. The review must include a survey of existing hatcheries and cost estimates to increase salmon and steelhead production within existing capacity, and where hatcheries could be expanded to increase production. The review must be consistent with the federal endangered species act requirements and treaty tribal obligations. The review must be conducted in consultation with tribal co-managers, the hatchery scientific review group, and appropriate federal agencies. The review must be provided to the southern resident killer whale task force, the office of financial management, and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2018.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$500,000

Sec. 3054. 2018 c 2 s 3029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)

Appropriation:

PLIA Underground Storage Tank Revolving

Account—State. . . .(($20,000,000))

﻿ $12,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($80,000,000))

﻿ $50,800,000

TOTAL. . . .(($100,000,000))

﻿ $63,500,000

Sec. 3055. 2018 c 2 s 3069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

St Edward State Park Environmental Learning Center (92000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $75,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a strategic plan to develop an environmental learning center at Saint Edward state park. The commission shall work cooperatively with the city of Kenmore to establish a public forum seeking advice on plans for further development of the Saint Edward ballfields. The advice from the public forum should guide both agency actions as well as city permitting prior to any further consideration of future ballfield development plans or continued environmental assessments.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$75,000

Sec. 3056. 2018 c 2 s 3015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the east Columbia basin irrigation district.

(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for a ((forty-seven and one-half mile pipeline for full capacity. Funds must be prioritized to constructing the distribution system to a capacity serving no less than eleven thousand acres)) ground water replacement distribution system with a pump station located at east low canal mile 47.5. Funds must be prioritized to include costs associated with the pump station, pumps and electrical/power grid system that has the capacity to ultimately serve 10,500 eligible acres in the distribution service area. Any remaining funds must be directed to the Odessa groundwater replacement program.

(3) $2,000,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for Icicle Creek integrated planning.

(4) $16,800,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the department to fund existing projects and staffing.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$19,550,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State. . . .$12,250,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue Recovery

Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$33,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$72,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$105,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

Recreational Assets of Statewide Significance (92000446)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to conduct the study required in section 7007 of this act.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$100,000

Sec. 3058. 2018 c 2 s 3091 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Improve Shellfish Growing Areas 2017-19 (92000012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Up to five percent of the appropriation provided in this section may be used by the conservation commission to acquire services of licensed engineers for project development, predesign and design services, and construction oversight for natural resource enhancement and conservation projects. Funding may be used for beach restoration, erosion control, sediment abatement, soft berm, and dynamic revetment projects.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$20,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$24,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 4001. 2018 c 2 s 4001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Stormwater Remediation (30000030)

Appropriation:

Fire Service Training Account—State. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $3,132,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))

﻿ $3,132,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

Sec. 5001. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 5011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($209,100,000))

﻿ $210,220,000

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$92,767,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($301,867,000))

﻿ $302,887,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$248,519,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($550,386,000))

﻿ $551,406,000

Sec. 5002. 2018 c 2 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids/Healthy Schools (30000184)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts and the department of health, shall develop criteria for providing funding for specific projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools may apply for grants but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section;

(b) Any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and

(c) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(2) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the appropriation may be used for the replacement of lead-contaminated drinking water fixtures.

(3) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the appropriation may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's physical health and may include, but is not limited to: Fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation.

(4) A maximum of $250,000 of the appropriation may be used to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's awareness and participation in sustaining efficient schools and may include, but is not limited to: Dashboards that display energy savings, composting systems, and recycling stations.

(5) The remaining portion of the appropriation is provided solely to purchase equipment or make repairs related to improving children's nutrition and may include, but is not limited to: Garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$27,250,000

Sec. 5003. 2018 c 2 s 5005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

STEM Classrooms and Labs (30000203)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,800,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Federal Way school district to merge STEM facilities.

(2) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the contract with the statewide STEM organization described in subsection (5) of this section.

(3) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide STEM classrooms and labs grants to school districts for public school facilities serving students in grades nine through twelve, or any combination thereof, to construct classrooms, or labs, as additions to existing school buildings or to modernize specialized STEM facilities.

(4) The superintendent shall award grants to school districts under the following conditions:

(a) Districts eligible to receive STEM classrooms and labs grants include:

(i) Districts that demonstrate a lack of sufficient space of STEM classrooms or labs to provide opportunities for students to meet statutory graduation requirements;

(ii) Districts that demonstrate that their current STEM classrooms or labs are insufficient to provide opportunities for students to meet statutory graduation requirements;

(iii) Districts that have not received state capital funding assistance in the previous ten years for the STEM classrooms or labs project proposals; and

(iv) Districts that have secured private donations of cash, like-kind, or equipment in a value of no less than $100,000. Prior to receiving grant funding, the district must provide verification of the donation to the superintendent within ninety days of notification of grant award.

(b) Allowable project costs under the grant program include design, construction renovation, or modernization of existing science labs or classrooms; project management costs; furnishings, fixtures, and equipment; and necessary utility and information technology systems upgrades to support specialized STEM facilities.

(c) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in southwest Washington;

(d) At least one grant award is made to school districts located in the Puget Sound region; and

(e) At least two grant awards are made to school districts located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range.

(5) The STEM classrooms and labs grants program must be administered by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance specified in RCW 28A.188.030 and the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050. The superintendent of public instruction must develop grant application materials and criteria in consultation with the statewide STEM organization, must review applications for accuracy and financial reasonableness, and must administer awarded grants. With funding specifically appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction must contract with the statewide STEM organization specified in RCW 28A.188.050 to evaluate applications against the criteria developed for the program and develop a single prioritized list. The superintendent of public instruction must award grants within the appropriated funding and may depart from the recommended prioritized list only after consulting with the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Priority for school districts that have experienced decreased enrollments of more than ten percent over the previous five year period due to interdistrict transfers to schools with STEM facilities constructed or modernized in that same period of time;

(b) Priority for applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program;

(c) Economic conditions within the school district that limits their ability to finance the modernization of STEM classrooms and labs from local funding sources;

(d) Educational benefits of proposed projects;

(e) Age and condition of existing STEM classroom and lab space, if applicable;

(f) The extent that existing STEM facilities are inadequate including the lack of adequate STEM facilities to meet graduation requirements in RCW 28A.150.220;

(g) Financial reasonableness based on total project cost per square foot; and

(h) Demonstration of readiness to proceed that may include, but is not limited to:

(i) A demonstration that existing STEM faculty are in place and are qualified to deliver an interactive, project-based STEM curriculum in the proposed specialized STEM facilities; or

(ii) A plan and budget in place to recruit or train such STEM faculty.

(6) For purposes of grant applications made in the 2017-2019 biennium, additional square footage funded through this grant program is excluded from the school district's inventory of available educational space for determining eligibility for state assistance for new construction until the earlier of:

(a) Five years following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors; or

(b) The date of the final review of the latest study and survey of the affected school district following acceptance of the project by the school district board of directors.

(7) Each school district is limited to one grant award, which may be used for more than one school facility within the district, of no more than $2,000,000.

(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may charge fees consistent with capital budget guidelines established by the office of financial management for administering the grants.

(9) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$93,000,000

Sec. 5004. 2018 c 2 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,005,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($672,423,000))

﻿ $723,674,000

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($255,581,000))

﻿ $243,238,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal. . . .$3,000,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$1,559,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($932,563,000))

﻿ $971,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$5,136,856,000

TOTAL. . . .(($6,069,419,000))

﻿ $6,108,327,000

Sec. 5005. 2018 c 2 s 5007 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Program Administration (40000007)

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .(($3,600,000))

﻿ $3,390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$13,097,000

TOTAL. . . .(($16,697,000))

﻿ $16,487,000

Sec. 5006. 2018 c 2 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Career and Technical Education Equipment Grants (91000408)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $72,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Bellevue school district for career and technical education equipment.

(2) $50,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Issaquah school district for career and technical education equipment.

(3) $30,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Elma school district for career and technical education equipment.

(4) The remaining portion of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide career and technical education equipment grants to school districts. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with school districts and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop criteria for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the following priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools must demonstrate that the request provides necessary equipment to deliver career and technical education; and

(b) ((Districts or schools must demonstrate a consistent commitment to maintaining school facilities and equipment by participating in the asset preservation program administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and

(c))) Prioritizing applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program.

(5) The superintendent must award grants to applicants on a first-come, first-serve basis if the district or school demonstrates that the request meets the criteria set by the office of superintendent of public instruction as described in subsection (4) of this section and the site is prepared to receive the equipment.

(6) No single district may receive more than $100,000 of the appropriation.

Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000

Sec. 5007. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 5016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

NEWTECH Skill Center (Spokane Area Professional-Technical) (92000005)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($387,000))

﻿ $349,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State. . . .$38,000

Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$21,450,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$21,837,000

Sec. 5008. 2018 c 2 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Small Rural District Modernization Grants (92000040)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is provided solely for grants to assist small, rural school districts with total enrollments of one thousand students or less, with school facilities with significant building systems deficiencies, and with such low property values that replacing or modernizing the school facility through the school construction assistance program would present an extraordinary tax burden on property owners or would exceed allowable debt for the district.

(2) (($11,198,000)) $17,198,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for projects in small rural districts where the school facility does not need to be replaced or require an extensive modernization, but does have significant building system deficiencies. Grants may not exceed $5,000,000. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare an expedited grant application process in selecting the grant recipients funded by this subsection.

(3) $23,802,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:

Mount Adams School District K-8 Elementary. . . .$14,277,000

South Bend School District. . . .$7,712,000

Lopez Island School District. . . .$1,813,000

(4) For projects in this section that are also eligible for funding through the school construction assistance program (SCAP), the office of the superintendent of public instruction must expedite and streamline the SCAP administrative requirements, timelines, and matching requirements in order for the funds provided in this section to be used promptly. Funds provided in this section, plus state funds provided in the SCAP grant, plus available local funds, must not exceed total project costs.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($35,000,000))

﻿ $41,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($35,000,000))

﻿ $41,000,000

Sec. 5009. 2018 c 2 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $19,586,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for Seattle public schools to address challenges related to extraordinary growth and to maintain and repair existing buildings.

(2) $1,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Black Diamond elementary school.

(3) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for maintenance to improve the health and environment for students and staff at the Eckstein middle school in Seattle.

(4) $3,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Chief Leschi school's auditorium.

(5) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Frantz H. Coe elementary school in Seattle.

(6) $1,450,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Glacier site middle school in the Highline school district.

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($21,186,000))

﻿ $30,136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($21,186,000))

﻿ $30,136,000

Sec. 5010. 2018 c 2 s 5015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

2017-19 Minor Public Works (30000029)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($307,000))

﻿ $1,218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($4,000,000))

﻿ $0

TOTAL. . . .(($4,307,000))

﻿ $1,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Academic and Physical Education Building (30000036)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,445,000

TOTAL. . . .$46,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

College of Engineering Interdisciplinary Ed./Research Center I (30000492)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$49,000,000

TOTAL. . . .$49,600,000

Sec. 5013. 2018 c 2 s 5021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State. . . .(($14,500,000))

﻿ $17,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$30,000,000

TOTAL. . . .(($44,500,000))

﻿ $47,500,000

Sec. 5014. 2018 c 2 s 5035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Engineering Building (30000556)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($345,000))

﻿ $359,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$56,695,000

TOTAL. . . .(($57,040,000))

﻿ $57,054,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation - Life Safety Code Compliance (30000569)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$5,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$5,950,000

Sec. 5016. 2018 c 2 s 5038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Facility Preservation (91000019)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($7,500,000))

﻿ $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($21,000,000))

﻿ $0

TOTAL. . . .(($28,500,000))

﻿ $7,000,000

Sec. 5017. 2018 c 2 s 5039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program (91000021)

Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($2,500,000))

﻿ $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($21,000,000))

﻿ $0

TOTAL. . . .(($23,500,000))

﻿ $0

Sec. 5018. 2018 c 2 s 5041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation (30000783)

Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($7,500,000))

﻿ $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($33,915,000))

﻿ $36,455,000

TOTAL. . . .(($41,415,000))

﻿ $47,455,000

Sec. 5019. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 5048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)

Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($175,000))

﻿ $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$225,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($400,000))

﻿ $413,000

Sec. 5020. 2018 c 2 s 5046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Facilities Preservation (91000010)

Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($7,500,000))

﻿ $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($30,000,000))

﻿ $52,825,000

TOTAL. . . .(($37,500,000))

﻿ $63,825,000

Sec. 5021. 2018 c 2 s 5053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works - Preservation (30000288)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($2,000,000))

﻿ $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Student Services and Instructional Building (30000127)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$41,162,000

TOTAL. . . .$45,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Learning Resource Center (30000136)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$4,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$45,080,000

TOTAL. . . .$49,095,000

Sec. 5024. 2018 c 2 s 5070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof Repairs (30001293)

Appropriation:

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($8,433,000))

﻿ $5,307,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($8,433,000))

﻿ $5,307,000

Sec. 5025. 2018 c 2 s 5071 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Facility Repairs (30001294)

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,218,000))

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .(($25,458,000))

﻿ $16,587,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$26,676,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($26,676,000))

﻿ $16,587,000

Sec. 5026. 2018 c 2 s 5072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site Repairs (30001295)

Appropriation:

((State Building Construction)) Community/Technical

Colleges Capital Projects Account—State. . . .$4,166,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .$4,166,000

Sec. 5027. 2018 c 2 s 5073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program (30001368)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .(($26,630,000))

﻿ $14,558,000

Community/Technical Colleges Capital Projects

Account—State. . . .$1,831,000

Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0

TOTAL. . . .(($26,630,000))

﻿ $16,389,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Library Building Renovation (30001451)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,448,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$28,359,000

TOTAL. . . .$31,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Science and Technology Building Replacement (30001452)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$1,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,727,000

TOTAL. . . .$9,883,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia Center for Science and Technology (30001453)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State. . . .$3,421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$37,726,000

TOTAL. . . .$41,147,000

(End of part)

PART 6

RESERVED

(End of part)

PART 7

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 7001. 2018 c 2 s 7001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are ((fifteen million, fifty seven)) sixteen million two hundred forty-seven thousand dollars for the 2017-2019 biennium, ((two hundred sixty-two million, two hundred ninety)) two hundred seventy-nine million eight hundred sixty thousand dollars for the 2019-2021 biennium, and ((three hundred sixty-six million, four hundred seventy-five)) three hundred ninety-four million six hundred sixty thousand dollars for the 2021-2023 biennium.

Sec. 7002. 2018 c 2 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Department of enterprise services:

(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $5,323,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to repair the east plaza garage in Olympia.

(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for Tacoma Rhodes elevators.

(4) Washington state patrol:

(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for furnishings and equipment at the 1063 building.

(5) Department of labor and industries: Enter into a financing contract for up to (($12,700,000)) $12,504,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to modernize a lab and training facility.

(6) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Cascadia College for up to (($29,500,000)) $30,225,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a parking structure.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Community College for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire property in Renton.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Seattle College for up to $10,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student wellness and fitness center.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $31,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build student housing.

(e) ((Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for up to $35,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student recreation center.

(f))) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to (($3,000,000)) $3,400,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the main building.

(((g))) (f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park Technical College for up to (($33,288,000)) $35,821,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a center for advanced manufacturing technologies.

(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Community College for up to $22,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a west campus expansion.

(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a student success center.

(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College for up to $26,475,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for student housing.

(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a health and wellness center.

(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor Community College for up to $1,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for parking lot improvements.

(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for property acquisition and improvements.

(7) Department of Social and Health Services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,900,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the special commitment center, King county secure community transition facility building purchase.

Sec. 7003. 2018 c 2 s 7024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The energy efficiency account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the energy ((recovery act)) efficiency account shall be appropriated and expended for loans, loan guarantees, and grants for projects that encourage the establishment and use of innovative and sustainable industries for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology. The balance of state funds, federal funds, and loan repayments, from the energy recovery act account, are deposited in this account.

Sec. 7004. 2018 c 2 s 7025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the office of financial management, may sell the property known as the Tacoma Rhodes complex to the city of Tacoma. The property consists of the broadway building, market building, and parking garage. The department may negotiate a sale with the city of Tacoma for less than fair market value, but the city must pay appraisal costs, ((all debt service, all closing costs, and the cost of any outstanding liabilities necessary to keep the department whole)) state bond debt, federal debt, debt from certificates of participation, and all closing costs. The terms and conditions of the sale must meet the business needs of the state tenants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:

By July 1, 2018, the Washington state historical society shall transfer custodianship of the historic lord mansion to The Evergreen State College, subject to approval by The Evergreen State College board of trustees. If the transfer does not occur by July 1, 2018, by June 30, 2019, the Washington State historical society shall transfer custodianship of the historic lord mansion to the department of enterprise services.

Sec. 7006. 2018 c 2 s 7028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The public use general aviation airport loan revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys collected under ((this chapter)) section 4002, chapter 2, Laws of 2018 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes described in section 4002 ((of this act)), chapter 2, Laws of 2018. Only the community aviation revitalization board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007. A new section is added to 2018 c 2 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) The legislature recognizes that outdoor recreation in Washington provides multiple benefits including significant business and retail tax revenue, business and job creation, improved physical and mental health, higher quality-of-life that attracts and retains businesses and workers from beyond the recreation sector, and conservation and education values. To fulfill the goals of the 2018 recreation and conservation plan for Washington state, the recreation and conservation office must conduct a study that identifies recreational assets of statewide significance, where gaps in recreational assets exist, and investment strategies and options for addressing those gaps. The study must address existing and projected future needs of the people of Washington state.

(2) The office must submit a report with its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---