BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The institutions of higher education, the council of presidents, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the Washington student achievement council shall collaborate to carry out the following goals:

(a) Identify talent pipeline gaps within the outdoor recreation industry in the state; and

(b) Develop recommendations for institutions of higher education to create master's, bachelor's, and associate degrees and certificate programs that meet the needs of the outdoor recreation industry.

(2) The task force on talent pipeline gaps in the outdoor recreation industry is established.

(a) The task force includes the following members:

(i) One representative from the state board for community and technical colleges;

(ii) One representative from each of the state universities, the regional universities, and the state college, who has expertise in curriculum development;

(iii) One representative from the council of presidents;

(iv) One representative from the student achievement council; and

(v) Four public representatives, each of whom has expertise in a different sector of the outdoor recreation industry within the state.

(b) The task force shall select two cochairs to facilitate its progress. One cochair shall represent the group in (a)(i) of this subsection and the other cochair shall be the representative described in (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(c) The purpose of the task force is to coordinate and implement the goals in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The task force shall report to the legislature and the institutions of higher education on its goals and recommendations by December 17, 2018.

(4) Staff support for the task force shall be jointly provided by the council of presidents and the state board for community and technical colleges.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.

(6) To select the representatives from the outdoor recreation industry under subsection (2)(a)(v) of this section, the student achievement council shall issue a request for interest, asking who wishes to participate on the task force as a volunteer. The names and resumes, including experience participating in similar efforts, of proposed task force members must be submitted to the student achievement council. The student achievement council shall give this information to the task force and the task force chairs shall select the four representatives from this pool of candidates.

(7) This section expires December 31, 2018.

--- END ---