BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1) After the effective date of this section, for updates to multicounty planning policies adopted by the metropolitan planning organization and regional transportation planning organization that include the most populous municipality in the state, major military installations and jurisdictions adjacent to or including a major military installation must be granted priority for regional funding that is equivalent to the largest municipality within the county in which the military installation is located.

(2) For the purposes of this section, a "major military installation" means an installation with at least five thousand enlisted and service personnel stationed at the installation.

--- END ---