BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department may provide residential custody services in a state juvenile rehabilitation facility to youth adjudicated and sentenced by a court of any federally recognized Indian tribe located within the state of Washington, pursuant to a contract between the department and the tribe that is entered into in compliance with the interlocal cooperation act, chapter 39.34 RCW.

(2) As used in this section:

(a) "Residential custody services" means a comprehensive program established pursuant to RCW 72.05.130 for the custody, care, education, treatment, instruction, guidance, control, and rehabilitation of youth committed to a state juvenile rehabilitation facility.

(b) "State juvenile rehabilitation facility" means an institution as defined in RCW 13.40.020(13), a community facility as defined in RCW 72.05.020(1), or other juvenile rehabilitation facility operated by the department.

--- END ---