BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is a public interest in protecting students at all levels of their education. The legislature also finds that there has been an atmosphere of societal unrest recently, especially on college campuses. The legislature also finds that the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College are explicitly authorized to maintain a commissioned police force. The legislature also finds that the community and technical colleges have not been given the authority to maintain the same level of security as the universities. The legislature intends the community and technical colleges to have the same ability to hire and maintain an armed commissioned police force on their campuses as the other institutes of higher education and common schools.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.10.550 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the state community and technical colleges, and the boards of trustees of the regional universities or of The Evergreen State College, acting independently and each on behalf of its own institution:

(1) May each establish a police force for its own institution, which force shall function under such conditions and regulations as the board prescribes; and

(2) May supply appropriate badges and uniforms indicating the positions and authority of the members of such police force.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.10.560 and 1983 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the state community and technical colleges, and the boards of trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College, acting independently and each on behalf of its own institution, may each:

(a) Establish and promulgate rules and regulations governing pedestrian traffic and vehicular traffic and parking upon lands and facilities of the university or college;

(b) Adjudicate matters involving parking infractions internally; and

(c) Collect and retain any penalties so imposed.

(2) If the rules or regulations promulgated under subsection (1) of this section provide for internal adjudication of parking infractions, a person charged with a parking infraction who deems himself or herself aggrieved by the final decision in an internal adjudication may, within ten days after written notice of the final decision, appeal by filing a written notice thereof with the college or university police force. Documents relating to the appeal shall immediately be forwarded to the district court in the county in which the offense was committed, which court shall have jurisdiction over such offense and such appeal shall be heard de novo.

--- END ---