BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.244 and 2015 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.

(2)(a) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own production.

(b) Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided that:

(i) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and

(ii) The number of warehouses off the premises of the microbrewery does not exceed one.

(c) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.

(3) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also sell from its premises for on-premises and off-premises consumption:

(a) Beer produced by another microbrewery or a domestic brewery as long as the other breweries' brands do not exceed twenty-five percent of the microbrewery's on-tap offerings; or

(b) Cider produced by a domestic winery.

(4) The board may issue up to two retail licenses allowing a microbrewery to operate an on or off-premises tavern, beer and/or wine restaurant, or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant.

(5) A microbrewery that holds a tavern license, spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license holds the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.

(6)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell ((bottled)) beer of its own production in bottles and growlers at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. ((However, strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at farmers markets.))

(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which ((bottled)) beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers market.

(c) Any person selling or serving beer must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.

(d) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in Washington.

(e) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection (6) include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers ((bottled)) beer for sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.

(f) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer and growlers of beer at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under this subsection (6) to sell ((bottled)) beer at retail at the farmers market. This application must include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell ((bottled)) beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which ((bottled)) beer may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell bottled beer and growlers of beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board must notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (6)(f) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.

(g) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary to implement this section.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection (6):

(i) "Qualifying farmers market" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.170.

(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.

(7) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for another microbrewer. This contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.170 and 2017 c 238 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is a license for domestic wineries; fee to be computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.

(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington state from grapes or other agricultural products.

(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed under this section may act as a distributor of its own production. Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed one.

(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve samples of its own products, with or without charge, may sell wine of its own production at retail, and may sell for off-premises consumption wines of its own production in kegs or sanitary containers meeting the applicable requirements of federal law brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap at the time of sale, provided that: (a) Each additional location has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the total number of additional locations does not exceed four; (c) a winery may not act as a distributor at any such additional location; and (d) any person selling or serving wine at an additional location for on-premises consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee, the board may hold all licensees operating the additional location jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery licenses.

(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell ((wine)) the following products of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market:

(i) Bottles of wine;

(ii) Bottles and growlers of mead, as defined in RCW 66.24.215(1)(f), with an alcohol content equal to or less than fourteen percent by volume; and

(iii) Bottles and growlers of cider, as defined in RCW 66.24.210(6).

(b) The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward the four additional retail locations limit specified in this section.

(((b))) (c) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell ((wine)) any products described in (a) of this subsection at a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which ((bottled wine)) such products may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the winery may offer wine, cider or mead for sale at a qualifying farmers market.

(((c))) (d) The wine, cider, or mead sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or from other agricultural products grown in this state.

(((d))) (e) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The winery may not store wine, cider, or mead at a farmers market beyond the hours that the winery offers ((bottled)) wine, cider, or mead for sale. The winery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.

(((e))) (f) Before a winery may sell ((bottled)) wine, cider, or mead at a qualifying farmers market under (a) of this subsection, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to sell ((bottled)) wine, cider, or mead at retail at the farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved winery may sell bottled wine and bottles and growlers of cider and mead; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which ((bottled wine)) such products may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved winery to sell bottled wine and bottles and growlers of cider and mead at retail at its farmers market location, the board must notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (5)(((e))) (f) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.

(((f))) (g) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be necessary to implement this section.

(((g))) (h) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following minimum requirements:

(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers selling their own agricultural products;

(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are processors or resellers. However, if a farmers market does not satisfy this subsection (5)(((g))) (h)(i)(B), a farmers market is still considered a "qualifying farmers market" if the total combined gross annual sales of farmers and processors at the farmers market is one million dollars or more;

(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;

(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor is prohibited; and

(E) No vendor is a franchisee.

(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.

(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.

(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine is deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

(7) During an event held by a nonprofit holding a special occasion license issued under RCW 66.24.380, a domestic winery licensed under this section may take orders, either in writing or electronically, and accept payment for wines of its own production under the following conditions:

(a) Wine produced by the domestic winery may be served for on-premises consumption by the special occasion licensee;

(b) The domestic winery delivers wine to the consumer on a date after the conclusion of the special occasion event;

(c) The domestic winery delivers wine to the consumer at a location different from the location at which the special occasion event is held;

(d) The domestic winery complies with all requirements in chapter 66.20 RCW for direct sale of wine to consumers;

(e) The wine is not sold for resale; and

(f) The domestic winery is entitled to all proceeds from the sale and delivery of its wine to a consumer after the conclusion of the special occasion event, but may enter into an agreement to share a portion of the proceeds of these sales with the special occasion licensee licensed under RCW 66.24.380.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.175 and 2014 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A qualifying farmers market authorized to allow wineries to sell bottled wine and bottles and growlers of cider and mead at retail under RCW 66.24.170 or microbreweries to sell ((bottled)) bottles and growlers of beer at retail under RCW 66.24.244, or both, may apply to the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board for an endorsement to allow sampling of ((wine or beer or both)) any or all of these products. A winery or microbrewery offering samples under this section must have an endorsement from the board to sell wine, cider, and mead or beer, as the case may be, of its own production at a qualifying farmers market under RCW 66.24.170 or 66.24.244((, respectively)).

(2) Samples may be offered only under the following conditions:

(a) No more than three wineries or microbreweries combined may offer samples at a qualifying farmers market per day.

(b) Samples must be two ounces or less. A winery or microbrewery may provide a maximum of two ounces of ((wine or beer)) alcohol to a customer per day.

(c) A winery or microbrewery may advertise that it offers samples only at its designated booth, stall, or other designated location at the farmers market.

(d) Customers must remain at the designated booth, stall, or other designated location while sampling ((beer or wine)) alcohol.

(e) Winery and microbrewery licensees and employees who are involved in sampling activities under this section must hold a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.

(f) A winery or microbrewery must have food available for customers to consume while sampling ((beer or wine)) alcohol, or must be adjacent to a vendor offering prepared food.

(3) The board may establish additional requirements to ensure that persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently intoxicated persons may not possess or consume alcohol under the authority granted in this section.

(4) The board may prohibit sampling at a farmers market that is within the boundaries of an alcohol impact area recognized by resolution of the board if the board finds that the sampling activities at the farmers market have an adverse effect on the reduction of chronic public inebriation in the area.

(5) If a winery or microbrewery is found to have committed a public safety violation in conjunction with tasting activities, the board may suspend the licensee's farmers market endorsement and not reissue the endorsement for up to two years from the date of the violation. If mitigating circumstances exist, the board may offer a monetary penalty in lieu of suspension during a settlement conference.

(6) For the purposes of this section((, a)):

(a) "Qualifying farmers market" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.170;

(b) "Cider" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.210(6); and

(c) "Mead" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.215(1)(f).

Sec. 4. RCW 66.04.010 and 2015 c 193 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.

(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:

(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;

(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the state of Washington;

(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced by a brewery or winery in the United States outside of the state of Washington; and

(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this subsection as its authorized representative for marketing and selling its products within the United States in accordance with a written agreement between the authorized representative and such brewery or winery pursuant to this title.

(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.

(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.

(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

(6) "Board" means the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board, constituted under this title.

(7) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.

(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational, athletic, or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.

(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or pieces.

(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether by drinking or otherwise.

(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store manager.

(12) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the reduced licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.

(13) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession within the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.

(14) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of distilling spirits.

(15) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.

(16) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.

(17) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business is, the sale of drugs, medicines, and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.

(18) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.

(19) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.

(20) "Flavored malt beverage" means:

(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or

(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.

(21) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'

(22) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds, having facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings, structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either owned or leased by the same person or persons.

(23) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.

(24) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.

(25) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined (alcohol, spirits, wine, and beer), and all fermented, spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine, or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid, semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.

(26) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as "strong beer."

(27) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.

(28) "Nightclub" means an establishment that provides entertainment and has as its primary source of revenue (a) the sale of alcohol for consumption on the premises, (b) cover charges, or (c) both.

(29) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding liquor.

(30) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for compensation.

(31) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this title.

(32) "Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or corporation.

(33) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession within the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.

(34) "Powdered alcohol" means any powder or crystalline substance containing alcohol that is produced for direct use or reconstitution.

(35) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and given by him or her to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.

(36) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of access, and which are generally used by the public.

(37) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board under the powers conferred by this title.

(38) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not including drug stores and soda fountains.

(39) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his or her agent in the state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge, of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale" and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW 9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.

(40) "Service bar" means a fixed or portable table, counter, cart, or similar work station primarily used to prepare, mix, serve, and sell alcohol that is picked up by employees or customers. Customers may not be seated or allowed to consume food or alcohol at a service bar.

(41) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or otherwise.

(42) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.

(43) "Store" means a state liquor store established under this title.

(44) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the premises, of beer, as herein defined.

(45) "VIP airport lounge" means an establishment within an international airport located beyond security checkpoints that provides a special space to sit, relax, read, work, and enjoy beverages where access is controlled by the VIP airport lounge operator and is generally limited to the following classifications of persons:

(a) Airline passengers of any age whose admission is based on a first-class, executive, or business class ticket;

(b) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or allowed guests of certain frequent flyer or other loyalty incentive programs maintained by airlines that have agreements describing the conditions for access to the VIP airport lounge;

(c) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or allowed guests of certain enhanced amenities programs maintained by companies that have agreements describing the conditions for access to the VIP airport lounge;

(d) Airport and airline employees, government officials, foreign dignitaries, and other attendees of functions held by the airport authority or airlines related to the promotion of business objectives such as increasing international air traffic and enhancing foreign trade where access to the VIP airport lounge will be controlled by the VIP airport lounge operator; and

(e) Airline passengers of any age or airline employees whose admission is based on a pass issued or permission given by the airline for access to the VIP airport lounge.

(46) "VIP airport lounge operator" means an airline, port district, or other entity operating a VIP airport lounge that: Is accountable for compliance with the alcohol beverage control act under this title; holds the license under chapter 66.24 RCW issued to the VIP airport lounge; and provides a point of contact for addressing any licensing and enforcement by the board.

(47)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation, and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume, including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port, sherry, muscatel, and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i) Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."

(48) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as agent.

(49) "Wine importer" means a person or business within Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

(50) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

(51) "Growler" means a sanitary container brought to an authorized premises by the purchaser, or provided by a licensee, and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale by an employee of the licensee.

--- END ---