BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges shall waive fifty percent of the tuition and services and activities fees for students who meet all of the following criteria:

(1) A member of a federally recognized Indian tribe; and

(2) Domiciled within the state for a minimum of one year as provided in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) or (b).

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.15.910 and 2015 c 55 s 224 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen State College, or the community and technical colleges as a whole, shall not exceed the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.

(a) University of Washington. . . .21 percent

(b) Washington State University. . . .20 percent

(c) Eastern Washington University. . . .11 percent

(d) Central Washington University. . . .10 percent

(e) Western Washington University. . . .10 percent

(f) The Evergreen State College. . . .10 percent

(g) Community and technical colleges as a whole. . . .35 percent

(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.15.014;

(b) RCW 28B.15.100;

(c) RCW 28B.15.225;

(d) RCW 28B.15.380;

(e) RCW 28B.15.520;

(f) RCW 28B.15.526;

(g) RCW 28B.15.527;

(h) RCW 28B.15.555;

(i) RCW 28B.15.556;

(j) RCW 28B.15.615;

(k) RCW 28B.15.621 (2) and (4);

(l) RCW 28B.15.730;

(m) RCW 28B.15.740;

(n) RCW 28B.15.750;

(o) RCW 28B.15.756;

(p) RCW 28B.50.259; ((and))

(q) RCW 28B.70.050; and

(r) Section 1 of this act.

(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees contained in the following:

(a) RCW 28B.15.522;

(b) RCW 28B.15.540;

(c) RCW 28B.15.558; and

(d) RCW 28B.15.621(3).

(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the western interstate commission for higher education western undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this subsection.

(a) Washington State University. . . .1 percent

(b) Eastern Washington University. . . .3 percent

(c) Central Washington University. . . .3 percent

(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

--- END ---