BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.300.288 and 2014 c 103 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work with state agency and community partners to assist schools in implementing youth suicide prevention activities, which may include the following:

(a) Training for school employees, parents, community members, and students in recognizing and responding to the signs of suicide;

(b) Partnering with local coalitions of community members interested in preventing youth suicide; and

(c) Responding to communities determined to be in crisis after a suicide or attempted suicide to prevent further instances of suicide.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, working with state and community partners, shall prioritize funding appropriated for subsection (1) of this section to communities identified as the highest risk.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and make available an online one hour training module for school staff on recognition, screening, and response to emotional or behavioral distress in students to assist school districts in meeting the staff training component of RCW 28A.320.127.

(a) The online suicide prevention training module for school staff does not replace RCW 28A.410.226, the training requirement for school counselors, psychologists, social workers, and nurses to complete an approved three hour suicide prevention training.

(b) School staff may complete the three hour suicide prevention training required by RCW 28A.410.226 in lieu of the one hour online suicide prevention training.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.320.127 and 2016 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2014-15 school year, each school district must adopt a plan for recognition, initial screening, and response to emotional or behavioral distress in students, including but not limited to indicators of possible substance abuse, violence, youth suicide, and sexual abuse. The school district must annually provide the plan to all district staff.

(2) At a minimum the plan must address:

(a) Identification of training opportunities in recognition, screening, and referral that may be available for staff including, but not limited to, the training developed in RCW 28A.300.288(3);

(b) How to use the expertise of district staff who have been trained in recognition, screening, and referral;

(c) How staff should respond to suspicions, concerns, or warning signs of emotional or behavioral distress in students;

(d) Identification and development of partnerships with community organizations and agencies for referral of students to health, mental health, substance abuse, and social support services, including development of at least one memorandum of understanding between the district and such an entity in the community or region;

(e) Protocols and procedures for communication with parents and guardians, including the notification requirements under RCW 28A.320.160;

(f) How staff should respond to a crisis situation where a student is in imminent danger to himself or herself or others;

(g) How the district will provide support to students and staff after an incident of violence, youth suicide, or allegations of sexual abuse;

(h) How staff should respond when allegations of sexual contact or abuse are made against a staff member, a volunteer, or a parent, guardian, or family member of the student, including how staff should interact with parents, law enforcement, and child protective services; and

(i) How the district will provide to certificated and classified staff the training on the obligation to report physical abuse or sexual misconduct required under RCW 28A.400.317.

(3) The plan under this section may be a separate plan or a component of another district plan or policy, such as the harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy under RCW 28A.300.2851 or the comprehensive safe school plan required under RCW 28A.320.125.

--- END ---