BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.380 and 2016 c 28 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The minimum monthly salary paid to state patrol troopers and sergeants ((on July 1, 2017,)) must be competitive with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington, guided by the results of a survey undertaken in the collective bargaining process during ((2016)) each biennium. The salary levels ((on July 1, 2017,)) must be guided by the average of compensation paid to the corresponding rank from ((the Seattle police department, King county sheriff's office, Tacoma police department, Snohomish county sheriff's office, Spokane police department, and Vancouver police department)) comparable law enforcement agencies. Compensation must be calculated using base salary, premium pay (a pay received by more than a majority of employees), education pay, and longevity pay. ((The compensation comparison data is based on the Washington state patrol and the law enforcement agencies listed in this section as of July 1, 2016.)) Increases in salary levels for captains and lieutenants that are collectively bargained must be proportionate to the increases in salaries for troopers and sergeants as a result of the survey described in this section.

(2) By January 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol must provide a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature on the impact of the salary adjustments provided pursuant to this section. The results must include information on the effect on recruitment, retention, vacancy rates, and staffing levels.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2023.

--- END ---