BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.87.130 and 1969 ex.s. c 185 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

No county shall vacate a county road or part thereof which abuts on a body of salt or freshwater unless:

(1) The purpose of the vacation is to enable any public authority to acquire the vacated property for: Port purposes, boat moorage or launching sites, or for park, viewpoint, recreational, educational, or other public purposes((, or unless)); or

(2) The property is zoned for industrial uses; or

(3) For the protection of public safety when the county road ends on private property and part of the private property provides access to a mainline railroad bridge creating a public safety hazard.

--- END ---