BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that every three minutes an American child or adult is diagnosed with a potentially fatal blood disease. The legislature further finds that twenty percent to thirty-four percent of individuals with diverse heritage never find a match. For many of these individuals, bone marrow transplantation is the only chance for survival. The ultimate key to survivability lies in increasing the number of bone marrow donors across all ethnicities, thus increasing the potential for a suitable match. It is the intent of the legislature to increase awareness of the national bone marrow program statewide and to increase the number of Washington residents on the national marrow donor registry in order to increase the chance that all patients in need of bone marrow transplants will find a suitable bone marrow match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall provide each driver's license or identicard applicant with written materials regarding making a donation of bone marrow and being placed on the bone marrow donor registry at the completion of their licensing transaction.

(2) The department of licensing, in cooperation with the national marrow donor program and other appropriate organizations, shall place signage in each of the licensing service offices that provide background on the written materials that the applicant will receive regarding bone marrow donation. This will include a notice that any information provided by the driver's license or identicard applicant will be used solely for allowing the applicant to obtain information on becoming a possible bone marrow donor and will not be used for commercial or fund-raising purposes.

(3) No organization or third party may utilize the information obtained from this section for fund-raising or other commercial purposes.

Sec. 3. RCW 70.54.280 and 1992 c 109 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of health shall establish a bone marrow donor recruitment and education program to educate residents of the state about:

(1) The need for bone marrow donors;

(2) The procedures required to become registered as a potential bone marrow donor, including procedures for determining a person's tissue type; ((and))

(3) The procedures a donor must undergo to donate bone marrow or other sources of blood stem cells; and

(4) The ability to obtain information about bone marrow donation when applying for or renewing a personal driver's license or identicard with the department of licensing.

The department of health shall make special efforts to educate and recruit citizens from minority populations to volunteer as potential bone marrow donors. Means of communication may include use of press, radio, and television, and placement of educational materials in appropriate health care facilities, blood banks, and state and local agencies. The department of health in conjunction with the department of licensing shall make educational materials available at all places where and when drivers' licenses are issued or renewed.

By December 1, 2019, the department of health, in conjunction with the department of licensing, must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results and outcomes of the efforts in increasing public awareness of bone marrow donation and the number of individuals being placed on the bone marrow donor registry from Washington state as a result of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---