BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) All public schools may offer students the opportunity to compost their food waste. School districts may provide on-site composting or contracting out with the local waste management company.

(2) All public schools may offer students the opportunity to recycle.

(3) The state may provide free pickup of compost and provide supplies such as bins and compost bags for all public schools that do not currently have the pickup and supplies needed.

--- END ---