BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of 49 C.F.R. Sec. 395.2 (2018) and 49 C.F.R. Sec. 395.1 (2018), relating to the exemption for agricultural transporters, the planting and harvesting seasons are January 1st through December 31st of each year.

--- END ---