BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In order to facilitate hunting and fishing opportunities for Washington state resident veterans who are eligible for reduced fishing and hunting license fees, based on a service-related disability, under RCW 77.32.480, the department may accept donations from the public so that resident disabled veterans, on a first-come, first-served basis, may elect to utilize a donation towards their purchase of hunting and fishing licenses.

(2) The director may take other actions consistent with facilitating hunting and fishing opportunities for disabled veterans. These actions may include, but are not limited to, entering into agreements with willing landowners pursuant to RCW 77.12.320.

(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section and to define the license products, to include the transaction and dealer fees, available for purchase using donated funds.

--- END ---