BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.068 and 2016 c 233 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the postretirement employment options available in RCW 41.32.802 or 41.32.862, ((and only until August 1, 2020,)) a teacher in plan 2 or plan 3 who has retired under the alternate early retirement provisions of RCW 41.32.765(3)(b) or 41.32.875(3)(b) may be employed with an employer for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year without suspension of his or her benefit, provided that: (1) The retired teacher reenters employment more than one calendar month after his or her accrual date and after June 9, 2016; (2) (([the retired teacher])) the retired teacher is employed exclusively as ((either)) a substitute teacher as defined in RCW 41.32.010(48)(a) in an instructional capacity, as opposed to other capacities identified in RCW 41.32.010(49); and (3) the employing school district compensates the district's substitute teachers at a rate that is at least eighty-five percent of the full daily amount allocated by the state to the district for substitute teacher compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. 2016 c 233 s 19 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---