BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.01.040 and 2017 c 168 s 1 and 2017 c 167 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices, departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled under their contract of employment with the state government to not less than eight hours of vacation leave with full pay for each month of employment.

Each such subordinate officer and employee shall be entitled under such contract of employment to not less than eight additional hours of vacation with full pay each year for satisfactorily completing the first two, three, and five continuous years of employment respectively.

To the extent that rates of vacation leave accrual are based upon total state employment, each contract year or equivalent of full-time employment in a certificated or classified position with a school district within the state shall be credited to the state officer or employee as one year of qualifying service. Qualifying employment with a school district shall be applied to leave accrual rates effective July 1, 2018.

Such part-time officers or employees of the state government who are employed on a regular schedule of duration of not less than one year shall be entitled under their contract of employment to that fractional part of the vacation leave that the total number of hours of such employment bears to the total number of hours of full-time employment.

Each subordinate officer and employee of the several offices, departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled under his or her contract of employment with the state government to accrue unused vacation leave not to exceed two hundred forty hours. However, employees of the Washington state ferries covered by collective bargaining agreements containing provisions in effect on June 30, 2017, allowing accrual of unused vacation leave not to exceed three hundred twenty hours shall be allowed to continue the higher accrual limit until such time as those provisions are modified through collective bargaining, or the bargaining unit changes its exclusive representative or is decertified. Officers and employees transferring within the several offices, departments, and institutions of the state government shall be entitled to transfer such accrued vacation leave to each succeeding state office, department, or institution. All vacation leave shall be taken at the time convenient to the employing office, department, or institution: PROVIDED, That if a subordinate officer's or employee's request for vacation leave is deferred by reason of the convenience of the employing office, department, or institution, and a statement of the necessity therefor is retained by the agency, then the aforesaid maximum two hundred forty hours of accrued unused vacation leave shall be extended for each month said leave is so deferred.

--- END ---