BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 17.28.257 and 1959 c 64 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of chapters 84.56 and 84.64 RCW and RCW ((36.88.120, 36.88.140, 36.88.150, 36.88.170 and 36.88.180)) 36.29.180 governing ((the)) liens, collection, payment of assessments, delinquent assessments, interest and penalties, lien foreclosure and foreclosed property ((of county road improvement districts)) shall govern such matters as applied to mosquito control districts.

--- END ---