BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.44.007 and 1997 c 332 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following words have the meanings indicated:

(1) "Other health care facilities" means nursing home, extended care, long-term care, outpatient, and rehabilitative facilities((,)); ambulances((,)); facilities that promote health, wellness, and prevention of illness and injury; and such other facilities as are appropriate to the health and wellness needs of the population served.

(2) "Other health care services" means nursing home, extended care, long-term care, outpatient, rehabilitative, ((health maintenance,)) and ambulance services; services that promote health, wellness, and prevention of illness and injury; and such other services as are appropriate to the health needs of the population served.

(3) "Public hospital district" or "district" means public health care service district.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.44.070 and 1987 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The public hospital district commission shall appoint a superintendent, who shall be appointed for an indefinite time and be removable at the will of the commission. Appointments and removals shall be by resolution, introduced at a regular meeting and adopted at the same or a subsequent regular meeting by a majority vote. The superintendent shall receive such compensation as the commission shall fix by resolution.

(2) Where a public hospital district operates more than one hospital, the commission may in its discretion appoint up to one superintendent per hospital and assign among the superintendents the powers and duties set forth in RCW 70.44.080 and 70.44.090 as deemed appropriate by the commission.

--- END ---