BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 44.73.015 and 2009 c 228 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative gift center ((is authorized to)) may sell at retail, for off-premises consumption, wine produced in Washington by a licensed domestic winery, spirits produced in Washington by a licensed craft distillery, or beer produced in Washington by a licensed microbrewery.

(2)(a) Wine sold by the legislative gift center must: (((a))) (i) Be sold to individuals twenty-one years of age or older; (((b))) (ii) be sold for personal use and not for resale; and (((c))) (iii) have been purchased from a licensed wine distributor or from a manufacturer authorized to distribute wine of its own production.

(((2))) (b) Spirits sold by the legislative gift center must: (i) Be sold to individuals twenty-one years of age or older; (ii) be sold for personal use and not for resale; and (iii) have been purchased from a licensed craft distillery or a licensed spirits distributor who sells craft spirits produced in Washington.

(c) Beer sold by the legislative gift center must: (i) Be sold to individuals twenty-one years of age or older; (ii) be sold for personal use and not for resale; (iii) be in sealed bottles or cans; and (iv) have been purchased from a licensed microbrewery or a licensed distributor who sells beer produced by a microbrewery in Washington.

(3) The legislative gift center must collect and remit to the department of revenue all applicable state and local taxes on sales of wine, beer, and spirits.

(((3))) (4) The legislative gift center must consult with:

(a) The Washington wine commission to select which Washington wines will be sold. The Washington wine commission must give consideration to award winning wines in assisting the gift center;

(b) Interest groups representing craft distilleries to select which Washington spirits will be sold. The interest groups must give consideration to award winning spirits in assisting the gift center; and

(c) The Washington beer commission to select which Washington microbrews will be sold. The Washington beer commission must give consideration to award winning microbrews in assisting the gift center.

Sec. 2. RCW 44.73.020 and 2007 c 453 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative gift center account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received by the gift center from the sale of Washington state souvenirs, other Washington products, and other products as approved shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operations and maintenance of the gift center, including the purchase of inventory, and for other purposes as provided in this section. Only the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate, or the lead staff person designated by them to oversee management and operation of the gift shop, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of Washington state souvenirs, other Washington products, and products approved by the legislative gift center, shall be deposited as provided in this subsection:

(a) Twenty-five percent in the legislative oral history account ((in chapter 44.04 RCW (created in Substitute House Bill No. 1741))) created in RCW 44.04.345;

(b) Twenty-five percent in the ((oral history)) Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account created in RCW 43.07.380; and

(c) Fifty percent in the capitol furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW 27.48.040.

(3) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of items bearing the state seal by the legislative gift center shall be deposited in the capitol furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW 27.48.040. A full accounting thereof shall be provided to the secretary of state.

(4) The legislative gift center may designate special sales, the proceeds of which shall go to an account specified at the time of designation.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.12.195 and 2009 c 228 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this title ((shall apply to or)) prevents the legislative gift center created in chapter 44.73 RCW from selling at retail, for off-premises consumption, wine produced in Washington by a licensed domestic winery, spirits produced in Washington by a licensed craft distillery, or beer produced in Washington by a microbrewery.

--- END ---