BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state of Washington would benefit from the consistency and predictability of observing a standard time throughout the calendar year. Research has shown that changing to and from daylight saving time twice per year has negative impacts on public health, increases traffic accidents and crime, disrupts agriculture scheduling, and hinders economic growth. Scientific studies have connected a number of health consequences with the act of switching between standard time and daylight saving time, including greater risks of heart attacks, more frequent workplace injuries, and increased suicide rates in the days immediately following the switch. Therefore, the legislature intends to exercise the rights granted under the uniform time act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 260a(a), and exempt the state of Washington from daylight saving time.

The legislature finds further that there have been other political subdivisions within the United States that have changed their time zone over the years to create more consistency across the United States for convenience of commerce. Therefore, it would be beneficial for the state of Washington to conduct a review of its time zone to determine whether or not changes are necessary for the convenience of commerce so that the state may apply for a change in time zone through the United States department of transportation, if appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The time of the state of Washington, for the entire calendar year, is the zone designated by the United States department of transportation for the state of Washington under the uniform time act, 15 U.S.C. Secs. 261 and 263, as determined by reference to coordinated universal time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department is directed to review impacts the state time zone and daylight saving time have on commerce in the state of Washington.

(2) Beginning December 1, 2018, and every two years thereafter, the department must report their findings and recommendations regarding a change in the state time zone to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must include:

(a) A summary of changes in the time zones of other political subdivisions that may affect convenience of commerce in Washington state;

(b) The percentage of residents that work outside of Washington state or leave their community for schooling and what state or standard of time is observed in the places where they go for these purposes;

(c) An overview of where businesses get their supplies and ship their goods or products;

(d) A summary of locations that provide media services to each county in the state of Washington;

(e) A summary of airport, bus, and passenger rail services provided to each community in the state; and

(f) Other major elements of this state's economy and any plans for economic development in the state that may impact the convenience of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 1.20.051 (Daylight saving time) and 1963 c 14 s 1 & 1961 c 3 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act takes effect March 10, 2019.

--- END ---