BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 39.04.020 and 1994 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the state or any municipality shall determine that any public work is necessary to be done, it shall cause plans, specifications, or both thereof and an estimate of the cost of such work to be made and filed in the office of the director, supervisor, commissioner, trustee, board, or agency having by law the authority to require such work to be done. The plans, specifications, and estimates of cost shall be approved by the director, supervisor, commissioner, trustee, board, or agency and the original draft or a certified copy filed in such office before further action is taken.

If the state or such municipality shall determine that it is necessary or advisable that such work shall be executed by any means or method other than by contract or by a small works roster process, and it shall appear by such estimate that the probable cost of executing such work will exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, then the state or such municipality shall at least fifteen days before beginning work cause such estimate, together with a description of the work, to be published at least once in a legal newspaper of general circulation ((published in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done)) and posted on the state or municipality's web site. When any emergency shall require the immediate execution of such public work, upon a finding of the existence of such emergency by the authority having power to direct such public work to be done and duly entered of record, publication of description and estimate may be made within seven days after the commencement of the work.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.04.320 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection, from January 1, 2005, and thereafter, for all public works estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(b)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid before July 1, 2007, for any public works by the department of transportation.

(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2007, and before July 1, 2008, for all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost five million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2008, and before July 1, 2009, for all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2015, and before July 1, 2020, for all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(v) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2020, for all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(c)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid before January 1, 2008, for any public works by a school district, or to any project funded in whole or in part by bond issues approved before July 1, 2007.

(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2008, for all public works by a school district estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2009, for all public works by a school district estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010, for all public works by a school district estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(d)(i) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all specifications must require that no less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2011, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications must require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2012, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications must require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(2) Awarding entities may adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project for the following reasons:

(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in specific geographic areas;

(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of apprentice participation;

(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.310 and this section; or

(d) Other criteria the awarding entity deems appropriate, which are subject to review by the office of the governor.

(3) The secretary of the department of transportation shall adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project for the following reasons:

(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in specific geographic areas; or

(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of apprentice participation.

(4) This section applies to public works contracts awarded by the state, to public works contracts awarded by school districts, and to public works contracts awarded by state four-year institutions of higher education. However, this section does not apply to contracts awarded by state agencies headed by a separately elected public official.

(5)(a) The department of enterprise services must provide information and technical assistance to the affected agencies they serve and collect the following data ((from)) on behalf of those affected agencies for each project covered by this section:

(i) The name of each apprentice and apprentice registration number;

(ii) The name of each project;

(iii) The dollar value of each project;

(iv) The date of the contractor's notice to proceed;

(v) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them, categorized by trade or craft;

(vi) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by them, categorized by trade or craft; and

(vii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted under subsection (2) of this section.

(b) The department of labor and industries shall assist the department of enterprise services in providing information and technical assistance.

(6) The secretary of transportation shall establish an apprenticeship utilization advisory committee, which shall include statewide geographic representation and consist of equal numbers of representatives of contractors and labor. The committee must include at least one member representing contractor businesses with less than thirty-five employees. The advisory committee shall meet regularly with the secretary of transportation to discuss implementation of this section by the department of transportation, including development of the process to be used to adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project.

(7) At the request of the senate labor, commerce, research and development committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee, or their successor committees, and the governor, the department of enterprise services and the department of labor and industries shall compile and summarize the agency data and provide a joint report to both committees. The report shall include recommendations on modifications or improvements to the apprentice utilization program and information on skill shortages in each trade or craft.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.19.600 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 233 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any passenger motor vehicles currently owned or hereafter acquired by any state agency shall be purchased by or transferred to the department. The director may accept vehicles subject to the provisions of RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.630, ((43.41.130 and 43.41.140)) 43.19.622 and 43.19.623 prior to July 1, 1975, if he or she deems it expedient to accomplish an orderly transition.

(2) The department, in cooperation with the office of financial management, shall study and ascertain current and prospective needs of state agencies for passenger motor vehicles and shall direct the transfer to ((a state motor pool)) the department of enterprise services or other appropriate disposition of any vehicle found not to be required by a state agency.

(3) The department shall direct the transfer of passenger motor vehicles from a state agency to ((a state motor pool)) the department of enterprise services or other disposition as appropriate, based on a study under subsection (2) of this section, if a finding is made based on data therein submitted that the economy, efficiency, or effectiveness of state government would be improved by such a transfer or other disposition of passenger motor vehicles. Any dispute over the accuracy of data submitted as to the benefits in state governmental economy, efficiency, and effectiveness to be gained by such transfer shall be resolved by the director and the director of financial management. Unless otherwise determined by the director after consultation with the office of financial management, vehicles owned and managed by the department of transportation, the department of natural resources, and the Washington state patrol are exempt from the requirements of ((subsections (1) through (3) of)) this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.08.065 and 2015 c 225 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any public officer having charge of any vehicle owned or controlled by any county, city, town, or public body in this state other than the state of Washington and used in public business to operate the same upon the public highways of this state unless and until there shall be displayed upon such automobile or other motor vehicle in letters of contrasting color not less than one and one-quarter inches in height in a conspicuous place on the right and left sides thereof, the name of such county, city, town, or other public body, together with the name of the department or office upon the business of which the said vehicle is used. This section shall not apply to vehicles of a sheriff's office, local police department, or any vehicles used by local peace officers under public authority for special undercover or confidential investigative purposes. This subsection shall not apply to: (a) Any municipal transit vehicle operated for purposes of providing public mass transportation; (b) any vehicle governed by the requirements of subsection (4) of this section; nor to (c) any motor vehicle on loan to a school district for driver training purposes. It shall be lawful and constitute compliance with the provisions of this section, however, for the governing body of the appropriate county, city, town, or public body other than the state of Washington or its agencies to adopt and use a distinctive insignia which shall be not less than six inches in diameter across its smallest dimension and which shall be displayed conspicuously on the right and left sides of the vehicle. Such insignia shall be in a color or colors contrasting with the vehicle to which applied for maximum visibility. The name of the public body owning or operating the vehicle shall also be included as part of or displayed above such approved insignia in colors contrasting with the vehicle in letters not less than one and one-quarter inches in height. Immediately below the lettering identifying the public entity and agency operating the vehicle or below an approved insignia shall appear the words "for official use only" in letters at least one inch high in a color contrasting with the color of the vehicle. The appropriate governing body may provide by rule or ordinance for marking of passenger motor vehicles as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section or for exceptions to the marking requirements for local governmental agencies for the same purposes and under the same circumstances as permitted for state agencies under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) Except as provided by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, passenger motor vehicles owned or controlled by the state of Washington, and purchased after July 1, 1989, must be plainly and conspicuously marked on the lower left-hand corner of the rear window with the name of the operating agency or institution or the words (("state motor pool,")) that would designate vehicles owned and managed by the department of enterprise services, as appropriate, the words "state of Washington — for official use only," and the seal of the state of Washington or the appropriate agency or institution insignia, approved by the department of enterprise services. Markings must be on a transparent adhesive material and conform to the standards established by the department of enterprise services. For the purposes of this section, "passenger motor vehicles" means sedans, station wagons, vans, light trucks, or other motor vehicles under ten thousand pounds gross vehicle weight.

(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to vehicles used by the Washington state patrol for general undercover or confidential investigative purposes. Traffic control vehicles of the Washington state patrol may be exempted from the requirements of subsection (2) of this section at the discretion of the chief of the Washington state patrol. The department of enterprise services shall adopt general rules permitting other exceptions to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section for other vehicles used for law enforcement, confidential public health work, and public assistance fraud or support investigative purposes, for vehicles leased or rented by the state on a casual basis for a period of less than ninety days, and those provided for in RCW 46.08.066. The exceptions in this subsection, subsection (4) of this section, and those provided for in RCW 46.08.066 shall be the only exceptions permitted to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(4) Any motorcycle, vehicle over 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight, or other vehicle that for structural reasons cannot be marked as required by subsection (1) or (2) of this section that is owned or controlled by the state of Washington or by any county, city, town, or other public body in this state and used for public purposes on the public highways of this state shall be conspicuously marked in letters of a contrasting color with the words "State of Washington" or the name of such county, city, town, or other public body, together with the name of the department or office that owns or controls the vehicle.

(5) All motor vehicle markings required under the terms of this chapter shall be maintained in a legible condition at all times.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW 41.04.460 (Financial planning for retirement—Department of enterprise services to provide information to retirement system members) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 472 & 1992 c 234 s 10 are each repealed.

--- END ---