BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 53.18.010 and 1967 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Port district" shall mean a municipal corporation of the state of Washington created pursuant to Title 53 RCW. Said port districts may also be hereinafter referred to as the "employer."

"Employee" shall include all port employees except managerial((, professional,)) and administrative personnel, and their confidential assistants.

"Employee organization" means any lawful association, labor organization, union, federation, council, or brotherhood, having as its primary purpose the representation of employees on matters of employment relations.

"Employment relations" includes, but is not limited to, matters concerning wages, salaries, hours, vacation, sick leave, holiday pay and grievance procedures.

Sec. 2. RCW 53.18.060 and 1967 c 101 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

No labor agreement or contract entered into by a port district shall:

(1) Restrict the right of the port district in its discretion to hire;

(2) Limit the right of the port to secure its regular or steady employees from the local community; ((and))

(3) Include within the same agreements: (a) Port security personnel((, or)) and (b) port supervisory personnel; and

(4) Include within the same bargaining unit: (a) Port professional personnel and (b) port supervisory personnel.

--- END ---