BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.56.160 and 1994 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission is empowered and directed to prevent any unfair labor practice and to issue appropriate remedial orders: PROVIDED, That a complaint shall not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. This power shall not be affected or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation or conciliation in labor disputes that have been or may hereafter be established by law.

(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and the reinstatement of employees.

(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or in which the person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.59.150 and 1983 c 58 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission is empowered to prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor practice as defined in RCW 41.59.140: PROVIDED, That a complaint shall not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. This power shall not be affected by any other means of adjustment or prevention that has been or may be established by agreement, law, equity or otherwise.

(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair labor practices as defined in RCW 41.59.140, then the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon such person an order requiring such person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and/or the reinstatement of employees.

(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or wherein the person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.76.055 and 2002 c 356 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission is empowered to prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor practice as defined in RCW 41.76.050: PROVIDED, That a complaint shall not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. This power shall not be affected by any other means of adjustment or prevention that has been or may be established by agreement, law, equity or otherwise.

(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair labor practice as defined in RCW 41.76.050, then the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon such person an order requiring such person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and/or the reinstatement of faculty members.

(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or wherein the person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.80.120 and 2002 c 354 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission is empowered and directed to prevent any unfair labor practice and to issue appropriate remedial orders: PROVIDED, That a complaint shall not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. This power shall not be affected or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation, or conciliation in labor disputes that have been or may hereafter be established by law.

(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and the reinstatement of employees.

(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or in which the person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

Sec. 5. RCW 47.64.132 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission is empowered and directed to prevent any unfair labor practice and to issue appropriate remedial orders; however, a complaint shall not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. This power shall not be affected or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation, or conciliation in labor disputes that have been or may hereafter be established by law.

(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and the reinstatement of employees.

(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or in which the person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

Sec. 6. RCW 49.39.140 and 2010 c 6 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission must prevent unfair labor practices and issue appropriate remedial orders. However, a complaint may not be processed for an unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court.

(2) If the commission determines that a person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission must issue and serve upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the unfair labor practice. The commission may take action to carry out the purposes and policy of this chapter, including requiring the person to pay damages and reinstate employees.

(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or in which the person who has engaged or is engaging in the unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

Sec. 7. RCW 28B.52.065 and 1987 c 314 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission may adjudicate any unfair labor practices alleged by a board of trustees or an employee organization and shall adopt reasonable rules to administer this section, except that a complaint must not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in superior court. However, the parties may agree to seek relief from unfair labor practices through binding arbitration.

--- END ---