BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, if the health services that are available to an injured worker under RCW 51.36.010 include purchase of a hearing instrument, then the health services that are available must also include replacement of such hearing instrument with a new, nonrefurbished instrument at least once every five years. Such replacement must also include related services necessary to assess, select, and fit the hearing instrument.

(2) For purposes of this section, "hearing instrument" has the meaning given in RCW 18.35.010.

--- END ---