BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state liquor and cannabis board must, by rule, adopt a schedule of penalties for a licensed alcohol manufacturer who has committed a violation as part of the licensee's ancillary activities.

(2)(a) The schedule of penalties adopted under subsection (1) of this section may include:

(i) The issuance of a monetary penalty;

(ii) The suspension, revocation, or cancellation of the licensee's ability to conduct ancillary activities; or

(iii) A monetary option in lieu of suspension or revocation.

(b) The schedule of penalties may not include the issuance of a suspension, revocation, or cancellation of an alcohol manufacturer's license and may not exceed the schedule of penalties for a similar violation committed by a retail licensee.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "ancillary activities" means the licensee's activities involving the public, as authorized by statute or by state liquor and cannabis board rule, relating to serving samples, operating a tasting room, conducting retail sales, serving alcohol under a restaurant license issued under this chapter, or serving alcohol with a special occasion license.

--- END ---