BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds the current restrictions that prohibit accounting firms in the Canadian province of British Columbia from providing attest or compilation services to wholly or majority-owned subsidiaries of British Columbia companies residing in and registered in Washington to be an unnecessary constraint. There are a number of such entities in Washington that require specific financial services and reports for issuance solely in Canada but are unable to utilize the services of British Columbia accounting firms, thus resulting in high audit costs. The legislature intends to allow British Columbia accounting firms to provide specific engagements for these subsidiaries residing in Washington.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.04.350 and 2016 c 127 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any individual not holding a license and not qualified for the practice privileges authorized by subsection (2) of this section from serving as an employee of a firm licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215. However, the employee shall not issue any report as defined in this chapter, on the information of any other persons, firms, or governmental units over his or her name.

(2) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's requirements and shall have all the privileges of licensees of this state without the need to obtain a license under RCW 18.04.105 if the individual:

(a) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state that requires, as a condition of licensure, that an individual:

(i) Have at least one hundred fifty semester hours of college or university education including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university;

(ii) Achieve a passing grade on the uniform certified public accountant examination; and

(iii) Possess at least one year of experience including service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills, all of which was verified by a licensee; or

(b) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state that does not meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, but such individual's qualifications are substantially equivalent to those requirements. Any individual who passed the uniform certified public accountant examination and holds a valid license issued by any other state prior to January 1, 2012, may be exempt from the education requirements in (a)(i) of this subsection for purposes of this section.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who qualifies for the practice privilege under subsection (2) of this section may offer or render professional services, whether in person or by mail, telephone, or electronic means, and no notice, fee, or other submission shall be provided by any such individual. Such an individual shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Any individual licensee of another state exercising the privilege afforded under subsection (2) of this section and the firm that employs that licensee simultaneously consent, as a condition of exercising this privilege:

(a) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

(b) To comply with this chapter and the board's rules;

(c) That in the event the license from the state of the individual's principal place of business is no longer valid, the individual will cease offering or rendering professional services in this state individually and on behalf of a firm; and

(d) To the appointment of the state board which issued the certificate or license as their agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by this state's board against the certificate holder or licensee.

(5) An individual who qualifies for practice privileges under subsection (2) of this section who performs any attest service described in RCW 18.04.025(1) may only do so through a firm which has obtained a license under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215 or which meets the requirements for an exception from the firm licensure requirements under RCW 18.04.195(1) (a)(iii) or (b).

(6) A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or using their CPA title in another state shall be subject to disciplinary action in this state for an act committed in another state for which the licensee would be subject to discipline for an act committed in the other state. Notwithstanding RCW 18.04.295 and this section, the board shall cooperate with and investigate any complaint made by the board of accountancy of another state or jurisdiction.

(7) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a licensed firm, any of their employees, or persons qualifying for practice privileges by this section from disclosing any data in confidence to other certified public accountants, quality assurance or peer review teams, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations of certified public accountants or to the board or any of its employees engaged in conducting quality assurance or peer reviews, or any one of their employees in connection with quality or peer reviews of that accountant's accounting and auditing practice conducted under the auspices of recognized professional associations.

(8) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a licensed firm, any of their employees, or persons qualifying for practice privileges by this section from disclosing any data in confidence to any employee, representative, officer, or committee member of a recognized professional association, or to the board, or any of its employees or committees in connection with a professional investigation held under the auspices of recognized professional associations or the board.

(9) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any officer, employee, partner, or principal of any organization:

(a) From affixing his or her signature to any statement or report in reference to the affairs of the organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office which he or she holds in the organization; or

(b) From describing himself or herself by the position, title, or office he or she holds in such organization.

(10) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person or firm composed of persons not holding a license under this chapter from offering or rendering to the public bookkeeping, accounting, tax services, the devising and installing of financial information systems, management advisory, or consulting services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters, or similar services, provided that persons, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations not holding a license who offer or render these services do not designate any written statement as a report as defined in RCW 18.04.025(21) or use any language in any statement relating to the financial affairs of a person or entity which is conventionally used by licensees in reports or any attest service as defined in this chapter.

(11) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person or firm composed of persons not holding a license under this chapter from offering or rendering to the public the preparation of financial statements, or written statements describing how such financial statements were prepared, provided that persons, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations not holding a license who offer or render these services do not designate any written statement as a report as defined in RCW 18.04.025(21), do not issue any written statement that purports to express or disclaim an opinion on financial statements that have been audited, and do not issue any written statement that expresses assurance on financial statements that have been reviewed. The board may prescribe, by rule, language for the written statement describing how such financial statements were prepared for use by persons not holding a license under this chapter.

(12) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any act of or the use of any words by a public official or a public employee in the performance of his or her duties.

(13) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits any person who holds only a valid certificate from assuming or using the designation "certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or any other title, designation, words, letters, sign, card, or device tending to indicate the person is a certificate holder, provided, that such person does not perform or offer to perform for the public one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills, including issuance of reports or of one or more kinds of management advisory, financial advisory, consulting services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters.

(14) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "accountant" by any person regardless of whether the person has been granted a certificate or holds a license under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "enrolled agent" or the designation "EA" by any person regardless of whether the person has been granted a certificate or holds a license under this chapter if the person is properly authorized at the time of use to use the title or designation by the United States department of the treasury. The board shall by rule allow the use of other titles by any person regardless of whether the person has been granted a certificate or holds a license under this chapter if the person using the titles or designations is authorized at the time of use by a nationally recognized entity sanctioning the use of board authorized titles.

(15) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any firm holding a license or registration as a chartered professional accounting firm in the Canadian province of British Columbia from performing any of the following services: (a) An attest or compilation engagement of a business entity operating in Washington state that is the consolidated, subsidiary, or component entity of another entity that is operating in Canada who acts as the issuer of the report; or (b) a standalone attest or compilation engagement of a wholly or majority-owned subsidiary and or component of an entity that is operating in Canada.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.04.183 and 2001 c 294 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall grant a license as a certified public accountant to a holder of a permit, license, or certificate issued by a foreign country's board, agency, or institute, provided that:

(((1))) (a) The foreign country where the foreign permit, license, or certificate was issued is a party to an agreement on trade with the United States that encourages the mutual recognition of licensing and certification requirements for the provision of covered services by the parties under the trade agreement;

(((2))) (b) Such foreign country's board, agency, or institute makes similar provision to allow a person who holds a valid license issued by this state to obtain such foreign country's comparable permit, license, or certificate;

(((3))) (c) The foreign permit, license, or certificate:

(((a))) (i) Was duly issued by such foreign country's board, agency, or institute that regulates the practice of public accountancy; and

(((b))) (ii) Is in good standing at the time of the application; and

(((c))) (iii) Was issued upon the basis of educational, examination, experience, and ethical requirements substantially equivalent currently or at the time of issuance of the foreign permit, license, or certificate to those in this state;

(((4))) (d) The applicant has within the thirty-six months prior to application completed an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE as required under RCW 18.04.215(5). The board shall provide for transition from existing to new CPE requirements;

(((5))) (e) The applicant's foreign permit, license, or certificate was the type of permit, license, or certificate requiring the most stringent qualifications if, in the foreign country, more than one type of permit, license, or certificate is issued. This state's board shall decide which are the most stringent qualifications;

(((6))) (f) The applicant has passed a written examination or its equivalent, approved by the board, that tests knowledge in the areas of United States accounting principles, auditing standards, commercial law, income tax law, and Washington state rules of professional ethics; and

(((7))) (g) The applicant has within the eight years prior to applying for a license under this section, demonstrated, in accordance with the rules issued by the board, one year of public accounting experience, within the foreign country where the foreign permit, license, or certificate was issued, equivalent to the experience required under RCW 18.04.105(1)(d) or such other experience or employment which the board in its discretion regards as substantially equivalent.

(2) The board may adopt by rule new CPE standards that differ from those in subsection (((4))) (1)(d) of this section or RCW 18.04.215 if the new standards are consistent with the CPE standards of other states so as to provide to the greatest extent possible, consistent national standards.

(3) A licensee who has been granted a license under the reciprocity provisions of this section shall notify the board within thirty days if the permit, license, or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction has lapsed or if the status of the permit, license, or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction becomes otherwise invalid.

(4) A chartered professional accountant licensed in the Canadian province of British Columbia who is an employee or owner of a chartered professional accounting firm also registered in the Canadian province of British Columbia is not required to obtain a license as a certified public accountant in Washington state, provided they are adhering to the provisions of RCW 18.04.350(15) in providing attest or compilation services to business entities covered under RCW 18.04.350(15).

Sec. 4. RCW 18.04.195 and 2016 c 127 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall grant or renew licenses to practice as a CPA firm to applicants that demonstrate their qualifications therefore in accordance with this section.

(a) The following must hold a license issued under this section:

(i) Any firm with an office in this state performing attest services as defined in RCW 18.04.025(1) or compilations as defined in RCW 18.04.025(6);

(ii) Any firm with an office in this state that uses the title "CPA" or "CPA firm"; or

(iii) Any firm that does not have an office in this state but offers or renders attest services described in RCW 18.04.025 in this state, unless it meets each of the following requirements:

(A) Complies with the qualifications described in subsection (3)(c), (4)(a), or (5)(c) of this section;

(B) Meets the board's quality assurance review program requirements authorized by RCW 18.04.055(9) and the rules implementing such section;

(C) Performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(2); and

(D) Can lawfully do so in the state where said individuals with practice privileges have their principal place of business.

(b) A chartered professional accounting firm registered in the Canadian province of British Columbia may provide compilation or attest services in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15) without obtaining a Washington state CPA firm license.

(c) A firm that is not subject to the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section may perform compilation services described in RCW 18.04.025(6) and other nonattest professional services while using the title "CPA" or "CPA firm" in this state without a license issued under this section only if:

(i) The firm performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(2); and

(ii) The firm can lawfully do so in the state where said individuals with practice privileges have their principal place of business.

(2) A sole proprietorship required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section shall license, as a firm, every three years with the board.

(a) The sole proprietor shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a sole proprietorship that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(b) Each resident individual in charge of an office located in this state shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215; and

(c) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(3) A partnership required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section shall license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall meet the following requirements:

(a) At least one general partner of the partnership shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a partnership that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(b) Each resident individual in charge of an office in this state shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215;

(c) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all partners or owners shall be held by persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another state. The principal partner of the partnership and any partner having authority over issuing reports shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state; and

(d) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(4) A corporation required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section shall license as a firm every three years with the board and shall meet the following requirements:

(a) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all shareholders or owners shall be held by persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another state and is principally employed by the corporation or actively engaged in its business. The principal officer of the corporation and any officer or director having authority over issuing reports shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state;

(b) At least one shareholder of the corporation shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a corporation that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(c) Each resident individual in charge of an office located in this state shall hold and renew a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215;

(d) A written agreement shall bind the corporation or its shareholders to purchase any shares offered for sale by, or not under the ownership or effective control of, a qualified shareholder, and bind any holder not a qualified shareholder to sell the shares to the corporation or its qualified shareholders. The agreement shall be noted on each certificate of corporate stock. The corporation may purchase any amount of its stock for this purpose, notwithstanding any impairment of capital, as long as one share remains outstanding;

(e) The corporation shall comply with any other rules pertaining to corporations practicing public accounting in this state as the board may prescribe; and

(f) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(5) A limited liability company required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section shall license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall meet the following requirements:

(a) At least one member of the limited liability company shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a limited liability company that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(b) Each resident manager or member in charge of an office located in this state shall hold and renew a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215;

(c) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all owners shall be held by persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another state. The principal member or manager of the limited liability company and any member having authority over issuing reports shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state; and

(d) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(6) Application for a license as a firm with an office in this state shall be made upon the affidavit of the proprietor or individual designated as managing partner, member, or shareholder for Washington. This individual shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.215.

(7) In the case of a firm licensed in another state and required to obtain a license under subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, the application for the firm license shall be made upon the affidavit of an individual who qualifies for practice privileges in this state under RCW 18.04.350(2) who has been authorized by the applicant firm to make the application. The board shall determine in each case whether the applicant is eligible for a license.

(8) The board shall be given notification within ninety days after the admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting from any partnership, corporation, or limited liability company so licensed.

(9) Licensed firms that fall out of compliance with the provisions of this section due to changes in firm ownership, after receiving or renewing a license, shall notify the board in writing within ninety days of its falling out of compliance and propose a time period in which they will come back into compliance. The board may grant a reasonable period of time for a firm to be in compliance with the provisions of this section. Failure to bring the firm into compliance within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the board, may result in suspension, revocation, or imposition of conditions on the firm's license.

(10) Fees for the license as a firm and for notification of the board of the admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member shall be determined by the board. Fees shall be paid by the firm at the time the license application form or notice of admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member is filed with the board.

(11) Nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are:

(a) Required to fully comply with the provisions of this chapter and board rules;

(b) Required to be an individual;

(c) Required to be of good character, as defined in RCW 18.04.105(1)(a), and an active individual participant in the licensed firm or affiliated entities as these terms are defined by board rule; and

(d) Subject to discipline by the board for violation of this chapter.

(12) Resident nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are required to meet:

(a) The ethics examination, registration, and fee requirements as established by the board rules; and

(b) The ethics CPE requirements established by the board rules.

(13)(a) Licensed firms must notify the board within thirty days after:

(i) Sanction, suspension, revocation, or modification of their professional license or practice rights by the securities exchange commission, internal revenue service, or another state board of accountancy;

(ii) Sanction or order against the licensee or nonlicensee firm owner by any federal or other state agency related to the licensee's practice of public accounting or violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule; or

(iii) The licensed firm is notified that it has been charged with a violation of law that could result in the suspension or revocation of the firm's license by a federal or other state agency, as identified by board rule, related to the firm's professional license, practice rights, or violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule.

(b) The board must adopt rules to implement this subsection and may also adopt rules specifying requirements for licensees to report to the board sanctions or orders relating to the licensee's practice of public accounting or violation of ethical or technical standards entered against the licensee by a nongovernmental professionally related standard-setting entity.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.04.215 and 2003 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Three-year licenses shall be issued by the board:

(a) To persons meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.105(1), 18.04.180, or 18.04.183.

(b) To certificate holders meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.105(4).

(c) To firms under RCW 18.04.195, meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.205.

(2) The board shall, by rule, provide for a system of certificate and license renewal and reinstatement. Applicants for renewal or reinstatement shall, at the time of filing their applications, list with the board all states and foreign jurisdictions in which they hold or have applied for certificates, permits or licenses to practice.

(3) An inactive certificate is renewed every three years with renewal subject to the requirements of ethics CPE and the payment of fees, prescribed by the board. Failure to renew the inactive certificate shall cause the inactive certificate to lapse and be subject to reinstatement. The board shall adopt rules providing for fees and procedures for renewal and reinstatement of inactive certificates.

(4) A license is issued every three years with renewal subject to requirements of CPE and payment of fees, prescribed by the board. Failure to renew the license shall cause the license to lapse and become subject to reinstatement. Persons holding a lapsed license are prohibited from using the title "CPA" or "certified public accountant." Persons holding a lapsed license are prohibited from practicing public accountancy. The board shall adopt rules providing for fees and procedures for issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of licenses.

(5) The board shall adopt rules providing for CPE for licensees and certificate holders. The rules shall:

(a) Provide that a licensee shall verify to the board that he or she has completed at least an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE during the last three-year period to maintain the license;

(b) Establish CPE requirements; and

(c) Establish when new licensees shall verify that they have completed the required CPE.

(6) A certified public accountant who holds a license issued by another state, and applies for a license in this state, may practice in this state from the date of filing a completed application with the board, until the board has acted upon the application provided the application is made prior to holding out as a certified public accountant in this state and no sanctions or investigations, deemed by the board to be pertinent to public accountancy, by other jurisdictions or agencies are in process.

(7) A licensee shall submit to the board satisfactory proof of having completed an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE recognized and approved by the board during the preceding three years. Failure to furnish this evidence as required shall make the license lapse and subject to reinstatement procedures, unless the board determines the failure to have been due to retirement or reasonable cause.

The board in its discretion may renew a certificate or license despite failure to furnish evidence of compliance with requirements of CPE upon condition that the applicant follow a particular program of CPE. In issuing rules and individual orders with respect to CPE requirements, the board, among other considerations, may rely upon guidelines and pronouncements of recognized educational and professional associations, may prescribe course content, duration, and organization, and may take into account the accessibility of CPE to licensees and certificate holders and instances of individual hardship.

(8) Fees for renewal or reinstatement of certificates and licenses in this state shall be determined by the board under this chapter. Fees shall be paid by the applicant at the time the application form is filed with the board. The board, by rule, may provide for proration of fees for licenses or certificates issued between normal renewal dates.

(9)(a) Licensees, certificate holders, and nonlicensee owners must notify the board within thirty days after:

(i) Sanction, suspension, revocation, or modification of their professional license or practice rights by the securities exchange commission, internal revenue service, or another state board of accountancy;

(ii) Sanction or order against the licensee, certificate holder, or nonlicensee owner by any federal or other state agency related to the licensee's practice of public accounting or the licensee's, certificate holder's, or nonlicensee owner's violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule; or

(iii) The licensee, certificate holder, or nonlicensee owner is notified that he or she has been charged with a violation of law that could result in the suspension or revocation of a license or certificate by a federal or other state agency, as identified by board rule, related to the licensee's, certificate holder's, or nonlicensee owner's professional license, practice rights, or violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule.

(b) The board must adopt rules to implement this subsection and may also adopt rules specifying requirements for licensees, certificate holders, and nonlicensee owners to report to the board sanctions or orders relating to the licensee's practice of public accounting or the licensee's, certificate holder's, or nonlicensee owner's violation of ethical or technical standards entered against the licensee, certificate holder, or nonlicensee owner by a nongovernmental professionally related standard-setting entity.

(10) A chartered professional accounting firm registered in the Canadian province of British Columbia and its owners and employees that provide compilation or attest services in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15) are not required to obtain a CPA firm license or individual CPA licenses and will not be subject to license fees.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.04.345 and 2016 c 127 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except when performing services as an employee or owner of a firm operating in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15), no individual may assume or use the designation "certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public accountant-inactive or CPA-inactive unless the individual holds a certificate. Individuals holding only a certificate may not practice public accounting.

(2) No individual may hold himself or herself out to the public or assume or use the designation "certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public accountant or CPA unless the individual qualifies for the privileges authorized by RCW 18.04.350(2) or holds a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or is providing compilation or attest services as an employee or owner of a firm operating in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15).

(3) No firm with an office in this state may perform or offer to perform attest services as defined in RCW 18.04.025(1) or compilation services as defined in RCW 18.04.025(6) or assume or use the designation "certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the firm is composed of certified public accountants or CPAs, unless the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and all offices of the firm in this state are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205. This subsection does not limit the services permitted under RCW 18.04.350(10) by persons not required to be licensed under this chapter, nor does it prohibit compilation or attest services performed in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15).

(4) No firm may perform the services defined in RCW 18.04.025(1) in this state unless the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195, renews the firm license as required under RCW 18.04.215, and all offices of the firm in this state are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205. This subsection does not prohibit services performed in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15).

(5) Except when performing services as an employee or owner of a firm operating in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15), no individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation offering public accounting services to the public may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the public, or assume or use along, or in connection with his, hers, or its name, or any other name the title or designation "certified accountant," "chartered accountant," "licensed accountant," "licensed public accountant," "public accountant," or any other title or designation likely to be confused with "certified public accountant" or any of the abbreviations "CA," "LA," "LPA," or "PA," or similar abbreviations likely to be confused with "CPA."

(6) No licensed firm may operate under an alias, a firm name, title, or "DBA" that differs from the firm name that is registered with the board.

(7) Except when performing services as an employee or owner of a firm operating in accordance with RCW 18.04.350(15), no individual with an office in this state may sign, affix, or associate his or her name or any trade or assumed name used by the individual in his or her business to any report prescribed by professional standards unless the individual holds a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, a firm holds a license under RCW 18.04.195, and all of the individual's offices in this state are registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(8) No individual licensed in another state may sign, affix, or associate a firm name to any report prescribed by professional standards, or associate a firm name in conjunction with the title certified public accountant, unless the individual:

(a) Qualifies for the practice privileges authorized by RCW 18.04.350(2); ((or))

(b) Is licensed under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, and all of the individual's offices in this state are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205; or

(c) Is performing services as an employee or owner of a firm in accordance with the provisions of RCW 18.04.350(15).

(9) No individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation not holding a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or firm not licensed under RCW 18.04.195 or firm not registering all of the firm's offices in this state under RCW 18.04.205, or not qualified for the practice privileges authorized by RCW 18.04.350(2), or not operating in accordance with the provisions of RCW 18.04.350(15), may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the public as an "auditor" with or without any other description or designation by use of such word on any sign, card, letterhead, or in any advertisement or directory.

(10) For purposes of this section, because individuals practicing using practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(2) are deemed substantially equivalent to licensees under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, every word, term, or reference that includes the latter shall be deemed to include the former, provided the conditions of such practice privilege, as set forth in RCW 18.04.350 (4) and (5) are maintained.

(11) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, it is not a violation of this section for a firm that does not hold a valid license under RCW 18.04.195 and that does not have an office in this state to use the title "CPA" or "certified public accountant" as part of the firm's name and to provide its professional services in this state, and licensees and individuals with practice privileges may provide services on behalf of such firms so long as it complies with the requirements of RCW 18.04.195(1). An individual or firm authorized under this subsection to use practice privileges in this state must comply with the requirements otherwise applicable to licensees in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The amendments contained in sections 2 through 6 of this act expire June 30, 2023.

--- END ---