BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of children, youth, and families, in consultation with the department of early learning, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of financial management, the caseload forecast council, legislative fiscal staff, and with advice and assistance from the state interagency coordinating council, must develop a funding model with which to determine the amount of annual allocations that shall be appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act after July 1, 2019, for early intervention services for children with disabilities from birth through two years of age, which the department of children, youth, and families oversees.

(2) The department must submit a final report that includes the agreed-upon funding model and any necessary statutory changes to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 1, 2018.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2020.

--- END ---