BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The college board must establish a pilot program for college districts to plan for the unique needs and challenges of students experiencing homelessness.

(2)(a) As part of the pilot program, each college district must develop a capital project plan to renovate or rehabilitate an existing building or facility within the district to provide, but not be limited to, the following accommodations: Laundry facilities, storage units, showers, and lockers. Such a capital project must receive an enhanced score, as developed by the college board, as compared to other capital projects submitted by the college district.

(b) If the college district implements a culinary program, it is encouraged to provide free or reduced-price meals to reduce food insecurity.

(c) To address student homelessness and increase housing options, the college district should also attempt to engage with the local housing authority to provide tenant-based rental assistance programs, including such programs to assist students who were recently released from a state correctional facility or local jail.

(3) The pilot program must include four college districts, two on each side of the Cascade mountain range. The pilot program expires July 1, 2023. The college districts that participate in the pilot program must provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, that includes at least the following information: The number of students experiencing homelessness during the pilot program, the number of students assisted, strategies for accommodating students experiencing homelessness, and legislative recommendations.

(4) For purposes of this section, "homelessness" means without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, P.L. 100–77, July 22, 1987, 101 Stat. 482, and runaway and homeless youth act, P.L. 93–415, Title III, September 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1129.

(5) This section expires January 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The council must establish a pilot program for four-year institutions of higher education to plan for the unique needs and challenges of students experiencing homelessness.

(2)(a) As part of the pilot program, each four-year institution of higher education, as part of its submission to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees of the legislature under RCW 43.88D.010(7), must develop a capital project plan to renovate or rehabilitate an existing campus building or facility to provide, but not be limited to, the following accommodations: Laundry facilities, storage units, showers, and lockers. Such a capital project must receive an enhanced score, as developed by the office of financial management, as compared to other capital projects submitted by the four-year institution of higher education.

(b) If the four-year institution of higher education implements a culinary program, it is encouraged to provide free or reduced-price meals to reduce food insecurity.

(c) To address student homelessness and increase housing options, the four-year institution of higher education should also attempt to engage with the local housing authority to provide tenant-based rental assistance programs, including such programs to assist students who were recently released from a state correctional facility or local jail.

(3) The pilot program must include two four-year institutions of higher education, one on each side of the Cascade mountain range. The pilot program expires July 1, 2023. The four-year institutions of higher education that participate in the pilot program must provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, that includes at least the following information: The number of students experiencing homelessness during the pilot program, the number of students assisted, strategies for accommodating students experiencing homelessness, and legislative recommendations.

(4) For purposes of this section, "homelessness" means without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, P.L. 100–77, July 22, 1987, 101 Stat. 482, and runaway and homeless youth act, P.L. 93–415, Title III, September 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1129.

(5) This section expires January 1, 2024.

--- END ---