BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

Institutions of higher education are prohibited from entering into contracts with any private entity for the purposes of acting as a third-party payer as defined by RCW 50.04.248, professional employer organization as defined by RCW 50.04.298, or any other type of employer representative on behalf of the institution of higher education to the employment security department.

--- END ---