BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A craft distillery licensed under RCW 66.24.145, who meets the requirements for selling spirits to a customer under RCW 66.20.410, may assist the customer in arranging for the shipment or delivery of the spirits to a willing licensee holding a:

(a) Combination spirits, beer, and wine license issued under RCW 66.24.035;

(b) Specialty shop license to sell spirits issued under RCW 66.24.371; or

(c) Spirits retail license, including a grocery store license to sell spirits, issued under RCW 66.24.630.

(2)(a) A craft distillery may assist the customer in locating a retail licensee, located near the customer's place of residence, who is willing to accept a spirits shipment or delivery on behalf of the customer.

(b) A craft distillery assisting the customer in making the arrangements under subsection (1) of this section may charge the customer a fee for the cost of the shipping or delivery, so long as it does not exceed the actual costs. The purchased items must be shipped or delivered in a sealed package, with the identity of the customer and the contents clearly identified on the package label.

(c) An authorized retail licensee who agrees to accept a customer's spirits order may charge the customer a handling fee, for facilitating the customer's shipment or delivery, in an amount as agreed upon by the customer and retailer. The licensee may not open the customer's package or commingle the contents with the licensee's inventory.

(3) Craft distilleries and authorized retail licensees who facilitate the shipment or delivery of a customer's order may not exchange any money or moneys' worth between each other.

(4)(a) An authorized retail licensee who is willing to accept the delivery of a customer's spirits order from a craft distillery, as provided in this section, may notify the liquor and cannabis board of the licensee's willingness to accept deliveries or shipments and provide the board with a statement of the licensee's fee for this service.

(b) The board must maintain on its web site a list of all authorized retail licensees that have notified the board of their willingness to accept shipments or deliveries that meet the requirements of this section and include the licensee's statement of fees for this service.

(5) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.630 and 2017 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is a spirits retail license to: Sell spirits in original containers to consumers for consumption off the licensed premises and to permit holders; sell spirits in original containers to retailers licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises, for resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of their licenses, although no single sale may exceed twenty-four liters, unless the sale is by a licensee that was a contract liquor store manager of a contract liquor store at the location of its spirits retail licensed premises from which it makes such sales; and export spirits.

(2) For the purposes of this title, a spirits retail license is a retail license, and a sale by a spirits retailer is a retail sale only if not for resale. Nothing in this title authorizes sales by on-sale licensees to other retail licensees. The board must establish by rule an obligation of on-sale spirits retailers to:

(a) Maintain a schedule by stock-keeping unit of all their purchases of spirits from spirits retail licensees, including combination spirits, beer, and wine licensees holding a license issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.035, indicating the identity of the seller and the quantities purchased; and

(b) Provide, not more frequently than quarterly, a report for each scheduled item containing the identity of the purchasing on-premises licensee and the quantities of that scheduled item purchased since any preceding report to:

(i) A distributor authorized by the distiller to distribute a scheduled item in the on-sale licensee's geographic area; or

(ii) A distiller acting as distributor of the scheduled item in the area.

(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, the board may issue spirits retail licenses only for premises comprising at least ten thousand square feet of fully enclosed retail space within a single structure, including storerooms and other interior auxiliary areas but excluding covered or fenced exterior areas, whether or not attached to the structure, and only to applicants that the board determines will maintain systems for inventory management, employee training, employee supervision, and physical security of the product substantially as effective as those of stores currently operated by the board with respect to preventing sales to or pilferage by underage or inebriated persons.

(b) License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations adopted thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing grocery premises licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for spirits retail licenses.

(c) The board may not deny a spirits retail license to an otherwise qualified contract liquor store at its contract location or to the holder of former state liquor store operating rights sold at auction under RCW 66.24.620 on the grounds of location, nature, or size of the premises to be licensed. The board may not deny a spirits retail license to applicants that are not contract liquor stores or operating rights holders on the grounds of the size of the premises to be licensed, if such applicant is otherwise qualified and the board determines that:

(i) There is no spirits retail license holder in the trade area that the applicant proposes to serve;

(ii) The applicant meets, or upon licensure will meet, the operational requirements established by the board by rule; and

(iii) The licensee has not committed more than one public safety violation within the three years preceding application.

(d) A retailer authorized to sell spirits for consumption on or off the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits at its licensed premises, at another licensed premises as designated by the retailer, or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from which the retailer may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted under subsection (1) of this section:

(i) To other retailer premises licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the licensed premises;

(ii) To other registered facilities; or

(iii) To lawful purchasers outside the state. The facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of retailers, including at least one retailer licensed to sell spirits.

(e) For purposes of negotiating volume discounts, a group of individual retailers authorized to sell spirits for consumption off the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits at their individual licensed premises or at any one of the individual licensee's premises, or at a warehouse facility registered with the board.

(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 66.24.632, or in (b) of this subsection, each spirits retail licensee must pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee equivalent to seventeen percent of all spirits sales revenues under the license, exclusive of taxes collected by the licensee and of sales of items on which a license fee payable under this section has otherwise been incurred. The board must establish rules setting forth the timing of such payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with payments required quarterly in arrears. The first payment is due October 1, 2012.

(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to:

(i) Craft distilleries; or

(ii) Shipments or deliveries from a craft distillery made on behalf of a customer of a craft distillery to a retail licensee under section 1 of this act so long as the retail licensee does not stock or have in inventory the spirits being shipped or delivered.

(5) In addition to the payment required under subsection (4) of this section, each licensee must pay an annual license renewal fee of one hundred sixty-six dollars. The board must periodically review and adjust the renewal fee as may be required to maintain it as comparable to annual license renewal fees for licenses to sell beer and wine not for consumption on the licensed premises. If required by law at the time, any increase of the annual renewal fee becomes effective only upon ratification by the legislature.

(6) As a condition to receiving and renewing a spirits retail license the licensee must provide training as prescribed by the board by rule for individuals who sell spirits or who manage others who sell spirits regarding compliance with laws and regulations regarding sale of spirits, including without limitation the prohibitions against sale of spirits to individuals who are underage or visibly intoxicated. The training must be provided before the individual first engages in the sale of spirits and must be renewed at least every five years. The licensee must maintain records documenting the nature and frequency of the training provided. An employee training program is presumptively sufficient if it incorporates a "responsible vendor program" adopted by the board.

(7) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020 through 314-29-040 relating to fines and suspensions are doubled for violations relating to the sale of spirits by spirits retail licensees.

(8)(a) The board must adopt regulations concerning the adoption and administration of a compliance training program for spirits retail licensees, to be known as a "responsible vendor program," to reduce underage drinking, encourage licensees to adopt specific best practices to prevent sales to minors, and provide licensees with an incentive to give their employees ongoing training in responsible alcohol sales and service.

(b) Licensees who join the responsible vendor program under this section and maintain all of the program's requirements are not subject to the doubling of penalties provided in this section for a single violation in any period of twelve calendar months.

(c) The responsible vendor program must be free, voluntary, and self-monitoring.

(d) To participate in the responsible vendor program, licensees must submit an application form to the board. If the application establishes that the licensee meets the qualifications to join the program, the board must send the licensee a membership certificate.

(e) A licensee participating in the responsible vendor program must at a minimum:

(i) Provide ongoing training to employees;

(ii) Accept only certain forms of identification for alcohol sales;

(iii) Adopt policies on alcohol sales and checking identification;

(iv) Post specific signs in the business; and

(v) Keep records verifying compliance with the program's requirements.

(f)(i) A spirits retail licensee that also holds a grocery store license under RCW 66.24.360 or a beer and/or wine specialty shop license under RCW 66.24.371 may, upon board approval and pursuant to board rules, transition to a combination spirits, beer, and wine license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035.

(ii) An applicant that would qualify for a spirits retail license under this section and that qualifies for a combination spirits, beer, and wine license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035 may apply for a license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035 instead of applying for a spirits retail license under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 66.28.295 and 2011 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in RCW 66.28.290 shall prohibit:

(1) A licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the brewery premises and at one additional off-site retail only location.

(2) A domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor.

(3) A microbrewery holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license under RCW 66.24.320 from holding the same privileges and endorsements attached to the beer and/or wine restaurant license.

(4)(a) A licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own production under RCW 66.24.145.

(b) A licensed craft distillery from shipping or delivering products to a retail licensee, as authorized under section 1 of this act, on behalf of a customer of a craft distillery.

(5) A licensed distiller, domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license.

(7) A brewery or microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license or a beer and/or wine license under chapter 66.24 RCW operated on the premises of the brewery or microbrewery from holding a second retail only license at a location separate from the premises of the brewery or microbrewery.

(8) Retail licensees with a caterer's endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from operating on a domestic winery premises.

(9) An organization qualifying under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the purpose of constructing and operating a facility to promote Washington wines from holding retail licenses on the facility property or leasing all or any portion of such facility property to a retail licensee on the facility property if the members of the board of directors or officers of the board for the organization include officers, directors, owners, or employees of a licensed domestic winery. Financing for the construction of the facility must include both public and private money.

(10) A bona fide charitable nonprofit society or association registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, or a local wine industry association registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code as it existed on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.

(11) A person licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.170, 66.24.240, or 66.24.244 from exercising the privileges of distributing and selling at retail such person's own production or from exercising any other right or privilege that attaches to such license.

(12) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW 66.24.206 from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of their own product or from shipping their own product directly to consumers as authorized by RCW 66.20.360.

(13) A person holding a wine shipper's permit pursuant to RCW 66.20.375 from shipping their own product directly to consumers.

(14) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW 66.24.270(2) from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of their own product.

(15) A domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.400 from entering an arrangement to waive a corkage fee.

--- END ---