BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.112.010 and 2009 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) (("Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than petroleum or natural gas that is used alone or in combination with gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel in self-propelled motor vehicles.

(2) "Alternative fuel" means all products or energy sources used to propel motor vehicles, other than conventional gasoline, diesel, or reformulated gasoline. Alternative fuel includes, but is not limited to, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural gas, biodiesel fuel, E85 motor fuel, fuels containing seventy percent or more by volume of alcohol fuel, fuels that are derived from biomass, hydrogen fuel, anhydrous ammonia fuel, nonhazardous motor fuel, or electricity, excluding onboard electric generation.

(3) "Biodiesel fuel" means the monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from plant or animal matter that meet the registration requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal environmental protection agency and standards established by the American society of testing and materials.

(4) "Diesel" means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and diesel fuel dyed in accordance with the regulations in 26 C.F.R. Sec. 48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.

(5))) "Director" means the director of agriculture.

(((6) "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a blend of ethanol and hydrocarbon of which the ethanol portion is nominally seventy-five to eighty-five percent denatured fuel ethanol by volume that complies with the most recent version of American society of testing and materials specification D 5798.

(7))) (2) "Motor fuel" ((means)) includes: (a) Any liquid product used for the generation of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state((,)); (b) any diesel fuel dyed in accordance with federal regulations that is used to power a motor vehicle; and (c) any biodiesel fuel. ((Motor fuels containing ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base motor fuel meets the applicable standards before the addition of the ethanol or (b) the resultant blend meets the applicable standards after the addition of the ethanol.

(8) "Nonhazardous motor fuel" means any fuel of a type distributed for use in self-propelled motor vehicles that does not contain a hazardous liquid as defined in RCW 19.122.020.

(9) "Renewable diesel" means a diesel fuel substitute produced from nonpetroleum renewable sources, including vegetable oils and animal fats, that meets the registration requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal environmental protection agency in 40 C.F.R. Part 79 (2008) and meets the requirements of American society of testing and materials specification D 975.))

Sec. 2. RCW 19.112.020 and 2010 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall be administered by the director or ((his or her)) the director's authorized agent. ((For the purpose of administering this chapter, for motor fuel except biodiesel fuel,))

(2)(a) The director shall adopt rules for maintaining standards for motor fuel. The rules may include:

(i) All or part of the standards set forth in the Annual Book of ASTM Standards and ((supplements thereto,)) amendments and revisions thereof((, are adopted, together with));

(ii) All or part of the standards set forth in the national institute of standards and technology (NIST) handbook 130, uniform laws and regulations in the areas of legal metrology and engine fuel quality rules, and any supplements, amendments, or revisions thereof; and

(iii) Any applicable federal environmental protection agency standards.

(b) If a conflict exists between federal environmental protection agency standards, ASTM standards, NIST standards, or state standards, for purposes of uniformity, federal environmental protection agency standards shall take precedence over ASTM and NIST standards. Any state standards adopted must be consistent with federal environmental protection agency standards and ASTM and NIST standards not in conflict with federal environmental protection agency standards.

(((2))) (3) The director may establish a fuel testing laboratory or may contract with a laboratory for testing.

(4) The director may ((also)) adopt rules on false and misleading advertising, labeling and posting of prices, ((and the standards for,)) and identity of((,)) motor fuels. ((The director shall require fuel pumps offering an ethanol blend to be identified by a label stating the percentage of ethanol and fuel pumps offering a biodiesel blend of up to and including five percent to be identified by a label that states "may contain up to five percent biodiesel." Biodiesel blends above five percent shall be identified by a label stating the percentage of biodiesel being offered.

(3) The rules adopted under RCW 19.112.140 shall also provide that the diesel refiner is responsible for meeting the ASTM standards required by chapter 338, Laws of 2006 when providing diesel fuel into the distribution system.))

Sec. 3. RCW 19.112.030 and 1990 c 102 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may:

(1) Enforce and administer this chapter by inspections, analyses, and other appropriate actions;

(2) Have access during normal business hours to all places where motor fuels are marketed for the purpose of examination, inspection, taking of samples, and investigation. If access is refused by the owner or agent or other persons leasing the same, the director or his or her agent may obtain an administrative search warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction;

(3) Collect or cause to be collected, samples of motor fuels marketed in this state, and cause such samples to be tested or analyzed for compliance with this chapter;

(4) Issue a stop-sale order for any motor fuel found not to be in compliance and rescind the stop-sale order if the motor fuel is brought into compliance with this chapter;

(5) ((Refuse, revoke, or suspend the registration of a motor fuel;

(6))) Delegate to authorized agents any of the responsibilities for the proper administration of this chapter((;

(7) Establish a motor fuel testing laboratory)).

Sec. 4. RCW 19.112.050 and 1990 c 102 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

It is unlawful to:

(1) Market motor fuels in any manner that may deceive or tend to deceive the purchaser as to the nature, price, quantity, and quality of a motor fuel;

(2) ((Fail to register a motor fuel;

(3) Submit incorrect, misleading, or false information regarding the registration of a motor fuel;

(4))) Hinder or obstruct the director, or his or her authorized agent, in the performance of his or her duties;

(((5))) (3) Market a motor fuel that is contrary to this chapter.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.112.060 and 2011 c 96 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under it is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

(b) The director ((shall)) may assess a civil penalty ranging from one hundred dollars to ten thousand dollars per occurrence, giving due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation, and the history of previous violations. Civil penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund.

(2) The penalties in subsection (1)(a) of this section do not apply to violations of RCW 19.112.110 ((and 19.112.120)).

Sec. 6. RCW 19.112.110 and 2013 c 225 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, as determined by the department of licensing, must provide evidence to the department of licensing that at least two percent of the total annual diesel fuel sold in Washington is biodiesel or renewable diesel fuel, following the earlier of: (a) November 30, 2008; or (b) when a determination is made by the director, published in the Washington State Register, that feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a two-percent requirement.

(2) Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, as determined by the department of licensing, must provide evidence to the department of licensing that at least five percent of total annual diesel fuel sold in Washington is biodiesel or renewable diesel fuel, when the director determines, and publishes this determination in the Washington State Register, that both in-state oil seed crushing capacity and feedstock grown in Washington state can satisfy a three-percent requirement.

(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section may take effect no sooner than one hundred eighty days after the determination has been published in the Washington State Register.

(4))) Beginning January 1, 2019, all diesel fuel sold or offered for sale in Washington for use in motor vehicles upon the highways of the state must contain at least five percent biodiesel by volume.

(2) The director ((and the director of licensing must each)) may adopt rules((, in coordination with each other,)) for enforcing and carrying out the purposes of this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 19.112.130 and 2006 c 338 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of licensing shall not publicly release, unless pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, information submitted as evidence as required by RCW 19.112.110 ((or 19.112.120)), except information disclosed in aggregate form that does not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel licensees.

Sec. 8. RCW 19.112.900 and 1990 c 102 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

((RCW 19.112.005 through 19.112.080 shall constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW and)) This chapter may be known and cited as the motor fuel quality act.

Sec. 9. RCW 42.56.270 and 2017 c 317 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private gain and public loss;

(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;

(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters 43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects under RCW 43.23.035;

(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by businesses or individuals during application for loans or program services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or program services provided by any local agency;

(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;

(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state investment board by any person when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers of this information;

(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;

(8) ((Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under chapter 70.95H RCW;

(9))) Financial and commercial information requested by the public stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;

(((10))) (9)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), marijuana producer, processor, or retailer license, liquor license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;

(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;

(((11))) (10) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b) data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c) determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;

(((12))) (11)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of commerce:

(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8); and

(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying information under this subsection and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;

(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;

(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;

(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to the department of commerce from a person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;

(((13))) (12) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter 70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;

(((14))) (13) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this information;

(((15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel licensees;

(16))) (14) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;

(((17))) (15)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the application or issuance of a permit;

(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;

(((18))) (16) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to providers of this information;

(((19))) (17) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328 that can be identified to a particular business;

(((20))) (18) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained by the University of Washington, other than information the university is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to result in private loss to the providers of this information;

(((21))) (19) Market share data submitted by a manufacturer under RCW 70.95N.190(4);

(((22))) (20) Financial information supplied to the department of financial institutions ((or to a portal under RCW 21.20.883,)) when filed by or on behalf of an issuer of securities for the purpose of obtaining the exemption from state securities registration for small securities offerings provided under RCW 21.20.880 or when filed by or on behalf of an investor for the purpose of purchasing such securities;

(((23))) (21) Unaggregated or individual notices of a transfer of crude oil that is financial, proprietary, or commercial information, submitted to the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 90.56.565(1)(a), and that is in the possession of the department of ecology or any entity with which the department of ecology has shared the notice pursuant to RCW 90.56.565;

(((24))) (22) Financial institution and retirement account information, and building security plan information, supplied to the liquor and cannabis board pursuant to RCW 69.50.325, 69.50.331, 69.50.342, and 69.50.345, when filed by or on behalf of a licensee or prospective licensee for the purpose of obtaining, maintaining, or renewing a license to produce, process, transport, or sell marijuana as allowed under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(((25))) (23) Marijuana transport information, vehicle and driver identification data, and account numbers or unique access identifiers issued to private entities for traceability system access, submitted by an individual or business to the liquor and cannabis board under the requirements of RCW 69.50.325, 69.50.331, 69.50.342, and 69.50.345 for the purpose of marijuana product traceability. Disclosure to local, state, and federal officials is not considered public disclosure for purposes of this section;

(((26))) (24) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained by the retirement board of any city that is responsible for the management of an employees' retirement system pursuant to the authority of chapter 35.39 RCW, when the information relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in loss to the retirement fund or to result in private loss to the providers of this information except that (a) the names and commitment amounts of the private funds in which retirement funds are invested and (b) the aggregate quarterly performance results for a retirement fund's portfolio of investments in such funds are subject to disclosure;

(((27))) (25) Proprietary financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and data submitted to or obtained by the liquor and cannabis board in applications for marijuana research licenses under RCW 69.50.372, or in reports submitted by marijuana research licensees in accordance with rules adopted by the liquor and cannabis board under RCW 69.50.372; and

(((28))) (26) Trade secrets, technology, proprietary information, and financial considerations contained in any agreements or contracts, entered into by a licensed marijuana business under RCW 69.50.395, which may be submitted to or obtained by the state liquor and cannabis board.

Sec. 10. RCW 43.19.642 and 2017 c 313 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.

(2))) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (2) of this section, effective June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the agencies for the operation of the agencies' diesel-powered vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.

(((3) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on July 1, 2016, file annual reports with the department of enterprise services documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how any problems encountered were resolved.

(4) By December 1, 2009, the department of enterprise services shall:

(a) Report to the legislature on the average true price differential for biodiesel by blend and location; and

(b) Examine alternative fuel procurement methods that work to address potential market barriers for in-state biodiesel producers and report these findings to the legislature.

(5))) (2) During the 2015-2017 and 2017-2019 fiscal biennia, the Washington state ferries is required to use a minimum of five percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all diesel purchases made by the Washington state ferries for the operation of the Washington state ferries diesel-powered vessels, as long as the price of a B5 biodiesel blend does not exceed the price of conventional diesel fuel by five percent or more.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.19.646 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 237 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The department must assist state agencies seeking to meet the biodiesel fuel requirements in RCW 43.19.642 by coordinating the purchase and delivery of biodiesel if requested by any state agency. The department may use long-term contracts of up to ten years, when purchasing from in-state suppliers who use predominantly in-state feedstock, to secure a sufficient and stable supply of biodiesel for use by state agencies.

(((2) The department shall compile and analyze the reports submitted under RCW 43.19.642(3) and report in an electronic format its findings and recommendations to the governor and committees of the legislature with responsibility for energy issues, within sixty days from the end of each reporting period. The governor shall consider these reports in determining whether to temporarily suspend minimum renewable fuel content requirements as authorized under RCW 19.112.160.))

Sec. 12. RCW 43.19.647 and 2015 c 225 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to allow the motor vehicle fuel needs of state and local government to be satisfied by Washington-produced biofuels as provided in this chapter, the department of enterprise services as well as local governments may contract in advance and execute contracts with public or private producers, suppliers, or other parties, for the purchase of appropriate biofuels, as ((that)) the term "biofuel" is defined in ((RCW 43.325.010)) section 13 of this act, and biofuel blends. Contract provisions may address items including, but not limited to, fuel standards, price, and delivery date.

(2) The department of enterprise services may combine the needs of local government agencies, including ports, special districts, school districts, and municipal corporations, for the purposes of executing contracts for biofuels and to secure a sufficient and stable supply of alternative fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 43.325 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Biofuel" means a liquid or gaseous fuel produced from biogenic, nonpetroleum feedstocks, including but not limited to biodiesel, renewable diesel, ethanol, and renewable natural gas.

(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.

Sec. 14. RCW 80.50.020 and 2010 c 152 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Alternative energy resource" includes energy facilities of the following types: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; or (f) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.

(2) "Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(3) "Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or sites filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires.

(4) "Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or other related and supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not limited to, communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment, instrumentation, and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line storage or venting required for efficient operation or safety of the transmission system and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages of at least 115,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant or alternative energy facilities to the northwest power grid. However, common carrier railroads or motor vehicles shall not be included.

(5) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as defined in ((RCW 43.325.010)) section 13 of this act.

(6) "Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040 as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with the construction or operation of any energy facility.

(7) "Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(8) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council created by RCW 80.50.030.

(9) "Counsel for the environment" means an assistant attorney general or a special assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in accordance with RCW 80.50.080.

(10) "Electrical transmission facilities" means electrical power lines and related equipment.

(11) "Energy facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities: PROVIDED, That the following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

(a) Facilities for the extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water, other than water specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or conversion for energy purposes; and

(b) Facilities operated by and for the armed services for military purposes or by other federal authority for the national defense.

(12) "Energy plant" means the following facilities together with their associated facilities:

(a) Any nuclear power facility where the primary purpose is to produce and sell electricity;

(b) Any nonnuclear stationary thermal power plant with generating capacity of three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power plants of one hundred thousand kilowatts or more suspended on the surface of water by means of a barge, vessel, or other floating platform;

(c) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquefied natural gas in the equivalent of more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day, which has been transported over marine waters;

(d) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an average of fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquefied petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over marine waters, except that the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such new facility construction;

(e) Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per day; and

(f) Facilities capable of processing more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day of petroleum or biofuel into refined products except where such biofuel production is undertaken at existing industrial facilities.

(13) "Independent consultants" means those persons who have no financial interest in the applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to evaluate the applicant's proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct additional studies.

(14) "Land use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element thereof adopted by a unit of local government pursuant to chapter 35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW, or as otherwise designated by chapter 325, Laws of 2007.

(15) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corporation, association, firm, public service company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government agency, public utility district, or any other entity, public or private, however organized.

(16) "Preapplicant" means a person considering applying for a site certificate agreement for any transmission facility.

(17) "Preapplication process" means the process which is initiated by written correspondence from the preapplicant to the council, and includes the process adopted by the council for consulting with the preapplicant and with cities, towns, and counties prior to accepting applications for all transmission facilities.

(18) "Secretary" means the secretary of the United States department of energy.

(19) "Site" means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility, alternative energy resource, or electrical transmission facility.

(20) "Thermal power plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any electrical generating facility using any fuel for distribution of electricity by electric utilities.

(21) "Transmission facility" means any of the following together with their associated facilities:

(a) Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside diameter between valves for the transmission of these products with a total length of at least fifteen miles;

(b) Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquefied petroleum gas transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter between valves, for the transmission of these products, with a total length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a distribution facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by the United States federal power commission.

(22) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local government regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to chapter 35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW or Article XI of the state Constitution, or as otherwise designated by chapter 325, Laws of 2007.

Sec. 15. RCW 82.08.865 and 2010 c 106 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of diesel fuel, biodiesel fuel, or aircraft fuel, to a farm fuel user for agricultural purposes. This exemption applies to a fuel blend if all of the component fuels of the blend would otherwise be exempt under this subsection if the component fuels were sold as separate products. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and this subsection apply to this section.

(a)(i) "Agricultural purposes" means the performance of activities directly related to the growing, raising, or producing of agricultural products.

(ii) "Agricultural purposes" does not include: (A) Heating space for human habitation or water for human consumption; or (B) transporting on public roads individuals, agricultural products, farm machinery or equipment, or other tangible personal property, except when the transportation is incidental to transportation on private property and the fuel used for such transportation is not subject to tax under chapter 82.38 RCW.

(b) "Aircraft fuel" is defined as provided in RCW 82.42.010.

(c) "Biodiesel fuel" ((is defined as provided in RCW 19.112.010)) means biodiesel fuel as defined by the Washington state department of agriculture as of January 1, 2018.

(d) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.

(e) "Farm fuel user" means: (i) A farmer; or (ii) a person who provides horticultural services for farmers, such as soil preparation services, crop cultivation services, and crop harvesting services.

Sec. 16. RCW 82.08.956 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel in Washington state. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(a) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood pellets; and

(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in ((RCW 43.325.010)) section 13 of this act.

(3) If a taxpayer who claimed an exemption under this section closes a facility in Washington for which employment positions were reported under RCW 82.32.605, resulting in a loss of jobs located within the state, the department must declare the amount of the tax exemption claimed under this section for the previous two calendar years to be immediately due.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2024.

Sec. 17. RCW 82.12.956 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1003 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel in Washington state.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.956; and

(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW ((43.325.010)) 82.08.956.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 19.112.040 (Motor fuel registration) and 1990 c 102 s 5;

(2) RCW 19.112.090 (Air pollution reduction—Variances from ASTM) and 1991 c 199 s 231;

(3) RCW 19.112.120 (Motor vehicle fuel licensees—Required sales of denatured ethanol—Rules—Limitation of section) and 2013 c 225 s 602, 2007 c 309 s 2, & 2006 c 338 s 3;

(4) RCW 19.112.140 (Standards for biodiesel fuel/fuel blended with biodiesel fuel—Rules) and 2006 c 338 s 7;

(5) RCW 19.112.150 (Biofuels advisory committee) and 2006 c 338 s 9;

(6) RCW 19.112.160 (Governor's authority to suspend certain minimum renewable fuel content requirements) and 2006 c 338 s 11;

(7) RCW 19.112.170 (Determination of the supply of certain fuels—Notification—Declaration concerning the applicability of RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120) and 2006 c 338 s 13;

(8) RCW 19.112.180 (Goals under RCW 19.112.170—Report—Executive request legislation) and 2006 c 338 s 14; and

(9) RCW 43.19.643 (Biodiesel fuel blends—Definitions) and 2003 c 17 s 3.

--- END ---