BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.655.080 and 2012 c 51 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To the extent funds are available, beginning in the 2012-13 school year, the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills shall be administered at the beginning of the school year to all students enrolled in state-funded full-day kindergarten programs under RCW 28A.150.315 with the exception of students who have been excused from participation by their parents or guardians.

(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, shall convene a work group to provide:

(i) Input and recommendations with respect to implementation of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills;

(ii) Recommendations regarding the optimum way to administer the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills to children in half-day kindergarten while ensuring that they receive the maximum instruction as required in RCW 28A.150.205; and

(iii) Recommendations with respect to achieving the goal of replacing assessments currently required by school districts with the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.

(b) The work group shall include:

(i) One representative from the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(ii) One representative from the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families;

(iii) One representative from the nongovernmental private-public partnership defined in RCW ((43.215.010)) 43.216.010;

(iv) Five representatives, including both teachers and principals, from school districts that participated in the pilot project, with every effort made to make sure that there is representation from across the state;

(v) Two parents who are familiar with and participated in the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills pilot during the 2010-11 school year; and

(vi) A representative from an independent, nonprofit children and family services organization with a main campus in North Bend, Washington.

(c) The work group may solicit input from people who are recent implementers of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.

(d) A preliminary report and recommendations shall be submitted to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives by December 1, 2012. A subsequent report and recommendations shall be submitted to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives by December 1, 2013, and annually by December 1st thereafter.

(e) The work group shall terminate upon full statewide implementation of all-day kindergarten.

(3) To the extent funds are available, additional support in the form of implementation grants shall be offered to schools on a schedule to be determined by the office of (([the])) the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families.

(4) Until full statewide implementation of all-day kindergarten programs, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, may grant annual, renewable waivers from the requirement of subsection (1) of this section to administer the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. A school district seeking a waiver for one or more of its schools must submit an application to the office of the superintendent of public instruction that includes:

(a) A description of the kindergarten readiness assessment and transition processes that it proposes to administer instead of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills;

(b) An explanation of why the administration of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills would be unduly burdensome; and

(c) An explanation of how administration of the alternative kindergarten readiness assessment will support social-emotional, physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children; support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform instruction.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.09.470 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 33 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consistent with the goals established in RCW 74.09.402, through the apple health for kids program authorized in this section, the authority shall provide affordable health care coverage to children under the age of nineteen who reside in Washington state and whose family income at the time of enrollment is not greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and human services, and effective January 1, 2009, and only to the extent that funds are specifically appropriated therefor, to children whose family income is not greater than three hundred percent of the federal poverty level. In administering the program, the authority shall take such actions as may be necessary to ensure the receipt of federal financial participation under the medical assistance program, as codified at Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI of the federal social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now available or may become available in the future. The authority and the caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated caseload and costs of the program established in this section.

(2) The authority shall accept applications for enrollment for children's health care coverage; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary; and determine eligibility based on current family income. The authority shall make eligibility determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510. The application and annual renewal processes shall be designed to minimize administrative barriers for applicants and enrolled clients, and to minimize gaps in eligibility for families who are eligible for coverage. If a change in family income results in a change in the source of funding for coverage, the authority shall transfer the family members to the appropriate source of funding and notify the family with respect to any change in premium obligation, without a break in eligibility. The authority shall use the same eligibility redetermination and appeals procedures as those provided for children on medical assistance programs. The authority shall modify its eligibility renewal procedures to lower the percentage of children failing to annually renew. The authority shall manage its outreach, application, and renewal procedures with the goals of: (a) Achieving year by year improvements in enrollment, enrollment rates, renewals, and renewal rates; (b) maximizing the use of existing program databases to obtain information related to earned and unearned income for purposes of eligibility determination and renewals, including, but not limited to, the basic food program, the child care subsidy program, federal social security administration programs, and the employment security department wage database; (c) streamlining renewal processes to rely primarily upon data matches, online submissions, and telephone interviews; and (d) implementing any other eligibility determination and renewal processes to allow the state to receive an enhanced federal matching rate and additional federal outreach funding available through the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009 by January 2010. The department shall advise the governor and the legislature regarding the status of these efforts by September 30, 2009. The information provided should include the status of the department's efforts, the anticipated impact of those efforts on enrollment, and the costs associated with that enrollment.

(3) To ensure continuity of care and ease of understanding for families and health care providers, and to maximize the efficiency of the program, the amount, scope, and duration of health care services provided to children under this section shall be the same as that provided to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW 74.09.520.

(4) The primary mechanism for purchasing health care coverage under this section shall be through contracts with managed health care systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522, subject to conditions, limitations, and appropriations provided in the biennial appropriations act. However, the authority shall make every effort within available resources to purchase health care coverage for uninsured children whose families have access to dependent coverage through an employer-sponsored health plan or another source when it is cost-effective for the state to do so, and the purchase is consistent with requirements of Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal social security act. To the extent allowable under federal law, the authority shall require families to enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage, as a condition of participating in the program established under this section, when it is cost-effective for the state to do so. Families who enroll in available employer- sponsored coverage under this section shall be accounted for separately in the annual report required by RCW 74.09.053.

(5)(a) To reflect appropriate parental responsibility, the authority shall develop and implement a schedule of premiums for children's health care coverage due to the authority from families with income greater than two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. For families with income greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level, the premiums shall be established in consultation with the senate majority and minority leaders and the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives. For children eligible for coverage under the federally funded children's health insurance program, Title XXI of the federal social security act, premiums shall be set at a reasonable level that does not pose a barrier to enrollment. The amount of the premium shall be based upon family income and shall not exceed the premium limitations in Title XXI of the federal social security act. For children who are not eligible for coverage under the federally funded children's health insurance program, premiums shall be set every two years in an amount no greater than the average state-only share of the per capita cost of coverage in the state-funded children's health program.

(b) Premiums shall not be imposed on children in households at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as articulated in RCW 74.09.055.

(c) Beginning no later than January 1, 2010, the authority shall offer families whose income is greater than three hundred percent of the federal poverty level the opportunity to purchase health care coverage for their children through the programs administered under this section without an explicit premium subsidy from the state. The design of the health benefit package offered to these children should provide a benefit package substantially similar to that offered in the apple health for kids program, and may differ with respect to cost-sharing, and other appropriate elements from that provided to children under subsection (3) of this section including, but not limited to, application of preexisting conditions, waiting periods, and other design changes needed to offer affordable coverage. The amount paid by the family shall be in an amount equal to the rate paid by the state to the managed health care system for coverage of the child, including any associated and administrative costs to the state of providing coverage for the child. Any pooling of the program enrollees that results in state fiscal impact must be identified and brought to the legislature for consideration.

(6) The authority shall undertake and continue a proactive, targeted outreach and education effort with the goal of enrolling children in health coverage and improving the health literacy of youth and parents. The authority shall collaborate with the department of social and health services, department of health, local public health jurisdictions, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, health educators, health care providers, health carriers, community-based organizations, and parents in the design and development of this effort. The outreach and education effort shall include the following components:

(a) Broad dissemination of information about the availability of coverage, including media campaigns;

(b) Assistance with completing applications, and community-based outreach efforts to help people apply for coverage. Community-based outreach efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to be covered;

(c) Use of existing systems, such as enrollment information from the free and reduced-price lunch program, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families child care subsidy program, the department of health's women, infants, and children program, and the early childhood education and assistance program, to identify children who may be eligible but not enrolled in coverage;

(d) Contracting with community-based organizations and government entities to support community-based outreach efforts to help families apply for coverage. These efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to be covered. The authority shall provide informational materials for use by government entities and community-based organizations in their outreach activities, and should identify any available federal matching funds to support these efforts;

(e) Development and dissemination of materials to engage and inform parents and families statewide on issues such as: The benefits of health insurance coverage; the appropriate use of health services, including primary care provided by health care practitioners licensed under chapters 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, and 18.79 RCW, and emergency services; the value of a medical home, well-child services and immunization, and other preventive health services with linkages to department of health child profile efforts; identifying and managing chronic conditions such as asthma and diabetes; and the value of good nutrition and physical activity;

(f) An evaluation of the outreach and education efforts, based upon clear, cost-effective outcome measures that are included in contracts with entities that undertake components of the outreach and education effort;

(g) An implementation plan to develop online application capability that is integrated with the automated client eligibility system, and to develop data linkages with the office of the superintendent of public instruction for free and reduced-price lunch enrollment information and the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families for child care subsidy program enrollment information.

(7) The authority shall take action to increase the number of primary care physicians providing dental disease preventive services including oral health screenings, risk assessment, family education, the application of fluoride varnish, and referral to a dentist as needed.

(8) The department shall monitor the rates of substitution between private-sector health care coverage and the coverage provided under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.63A.068 and 2009 c 518 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce shall establish an advisory committee to monitor, guide, and report on recommendations relating to policies and programs for children and families with incarcerated parents.

(b) The advisory committee shall include representatives of the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, representatives of the private nonprofit and business sectors, child advocates, representatives of Washington state Indian tribes as defined under the federal Indian welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), court administrators, the administrative office of the courts, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, jail administrators, the office of the governor, and others who have an interest in these issues.

(c) The advisory committee shall:

(i) Gather the data collected by the departments as required in RCW 72.09.495, 74.04.800, ((43.215.065)) 43.216.060, and 28A.300.520;

(ii) Monitor and provide consultation on the implementation of recommendations contained in the 2006 children of incarcerated parents report;

(iii) Identify areas of need and develop recommendations for the legislature, the department of social and health services, the department of corrections, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to better meet the needs of children and families of persons incarcerated in department of corrections facilities; and

(iv) Advise the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce regarding community programs the department should fund with moneys appropriated for this purpose in the operating budget. The advisory committee shall provide recommendations to the department regarding the following:

(A) The goals for geographic distribution of programs and funding;

(B) The scope and purpose of eligible services and the priority of such services;

(C) Grant award funding limits;

(D) Entities eligible to apply for the funding;

(E) Whether the funding should be directed towards starting or supporting new programs, expanding existing programs, or whether the funding should be open to all eligible services and providers; and

(F) Other areas the advisory committee determines appropriate.

(d) The children of incarcerated parents advisory committee shall update the legislature and governor biennially on committee activities, with the first update due by January 1, 2010.

(2) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce shall select community programs or services to receive funding that focus on children and families of inmates incarcerated in a department of corrections facility and sustaining the family during the period of the inmate's incarceration.

(a) Programs or services which meet the needs of the children of incarcerated parents should be the greatest consideration in the programs that are identified by the department.

(b) The department shall consider the recommendations of the advisory committee regarding which services or programs the department should fund.

(c) The programs selected shall collaborate with an agency, or agencies, experienced in providing services to aid families and victims of sexual assault and domestic violence to ensure that the programs identify families who have a history of sexual assault or domestic violence and ensure the services provided are appropriate for the children and families.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.63A.066 and 2006 c 265 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families shall have primary responsibility for providing child abuse and neglect prevention training to preschool age children participating in the federal head start program or the early childhood education and assistance program established under RCW 28A.215.010 through 28A.215.050, ((43.215.400)) 43.216.500 through ((43.215.450)) 43.216.550, 43.216.900, and ((43.215.900 through 43.215.903)) 43.216.901.

Sec. 5. RCW 43.31.571 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, in consultation with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, shall oversee the early learning facilities revolving account and the early learning facilities development account, and is the lead state agency for the early learning facilities grant and loan program.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that state funds invested in the accounts be matched by private or local government funding. Every effort shall be made to maximize funding available for early learning facilities from public schools, community colleges, ((education[al])) educational service districts, local governments, and private funders.

(3) Amounts used for program administration by the department may not exceed an average of four percent of the appropriated funds.

(4) Commitment of state funds for construction, purchase, or renovation of early learning facilities may be given only after private or public match funds are committed. Private or public match funds may consist of cash, equipment, land, buildings, or like-kind. In determining the level of match required, the department shall take into consideration the financial need of the applicant and the economic conditions of the location of the proposed facility.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.06.097 and 2006 c 265 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families to the ((director)) secretary, the ((director's)) secretary's personal secretary, and any other exempt staff members provided for in RCW ((43.215.030)) 43.216.025(2).

Sec. 7. RCW 74.12.340 and 2006 c 265 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department is authorized to adopt rules governing the provision of day care as a part of child welfare services when the secretary determines that a need exists for such day care and that it is in the best interests of the child, the parents, or the custodial parent and in determining the need for such day care priority shall be given to geographical areas having the greatest need for such care and to members of low-income groups in the population((: PROVIDED, That where)). If the family is financially able to pay part or all of the costs of such care, fees shall be imposed and paid according to the financial ability of the family.

(2) This section does not affect the authority of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families to adopt rules governing child day care and early learning programs.

Sec. 8. RCW 74.08A.260 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 21 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.

(2) Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for maximizing the recipient's success at meeting the employment goal; (b) considers WorkFirst educational and training programs from which the recipient could benefit; (c) contains the obligation of the recipient to participate in the program by complying with the plan; (d) moves the recipient into full-time WorkFirst activities as quickly as possible; and (e) describes the services available to the recipient either during or after WorkFirst to enable the recipient to obtain and keep employment and to advance in the workplace and increase the recipient's wage earning potential over time.

(3) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.

(4) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it appropriate, be terminated.

(5) The department may waive the penalties required under subsection (4) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.

(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is available in the local area where the recipient resides.

(7) Assessments conducted under this section shall include a consideration of the potential benefit to the recipient of engaging in financial literacy activities. The department shall consider the options for financial literacy activities available in the community, including information and resources available through the financial education public-private partnership created under RCW 28A.300.450. The department may authorize up to ten hours of financial literacy activities as a core activity or an optional activity under WorkFirst.

(8)(a) Subsections (2) through (6) of this section are suspended for a recipient who is a parent or other relative personally providing care for a child under the age of two years. This suspension applies to both one and two parent families. However, both parents in a two-parent family cannot use the suspension during the same month. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a recipient from participating in the WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis.

(b)(i) The period of suspension of work activities under this subsection provides an opportunity for the legislative and executive branches to oversee redesign of the WorkFirst program. To realize this opportunity, both during the period of suspension and following reinstatement of work activity requirements as redesign is being implemented, a legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight task force is established, with members as provided in this subsection (8)(b).

(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(iii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iv) The governor shall appoint members representing the department of social and health services, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the department of commerce, the employment security department, the office of financial management, and the state board for community and technical colleges.

(v) The task force shall choose cochairs, one from among the legislative members and one from among the executive branch members. The legislative members shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(c) The task force shall:

(i) Oversee the partner agencies' implementation of the redesign of the WorkFirst program and operation of the temporary assistance for needy families program to ensure that the programs are achieving desired outcomes for their clients;

(ii) Determine evidence-based outcome measures for the WorkFirst program, including measures related to equitably serving the needs of historically underrepresented populations, such as English language learners, immigrants, refugees, and other diverse communities;

(iii) Develop accountability measures for WorkFirst recipients and the state agencies responsible for their progress toward self-sufficiency;

(iv) Make recommendations to the governor and the legislature regarding:

(A) Policies to improve the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program over time;

(B) Early identification of those recipients most likely to experience long stays on the program and strategies to improve their ability to achieve progress toward self-sufficiency; and

(C) Necessary changes to the program, including taking into account federal changes to the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(d) The partner agencies must provide the task force with regular reports on:

(i) The partner agencies' progress toward meeting the outcome and performance measures established under (c) of this subsection;

(ii) Caseload trends and program expenditures, and the impact of those trends and expenditures on client services, including services to historically underrepresented populations; and

(iii) The characteristics of families who have been unsuccessful on the program and have lost their benefits either through sanction or the sixty-month time limit.

(e) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate committee services, the house of representatives office of program research, and the state agency members of the task force.

(f) The task force shall meet on a quarterly basis beginning September 2011, or as determined necessary by the task force cochairs.

(g) During its tenure, the state agency members of the task force shall respond in a timely manner to data requests from the cochairs.

Sec. 9. RCW 74.04.014 and 2013 c 23 s 193 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the office of fraud and accountability shall have prompt access to all individuals, records, electronic data, reports, audits, reviews, documents, and other materials available to the department of revenue, department of labor and industries, department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, employment security department, department of licensing, and any other government entity that can be used to help facilitate investigations of fraud or abuse as determined necessary by the director of the office of fraud and accountability.

(2) The investigator shall have access to all original child care records maintained by licensed and unlicensed child care providers with the consent of the provider or with a court order or valid search warrant.

(3) Information gathered by the department, the office, or the fraud ombuds shall be safeguarded and remain confidential as required by applicable state or federal law. Whenever information or assistance requested under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is, in the judgment of the director, unreasonably refused or not provided, the director of the office of fraud and accountability must report the circumstances to the secretary immediately.

Sec. 10. RCW 70.305.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The secretary of the department of social and health services and the ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families shall actively participate in the development of a nongovernmental private-public initiative focused on coordinating government and philanthropic organizations' investments in the positive development of children and preventing and mitigating the effects of adverse childhood experiences. The ((secretary and director)) secretaries shall convene a planning group to work with interested private partners to: (i) Develop a process by which the goals identified in RCW 70.305.005 shall be met; and (ii) develop recommendations for inclusive and diverse governance to advance the adverse childhood experiences initiative.

(b) The ((secretary and director)) secretaries shall select no more than twelve to fifteen persons as members of the planning group. The members selected must represent a diversity of interests including: Early learning coalitions, community public health and safety networks, organizations that work to prevent and address child abuse and neglect, tribes, representatives of public agency agencies involved with interventions in or prevention of adverse childhood experiences, philanthropic organizations, and organizations focused on community mobilization.

(c) The ((secretary and director)) secretaries shall cochair the planning group meetings and shall convene the first meeting.

(2) ((The planning group shall submit a report on its progress and recommendations to the appropriate legislative committees no later than December 15, 2011.

(3))) In addition to other powers granted to the secretary of the department of social and health services, the secretary of the department of social and health services may:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department of social and health services to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Provide funding to communities or any governance entity that is created as a result of the partnership; and

(c) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 11. RCW 70.305.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adverse childhood experiences" means the following indicators of severe childhood stressors and family dysfunction that, when experienced in the first eighteen years of life and taken together, are proven by public health research to be powerful determinants of physical, mental, social, and behavioral health across the lifespan: Child physical abuse; child sexual abuse; child emotional abuse; child emotional or physical neglect; alcohol or other substance abuse in the home; mental illness, depression, or suicidal behaviors in the home; incarceration of a family member; witnessing intimate partner violence; and parental divorce or separation. Adverse childhood experiences have been demonstrated to affect the development of the brain and other major body systems.

(2) "Community public health and safety networks" or "networks" means the organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.

(3) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(4) (("Director" means the director of the department of early learning.

(5))) "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in RCW ((43.215.146)) 43.216.141.

(((6))) (5) "Research-based" has the same meaning as in RCW ((43.215.146)) 43.216.141.

(((7))) (6) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(7) "Secretary of children, youth, and families" means the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 12. RCW 70.198.020 and 2010 c 233 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established an advisory council in the department of social and health services for the purpose of advancing the development of a comprehensive and effective statewide system to provide prompt and effective early interventions for children in the state who are deaf or hard of hearing and their families.

(2) Members of the advisory council shall have training, experience, or interest in hearing loss in children. Membership shall include, but not be limited to, the following: Pediatricians; audiologists; teachers of the deaf and hard of hearing; parents of children who are deaf or hard of hearing; a representative from the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss; and representatives of the early support for infants and toddlers program in the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the department of health, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 13. RCW 43.216.065 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to other duties under this chapter, the secretary shall actively participate in a nongovernmental private-public partnership focused on supporting government's investments in early learning and ensuring that every child in the state is prepared to succeed in school and in life. Except for licensing as required by Washington state law and to the extent permitted by federal law, the secretary shall grant waivers from the rules of state agencies for the operation of early learning programs requested by the nongovernmental private-public partnership to allow for flexibility to pursue market-based approaches to achieving the best outcomes for children and families.

(2) In addition to other powers granted to the secretary, the secretary may:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this chapter; and

(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to implement this chapter, including rules governing child day care and early learning programs under this chapter. This section does not expand the rule-making authority of the ((director)) secretary beyond that necessary to implement and administer programs and services existing July 1, 2006, as transferred to the department of early learning under section 501, chapter 265, Laws of 2006. The rule-making authority does not include any authority to set mandatory curriculum or establish what must be taught in child day care centers or by family day care providers.

Sec. 14. RCW 43.121.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, including funds generated by the sale of "heirloom" birth certificates under chapter 70.58 RCW from persons, associations, or corporations and funds generated through the issuance of the "Keep Kids Safe" license plate under chapter 46.18 RCW, shall be deposited in a depository approved by the state treasurer to be known as the children's trust fund. Disbursements of such funds shall be on the authorization of the ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families beginning July 1, 2012. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, such funds shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditure of such funds.

Sec. 15. RCW 43.88C.050 and 2015 c 128 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The caseload forecast council shall appoint a research staff of sufficient size and with sufficient resources to accomplish its duties. The caseload forecast council may request from the administrative office of the courts, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the department of corrections, the health care authority, the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the department of social and health services, and other agencies with caseloads forecasted by the council, such data, information, and data processing assistance as it may need to accomplish its duties, and such services shall be provided without cost to the caseload forecast council.

Sec. 16. RCW 43.31.583 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

When funding is provided in the previous biennium, the department, in collaboration with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, shall submit a report no later than December 1st of even-numbered years, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provides an update on the status of the early learning facilities grant and loan program that includes, but is not limited to:

(1) The total amount of funds, by grant and loan, spent or contracted to be spent; and

(2) A list of projects awarded funding including, but not limited to, information about whether the project is a renovation or new construction or some other category, where the project is located, and the number of slots the project supports.

Sec. 17. RCW 43.31.581 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall convene a committee of early learning facilities experts to advise the department regarding the prioritization methodology of applications for projects described in RCW 43.31.577 including no less than one representative each from the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the Washington state housing finance commission, an organization certified by the community development financial institutions fund, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) When developing a prioritization methodology under this section, the committee shall consider, but is not limited to:

(a) Projects that add part-day, full-day, or extended day early childhood education and assistance program slots in areas with the highest unmet need;

(b) Projects benefiting low-income children;

(c) Projects located in low-income neighborhoods;

(d) Projects that provide more access to the early childhood education and assistance program as a ratio of the children eligible to participate in the program;

(e) Projects that are geographically disbursed relative to statewide need;

(f) Projects that include new or renovated kitchen facilities equipped to support the use of from scratch, modified scratch, or other cooking methods that enhance overall student nutrition;

(g) Projects that balance mixed-use development and rural locations; and

(h) Projects that maximize resources available from the state with funding from other public and private organizations, including the use of state lands or facilities.

(3) Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may request reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Committee members are not liable to the state, the early learning facilities revolving account, the early learning facilities development account, or to any other person, as a result of their activities, whether ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or intentional violation of the law.

(5) The department may purchase liability insurance for members and may indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

Sec. 18. RCW 43.31.575 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Organizations eligible to receive funding from the early learning facilities grant and loan program include:

(a) Early childhood education and assistance program providers;

(b) Working connections child care providers who are eligible to receive state subsidies;

(c) Licensed early learning centers not currently participating in the early childhood education and assistance program, but intending to do so;

(d) Developers of housing and community facilities;

(e) Community and technical colleges;

(f) Educational service districts;

(g) Local governments;

(h) Federally recognized tribes in the state; and

(i) Religiously affiliated entities.

(2) To be eligible to receive funding from the early learning facilities grant and loan program for activities described in RCW 43.31.577 (1) (b) and (c) and (2), eligible organizations and school districts must:

(a) Commit to being an active participant in good standing with the early achievers program as defined by chapter ((43.215)) 43.216 RCW;

(b) Demonstrate that projects receiving construction, purchase, or renovation grants or loans less than two hundred thousand dollars must also:

(i) Demonstrate that the project site is under the applicant's control for a minimum of ten years, either through ownership or a long-term lease; and

(ii) Commit to using the facility funded by the grant or loan for the purposes of providing preschool or child care for a minimum of ten years;

(c) Demonstrate that projects receiving construction, purchase, or renovation grants or loans of two hundred thousand dollars or more must also:

(i) Demonstrate that the project site is under the applicant's control for a minimum of twenty years, either through ownership or a long-term lease; and

(ii) Commit to using the facility funded by the grant or loan for the purposes of providing preschool or child care for a minimum of twenty years.

(3) To be eligible to receive funding from the early learning facilities grant and loan program for activities described in RCW 43.31.577 (1) (b) and (c) and (2), religiously affiliated entities must use the facility to provide child care and education services consistent with subsection (4)(a) of this section.

(4)(a) Upon receiving a grant or loan, the recipient must continue to be an active participant and in good standing with the early achievers program.

(b) If the recipient does not meet the conditions specified in (a) of this subsection, the grants shall be repaid to the early learning facilities revolving account or the early learning facilities development account, as directed by the department. So long as an eligible organization continues to provide an early learning program in the facility, the facility is used as authorized, and the eligible organization continues to be an active participant and in good standing with the early achievers program, the grant repayment is waived.

(c) The department, in consultation with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, must adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 19. RCW 43.20.275 and 2006 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In collaboration with staff whom the office of financial management may assign, and within funds made expressly available to the state board for these purposes, the state board shall assist the governor by convening and providing assistance to the council. The council shall include one representative from each of the following groups: Each of the commissions, the state board, the department, the department of social and health services, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, the health care authority, the department of agriculture, the department of ecology, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and two members of the public who will represent the interests of health care consumers. The council is a class one group under RCW 43.03.220. The two public members shall be paid per diem and travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The council shall reflect diversity in race, ethnicity, and gender. The governor or the governor's designee shall chair the council.

(2) The council shall promote and facilitate communication, coordination, and collaboration among relevant state agencies and communities of color, and the private sector and public sector, to address health disparities. The council shall conduct public hearings, inquiries, studies, or other forms of information gathering to understand how the actions of state government ameliorate or contribute to health disparities. All state agencies must cooperate with the council's efforts.

(3) The council with assistance from the state board, shall assess through public hearings, review of existing data, and other means, and recommend initiatives for improving the availability of culturally appropriate health literature and interpretive services within public and private health-related agencies.

(4) In order to assist with its work, the council shall establish advisory committees to assist in plan development for specific issues and shall include members of other state agencies and local communities.

(5) The advisory committee shall reflect diversity in race, ethnicity, and gender.

Sec. 20. RCW 42.48.010 and 2007 c 17 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) "Individually identifiable" means that a record contains information which reveals or can likely be associated with the identity of the person or persons to whom the record pertains.

(2) "Legally authorized representative" means a person legally authorized to give consent for the disclosure of personal records on behalf of a minor or a legally incompetent adult.

(3) "Personal record" means any information obtained or maintained by a state agency which refers to a person and which is declared exempt from public disclosure, confidential, or privileged under state or federal law.

(4) "Research" means a planned and systematic sociological, psychological, epidemiological, biomedical, or other scientific investigation carried out by a state agency, by a scientific research professional associated with a bona fide scientific research organization, or by a graduate student currently enrolled in an advanced academic degree curriculum, with an objective to contribute to scientific knowledge, the solution of social and health problems, or the evaluation of public benefit and service programs. This definition excludes methods of record analysis and data collection that are subjective, do not permit replication, and are not designed to yield reliable and valid results.

(5) "Research record" means an item or grouping of information obtained for the purpose of research from or about a person or extracted for the purpose of research from a personal record.

(6) "State agency" means: (a) The department of social and health services; (b) the department of corrections; (c) an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; (d) the department of health; or (e) the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families.

Sec. 21. RCW 41.04.385 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 433 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that (1) demographic, economic, and social trends underlie a critical and increasing demand for child care in the state of Washington; (2) working parents and their children benefit when the employees' child care needs have been resolved; (3) the state of Washington should serve as a model employer by creating a supportive atmosphere, to the extent feasible, in which its employees may meet their child care needs; and (4) the state of Washington should encourage the development of partnerships between state agencies, state employees, state employee labor organizations, and private employers to expand the availability of affordable quality child care. The legislature finds further that resolving employee child care concerns not only benefits the employees and their children, but may benefit the employer by reducing absenteeism, increasing employee productivity, improving morale, and enhancing the employer's position in recruiting and retaining employees. Therefore, the legislature declares that it is the policy of the state of Washington to assist state employees by creating a supportive atmosphere in which they may meet their child care needs. Policies and procedures for state agencies to address employee child care needs will be the responsibility of the director of enterprise services in consultation with the ((director)) secretary of the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families and state employee representatives.

Sec. 22. RCW 36.70A.450 and 2007 c 17 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no county or city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's home facility.

(2) A county or city may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families licensor as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care and who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3) A county or city may also require that the family day-care provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and the family day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a county or city from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care provider's home in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, so long as such conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW ((43.215.010)) 43.216.010.

Sec. 23. RCW 36.70.757 and 2007 c 17 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no county may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's facility serving twelve or fewer children.

(2) A county may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families licensor as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3) A county may also require that the family day-care provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and the day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4) This section may not be construed to prohibit a county from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care provider's home serving twelve or fewer children in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, if the conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW ((43.215.010)) 43.216.010.

Sec. 24. RCW 35A.63.215 and 2007 c 17 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's home facility.

(2) A city may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families licensor as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care and who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3) A city may also require that the family day-care provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and the family day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care provider's home in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, so long as such conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW ((43.215.010)) 43.216.010.

Sec. 25. RCW 35.63.185 and 2007 c 17 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no city may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's home facility.

(2) A city may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families licensor as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care and who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3) A city may also require that the family day-care provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and the family day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care provider's home in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, so long as such conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW ((43.215.010)) 43.216.010.

Sec. 26. RCW 35.21.688 and 2007 c 17 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no city or town may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's facility serving twelve or fewer children.

(2) A city or town may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families licensor as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3) A city or town may also require that the family day-care provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and the day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4) This section may not be construed to prohibit a city or town from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care provider's home serving twelve or fewer children in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, if the conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW ((43.215.010)) 43.216.010.

Sec. 27. RCW 28B.77.005 and 2012 c 229 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On July 1, 2012, the higher education coordinating board is abolished and the student achievement council is created.

(2) The council is composed of nine voting members as provided in this subsection.

(a) Five citizen members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. One of the citizen members shall be a student. The citizen members shall be selected based on their knowledge of or experience in higher education. In making appointments to the council, the governor shall give consideration to citizens representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities, as well as geographic representation, to ensure that the council's membership reflects the state's diverse population. The citizen members shall serve for four-year terms except for the student member, who shall serve for one year; however, the terms of the initial members shall be staggered.

(b) A representative of an independent nonprofit higher education institution as defined in RCW 28B.07.020(4), selected by an association of independent nonprofit baccalaureate degree-granting institutions. The representative appointed under this ((section)) subsection (2)(b) shall excuse himself or herself from voting on matters relating primarily to public institutions of higher education.

(c) Chosen for their recognized ability and innovative leadership experience in broad education policy and system design, a representative of each of the following shall be selected by the respective organizations, who shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing organizations:

(i) A representative of the four-year institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, selected by the presidents of those institutions;

(ii) A representative of the state's community and technical college system, selected by the state board for community and technical colleges; and

(iii) A representative of the state's K-12 education system, selected by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families and the state board of education. The representative appointed under this subsection (2)(c)(iii) shall excuse himself or herself from voting on matters relating primarily to institutions of higher education.

(3) The chair shall be selected by the council from among the citizen members appointed to the council. The chair shall serve a one-year term but may serve more than one term if selected to do so by the membership.

(4) The council may create advisory committees on an ad hoc basis for the purpose of obtaining input from students, faculty, and higher education experts and practitioners, citizens, business and industry, and labor, and for the purpose of informing their research, policy, and programmatic functions. Ad hoc advisory committees addressing secondary to postsecondary transitions and university and college admissions requirements must include K-12 sector representatives including teachers, school directors, principals, administrators, and others as the council may direct, in addition to higher education representatives. The council shall maintain a contact list of K-12 and higher education stakeholder organizations to provide notices to stakeholders regarding the purposes of ad hoc advisory committees, timelines for planned work, means for participation, and a statement of desired outcomes.

(5) Any vacancies on the council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be only for such terms as remain unexpired. Any vacancies among council members appointed by the governor shall be filled by the governor subject to confirmation by the senate and shall have full authority to act before the time the senate acts on their confirmation.

Sec. 28. RCW 28A.655.220 and 2011 c 340 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Before implementing the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills as provided under RCW 28A.150.315, the superintendent of public instruction and the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families must assure that a fairness and bias review of the assessment process has been conducted, including providing an opportunity for input from the ((achievement)) educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee under RCW 28A.300.136 and from an additional diverse group of community representatives, parents, and educators to be convened by the superintendent and the ((director)) secretary of the department.

Sec. 29. RCW 28A.300.570 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

In support of reading and early literacy, the office of the superintendent of public instruction is responsible for:

(1) Continuing to work collaboratively with state and regional partners such as the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families and the educational service districts to establish early literacy benchmarks and standards and to implement the Washington state comprehensive literacy plan;

(2) Disseminating research and information to school districts about evidence-based programs and practices in reading readiness skills, early literacy, and reading instruction;

(3) Providing statewide models to support school districts that are implementing response to intervention initiatives, positive behavior intervention support systems, or other similar comprehensive models of data-based identification and early intervention; and

(4) Within available funds and in partnership with the educational service districts, providing technical assistance and professional development opportunities for school districts.

Sec. 30. RCW 28A.188.040 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The STEM education innovation alliance shall develop a STEM education report card, based on the STEM framework for action and accountability, to monitor progress in increasing learning opportunities and aligning strategic plans and activities in order to prepare students for STEM-related jobs and careers, with the longer-term goal of improving educational, workforce, and economic outcomes in STEM.

(2) The report card must:

(a) Illustrate the most recent data for the indicators and measures of the STEM framework for action and accountability;

(b) Provide information from state education agencies that indicates the extent that activities and resources are aligned with and support the STEM framework for action and accountability;

(c) Provide data regarding current and projected STEM job openings in the state; and

(d) Be prominently displayed on a web site designed for this purpose.

(3)(a) The education data center under RCW 43.41.400 must coordinate data collection and analysis to support the report card.

(b) The state education agencies must annually report on how their policies, activities, and expenditures of public resources align with and support the STEM framework for action and accountability. The focus of the reporting under this subsection is on programs and initiatives specifically identified in law or budget proviso as related to STEM education. The agencies must use a common metric for the reporting, designed by the education data center in consultation with the STEM education innovation alliance. For the purposes of this section, "state education agencies" includes the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the professional educator standards board, the state board of education, and the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families.

(c) The employment security department must create an annual report on current and projected job openings in STEM fields and submit the report to the education data center for inclusion in the STEM education report card.

(4) The STEM education innovation alliance must publish the first STEM education report card with baseline data on the identified measures by January 10, 2014, and must update the report card by each January 10th thereafter.

Sec. 31. RCW 28A.175.075 and 2016 c 162 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a state-level building bridges work group that includes K-12 and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the employment security department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the department of health, the community mobilization office, and the children's services and behavioral health and recovery divisions of the department of social and health services. The work group should also consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and organizations: A statewide organization representing career and technical education programs including skill centers; the juvenile courts or the office of juvenile justice, or both; the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of public defense; accredited institutions of higher education; the educational service districts; the area workforce development councils; parent and educator associations; educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; office of the education ombuds; local school districts; agencies or organizations that provide services to special education students; community organizations serving youth; federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers; each of the major political caucuses of the senate and house of representatives; and the minority commissions.

(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs established in RCW 28A.175.025, the state-level work group shall:

(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and local level;

(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each partner agency or organization across the state including performance measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and

(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.

(3)(a) The work group shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor on an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies for building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems in local communities throughout the state including, but not limited to, recommendations for implementing emerging best practices, needed additional resources, and eliminating barriers.

(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:

(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the percentage of students graduating from high school;

(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be reengaged in education and be college and work ready;

(iii) Recommended funding for supporting career guidance and the planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the funding into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013 biennium; and

(iv) A plan for phasing in the expansion of the current school improvement planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused school improvement technical assistance for school districts in significant need of improvement regarding high school graduation rates.

(4) State agencies in the building bridges work group shall work together, wherever feasible, on the following activities to support school/family/community partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems:

(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of program eligibility and funding criteria;

(b) Providing joint funding;

(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on sharing records and data;

(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that provide knowledge and training on:

(i) Research-based and promising practices;

(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable youth; and

(iii) Cultural competence.

(5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:

(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support coordinated planning and evaluation;

(b) The creation of a performance-based management system, including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability for the dropout issue;

(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems;

(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping for services that would:

(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout early warning and intervention data system;

(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services, including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment and referral processes; and

(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;

(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high school graduation rate; and

(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for vulnerable youth.

Sec. 32. RCW 28A.155.160 and 2009 c 381 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the Washington state school for the blind, school districts, educational service districts, and all other state and local government educational agencies and the department of services for the blind, the department of social and health services, and all other state and local government agencies concerned with the care, education, or habilitation or rehabilitation of children with disabilities may enter into interagency cooperative agreements for the purpose of providing assistive technology devices and services to children with disabilities. Such arrangements may include but are not limited to interagency agreements for the acquisition, including joint funding, maintenance, loan, sale, lease, or transfer of assistive technology devices and for the provision of assistive technology services including but not limited to assistive technology assessments and training.

For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with disabilities. The term "assistive technology service" means any service that directly assists a child with a disability in the selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device. Assistive technology service includes:

(1) The evaluation of the needs of a child with a disability, including a functional evaluation of the child in the child's customary environment;

(2) Purchasing, leasing, or otherwise providing for the acquisition of assistive technology devices by children with disabilities;

(3) Selecting, designing, fitting, customizing, adapting, applying, retaining, repairing, or replacing of assistive technology devices;

(4) Coordinating and using other therapies, interventions, or services with assistive technology devices, such as those associated with existing education and rehabilitation plans and programs;

(5) Training or technical assistance for a child with a disability or if appropriate, the child's family; and

(6) Training or technical assistance for professionals, including individuals providing education and rehabilitation services, employers, or other individuals who provide services to, employ, or are otherwise substantially involved in the major life functions of children with disabilities.

Sec. 33. RCW 19.02.050 and 2013 c 111 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each of the following agencies must fully participate in the implementation of this chapter:

(1) Department of agriculture;

(2) Secretary of state;

(3) Department of social and health services;

(4) Department of revenue;

(5) Department of fish and wildlife;

(6) Employment security department;

(7) Department of labor and industries;

(8) Liquor ((control)) and cannabis board;

(9) Department of health;

(10) Department of licensing;

(11) Utilities and transportation commission;

(12) Board of accountancy;

(13) Department of archaeology and historic preservation;

(14) Department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families;

(15) Department of ecology;

(16) Department of financial institutions;

(17) Department of transportation;

(18) Gambling commission;

(19) Horse racing commission;

(20) Office of the insurance commissioner;

(21) State lottery;

(22) Student achievement council;

(23) Washington state patrol;

(24) Workforce training and education coordinating board; and

(25) Other agencies as determined by the governor.

Sec. 34. RCW 43.216.555 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, an early learning program to provide voluntary preschool opportunities for children three and four years of age shall be implemented according to the funding and implementation plan in RCW ((43.215.456)) 43.216.556. The program must offer a comprehensive program of early childhood education and family support, including parental involvement and health information, screening, and referral services, based on family need. Participation in the program is voluntary. On a space available basis, the program may allow enrollment of children who are not otherwise eligible by assessing a fee.

(2) The program shall be implemented by utilizing the program standards and eligibility criteria in the early childhood education and assistance program in RCW ((43.215.400)) 43.216.500 through ((43.215.450)) 43.216.550.

(3)(a) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, the program implementation in this section shall prioritize early childhood education and assistance programs located in low-income neighborhoods within high-need geographical areas.

(b) Following the priority in (a) of this subsection, preference shall be given to programs meeting at least one of the following characteristics:

(i) Programs offering an extended day program for early care and education;

(ii) Programs offering services to children diagnosed with a special need; or

(iii) Programs offering services to children involved in the child welfare system.

(4) The ((director)) secretary shall adopt rules for the following program components, as appropriate and necessary during the phased implementation of the program, consistent with early achievers program standards established in RCW ((43.215.100)) 43.216.085:

(a) Minimum program standards;

(b) Approval of program providers; and

(c) Accountability and adherence to performance standards.

(5) The department has administrative responsibility for:

(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules developed by the ((director)) secretary under this section;

(b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible children;

(c) Assuring that program providers work cooperatively with school districts to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported; and

(d) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers.

Sec. 35. RCW 43.216.370 and 2007 c 17 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((director)) secretary shall have the power and it shall be the ((director's)) secretary's duty to engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW 34.05.310(2)(a) with the exclusive representative of the family child care licensees selected in accordance with RCW ((43.215.355)) 43.216.375 and with other affected interests before adopting requirements that affect family child care licensees.

Sec. 36. RCW 43.216.355 and 2006 c 265 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the ((director)) secretary may, in the manner provided by law, upon the advice of the attorney general, who shall represent the department in the proceeding, maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or such other relief as he or she may deem advisable against any agency subject to licensing under the provisions of this chapter or against any such agency not having a license as heretofore provided in this chapter.

Sec. 37. RCW 43.216.350 and 2006 c 265 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((director)) secretary shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the ((director's)) secretary's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 38. RCW 43.216.325 and 2011 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued pursuant to this chapter may be suspended, revoked, modified, or not renewed by the ((director)) secretary upon proof (a) that the agency has failed or refused to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the requirements adopted pursuant to this chapter; or (b) that the conditions required for the issuance of a license under this chapter have ceased to exist with respect to such licenses. RCW ((43.215.305)) 43.216.327 governs notice of a license denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

(2) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial, modification, suspension, or revocation of any license under this chapter, the department's decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a preponderance of the evidence.

(3)(a) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted under this chapter or that an agency subject to licensing under this chapter is operating without a license except that civil monetary penalties shall not be levied against a licensed foster home.

(b) Monetary penalties levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an application for licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently become licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in addition to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day an agency is or was out of compliance.

(c) Civil monetary penalties shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars per violation for a family day care home and two hundred fifty dollars per violation for child day care centers. Each day upon which the same or substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment of a separate penalty.

(d) The department shall provide a notification period before a monetary penalty is effective and may forgive the penalty levied if the agency comes into compliance during this period.

(e) The department may suspend, revoke, or not renew a license for failure to pay a civil monetary penalty it has assessed pursuant to this chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes final. RCW ((43.215.307)) 43.216.335 governs notice of a civil monetary penalty and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The preponderance of evidence standard shall apply in adjudicative proceedings related to assessment of civil monetary penalties.

(4)(a) In addition to or in lieu of an enforcement action being taken, the department may place a child day care center or family day care provider on nonreferral status if the center or provider has failed or refused to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter or an enforcement action has been taken. The nonreferral status may continue until the department determines that: (i) No enforcement action is appropriate; or (ii) a corrective action plan has been successfully concluded.

(b) Whenever a child day care center or family day care provider is placed on nonreferral status, the department shall provide written notification to the child day care center or family day care provider.

(5) The department shall notify appropriate public and private child care resource and referral agencies of the department's decision to: (a) Take an enforcement action against a child day care center or family day care provider; or (b) place or remove a child day care center or family day care provider on nonreferral status.

Sec. 39. RCW 43.216.315 and 2006 c 265 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((director)) secretary may, at his or her discretion, issue an initial license instead of a full license, to an agency or facility for a period not to exceed six months, renewable for a period not to exceed two years, to allow such agency or facility reasonable time to become eligible for full license.

Sec. 40. RCW 43.216.305 and 2011 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each agency shall make application for a license or the continuation of a full license to the department on forms prescribed by the department. Upon receipt of such application, the department shall either grant or deny a license or continuation of a full license within ninety days. A license or continuation shall be granted if the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in this chapter and the departmental requirements consistent with this chapter, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW ((43.215.280)) 43.216.315. The department shall consider whether an agency is in good standing, as defined in subsection (4)(b) of this section, before granting a continuation of a full license. Full licenses provided for in this chapter shall continue to remain valid so long as the licensee meets the requirements for a nonexpiring license in subsection (2) of this section. The licensee, however, shall advise the ((director)) secretary of any material change in circumstances which might constitute grounds for reclassification of license as to category. The license issued under this chapter is not transferable and applies only to the licensee and the location stated in the application. For licensed family day care homes having an acceptable history of child care, the license may remain in effect for two weeks after a move.

(2) In order to qualify for a nonexpiring full license, a licensee must meet the following requirements on an annual basis as established from the date of initial licensure:

(a) Submit the annual licensing fee;

(b) Submit a declaration to the department indicating the licensee's intent to continue operating a licensed child care program, or the intent to cease operation on a date certain;

(c) Submit a declaration of compliance with all licensing rules; and

(d) Submit background check applications on the schedule established by the department.

(3) If a licensee fails to meet the requirements in subsection (2) of this section for continuation of a full license the license expires and the licensee must submit a new application for licensure under this chapter.

(4)(a) Nothing about the nonexpiring license process may interfere with the department's established monitoring practice.

(b) For the purpose of this section, an agency is considered to be in good standing if in the intervening period between monitoring visits the agency does not have any of the following:

(i) Valid complaints;

(ii) A history of noncompliance related to those valid complaints or pending from prior monitoring visits; or

(iii) Other information that when evaluated would result in a finding of noncompliance with this section.

(c) The department shall consider whether an agency is in good standing when determining the most appropriate approach and process for monitoring visits, for the purposes of administrative efficiency while protecting children, consistent with this chapter. If the department determines that an agency is not in good standing, the department may issue a probationary license, as provided in RCW ((43.215.290)) 43.216.320.

Sec. 41. RCW 43.216.300 and 2007 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The ((director)) secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining a license. The ((director)) secretary may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the ((director)) secretary, the fees would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.

(2) Fees charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include costs of necessary inspection.

(3) The ((director)) secretary shall establish the fees charged by rule.

Sec. 42. RCW 43.216.265 and 2013 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty:

(1) In consultation with the ((director)) secretary and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt recognized minimum standard requirements pertaining to each category of agency established pursuant to this chapter necessary to protect all persons residing therein from fire hazards;

(2) To adopt licensing minimum standard requirements to allow children who attend classes in a school building during school hours to remain in the same building to participate in before-school or after-school programs and to allow participation in such before-school and after-school programs by children who attend other schools and are transported to attend such before-school and after-school programs;

(3) To make or cause to be made such inspections and investigations of agencies as he or she deems necessary;

(4) To make a periodic review of requirements under RCW ((43.215.200(5))) 43.216.250(8) and to adopt necessary changes after consultation as required in subsection (1) of this section;

(5) To issue to applicants for licenses under this chapter who comply with the requirements, a certificate of compliance, a copy of which shall be presented to the department before a license shall be issued, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW ((43.215.280)) 43.216.315.

Sec. 43. RCW 43.216.045 and 2006 c 265 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((director)) secretary may appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The ((director)) secretary may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities. The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the ((director)) secretary may determine.

Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 44. RCW 43.216.105 and 2017 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((early learning)) children, youth, and families must work with community partners to support outreach and education for parents and families around the benefits of native language development and retention, as well as the benefits of dual language learning. Native language means the language normally used by an individual or, in the case of a child or youth, the language normally used by the parents or family of the child or youth. Dual language learning means learning in two languages, generally English and a target language other than English spoken in the local community, for example Spanish, Somali, Vietnamese, Russian, Arabic, native languages, or indigenous languages where the goal is bilingualism.

(2) Within existing resources, the department must create training and professional development resources on dual language learning, such as supporting English learners, working in culturally and linguistically diverse communities, strategies for family engagement, and cultural responsiveness. The department must design the training modules to be culturally responsive.

(3) Within existing resources, the department must support dual language learning communities for teachers and coaches.

(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 45. RCW 9.94A.655 and 2010 c 224 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An offender is eligible for the parenting sentencing alternative if:

(a) The high end of the standard sentence range for the current offense is greater than one year;

(b) The offender has no prior or current conviction for a felony that is a sex offense or a violent offense;

(c) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation order during the period of the sentence;

(d) The offender signs any release of information waivers required to allow information regarding current or prior child welfare cases to be shared with the department and the court; and

(e) The offender has physical custody of his or her minor child or is a legal guardian or custodian with physical custody of a child under the age of eighteen at the time of the current offense.

(2) To assist the court in making its determination, the court may order the department to complete either a risk assessment report or a chemical dependency screening report as provided in RCW 9.94A.500, or both reports prior to sentencing.

(3) If the court is considering this alternative, the court shall request that the department contact the ((children's administration of the Washington state department of social and health services)) department of children, youth, and families to determine if the agency has an open child welfare case or prior substantiated referral of abuse or neglect involving the offender or if the agency is aware of any substantiated case of abuse or neglect with a tribal child welfare agency involving the offender.

(a) If the offender has an open child welfare case, the department will provide the release of information waiver and request that the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families or the tribal child welfare agency provide a report to the court. The ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families shall provide a report within seven business days of the request that includes, at the minimum, the following:

(i) Legal status of the child welfare case;

(ii) Length of time the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families has been involved with the offender;

(iii) Legal status of the case and permanent plan;

(iv) Any special needs of the child;

(v) Whether or not the offender has been cooperative with services ordered by a juvenile court under a child welfare case; and

(vi) If the offender has been convicted of a crime against a child.

(b) If a report is required from a tribal child welfare agency, the department shall attempt to obtain information that is similar to what is required for the report provided by the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families in a timely manner.

(c) If the offender does not have an open child welfare case with the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families or with a tribal child welfare agency but has prior involvement, the department will obtain information from the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families on the number and type of past substantiated referrals of abuse or neglect and report that information to the court. If the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families has never had any substantiated referrals or an open case with the offender, the department will inform the court.

(4) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is eligible for a sentencing alternative under this section and that the sentencing alternative is appropriate and should be imposed, the court shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a sentence consisting of twelve months of community custody. The court shall consider the offender's criminal history when determining if the alternative is appropriate.

(5) When a court imposes a sentence of community custody under this section:

(a) The court may impose conditions as provided in RCW 9.94A.703 and may impose other affirmative conditions as the court considers appropriate.

(b) The department may impose conditions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.704 that may include, but are not limited to:

(i) Parenting classes;

(ii) Chemical dependency treatment;

(iii) Mental health treatment;

(iv) Vocational training;

(v) Offender change programs;

(vi) Life skills classes.

(c) The department shall report to the court if the offender commits any violations of his or her sentence conditions.

(6) The department shall provide the court with quarterly progress reports regarding the offender's progress in required programming, treatment, and other supervision conditions. When an offender has an open child welfare case, the department will seek to coordinate services with the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families.

(7)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this section back into court at any time during the period of community custody on its own initiative to evaluate the offender's progress in treatment, or to determine if any violations of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.

(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify the conditions of community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of this subsection.

(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense at any time during the period of community custody, if the offender violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.

(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under (c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously served in confinement under this section.

Sec. 46. RCW 26.44.220 and 2013 c 23 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within existing resources, the department shall develop a curriculum designed to train department staff ((of the department's children's administration)) who assess or provide services to adolescents on how to screen and respond to referrals to child protective services when those referrals may involve victims of abuse or neglect between the ages of eleven and eighteen. At a minimum, the curriculum developed pursuant to this section shall include:

(a) Review of relevant laws and regulations, including the requirement that the department investigate complaints if a parent's or caretaker's actions result in serious physical or emotional harm or present an imminent risk of serious harm to any person under eighteen;

(b) Review of departmental policies ((of the department's children's administration)) that require assessment and screening of abuse and neglect referrals on the basis of risk and not age;

(c) Explanation of safety assessment and risk assessment models;

(d) Case studies of situations in which the department has received reports of alleged abuse or neglect of older children and adolescents;

(e) Discussion of best practices in screening and responding to referrals involving older children and adolescents; and

(f) Discussion of how abuse and neglect referrals related to adolescents are investigated and when law enforcement must be notified.

(2) As it develops its curriculum pursuant to this section, the department shall request that the office of the family and children's ombuds review and comment on its proposed training materials. The department shall consider the comments and recommendations of the office of the family and children's ombuds as it develops the curriculum required by this section.

(3) The department shall complete the curriculum materials required by this section no later than December 31, 2005.

(4) Within existing resources, the department shall incorporate training on the curriculum developed pursuant to this section into existing training for child protective services workers who screen intake calls, ((children's administration)) department staff responsible for assessing or providing services to older children and adolescents, and all new employees of the ((children's administration)) department responsible for assessing or providing services to older children and adolescents.

Sec. 47. RCW 9.94A.6551 and 2010 c 224 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For offenders not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.655, but otherwise eligible under this section, no more than the final twelve months of the offender's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as home detention as part of the parenting program developed by the department.

(1) The secretary may transfer an offender from a correctional facility to home detention in the community if it is determined that the parenting program is an appropriate placement and when all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The offender is serving a sentence in which the high end of the range is greater than one year;

(b) The offender has no current conviction for a felony that is a sex offense or a violent offense;

(c) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not become subject to a deportation order during the period of the sentence;

(d) The offender signs any release of information waivers required to allow information regarding current or prior child welfare cases to be shared with the department and the court;

(e) The offender:

(i) Has physical or legal custody of a minor child;

(ii) Has a proven, established, ongoing, and substantial relationship with his or her minor child that existed prior to the commission of the current offense; or

(iii) Is a legal guardian of a child that was under the age of eighteen at the time of the current offense; and

(f) The department determines that such a placement is in the best interests of the child.

(2) When the department is considering partial confinement as part of the parenting program for an offender, the department shall inquire of the individual and the ((children's administration with the Washington state department of social and health services)) department of children, youth, and families whether the agency has an open child welfare case or prior substantiated referral for abuse or neglect involving the offender. If the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families or a tribal jurisdiction has an open child welfare case, the department will seek input from the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families or the involved tribal jurisdiction as to: (a) The status of the child welfare case; and (b) recommendations regarding placement of the offender and services required of the department and the court governing the individual's child welfare case. The department and its officers, agents, and employees are not liable for the acts of offenders participating in the parenting program unless the department or its officers, agents, and employees acted with willful and wanton disregard.

(3) All offenders placed on home detention as part of the parenting program shall provide an approved residence and living arrangement prior to transfer to home detention.

(4) While in the community on home detention as part of the parenting program, the department shall:

(a) Require the offender to be placed on electronic home monitoring;

(b) Require the offender to participate in programming and treatment that the department determines is needed;

(c) Assign a community corrections officer who will monitor the offender's compliance with conditions of partial confinement and programming requirements; and

(d) If the offender has an open child welfare case with the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families, collaborate and communicate with the identified social worker in the provision of services.

(5) The department has the authority to return any offender serving partial confinement in the parenting program to total confinement if the offender is not complying with sentence requirements.

Sec. 48. RCW 74.13.632 and 2013 c 182 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A university-based child welfare research entity shall include in its reporting the educational experiences and progress of students in ((children's administration)) out-of-home care with the department. This data must be disaggregated in the smallest units allowable by law that do not identify an individual student, in order to learn which ((children's administration)) of the department's offices and school districts are experiencing the greatest success and challenges in achieving quality educational outcomes with students in ((children's administration)) out-of-home care with the department.

(2) By January 1, 2015 and annually thereafter, the university-based child welfare research entity must submit a report to the legislature. To the extent possible, the report should include, but is not limited to, information on the following measures for a youth who is a dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW:

(a) Aggregate scores from the Washington state kindergarten readiness assessment;

(b) Aggregate scores from the third grade statewide student assessment in reading;

(c) Number of youth graduating from high school with a documented plan for postsecondary education, employment, or military service;

(d) Number of youth completing one year of postsecondary education, the equivalent of first-year student credits, or achieving a postsecondary certificate; and

(e) Number of youth who complete an associate or bachelor's degree.

(3) The report must identify strengths and weaknesses in practice and recommend to the legislature strategy and needed resources for improvement.

Sec. 49. RCW 74.13.341 and 2015 c 240 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

With respect to youth who will be aging out of foster care, the ((children's administration)) department shall invite representatives from the department of social and health services division of behavioral health and recovery, the disability services administration, the economic services administration, and the juvenile justice and rehabilitation administration to the youth's shared planning meeting that occurs between age seventeen and seventeen and one-half that is used to develop a transition plan. It is the responsibility of the ((children's administration)) department to include these agencies in the shared planning meeting. If foster youth who are the subject of this meeting may qualify for developmental disability services pursuant to Title 71A RCW, the ((children's administration)) department shall direct these youth to apply for these services and provide assistance in the application process.

Sec. 50. RCW 28A.300.525 and 2012 c 163 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The education data center shall include in its reporting as part of the P-20 education data project the educational experiences and progress of students in ((children's administration)) out-of-home care with the department of children, youth, and families. This data should be disaggregated in the smallest units allowable by law that do not identify an individual student, in order to learn which school districts are experiencing the greatest success and challenges in achieving quality educational outcomes with students in ((children's administration)) out-of-home care with the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 51. RCW 74.13.020 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Case management" means convening family meetings, developing, revising, and monitoring implementation of any case plan or individual service and safety plan, coordinating and monitoring services needed by the child and family, caseworker-child visits, family visits, and the assumption of court-related duties, excluding legal representation, including preparing court reports, attending judicial hearings and permanency hearings, and ensuring that the child is progressing toward permanency within state and federal mandates, including the Indian child welfare act.

(2) "Child" means:

(a) A person less than eighteen years of age; or

(b) A person age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(3) "Child protective services" has the same meaning as in RCW 26.44.020.

(4) "Child welfare services" means social services including voluntary and in-home services, out-of-home care, case management, and adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or substitute for, parental care and supervision for the purpose of:

(a) Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of problems which may result in families in conflict, or the neglect, abuse, exploitation, or criminal behavior of children;

(b) Protecting and caring for dependent, abused, or neglected children;

(c) Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and assisting parents who are in conflict with their children, with services designed to resolve such conflicts;

(d) Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the strengthening of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;

(e) Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in foster family homes or day care or other child care agencies or facilities.

"Child welfare services" does not include child protection services.

(5) "Committee" means the child welfare transformation design committee.

(6) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(7) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other support services the department is authorized to provide to foster children. These services include, but are not limited to, placement in licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs; independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or treatment.

(8) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent maltreatment.

(9) "Measurable effects" means a statistically significant change which occurs as a result of the service or services a supervising agency is assigned in a performance-based contract, in time periods established in the contract.

(10) "Medical condition" means, for the purposes of qualifying for extended foster care services, a physical or mental health condition as documented by any licensed health care provider regulated by a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040.

(11) "Nonminor dependent" means any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is participating in extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(12) "Out-of-home care services" means services provided after the shelter care hearing to or for children in out-of-home care, as that term is defined in RCW 13.34.030, and their families, including the recruitment, training, and management of foster parents, the recruitment of adoptive families, and the facilitation of the adoption process, family reunification, independent living, emergency shelter, residential group care, and foster care, including relative placement.

(13) "Performance-based contracting" means the structuring of all aspects of the procurement of services around the purpose of the work to be performed and the desired results with the contract requirements set forth in clear, specific, and objective terms with measurable outcomes. Contracts shall also include provisions that link the performance of the contractor to the level and timing of reimbursement.

(14) "Permanency services" means long-term services provided to secure a child's safety, permanency, and well-being, including foster care services, family reunification services, adoption services, and preparation for independent living services.

(15) "Primary prevention services" means services which are designed and delivered for the primary purpose of enhancing child and family well-being and are shown, by analysis of outcomes, to reduce the risk to the likelihood of the initial need for child welfare services.

(16) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department.

(17) "Supervised independent living" includes, but is not limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings. Supervised independent living settings must be approved by the ((children's administration)) department or the court.

(18) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide case management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services, as defined in this section. This definition is applicable on or after December 30, 2015.

(19) "Unsupervised" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.43.830.

(20) "Voluntary placement agreement" means, for the purposes of extended foster care services, a written voluntary agreement between a nonminor dependent who agrees to submit to the care and authority of the department for the purposes of participating in the extended foster care program.

Sec. 52. RCW 72.05.435 and 1998 c 269 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish by rule a policy for the common use of residential group homes for juvenile offenders under the jurisdiction of the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families.

(2) A juvenile confined under the jurisdiction of the juvenile rehabilitation administration who is convicted of a class A felony is not eligible for placement in a community facility operated by ((children's administration)) the department of children, youth, and families that houses juveniles who are not under the jurisdiction of juvenile rehabilitation administration unless:

(a) The juvenile is housed in a separate living unit solely for juvenile offenders;

(b) The community facility is a specialized treatment program and the youth is not assessed as sexually aggressive under RCW 13.40.470; or

(c) The community facility is a specialized treatment program that houses one or more sexually aggressive youth and the juvenile is not assessed as sexually vulnerable under RCW 13.40.470.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53. Section 52 of this act expires July 1, 2019.

Sec. 54. RCW 13.34.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to forego, for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities despite an ability to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there is no expressed intent to abandon.

(2) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean:

(a) Any individual under the age of eighteen years; or

(b) Any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is eligible to receive and who elects to receive the extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031. A youth who remains dependent and who receives extended foster care services under RCW 74.13.031 shall not be considered a "child" under any other statute or for any other purpose.

(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(4) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) "Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation, or Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the dependency.

(6) "Dependent child" means any child who:

(a) Has been abandoned;

(b) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a person legally responsible for the care of the child;

(c) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which constitute a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological or physical development; or

(d) Is receiving extended foster care services, as authorized by RCW 74.13.031.

(7) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary of the department of social and health services to be closely related to an intellectual disability or to require treatment similar to that required for individuals with intellectual disabilities, which disability originates before the individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial limitation to the individual.

(8) "Educational liaison" means a person who has been appointed by the court to fulfill responsibilities outlined in RCW 13.34.046.

(9) "Extended foster care services" means residential and other support services the department is authorized to provide under RCW 74.13.031. These services may include placement in licensed, relative, or otherwise approved care, or supervised independent living settings; assistance in meeting basic needs; independent living services; medical assistance; and counseling or treatment.

(10) "Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding, including a guardian appointed pursuant to chapter 13.36 RCW; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under this chapter.

(11) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding under this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by the court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform substantially the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem, shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of this chapter.

(12) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of volunteer guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or found to be dependent. Such management shall include but is not limited to: Recruitment, screening, training, supervision, assignment, and discharge of volunteers.

(13) "Housing assistance" means appropriate referrals by the department or other supervising agencies to federal, state, local, or private agencies or organizations, assistance with forms, applications, or financial subsidies or other monetary assistance for housing. For purposes of this chapter, "housing assistance" is not a remedial service or time-limited family reunification service as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(14) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court proceeding, is:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, medical care services under RCW 74.09.035, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the federally established poverty level; or

(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the retention of counsel.

(15) "Nonminor dependent" means any individual age eighteen to twenty-one years who is participating in extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

(16) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(17) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive parents of a child, or an individual who has established a parent-child relationship under RCW 26.26.101, unless the legal rights of that person have been terminated by a judicial proceeding pursuant to this chapter, chapter 26.33 RCW, or the equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(18) "Preventive services" means preservation services, as defined in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services, including housing assistance, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting the child.

(19) "Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030.

(20) "Sibling" means a child's birth brother, birth sister, adoptive brother, adoptive sister, half-brother, or half-sister, or as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe for an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040.

(21) "Social study" means a written evaluation of matters relevant to the disposition of the case and shall contain the following information:

(a) A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that intervention is designed to alleviate;

(b) A description of the specific services and activities, for both the parents and child, that are needed in order to prevent serious harm to the child; the reasons why such services and activities are likely to be useful; the availability of any proposed services; and the agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services will be delivered. The description shall identify the services chosen and approved by the parent;

(c) If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons why the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a description of any previous efforts to work with the parents and the child in the home; the in-home treatment programs that have been considered and rejected; the preventive services, including housing assistance, that have been offered or provided and have failed to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home; and the parents' attitude toward placement of the child;

(d) A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a result of removal;

(e) A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize the harm to the child that may result if separation occurs including an assessment of the child's relationship and emotional bond with any siblings, and the agency's plan to provide ongoing contact between the child and the child's siblings if appropriate; and

(f) Behavior that will be expected before determination that supervision of the family or placement is no longer necessary.

(22) "Supervised independent living" includes, but is not limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings. Supervised independent living settings must be approved by the ((children's administration)) department or the court.

(23) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide case management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020.

(24) "Voluntary placement agreement" means, for the purposes of extended foster care services, a written voluntary agreement between a nonminor dependent who agrees to submit to the care and authority of the department for the purposes of participating in the extended foster care program.

Sec. 55. RCW 74.31.020 and 2011 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington traumatic brain injury strategic partnership advisory council is established as an advisory council to the governor, the legislature, and the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(2) The council shall be composed of:

(a) The following members who shall be appointed by the governor:

(i) A representative from a Native American tribe located in Washington state;

(ii) A representative from a nonprofit organization serving individuals with traumatic brain injury;

(iii) An individual with expertise in working with children with traumatic brain injuries;

(iv) A physician who has experience working with individuals with traumatic brain injuries;

(v) A neuropsychologist who has experience working with persons with traumatic brain injuries;

(vi) A social worker or clinical psychologist who has experience in working with persons who have sustained traumatic brain injuries;

(vii) A rehabilitation specialist, such as a speech pathologist, vocational rehabilitation counselor, occupational therapist, or physical therapist who has experience working with persons with traumatic brain injuries;

(viii) Two persons who are individuals with a traumatic brain injury;

(ix) Two persons who are family members of individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and

(x) Two members of the public who have experience with issues related to the causes of traumatic brain injuries; and

(b) The following agency members:

(i) The secretary or the secretary's designee, and representatives from the following: The ((children's administration, the)) division of behavioral health and recovery services, the aging and disability services administration, and the division of vocational rehabilitation;

(ii) The secretary of health or the secretary's designee;

(iii) The secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee;

(iv) The secretary of children, youth, and families or the secretary's designee;

(v) A representative of the department of commerce with expertise in housing;

(((v))) (vi) A representative from the Washington state department of veterans affairs;

(((vi))) (vii) A representative from the national guard;

(((vii))) (viii) The executive director of the Washington protection and advocacy system or the executive director's designee; and

(((viii))) (ix) The executive director of the state brain injury association or the executive director's designee.

In the event that any of the state agencies designated in (((b) of)) this subsection (2)(b) is renamed, reorganized, or eliminated, the director or secretary of the department that assumes the responsibilities of each renamed, reorganized, or eliminated agency shall designate a substitute representative.

(3) Councilmembers shall not be compensated for serving on the council, but may be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses related to costs incurred in participating in meetings for the council.

(4) No member may serve more than two consecutive terms.

(5) The appointed members of the council shall, to the extent possible, represent rural and urban areas of the state.

(6) A chairperson shall be elected every two years by majority vote from among the councilmembers. The chairperson shall act as the presiding officer of the council.

(7) The duties of the council include:

(a) Collaborating with the department to develop and revise as needed a comprehensive statewide plan to address the needs of individuals with traumatic brain injuries;

(b) Providing recommendations to the department on criteria to be used to select programs facilitating support groups for individuals with traumatic brain injuries and their families under RCW 74.31.050;

(c) By January 15, 2013, and every two years thereafter, developing a report in collaboration with the department and submitting it to the legislature and the governor on the following:

(i) Identifying the activities of the council in the implementation of the comprehensive statewide plan;

(ii) Recommendations for the revisions to the comprehensive statewide plan;

(iii) Recommendations for using the traumatic brain injury account established under RCW 74.31.060 to form strategic partnerships and to foster the development of services and supports for individuals impacted by traumatic brain injuries; and

(iv) Recommendations for a council staffing plan for council support under RCW 74.31.030.

(8) The council may utilize the advice or services of a nationally recognized expert, or other individuals as the council deems appropriate, to assist the council in carrying out its duties under this section.

Sec. 56. RCW 74.15.038 and 2014 c 88 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If an agency operating under contract with the ((children's administration)) department chooses to hire an individual that would be precluded from employment with the department based on a disqualifying crime or negative action, the department and its officers and employees have no liability arising from any injury or harm to a child or other department client that is attributable to such individual.

Sec. 57. RCW 74.13.660 and 2007 c 220 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Under the foster parent critical support and retention program, foster parents who care for sexually reactive children, physically assaultive children, or children with other high-risk behaviors, as defined in RCW 74.13.280, shall receive:

(1) Availability at any time of the day or night to address specific concerns related to the identified child;

(2) Assessment of risk and development of a safety and supervision plan;

(3) Home-based foster parent training utilizing evidence-based models; and

(4) Referral to relevant community services and training provided by the local ((children's administration)) department office or community agencies.

Sec. 58. RCW 74.13.570 and 2012 c 229 s 594 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish an oversight committee composed of staff from ((the children's administration of the department,)) the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the student achievement council, foster youth, former foster youth, foster parents, and advocacy agencies to develop strategies for maintaining foster children in the schools they were attending at the time they entered foster care and to promote opportunities for foster youth to participate in postsecondary education or training.

(2) The duties of the oversight committee shall include, but are not limited to:

(a) Developing strategies for school-based recruitment of foster homes;

(b) Monitoring the progress of current pilot projects that assist foster children to continue attending the schools they were attending at the time they entered foster care;

(c) Overseeing the expansion of the number of pilot projects;

(d) Promoting the use of best practices, throughout the state, demonstrated by the pilot projects and other programs relating to maintaining foster children in the schools they were attending at the time they entered foster care;

(e) Informing the legislature of the status of efforts to maintain foster children in the schools they were attending at the time they entered foster care;

(f) Assessing the scope and nature of statewide need among current and former foster youth for assistance to pursue and participate in postsecondary education or training opportunities;

(g) Identifying available sources of funding available in the state for services to former foster youth to pursue and participate in postsecondary education or training opportunities;

(h) Reviewing the effectiveness of activities in the state to support former foster youth to pursue and participate in postsecondary education or training opportunities;

(i) Identifying new activities, or existing activities that should be modified or expanded, to best meet statewide needs; and

(j) Reviewing on an ongoing basis the progress toward improving educational and vocational outcomes for foster youth.

Sec. 59. RCW 71.24.065 and 2014 c 225 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

To the extent funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, the department of social and health services shall contract for implementation of a wraparound model of integrated children's mental health services delivery in up to four behavioral health organization regions in Washington state in which wraparound programs are not currently operating, and in up to two behavioral health organization regions in which wraparound programs are currently operating. Contracts in regions with existing wraparound programs shall be for the purpose of expanding the number of children served.

(1) Funding provided may be expended for: Costs associated with a request for proposal and contracting process; administrative costs associated with successful bidders' operation of the wraparound model; the evaluation under subsection (5) of this section; and funding for services needed by children enrolled in wraparound model sites that are not otherwise covered under existing state programs. The services provided through the wraparound model sites shall include, but not be limited to, services covered under the medicaid program. The department shall maximize the use of medicaid and other existing state-funded programs as a funding source. However, state funds provided may be used to develop a broader service package to meet needs identified in a child's care plan. Amounts provided shall supplement, and not supplant, state, local, or other funding for services that a child being served through a wraparound site would otherwise be eligible to receive.

(2) The wraparound model sites shall serve children with serious emotional or behavioral disturbances who are at high risk of residential or correctional placement or psychiatric hospitalization, and who have been referred for services from the department, a county juvenile court, a tribal court, a school, or a licensed mental health provider or agency.

(3) Through a request for proposal process, the department shall contract, with behavioral health organizations, alone or in partnership with either educational service districts or entities licensed to provide mental health services to children with serious emotional or behavioral disturbances, to operate the wraparound model sites. The contractor shall provide care coordination and facilitate the delivery of services and other supports to families using a strength-based, highly individualized wraparound process. The request for proposal shall require that:

(a) The behavioral health organization agree to use its medicaid revenues to fund services included in the existing behavioral health organization's benefit package that a medicaid-eligible child participating in the wraparound model site is determined to need;

(b) The contractor provide evidence of commitments from at least the following entities to participate in wraparound care plan development and service provision when appropriate: Community mental health agencies, schools, the department of ((social and health services children's administration)) children, youth, and families, juvenile courts, the department of social and health services juvenile rehabilitation administration, and managed health care systems contracting with the department under RCW 74.09.522; and

(c) The contractor will operate the wraparound model site in a manner that maintains fidelity to the wraparound process as defined in RCW 71.36.010.

(4) Contracts for operation of the wraparound model sites shall be executed on or before April 1, 2008, with enrollment and service delivery beginning on or before July 1, 2008.

(5) The evidence-based practice institute established in RCW 71.24.061 shall evaluate the wraparound model sites, measuring outcomes for children served. Outcomes measured shall include, but are not limited to: Decreased out-of-home placement, including residential, group, and foster care, and increased stability of such placements, school attendance, school performance, recidivism, emergency room utilization, involvement with the juvenile justice system, decreased use of psychotropic medication, and decreased hospitalization.

(6) The evidence-based practice institute shall provide a report and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

Sec. 60. RCW 43.185C.285 and 2017 c 277 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The administrator of a crisis residential center shall notify parents and the appropriate law enforcement agency as to any unauthorized leave from the center by a child placed at the center. The administrator shall also notify the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families immediately as to any unauthorized leave from the center by a child who is in the care of or receiving services from the department of ((social and health services children's administration)) children, youth, and families.

Sec. 61. RCW 43.185C.260 and 2017 c 277 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement officer shall take a child into custody:

(a) If a law enforcement agency has been contacted by the parent of the child that the child is absent from parental custody without consent; or

(b) If a law enforcement officer reasonably believes, considering the child's age, the location, and the time of day, that a child is in circumstances which constitute a danger to the child's safety or that a child is violating a local curfew ordinance; or

(c) If an agency legally charged with the supervision of a child has notified a law enforcement agency that the child has run away from placement; or

(d) If a law enforcement agency has been notified by the juvenile court that the court finds probable cause exists to believe that the child has violated a court placement order issued under this chapter or chapter 13.34 RCW or that the court has issued an order for law enforcement pick-up of the child under this chapter or chapter 13.34 RCW.

(2) Law enforcement custody shall not extend beyond the amount of time reasonably necessary to transport the child to a destination authorized by law and to place the child at that destination. Law enforcement custody continues until the law enforcement officer transfers custody to a person, agency, or other authorized entity under this chapter, or releases the child because no placement is available. Transfer of custody is not complete unless the person, agency, or entity to whom the child is released agrees to accept custody.

(3) If a law enforcement officer takes a child into custody pursuant to either subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and transports the child to a crisis residential center, the officer shall, within twenty-four hours of delivering the child to the center, provide to the center a written report detailing the reasons the officer took the child into custody. The center shall provide the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families with a copy of the officer's report if the youth is in the care of or receiving services from the department of ((social and health services children's administration)) children, youth, and families.

(4) If the law enforcement officer who initially takes the juvenile into custody or the staff of the crisis residential center have reasonable cause to believe that the child is absent from home because he or she is abused or neglected, a report shall be made immediately to the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(5) Nothing in this section affects the authority of any political subdivision to make regulations concerning the conduct of minors in public places by ordinance or other local law.

(6) If a law enforcement officer has a reasonable suspicion that a child is being unlawfully harbored in violation of RCW 13.32A.080, the officer shall remove the child from the custody of the person harboring the child and shall transport the child to one of the locations specified in RCW 43.185C.265.

(7) No child may be placed in a secure facility except as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 62. RCW 28B.105.060 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Notify elementary, middle, junior high, high school, and school district staff and administrators, and the ((children's administration of the department of social and health services)) department of children, youth, and families about the GET ready for math and science scholarship program using methods in place for communicating with schools and school districts; and

(2) Provide data showing the race, ethnicity, income, and other available demographic information of students who achieve level four on the math and science high school statewide student assessment; compare those data with comparable information on the student population as a whole; and submit a report with the analysis to the committees responsible for education and higher education in the legislature on December 1st of even-numbered years.

Sec. 63. RCW 28A.300.592 and 2016 c 71 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section, "outcome" or "outcomes" means measuring the differences in high school graduation rates and postsecondary enrollment and completion between youth served by the programs described in this section, and those who would have otherwise been eligible for the programs, but were not served by the programs.

(2) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must contract with at least one nongovernmental entity to improve the educational outcomes of students at two sites by providing individualized education services and monitoring and supporting dependent youths' completion of educational milestones, remediation needs, and special education needs. The selected nongovernmental entity must engage in a public-private partnership with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and is responsible for raising a portion of the funds needed for service delivery, administration, and evaluation.

(3) One of the sites described in subsection (2) of this section shall be the site previously selected by the department of social and health services pursuant to the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act, section 202(10), chapter 4, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. to the extent private funds are available. The previously selected site will expand to include the entire county in which it is currently located, subject to the availability of private funds. The second site established under this section must be implemented after July 1, 2016. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the nongovernmental entity or entities at the original site shall consult with the department of social and health services and then collaboratively select the second site. This site should be a school district or group of school districts with a significant number of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW.

(4) The purpose of the programs at both sites is to improve the educational outcomes of students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW by providing individualized education services and supporting dependent youths' completion of educational milestones, remediation needs, and special education needs.

(5) The entity or entities at these sites must facilitate the educational progress, high school completion, and postsecondary plan initiation of eligible youth. The contract with the entity or entities must be outcome driven with a stated goal of improving the graduation rates and postsecondary plan initiation of foster youth by two percent per year over five school year periods. The baseline for measurement for the existing site was established in the 2013-14 school year, and this baseline remains applicable through the 2018-19 school year. Any new site must establish its baseline at the end of the first year of service provision, and this baseline must remain applicable for the next five school year periods.

(6) Services provided by the nongovernmental entity or entities must include:

(a) Advocacy for foster youth to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;

(b) Consultation with schools and the department of ((social and health services')) children, youth, and families case workers to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;

(c) Monitoring education progress and providing interventions to improve attendance, behavior, and course performance of participating youth;

(d) Facilitating age-specific developmental and logistical tasks to be accomplished for high school and postsecondary success;

(e) Facilitating the participation of youth with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success; and

(f) Coordinating youth, caregivers, schools, and social workers to advocate to support youth progress in the educational system.

(7) The contracted nongovernmental entity or entities must report site outcomes to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families semiannually.

(8) The department of ((social and health services children's administration)) children, youth, and families must proactively refer all eligible students thirteen years of age or older, within the site areas, to the contractor for educational services. Youth eligible for referral are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW, are age thirteen through twenty-one years of age, are not currently served by services under RCW 28B.77.250, and remain eligible for continuing service following fulfillment of the permanent plan and through initiation of a postsecondary plan. After high school completion, services are concluded within a time period specified in the contract to pursue engagement of continuing postsecondary support services provided by local education agencies, postsecondary education, community-based programs, or the passport to college promise program.

(9) The selected nongovernmental entity or entities may be colocated in the offices of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families to provide timely consultation. These entities must be provided access to all paper and electronic education records and case information pertinent to the educational planning and services of youth referred and are subject to RCW 13.50.010 and 13.50.100.

Sec. 64. RCW 26.44.125 and 2012 c 259 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who is named as an alleged perpetrator after October 1, 1998, in a founded report of child abuse or neglect has the right to seek review and amendment of the finding as provided in this section.

(2) Within thirty calendar days after the department has notified the alleged perpetrator under RCW 26.44.100 that the person is named as an alleged perpetrator in a founded report of child abuse or neglect, he or she may request that the department review the finding. The request must be made in writing. The written notice provided by the department must contain at least the following information in plain language:

(a) Information about the department's investigative finding as it relates to the alleged perpetrator;

(b) Sufficient factual information to apprise the alleged perpetrator of the date and nature of the founded reports;

(c) That the alleged perpetrator has the right to submit to child protective services a written response regarding the child protective services finding which, if received, shall be filed in the department's records;

(d) That information in the department's records, including information about this founded report, may be considered in a later investigation or proceeding related to a different allegation of child abuse or neglect or child custody;

(e) That founded allegations of child abuse or neglect may be used by the department in determining:

(i) If a perpetrator is qualified to be licensed or approved to care for children or vulnerable adults; or

(ii) If a perpetrator is qualified to be employed by the department in a position having unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults;

(f) That the alleged perpetrator has a right to challenge a founded allegation of child abuse or neglect.

(3) If a request for review is not made as provided in this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further challenge the finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an adjudicative hearing or judicial review of the finding, unless he or she can show that the department did not comply with the notice requirements of RCW 26.44.100.

(4) Upon receipt of a written request for review, the department shall review and, if appropriate, may amend the finding. Management level staff within the ((children's administration)) department designated by the secretary shall be responsible for the review. The review must be completed within thirty days after receiving the written request for review. The review must be conducted in accordance with procedures the department establishes by rule. Upon completion of the review, the department shall notify the alleged perpetrator in writing of the agency's determination. The notification must be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person's last known address.

(5) If, following agency review, the report remains founded, the person named as the alleged perpetrator in the report may request an adjudicative hearing to contest the finding. The adjudicative proceeding is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW and this section. The request for an adjudicative proceeding must be filed within thirty calendar days after receiving notice of the agency review determination. If a request for an adjudicative proceeding is not made as provided in this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further challenge the finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an adjudicative hearing or judicial review of the finding.

(6) Reviews and hearings conducted under this section are confidential and shall not be open to the public. Information about reports, reviews, and hearings may be disclosed only in accordance with federal and state laws pertaining to child welfare records and child protective services reports.

(7) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 65. RCW 7.68.801 and 2017 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commercially sexually exploited children statewide coordinating committee is established to address the issue of children who are commercially sexually exploited, to examine the practices of local and regional entities involved in addressing sexually exploited children, and to make recommendations on statewide laws and practices.

(2) The committee is convened by the office of the attorney general with the department of commerce assisting with agenda planning and administrative and clerical support. The committee consists of the following members:

(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house;

(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the speaker of the senate;

(c) A representative of the governor's office appointed by the governor;

(d) The secretary of the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families or his or her designee;

(e) The secretary of the juvenile rehabilitation administration or his or her designee;

(f) The attorney general or his or her designee;

(g) The superintendent of public instruction or his or her designee;

(h) A representative of the administrative office of the courts appointed by the administrative office of the courts;

(i) The executive director of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs or his or her designee;

(j) The executive director of the Washington state criminal justice training commission or his or her designee;

(k) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys appointed by the association;

(l) The executive director of the office of public defense or his or her designee;

(m) Three representatives of community service providers that provide direct services to commercially sexually exploited children appointed by the attorney general;

(n) Two representatives of nongovernmental organizations familiar with the issues affecting commercially sexually exploited children appointed by the attorney general;

(o) The president of the superior court judges' association or his or her designee;

(p) The president of the juvenile court administrators or his or her designee;

(q) Any existing chairs of regional task forces on commercially sexually exploited children;

(r) A representative from the criminal defense bar;

(s) A representative of the center for children and youth justice;

(t) A representative from the office of crime victims advocacy;

(u) The executive director of the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(v) A representative of an organization that provides in-patient chemical dependency treatment to youth, appointed by the attorney general;

(w) A representative of an organization that provides mental health treatment to youth, appointed by the attorney general; and

(x) A survivor of human trafficking, appointed by the attorney general.

(3) The duties of the committee include, but are not limited to:

(a) Overseeing and reviewing the implementation of the Washington state model protocol for commercially sexually exploited children at task force sites;

(b) Receiving reports and data from local and regional entities regarding the incidence of commercially sexually exploited children in their areas as well as data information regarding perpetrators, geographic data and location trends, and any other data deemed relevant;

(c) Receiving reports on local coordinated community response practices and results of the community responses;

(d) Reviewing recommendations from local and regional entities regarding policy and legislative changes that would improve the efficiency and effectiveness of local response practices;

(e) Making recommendations regarding policy and legislative changes that would improve the effectiveness of the state's response to and promote best practices for suppression of the commercial sexual exploitation of children;

(f) Making recommendations regarding data collection useful to understanding or addressing the problem of commercially sexually exploited children;

(g) Reviewing and making recommendations regarding strategic local investments or opportunities for federal and state funding to address the commercial sexual exploitation of children;

(h) Reviewing the extent to which chapter 289, Laws of 2010 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476) is understood and applied by enforcement authorities; and

(i) Researching any barriers that exist to full implementation of chapter 289, Laws of 2010 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6476) throughout the state.

(4) The committee must meet no less than annually.

(5) The committee shall annually report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to any other known statewide committees addressing trafficking or the commercial sex trade.

(6) This section expires June 30, 2023.

Sec. 66. RCW 2.70.090 and 2015 c 117 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the parents for parents program shall be funded through the office of public defense and centrally administered through a pass-through to a Washington state nonprofit-lead organization that has extensive experience supporting child welfare parent mentors.

(2) Through the contract with the lead organization, each local program must be locally administered by the county superior court or a nonprofit organization that shall serve as the host organization.

(3) Local stakeholders representing key child welfare systems shall serve as parents for parents program advisors. Examples of local stakeholders include the ((children's administration)) department of children, youth, and families, the superior court, attorneys for the parents, assistant attorneys general, and court-appointed special advocates or guardians ad litem.

(4) A child welfare parent mentor lead shall provide program coordination and maintain local program information.

(5) The lead organization shall provide ongoing training to the host organizations, statewide program oversight and coordination, and maintain statewide program information.

Sec. 67. RCW 43.216.380 and 2007 c 299 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Minimum licensing requirements under this chapter shall include a prohibition on the use of window blinds or other window coverings with pull cords or inner cords capable of forming a loop and posing a risk of strangulation to young children. Window blinds and other coverings that have been manufactured or properly retrofitted in a manner that eliminates the formation of loops posing a risk of strangulation are not prohibited under this section.

(2) When developing and periodically reviewing minimum licensing requirements related to safety of the premises, the ((director)) secretary shall consult and give serious consideration to publications of the United States consumer product safety commission.

(3) The department may provide information as available regarding reduced cost or no-cost options for retrofitting or replacing unsafe window blinds and window coverings.

Sec. 68. RCW 43.216.165 and 2017 c 178 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The early start account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Revenues in the account shall consist of appropriations by the legislature and all other sources deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes listed in RCW ((43.215.099)) 43.216.080. All receipts from local governments, school districts, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and nonprofit organizations must be deposited into the account.

(2) The department oversees the account. Only the ((director)) secretary or the ((director's)) secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(3) The department shall separately track funds received for each local government, school district, institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or nonprofit organization that deposits funds into the account. Expenditures from these funds may be used only for the purposes listed in RCW ((43.215.099)) 43.216.080 as identified in writing with the department by the contributing local government, school district, institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or nonprofit organization.

Sec. 69. RCW 43.216.270 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 33 s 6 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 206 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early learning services to children, the department may consider the history of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes. No unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider licensed under this chapter.

(2) In order to determine the suitability of individuals newly applying for an agency license, new licensees, their new employees, and other persons who newly have unsupervised access to children in child care, shall be fingerprinted.

(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history record check.

(b)(i) All individuals applying for first-time agency licenses, all new employees, and other persons who have not been previously qualified by the department to have unsupervised access to children in child care must be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal history record check pursuant to this section.

(ii) Persons required to be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal history record check pursuant to this section must pay for the cost of this check as follows: The fee established by the Washington state patrol for the criminal background history check, including the cost of obtaining the fingerprints; and a fee paid to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. The fee paid to the department must be deposited into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.216.273. The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.

(c) The secretary shall use the fingerprint criminal history record check information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for children.

(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such information as they may have and that the secretary may require for such purpose.

(e) No later than July 1, 2013, all agency licensees holding licenses prior to July 1, 2012, persons who were employees before July 1, 2012, and persons who have been qualified by the department before July 1, 2012, to have unsupervised access to children in child care, must submit a new background application to the department. The department must require persons submitting a new background application pursuant to this subsection (2)(e) to pay a fee to the department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable background check clearance registry. This fee must be paid into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW 43.216.273. The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these costs.

(f) The department shall issue a background check clearance card or certificate to the applicant if after the completion of a background check the department concludes the applicant is qualified for unsupervised access to children in child care. The background check clearance card or certificate is valid for three years from the date of issuance. A valid card or certificate must be accepted by a potential employer as proof that the applicant has successfully completed a background check as required under this chapter.

(g) The original applicant for an agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised access to children in child care shall submit a new background check application to the department, on a form and by a date as determined by the department.

(h) The applicant and agency shall maintain on-site for inspection a copy of the background check clearance card or certificate.

(i) Individuals who have been issued a background check clearance card or certificate shall report nonconviction and conviction information to the department within twenty-four hours of the event constituting the nonconviction or conviction information.

(j) The department shall investigate and conduct a redetermination of an applicant's or licensee's background clearance if the department receives a complaint or information from individuals, a law enforcement agency, or other federal, state, or local government agency. Subject to the requirements contained in RCW 43.216.325 and 43.216.327 and based on a determination that an individual lacks the appropriate character, suitability, or competence to provide child care or early learning services to children, the department may: (i) Invalidate the background card or certificate; or (ii) suspend, modify, or revoke any license authorized by this chapter.

(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements of the department of children, youth, and families, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of social and health services, each department shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow these departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. These departments may not share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

(4) Individuals who have completed a fingerprint background check as required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, consistent with RCW 28A.400.303, and have been continuously employed by the same school district or educational service district, can meet the requirements in subsection (2) of this section by providing a true and accurate copy of their Washington state patrol and federal bureau of investigation background check report results to the department or if the school district or the educational service district provides an affidavit to the department that the individual has been authorized to work by the school district or educational service district after completing a record check consistent with RCW 28A.400.303. The department may require that additional background checks be completed that do not require additional fingerprinting and may charge a fee for these additional background checks.

Sec. 70. RCW 43.216.250 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the secretary's duty with regard to licensing under this chapter:

(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to designate categories of child care facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any other factor relevant thereto;

(2)(a) In consultation with the state fire marshal's office, the secretary shall use an interagency process to address health and safety requirements for child care programs that serve school-age children and are operated in buildings that contain public or private schools that safely serve children during times in which school is in session;

(b) Any requirements in (a) of this subsection as they relate to the physical facility, including outdoor playgrounds, do not apply to before-school and after-school programs that serve only school-age children and operate in the same facilities used by public or private schools;

(3) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of parents or guardians, and persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed under this chapter;

(4) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges of each agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure, and other persons having unsupervised access to children in child care;

(5) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided for in RCW 43.216.270 and 43.20A.710, the department of children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person;

(6) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of child care that an agency is authorized to render and the ages and number of children to be served;

(7) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to require regular reports from each licensee;

(8) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements adopted under this chapter;

(9) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at least every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation with affected groups for child ((day)) care requirements; and

(10) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help them improve their methods and facilities for the care and early learning of children.

Sec. 71. RCW 13.34.062 and 2009 c 477 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when child protective services is notified that a child has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or 26.44.056, child protective services shall make reasonable efforts to inform the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been taken into custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their legal rights under this title, including the right to a shelter care hearing, as soon as possible. Notice must be provided in an understandable manner and take into consideration the parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's primary language, level of education, and cultural issues.

(b) In no event shall the notice required by this section be provided to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian more than twenty-four hours after the child has been taken into custody or twenty-four hours after child protective services has been notified that the child has been taken into custody.

(2)(a) The notice of custody and rights may be given by any means reasonably certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited to, written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial notification is provided by a means other than writing, child protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide written notification.

(b) The written notice of custody and rights required by this section shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

Your child has been placed in temporary custody under the supervision of Child Protective Services (or other person or agency). You have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your interests.

1. A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of the time your child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. You should call the court at (insert appropriate phone number here) for specific information about the date, time, and location of the court hearing.

2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. Your right to representation continues after the shelter care hearing. You have the right to records the department intends to rely upon. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk to child protective services and other agencies, tell you about the law, help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain local procedure) .

3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.

4. If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the right to have the decision of the court commissioner reviewed by a superior court judge. To obtain that review, you must, within ten days after the entry of the decision of the court commissioner, file with the court a motion for revision of the decision, as provided in RCW 2.24.050.

You should be present at any shelter care hearing. If you do not come, the judge will not hear what you have to say.

You may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more information about your child. The caseworker's name and telephone number are: (insert name and telephone number) .

5. You have a right to a case conference to develop a written service agreement following the shelter care hearing. The service agreement may not conflict with the court's order of shelter care. You may request that a multidisciplinary team, family group conference, or prognostic staffing be convened for your child's case. You may participate in these processes with your counsel present.

6. If your child is placed in the custody of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or other supervising agency, immediately following the shelter care hearing, the court will enter an order granting the department or other supervising agency the right to inspect and copy all health, medical, mental health, and education records of the child, directing health care providers to release such information without your further consent, and granting the department or supervising agency or its designee the authority and responsibility, where applicable, to:

(1) Notify the child's school that the child is in out-of-home placement;

(2) Enroll the child in school;

(3) Request the school transfer records;

(4) Request and authorize evaluation of special needs;

(5) Attend parent or teacher conferences;

(6) Excuse absences;

(7) Grant permission for extracurricular activities;

(8) Authorize medications which need to be administered during school hours and sign for medical needs that arise during school hours; and

(9) Complete or update school emergency records.

7. If the court decides to place your child in the custody of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or other supervising agency, the department or agency will create a permanency plan for your child, including a primary placement goal and secondary placement goal. The department or agency also will recommend that the court order services for your child and for you, if needed. The department or agency is required to make reasonable efforts to provide you with services to address your parenting problems, and to provide you with visitation with your child according to court orders. Failure to promptly engage in services or to maintain contact with your child may lead to the filing of a petition to terminate your parental rights.

8. Primary and secondary permanency plans are intended to run at the same time so that your child will have a permanent home as quickly as possible. Absent good cause, and when appropriate, the department or other supervising agency must follow the wishes of a natural parent regarding placement of a child. You should tell your lawyer and the court where you wish your child placed immediately, including whether you want your child placed with you, with a relative, or with another suitable person. You also should tell your lawyer and the court what services you feel are necessary and your wishes regarding visitation with your child. Even if you want another parent or person to be the primary placement choice for your child, you should tell your lawyer, the department or other supervising agency, and the court if you want to be a secondary placement option, and you should comply with court orders for services and participate in visitation with your child. Early and consistent involvement in your child's case plan is important for the well-being of your child.

9. A dependency petition begins a judicial process, which, if the court finds your child dependent, could result in substantial restrictions including, the entry or modification of a parenting plan or residential schedule, nonparental custody order or decree, guardianship order, or permanent loss of your parental rights."

Upon receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared by child protective services. If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not sign the receipt, the reason for lack of a signature shall be written on the receipt. The receipt shall be made a part of the court's file in the dependency action.

If after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child protective services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or sent to the last known address of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

(3) If child protective services is not required to give notice under this section, the juvenile court counselor assigned to the matter shall make all reasonable efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian of the time and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be present, and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090.

(4) Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in this section, shall include, at a minimum, investigation of the whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. If such reasonable efforts are not successful, or the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not appear at the shelter care hearing, the petitioner shall testify at the hearing or state in a declaration:

(a) The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to advise, the parent, guardian, or custodian; and

(b) Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made, and how it was made, including the substance of any oral communication or copies of written materials used.

Sec. 72. RCW 13.34.069 and 2013 c 182 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If a child is placed in the custody of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families or other supervising agency, immediately following the shelter care hearing, an order and authorization regarding health care and education records for the child shall be entered. The order shall:

(1) Provide the department or other supervising agency with the right to inspect and copy all health, medical, mental health, and education records of the child;

(2) Authorize and direct any agency, hospital, doctor, nurse, dentist, orthodontist, or other health care provider, therapist, drug or alcohol treatment provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, or mental health clinic, or health or medical records custodian or document management company, or school or school organization to permit the department or other supervising agency to inspect and to obtain copies of any records relating to the child involved in the case, without the further consent of the parent or guardian of the child; ((and))

(3) Identify the person who will serve as the educational liaison; and

(4) Grant the department or other supervising agency or its designee the authority and responsibility, where applicable, to:

(a) Notify the child's school that the child is in out-of-home placement;

(b) Enroll the child in school;

(c) Request the school transfer records;

(d) Request and authorize evaluation of special needs;

(e) Attend parent or teacher conferences;

(f) Excuse absences;

(g) Grant permission for extracurricular activities;

(h) Authorize medications which need to be administered during school hours and sign for medical needs that arise during school hours; and

(i) Complete or update school emergency records.

Access to records under this section is subject to the child's consent where required by other state and federal laws.

Sec. 73. RCW 74.13A.005 and 1985 c 7 s 133 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the policy of this state to enable the secretary to charge fees for certain services to adoptive parents who are able to pay for such services.

It is, however, also the policy of this state that the secretary of the department ((of social and health services)) shall be liberal in waiving, reducing, or deferring payment of any such fee to the end that adoptions shall be encouraged in cases where prospective adoptive parents lack means.

It is the policy of this state to encourage, within the limits of available funds, the adoption of certain hard to place children in order to make it possible for children living in, or likely to be placed in, foster homes or institutions to benefit from the stability and security of permanent homes in which such children can receive continuous parental care, guidance, protection, and love and to reduce the number of such children who must be placed or remain in foster homes or institutions until they become adults.

It is also the policy of this state to try, by means of the program of adoption support authorized in RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080, to reduce the total cost to the state of foster home and institutional care.

Sec. 74. RCW 74.14A.060 and 2016 c 197 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Within available funds, the secretary of the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families shall support blended funding projects for youth. To be eligible for blended funding a child must be eligible for services designed to address a behavioral, mental, emotional, or substance abuse issue from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families and require services from more than one categorical service delivery system. Before any blended funding project is established by the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, any entity or person proposing the project shall seek input from the public health and safety network or networks established in the catchment area of the project. The network or networks shall submit recommendations on the blended funding project to the private-public initiative described in RCW 70.305.020. The private-public initiative shall advise the secretary whether to approve the proposed blended funding project. The network shall review the proposed blended funding project pursuant to its authority to examine the decategorization of program funds under RCW 70.190.110, within the current appropriation level. The department shall document the number of children who participate in blended funding projects, the total blended funding amounts per child, the amount charged to each appropriation by program, and services provided to each child through each blended funding project.

Sec. 75. RCW 13.90.010 and 2017 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of ((social and health services)) children, youth, and families.

(2) "Guardian" means a person who has been appointed by the court as the guardian of a vulnerable youth in a legal proceeding under this chapter. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW for the purpose of assisting the court in supervising the dependency. The term "guardian" does not include a "guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.36 RCW or a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(3) "Juvenile court" or "court" means the juvenile division of the superior court.

(4) "Relative" means a person related to the child in the following ways:

(a) Any parent, or blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;

(b) A stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(c) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;

(d) Spouses of any persons named in (a) through (c) of this subsection (4), even after the marriage is terminated;

(e) Relatives, as described in (a) through (d) of this subsection (4), of any half-sibling of the child.

(5)(a) "Suitable person" means a nonrelative who has completed all required criminal history background checks as specified in (b) of this subsection and otherwise appears to be suitable and competent to provide care for the youth.

(b) The criminal background checks required in (a) of this subsection are those set out in RCW 26.10.135 (1) and (2)(b), but apply only to the guardian and not to other adult members of the household.

(6) "Vulnerable youth" is an individual who has turned eighteen years old, but who is not yet twenty-one years old and who is eligible for classification under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(27)(J). A youth who remains in a vulnerable youth guardianship under this chapter shall not be considered a "child" under any other state statute or for any other purpose. A vulnerable youth is one who is not also a nonminor dependent who is participating in extended foster care services authorized under RCW 74.13.031.

Sec. 76. RCW 43.216.015 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The department of children, youth, and families is created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. The vision for the department is that Washington state's children and youth grow up safe and ((health-[healthy—])) healthy—thriving physically, emotionally, and academically, nurtured by family and community.

(b) The department, in partnership with state and local agencies, tribes, and communities, shall protect children and youth from harm and promote healthy development with effective, high quality prevention, intervention, and early education services delivered in an equitable manner. An important role for the department shall be to provide preventative services to help secure and preserve families in crisis. The department shall partner with the federally recognized Indian tribes to develop effective services for youth and families while respecting the sovereignty of those tribes and the government-to-government relationship. Nothing in chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. alters the duties, requirements, and policies of the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1901 through 1963, as amended, or the Indian child welfare act, chapter 13.38 RCW.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must develop definitions for, work plans to address, and metrics to measure the outcomes for children, youth, and families served by the department and must work with state agencies to ensure services for children, youth, and families are science-based, outcome-driven, data-informed, and collaborative.

(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must establish short and long-term population level outcome measure goals, including metrics regarding reducing disparities by family income, race, and ethnicity in each outcome.

(b) The department must report to the legislature on outcome measures, actions taken, progress toward these goals, and plans for the future year, no less than annually, beginning December 1, 2018.

(c) The outcome measures must include, but are not limited to:

(i) Improving child development and school readiness through voluntary, high quality early learning opportunities as measured by: (A) Increasing the number and proportion of children kindergarten-ready as measured by the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WAKids) assessment including mathematics; (B) increasing the proportion of children in early learning programs that have achieved the level 3 or higher early achievers quality standard; and (C) increasing the available supply of licensed child care in both child care centers and family homes, including providers not receiving state subsidy;

(ii) Preventing child abuse and neglect;

(iii) Improving child and youth safety, permanency, and well-being as measured by: (A) Reducing the number of children entering out-of-home care; (B) reducing a child's length of stay in out-of-home care; (C) reducing maltreatment of youth while in out-of-home care; (D) licensing more foster homes than there are children in foster care; (E) reducing the number of children that reenter out-of-home care within twelve months; (F) increasing the stability of placements for children in out-of-home care; and (G) developing strategies to demonstrate to foster families that their service and involvement is highly valued by the department, as demonstrated by the development of strategies to consult with foster families regarding future placement of a foster child currently placed with a foster family;

(iv) Improving reconciliation of children and youth with their families as measured by: (A) Increasing family reunification; and (B) increasing the number of youth who are reunified with their family of origin;

(v) In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, improving adolescent outcomes including reducing multisystem involvement and homelessness; and increasing school graduation rates and successful transitions to adulthood for youth involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems;

(vi) Reducing future demand for mental health and substance use disorder treatment for youth involved in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems;

(vii) In collaboration with county juvenile justice programs, reducing criminal justice involvement and recidivism as measured by: (A) An increase in the number of youth who successfully complete the terms of diversion or alternative sentencing options; (B) a decrease in the number of youth who commit subsequent crimes; and (C) eliminating the discharge of youth from institutional settings into homelessness; and

(viii) Reducing racial and ethnic disproportionality and disparities in system involvement and across child and youth outcomes in collaboration with other state agencies.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2018, the department must:

(a) Lead ongoing collaborative work to minimize or eliminate systemic barriers to effective, integrated services in collaboration with state agencies serving children, youth, and families;

(b) Identify necessary improvements and updates to statutes relevant to their responsibilities and proposing legislative changes to the governor no less than biennially;

(c) Help create a data-focused environment in which there are aligned outcomes and shared accountability for achieving those outcomes, with shared, real-time data that is accessible to authorized persons interacting with the family, child, or youth to identify what is needed and which services would be effective;

(d) Lead the provision of state services to adolescents, focusing on key transition points for youth, including exiting foster care and institutions, and coordinating with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to address the unique needs of homeless youth; and

(e) Create and annually update a list of the rights and responsibilities of foster parents in partnership with foster parent representatives. The list of foster parent rights and responsibilities must be posted on the department's web site and provided to foster parents in writing at the time of licensure.

(5) The department is accountable to the public. To ensure transparency, beginning December 30, 2018, agency performance data for the services provided by the department, including outcome data for contracted services, must be available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws, federal protections, and individual rights to privacy. Publicly available data must include budget and funding decisions, performance-based contracting data, including data for contracted services, and performance data on metrics identified in this section. The oversight board for children, youth, and families must work with the secretary and director to develop the most effective and cost-efficient ways to make department data available to the public, including making this data readily available on the department's web site.

(6) The department shall ensure that all new and renewed contracts for services are performance-based.

(7) As used in this section, "performance-based contract" means results-oriented contracting that focuses on the quality or outcomes that tie at least a portion of the contractor's payment, contract extensions, or contract renewals to the achievement of specific measurable performance standards and requirements.

(8) The department must execute all new and renewed contracts for services in accordance with this section and consistent with RCW 74.13B.020. When contracted services are managed through a network administrator or other third party, the department must execute data-sharing agreements with the entities managing the contracts to track provider performance measures. Contracts with network administrators or other third parties must provide the contract administrator the ability to shift resources from one provider to another, to evaluate individual provider performance, to add or delete services in consultation with the department, and to reinvest savings from increased efficiencies into new or improved services in their catchment area. Whenever possible, contractor performance data must be made available to the public, consistent with confidentiality laws and individual rights to privacy.

(9)(a) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall begin its work and call the first meeting of the board on or after July 1, 2018. The oversight board shall immediately assume the duties of the legislative children's oversight committee, as provided for in RCW 74.13.570 and assume the full functions of the board as provided for in this section by July 1, 2019. The office of innovation, alignment, and accountability shall provide quarterly updates regarding the implementation of the department of children, youth, and families to the board between July 1, 2018, and July 1, 2019.

(b) The ombuds shall establish the oversight board for children, youth, and families. The board is authorized for the purpose of monitoring and ensuring that the department of children, youth, and families achieves the stated outcomes of chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess., and complies with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to early learning, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and children and family services.

(10)(a) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall consist of two senators and two representatives from the legislature with one member from each major caucus, one nonvoting representative from the governor's office, one subject matter expert in early learning, one subject matter expert in child welfare, one subject matter expert in juvenile rehabilitation and justice, one subject matter expert in reducing disparities in child outcomes by family income and race and ethnicity, one tribal representative from the west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, one tribal representative from the east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, one current or former foster parent representative, one representative of an organization that advocates for the best interest of the child, one parent stakeholder group representative, one law enforcement representative, one child welfare caseworker representative, one early childhood learning program implementation practitioner, and one judicial representative presiding over child welfare court proceedings or other children's matters.

(b) The senate members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the senate. The house of representatives members of the board shall be appointed by the leaders of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year.

(c) The remaining board members shall be nominated by the governor, subject to the approval of the appointed legislators by majority vote, and serve four-year terms.

(11) The oversight board for children, youth, and families has the following powers, which may be exercised by majority vote of the board:

(a) To receive reports of the family and children's ombuds;

(b) To obtain access to all relevant records in the possession of the family and children's ombuds, except as prohibited by law;

(c) To select its officers and adoption of rules for orderly procedure;

(d) To request investigations by the family and children's ombuds of administrative acts;

(e) To request and receive information, outcome data, documents, materials, and records from the department of children, youth, and families relating to children and family welfare, juvenile rehabilitation, juvenile justice, and early learning;

(f) To determine whether the department of children, youth, and families is achieving the performance measures;

(g) If final review is requested by a licensee, to review whether department of children, youth, and families' licensors appropriately and consistently applied agency rules in child care facility licensing compliance agreements as defined in RCW 43.216.395 that do not involve a violation of health and safety standards as defined in RCW 43.216.395 in cases that have already been reviewed by the internal review process described in RCW 43.216.395 with the authority to overturn, change, or uphold such decisions;

(h) To conduct annual reviews of a sample of department of children, youth, and families contracts for services from a variety of program and service areas to ensure that those contracts are performance-based and to assess the measures included in each contract; and

(i) Upon receipt of records or data from the family and children's ombuds or the department of children, youth, and families, the oversight board for children, youth, and families is subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as the family and children's ombuds is under RCW 43.06A.050. The provisions of RCW 43.06A.060 also apply to the oversight board for children, youth, and families.

(12) The oversight board for children, youth, and families has general oversight over the performance and policies of the department and shall provide advice and input to the department and the governor.

(13) The oversight board for children, youth, and families must no less than twice per year convene stakeholder meetings to allow feedback to the board regarding contracting with the department of children, youth, and families, departmental use of local, state, private, and federal funds, and other matters as relating to carrying out the duties of the department.

(14) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall review existing surveys of providers, customers, parent groups, and external services to assess whether the department of children, youth, and families is effectively delivering services, and shall conduct additional surveys as needed to assess whether the department is effectively delivering services.

(15) The oversight board for children, youth, and families is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, except to the extent disclosure of records or information is otherwise confidential under state or federal law.

(16) Records or information received by the oversight board for children, youth, and families is confidential to the extent permitted by state or federal law. This subsection does not create an exception for records covered by RCW 13.50.100.

(17) The oversight board for children, youth, and families members shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while attending meetings of the board when authorized by the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(18) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall select, by majority vote, an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board. The executive director is exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board established in this section.

(19) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall maintain a staff not to exceed one full-time equivalent employee. The board-selected executive director of the board is responsible for coordinating staff appointments.

(20) The oversight board for children, youth, and families shall issue an annual report to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year with an initial report delivered by December 1, 2019. The report must review the department of children, youth, and families' progress towards meeting stated performance measures and desired performance outcomes, and must also include a review of the department's strategic plan, policies, and rules.

(21) As used in this section, "department" means the department of children, youth, and families, "director" means the director of the office of innovation, alignment, and accountability, and "secretary" means the secretary of the department.

(22) The governor must appoint the secretary of the department within thirty days of July 6, 2017.

Sec. 77. RCW 43.06A.030 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

The ombuds shall perform the following duties:

(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of individuals receiving family and children's services, juvenile justice, juvenile rehabilitation, and child early learning, and on the procedures for providing these services;

(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombuds may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;

(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the department of children, youth, and families to carry out its responsibilities in delivering family and children's services with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's health and safety;

(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state institutions serving children, youth, and families, and state-licensed facilities or residences;

(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of children, youth, and families;

(6) Submit annually to the oversight board for children, youth, and families created in RCW 43.216.015 and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing the work of the department of children, youth, and families, including recommendations;

(7) Grant the ((committee)) oversight board for children, youth, and families access to all relevant records in the possession of the ombuds unless prohibited by law; and

(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Sec. 78. RCW 13.50.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For purposes of this chapter:

(a) "Good faith effort to pay" means a juvenile offender has either (i) paid the principal amount in full; (ii) made at least eighty percent of the value of full monthly payments within the period from disposition or deferred disposition until the time the amount of restitution owed is under review; or (iii) can show good cause why he or she paid an amount less than eighty percent of the value of full monthly payments;

(b) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following: Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, detention center, attorney general, the oversight board for children, youth, and families, the office of the family and children's ombuds, the department of social and health services and its contracting agencies, the department of children, youth, and families and its contracting agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight committee created under RCW 72.05.415;

(c) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions, memorandums, briefs, notices of hearing or appearance, service documents, witness and exhibit lists, findings of the court and court orders, agreements, judgments, decrees, notices of appeal, as well as documents prepared by the clerk, including court minutes, letters, warrants, waivers, affidavits, declarations, invoices, and the index to clerk papers;

(d) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the case;

(e) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the records and reports of the probation counselor.

(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately from the official juvenile court file.

(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to maintain accurate records. To this end:

(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information. Any information in records maintained by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;

(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of its records and prevent tampering with them; and

(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies with respect to matters in its files.

(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries concerning records.

(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain confidential.

(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or destroyed.

(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the motion.

(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes. Each person granted permission to inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for research purposes shall present a notarized statement to the court stating that the names of juveniles and parents will remain confidential.

(9) The court shall release to the caseload forecast council the records needed for its research and data-gathering functions. Access to caseload forecast data may be permitted by the council for research purposes only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records or information will be preserved.

(10) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the caseload forecast council upon request. The commission shall not disclose the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records without the named individual's written permission.

(11) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority to compel disclosure shall not apply to the oversight board for children, youth, and families or the office of the family and children's ombuds.

(12) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the research copy is restricted to the administrative office of the courts for research purposes as authorized by the supreme court or by state statute. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy. Data contained in the research copy may be shared with other governmental agencies as authorized by state statute, pursuant to data-sharing and research agreements, and consistent with applicable security and confidentiality requirements. The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.270 and 13.50.100(3).

(13) The court shall release to the Washington state office of public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records.

(14) The court shall release to the Washington state office of civil legal aid records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.53.045. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of civil legal aid. The Washington state office of civil legal aid shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records, and shall, as soon as possible, destroy any retained notes or records obtained under this section that are not necessary for its functions related to RCW 2.53.045.

(15) For purposes of providing for the educational success of youth in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with meeting the educational needs of foster youth to another state agency or state agency's contracted provider responsible under state law or contract for assisting foster youth to attain educational success. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.

(16) For the purpose of ensuring the safety and welfare of the youth who are in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose to the department of commerce and its contracted providers responsible under state law or contract for providing services to youth, only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to ensuring the safety and welfare of the youth who are in foster care who are admitted to crisis residential centers or HOPE centers under contract with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection. Records disclosed under this subsection retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and may not be further disclosed except as permitted by this chapter and federal law.

(17) For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health and well-being of children in foster care to the department of social and health services, the health care authority, or their contracting agencies. For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and to provide for the coordination of health care and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of social and health services and the health care authority may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care to the department of children, youth, and families, or its contracting agencies. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.

Sec. 79. RCW 74.14B.010 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Caseworkers employed in children services shall meet minimum standards established by the department. Comprehensive training for caseworkers shall be completed before such caseworkers are assigned to case-carrying responsibilities without direct supervision. Intermittent, part-time, and standby workers shall be subject to the same minimum standards and training.

(2) Ongoing specialized training shall be provided for persons responsible for investigating child sexual abuse. Training participants shall have the opportunity to practice interview skills and receive feedback from instructors.

(3) The department, the criminal justice training commission, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys shall design and implement statewide training that contains consistent elements for persons engaged in the interviewing of children, including law enforcement, prosecution, and child protective services.

(4) The training shall: (a) Be based on research-based practices and standards; (b) minimize the trauma of all persons who are interviewed during abuse investigations; (c) provide methods of reducing the number of investigative interviews necessary whenever possible; (d) assure, to the extent possible, that investigative interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; (e) recognize needs of special populations, such as persons with developmental disabilities; (f) recognize the nature and consequences of victimization; (g) require investigative interviews to be conducted in a manner most likely to permit the interviewed persons the maximum emotional comfort under the circumstances; (h) address record retention and retrieval; and (i) documentation of investigative interviews.

(5) The identification of domestic violence is critical in ensuring the safety of children in the child welfare system. As a result, ongoing domestic violence training and consultation shall be provided to caseworkers, including how to use the ((children's administration's)) department's practice guide to domestic violence.

Sec. 80. RCW 43.216.906 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 803 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services pertaining to child welfare services under chapters 13.32A, 13.34, 13.36, 13.38, 13.50, 13.60, 13.64, 26.33, 26.44, 74.13, 74.13A, 74.14B, 74.14C, and 74.15 RCW are transferred to the department of children, youth, and families. All references to the secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department of children, youth, and families when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of children, youth, and families. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the department of children, youth, and families. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the department of children, youth, and families.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall, on July 1, 2018, be transferred and credited to the department of children, youth, and families.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, duties, and functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and families. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of children, youth, and families to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of children, youth, and families. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2018.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7)(a) The portions of any bargaining units of employees at the department of social and health services existing on July 1, 2018, that are transferred to the department of children, youth, and families shall be considered separate appropriate units within the department of children, youth, and families unless and until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the portions of the bargaining units of employees at the department of social and health services existing on July 1, 2018, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

(b) The public employment relations commission may review the appropriateness of the collective bargaining units that are a result of the transfer from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. The employer or the exclusive bargaining representative may petition the public employment relations commission to review the bargaining units in accordance with this section.

Sec. 81. RCW 43.216.905 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of early learning is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the department of children, youth, and families. All references to the ((secretary)) director or the department of early learning in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or the department of children, youth, and families.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of early learning shall be delivered to the custody of the department of children, youth, and families. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of early learning shall be made available to the department of children, youth, and families. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of early learning shall be assigned to the department of children, youth, and families.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of early learning shall, on July 1, 2018, be transferred and credited to the department of children, youth, and families.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of early learning are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and families. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of children, youth, and families to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of early learning shall be continued and acted upon by the department of children, youth, and families. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of early learning shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2018.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7)(a) The bargaining units of employees at the department of early learning existing on July 1, 2018, that are transferred to the department of children, youth, and families shall be considered separate appropriate units within the department of children, youth, and families unless and until modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. The exclusive bargaining representatives recognized as representing the bargaining units of employees at the department of early learning existing on July 1, 2018, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representatives of the transferred bargaining units without the necessity of an election.

(b) The public employment relations commission may review the appropriateness of the collective bargaining units that are a result of the transfer from the department of early learning to the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. The employer or the exclusive bargaining representative may petition the public employment relations commission to review the bargaining units in accordance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 82. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---