BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) In any transaction for the sale of a horse, the seller shall include on a bill of sale, a list of any medications prescribed and given to the horse during the previous one hundred eighty days from the date of the sale of the horse. Additionally, the seller shall include on a bill of sale a list of any medications prescribed or given to the horse at any point since the seller has owned the horse that would cause the horse to be permanently excluded from being suitable for human consumption in this country.

(b) These statements on the bill of sale must be made under the penalties of perjury and the bill of sale must state that these statements are made under the penalty of perjury. The making or subscribing of any bill of sale containing any false or misleading information may be prosecuted and punished under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

(2)(a) In any transaction for the sale of a horse, the buyer shall include on a bill of sale whether the horse is being sold for slaughter and if the horse will be slaughtered in a country that allows horse meat to be used for human consumption.

(b) This statement on the bill of sale must be made under the penalties of perjury and the bill of sale must state that the statement is made under the penalty of perjury. The making or subscribing of any bill of sale containing any false or misleading information may be prosecuted and punished under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

--- END ---