BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:

A provision of an employment contract or agreement is against public policy and is void and unenforceable if it requires an employee to waive the employee's right to publicly pursue a cause of action arising under chapter 49.60 RCW or federal antidiscrimination laws or to publicly file a complaint with the appropriate state or federal agencies, or if it requires a dispute resolution process that is confidential.

--- END ---