BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must provide notice and hold a public hearing prior to department personnel transferring, relocating, or introducing any wildlife into a different location in the state.

(2)(a) The notice of the public hearing must be made at least thirty days prior to the date of the hearing. The notice must state the public hearing date, time, and location, and provide a brief explanation of the department's proposed action. The brief explanation must include the species of wildlife, the estimated number of animals, the general location where the wildlife will be released, and the potential range the wildlife is likely to roam.

(b) A press release of the notice of the public hearing must be sent to media outlets providing news services to the communities that are likely to be impacted by the wildlife's presence. The notice of the public hearing must be posted on the department's web site, and if possible, posted on a web site of the community or local government near where the wildlife will be transferred, relocated, or introduced; and be provided in writing to the town, city, or county legislative members and the mayor or county executive of any location that is likely to be impacted by the presence of the wildlife.

(3) The public hearing must be open to the public and held within the community likely to be impacted by the presence of the transferred, relocated, or introduced wildlife. A member of the public may not be required to register his or her name or other information as a condition to his or her attendance at the public hearing. The presiding official or department personnel must present an oral and visual presentation, to the extent practicable, explaining the department's proposed actions and related management of the wildlife, which must be based on the best available peer-reviewed science, in sufficient detail to provide a reasonable understanding of the reasons for and potential impacts of the action and presence of the wildlife in or near the community. The hearing must be conducted by the presiding official to afford interested persons the opportunity to present comment individually in the presence and hearing of other attendees. Written or electronic submissions may be accepted and included in the agency's hearing record.

(4) The requirements of this section do not apply: To activities occurring at existing hatcheries; for purposes of the relocation of beavers; or for removal of an animal from urban or residential areas to habitat areas that contain the same species of animal.

--- END ---