BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that certain maintenance and repair work that is common but unpredictable in its timing and scope can sometimes be overly burdensome to procure through a competitive bid process. It is an efficient mechanism to maintain essential services to port customers, often on short notice or in emergency situations to allow port districts to contract without calling for bids when public works do not exceed forty thousand dollars.

(2) The legislature also finds that the necessary work continues to be performed safely and at a competitive rate by responsible contractors, and also saves public money because of additional costs that would be incurred by bidding each contract separately.

Sec. 2. RCW 53.08.120 and 2009 c 74 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All material and work required by a port district not meeting the definition of public work in RCW 39.04.010(4) may be procured in the open market or by contract and all work ordered may be done by contract or day labor.

(2)(a) All such contracts for work meeting the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4), the estimated cost of which exceeds three hundred thousand dollars, shall be awarded using a competitive bid process. The contract must be awarded at public bidding upon notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, calling for bids upon the work, plans and specifications for which shall then be on file in the office of the commission for public inspection. The same notice may call for bids on such work or material based upon plans and specifications submitted by the bidder. The competitive bidding requirements for purchases or public works may be waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

(b) For all contracts related to work meeting the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4) that are estimated at three hundred thousand dollars or less, a port district may let contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155 in lieu of advertising for bids. Whenever possible, the managing official shall invite at least one proposal from a minority contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

When awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals from the small works roster, the managing official shall give weight to the contractor submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it would not violate the public interest, such contracts shall be distributed equally among contractors, including minority contractors, on the small works roster.

(c) Any port district may construct any public work, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, by contract without calling for bids whenever the estimated cost of the work or improvement, including cost of materials, supplies, and equipment, will not exceed the sum of forty thousand dollars. A "public works project" means a complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to avoid calling for bids. The port district managing official shall make his or her best effort to reach out to qualified contractors, including certified minority and woman-owned contractors.

--- END ---