BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of two percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(2) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.32.489 or 41.32.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of two percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed sixty-two dollars and fifty cents.

(2) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.40.1984.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---