BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.98 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the healthy energy workers task force is established. The purpose of the healthy energy workers task force is to review the information generated through the presumption of occupational disease for department of energy Hanford site workers and to develop recommendations for successfully diagnosing and treating diseases or other health problems experienced by workers, including contractors and subcontractors, who have performed work for the United States at the Hanford site.

(2) The University of Washington, through the center of excellence for chemically related illness at Harborview medical center, and the department of labor and industries, shall provide administrative support to the healthy energy workers task force, including making arrangements for the inaugural meeting of the task force and subsequent meetings of the task force.

(3) The healthy energy workers task force is composed of the following members, who must be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate in accordance with RCW 43.06.092:

(a) An individual representing the United States department of energy Richland operations office;

(b) An individual representing plumbers and steamfitters local union 598;

(c) The director of the department of labor and industries, or the director's designee;

(d) The secretary of the Washington state department of health, or the secretary's designee;

(e) An individual representing an organization that contracts to perform work for the United States at the Hanford site;

(f) An individual representing a labor union in Washington other than the member appointed under (b) of this subsection; and

(g) An individual representing the Harborview medical center.

(4) Members are appointed for a term of four years and may be reappointed.

(5) In addition to the members appointed to the healthy energy workers task force under subsection (3) of this section, medical professionals employed by the University of Washington or Harborview medical center may be invited by the director of the department of labor and industries, in consultation with the University of Washington or Harborview medical center, to participate in an advisory capacity in meetings of the healthy energy workers task force. Individuals participating in an advisory capacity under this subsection are not members of the task force and are not subject to the appointment process established in this section. There is no limit to the number of individuals who may participate in healthy energy workers task force meetings in an advisory capacity under this subsection.

(6) The healthy energy workers task force shall hold its inaugural meeting by October 1, 2018. The task force may hold subsequent meetings at its discretion, but must meet at least two times per year.

(7) The healthy energy workers task force shall focus on the following subjects:

(a) An analysis of data as it pertains to the participation and effectiveness of any presumption of occupational disease policy for department of energy workers at the Hanford site;

(b) Research and development of protocols for diagnosing diseases or other health problems that may be the result of exposure to hazardous substances or other dangerous conditions at the Hanford site;

(c) Research and development of patient monitoring or surveillance strategies that will result in the collection of data regarding long-term outcomes for workers who have been treated for diseases or other health problems that may be linked to working at the Hanford site;

(d) Surveying data and information from other states and countries that may be helpful to developing strategies for diagnosing and treating diseases or other health problems that may be linked to working at the Hanford site; and

(e) Discussing and making recommendations regarding public health programs that may be developed at the state level to benefit workers who have worked, or are working, at the Hanford site.

(8) The healthy energy workers task force shall provide a report to the legislature by December 1st each year beginning in 2019 documenting the activities of the task force and reporting on the subjects listed in subsection (7) of this section. The department of labor and industries may provide staff support to the task force for the purpose of authoring the report and transmitting it to the legislature. Any member of the task force may provide a minority report as an appendix to the report submitted to the legislature under this section.

--- END ---