BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 78.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Until December 31, 2028, a moratorium is imposed on the use of hydraulic fracturing in the exploration for and production of oil and natural gas.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "hydraulic fracturing" means the process of pumping a fluid into or under the surface of the ground in order to create fractures in rock for the purpose of the production or recovery of oil or natural gas.

--- END ---