BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.140.130 and 2005 c 339 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each original and renewal certificate, license, or registration issued under this chapter shall expire on the applicant's second birthday following issuance of the certificate, license, or registration.

(2) To be renewed as a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser or state-registered appraiser trainee, the holder of a valid certificate, license, or registration shall apply and pay the prescribed fee to the director no earlier than one hundred twenty days prior to the expiration date of the certificate, license, or registration and shall demonstrate satisfaction of any continuing education requirements.

(3) If a person fails to renew a certificate, license, or registration prior to its expiration and no more than one year has passed since the person last held a valid certificate, license, or registration, the person may obtain a renewal certificate, license, or registration by satisfying all of the requirements for renewal and paying late renewal fees.

((The director shall cancel the certificate, license, or registration of any person whose renewal fee is not received within one year from the date of expiration. A person may obtain a new certificate, license, or registration by satisfying the procedures and qualifications for initial certification, licensure, or registration, including the successful completion of any applicable examinations.))

(4)(a) If a person's certificate, license, or registration is not renewed within one year after the expiration date of the certificate, license, or registration, the director must place the certificate, license, or registration in inactive status.

(b) A person whose certificate, license, or registration is placed in inactive status may apply for reinstatement of the certificate, license, or registration by paying the prescribed fee and meeting the requirements established by the director. The director may require reinstatement applicants to pass an appropriate examination and to complete continuing education requirements in order for the certificate, license, or registration to be reinstated. If the director requires a work experience log to qualify for reinstatement, the director may accept previously approved work experience to satisfy the requirement.

(c) A person applying for reinstatement as a state-certified general real estate appraiser, a state-certified residential real estate appraiser, or a state-licensed real estate appraiser may apply to work as a state-registered appraiser trainee for a supervisory appraiser, subject to the requirements established by the director, while completing the requirements for reinstatement.

(d) The director must cancel a certificate, license, or registration that is not renewed or reinstated within five years after the date of expiration of the certificate, license, or registration.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.140.060 and 2005 c 339 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Applications for examinations, original certification, licensure, or registration, ((and)) renewal certification, licensure, or registration ((shall)), and the reinstatement of a certificate, license, or registration must be made in writing to the department on forms approved by the director. Applications for original and renewal certification, licensure, or registration ((shall)) or the reinstatement of a certificate, license, or registration must include a statement confirming that the applicant ((shall)) must comply with applicable rules and regulations and that the applicant understands the penalties for misconduct.

(2) The appropriate fees ((shall)) must accompany all applications for examination, reexamination, original certification, licensure, or registration, ((and)) renewal certification, licensure, or registration, and the reinstatement of a certificate, license, or registration.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.140.160 and 2007 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action for the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) Failing to meet the minimum qualifications for state certification, licensure, or registration established by or pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Paying money other than the fees provided for by this chapter to any employee of the director or the commission to procure state certification, licensure, or registration under this chapter;

(3) Continuing to act as a state-certified real estate appraiser, state-licensed real estate appraiser, or state-registered appraiser trainee when his or her certificate, license, or registration is on an expired or inactive status;

(4) Violating any provision of this chapter or any lawful rule made by the director pursuant thereto;

(5) Issuing an appraisal report on any real property in which the appraiser has an interest unless his or her interest is clearly stated in the appraisal report;

(6) Being affiliated as an employer, independent contractor, or supervisory appraiser of a state-certified real estate appraiser, state-licensed real estate appraiser, or state-registered appraiser trainee whose certification, license, or registration is currently in a suspended or revoked status;

(7) Failure or refusal without good cause to exercise reasonable diligence in performing an appraisal practice under this chapter, including preparing an oral or written report to communicate information concerning an appraisal practice; and

(8) Negligence or incompetence in performing an appraisal practice under this chapter, including preparing an oral or written report to communicate information concerning an appraisal practice.

--- END ---