BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.837 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 225 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in order to determine the character, competence, and suitability of any applicant or service provider to have unsupervised access, the secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at any time, but shall require a fingerprint-based background check when the applicant or service provider has resided in the state less than three consecutive years before application, and:

(a) Is an applicant or service provider providing services to children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) Is an individual residing in an applicant or service provider's home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or

(c) Is an applicant or service provider providing in-home services funded by:

(i) Medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(ii) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(iii) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110; or

(iv) Other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services.

(2) Long-term care workers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, who are hired after January 7, 2012, are subject to background checks under RCW 74.39A.056.

(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided for in RCW 43.216.270 and 43.20A.710, the department of children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services shall share federal fingerprint-based background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

(4) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall require a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation when the department seeks to approve an applicant or service provider for a foster or adoptive placement of children in accordance with federal and state law. Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the department of children, youth, and families for applicant and service providers providing foster care as required in RCW 74.15.030.

(5) Any secure facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 71.09 RCW shall require applicants and service providers to undergo a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation.

(6) Service providers and service provider applicants who are required to complete a fingerprint-based background check may be hired for a one hundred twenty-day provisional period as allowed under law or program rules when:

(a) A fingerprint-based background check is pending; and

(b) The applicant or service provider is not disqualified based on the immediate result of the background check.

(7) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the applicable department for applicants or service providers providing:

(a) Services to people with a developmental disability under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) In-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(c) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(d) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110;

(e) Services under other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families; and

(f) Services in, or to residents of, a secure facility under RCW 71.09.115.

(8) Service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 must pay fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for conducting fingerprint-based background checks.

(9) Department of children, youth, and families service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 may not pass on the cost of the background check fees to their applicants unless the individual is determined to be disqualified due to the background information.

(10) The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall develop rules identifying the financial responsibility of service providers, applicants, and the department for paying the fees charged by law enforcement to roll, print, or scan fingerprints-based for the purpose of a Washington state patrol or federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based background check.

(11) In order to determine the character, competence, and suitability of an applicant or service provider to have unsupervised access, the director of the state health care authority shall require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at any time when services are to be provided under the nonemergency medical transportation program.

(12) For purposes of this section, unless the context plainly indicates otherwise:

(a) "Applicant" means a current or prospective department of social and health services, department of children, youth, and families, state health care authority, or service provider employee, volunteer, student, intern, researcher, contractor, or any other individual who will or may have unsupervised access because of the nature of the work or services he or she provides. "Applicant" includes but is not limited to any individual who will or may have unsupervised access and is:

(i) Applying for a license or certification from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) Seeking a contract with the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, or a service provider;

(iii) Applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or transfer;

(iv) An individual that a department of social and health services or ((the)) department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client chooses to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered; or

(v) A department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families applicant who will or may work in a department-covered position.

(b) "Authorized" means the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families grants an applicant, home, or facility permission to:

(i) Conduct licensing, certification, or contracting activities;

(ii) Have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, juveniles, and children;

(iii) Receive payments from a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families program; or

(iv) Work or serve in a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families-covered position.

(c) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(d) "Secure facility" has the meaning provided in RCW 71.09.020.

(e) "Service provider" means entities, facilities, agencies, businesses, or individuals who are licensed, certified, authorized, or regulated by, receive payment from, or have contracts or agreements with the department of social and health services ((or)), the department of children, youth, and families, or the state health care authority to provide services to vulnerable adults, juveniles, or children. "Service provider" includes individuals whom a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client may choose to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered. "Service provider" does not include those certified under chapter 70.96A RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.43.838 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 226 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After January 1, 1988, and notwithstanding any provision of RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol shall furnish a transcript of the conviction record pertaining to any person for whom the state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has a record upon the written request of:

(a) The subject of the inquiry;

(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting evaluations under RCW 43.43.832;

(c) The department of social and health services;

(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the office of the attorney general;

(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter 18.51, 18.20, or 72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or license a facility which handles vulnerable adults; ((or))

(f) The department of children, youth, and families for the purpose of meeting responsibilities in chapters 43.216 and 74.15 RCW. However, access to conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(f) does not limit or restrict the ability of (([the])) the department of children, youth, and families to obtain additional information regarding conviction records and pending charges as provided in RCW 74.15.030(2)(b); or

(g) The state health care authority for the purpose of protecting the vulnerable population served by the nonemergency medical transportation program.

(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees for disseminating records under this section to recipients identified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section. The state patrol shall also by rule establish fees for disseminating records in the custody of the national crime information center. The revenue from the fees shall cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state patrol of disseminating the records. No fee shall be charged to a nonprofit organization for the records check. Record checks requested by school districts and educational service districts using only name and date of birth will be provided free of charge.

(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 or 43.43.760.

(4) Before July 26, 1987, the state patrol shall adopt rules and forms to implement this section and to provide for security and privacy of information disseminated under this section, giving first priority to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter. The rules may include requirements for users, audits of users, and other procedures to prevent use of civil adjudication record information or criminal history record information inconsistent with this chapter.

(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in chapter 9.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---