BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 16.36.140 and 2011 c 204 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person to bring an animal into Washington state without first securing a certificate of veterinary inspection, reviewed by the state veterinarian of the state of origin, verifying that the animal meets Washington state animal health requirements. This subsection does not apply to animals that:

(a) Have been exempted by the director by rule; or

(b) Will be delivered within twelve hours after entry into Washington state to:

(i) ((An approved, inspected feed lot for slaughter;

(ii))) A federally inspected slaughter plant; or

(((iii))) (ii) A licensed public livestock market for sale and subsequent delivery within twelve hours to((:

(A) An approved, inspected feed lot for slaughter; or

(B))) a federally inspected slaughter plant.

(2) The director may monitor animals entering Washington state. Persons importing, transporting, receiving, feeding, or housing imported animals shall:

(a) Comply with the requirement and any exemptions specified in subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) Make the animal and related records available for inspection by the director.

(3) The director may adopt and enforce rules necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this section.

--- END ---