BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.12.453 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may issue permits to members of the Wanapum band of Indians to take salmon and other freshwater food fish for ceremonial and subsistence purposes. The department shall establish the areas in which the permits are valid and shall regulate the times for and manner of taking the salmon and other freshwater food fish. This section does not create a right to fish commercially.

--- END ---