BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In addition to a recreational license required under this chapter, a steelhead endorsement is required in order to fish recreationally for steelhead statewide.

(2) No endorsement is required in the following circumstances:

(a) For a person fishing in an area where the Columbia river salmon and steelhead endorsement is required under RCW 77.32.580; or

(b) For a person under the age where a youth fishing license is required.

(3) The cost for each endorsement is five dollars. The department shall deposit all receipts from endorsement purchases into the statewide recreational steelhead endorsement account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

The statewide recreational steelhead endorsement account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the endorsement established in section 1 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the enforcement of recreational steelhead fisheries. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---