BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that research continues to demonstrate the efficacy of the state's early childhood education and assistance program, known as ECEAP. Studies in Washington and from other states show that ECEAP prepares children for kindergarten success and has significant positive impacts on third, fourth, and fifth grade test scores. The legislature also finds that in some areas of the state, expanding ECEAP has proven challenging because there are too few eligible children to form an ECEAP classroom. The result is that children who are income eligible and the furthest from opportunity remain unserved. The legislature finds further that in other ECEAP classrooms, funded seats remain empty because providers do not have sufficient flexibility to serve families in need who are slightly over income but often have similar risk factors. The legislature intends, therefore, to provide more flexibility in determining eligibility for ECEAP in order to maximize the state's investment and assure that program funding is deployed to serve the greatest number of children and families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall adopt rules that allow the inclusion of children in the early childhood education and assistance program whose family income is above one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty level if the number of such children equals not more than twenty-five percent of total statewide enrollment.

(2) Children included in the early childhood education and assistance program under this section must be homeless or impacted by specific developmental or environmental risk factors that are linked by research to school performance. "Homeless" means without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, P.L. 100–77, July 22, 1987, 101 Stat. 482, and runaway and homeless youth act, P.L. 93–415, Title III, September 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1129.

(3) Children included in the early childhood education and assistance program under this section are not to be considered eligible children as defined in RCW 43.216.505 and are not considered to be part of the state-funded entitlement required in RCW 43.216.556.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.555 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, an early learning program to provide voluntary preschool opportunities for children three and four years of age shall be implemented according to the funding and implementation plan in RCW ((43.215.456)) 43.216.556. The program must offer a comprehensive program of early childhood education and family support, including parental involvement and health information, screening, and referral services, based on family need. Participation in the program is voluntary. On a space available basis, the program may allow enrollment of children included in the early childhood education and assistance program under section 2 of this act and may allow enrollment of children who are not otherwise eligible by assessing a fee.

(2) The program shall be implemented by utilizing the program standards and eligibility criteria in the early childhood education and assistance program in RCW ((43.215.400)) 43.216.500 through ((43.215.450)) 43.216.550.

(3)(a) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, the program implementation in this section shall prioritize early childhood education and assistance programs located in low-income neighborhoods within high-need geographical areas.

(b) Following the priority in (a) of this subsection, preference shall be given to programs meeting at least one of the following characteristics:

(i) Programs offering an extended day program for early care and education;

(ii) Programs offering services to children diagnosed with a special need; or

(iii) Programs offering services to children involved in the child welfare system.

(4) The ((director)) secretary shall adopt rules for the following program components, as appropriate and necessary during the phased implementation of the program, consistent with early achievers program standards established in RCW ((43.215.100)) 43.216.085:

(a) Minimum program standards;

(b) Approval of program providers; and

(c) Accountability and adherence to performance standards.

(5) The department has administrative responsibility for:

(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules developed by the ((director)) secretary under this section;

(b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible children;

(c) Assuring that program providers work cooperatively with school districts to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported; and

(d) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---