BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the superintendent of public instruction must convene a work group to update the environmental and sustainability literacy plan in existence on the effective date of this section and develop grade appropriate model lessons that connect to adopted state standards.

(1) The work group must:

(a) Include representatives from a variety of sectors, including but not limited to teachers, agencies, environmental groups, and business representatives;

(b) Convene at least three but no more than five times;

(c) Update the environmental and sustainability literacy plan by August 1, 2019; and

(d) Recommend next steps to be taken by the legislature to successfully implement the environmental and sustainability literacy plan on a statewide basis.

(2) If Senate Bill No. 6201 is enacted into law, the model lessons developed by the work group shall be placed in the open courseware repository identified under RCW 28A.300.803.

--- END ---