BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.380 and 2016 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There is a retailer's license to be designated as a special occasion license to be issued to a not-for-profit society or organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such as at picnics or other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee sixty dollars per day.

(1) The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales of no more than twelve calendar days per year. For the purposes of this subsection, special occasion licensees that are (("))agricultural "area fairs," ((or "agricultural))" county((,)) and district((, and area)) fairs," or "community fairs," as defined by RCW 15.76.120, that receive a special occasion license may, once per calendar year, count as one event fairs that last multiple days, so long as alcohol sales are at set dates, times, and locations, and the board receives prior notification of the dates, times, and locations. The special occasion license applicant will pay the sixty dollars per day for this event.

(2) The licensee may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine in original, unopened containers for off-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.

(3) In addition to offering the sale of wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption, the licensee may sell wine in original, unopened containers for on-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.

(4)(a) Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to be confined to specified premises or designated areas only.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection (4), the specified premises or designated areas for certain special events that have a special occasion license, with a fairgrounds endorsement, and are held on the fairgrounds of agricultural "area fairs," "county and district fairs," or "community fairs" includes the entire fair venue, or a designated area of the venue, if:

(i) The fairgrounds or designated area being used for the special event are enclosed by fencing;

(ii) Access is controlled;

(iii) The special event primarily caters to adult patrons, and may not include such events as state fairs or agricultural fairs as defined in RCW 15.76.120; and

(iv) The licensee has applied for and received a fairgrounds endorsement that allows the licensee to use the entire venue or a designated portion of the venue for the consumption of alcohol.

(d) This subsection (4) does not limit any existing right or benefit currently authorized or provided to special events or special occasion license holders.

(e) The liquor and cannabis board must adopt rules setting the criteria and conditions that must be met in order to issue a fairgrounds endorsement authorized under (b) of this subsection.

(5) Liquor sold under this special occasion license must be purchased from a licensee of the board.

(6) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction having a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars as provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---