BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, from the connecting Washington account—state funds and is provided solely for the department of transportation to complete an interchange justification report (IJR) and begin environmental review for an I-5/Exit 274 interchange project in Blaine based on the project concept agreed upon during community outreach workshops conducted for the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. It is the intent of the legislature that an I-5/Exit 274 interchange project in Blaine be further funded with $11,100,000 of connecting Washington account—state funds in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and be changed accordingly on the applicable LEAP transportation documents referenced in the omnibus transportation appropriations act. This project would create a new southbound off-ramp on Interstate 5 at exit 274 onto Peace Portal drive and create grade separation in the vicinity of the off-ramp near Bell road and Peace Portal drive. It is the further intent of the legislature that for the I-5/Exit 274 interchange project, the department of transportation shall actively pursue $12,900,000 in additional funds to pay for the remainder of the project's estimated cost. The department shall pursue all relevant funding options including, but not limited to, grants from the federal highway administration and the freight mobility strategic investment board, and matching funds from local governments or private businesses.

--- END ---