BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the other provisions of this title, mental health services available to an injured worker under RCW 51.36.010 include mental health therapy and evaluation. Mental health services for injured workers are limited to those provided by psychiatrists, clinical Ph.D. or Psy.D. psychologists, and psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners as licensed under the respective provisions of chapters 18.71, 18.79, and 18.83 RCW, and mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW. These mental health professionals are authorized to provide treatment and opinions, within the scope of their practice, on all benefits as provided under this title, including but not limited to RCW 51.32.060, 51.32.080, 51.32.090, and 51.36.010.

--- END ---