BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 64.06 RCW to read as follows:

A seller of residential real property shall make available to the buyer the following statement: "This notice is to inform you that if the real property you are considering for purchase utilizes an oil tank for heating purposes, no cost insurance may be available from the pollution liability insurance agency."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---