BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the office of juvenile justice or its successor agency, in consultation with the Washington state center for court research, must conduct a pilot program to address the shortage of available secure crisis residential centers in the state as alternatives to juvenile detention and the ability of community truancy boards under chapter 28A.225 RCW to provide services to prevent nonoffender youth from entering the juvenile court system.

(2) The pilot program must include three counties, two on the western side of the Cascade mountain range and one on the eastern side of the Cascade mountain range. Preferred counties to be selected:

(a) Must have, according to the detention report provided by the Washington state center for court research in response to chapter 205, Laws of 2016, the highest percentage use of detention for nonoffender matters;

(b) Must have a high propensity to use a valid court order for detention purposes;

(c) Must have not implemented juvenile detention alternatives initiative strategies as part of its juvenile court system; and

(d) Do not have secure crisis residential centers that are accessible or available.

(3)(a) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs must allocate funds to the selected counties to be used to site secure crisis residential centers that meet therapeutic standards in order to make these centers more accessible and available.

(b)(i) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must allocate funds to community truancy boards in the selected counties to provide families with evidence-based services and treatments, including functional family therapy, when possible.

(ii) The office of juvenile justice, or its successor agency, must allocate funds to community truancy boards in the selected counties to provide families with case management services, including the use of juvenile detention alternatives initiative strategies, when possible. Any funds appropriated or distributed pursuant to this subsection (3)(b)(ii) must not affect or impact those funds appropriated to counties implementing juvenile detention alternatives initiative strategies as of the effective date of this section.

(iii) A community truancy board may provide the services described under (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection directly or contract out for such services as appropriate.

(4) The pilot program expires July 1, 2020.

(5) By January 1, 2021, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the office of juvenile justice or its successor agency, in consultation with the Washington state center for court research, must submit a joint report to the legislature that includes: The number of youth placed in secure crisis residential centers; the number of youth and families that received evidence-based practices or case management services, or both; and any legislative recommendations.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2018, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---