BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The apprenticeship council under chapter 49.04 RCW and the workforce training and education coordinating board under RCW 28C.18.020 shall develop a strategic plan focused on apprenticeship. In consultation with the governor's office, the department of labor and industries, the apprenticeship council and the workforce training and education coordinating board shall collaborate with the state board for community and technical colleges, the employment security department, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to:

(a) Review existing registered apprenticeship programs;

(b) Analyze opportunities to statewide expansion of registered apprenticeship programs and preapprenticeship programs; and

(c) Recommend policies to implement strategies that increase registered youth and adult apprenticeships.

(2) The apprenticeship council and the workforce training and education coordinating board shall consult individuals from the public and private sectors with expertise in apprenticeships, including representatives of labor unions, professional technical organizations, and business and industry in the development of their recommendations.

(3) The apprenticeship work group is established to review the work being done under subsection (1) of this section by the governor's office concerning students' preparation for pathways towards a living wage, to study policy recommendations, and to advise the legislature on a future statewide cross-sector registered apprenticeship system.

(a) The work group shall consist of the following members:

(i) The chair and ranking members of the senate higher education and workforce development committee;

(ii) The chair and ranking members of the house of representatives higher education committee;

(iii) The chair and ranking members of the senate labor and commerce committee;

(iv) The chair and ranking members of the house of representatives labor and workplace standards committee;

(v) One representative from each of the agencies collaborating in subsection (1) of this section;

(vi) Two representatives from the governor's office;

(vii) Six business representatives from different industry sectors; and

(viii) Two representatives with subject matter expertise in apprenticeship models.

(b) The work group shall choose two cochairs, one from among its business membership and one representative from state government.

(c) Legislative members of the work group are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(d) The work group shall meet at least three times before October 15, 2018.

(4) The work group shall consolidate its findings and recommendations into one report delivered to the governor and the higher education and labor committees of the legislature by October 15, 2018.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to appropriations, the department of labor and industries shall, through the supervisor of apprenticeship, employ a coordinator to do outreach to the private sector and assist industries in establishing registered apprenticeship and training programs where they do not exist. Outreach to the private sector should include but not be limited to employers and employee organizations within the technology, agriculture, aerospace, and outdoor recreation manufacturing industries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The complete Washington program is created for the purpose of connecting prior learning, including registered apprenticeships and other skills-based work experience, with postsecondary degree completion. The program will be coordinated by the office of the lieutenant governor, in consultation with the Washington student achievement council and the academic credit for prior learning work group in RCW 28B.77.230. The program shall work to expand postsecondary degree pathways that recognize prior learning in the form of registered apprenticeship programs.

(2) Moneys deposited into the student achievement council fund for innovation and quality established in RCW 28B.120.040 may be spent by the student achievement council for the purposes of incentive grants to organizations consistent with the overall goals of the complete Washington program and consistent with the guidelines established by the student achievement council and the office of the lieutenant governor in RCW 28B.120.005.

Sec. 4. RCW 28B.120.005 and 2010 c 245 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that encouraging collaboration among the various ((educational)) sectors to meet statewide productivity and educational attainment needs as described in the system design plan developed by the ((higher education coordinating board)) student achievement council and the office of the lieutenant governor will strengthen the entire educational system through to careers, from kindergarten through twelfth grade ((and)), to higher education or registered apprenticeships. The legislature also recognizes that the most effective way to develop innovative and collaborative programs is to encourage institutions to develop them voluntarily, in line with established state goals. Through a system of competitive grants, the legislature shall encourage the development of innovative and collaborative and cost-effective solutions to issues of critical statewide need, including:

(1) Raising educational attainment and access to occupation-oriented learning through planning and piloting innovative initiatives to reach new locations and populations;

(2) Recognizing needs of special populations of students, including access and completion efforts targeting underrepresented populations;

(3) Furthering the development of learner-centered, technology-assisted course delivery, including expansion of online and hybrid coursework, open courseware, and other uses of technology in order to effectively and efficiently share costs, improve the quality of instruction and student, faculty, and administrative services, increase undergraduate and graduate student access, retention, and graduation, and to enhance transfer capability;

(4) Furthering the development of competency-based measurements of student achievement to be used as the basis for awarding degrees and certificates;

(5) Increasing the collaboration among both public and private sector institutions of higher education; ((and))

(6) Expanding postsecondary degree pathways that recognize prior learning in the form of registered apprenticeship programs; and

(7) Improving productivity through innovations such as accelerated programs and alternative scheduling.

Sec. 5. RCW 28B.120.010 and 2012 c 229 s 571 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington fund for innovation and quality in higher education program is established. The student achievement council shall administer the program and shall work in close collaboration with the office of the lieutenant governor, the state board for community and technical colleges, and other local and regional entities. Through this program the student achievement council may award on a competitive basis incentive grants to state public or private nonprofit institutions of higher education or consortia of institutions to encourage programs designed to address specific system problems. Each institution or consortia of institutions receiving the award shall contribute some financial support, either by covering part of the costs for the program during its implementation, or by assuming continuing support at the end of the grant period. Strong priority will be given to proposals that involve more than one sector of education or workforce development. Institutions are encouraged to solicit nonstate funds to support these cooperative programs.

Sec. 6. RCW 28B.120.030 and 2012 c 229 s 574 are each amended to read as follows:

The student achievement council and the ((state board for community and technical colleges)) office of the lieutenant governor may solicit and receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the program and may expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 7. RCW 28B.120.040 and 2012 c 229 s 575 are each amended to read as follows:

The student achievement council fund for innovation and quality is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The student achievement council and the office of the lieutenant governor shall deposit in the fund all moneys received under RCW 28B.120.030. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of RCW 28B.120.010 ((and)), 28B.120.020, and the complete Washington program in section 3 of this act. Disbursements from the fund shall be on the authorization of the student achievement council. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

--- END ---