BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.63A.215 and 1993 c 478 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall, in consultation with the affordable housing advisory board created in RCW 43.185B.020, report to the legislature on the development and placement of accessory apartments. The department shall produce a written report by December 15, 1993, which:

(a) Identifies local governments that allow the siting of accessory apartments in areas zoned for single-family residential use; and

(b) Makes recommendations to the legislature designed to encourage the development and placement of accessory apartments in areas zoned for single-family residential use.

(2) The recommendations made under subsection (1) of this section shall not take effect before ninety days following adjournment of the 1994 regular legislative session.

(3) Unless provided otherwise by the legislature, by December 31, 1994, local governments shall incorporate in their development regulations, zoning regulations, or official controls the recommendations contained in subsection (1) of this section. The accessory apartment provisions shall be part of the local government's development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control. To allow local flexibility, the recommendations shall be subject to such regulations, conditions, procedures, and limitations as determined by the local legislative authority. The local government may allow the development and placement of accessory apartments within or outside urban growth areas.

(4) As used in this section, "local government" means:

(a) A city or code city with a population that exceeds twenty thousand;

(b) A county that is required to or has elected to plan under the state growth management act; and

(c) A county with a population that exceeds one hundred twenty-five thousand.

--- END ---