BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.633 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 6 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) An offender who violates any condition or requirement of a sentence may be sanctioned by the court with up to sixty days' confinement for each violation or by the department with up to thirty days' confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.737.

(b) In lieu of confinement, an offender may be sanctioned with work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other community-based sanctions.

(2) If an offender was under community custody pursuant to one of the following statutes, the offender may be sanctioned as follows:

(a) ((If the offender was transferred to community custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728, the offender may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation.

(b))) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.660, the offender may be sanctioned in accordance with that section.

(((c))) (b) If the offender was sentenced under the parenting sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.655, the offender may be sanctioned in accordance with that section.

(((d))) (c) If the offender was sentenced under the special sex offender sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.670, the suspended sentence may be revoked and the offender committed to serve the original sentence of confinement.

(((e))) (d) If the offender was sentenced to a work ethic camp pursuant to RCW 9.94A.690, the offender may be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence in total confinement.

(((f))) (e) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, the offender may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation.

(3) If a probationer is being supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, the probationer may be sanctioned pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The department shall have authority to issue a warrant for the arrest of an offender who violates a condition of community custody, as provided in RCW 9.94A.716. Any sanctions shall be imposed by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.737. Nothing in this subsection is intended to limit the power of the sentencing court to respond to a probationer's violation of conditions.

(4) The parole or probation of an offender who is charged with a new felony offense may be suspended and the offender placed in total confinement pending disposition of the new criminal charges if:

(a) The offender is on parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.110(1); or

(b) The offender is being supervised pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745 and is on parole or probation pursuant to the laws of another state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act applies to any sanction imposed on or after the effective date of this section, regardless of the date of the violation. Section 1 of this act does not affect the validity of any sanction that was imposed prior to the effective date of the section.

--- END ---