BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) To reaffirm the legislature's intent of equitable distribution of releases to prevent the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in any one geographical region, one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, the legislature finds it is appropriate for a release to a less restrictive alternative to occur in the person's county of commitment first, then neighboring counties, prior to the state considering or approving placement elsewhere. Despite the intent of the legislature, appropriate treatment and facilities that adequately protect the community are not available in all counties. The legislature finds that this has led to the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in one geographical region, one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a sexually violent predator review group.

(2) To further this end, the Washington state sex offender policy board shall establish and provide oversight, staff support, research, and consultation to the sexually violent predator review group, led by the sexually violent predator section chief in the attorney general's office and shall contain, at minimum:

(a) A representative of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(b) The chair or representative of the sexually violent predator unit in the King county prosecutor's office;

(c) A representative from the office of public defense;

(d) A representative of the Pierce county prosecutor's office;

(e) A representative of the Washington association for the treatment of sex abusers;

(f) A representative of the department of corrections unit supervising sexually violent predators, or the end of sentence review committee;

(g) A retired Washington state superior court judge;

(h) A representative of the Washington state association of counties;

(i) A representative of the association of Washington cities; and

(j) The chief executive officer of the special commitment center, or the chief executive officer's designee.

(3) As appropriate, the sexually violent predator review group shall consult with the Washington institute for public policy and the office of financial management's forecasting and research division.

(4) The sexually violent predator review group shall, at minimum, meet with the sex offender policy board on a quarterly basis to review progress and make requests for staff support, research, or consultation.

(5) The sexually violent predator review group shall at minimum:

(a) Identify regional differences and challenges to developing appropriate treatment and facilities for persons released to less restrictive alternatives;

(b) Recommend methods to promote and increase the development of appropriate treatment and facilities for persons released to a less restrictive alternative statewide, targeting counties that do not currently have appropriate services;

(c) Review currently available data of all less restrictive alternative releases under this chapter both to county of commitment and to other than county of commitment by county of commitment, and by receiving county, and make recommendations accordingly;

(d) Develop a statewide repository to identify all certified treatment providers under chapter 18.155 RCW by county;

(e) Recommend improvement strategies to the process for granting releases to less restrictive alternatives;

(f) Recommend the appropriate procedures and level of involvement for the department of social and health services and the department of corrections in discharge planning, community supervision, and developing appropriate treatment and facilities for persons released to less restrictive alternatives; and

(g) Recommend statutory changes related to commitments and releases under this chapter.

(6) By December 1, 2018, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the sexually violent predator review group must submit a report to the legislature with findings and recommendations from subsection (5) of this section and any legislative proposals.

(7) This section expires December 30, 2019.

--- END ---