BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.589 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection, whenever a person is to be sentenced for two or more current offenses, the sentence range for each current offense shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions as if they were prior convictions for the purpose of the offender score: PROVIDED, That if the court enters a finding that some or all of the current offenses encompass the same criminal conduct then those current offenses shall be counted as one crime. Sentences imposed under this subsection shall be served concurrently. Consecutive sentences may only be imposed under the exceptional sentence provisions of RCW 9.94A.535. "Same criminal conduct," as used in this subsection, means two or more crimes that require the same criminal intent, are committed at the same time and place, and involve the same victim. This definition applies in cases involving vehicular assault or vehicular homicide even if the victims occupied the same vehicle.

(b) Whenever a person is convicted of two or more serious violent offenses arising from separate and distinct criminal conduct, the standard sentence range for the offense with the highest seriousness level under RCW 9.94A.515 shall be determined using the offender's prior convictions and other current convictions that are not serious violent offenses in the offender score and the standard sentence range for other serious violent offenses shall be determined by using an offender score of zero. The standard sentence range for any offenses that are not serious violent offenses shall be determined according to (a) of this subsection. All sentences imposed under this subsection (1)(b) shall be served consecutively to each other and concurrently with sentences imposed under (a) of this subsection. However, unless the court expressly orders that the community custody terms run consecutively to each other, the terms shall run concurrently to each other even if the court orders the confinement terms to run consecutively to each other.

(c) If an offender is convicted under RCW 9.41.040 for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, the standard sentence range for each of these current offenses shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions, except other current convictions for the felony crimes listed in this subsection (1)(c), as if they were prior convictions. The offender shall serve consecutive sentences for each conviction of the felony crimes listed in this subsection (1)(c), and for each firearm unlawfully possessed.

(d) All sentences imposed under RCW 46.61.502(6), 46.61.504(6), or 46.61.5055(4) shall be served consecutively to any sentences imposed under RCW 46.20.740 and 46.20.750.

(2)(a) ((Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) Whenever a person while under sentence for conviction of a felony commits another felony and is sentenced to another term of confinement, the latter term of confinement shall not begin until expiration of all prior terms of confinement. However, any terms of community custody shall run concurrently to each other, unless the court pronouncing the current sentence expressly orders that they be served consecutively.

(b) Whenever a second or later felony conviction results in consecutive community ((supervision)) custody with conditions not currently in effect, under the prior sentence or sentences of community ((supervision)) custody the court may require that the conditions of community ((supervision)) custody contained in the second or later sentence begin during the immediate term of community ((supervision)) custody and continue throughout the duration of the consecutive term of community ((supervision)) custody.

(3) Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, whenever a person is sentenced for a felony that was committed while the person was not under sentence for conviction of a felony, the sentence shall run concurrently with any felony sentence which has been imposed by any court in this or another state or by a federal court subsequent to the commission of the crime being sentenced unless the court pronouncing the current sentence expressly orders that ((they)) the confinement terms be served consecutively to each other. Unless the court expressly orders that the community custody terms run consecutively, such terms run concurrently to each other even if the court orders the confinement terms to run consecutively to each other.

(4) Whenever any person granted probation under RCW 9.95.210 or 9.92.060, or both, has the probationary sentence revoked and a prison sentence imposed, that sentence shall run consecutively to any sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter, unless the court pronouncing the subsequent sentence expressly orders that they be served concurrently.

(5) ((In the case of consecutive sentences,)) All periods of total confinement shall be served before any partial confinement, community ((restitution, community supervision)) custody, or any other requirement or conditions of any of the sentences. ((Except for exceptional sentences as authorized under RCW 9.94A.535, if two or more sentences that run consecutively include periods of community supervision, the aggregate of the community supervision period shall not exceed twenty-four months.))

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94B.050 and 2003 c 379 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When a court sentences an offender to a term of total confinement in the custody of the department for any of the offenses specified in this section, the court shall also sentence the offender to a term of community placement as provided in this section. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the department shall supervise any sentence of community placement imposed under this section.

(1) The court shall order a one-year term of community placement for the following:

(a) A sex offense or a serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1, 1990; or

(b) An offense committed on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 25, 1999, that is:

(i) Assault in the second degree;

(ii) Assault of a child in the second degree;

(iii) A crime against persons where it is determined in accordance with RCW ((9.94A.602)) 9.94A.825 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of commission; or

(iv) A felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660.

(2) The court shall sentence the offender to a term of community placement of two years or up to the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728, whichever is longer, for:

(a) An offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, including those sex offenses also included in other offense categories;

(b) A serious violent offense other than a sex offense committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000; or

(c) A vehicular homicide or vehicular assault committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000.

(3) The community placement ordered under this section shall begin either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release. When the court sentences an offender to the statutory maximum sentence then the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the offender may become eligible. Any period of community custody actually served shall be credited against the community placement portion of the sentence. The community placement shall run concurrently to any period of probation, parole, community supervision, community placement, or community custody previously imposed by any court in any jurisdiction, unless the court pronouncing the current sentence expressly orders that they be served consecutively to each other.

(4) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of any community placement imposed under this section shall include the following conditions:

(a) The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned community corrections officer as directed;

(b) The offender shall work at department-approved education, employment, or community restitution, or any combination thereof;

(c) The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(d) The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department; and

(e) The residence location and living arrangements shall be subject to the prior approval of the department during the period of community placement.

(5) As a part of any terms of community placement imposed under this section, the court may also order one or more of the following special conditions:

(a) The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical boundary;

(b) The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the crime or a specified class of individuals;

(c) The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling services;

(d) The offender shall not consume alcohol; or

(e) The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions.

(6) An offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after June 6, 1996, shall comply with any terms and conditions of community placement imposed by the department relating to contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim.

(7) Prior to or during community placement, upon recommendation of the department, the sentencing court may remove or modify any conditions of community placement so as not to be more restrictive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 9.94B RCW to read as follows:

Except for exceptional sentences, as authorized under RCW 9.94A.535, if two or more sentences that run consecutively include periods of community supervision that the court has expressly ordered to run consecutively, the aggregate of the community supervision period shall not exceed twenty-four months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The department of corrections must recalculate the scheduled end dates for terms of community custody, community supervision, and community placement so that they run concurrently to previously imposed sentences of community custody, community supervision, community placement, probation, and parole, unless the court pronouncing the current sentence has expressly required such terms to run consecutively. This section applies to each offender currently in confinement or under active supervision, regardless of whether the offender is sentenced after the effective date of this section, and regardless of whether the offender's date of offense occurred before the effective date of this section or after.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The legislature declares that the department of corrections' recalculations of community custody terms pursuant to this act do not create any expectations that a particular community custody term will end before July 1, 2018, and offenders have no reason to conclude that the recalculation of their community custody terms before July 1, 2018, is an entitlement or creates any liberty interest in their community custody term ending before July 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The department of corrections has the authority to begin implementing this act upon the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This act applies retroactively and prospectively regardless of the date of an offender's underlying offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect July 1, 2018.

--- END ---