BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:

Any contract that restrains an hourly employee from engaging in a lawful profession, trade, or business of any kind is against public policy and is void and unenforceable to the extent that it restrains a person from engaging in a lawful profession, trade, or business.

--- END ---