BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preferences contained in sections 502 and 503, chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preferences. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes these tax preferences as ones intended to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers, improve industry competitiveness, and create or retain jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (a) through (c).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to maintain and expand business in the semiconductor cluster. It is the legislature's intent to extend by ten years the preferential tax rates for manufacturers and processors for hire of semiconductor materials in order to maintain and grow jobs in the semiconductor cluster.

(4) If a review finds that: (a) Since October 19, 2017, at least one project in the semiconductor cluster has located in Clark county, and that this project generates at least two thousand five hundred high-wage jobs, all of which pay twenty dollars per hour or more and at least eighty percent of which pay thirty-five dollars per hour or more; and (b) the number of jobs in the semiconductor cluster in Washington has increased since October 19, 2017, then the legislature intends to extend the expiration date of the tax preference.

(5) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to data from the department of revenue's annual survey ((data)) for tax years ending before January 1, 2018, and annual tax performance report for subsequent tax years.

Sec. 2. 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preferences contained in sections 505 through 508, chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preferences. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes these tax preferences as ones intended to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers, improve industry competitiveness, and create or retain jobs, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2) (a) through (c).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to encourage significant construction projects; retain, expand, and attract semiconductor business; and encourage and expand family-wage jobs. It is the legislature's intent to extend by ten years the ((preferential tax rates)) exemptions for sales and use of gases and chemicals used in the production of semiconductor materials, in order to encourage the growth and retention of the semiconductor business in Washington, thereby strengthening Washington's competitiveness with other states for manufacturing investment.

(4) If a review finds that the number of construction projects in the industry has increased, and that (([the])) the number of people employed by the solar silicon, silicon manufacturing, and semiconductor fabrication industry in Washington is the same or more than in 2015, and that at least sixty percent of employees earn sixty thousand dollars a year, then the legislature intends to extend the expiration date of the tax preferences.

(5) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to data from the department of revenue's annual survey ((data)) for tax years ending before January 1, 2018, and annual tax performance report for subsequent tax years.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.02.085 and 2013 c 144 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To encourage timely renewal by applicants, a business license delinquency fee is imposed on licensees who fail to renew by the business license expiration date. The business license delinquency fee must be the lesser of one hundred fifty dollars or fifty percent of a base comprised of the licensee's renewal fee minus corporate licensing taxes, corporation annual report fee, and any interest fees or penalties charged for late taxes or corporate renewals. The business license delinquency fee must be added to the renewal fee and paid by the licensee before a business license is renewed. The delinquency fee must be deposited in the business license account.

(2) The department must waive or cancel the business license delinquency fee imposed in subsection (1) of this section only if the department determines that the licensee failed to renew a license by the business license expiration date due to an undisputable error or failure by the department. For purposes of this subsection, an error or failure is undisputable if the department is satisfied, beyond any doubt, that the error or failure occurred.

Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.192 and 2017 c 323 s 514 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Digital audio works" means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including ringtones.

(2) "Digital audiovisual works" means a series of related images which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any.

(3)(a) "Digital automated service," except as provided in (b) of this subsection (3), means any service transferred electronically that uses one or more software applications.

(b) "Digital automated service" does not include:

(i) Any service that primarily involves the application of human effort by the seller, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service;

(ii) The loaning or transferring of money or the purchase, sale, or transfer of financial instruments. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(ii), "financial instruments" include cash, accounts receivable and payable, loans and notes receivable and payable, debt securities, equity securities, as well as derivative contracts such as forward contracts, swap contracts, and options;

(iii) Dispensing cash or other physical items from a machine;

(iv) Payment processing services;

(v) Parimutuel wagering and handicapping contests as authorized by chapter 67.16 RCW;

(vi) Telecommunications services and ancillary services as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065;

(vii) The internet and internet access as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.297;

(viii) The service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c);

(ix) Online educational programs provided by a:

(A) Public or private elementary or secondary school; or

(B) An institution of higher education as defined in sections 1001 or 1002 of the federal higher education act of 1965 (Title 20 U.S.C. Secs. 1001 and 1002), as existing on July 1, 2009. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(ix)(B), an online educational program must be encompassed within the institution's accreditation;

(x) Live presentations, such as lectures, seminars, workshops, or courses, where participants are connected to other participants via the internet or telecommunications equipment, which allows audience members and the presenter or instructor to give, receive, and discuss information with each other in real time;

(xi) Travel agent services, including online travel services, and automated systems used by travel agents to book reservations;

(xii)(A) A service that allows the person receiving the service to make online sales of products or services, digital or otherwise, using either: (I) The service provider's web site; or (II) the service recipient's web site, but only when the service provider's technology is used in creating or hosting the service recipient's web site or is used in processing orders from customers using the service recipient's web site.

(B) The service described in this subsection (3)(b)(xii) does not include the underlying sale of the products or services, digital or otherwise, by the person receiving the service;

(xiii) Advertising services. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(xiii), "advertising services" means all services directly related to the creation, preparation, production, or the dissemination of advertisements. Advertising services include layout, art direction, graphic design, mechanical preparation, production supervision, placement, and rendering advice to a client concerning the best methods of advertising that client's products or services. Advertising services also include online referrals, search engine marketing and lead generation optimization, web campaign planning, the acquisition of advertising space in the internet media, and the monitoring and evaluation of web site traffic for purposes of determining the effectiveness of an advertising campaign. Advertising services do not include web hosting services and domain name registration;

(xiv) The mere storage of digital products, digital codes, computer software, or master copies of software. This exclusion from the definition of digital automated services includes providing space on a server for web hosting or the backing up of data or other information;

(xv) Data processing services. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(xv), "data processing service" means a primarily automated service provided to a business or other organization where the primary object of the service is the systematic performance of operations by the service provider on data supplied in whole or in part by the customer to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing services include check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities. Data processing does not include the service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c); and

(xvi) Digital goods.

(4) "Digital books" means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as books.

(5) "Digital code" means a code that provides a purchaser with the right to obtain one or more digital products, if all of the digital products to be obtained through the use of the code have the same sales and use tax treatment. "Digital code" does not include a code that represents a stored monetary value that is deducted from a total as it is used by the purchaser. "Digital code" also does not include a code that represents a redeemable card, gift card, or gift certificate that entitles the holder to select digital products of an indicated cash value. A digital code may be obtained by any means, including email or by tangible means regardless of its designation as song code, video code, book code, or some other term.

(6)(a) "Digital goods," except as provided in (b) of this subsection (6), means sounds, images, data, facts, or information, or any combination thereof, transferred electronically, including, but not limited to, specified digital products and other products transferred electronically not included within the definition of specified digital products.

(b) The term "digital goods" does not include:

(i) Telecommunications services and ancillary services as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065;

(ii) Computer software as defined in RCW 82.04.215;

(iii) The internet and internet access as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.297;

(iv)(A) Except as provided in (b)(iv)(B) of this subsection (6), the representation of a personal or professional service in electronic form, such as an electronic copy of an engineering report prepared by an engineer, where the service primarily involves the application of human effort by the service provider, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service.

(B) The exclusion in (b)(iv)(A) of this subsection (6) does not apply to photographers in respect to amounts received for the taking of photographs that are transferred electronically to the customer, but only if the customer is an end user, as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11), of the photographs. Such amounts are considered to be for the sale of digital goods; and

(v) Services and activities excluded from the definition of digital automated services in subsection (3)(b)(i) through (xv) of this section and not otherwise described in (b)(i) through (iv) of this subsection (6).

(7) "Digital products" means digital goods and digital automated services.

(8) "Electronically transferred" or "transferred electronically" means obtained by the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media. It is not necessary that a copy of the product be physically transferred to the purchaser. So long as the purchaser may access the product, it will be considered to have been electronically transferred to the purchaser.

(9) "Specified digital products" means electronically transferred digital audiovisual works, digital audio works, and digital books.

(10) "Subscription radio services" means the sale of audio programming by a radio broadcaster as defined in RCW ((82.08.02081)) 82.08.0208, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. "Subscription radio services" does not include audio programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service.

(11) "Subscription television services" means the sale of video programming by a television broadcaster as defined in RCW ((82.08.02081)) 82.08.0208, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. "Subscription television services" does not include video programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service, but only if the seller is not subject to a franchise fee in this state under the authority of Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a) on the gross revenue derived from the sale.

Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.4266 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables; or

(b) Selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(2) For purposes of this section, "fruits" and "vegetables" do not include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual ((survey)) tax performance report with the department under RCW ((82.32.585)) 82.32.534.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.4268 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax, the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing dairy products; or

(b) Selling dairy products manufactured by the seller to purchasers who either transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state or purchasers who use such dairy products as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state or sold to a manufacturer for use as an ingredient or component in the manufacturing of a dairy product.

(2) "Dairy products" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.260.

(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual ((survey)) tax performance report with the department under RCW ((82.32.585)) 82.32.534.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 7. RCW 82.04.4269 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:

(a) Manufacturing seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; or

(b) Selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state.

(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual ((survey)) tax performance report with the department under RCW ((82.32.585)) 82.32.534.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2025.

Sec. 8. RCW 82.04.4327 and 1985 c 471 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In computing tax ((there may be deducted)) under this chapter, an artistic or cultural organization may deduct from the measure of tax ((those)):

(1) All amounts received by the artistic or cultural ((organizations which represent income derived from business activities conducted by the organization)) organization; and

(2) The value of articles manufactured by the artistic or cultural organization solely for use by the organization in displaying art objects or presenting artistic or cultural exhibitions, performances, or programs for attendance or viewing by the general public.

Sec. 9. RCW 82.04.4328 and 1985 c 471 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of RCW ((82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326,)) 82.04.4327, 82.08.031, and 82.12.031, the term "artistic or cultural organization" means an organization ((which)) that is organized and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, for viewing or attendance by the general public. The organization must be a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and managed by a governing board of not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the organization or by a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In addition, to qualify for deduction or exemption from taxation under RCW ((82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326,)) 82.04.4327, 82.08.031, and 82.12.031, the corporation ((shall)) must satisfy the following conditions:

(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its purposes and bylaws;

(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the salary or compensation of like positions within the state;

(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the activities for which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which also would be entitled to the exemption;

(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;

(e) The amounts received that qualify for exemption must be used for the activities for which the exemption is granted;

(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national origin, or ancestry; and

(g) The director of revenue ((shall)) must have access to its books in order to determine whether the corporation is exempt from taxes.

(2) The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs" includes and is limited to:

(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed in art or history museums;

(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances; or

(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs, offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic, cultural, or historical subject.

Sec. 10. RCW 82.08.0201 and 1992 c 194 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Before January 1, 1994, and January 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter:

The department of licensing, with the assistance of the department of revenue, ((shall)) must provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature with an updated estimate of the amount of revenue attributable to the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.020(2)((, and the amount of revenue not collected as a result of RCW 82.44.023)).

Sec. 11. RCW 82.08.0208 and 2009 c 535 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of a digital code for one or more digital products if the sale of the digital products to which the digital code relates is exempt from the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020.

(2)(a) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to a business or other organization for the purpose of making the digital good or digital automated service, including a digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of a digital code, or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c), available free of charge for the use or enjoyment of the general public. The exemption provided in this subsection (2) does not apply unless the purchaser has the legal right to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license, relicense, distribute, redistribute, or exhibit the product, in whole or in part, to the general public.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (2), "general public" means all persons and not limited or restricted to a particular class of persons, except that the general public includes:

(i) A class of persons that is defined as all persons residing or owning property within the boundaries of a state, political subdivision of a state, or a municipal corporation; and

(ii) With respect to libraries, authorized library patrons.

(3)(a) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to a business of digital goods, and services rendered in respect to digital goods, if the digital goods and services rendered in respect to digital goods are purchased solely for business purposes. The exemption provided by this subsection (3) also applies to the sale to a business of a digital code if all of the digital goods to be obtained through the use of the code will be used solely for business purposes.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (3), the following definitions apply:

(i) "Business purposes" means any purpose relevant to the business needs of the taxpayer claiming an exemption under this subsection (3). Business purposes do not include any personal, family, or household purpose. The term also does not include any activity conducted by a government entity as that term is defined in RCW 7.25.005; and

(ii) "Services rendered in respect to digital goods" means those services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(g).

(4)(a) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) to a buyer that provides the seller with an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use. An exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use must be in a form and contain such information as required by the department.

(b) A buyer is entitled to use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use only if the buyer is a business or other organization and the digital goods or digital automated services purchased, or the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the digital code purchased, or the prewritten computer software or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) purchased will be concurrently available for use within and outside this state. A buyer is not entitled to use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use for digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) purchased for personal use.

(c) A buyer claiming an exemption under this subsection (4) must report and pay the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 and any local use taxes imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW and RCW 81.104.170 directly to the department in accordance with RCW 82.12.0208 and 82.14.457.

(d) For purposes of this subsection (4), "concurrently available for use within and outside this state" means that employees or other agents of the buyer may use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) simultaneously from one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state. A digital code is concurrently available for use within and outside this state if employees or other agents of the buyer may use the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the code simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state.

(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (5), the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of audio or video programming by a radio or television broadcaster.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (5), the exemption provided in this subsection (5) does not apply in respect to programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service.

(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (5) applies to the sale of programming described in (b)(i) of this subsection (5) if the seller is subject to a franchise fee in this state under the authority of Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a) on the gross revenue derived from the sale.

(c) For purposes of this subsection (5), "radio or television broadcaster" includes satellite radio providers, satellite television providers, cable television providers, and providers of subscription internet television.

(6) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under subsection (2) or (3) of this section must obtain an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

Sec. 12. RCW 82.08.025651 and 2011 c 23 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a public research institution of machinery and equipment used primarily in a research and development operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.

(b) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain from the purchaser an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) A public research institution claiming the exemption provided in this section must file a complete annual ((survey)) tax performance report with the department under RCW ((82.32.585)) 82.32.534.

(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Machinery and equipment" means those fixtures, pieces of equipment, digital goods, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a research and development operation, and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of such fixtures, equipment, and support facilities, including repair parts and replacement parts. "Machinery and equipment" may include, but is not limited to: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment, instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product, formula, or invention; vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery and equipment.

(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:

(i) Hand-powered tools;

(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;

(iii) Buildings; and

(iv) Those building fixtures that are not an integral and necessary part of a research and development operation and that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.

(c) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by time. If machinery and equipment is used simultaneously in a research and development operation and also for other purposes, the use for other purposes must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes of determining whether the machinery and equipment is used primarily in a research and development operation.

(d) "Public research institution" means any college or university included within the definitions of state universities, regional universities, or state college in RCW 28B.10.016.

(e) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010.

Sec. 13. RCW 82.08.02807 and 2014 c 97 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to the sales of medical supplies, chemicals, or materials to an organ procurement organization exempt under RCW 82.04.326. This exemption does not apply to the sale of construction materials, office equipment, building equipment, administrative supplies, or vehicles.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or other additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood, bone, or tissue.

(b) "Materials" means any item of tangible personal property including, but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering materials, testing reagents, antisera, and refrigerants, used or consumed in performing research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.

(c) "Medical supplies" means any item of tangible personal property, including any repair and replacement parts for such tangible personal property, used by an organ procurement organization exempt under RCW 82.04.326 for the purpose of performing research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue. The term includes tangible personal property used to:

(i) Provide preparatory treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;

(ii) Control, guide, measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test, or physically support blood, bone, or tissue; or

(iii) Protect the health and safety of employees or others present during research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.08.155 and 2012 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If the department determines that a taxpayer is more than thirty days delinquent in reporting or remitting spirits taxes on a tax return or assessed by the department, including any applicable penalties and interest on such taxes, the department may request that the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board suspend the taxpayer's spirits license or licenses and refuse to renew any existing spirits license held by the taxpayer or issue any new spirits license to the taxpayer. The department must provide written notice to the affected taxpayer of the department's request to the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board.

(b) Before the department may make a request to the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board as authorized in (a) of this subsection (1), the department must have provided the taxpayer with at least seven calendar days prior written notice. This notice must inform the taxpayer that the department intends to request that the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board suspend the taxpayer's spirits license or licenses and refuse to renew any existing license of the taxpayer or issue any new spirits license to the taxpayer unless, within seven calendar days of the date of the notice, the taxpayer submits any unfiled tax returns for reporting spirits taxes and remits full payment of its outstanding spirits tax liability to the department or negotiates payment arrangements for the unpaid spirits taxes. The notice required by this subsection (1)(b) must include information listing any unfiled tax returns; the amount of unpaid spirits taxes, including any applicable penalties and interest; who to contact to inquire about payment arrangements; and that the taxpayer may seek administrative review by the department of the notice, and the deadline for seeking such review. Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) requires the department to enter into any payment arrangement proposed by a taxpayer if the department determines that the taxpayer's proposal is not satisfactory.

(c) The department may not make a request to the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board under (a) of this subsection (((1)(a) of this section)) relating to any spirits taxes that are the subject of pending administrative review by the department.

(2) A taxpayer's right to administrative review of the notice required in subsection (1)(b) of this section:

(a) May be conducted under any rule adopted pursuant to RCW 82.01.060(4) or as a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494; and

(b) Does not include the right to challenge the amount of any spirits taxes assessed by the department if the taxpayer previously sought or could have sought administrative review of the assessment as provided in RCW 82.32.160.

(3) The notices required by this section may be provided electronically in accordance with RCW 82.32.135.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Spirits license" has the same meaning as in RCW 66.24.010(3)(c); and

(b) "Spirits taxes" means the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.150.

Sec. 15. RCW 82.08.195 and 2010 c 111 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a bundled transaction is subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 if the retail sale of any of its component products would be subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.

(2) The transactions described in RCW 82.08.190(4) (a) and (b) are subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 if the service that is the true object of the transaction is subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. If the service that is the true object of the transaction is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020, the transaction is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.

(3) The transaction described in RCW 82.08.190(4)(c) is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.

(4) The transaction described in RCW 82.08.190(4)(d) is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.

(5) In the case of a bundled transaction that includes any of the following: Telecommunications service, ancillary service, internet access, or audio or video programming service:

(a) If the price is attributable to products that are taxable and products that are not taxable, the portion of the price attributable to the nontaxable products are subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 unless the seller can identify by reasonable and verifiable standards the portion from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes including, but not limited to, nontax purposes;

(b) If the price is attributable to products that are subject to tax at different tax rates, the total price is attributable to the products subject to the tax at the highest tax rate unless the seller can identify by reasonable and verifiable standards the portion of the price attributable to the products subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 at the lower rate from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes including, but not limited to, nontax purposes.

(6) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply in respect to a bundled transaction consisting entirely of the sale of services or of services and prepared food, if the sale is to a resident, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. A single bundled transaction involving both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(7) In the case of the sale of a code that provides a purchaser with the right to obtain more than one digital product or one or more digital products and other products or services, and all of the products and services, digital or otherwise, to be obtained through the use of the code do not have the same sales and use tax treatment, for purposes of the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020:

(a) The transaction is deemed to be the sale of the products and services to be obtained through the use of the code; and

(b)(i) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 applies to the entire selling price of the code, except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (7).

(ii) If the seller can identify by reasonable and verifiable standards the portion of the selling price attributable to the products and services that are not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes including, but not limited to, nontax purposes, the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to that portion of the selling price of the code attributable to the products and services that are not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 nor to that portion of the selling price of the code attributable to any digital goods, the sale of which is exempt under RCW ((82.08.02087)) 82.08.0208(3).

Sec. 16. RCW 82.08.806 and 2011 c 174 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.

(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.

(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated physical components that constitute a computer system, including monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers. "Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer software.

(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.

(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by time.

(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (14) or 82.04.280(1)(a).

(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for administrative purposes.

Sec. 17. RCW 82.08.956 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1002 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2) For the purposes of this section ((the following definitions apply)):

(a) "Biofuel" includes, but is not limited to, biodiesel, ethanol, and ethanol blend fuels and renewable liquid natural gas or liquid compressed natural gas made from biogas;

(b) "Biogas" includes waste gases derived from landfills and wastewater treatment plants and dairy and farm wastes; and

(c) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood pellets((; and

(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010)).

(3) If a taxpayer who claimed an exemption under this section closes a facility in Washington for which employment positions were reported under RCW 82.32.605, resulting in a loss of jobs located within the state, the department must declare the amount of the tax exemption claimed under this section for the previous two calendar years to be immediately due.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2024.

Sec. 18. RCW 82.08.9651 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place. For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).

(2) A person claiming the exemption under this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(3) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.

(4) Any person who has claimed the ((preferential tax rate)) exemption under this section must reimburse the department for fifty percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section, if:

(a) The number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than ninety percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the ((preferential tax rate)) exemption is claimed; or

(b) The person is subject to a review under section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such person does not meet performance criteria in section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

(5) This section expires December 1, 2028.

Sec. 19. RCW 82.12.0208 and 2009 c 535 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of a digital code for one or more digital products, if the use of the digital products to which the digital code relates is exempt from the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020.

(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a business or other organization of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) for the purpose of making the digital good or digital automated service, including a digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of a digital code, or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) available free of charge for the use or enjoyment of the general public. For purposes of this subsection (2), "general public" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0208. The exemption provided in this subsection (2) does not apply unless the user has the legal right to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license, relicense, distribute, redistribute, or exhibit the product, in whole or in part, to the general public.

(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by students of digital goods furnished by a public or private elementary or secondary school, or an institution of higher education as defined in section 1001 or 1002 of the federal higher education act of 1965 (Title 20 U.S.C. Secs. 1001 and 1002), as existing on July 1, 2009.

(4)(a) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of digital goods that are:

(i) Of a noncommercial nature, such as personal email communications;

(ii) Created solely for an internal audience; or

(iii) Created solely for the business needs of the person who created the digital good, including business email communications, but not including the type of digital good that is offered for sale.

(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to the use of any digital goods purchased by the user, the user's donor, or anybody on the user's behalf.

(5) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of digital products or digital codes obtained by the end user free of charge.

(6) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a business of digital goods, and services rendered in respect to digital goods, where the digital goods and services rendered in respect to digital goods are used solely for business purposes. The exemption provided by this subsection (6) also applies to the use by a business of a digital code if all of the digital goods to be obtained through the use of the code will be used solely for business purposes. For purposes of this subsection (6), the definitions in RCW 82.08.0208 apply.

(7)(a) A business or other organization subject to the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 on the use of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) that are concurrently available for use within and outside this state is entitled to apportion the amount of tax due this state based on users in this state compared to users everywhere. The department may authorize or require an alternative method of apportionment supported by the taxpayer's records that fairly reflects the proportion of in-state to out-of-state use by the taxpayer of the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c).

(b) No apportionment under this subsection (7) is allowed unless the apportionment method is supported by the taxpayer's records kept in the ordinary course of business.

(c) For purposes of this subsection (7), the following definitions apply:

(i) "Concurrently available for use within and outside this state" means that employees or other agents of the taxpayer may use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state. A digital code is concurrently available for use within and outside this state if employees or other agents of the taxpayer may use the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the code simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state; and

(ii) "User" means an employee or agent of the taxpayer who is authorized by the taxpayer to use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) in the performance of his or her duties as an employee or other agent of the taxpayer.

(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (8), the provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of audio or video programming provided by a radio or television broadcaster.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (8), the exemption provided in this subsection (8) does not apply in respect to programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service.

(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (8) applies to the sale of programming described in (b)(i) of this subsection (8) if the seller is subject to a franchise fee in this state under the authority of Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a) on the gross revenue derived from the sale.

(c) For purposes of this subsection (8), "radio or television broadcaster" includes satellite radio providers, satellite television providers, cable television providers, providers of subscription internet television, and persons who provide radio or television broadcasting to listeners or viewers for no charge.

Sec. 20. RCW 82.12.02749 and 2002 c 113 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to the use of medical supplies, chemicals, or materials by an organ procurement organization exempt under RCW 82.04.326. The definitions of medical supplies, chemicals, and materials in RCW ((82.04.324)) 82.08.02807 apply to this section. This exemption does not apply to the use of construction materials, office equipment, building equipment, administrative supplies, or vehicles.

Sec. 21. RCW 82.12.930 and 2003 c 5 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by municipal corporations, the state, and all political subdivisions thereof of tangible personal property consumed and/or of labor and services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) rendered in respect to contracts for watershed protection and/or flood prevention. This exemption is limited to that portion of the selling price that is reimbursed by the United States government according to the provisions of the watershed protection and flood prevention act (68 Stat. 666; 16 U.S.C. Sec. ((101)) 1001 et seq.).

Sec. 22. RCW 82.12.956 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1003 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.956; and

(b) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.956((; and

(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010)).

(3) This section expires June 30, 2024.

Sec. 23. RCW 82.12.9651 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).

(2) A person claiming the exemption under this section must file a complete annual tax performance report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

(3) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW.

(4) Any person who has claimed the ((preferential tax rate)) exemption under this section must reimburse the department for fifty percent of the amount of the tax preference under this section, if:

(a) The number of persons employed by the person claiming the tax preference is less than ninety percent of the person's three-year employment average for the three years immediately preceding the year in which the ((preferential tax rate)) exemption is claimed; or

(b) The person is subject to a review under section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. and such person does not meet performance criteria in section 501(4)(a), chapter 37, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

(5) This section expires December 1, 2028.

Sec. 24. RCW 82.14.049 and 2011 c 174 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative authority of any county may impose a sales and use tax, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax is one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or rental value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax. Proceeds of the tax may not be used to subsidize any professional sports team and must be used solely for the following purposes:

(a) Acquiring, constructing, maintaining, or operating public sports stadium facilities;

(b) Engineering, planning, financial, legal, or professional services incidental to public sports stadium facilities;

(c) Youth or amateur sport activities or facilities; or

(d) Debt or refinancing debt issued for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.

(2) In a county of one million or more, at least seventy-five percent of the tax imposed under this section must be used to retire the debt on the stadium under RCW 67.28.180(2)(b)(((ii))) (i)(B), until that debt is fully retired.

Sec. 25. RCW 82.14.400 and 2000 c 240 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon the joint request of a metropolitan park district, a city with a population of more than one hundred fifty thousand, and a county legislative authority in a county with a national park and a population of more than five hundred thousand and less than one million five hundred thousand, the county ((shall)) must submit an authorizing proposition to the county voters, fixing and imposing a sales and use tax in accordance with this chapter for the purposes designated in subsection (4) of this section and identified in the joint request. Such proposition must be placed on a ballot for a special or general election to be held no later than one year after the date of the joint request.

(2) The proposition is approved if it receives the votes of a majority of those voting on the proposition.

(3) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax ((shall)) must equal no more than one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.

(4) Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section ((shall)) must be used solely for the purpose of providing funds for:

(a) Costs associated with financing, design, acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, reequipping, or improvement of zoo, aquarium, and wildlife preservation and display facilities that are currently accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association; or

(b) Those costs associated with (a) of this subsection and costs related to parks located within a county described in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) The department ((of revenue shall)) must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county. In lieu of the charge for the administration and collection of local sales and use taxes under RCW 82.14.050 from which the county is exempt under this subsection (5), a percentage of the tax revenues authorized by this section equal to one-half of the maximum percentage provided in RCW 82.14.050 ((shall)) must be transferred annually to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, or its successor agency, from the funds allocated under subsection (6)(b) of this section for a period of twelve years from the first date of distribution of funds under subsection (6)(b) of this section. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, or its successor agency, ((shall)) must use funds transferred to it pursuant to this subsection (5) to provide, operate, and maintain community-based housing under chapter 43.185 RCW for ((persons who are mentally ill)) individuals with mental illness.

(6) If the joint request and the authorizing proposition include provisions for funding those costs included within subsection (4)(b) of this section, the tax revenues authorized by this section ((shall)) must be allocated annually as follows:

(a) Fifty percent to the zoo and aquarium advisory authority; and

(b) Fifty percent to be distributed on a per capita basis as set out in the most recent population figures for unincorporated and incorporated areas only within that county, as determined by the office of financial management, solely for parks, as follows: To any metropolitan park district, to cities and towns not contained within a metropolitan park district, and the remainder to the county. Moneys received under this subsection (6)(b) by a county may not be used to replace or supplant existing per capita funding.

(7) Funds ((shall)) must be distributed annually by the county treasurer to the county, and cities and towns located within the county, in the manner set out in subsection (6)(b) of this section.

(8) Prior to expenditure of any funds received by the county under subsection (6)(b) of this section, the county ((shall)) must establish a process which considers needs throughout the unincorporated areas of the county in consultation with community advisory councils established by ordinance.

(9) By December 31, 2005, and thereafter, the county or any city with a population greater than eighty thousand must provide at least one dollar match for every two dollars received under this section.

(10) Properties subject to a memorandum of agreement between the federal bureau of land management, the advisory council on historic preservation, and the Washington state historic preservation officer have priority for funding from money received under subsection (6)(b) of this section for implementation of the stipulations in the memorandum of agreement.

(a) At least one hundred thousand dollars of the first four years of allocations under subsection (6)(b) of this section, to be matched by the county or city with one dollar for every two dollars received, ((shall)) must be used to implement the stipulations of the memorandum of agreement and for other historical, archaeological, architectural, and cultural preservation and improvements related to the properties.

(b) The amount in (a) of this subsection ((shall)) must come equally from the allocations to the county and to the city in which the properties are located, unless otherwise agreed to by the county and the city.

(c) The amount in (a) of this subsection ((shall)) may not be construed to displace or be offered in lieu of any lease payment from a county or city to the state for the properties in question.

Sec. 26. RCW 82.14.457 and 2017 c 323 s 527 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A business or other organization that is entitled under RCW ((82.12.02088)) 82.12.0208(7) to apportion the amount of state use tax on the use of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) is also entitled to apportion the amount of local use taxes imposed under the authority of this chapter and RCW 81.104.170 on the use of such products or services.

(2) To ensure that the tax base for state and local use taxes is identical, the measure of local use taxes apportioned under this section must be the same as the measure of state use tax apportioned under RCW ((82.12.02088)) 82.12.0208(7).

(3) This section does not affect the sourcing of local use taxes.

Sec. 27. RCW 82.16.0497 and 2006 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Base credit" means the maximum amount of credit against the tax imposed by this chapter that each light and power business or gas distribution business may take each fiscal year as calculated by the department. The base credit is equal to the proportionate share that the total grants received by each light and power business or gas distribution business in the prior fiscal year bears to the total grants received by all light and power businesses and gas distribution businesses in the prior fiscal year multiplied by five million five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2007, and two million five hundred thousand dollars for all other fiscal years before and after fiscal year 2007.

(b) "Billing discount" means a reduction in the amount charged for providing service to qualifying persons in Washington made by a light and power business or a gas distribution business. Billing discount does not include grants received by the light and power business or a gas distribution business.

(c) "Grant" means funds provided to a light and power business or gas distribution business by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce or by a qualifying organization.

(d) "Low-income home energy assistance program" means energy assistance programs for low-income households as defined on December 31, 2000, in the low-income home energy assistance act of 1981 as amended August 1, 1999, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8623 et seq.

(e) "Qualifying person" means a Washington resident who applies for assistance and qualifies for a grant regardless of whether that person receives a grant.

(f) "Qualifying contribution" means money given by a light and power business or a gas distribution business to a qualifying organization, exclusive of money received in the prior fiscal year from its customers for the purpose of assisting other customers.

(g) "Qualifying organization" means an entity that has a contractual agreement with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce to administer in a specified service area low-income home energy assistance funds received from the federal government and such other funds that may be received by the entity.

(2) Subject to the limitations in this section, a light and power business or a gas distribution business may take a credit each fiscal year against the tax imposed under this chapter.

(a)(i) A credit may be taken for qualifying contributions if the dollar amount of qualifying contributions for the fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken is greater than one hundred twenty-five percent of the dollar amount of qualifying contributions given in fiscal year 2000.

(ii) If no qualifying contributions were given in fiscal year 2000, a credit ((shall be)) is allowed for the first fiscal year that qualifying contributions are given. Thereafter, credit ((shall be)) is allowed if the qualifying contributions given exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of qualifying contributions given in the first fiscal year.

(iii) The amount of credit ((shall be)) is fifty percent of the dollar amount of qualifying contributions given in the fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken.

(b)(i) A credit may be taken for billing discounts if the dollar amount of billing discounts for the fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken is greater than one hundred twenty-five percent of the dollar amount of billing discounts given in fiscal year 2000.

(ii) If no billing discounts were given in fiscal year 2000, a credit ((shall be)) is allowed in the first fiscal year that billing discounts are given. Thereafter, credit ((shall be)) is allowed if the dollar amount of billing discounts given exceeds one hundred twenty-five percent of billing discounts given in the first fiscal year.

(iii) The amount of credit ((shall be)) is fifty percent of the dollar amount of the billing discounts given in the fiscal year in which the tax credit is taken.

(c) The total amount of credit that may be taken for qualifying contributions and billing discounts in a fiscal year is limited to the base credit for the same fiscal year.

(3)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the total amount of credit, statewide, that may be taken in any fiscal year ((shall)) may not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars.

(ii) The total amount of credit, statewide, that may be taken in fiscal year 2007 ((shall)) may not exceed five million five hundred thousand dollars.

(b) By May 1st of each year starting in 2002, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development shall)) commerce must notify the department of revenue in writing of the grants received in the current fiscal year by each light and power business and gas distribution business.

(4)(a) Not later than June 1st of each year beginning in 2002, the department ((shall)) must publish the base credit for each light and power business and gas distribution business for the next fiscal year.

(b) Not later than July 1st of each year beginning in 2002, application for credit must ((by)) be made to the department including but not limited to the following information: Billing discounts given by the applicant in fiscal year 2000; qualifying contributions given by the applicant in the prior fiscal year; the amount of money received in the prior fiscal year from customers for the purpose of assisting other customers; the base credit for the next fiscal year for the applicant; the qualifying contributions anticipated to be given in the next fiscal year; and billing discounts anticipated to be given in the next fiscal year. No credit under this section will be allowed to a light and power business or gas distribution business that does not file the application by July 1st.

(c) Not later than August 1st of each year beginning in 2002, the department ((shall)) must notify each applicant of the amount of credit that may be taken in that fiscal year.

(d) The balance of base credits not used by other light and power businesses and gas distribution businesses ((shall)) must be ratably distributed to applicants under the formula in subsection (1)(a) of this section. The total amount of credit that may be taken by an applicant is the base credit plus any ratable portion of unused base credit.

(5) The credit taken under this section is limited to the amount of tax imposed under this chapter for the fiscal year. The credit must be claimed in the fiscal year in which the billing reduction is made. Any unused credit expires. Refunds ((shall)) may not be given in place of credits.

(6) No credit may be taken for billing discounts made before July 1, 2001. Within two weeks of May 8, 2001, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development shall)) commerce must notify the department of revenue in writing of the grants received in fiscal year 2001 by each light and power business and gas distribution business. Within four weeks of May 8, 2001, the department of revenue ((shall)) must publish the base credit for each light and power business and gas distribution business for fiscal year 2002. Within eight weeks of May 8, 2001, application to the department must be made showing the information required in subsection (4)(b) of this section. Within twelve weeks of May 8, 2001, the department ((shall)) must notify each applicant of the amount of credit that may be taken in fiscal year 2002.

Sec. 28. RCW 82.16.055 and 1980 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In computing tax under this chapter there ((shall)) must be deducted from the gross income:

(a) An amount equal to the cost of production at the plant for consumption within the state of Washington of:

(i) Electrical energy produced or generated from cogeneration as defined in RCW 82.35.020, as existing on June 30, 2006; and

(ii) Electrical energy or gas produced or generated from renewable energy resources such as solar energy, wind energy, hydroelectric energy, geothermal energy, wood, wood wastes, municipal wastes, agricultural products and wastes, and end-use waste heat; and

(b) Those amounts expended to improve consumers' efficiency of energy end use or to otherwise reduce the use of electrical energy or gas by the consumer.

(2) This section applies only to new facilities for the production or generation of energy from cogeneration or renewable energy resources or measures to improve the efficiency of energy end use on which construction or installation is begun after June 12, 1980, and before January 1, 1990.

(3) Deductions under subsection (1)(a) of this section ((shall)) must be allowed for a period not to exceed thirty years after the project is placed in operation.

(4) Measures or projects encouraged under this section ((shall)) must at the time they are placed in service be reasonably expected to save, produce, or generate energy at a total incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use which is less than or equal to the incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use from similarly available conventional energy resources which utilize nuclear energy or fossil fuels and which the gas or electric utility could acquire to meet energy demand in the same time period.

(5) The department of revenue, after consultation with the utilities and transportation commission in the case of investor-owned utilities and the governing bodies of locally regulated utilities, ((shall)) must determine the eligibility of individual projects and measures for deductions under this section.

Sec. 29. RCW 82.23A.010 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Petroleum product" means plant condensate, lubricating oil, gasoline, aviation fuel, kerosene, diesel motor fuel, benzol, fuel oil, residual oil, and every other product derived from the refining of crude oil, but the term does not include crude oil or liquefiable gases.

(2) "Possession" means the control of a petroleum product located within this state and includes both actual and constructive possession. "Actual possession" occurs when the person with control has physical possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the person with control does not have physical possession. "Control" means the power to sell or use a petroleum product or to authorize the sale or use by another.

(3) "Previously taxed petroleum product" means a petroleum product in respect to which a tax has been paid under this chapter and that has not been remanufactured or reprocessed in any manner (other than mere repackaging or recycling for beneficial reuse) since the tax was paid.

(4) "Rack" means a mechanism for delivering petroleum products from a refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means of nonbulk transfer. For the purposes of this definition:

(a) "Terminal" has the same ((definition as in RCW 82.36.010 and)) meaning as provided in RCW 82.38.020; and

(b) "Nonbulk transfer" means a transfer that does not meet the definition of "bulk transfer" as defined in RCW ((82.36.010 and)) 82.38.020.

(5) "Wholesale value" means fair market wholesale value, determined as nearly as possible according to the wholesale selling price at the place of use of similar products of like quality and character, in accordance with rules of the department.

(6) Except for terms defined in this section, the definitions in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW apply to this chapter.

Sec. 30. RCW 82.24.010 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board.

(2) "Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and irrespective of the tobacco being flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other ingredient, where such roll has a wrapper or cover made of paper or any material, except where such wrapper is wholly or in the greater part made of natural leaf tobacco in its natural state. "Cigarette" includes a roll-your-own cigarette.

(3) "Cigarette paper" means any paper or any other material except tobacco, prepared for use as a cigarette wrapper.

(4) "Cigarette tube" means cigarette paper made into a hollow cylinder for use in making cigarettes.

(5) "Commercial cigarette-making machine" means a machine that is operated in a retail establishment and that is capable of being loaded with loose tobacco, cigarette paper or tubes, and any other components related to the production of roll-your-own cigarettes, including filters.

(6) "Indian tribal organization" means a federally recognized Indian tribe, or tribal entity, and includes an Indian wholesaler or retailer that is owned by an Indian who is an enrolled tribal member conducting business under tribal license or similar tribal approval within Indian country. For purposes of this chapter "Indian country" is defined in the manner set forth in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1151.

(7) "Precollection obligation" means the obligation of a seller otherwise exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter to collect the tax from that seller's buyer.

(8) "Retailer" means every person, other than a wholesaler, who purchases, sells, offers for sale or distributes any one or more of the articles taxed herein, irrespective of quantity or amount, or the number of sales, and all persons operating under a retailer's registration certificate.

(9) "Retail selling price" means the ordinary, customary or usual price paid by the consumer for each package of cigarettes, less the tax levied by this chapter and less any similar tax levied by this state.

(10) "Roll-your-own cigarettes" means cigarettes produced by a commercial cigarette-making machine.

(11) "Stamp" means the stamp or stamps by use of which the tax levy under this chapter is paid or identification is made of those cigarettes with respect to which no tax is imposed.

(12) "Wholesaler" means every person who purchases, sells, or distributes any one or more of the articles taxed herein to retailers for the purpose of resale only.

(13) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the words "person," "sale," "business" and "successor" applies equally in this chapter.

Sec. 31. RCW 82.24.551 and 1997 c 420 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((shall)) must appoint, as duly authorized agents, enforcement officers of the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board to enforce provisions of this chapter. These officers ((shall)) are not ((be)) considered employees of the department.

Sec. 32. RCW 82.26.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight, transportation, or handling.

(2) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.

(3) "Board" means the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board.

(4) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products in this state.

(5) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.

(6) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.

(7) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(8) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this state who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been imposed.

(9) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24 RCW.

(10) "Little cigar" means a cigar that has a cellulose acetate integrated filter.

(11) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells tobacco products.

(12) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products, and includes employees and independent contractors.

(13) "Moist snuff" means tobacco that is finely cut, ground, or powdered; is not for smoking; and is intended to be placed in the oral, but not the nasal, cavity.

(14) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator, executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington, corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person immune from state taxation, including the United States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.

(15) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or vending machine.

(16) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco products are sold to consumers.

(17) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products to ultimate consumers.

(18)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes and means all sales made by any person.

(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.

(19)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:

(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer purchased the tobacco products;

(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers;

(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers;

(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;

(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products under a sale as defined in subsection (18)(b) of this section, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers; or

(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers.

(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only, "person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (14) of this section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.

(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of taxable sales price under this subsection.

(20) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this chapter.

(21) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, and any other product, regardless of form, that contains tobacco and is intended for human consumption or placement in the oral or nasal cavity or absorption into the human body by any other means, but does not include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010.

(22) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.

(23) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.

Sec. 33. RCW 82.26.121 and 1997 c 420 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The department ((shall)) must appoint, as duly authorized agents, enforcement officers of the liquor ((control)) and cannabis board to enforce provisions of this chapter. These officers ((shall)) are not ((be)) considered employees of the department.

Sec. 34. RCW 82.26.130 and 2002 c 325 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department ((shall)) must by rule establish the invoice detail required under RCW 82.26.060 for a distributor under RCW 82.26.010(((3))) (8)(d) and for those invoices required to be provided to retailers under RCW 82.26.070.

(2) If a retailer fails to keep invoices as required under chapter 82.32 RCW, the retailer is liable for the tax owed on any uninvoiced tobacco products but not penalties and interest, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) If the department finds that the nonpayment of tax by the retailer was willful or if in the case of a second or plural nonpayment of tax by the retailer, penalties and interest ((shall)) must be assessed in accordance with chapter 82.32 RCW.

Sec. 35. RCW 82.26.190 and 2009 c 154 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) No person may engage in or conduct business as a distributor or retailer in this state after September 30, 2005, without a valid license issued under this chapter. Any person who sells tobacco products to persons other than ultimate consumers or who meets the definition of distributor under RCW 82.26.010(((3))) (8)(d) must obtain a distributor's license under this chapter. Any person who sells tobacco products to ultimate consumers must obtain a retailer's license under this chapter.

(b) A violation of this subsection (1) is punishable as a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)(a) No person engaged in or conducting business as a distributor or retailer in this state may:

(i) Refuse to allow the department or the board, on demand, to make a full inspection of any place of business where any of the tobacco products taxed under this chapter are sold, stored, or handled, or otherwise hinder or prevent such inspection;

(ii) Make, use, or present or exhibit to the department or the board any invoice for any of the tobacco products taxed under this chapter that bears an untrue date or falsely states the nature or quantity of the goods invoiced; or

(iii) Fail to produce on demand of the department or the board all invoices of all the tobacco products taxed under this chapter within five years prior to such demand unless the person can show by satisfactory proof that the nonproduction of the invoices was due to causes beyond the person's control.

(b) No person, other than a licensed distributor or retailer, may transport tobacco products for sale in this state for which the taxes imposed under this chapter have not been paid unless:

(i) Notice of the transportation has been given as required under RCW 82.26.140;

(ii) The person transporting the tobacco products actually possesses invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address of the consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of tobacco products being transported; and

(iii) The tobacco products are consigned to or purchased by a person in this state who is licensed under this chapter.

(c) A violation of this subsection (2) is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) Any person licensed under this chapter as a distributor, and any person licensed under this chapter as a retailer, ((shall)) may not operate in any other capacity unless the additional appropriate license is first secured. A violation of this subsection (3) is a misdemeanor.

(4) The penalties provided in this section are in addition to any other penalties provided by law for violating the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.

Sec. 36. RCW 82.26.200 and 2005 c 180 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A retailer that obtains tobacco products from an unlicensed distributor or any other person that is not licensed under this chapter must be licensed both as a retailer and a distributor under this chapter and is liable for the tax imposed under RCW 82.26.020 with respect to the tobacco products acquired from the unlicensed person that are held for sale, handling, or distribution in this state. For the purposes of this subsection, "person" includes both persons defined in RCW 82.26.010(((10))) (14) and any person immune from state taxation, such as the United States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.

(2) Every distributor licensed under this chapter ((shall)) must sell tobacco products to retailers located in Washington only if the retailer has a current retailer's license under this chapter.

Sec. 37. RCW 82.29A.060 and 1994 c 95 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.02 and 82.32 RCW ((shall be)) are applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(2)(a) A lessee, or a sublessee in the case where the sublessee is responsible for paying the tax imposed under this chapter, of property used for residential purposes may petition the county board of equalization for a change in appraised value when the department of revenue establishes taxable rent under RCW 82.29A.020(2)(((b))) (g) based on an appraisal done by the county assessor at the request of the department. The petition must be on forms prescribed or approved by the department of revenue and any petition not conforming to those requirements or not properly completed ((shall)) may not be considered by the board. The petition must be filed with the board within the time period set forth in RCW 84.40.038. A decision of the board of equalization may be appealed by the taxpayer to the board of tax appeals as provided in RCW 84.08.130.

(b) A sublessee, in the case where the sublessee is responsible for paying the tax imposed under this chapter, of property used for residential purposes may petition the department for a change in taxable rent when the department of revenue establishes taxable rent under RCW 82.29A.020(2)(((b))) (g).

(c) Any change in tax resulting from an appeal under this subsection ((shall)) must be allocated to the lessee or sublessee responsible for paying the tax.

(3) This section ((shall)) does not authorize the issuance of any levy upon any property owned by the public lessor.

(4) In selecting leasehold excise tax returns for audit the department of revenue ((shall)) must give priority to any return an audit of which is specifically requested in writing by the county assessor or treasurer or other chief financial officer of any city or county affected by such return. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 82.32.330, findings of fact and determinations of the amount of taxable rent made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter ((shall)) must be open to public inspection at all reasonable times.

Sec. 38. RCW 82.29A.120 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 1302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) After computation of the taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040, the following credits are allowed in determining the tax payable:

(i) For lessees and sublessees who would qualify for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381 if the property were privately owned, the tax otherwise due after this credit must be reduced by a percentage equal to the percentage reduction in property tax that would result from the property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381; and

(ii) A credit of thirty-three percent of the tax otherwise due is allowed with respect to a product lease.

(b)(i) For a leasehold interest in real property owned by a state university, a credit is allowed equal to the amount that the tax under this chapter exceeds the property tax that would apply if the real property were privately owned by the taxpayer.

(ii) The credit under this subsection (1)(b) is available only if the tax parcel that is subject to the leasehold interest has a market value in excess of ten million dollars. If the leasehold interest attaches to two or more parcels, the credit is available if at least one of the tax parcels has a market value in excess of ten million dollars. In either case, the market value must be determined as of January 1st of the year prior to the year for which the credit is claimed.

(iii) For purposes of calculating the credit under this subsection (1)(b):

(A) If a tax parcel does not have current assessed value in accordance with RCW 84.40.020, a market value appraisal performed by a Washington state-certified general real estate appraiser, as defined in RCW 18.140.010, is sufficient to establish the market value. If the underlying real property that is the subject of the leasehold interest consists of a part of one or more tax parcels, this appraisal must include the market value of the part of the parcel or parcels to which the leasehold interest applies; and

(B) The property tax that would otherwise apply to the real property that is the subject of the leasehold interest is calculated using the existing consolidated levy rate for the property's tax code area.

(iv) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this subsection (1)(b) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(A) "Market value" means the true and fair value of the property as that term is used in RCW 84.40.030, based on the property's highest and best use and determined by any reasonable means approved by the department.

(B) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and also includes all improvements upon the land the fee of which is still vested in the public owner.

(C) "State university" has the same meaning as "state universities" as provided in RCW 28B.10.016.

(v) The credit provided under this subsection (1)(b) may not be claimed for tax reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2032.

(2) ((This section expires)) No credit under subsection (1)(b) of this section may be claimed or approved on or after January 1, 2032.

Sec. 39. RCW 82.32.062 and 2002 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the procedure set forth in RCW 82.32.060 and as an exception to the four-year period explicitly set forth in RCW 82.32.060, an offset for a tax that has been paid in excess of that properly due may be taken under the following conditions:

(((1))) (a) The tax paid in excess of that properly due was sales ((tax paid on the purchase of property acquired for leasing; (2))) or use tax paid on property purchased for the purpose of leasing;

(b) The taxpayer was at the time of purchase entitled to purchase the property at wholesale under RCW 82.04.060; and

(((3))) (c) The taxpayer substantiates that ((sales tax was paid at the time of purchase)) the taxpayer paid sales or use tax on the purchase of the property and that there was no intervening use of the ((equipment)) property by the taxpayer.

(2) The offset under this section is applied to and reduced by the amount of retail sales tax otherwise due from the beginning of lease of the property until the offset is extinguished.

Sec. 40. RCW 82.32.300 and 1997 c 420 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

((The administration of this and chapters 82.04 through 82.27 RCW of this title is vested in the department of revenue which shall)) (1) The department must administer this chapter and such other provisions of the Revised Code of Washington as specifically provided by law. To that end, the department may prescribe forms and rules of procedure for the determination of the taxable status of any person, for the making of returns and for the ascertainment, assessment, and collection of taxes and penalties imposed thereunder.

(2)(a) The department ((of revenue shall)) may make and publish rules ((and regulations)), not inconsistent therewith, necessary to enforce provisions of this chapter ((and chapters 82.02 through 82.23B and 82.27 RCW, and the liquor control board shall)) and such other provisions of the Revised Code of Washington that the department is empowered by law to enforce. The liquor and cannabis board may make and publish rules necessary to enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW((, which shall)).

(b) Rules adopted by the department or liquor and cannabis board under the authority of this subsection have the same force and effect as if specifically included ((therein)) in law, unless declared invalid by the judgment of a court of record not appealed from.

(3) The department may employ such clerks, specialists, and other assistants as are necessary. Salaries and compensation of such employees ((shall)) must be fixed by the department and ((shall)) must be charged to the proper appropriation for the department.

(4) The department ((shall)) must exercise general supervision of the collection of taxes and, in the discharge of such duty, may institute and prosecute such suits or proceedings in the courts as may be necessary and proper.

Sec. 41. RCW 82.32.780 and 2010 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Taxpayers seeking to obtain a new reseller permit or to renew or reinstate a reseller permit, other than taxpayers subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.783, must apply to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department must use its best efforts to rule on applications within sixty days of receiving a complete application. If the department fails to rule on an application within sixty days of receiving a complete application, the taxpayer may either request a review as provided in subsection (6) of this section or resubmit the application. Nothing in this subsection may be construed as preventing the department from ruling on an application more than sixty days after the department received the application.

(b) An application must be denied if:

(i) The department determines that, based on the nature of the applicant's business, the applicant is not entitled to make purchases at wholesale or is otherwise prohibited from using a reseller permit;

(ii) The application contains any material misstatement; or

(iii) The application is incomplete.

(c) The department may also deny an application if it determines that denial would be in the best interest of collecting taxes due under this title.

(d) The department's decision to approve or deny an application may be based on tax returns previously filed with the department by the applicant, a current or previous examination of the applicant's books and records by the department, information provided by the applicant in the master application and the reseller permit application, and other information available to the department.

(e) The department must refuse to accept an application to renew a reseller permit that is received more than ninety days before the expiration of the reseller permit.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department may issue or renew a reseller permit for a taxpayer that has not applied for the permit or renewal of the permit if it appears to the department's satisfaction, based on the nature of the taxpayer's business activities and any other information available to the department, that the taxpayer is entitled to make purchases at wholesale.

(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reseller permits issued, renewed, or reinstated under this section will be valid for a period of forty-eight months from the date of issuance, renewal, or reinstatement.

(b)(i) A reseller permit is valid for a period of twenty-four months and may be renewed for the period prescribed in (a) of this subsection (3) if the permit is issued to a taxpayer who:

(A) Is not registered with the department under RCW 82.32.030;

(B) Has been registered with the department under RCW 82.32.030 for a continuous period of less than one year as of the date that the department received the taxpayer's application for a reseller permit;

(C) Was on nonreporting status as authorized under RCW 82.32.045(4) at the time that the department received the taxpayer's application for a reseller permit or to renew or reinstate a reseller permit;

(D) Has filed tax returns reporting no business activity for purposes of sales and business and occupation taxes for the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date that the department received the taxpayer's application for a reseller permit or to renew or reinstate a reseller permit; or

(E) Has failed to file tax returns covering any part of the twelve-month period immediately preceding the department's receipt of the taxpayer's application for a reseller permit or to renew or reinstate a reseller permit.

(ii) The provisions of this subsection (3)(b) do not apply to reseller permits issued to any business owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe or by an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe, if the business does not engage in any business activity that subjects the business to any tax imposed by the state under chapter 82.04 RCW. Permits issued to such businesses are valid for the period provided in (a) of this subsection (3).

(iii) Nothing in this subsection (3)(b) may be construed as affecting the department's right to deny a taxpayer's application for a reseller permit or to renew or reinstate a reseller permit as provided in subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section.

(c) A reseller permit is no longer valid if the permit holder's certificate of registration is revoked, the permit holder's tax reporting account is closed by the department, or the permit holder otherwise ceases to engage in business.

(d) The department may provide by rule for a uniform expiration date for reseller permits issued, renewed, or reinstated under this section, if the department determines that a uniform expiration date for reseller permits will improve administrative efficiency for the department. If the department adopts a uniform expiration date by rule, the department may extend or shorten the twenty-four or forty-eight month period provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection for a period not to exceed six months as necessary to conform the reseller permit to the uniform expiration date.

(4)(a) The department may revoke a taxpayer's reseller permit for any of the following reasons:

(i) The taxpayer used or allowed or caused its reseller permit to be used to purchase any item or service without payment of sales tax, but the taxpayer or other purchaser was not entitled to use the reseller permit for the purchase;

(ii) The department issued the reseller permit to the taxpayer in error;

(iii) The department determines that the taxpayer is no longer entitled to make purchases at wholesale; or

(iv) The department determines that revocation of the reseller permit would be in the best interest of collecting taxes due under this title.

(b) The notice of revocation must be in writing and is effective on the date specified in the revocation notice. The notice must also advise the taxpayer of its right to a review by the department.

(c) The department may refuse to reinstate a reseller permit revoked under (a)(i) of this subsection until all taxes, penalties, and interest due on any improperly purchased item or service have been paid in full. In the event a taxpayer whose reseller permit has been revoked under this subsection reorganizes, the new business resulting from the reorganization is not entitled to a reseller permit until all taxes, penalties, and interest due on any improperly purchased item or service have been paid in full.

(d) For purposes of this subsection, "reorganize" or "reorganization" means: (i) The transfer, however effected, of a majority of the assets of one business to another business where any of the persons having an interest in the ownership or management in the former business maintain an ownership or management interest in the new business, either directly or indirectly; (ii) a mere change in identity or form of ownership, however effected; or (iii) the new business is a mere continuation of the former business based on significant shared features such as owners, personnel, assets, or general business activity.

(5) The department may provide the public with access to reseller permit numbers on its web site, including the name of the permit holder, the status of the reseller permit, the expiration date of the permit, and any other information that is disclosable under RCW 82.32.330(3)(((l))) (k).

(6) The department must provide by rule for the review of the department's decision to deny, revoke, or refuse to reinstate a reseller permit or the department's failure to rule on an application within the time prescribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section. Such review must be consistent with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(7) As part of its continuing efforts to educate taxpayers on their sales and use tax responsibilities, the department will educate taxpayers on the appropriate use of a reseller permit or other documentation authorized under RCW 82.04.470 and the consequences of misusing such permits or other documentation.

Sec. 42. RCW 82.60.025 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless:

(1) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or

(2)(a) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;

(b) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual ((survey)) tax performance report required under RCW 82.60.070; and

(c) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and the lessee.

Sec. 43. RCW 82.60.063 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, a person is not liable for the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for an investment project when the person temporarily ceases to use its qualified buildings and qualified machinery and equipment for manufacturing or research and development activities in a county with a population of less than twenty thousand persons for a period not to exceed twenty-four months from the date that the department sent its assessment for the amount of outstanding deferred taxes to the taxpayer.

(2) The relief from repayment of deferred taxes under this section does not apply unless the number of qualified employment positions maintained at the investment project after manufacturing or research and development activities are temporarily ceased is at least ten percent of the number of qualified employment positions employed at the investment project at the time the deferral was approved by the department. If a person has been approved for more than one deferral under this chapter, relief from repayment of deferred taxes under this section does not apply unless the number of qualified employment positions maintained at the investment project after manufacturing or research and development activities are temporarily ceased is at least ten percent of the highest number of qualified employment positions at the investment project at the time any of the deferrals were approved by the department. If, at any time during the twenty-four month period after the department has sent the taxpayer an assessment for outstanding deferred taxes resulting from the person temporarily ceasing to use its qualified buildings and qualified machinery and equipment for manufacturing or research and development activities, the number of qualified employment positions falls below the ten percent threshold in this subsection, the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for the project is immediately due.

(3) The lessor of an investment project for which a deferral has been granted under this chapter who has passed the economic benefits of the deferral to the lessee is not eligible for relief from the payment of deferred taxes under this section.

(4) A person seeking relief from the payment of deferred taxes under this section must apply to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The application required under this subsection must be received by the department within thirty days of the date that the department sent its assessment for outstanding deferred taxes resulting from the person temporarily ceasing to use its qualified buildings and qualified machinery and equipment for manufacturing or research and development activities. The department must approve applications that meet the requirements in this section for relief from the payment of deferred taxes.

(5) A person is entitled to relief under this section only once.

(6) A person whose application for relief from the payment of deferred taxes has been approved under this section must continue to file an annual ((survey)) tax performance report as required under RCW 82.60.070(1) or any successor statute. In addition, the person must file, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, a report on the status of the business and the outlook for commencing manufacturing or research and development activities.

Sec. 44. RCW 82.63.010 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 5 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing and developing of computing hardware and software, including innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from handheld calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.

(2) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.

(3) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this chapter.

(4) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for specific uses.

(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(6) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital communications and imaging devices.

(7) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project which either initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current operation by expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility. The lessor or owner of the qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless:

(a) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or

(b)(i) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;

(ii) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual ((survey)) tax performance report required under RCW 82.63.020(2); and

(iii) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and the lessee.

(8) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.

(9)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for:

(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving the economic benefit of the deferral;

(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in subsection (7) of this section; or

(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing, site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit for the construction of the foundation of the building.

(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of construction" ((shall apply)) applies separately to each phase.

(10) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction or improvement of the project.

(11) "Multiple qualified buildings" means qualified buildings leased to the same person when such structures: (a) Are located within a five-mile radius; and (b) the initiation of construction of each building begins within a sixty-month period.

(12) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030 and includes state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(13) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device technology, advanced materials, and environmental technology other than for commercial sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sale" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

(14) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development, including plant offices and other facilities that are an essential or an integral part of a structure used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development. If a building or buildings are used partly for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development, and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral ((shall be)) is determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department. Such rules may include provisions for determining the amount of the deferral based on apportionment of costs of construction of an investment project consisting of a building or multiple buildings, where qualified research and development or pilot scale manufacturing activities are shifted within a building or from one building to another building.

(15)(a) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment, instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product, formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For purposes of this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be either new to the taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the certificate holder, except that used machinery and equipment may be treated as qualified machinery and equipment if the certificate holder either brings the machinery and equipment into Washington or makes a retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in Washington or elsewhere.

(b) "Qualified machinery and equipment" does not include any fixtures, equipment, or support facilities, if the sale to or use by the recipient is not eligible for an exemption under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 solely because the recipient is an ineligible person as defined in RCW 82.08.02565.

(16) "Qualified research and development" means research and development performed within this state in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device technology, and environmental technology.

(17) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this chapter.

(18) "Research and development" means activities performed to discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine activities concerned with translating technological information into new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions, or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include adaptation or duplication of existing products where the products are not substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the term include surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.

Sec. 45. RCW 82.74.010 and 2006 c 354 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this chapter.

(2) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse owned or operated by a wholesaler or third-party warehouser as those terms are defined in RCW 82.08.820 to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, dairy products, seafood products, or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly marketing.

(3) "Dairy product" means dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein.

(4) "Dairy product manufacturing" means manufacturing, as defined in RCW 82.04.120, of dairy products.

(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(6) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the project. The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless (a) the underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or (b)(i) the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced rent payments, and (ii) the lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual ((survey)) tax performance report under RCW 82.74.040. The economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee may be evidenced by any type of payment, credit, or any other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and the lessee.

(7) "Fresh fruit and vegetable processing" means manufacturing as defined in RCW 82.04.120 which consists of the canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and/or vegetables.

(8)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for:

(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving the economic benefit of the deferral;

(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in subsection (6) of this section; or

(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing, site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit for the construction of the foundation of the building.

(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of construction" applies separately to each phase.

(9) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, cold storage warehousing, and research and development activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory, plant, or laboratory used for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, cold storage warehousing, or research and development. If a building is used partly for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, cold storage warehousing, or research and development and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral ((shall be)) is determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.

(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, cold storage ((warehouse)) warehousing, or research and development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.

(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this chapter.

(13) "Research and development" means the development, refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or process related to fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, or cold storage warehousing before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

(14) "Seafood product" means any edible marine fish and shellfish that remains in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state.

(15) "Seafood product manufacturing" means the manufacturing, as defined in RCW 82.04.120, of seafood products.

Sec. 46. RCW 82.75.010 and 2010 c 114 s 145 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this chapter.

(2) "Biotechnology" means a technology based on the science of biology, microbiology, molecular biology, cellular biology, biochemistry, or biophysics, or any combination of these, and includes, but is not limited to, recombinant DNA techniques, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms.

(3) "Biotechnology product" means any virus, therapeutic serum, antibody, protein, toxin, antitoxin, vaccine, blood, blood component or derivative, allergenic product, or analogous product produced through the application of biotechnology that is used in the prevention, treatment, or cure of diseases or injuries to humans.

(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the project.

(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless:

(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or

(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;

(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual ((survey)) tax performance report required under RCW 82.75.070; and

(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and the lessee.

(6)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for:

(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving the economic benefit of the deferral;

(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section; or

(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.

(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing, site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit for the construction of the foundation of the building.

(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of construction" applies separately to each phase.

(7) "Manufacturing" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.120.

(8) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or related article, including any component, part, or accessory, that is designed or developed and:

(a) Recognized in the national formulary, or the United States pharmacopeia, or any supplement to them;

(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease, or in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other conditions in human beings or other animals; or

(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or other animals, and which does not achieve any of its primary intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body of human beings or other animals and which is not dependent upon being metabolized for the achievement of any of its principal intended purposes.

(9) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.

(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities, including plant offices, commercial laboratories for process development, quality assurance and quality control, and warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if the facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory, plant, or laboratory used for biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing. If a building is used partly for biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral must be determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.

(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.

(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this chapter.

Sec. 47. RCW 82.82.010 and 2008 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this chapter.

(2) "Corporate headquarters" means a facility or facilities where corporate staff employees are physically employed, and where the majority of the company's management services are handled either on a regional or a national basis. Company management services may include: Accounts receivable and payable, accounting, data processing, distribution management, employee benefit plan, financial and securities accounting, information technology, insurance, legal, merchandising, payroll, personnel, purchasing procurement, planning, reporting and compliance, research and development, tax, treasury, or other headquarters-related services. "Corporate headquarters" does not include a facility or facilities used for manufacturing, wholesaling, or warehousing.

(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(4) "Eligible area" means a designated community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.31C.020.

(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in a qualified building or buildings in an eligible area, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, which will have employment at the qualified building or buildings of at least three hundred employees in qualified employment positions, each of whom must earn for the year reported at least the average annual wage for the state for that year as determined by the employment security department.

(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building or buildings is not eligible for a deferral unless:

(i) The underlying ownership of the building or buildings vests exclusively in the same person; or

(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;

(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual ((survey)) tax performance report required under RCW 82.82.020; and

(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and the lessee.

(6) "Investment project" means a capital investment of at least thirty million dollars in a qualified building or buildings including tangible personal property and fixtures that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of their construction, and including labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the project.

(7) "Manufacture" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.120.

(8) "Operationally complete" means a date no later than one year from the date the project is issued an occupancy permit by the local permit issuing authority.

(9) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.

(10) "Qualified building or buildings" means construction of a new structure or structures or expansion of an existing structure or structures to be used for corporate headquarters. If a building is used partly for corporate headquarters and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral is determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.

(11) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.

(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this chapter.

(13) "Warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage for compensation.

(14) "Wholesale sale" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.060.

Sec. 48. RCW 82.85.030 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless:

(1) The underlying ownership of the building, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or

(2)(a) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee;

(b) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual ((survey)) tax performance report required under RCW ((82.32.585)) 82.32.534; and

(c) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and the lessee.

Sec. 49. RCW 82.85.080 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this chapter must file a complete annual ((survey)) tax performance report with the department under RCW ((82.32.585)) 82.32.534. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.85.030, the lessee must file a complete annual ((survey)) tax performance report, and the applicant is not required to file a complete annual ((survey)) tax performance report.

(2) If, on the basis of a ((survey)) tax performance report under RCW ((82.32.585)) 82.32.534 or other information, the department finds that an investment project is not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter due to the fact the investment project is no longer used for qualified activities, the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for the investment project is immediately due and payable.

(3) If the economic benefits of a tax deferral under this chapter are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.85.030, the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.

Sec. 50. RCW 84.36.840 and 2016 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to determine whether organizations, associations, corporations, or institutions, except those exempted under RCW 84.36.020, 84.36.049, and 84.36.030, are exempt from property taxes, and before the exemption is allowed for any year, the superintendent or manager or other proper officer of the organization, association, corporation, or institution claiming exemption from taxation must file with the department of revenue a statement certifying that the income and the receipts thereof, including donations to it, have been applied to the actual expenses of operating and maintaining it, or for its capital expenditures, and to no other purpose. This report must also include a statement of the receipts and disbursements of the exempt organization, association, corporation, or institution.

(2) ((Educational institutions claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.050 must also file a list of all property claimed to be exempt, the purpose for which it is used, the revenue derived from it for the preceding year, the use to which the revenue was applied, the number of students who attended the school or college, the total revenues of the institution with the source from which they were derived, and the purposes to which the revenues were applied, listing the items of such revenues and expenditures in detail.

(3))) The reports required under ((subsections (1) and (2) of)) this section may be submitted electronically, in a format provided or approved by the department, or mailed to the department. The reports must be submitted on or before March 31st of each year. The department must remove the tax exemption from the property of any organization, association, corporation, or institution that does not file the required report with the department on or before the due date. However, the department must allow a reasonable extension of time for filing upon receipt of a written request on or before the required filing date and for good cause shown therein.

Sec. 51. RCW 84.37.040 and 2007 sp.s. c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each claimant electing to defer payment of special assessments or real property tax obligations, or both, under this chapter ((shall)) must file with the county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department and supplied by the assessor, a written declaration thereof. The declaration to defer special assessments and/or real property taxes for any year ((shall)) must be filed no later than the first day of September of the year for which the deferral is sought((: PROVIDED, That)); however, for good cause shown, the department may waive this requirement.

(2) The declaration ((shall)) must designate the property to which the deferral applies, and ((shall)) must include a statement setting forth (a) a list of all members of the claimant's household, (b) the claimant's equity value in his or her residence, (c) facts establishing the eligibility for the deferral under the provisions of this chapter, and (d) any other relevant information required by the rules of the department. ((Each copy shall)) The declaration must be signed by the claimant subject to the penalties as provided in chapter 9A.72 RCW for false swearing.

(3) The county assessor ((shall)) must determine if each claimant ((shall be)) is granted a deferral for each year but the claimant ((shall have)) has the right to appeal this determination to the county board of equalization, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038, whose decision ((shall be)) is final as to the deferral of that year.

Sec. 52. RCW 84.38.040 and 2013 c 23 s 353 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each claimant electing to defer payment of special assessments and/or real property tax obligations under this chapter ((shall)) must file with the county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department and supplied by the assessor, a written declaration thereof. The declaration to defer special assessments and/or real property taxes for any year ((shall)) must be filed no later than thirty days before the tax or assessment is due or thirty days after receiving notice under RCW 84.64.050, whichever is later((: PROVIDED, That)); however, for good cause shown, the department may waive this requirement.

(2) The declaration ((shall)) must designate the property to which the deferral applies, and ((shall)) must include a statement setting forth (a) a list of all members of the claimant's household, (b) the claimant's equity value in his or her residence, (c) facts establishing the eligibility for the deferral under the provisions of this chapter, and (d) any other relevant information required by the rules of the department. ((Each copy shall)) The declaration must be signed by the claimant subject to the penalties as provided in chapter 9A.72 RCW for false swearing. The first declaration to defer filed in a county ((shall)) must include proof of the claimant's age acceptable to the assessor.

(3) The county assessor ((shall)) must determine if each claimant ((shall be)) is granted a deferral for each year but the claimant ((shall have)) has the right to appeal this determination to the county board of equalization, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038, whose decision ((shall be)) is final as to the deferral of that year.

Sec. 53. RCW 84.38.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 214 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Declarations to defer property taxes for all years following the first year may be made by filing with the county assessor no later than thirty days before the tax is due a renewal form ((in duplicate)), prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor, which affirms the continued eligibility of the claimant.

(b) In January of each year, the county assessor ((shall)) must send to each claimant who has been granted deferral of ad valorem taxes for the previous year renewal forms and notice to renew.

(2) Declarations to defer special assessments ((shall)) must be made by filing with the assessor no later than thirty days before the special assessment is due on a form to be prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor. Upon approval, the full amount of special assessments upon such claimant's residence ((shall)) must be deferred but not to exceed an amount equal to eighty percent of the claimant's equity value in said property.

Sec. 54. RCW 84.38.110 and 1984 c 220 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The county assessor ((shall)) must:

(1) Immediately transmit ((one)) a copy of each declaration to defer to the department of revenue. The department may audit any declaration and ((shall)) must notify the assessor as soon as possible of any claim where any factor appears to disqualify the claimant for the deferral sought.

(2) Transmit ((one)) a copy of each declaration to defer a special assessment to the local improvement district which imposed such assessment.

(3) Compute the dollar tax rate for the county as if any deferrals provided by this chapter did not exist.

(4) As soon as possible notify the department of revenue and the county treasurer of the amount of real property taxes deferred for that year and notify the department of revenue and the respective treasurers of municipal corporations of the amount of special assessments deferred for each local improvement district within such unit.

Sec. 55. RCW 84.39.020 and 2005 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each claimant applying for assistance under RCW 84.39.010 ((shall)) must file a claim with the department, on forms prescribed by the department, no later than thirty days before the tax is due. The department may waive this requirement for good cause shown. The department ((shall)) must supply forms to the county assessor to allow persons to apply for the program at the county assessor's office.

(2) The claim ((shall)) must designate the property to which the assistance applies and ((shall)) must include a statement setting forth (a) a list of all members of the claimant's household, (b) facts establishing the eligibility under this section, and (c) any other relevant information required by the rules of the department. ((Each copy shall)) The claim must be signed by the claimant subject to the penalties as provided in chapter 9A.72 RCW for false swearing. The first claim ((shall)) must include proof of the claimant's age acceptable to the department.

(3) The following documentation ((shall)) must be filed with a claim along with any other documentation required by the department:

(a) The deceased veteran's DD 214 report of separation, or its equivalent, that must be under honorable conditions;

(b) A copy of the applicant's certificate of marriage to the deceased;

(c) A copy of the deceased veteran's death certificate; and

(d) A letter from the United States veterans' administration certifying that the death of the veteran meets the requirements of RCW 84.39.010(2).

(4) The department of veterans affairs ((shall)) must assist an eligible widow or widower in the preparation and submission of an application and the procurement of necessary substantiating documentation.

(((4))) (5) The department ((shall)) must determine if each claimant is eligible each year. Any applicant aggrieved by the department's denial of assistance may petition the state board of tax appeals to review the denial and the board ((shall)) must consider any appeals to determine (a) if the claimant is entitled to assistance and (b) the amount or portion thereof.

Sec. 56. RCW 84.39.030 and 2005 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Claims for assistance for all years following the first year may be made by filing with the department no later than thirty days before the tax is due a renewal form ((in duplicate)), prescribed by the department, that affirms the continued eligibility of the claimant.

(2) In January of each year, the department ((shall)) must send to each claimant who has been granted assistance for the previous year a renewal form((s)) and notice to renew.

Sec. 57. RCW 84.56.150 and 1961 c 15 s 84.56.150 are each amended to read as follows:

If any person, firm, or corporation ((shall remove)) removes from one county to another in this state personal property ((which)) that has been assessed in the former county for a tax ((which)) that is unpaid at the time of such removal, the treasurer of the county from which the property is removed ((shall)) must certify to the treasurer of the county to which the property has been ((removed)) moved a statement of the tax together with all delinquencies and penalties.

Sec. 58. RCW 82.32.805 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every new tax preference expires on the first day of the calendar year that is subsequent to the calendar year that is ten years from the effective date of the tax preference. With respect to any new property tax exemption, the exemption does not apply to taxes levied for collection beginning in the calendar year that is subsequent to the calendar year that is ten years from the effective date of the tax preference.

(b) A future amendment that expands a tax preference does not extend the tax preference beyond the period provided in this subsection unless an extension is expressly and unambiguously stated in the amendment.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if legislation creating a new tax preference includes an expiration date for the new tax preference or an exemption from this section in its entirety or from the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, whether or not such exemption is codified.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any existing tax preference that is amended to clarify an ambiguity or correct a technical inconsistency. Future enacted legislation intended to make such clarifications or corrections must explicitly indicate this intent.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "New tax preference" means a tax preference that initially takes effect after August 1, 2013, or a tax preference in effect as of August 1, 2013, that is expanded or extended after August 1, 2013, even if the expanding or extending amendment includes any other change to the tax preference.

(b) "Tax preference" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.136.021 with respect to any state tax administered by the department, except does not include the Washington estate and transfer tax in chapter 83.100 RCW.

(5) The department must provide written notice to the office of the code reviser of a ten-year expiration date required under this section for a new tax preference.

Sec. 59. RCW 82.32.808 and 2017 c 135 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As provided in this section, every bill enacting a new tax preference must include a tax preference performance statement, unless the legislation enacting the new tax preference contains an explicit exemption from the requirements of this section.

(2) A tax preference performance statement must state the legislative purpose for the new tax preference. The tax preference performance statement must indicate one or more of the following general categories, by reference to the applicable category specified in this subsection, as the legislative purpose of the new tax preference:

(a) Tax preferences intended to induce certain designated behavior by taxpayers;

(b) Tax preferences intended to improve industry competitiveness;

(c) Tax preferences intended to create or retain jobs;

(d) Tax preferences intended to reduce structural inefficiencies in the tax structure;

(e) Tax preferences intended to provide tax relief for certain businesses or individuals; or

(f) A general purpose not identified in (a) through (e) of this subsection.

(3) In addition to identifying the general legislative purpose of the tax preference under subsection (2) of this section, the tax preference performance statement must provide additional detailed information regarding the legislative purpose of the new tax preference.

(4) A new tax preference performance statement must specify clear, relevant, and ascertainable metrics and data requirements that allow the joint legislative audit and review committee and the legislature to measure the effectiveness of the new tax preference in achieving the purpose designated under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) If the tax preference performance statement for a new tax preference indicates a legislative purpose described in subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section, any taxpayer claiming the new tax preference must file an annual tax performance report in accordance with RCW 82.32.534.

(6)(a) Taxpayers claiming a new tax preference must report the amount of the tax preference claimed by the taxpayer to the department as otherwise required by statute or determined by the department as part of the taxpayer's regular tax reporting responsibilities. For new tax preferences allowing certain types of gross income of the business to be excluded from business and occupation or public utility taxation, the tax return must explicitly report the amount of the exclusion, regardless of whether it is structured as an exemption or deduction, if the taxpayer is otherwise required to report taxes to the department on a monthly or quarterly basis. For a new sales and use tax exemption, the total purchase price or value of the exempt product or service subject to the exemption claimed by the buyer must be reported on an addendum to the buyer's tax return if the buyer is otherwise required to report taxes to the department on a monthly or quarterly basis and the buyer is required to submit an exemption certificate, or similar document, to the seller.

(b) This subsection does not apply to:

(i) Property tax exemptions;

(ii) Tax preferences required by constitutional law;

(iii) Tax preferences for which the tax benefit to the taxpayer is less than one thousand dollars per calendar year; or

(iv) Taxpayers who are annual filers.

(c) The department may waive the filing requirements of this subsection for taxpayers who are not required to file electronically any return or report under this chapter.

(7)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the amount claimed by a taxpayer for any new tax preference is subject to public disclosure and is not considered confidential tax information under RCW 82.32.330, if the reporting periods subject to disclosure ended at least twenty-four months prior to the date of disclosure and the taxpayer is required to report the amount of the tax preference claimed by the taxpayer to the department under subsection (6) of this section.

(b)(i) The department may waive the public disclosure requirement under (a) of this subsection (7) for good cause. Good cause may be demonstrated by a reasonable showing of economic harm to a taxpayer if the information specified under this subsection is disclosed. The waiver under this subsection (7)(b)(i) only applies to the new tax preferences provided in chapter 13, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.

(ii) The amount of the tax preference claimed by a taxpayer during a calendar year is confidential under RCW 82.32.330 and may not be disclosed under this subsection if the amount for the calendar year is less than ten thousand dollars.

(c) In lieu of the disclosure and waiver requirements under this subsection, the requirements under RCW 82.32.534 apply to any tax preference that requires a tax performance report.

(8) If a new tax preference does not include the information required under subsections (2) through (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee is not required to perform a tax preference review under chapter 43.136 RCW, and it is legislatively presumed that it is the intent of the legislature to allow the new tax preference to expire upon its scheduled expiration date.

(9) For the purposes of this section, "tax preference" and "new tax preference" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.32.805.

(10) The provisions of this section do not apply to the extent that legislation creating a new tax preference provides an exemption, in whole or in part, from this section, whether or not such exemption is codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 60. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 82.04.4322 (Deductions—Artistic or cultural organization—Compensation from United States, state, etc., for artistic or cultural exhibitions, performances, or programs) and 1981 c 140 s 1;

(2) RCW 82.04.4324 (Deductions—Artistic or cultural organization—Deduction for tax under RCW 82.04.240—Value of articles for use in displaying art objects or presenting artistic or cultural exhibitions, performances, or programs) and 1981 c 140 s 2;

(3) RCW 82.04.4326 (Deductions—Artistic or cultural organizations—Tuition charges for attending artistic or cultural education programs) and 1981 c 140 s 3;

(4) RCW 82.08.02081 (Exemptions—Audio or video programming) and 2009 c 535 s 502;

(5) RCW 82.08.02082 (Exemptions—Digital products or services—Ingredient or component—Made available for free) and 2017 c 323 s 517, 2010 c 111 s 401, & 2009 c 535 s 503;

(6) RCW 82.08.02087 (Exemptions—Digital goods and services—Purchased for business purposes) and 2010 c 111 s 402 & 2009 c 535 s 504;

(7) RCW 82.08.02088 (Exemptions—Digital products—Business buyers—Concurrently available for use within and outside state) and 2017 c 323 s 518 & 2009 c 535 s 701;

(8) RCW 82.12.02081 (Exemptions—Audio or video programming) and 2009 c 535 s 602;

(9) RCW 82.12.02082 (Exemptions—Digital products or services—Made available for free to general public) and 2017 c 323 s 521, 2010 c 111 s 501, & 2009 c 535 s 603;

(10) RCW 82.12.02084 (Exemptions—Digital goods—Use by students) and 2009 c 535 s 604;

(11) RCW 82.12.02085 (Exemptions—Digital goods—Noncommercial—Internal audience—Not for sale) and 2009 c 535 s 605;

(12) RCW 82.12.02086 (Exemptions—Digital products or codes—Free of charge) and 2009 c 535 s 606;

(13) RCW 82.12.02087 (Exemptions—Digital goods, codes, and services—Used for business purposes) and 2010 c 111 s 502 & 2009 c 535 s 607;

(14) RCW 82.32.755 (Sourcing compliance—Taxpayer relief—Interest and penalties—Streamlined sales and use tax agreement) and 2007 c 6 s 1601;

(15) RCW 82.32.760 (Sourcing compliance—Taxpayer relief—Credits—Streamlined sales and use tax agreement) and 2007 c 6 s 1602;

(16) RCW 82.66.010 (Definitions) and 1995 c 352 s 1;

(17) RCW 82.66.020 (Application for deferral—Contents—Ruling) and 1995 c 352 s 2;

(18) RCW 82.66.040 (Repayment schedule—Interest, penalties) and 1998 c 339 s 1 & 1995 c 352 s 4;

(19) RCW 82.66.050 (Applications not confidential) and 1995 c 352 s 6;

(20) RCW 82.66.060 (Administration) and 1995 c 352 s 5; and

(21) RCW 82.66.901 (Effective date—1995 c 352) and 1995 c 352 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 61. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 82.58.005 (Findings);

(2) RCW 82.58.901 (Effective date—2002 c 267 §§ 1-9); and

(3) RCW 82.58.902 (Contingent effective date—2002 c 267 §§ 10 and 11).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 62. Section 38 of this act takes effect January 1, 2022.

--- END ---