BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that farmers, farmworkers, and the broader community share an interest in minimizing human exposure to pesticide.

(2) The legislature recognizes that huge gains in minimizing human exposure have been made by the agricultural industry through a combination of scientific advancements, ongoing education and training, usage of safety equipment, improved technologies, and proper monitoring and regulation. In 2014, the legislature created a temporary farm work group that included representatives of both growers and workers. The 2014 farm work group jointly identified administrative recommendations to minimize public health issues posed by pesticide drift. The 2014 farm work group recognized that following necessary operating procedures and best management practices, thorough operator training, and good communication prevents or greatly reduces pesticide drift exposure. Through such collaborative efforts, the state has had significant gains in decreasing pesticide exposure on farms.

(3) The legislature finds that collaboration between state agencies and the farming community can assist in further minimizing exposure of agricultural workers to pesticide drift.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A pesticide application safety work group is established to develop recommendations for improving the safety of pesticide applications. The work group shall:

(a) Review existing state and federal laws regulating pesticide safety and application;

(b) Arrange for a presentation on new pesticide application technology and review other technologies used throughout the nation to increase pesticide application safety;

(c) Review the structure of the former pesticide incident reporting and tracking review panel created under RCW 70.104.080 (repealed) to determine whether a similar group should be created; and

(d) Review current data and reports from Washington state agencies and relevant agencies in other states that may be helpful in developing strategies to improve pesticide application safety.

(2) The work group is composed of:

(a) One member and one alternate from each of the two largest caucuses in the senate, who shall be appointed by the majority leader and minority leader of the senate;

(b) One member and one alternate from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of representatives, who shall be appointed by the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives;

(c) One representative from each of the following agencies:

(i) The department of agriculture;

(ii) The department of health;

(iii) The department of labor and industries;

(iv) The department of natural resources; and

(v) The commission on Hispanic affairs.

(3)(a) The secretary of the department of health and the director of the department of agriculture may invite individuals to participate in the work group in an advisory capacity. There is no limit to the number of individuals who may participate in work group meetings in an advisory capacity under this subsection.

(b) The following may have an interest in participating in an advisory role:

(i) An organization representing producers of a crop that uses airblast sprayers;

(ii) An organization representing producers of a crop that uses fumigation;

(iii) An organization representing producers of a crop that uses aerial application;

(iv) An organization representing timber producers;

(v) An aerial applicator or pilot;

(vi) An organization representing farmworkers;

(vii) An organization representing labor;

(viii) An organization representing children's health advocacy;

(ix) An organization representing environmental interests;

(x) The University of Washington Latino center for health; and

(xi) Washington State University.

(4) The work group shall be cochaired by two of the legislative members, one from each major party and one from each house.

(5) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the department of health and the department of agriculture.

(6) Legislative members of the work group are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The work group shall provide a report that includes any findings, recommendations, and draft legislation, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, by November 1, 2018.

(8) This section expires December 31, 2018.

--- END ---