BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.68.090 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the fuel tax must be first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount must be distributed monthly by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (8) of this section.

(a) For payment of refunds of fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;

(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the fuel tax, which sums must be distributed monthly.

(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(1) must be distributed as set forth in (a) through (j) of this subsection.

(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;

(b)(i) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will require bond financing to complete construction.

(ii) The following criteria, listed in order of priority, must be used in determining which special category C projects have the highest priority:

(A) Accident experience;

(B) Fatal accident experience;

(C) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and

(D) Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.

(iii) Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under this subsection (2)(b);

(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;

(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;

(e) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;

(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;

(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there must be distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW 47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;

(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds must be distributed by the county road administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each county and must be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road administration board must adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management system is used;

(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.

(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(2) must be distributed to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).

(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(3) must be distributed as follows:

(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and

(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.

(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(4) must be distributed as follows:

(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and

(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.

(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (5) and (6) must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.

(7) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (7) and (8) must be distributed as follows:

(a) 1.180 percent must be distributed to the transportation improvement board in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;

(b) 0.590 percent must be distributed to the county road administration board in accordance with subsection (2)(i) of this section;

(c) 0.590 percent must be distributed to the county road administration board in accordance with RCW 36.79.020;

(d) Eight million five hundred eleven thousand dollars per biennium must be distributed by the state treasurer to the freight mobility investment account created in RCW 46.68.300;

(e) Eight million five hundred eleven thousand dollars per biennium must be distributed by the state treasurer to the freight mobility multimodal account created in RCW 46.68.310; and

(f) The remainder must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395.

(8) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise taxes on fuel.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.325 and 2017 c 313 s 710 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The rural mobility grant program account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.100.

(2) Beginning September 2011, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the rural mobility grant program account two million five hundred thousand dollars.

(3) ((During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the rural mobility grant program account.)) Beginning with September 2019, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the rural mobility grant program account four million four hundred three thousand dollars.

(4) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the rural mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.68.320 and 2010 c 247 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The regional mobility grant program account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.030.

(2) Beginning with September 2007, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional mobility grant program account five million dollars.

(3) Beginning with September 2015, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional mobility grant program account six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(4) ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the regional mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the regional mobility grant program account.)) Beginning with September 2019, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional mobility grant program account nine million seven hundred ten thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 47.66 RCW to read as follows:

MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION ACCOUNT—TRANSFERS. (1) On July 1, 2019, and by each July 1st thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070:

(a) Seven million three hundred thirty-five thousand dollars to the complete streets grant program account created in RCW 47.04.325;

(b) Five million one hundred ninety thousand dollars to the bicycle and pedestrian grant account created in section 5 of this act.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2031.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

BICYCLE AND PEDESTRIAN GRANT ACCOUNT. (1) The bicycle and pedestrian grant account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Only the department of transportation may authorize expenditures from the account. The department of transportation may use the bicycle and pedestrian grant account funds for making awards to local governments.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2031.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June 30, 2031.

--- END ---