BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.525.166 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7018 are each amended to read as follows:

Allocations to school districts of state funds provided by RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall be made by the superintendent of public instruction and the amount of state funding assistance to a school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined in the following manner:

(1) The boards of directors of the districts shall determine the total cost of the proposed project, which cost may include the cost of acquiring and preparing the site, the cost of constructing the building or of acquiring a building and preparing the same for school use, the cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to the project, necessary architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for contingencies and for other necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the total cost of the project shall be subject to review and approval by the superintendent.

(2) The state funding assistance percentage for a school district shall be computed by the following formula:

(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil shall be subtracted from three, and then the result of the foregoing shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil).

District adjusted

Total state

3-valuation

÷

adjusted valuation

Computed

per pupil

per pupil

State

State

=

————

= - %

Funding

Ratio

District adjusted

Total state

Assistance

3+valuation

÷

adjusted valuation

per pupil

per pupil

((PROVIDED, That)) (b)(i) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, in the event the state funding assistance percentage to any school district based on the above formula is less than ((twenty)) twenty-five percent and such school district is otherwise eligible for state funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180, the superintendent ((may)) must establish for such district a state funding assistance percentage not in excess of ((twenty)) twenty-five percent of the approved cost of the project((, if the superintendent finds that such additional assistance is necessary to provide minimum facilities for housing the pupils of the district)).

(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, in the event the state funding assistance percentage to any school district based on the above formula is less than thirty percent and such school district is otherwise eligible for state funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180, the superintendent must establish for such district a state funding assistance percentage not in excess of thirty percent of the approved cost of the project.

(3) In addition to the computed state funding assistance percentage developed in subsection (2) of this section, a school district shall be entitled to additional percentage points determined by the average percentage of growth for the past three years. One percent shall be added to the computed state funding assistance percentage for each percent of growth, with a maximum of twenty percent.

(4) In computing the state funding assistance percentage in subsection (2) of this section and adjusting the percentage under subsection (3) of this section, students residing outside the school district who are enrolled in alternative learning experience courses under RCW 28A.232.010 shall be excluded from the count of total pupils. In lieu of the exclusion in this subsection, a district may submit an alternative calculation for excluding students enrolled in alternative learning experience courses. The alternative calculation must show the student headcount use of district classroom facilities on a regular basis for a reasonable duration by out-of-district alternative learning experience students subtracted by the headcount of in-district alternative learning experience students not using district classroom facilities on a regular basis for a reasonable duration. The alternative calculation must be submitted in a form approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop rules to define "regular basis" and "reasonable duration."

(5) The approved cost of the project determined in the manner prescribed in this section multiplied by the state funding assistance percentage derived as provided for in this section shall be the amount of state funding assistance to the district for the financing of the project: PROVIDED, That need therefor has been established to the satisfaction of the superintendent: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That additional state funding assistance may be allowed if it is found by the superintendent, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel that such assistance is necessary in order to meet (a) a school housing emergency resulting from the destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation of a school building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden excessive and clearly foreseeable future increase in school population, or other conditions similarly emergent in nature; or (b) a special school housing burden resulting from projects of statewide significance or imposed by virtue of the admission of nonresident students into educational programs established, maintained and operated in conformity with the requirements of law; or (c) a deficiency in the capital funds of the district resulting from financing, subsequent to April 1, 1969, and without benefit of the state funding assistance provided by prior state assistance programs, the construction of a needed school building project or projects approved in conformity with the requirements of such programs, after having first applied for and been denied state funding assistance because of the inadequacy of state funds available for the purpose, or (d) a condition created by the fact that an excessive number of students live in state owned housing, or (e) a need for the construction of a school building to provide for improved school district organization or racial balance, or (f) conditions similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection, creating a like emergency.

(6) ((For the 2015-2017 biennium, schools determined to have a lack of sufficient space to provide science classrooms or labs, to meet the requirements of law, have a special housing burden condition similar to those defined under subsection (5)(b) of this section, creating a like emergency. For the 2015-2017 biennium, school districts are entitled to additional percentage points for school construction projects that have a special housing burden condition only and have received private donations in the form of cash, in-kind, or equipment of more than one hundred thousand dollars. The additional percentage points are determined by (a) school district student enrollments in the free and reduced-price meals program, (b) school district class as defined by RCW 28A.300.065, and (c) the funding assistance percentage as calculated in subsection (2) of this section. The additional percentage points under (a) of this subsection are twenty percent of the percent of student enrollments eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program. The additional percentage points under (b) of this subsection are ten for second class school districts. The additional percentage points under (c) of this subsection are ten for school districts with funding assistance percentages of more than fifty percent.)) The state construction cost allocation used in calculating state assistance for construction of school facilities shall be provided as follows:

(a) Two hundred thirty-two dollars and twenty-three cents in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020;

(b) Two hundred thirty-eight dollars and fifty cents in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2021;

(c) Two hundred forty-four dollars and eighty-six cents in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022;

(d) Two hundred fifty-one dollars and twenty-one cents in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023;

(e) Two hundred seventy-two dollars in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024;

(f) Two hundred eighty-seven dollars in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025;

(g) Three hundred twelve dollars in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026;

(h) Three hundred twenty-two dollars in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027; and

(i) Beginning with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, and thereafter, the state construction cost allocation used in calculating state assistance for construction of school facilities shall be based on the average cost of new construction at the time of bid of the projects funded by the school construction assistance program in the previous fiscal year adjusted for a construction inflation factor. The superintendent of public instruction must work with the office of financial management to determine the annual construction inflation factor.

(7) State funding assistance in the construction of school facilities for grade kindergarten through grade twelve and classrooms planned for the exclusive use of students with disabilities shall be based on a space allocation per enrolled student and shall be provided as follows:

(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020:

(i) One hundred ten square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred seventeen square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred thirty square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred forty-four square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities;

(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2021:

(i) One hundred twenty square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred seventeen square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred thirty square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred forty-four square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities;

(c) For fiscal year ending June 30, 2022:

(i) One hundred thirty square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred thirty square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred forty square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred forty-six square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities;

(d) For fiscal year ending June 30, 2023:

(i) One hundred forty square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred thirty-five square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred forty-five square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred forty-eight square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities;

(e) For fiscal year ending June 30, 2024:

(i) One hundred forty square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred forty square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred fifty square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred fifty square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities;

(f) For fiscal year ending June 30, 2025:

(i) One hundred forty square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred forty-five square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred fifty-five square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred fifty-five square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities;

(g) For fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:

(i) One hundred forty square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred fifty square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred sixty square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred sixty square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities; and

(h) For fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and thereafter:

(i) One hundred forty square feet maximum per student in kindergarten through grade six;

(ii) One hundred fifty-five square feet maximum per student in grades seven and eight;

(iii) One hundred sixty-five square feet maximum per student in grades nine through twelve; and

(iv) One hundred sixty-five square feet maximum per student in any grade for classrooms for students with developmental disabilities.

(8) Space allocations for state funding assistance purposes for districts with fewer than four hundred students in kindergarten through grade eight or fewer than four hundred students in senior or four-year high schools shall be provided as follows:

Number of Headcount

Students—Grades Kindergarten – 8

Maximum Space Allocation

Per Facility

1-200

42,000 square feet

201-300

48,000 square feet

301-399

52,000 square feet

Number of Headcount

Students—Grades 9-12

Maximum Space Allocation

Per Facility

1-200

42,000 square feet

201-300

48,000 square feet

301-399

52,000 square feet

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2019.

--- END ---