BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that as part of the feasibility study for a community and technical college in Graham, Washington, authorized under section 605, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., the Graham proviso pilot project was a successful first step towards achieving the goal of providing access to higher education for the Graham community, an unserved part of the second legislative district and college district 11 in south Pierce county. The legislature finds that the feasibility study and Graham proviso pilot project yielded successful results. During the winter and spring quarters of 2017, the Graham proviso pilot project served one hundred thirty-two students, the majority of whom were place-bound running start and older returning students, unable to take advantage of Washington's institutions of higher education. The legislature further finds that continuing the feasibility study will provide students and adults in the Graham community the opportunity to not only increase their educational opportunities, but also to gather information and further the availability of a community and technical college in south Pierce county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The state board of community and technical colleges shall continue the feasibility study for a potential new community and technical college within ten miles of Graham, Washington, authorized by section 605, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. The feasibility study shall be accomplished by continuing to expand enrollment and classes at the Graham-Kapowsin high school and gathering data, such as enrollment numbers, future class interest, and student profile data, from students who participate. The feasibility study shall be conducted for an additional two years and specifically address the intent of pursuing the establishment of a community college in the Graham community. The state board of community and technical colleges shall report to the legislature regarding the feasibility of installing a community and technical college within ten miles of Graham, Washington, by December 31, 2018.

--- END ---