BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.522 and 2001 c 300 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of vehicular assault if he or she operates or drives any vehicle:

(a) In a reckless manner and causes substantial bodily harm to another; or

(b) While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW 46.61.502, and causes substantial bodily harm to another; or

(c) With disregard for the safety of others and causes substantial bodily harm to another; or

(d) With the disregard for the safety of others and causes substantial bodily harm to a vulnerable user of a public way.

(2) Vehicular assault is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) As used in this section((,)):

(a) "Substantial bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.

(b) "Vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.61.526.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the Leprechaun Cain act.

--- END ---