BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of transportation shall cease operations of the express toll lanes on Interstate 405 for ninety consecutive days, to commence no later than September 1, 2018. During the temporary shutdown of the express toll lanes, the department shall allow all vehicles to travel in all lanes of Interstate 405 between Lynnwood and Bellevue. The department shall conduct adequate public outreach prior to the ninety-day change and shall modify the facility's operation by changing the messaging on the electronic signage to inform drivers the lanes are open to all, similar to the current procedure when operations change for the weekend or evening hours.

(2) The department shall continue to collect corridor data in the same way and aggregate the data solely for the ninety-day period of the temporary shutdown of the express toll lanes. A report for this ninety-day period summarizing the same performance measures as the first twenty-four month period quarterly performance updates, including applicable performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4), is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 7, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act expires July 1, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---