BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that midwives provide high value care. The legislature intends to ensure the number of practicing midwives continues to grow, and that no person is prevented from entering the practice of midwifery due to the cost of licensure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.50 RCW to read as follows:

Initial application fees and renewal fees for licensure as a midwife must be set by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 and must not exceed five hundred twenty-five dollars annually per license.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.50.050 and 1996 c 191 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

Applicants shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary as provided by ((RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.50.102 and 2014 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensed midwife must renew his or her license according to the following requirements:

(a) Completion of a minimum of thirty hours of continuing education, approved by the secretary, every three years;

(b) Proof of participation in a Washington state coordinated quality improvement program as detailed in rule;

(c) Proof of participation in data submission on perinatal outcomes to a national or state research organization, as detailed in rule; and

(d) Fees determined by the secretary as provided in ((RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280)) section 2 of this act.

(2) The secretary shall write rules regarding the renewal requirements and the department's process for verification of the third-party data submission.

--- END ---