BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) In accordance with RCW 43.330.700(5)(a), it is the goal of the legislature, that beginning January 1, 2020, any youth discharged from a public system of care in our state will be discharged into safe and stable housing, and that this policy applies to any judicial proceeding through which the youth has been committed to the public system of care or in any collateral proceeding that involves the custody of the youth in that system.

(2) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs must develop a plan to ensure that, by December 31, 2019, no youth is discharged from a public system of care into homelessness. The plan must specify actions that state agencies will need to take, any necessary statutory and funding legislative action, and the assignment of those specific state agency actions to effectuate all parts of the plan. By December 31, 2018, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs must issue the plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor. The governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature must respond to the plan by March 31, 2019.

--- END ---