BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) The office of clean technology at Washington State University shall convene a sustainable aviation biofuels work group.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from the senate to the work group.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from the house of representatives to the work group.

(b) The office of clean technology at Washington State University, in consultation with the legislative members, shall designate work group members that represent sectors involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research, development, production, and utilization from at least the following:

(i) An agriculture advocacy organization;

(ii) An airline operator;

(iii) An airplane manufacturer;

(iv) An airport operator located in western Washington and an airport operator located in eastern Washington;

(v) Biofuels feedstock producers;

(vi) Two biofuels producers;

(vii) The department of agriculture;

(viii) The department of commerce;

(ix) The department of natural resources;

(x) A sustainable energy advocacy organization;

(xi) The United States department of defense;

(xii) The University of Washington;

(xiii) Washington State University; and

(xiv) The Pacific Northwest national laboratory.

(c) The work group shall choose its chair from among its membership.

(2) The purpose of the work group is to:

(a) Further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a productive industry in Washington, using as a foundation the regional assessment prepared by the collaborative known as the sustainable aviation fuels northwest;

(b) Facilitate communication and coordination among aviation biofuels stakeholders;

(c) Provide a forum for discussion and problem solving regarding potential and current barriers related to technology development, production, distribution, supply chain development, and commercialization of aviation biofuels; and

(d) Provide recommendations to the legislature on potential legislation that will facilitate the technology development, production, distribution, and commercialization of aviation biofuels.

(3) The work group shall meet twice a year.

(4) The work group shall provide an update of its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each odd year through 2023.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2023.

--- END ---