BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.74 RCW to read as follows:

All records obtained and all reports produced, as required by this chapter, are not subject to disclosure through the public records act under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.56.460 and 2005 c 274 s 426 are each amended to read as follows:

All records obtained and all reports produced as required by state fireworks law, chapter 70.77 RCW, and the Washington state explosives act, chapter 70.74 RCW, are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

--- END ---