BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the growing number of options of venue for consumers in Washington state to give birth is positive. With more options, there are also more opportunities for consumers to become confused by the term "birth center." "Birth center" is applied to hospital labor and delivery units, labor and delivery units in separate structures on hospital campuses, and to licensed birth centers. Birth data is easily confused by having different birth venue types with the same name. For these reasons, it is the intent of the legislature to provide clarity for consumers.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.46.010 and 2000 c 93 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) "Birthing center," "birth center," or "childbirth center" means any health facility, not part of a hospital or in a hospital, that provides facilities and staff to support a birth service to low-risk maternity clients((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this chapter shall not apply to any hospital approved by the American College of Surgeons, American Osteopathic Association, or its successor)).

(2) "Department" means the state department of health.

(3) "Low-risk" means normal, uncomplicated prenatal course as determined by adequate prenatal care and prospects for a normal uncomplicated birth as defined by reasonable and generally accepted criteria of maternal and fetal health.

(4) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.46.020 and 2000 c 93 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

((After July 1, 1951,)) (1) No person shall operate a birthing center in this state without a license under this chapter.

(2) No person may advertise as or claim to be a "birthing center," "birth center," or "childbirth center" unless licensed under this chapter.

--- END ---