BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that great advances have been made in medical technology and treatment of the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). HIV is treatable and a person living with HIV can lead a relatively healthy life, if they have access to health care and are able to achieve viral suppression. Additionally, if a person's virus is undetectable, he or she is unable to transmit the virus. It is critical that people are tested for HIV. Therefore, the legislature finds that any and all barriers to HIV testing must be removed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 70.24.330 (HIV testing—Consent, exceptions) and 1988 c 206 s 702; and

(2) RCW 70.24.335 (HIV testing—Opt-out screening) and 2016 c 60 s 2.

--- END ---