BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Part I

Repealing the Sales and Use Tax Exemption for Candy

Sec. 101. RCW 82.08.0293 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 28 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does not include:

(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume;

(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco; and

(c) Marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, candy, or dietary supplements. The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a safety sealed container or package for human consumption. Bottled water is calorie free and does not contain sweeteners or other additives except that it may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii) fluoride; (iii) carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes; (v) oxygen; (vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts, or essences derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes water that is delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is not sold with the water.

(b) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" does not include any preparation containing flour and does not require refrigeration.

(c) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that:

(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:

(A) A vitamin;

(B) A mineral;

(C) An herb or other botanical;

(D) An amino acid;

(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; or

(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in this subsection;

(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and

(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.

(((c))) (d)(i) "Prepared food" means:

(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food; or

(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item, except:

(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller; or

(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.

(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating utensils provided by the seller:

(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the "North American industry classification system—United States, 2002";

(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item; or

(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.

(((d))) (e) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" means a facility:

(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on August 1, 2009;

(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485; and

(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code.

(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.

(b) For soft drinks, bottled water, and hot prepared food and food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales tax rate expressed as a decimal.

(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 102. RCW 82.12.0293 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 28 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft drinks, bottled water, candy, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft drinks," "bottled water," "candy," and "dietary supplements" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.

(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section applies to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6);

(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or

(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must compile a list of products meeting the definition of candy in RCW 82.08.0293 and products that are similar to candy but do not meet that definition. The list must identify each item as either subject to sales or use tax or not subject to sales or use tax. The list will be made in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must be made available on the department's internet web site. The list must also provide information about how to request a binding ruling from the department on the taxability of products not on the list.

(2) In compiling the list described in subsection (1) of this section, the department may:

(a) Evaluate the experiences of other member states of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement that impose retail sales tax on candy;

(b) Accept technical assistance from persons that sell, market, or distribute candy; and

(c) Consider any other resource the department finds useful in compiling the list.

(3) The creation of a list under subsection (1) of this section and any modifications to the list are not subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) For products that are not identified on the list created by the department under subsection (1) of this section, taxpayers may request a binding written ruling from the department on the taxability of the product.

Part II

Limiting the Limit Trade-In Exclusion

Sec. 201. RCW 82.08.010 and 2014 c 140 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)(a)(i) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means the total amount of consideration, ((except separately stated trade-in property of like kind,)) including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the following: (A) The seller's cost of the property sold; (B) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (C) charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation charges; (D) delivery charges; and (E) installation charges.

(ii) When tangible personal property is rented or leased under circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the "selling price" must be determined as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe;

(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include:

(i) The value of separately stated trade-in property of like kind, up to a maximum amount of ten thousand dollars;

(ii) Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;

(iii) Interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; and

(iv) Any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;

(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration received by the seller from a third party if:

(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;

(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;

(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and

(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:

(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate, or documentation is presented;

(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or

(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the purchaser;

(2)(a) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or principal, except "seller" does not mean:

(i) The state and its departments and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and institutions; or

(ii) A professional employer organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale at retail that is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be the seller and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client," "covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and "professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.04.540;

(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association, society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;

(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal property or services for preparation and delivery to a location designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including, but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and packing;

(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address;

(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state," "within this state," "marijuana," "useable marijuana," and "marijuana-infused products" applies equally to the provisions of this chapter;

(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software;

(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7);

(9) The definitions in RCW 82.04.192 apply to this chapter;

(10) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, whenever the terms "property" or "personal property" are used, those terms must be construed to include digital goods and digital codes unless:

(a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property;

(b) It is clear from the context that the term "property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property, real property, or both; or

(c) To construe the term "property" or "personal property" as including digital goods and digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd, or strained consequences; and

(11) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease, or subrent.

(12) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture," "horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to include or relate to marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

Part III

Narrowing the Nonresident Sales and Use Tax Exemption

Sec. 301. RCW 82.08.0273 and 2014 c 140 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to)) Subject to the conditions and limitations in this section, an exemption from the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 in the form of a remittance from the department is provided for sales to nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital codes((, when)). The exemption only applies if:

(a) The property is for use outside this state;

(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United States, other than the state of Washington; and

(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose, or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax, use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities, or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or

(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection, provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of their residence; and

(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department ((of revenue)) access to such records and other forms of verification at ((his or her)) the purchaser's place of residence to assure that such purchases are not first used substantially in the state of Washington.

(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the seller certifies in writing to the purchaser that the separately stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property and service. All of the ((requirements)) provisions in subsections (1) and (3) through (((6))) (7) of this section apply to this subsection.

(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section must ((display proof of his or her current nonresident status as provided in this section)) pay the state and local sales tax to the seller at the time of purchase and then request a remittance from the department in accordance with this subsection and subsection (4) of this section. A request for remittance must include proof of the person's status as a nonresident at the time of the purchase for which a remittance is requested. The request for a remittance must also include any additional information and documentation as required by the department, which may include a description of the item purchased for which a remittance is requested, the sales price of the item, the amount of sales tax paid on the item, the date of the purchase, the name of the seller and the physical address where the sale took place, and copies of sales receipts showing the qualified purchases.

(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection (3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.

(((c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(4)(a) Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which must show the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.

(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.

(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on such purchases.

(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.

(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW)) (4)(a)(i) Beginning January 1, 2019, through December 31, 2019, a person may request a remittance from the department for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington between April 1, 2018, and December 31, 2018.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2020, a person may request a remittance from the department during any calendar year for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington during the immediately preceding calendar year only. No application may be made with respect to purchases made before the immediately preceding calendar year.

(b) The remittance request, including proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information required by the department, must be provided in a form and manner as prescribed by the department. Only one remittance request may be made by a person per calendar year.

(c) The total amount of a remittance request must be at least twenty-five dollars. The department must deny any request for a remittance that is less than twenty-five dollars.

(d) The department will examine the applicant's proof of nonresident status and any other documentation and information as required in the application to determine whether the applicant is entitled to a remittance under this section.

(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements to the department, which includes the offer of fraudulent or fraudulently procured identification or fraudulent sales receipts, in order to receive a remittance of retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(b) Any person obtaining a remittance of retail sales tax from the department by providing proof of identification or sales receipts not the person's own, or counterfeit identification or sales receipts is (i) liable for repayment of the remittance, including interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW from the date the remittance was transmitted to the person until repaid in full, (ii) liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the amount of the remittance obtained in violation of this subsection (5)(b), and (iii) ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(c) Any person assisting another person in obtaining a remittance of retail sales tax in violation of (b) of this subsection (5) is jointly and severally liable for amounts due under (b) of this subsection (5) and is also ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(6) A person who receives a refund of sales tax from the seller for any reason with respect to a purchase made in this state is not entitled to a remittance for the tax paid on the purchase. A person who receives both a remittance under this section and a refund of sales tax from the seller with respect to the same purchase must immediately repay the remittance to the department. Interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW applies to amounts due under this section from the date that the department made the remittance until the amount due under this subsection is paid to the department. A person who receives a remittance with respect to a purchase for which the person had, at the time the person submitted the application for a remittance, already received a refund of sales tax from the seller is also liable for a civil penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the amount of the remittance obtained in violation of this subsection (6) and is ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under this section.

(7) The exemption provided by this section is only for the state portion of the sales tax. For purposes of this section, the state portion of the sales tax is not reduced by any local sales tax that is deducted or credited against the state sales tax as provided by law.

(((7))) (8) The exemption in this section does not apply to sales of marijuana, useable marijuana, or marijuana-infused products.

Part IV

Narrowing the Sales Tax Exemption for Certain Fertilizers, Sprays, and Washes

Sec. 401. RCW 82.04.050 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 37 s 1201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:

(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or

(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or

(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.

(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.

(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.

(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;

(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;

(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(b) Credit bureau services;

(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;

(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and

(g)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (g)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:

(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;

(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as advertising, massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW;

(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;

(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;

(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(g). For purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(H) Yoga, chi gong, or martial arts classes, training, or events held at a community center, park, school gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any other facility that is not operated within and as part of an athletic or fitness facility.

(iii) Nothing in (g)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).

(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g), the following definitions apply:

(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.

(B) "Martial arts" means any of the various systems of training for physical combat or self-defense. "Martial arts" includes, but is not limited to, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, Krav Maga, boxing, kickboxing, jujitsu, shootfighting, wrestling, aikido, judo, hapkido, Kendo, tai chi, and mixed martial arts.

(C) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant. "Physical fitness activities" includes participating in yoga, chi gong, or martial arts.

(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.

(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.

(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.

(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:

(i) Custom software; or

(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.

(c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.

(ii)(A) The service described in (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.

(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.

(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:

(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.

(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(11) The term also does not include sales of:

(a) Chemical sprays or washes ((to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of)), fertilizer, and spray materials as provided in section 402 of this act; and

(b) Feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees((, and spray materials)) to: (((a))) (i) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, ((and)) or the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;

(((b))) (ii) Farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product;

(((c))) (iii) Farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and

(((d))) (iv) Farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:

(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.

(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;

(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;

(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;

(v) Batting cage activities;

(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;

(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;

(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;

(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;

(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);

(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;

(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW ((43.215.010)) 43.216.010;

(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;

(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;

(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;

(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and

(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.

(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:

(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed twenty-one days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;

(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or

(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age eighteen, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As provided by RCW 82.04.050(11), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include sales of:

(a) Registered chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay; and

(b) Registered fertilizer and spray materials to:

(i) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, or the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;

(ii) Farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; and

(iii) Farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section:

(a) "Brand name materials list" means a list established by the state department of agriculture of materials allowed for use in organic production, processing, or handling under standards of the national organic program.

(b) "National organic program" means a program authorized by the organic foods production act of 1990, as amended, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq., and the rules adopted thereunder for agricultural products marketed and labeled using the term "organic" or a derivative of the term "organic."

(c) "Registered" means registration by the state department of agriculture and inclusion in the brand name materials list as provided under RCW 15.86.130.

Part V

Reducing the Estate Tax Threshold

Sec. 501. RCW 83.100.020 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Applicable exclusion amount" means:

(i) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents dying before January 1, 2006;

(ii) Two million dollars for estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006, and before January 1, 2014; ((and))

(iii) For estates of decedents dying in calendar year 2014 ((and each calendar year thereafter)), and before April 1, 2018, the amount in (a)(ii) of this subsection must be adjusted annually, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(a)(iii). The annual adjustment is determined by multiplying two million dollars by one plus the percentage by which the most recent October consumer price index exceeds the consumer price index for October 2012, and rounding the result to the nearest one thousand dollars. No adjustment is made for a calendar year if the adjustment would result in the same or a lesser applicable exclusion amount than the applicable exclusion amount for the immediately preceding calendar year. The applicable exclusion amount under this subsection (1)(a)(iii) for the decedent's estate is the applicable exclusion amount in effect as of the date of the decedent's death; and

(iv) One million dollars for estates of decedents dying on or after April 1, 2018, adjusted annually beginning in calendar year 2020, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(a)(iv). The annual adjustment is determined by multiplying one million dollars by one plus the percentage by which the most recent October consumer price index exceeds the consumer price index for October 2018, and rounding the result to the nearest one thousand dollars. No adjustment is made for a calendar year if the adjustment would result in the same or a lesser applicable exclusion amount than the applicable exclusion amount for the immediately preceding calendar year. The applicable exclusion amount under this subsection (1)(a)(iv) for the decedent's estate is the applicable exclusion amount in effect as of the date of the decedent's death.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, "consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers, all items, for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton metropolitan area as calculated by the United States bureau of labor statistics.

(2) "Decedent" means a deceased individual.

(3) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority lawfully delegated to him or her by the director.

(4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 of the internal revenue code.

(5) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code.

(6) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as determined under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code without regard to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210 of the internal revenue code or any other provision of law, and (b) the deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes allowable under section 2058 of the internal revenue code.

(7) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in section 2031 of the internal revenue code.

(8) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal revenue code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005.

(9) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver, cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership, joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof.

(10) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the internal revenue code, such as the personal representative of an estate.

(11) "Property" means property included in the gross estate.

(12) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at time of death.

(13) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed under this chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax under RCW 83.100.120.

(14) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the internal revenue code and includes any shifting upon death of the economic benefit in property or any power or legal privilege incidental to the ownership or enjoyment of property. However, "transfer" does not include a qualified heir disposing of an interest in property qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing to use the property for farming purposes.

(15) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable estate and includes, but is not limited to, the value of any property included in the gross estate under section 2044 of the internal revenue code, regardless of whether the decedent's interest in such property was acquired before May 17, 2005, (a) plus amounts required to be added to the Washington taxable estate under RCW 83.100.047, (b) less: (i) The applicable exclusion amount; (ii) the amount of any deduction allowed under RCW 83.100.046; (iii) amounts allowed to be deducted from the Washington taxable estate under RCW 83.100.047; and (iv) the amount of any deduction allowed under RCW 83.100.048.

Part VI

Imposing a Graduated Real Estate Excise Tax

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. (1) This section is the tax preference performance statement for the tax preference contained in section 602, chapter . . ., Laws of 2018 (section 602 of this act). This performance statement is only intended to be used for subsequent evaluation of the tax preference. It is not intended to create a private right of action by any party or to be used to determine eligibility for preferential tax treatment.

(2) The legislature categorizes this tax preference as one intended to provide tax relief for certain businesses or individuals, as indicated in RCW 82.32.808(2)(e).

(3) It is the legislature's specific public policy objective to reduce the tax burden on individuals and businesses who sell real property subject to the real estate excise tax.

(4) If the review finds that more than one thousand transactions in the state per year are experiencing tax relief from the preferential excise tax rates in section 602(1)(a) of this act, then the legislature intends to extend the expiration date of this tax preference.

(5) In order to obtain the data necessary to perform the review in subsection (4) of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may refer to any data collected by the state.

Sec. 602. RCW 82.45.060 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Until January 1, 2034, there is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the ((rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling price.)) following rates multiplied by the selling price:

(a) Three-quarters percent if the selling price is less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars;

(b) One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent if the selling price is equal to or greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than one million dollars;

(c) Two percent if the selling price is equal to or greater than one million dollars but less than five million dollars; or

(d) Two and one-half percent if the selling price is equal to or greater than five million dollars.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2034, there is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling price.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2023, an amount equal to two percent of the proceeds of this tax revenue remaining after the calculations and deposits made pursuant to section 603(2) of this act must be deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050, and an amount equal to four and one-tenth percent of this tax revenue remaining after the calculations and deposits made pursuant to section 603(2) of this act must be deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230. Thereafter, an amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of this tax revenue remaining after the calculations and deposits made pursuant to section 603(2) of this act to the state treasurer must be deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax revenue remaining after the calculations and deposits made pursuant to section 603(2) of this act to the state treasurer must be deposited in the city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

By the last workday of the second and fourth calendar quarters, the state treasurer must transfer the amount specified in this section from the general fund to the education legacy trust account. The first transfer under this section must occur by December 31, 2018. By December 15th and by June 15th of each fiscal year, the department must estimate the net increase in state general fund revenues from the changes made under part VI of this act for the applicable six-month period of the current fiscal year and the same six-month period of fiscal year 2018 and notify the state treasurer of the increase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 43.135.034(4) does not apply to the transfers under section 603 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605. A new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW to read as follows:

The purpose of part VI of this act is to levy revenues for the support of education-related expenditures from the education legacy trust account. For this reason, general state revenues transferred to the education legacy trust account under section 603 of this act are excluded from the calculation of general state revenues for purposes of Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 39.42.130 and 39.42.140.

Part VII

Imposing a Carbonated Beverage Tax

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)(a) "Carbonated beverage" means any packaged nonalcoholic liquid intended for human consumption that contains carbonation by natural or artificial means and any of the following substances: Caffeine, extracts, fruit juice or concentrated fruit juice, herbs, sweeteners, or syrup. "Packaged" includes cans, bottles, and other similar sealed containers. "Syrup" means a concentrated mixture in either liquid or powdered form that contains sugar or a sugar substitute and that is an ingredient used to make carbonated beverages.

(b) "Carbonated beverage" does not include carbonated bottled water. For the purpose of this subsection, "bottled water" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.0293.

(2) "Ounce" means United States fluid ounce.

(3) "Previously taxed carbonated beverages" means carbonated beverages to which the tax under this chapter has been previously imposed.

(4) Except for terms defined in this section, the definitions in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. (1) A tax is imposed on every person for the privilege of selling, at wholesale or retail, carbonated beverages in this state. The rate of the tax is equal to two cents per twelve ounces of carbonated beverages sold in this state.

(2)(a) In calculating the amount of tax due under this section, if the total amount of carbonated beverages sold in this state during the reporting period is not a whole number, the taxable quantity must be rounded as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) For a fraction of an ounce that is equal to or greater than one-half ounce, the taxable quantity must be rounded up to the nearest ounce. For a fraction of an ounce that is less than one-half ounce, the taxable quantity must be rounded down to the nearest ounce.

(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this section. The tax reporting frequency for the tax imposed in this section must coincide with the taxpayer's reporting frequency for the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW.

(4) The department may require taxpayers to report the taxable quantity of carbonated beverages in units of measure other than ounces.

(5) The tax imposed in this section is in addition to all other taxes imposed in this title on the same taxable event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703. (1) The tax imposed in this chapter does not apply to any successive sale of previously taxed carbonated beverages.

(2) Any person claiming the exemption provided in this section must maintain documentation establishing that the carbonated beverages were previously taxed under this chapter. The documentation may be in the form of information on the invoice, or certification from the previous seller, stating: (a) That all or a specific stated portion of the carbonated beverages were previously subject to the tax imposed in this chapter; and (b) the amount of tax remitted or to be remitted to the department in respect of the carbonated beverages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704. The tax imposed in this chapter does not apply to any activity or person that the state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or laws of the United States.

Part VIII

Imposing a Luxury Tax on Expensive Passenger Motor Vehicles

Sec. 801. RCW 82.08.020 and 2014 c 140 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of:

(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services, if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;

(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and

(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale.

(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.

(((4))) (b) For purposes of this subsection (3) ((of this section)), "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:

(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of marijuana;

(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;

(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and

(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.

(4)(a) In addition to the taxes imposed in subsections (1) and (3) of this section, there is levied and collected an additional tax on the sale of a passenger motor vehicle if:

(i) The selling price of the passenger motor vehicle exceeds fifty thousand dollars; or

(ii) In the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, the fair market value of the passenger motor vehicle exceeds fifty thousand dollars at the inception of the lease.

(b) The additional tax imposed in this subsection applies regardless of whether the vehicle is used for personal, business, or other purposes.

(c) The additional tax imposed in this subsection only applies to the portion of the selling price in excess of fifty thousand dollars, or in the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, the fair market value of the passenger motor vehicle in excess of fifty thousand dollars at the inception of the lease.

(d) For purposes of this subsection, "passenger motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is designed for carrying ten or fewer passengers, including cars, light trucks, limousines, motorcycles, motor homes, passenger vans, and sport utility vehicles. For purposes of this subsection (4)(d), the definitions in chapter 46.04 RCW apply.

(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.

(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail sales of the same property.

(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 802. RCW 82.12.020 and 2017 c 323 s 520 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer any:

(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within this state;

(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both;

(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(c), excluding services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(c) that are provided free of charge;

(d) Extended warranty; or

(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service, including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:

(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of use.

(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(c), if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.

(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:

(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor;

(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;

(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or

(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services, which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.

(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

(5) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person" includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.

(6)(a) The tax imposed in this section at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(4) applies to the use of a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 82.08.020(4) on the value of the passenger motor vehicle in excess of fifty thousand dollars at the time that it is first used in this state by the consumer.

(b) "Value of the passenger motor vehicle" means the fair market value of the passenger motor vehicle. In the case of a leased passenger motor vehicle in which the consumer is required to make periodic lease payments, "value of the passenger motor vehicle" means the fair market value of the passenger motor vehicle at the inception of the lease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803. The additional sales and use tax imposed in sections 801 and 802 of this act applies only to passenger motor vehicles acquired by the taxpayer on or after the effective date of this section. In the case of leased passenger motor vehicles, the additional sales and use tax imposed in sections 801 and 802 of this act applies only with respect to leases entered into by the taxpayer on or after the effective date of this section.

Part IX

Reducing the State Property Tax

Sec. 901. RCW 84.52.065 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state ((shall)) must levy for collection in the following year for the support of common schools of the state a tax of three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue.

(2)(a) In addition to the tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section, the state must levy an additional property tax for the support of common schools of the state.

(i) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2018 through 2021, the rate of tax is the rate necessary to bring the aggregate rate for state property tax levies levied under this subsection and subsection (1) of this section to a combined rate of two dollars and ((seventy)) twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue.

(ii) For taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2022 and thereafter, the tax authorized under this subsection (2) is subject to the limitations of chapter 84.55 RCW.

(b) Taxes collected under this subsection (2) must be deposited into the state general fund.

(3) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2019 through 2021, the state property taxes levied under subsections (1) and (2) of this section are not subject to the limitations in chapter 84.55 RCW.

(4) For taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2022 and thereafter, the aggregate rate limit for state property taxes levied under subsections (1) and (2) of this section is three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue.

(5) For property taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2019 through 2021, the rate of tax levied under subsection (1) of this section is the actual rate that was levied for collection in calendar year 2018 under subsection (1) of this section.

(6) As used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes the payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction projects for the common schools.

Part X

Miscellaneous Provisions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. Part VII of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. Except for part IX of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. Part IX of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---