BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to increase the safety and well-being of our children and schools through the provisions of this act.

According to one analysis, more than one hundred fifty thousand students attending at least one hundred seventy schools have experienced a shooting on campus since the Columbine massacre in 1999, including shootings at both Marysville Pilchuck High School and Freeman High School in Spokane in the past three years. In 2016, a nineteen year old legally purchased a semiautomatic rifle in Washington and used it to murder three former classmates from Kamiak High School. In early 2018, an eighteen year old in Everett, Washington purchased a semiautomatic rifle that, according to charging documents, he intended to use in a school shooting at a high school in the area. According to news reports, he noted in his journal that it was "too (expletive) easy" to get a gun. Mass shootings involving the use of semiautomatic rifles across the United States, from Columbine in Colorado, to Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newton, Connecticut to Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland, Florida are tragedies that have resulted in dozens of lives lost, including scores of children, as well as lasting impacts like PTSD on those who were injured or witness to these horrific events.

The legislature finds that frequently, mass shootings at schools involve individuals who show warning signs. Programs that allow anonymous reporting of potentially unsafe or violent activities will help prevent school shootings before they occur. Providing funds to schools to implement emergency response systems will, in the unfortunate event a mass shooting at a school begins, provide for a more rapid and effective response.

The legislature also finds that according to research, eighteen to twenty year olds commit a disproportionate number of firearm homicides in the United States and are more likely to use firearms in violent crime. Federal law prohibits the sale of pistols to individuals under twenty-one and at least a dozen states further restrict the ownership or possession of firearms by individuals under the age of twenty-one. Studies show that shootings where semiautomatic rifles are used result in one hundred thirty-five percent more people shot and fifty-seven percent more people killed, compared with other mass shootings. Ensuring that purchasers of semiautomatic rifles are subject to the same purchase and background check requirements as handguns will help reduce the ability of potential mass shooters to inflict significant injury and death among innocent victims.

Part I - School Emergency Response Systems and Notification

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must develop and implement emergency response systems using evolving technology to expedite the response and arrival of law enforcement in the event of a threat or emergency at a school. Such a system must be consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.335.010. To the extent practicable, the system should be incorporated into, or interoperable with, the statewide first responder building mapping information system established in RCW 36.28A.060 and the students protecting students program established in section 6 of this act.

(2) Information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs pursuant to this section are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 3. RCW 28A.320.125 and 2017 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety for public schools and staff to have current safe school plans and procedures in place, fully consistent with federal law. The legislature further finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans to be in place, that school districts will become eligible for federal assistance. The legislature further finds that schools are in a position to serve the community in the event of an emergency resulting from natural disasters or man-made disasters.

(2) Schools and school districts shall consider the guidance provided by the superintendent of public instruction, including the comprehensive school safety checklist and the model comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention, intervention, all hazard/crisis response, and postcrisis recovery, when developing their own individual comprehensive safe school plans. Each school district shall adopt, no later than September 1, 2008, and implement a safe school plan consistent with the school mapping information system pursuant to RCW 36.28A.060. The plan shall:

(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;

(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery;

(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;

(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency management division of the state military department in collaboration with the Washington state office of the superintendent of public instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory committee;

(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident command system;

(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide emergency; and

(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and participate in safety-related drills.

(3) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall annually:

(a) Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local emergency response agencies;

(b) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;

(c) Update information on the school mapping information system to reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:

(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or are certified on the incident command system; and

(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation, to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems, parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and

(d) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency supplies and notification and alert procedures.

(4) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall annually record and report on the information and activities required in subsection (3) of this section to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.

(5) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale exercises within a four-year period.

(6)(a) Due to geographic location, schools have unique safety challenges. It is the responsibility of school principals and administrators to assess the threats and hazards most likely to impact their school, and to practice three basic functional drills, shelter-in-place, lockdown, and evacuation, as these drills relate to those threats and hazards. Some threats or hazards may require the use of more than one basic functional drill.

(b) Schools shall conduct at least one safety-related drill per month, including summer months when school is in session with students. These drills must teach students three basic functional drill responses:

(i) "Shelter-in-place," used to limit the exposure of students and staff to hazardous materials, such as chemical, biological, or radiological contaminants, released into the environment by isolating the inside environment from the outside;

(ii) "Lockdown," used to isolate students and staff from threats of violence, such as suspicious trespassers or armed intruders, that may occur in a school or in the vicinity of a school; and

(iii) "Evacuation," used to move students and staff away from threats, such as fires, oil train spills, or tsunamis.

(c) The drills described in (b) of this subsection must incorporate the following requirements:

(i) Use of the school mapping information system in at least one of the safety-related drills; and

(ii) A pedestrian evacuation drill for schools in mapped tsunami hazard zones.

(d) The drills described in (b) of this subsection may incorporate an earthquake drill using the state-approved earthquake safety technique "drop, cover, and hold."

(e) Schools shall document the date, time, and type (shelter-in-place, lockdown, or evacuate) of each drill required under this subsection (6), and maintain the documentation in the school office.

(f) This subsection (6) is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.

(7) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington emergency management division of the state military department.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are not limited to, provisions for evacuations, lockdowns, or other components of a comprehensive safe school plan.

(9)(a) Whenever a first responder agency notifies a school of a situation which may necessitate an evacuation or lockdown, the agency must also determine if other schools in the vicinity are similarly threatened and must notify every other school in the vicinity for which an evacuation or lockdown appears reasonably necessary. For purposes of this subsection, "school" includes a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(b) A first responder agency and its officers, agents, and employees are not liable for any act, or failure to act, under this subsection unless a first responder agency and its officers, agents, and employees acted with willful disregard.

Sec. 4. RCW 36.28A.080 and 2003 c 102 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Units of local government and their employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for damages arising out of the creation and use of the statewide first responder building mapping information system as provided in RCW 36.28A.060 or the emergency response system as provided in section 2 of this act, unless it is shown that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

Part II – Students Protecting Students

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By May 1, 2018, school districts must report the following information to the office of the superintendent of public instruction:

(a) Any incident alert and reporting system in use by the district; and

(b) If the district is not using an incident alert and reporting system as of the effective date of this section, the barriers that the district faces in implementing an incident alert and reporting system. Barriers may include lack of support, training, availability, awareness, or financial resources.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must compile the district information required under this section and report it to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2018, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(3) This section expires August 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must contract with a vendor to make available to public schools an incident alert and reporting system, by the 2019-20 school year. The incident alert and reporting system, named the students protecting students program, must have, at a minimum, the following features:

(a) Availability as a mobile application;

(b) Fast, secure, and anonymous reporting by students to school administrators of activities or the threat of activities that are inappropriate, unsafe, harmful, dangerous, unethical, or illegal;

(c) Two-way messaging;

(d) The ability to include text, image, and video in reports and messages;

(e) The ability to designate school administrators to receive and respond to reports; and

(f) Protection of the privacy of student data, consistent with federal and state laws.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must contract for updates to the students protecting students program as new technology is available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, beginning in the 2019-20 school year, and except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, school districts must implement the students protecting students program, created under section 6 of this act, in middle or junior high schools, and high schools.

(2) A school district that will be unable to implement the students protecting students program that is created in section 6 of this act, during the 2019-20 school year must submit a students protecting students implementation plan to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by the start of the 2019-20 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for damages resulting from the creation and use of the incident alert and reporting system provided in sections 5 and 6 of this act, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith.

Part III - Regional School Safety

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 28A.310 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, two educational service districts, selected by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in coordination with the nine educational service districts, must establish regional school safety centers as part of a statewide network, and as required under this section. One of the regional school safety centers must be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and one of the regional school safety centers must be located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(2) The purpose of this statewide network is to provide regional coordination of school safety efforts related to behavioral health threat assessment and suicide prevention across the state and to provide school safety resources related to behavioral health threat assessment and suicide prevention to the school districts in the region.

(3) The regional school safety centers must consult with the state school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction in order to unify discussions around safety across the state.

(4) For the purpose of implementing regional school safety centers, the two selected educational service districts must employ a behavioral health threat assessment coordinator.

(5) Private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW may contract with regional school safety centers for school safety resources and services.

(6) The regional school safety centers must provide technical assistance to school districts seeking funding for first aid, health, and safety and security resources including defibrillators and saws with automatic braking systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. RCW 28A.310.505 (Regional school safety and security programs) and 2016 c 240 s 6 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction in coordination with educational service districts will review safe schools plans for all school districts and educational service districts, and assess and document school district and regional school safety assets and needs.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide grants to educational service districts and school districts to develop or expand regional safety programs to address student safety.

(3) At a minimum, grant recipients must address development and documentation of comprehensive safe schools plans for districts and schools within their region which build on multitiered systems of support; incorporate best practices in threat assessment; include a process for notifying schools, including private schools, of safety emergencies; and make recommendations for appropriate safety technologies consistent with regional needs.

(4) By November 1, 2019, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature on the results of the statewide review of safe schools plans and on the activities, progress, and recommendations of the grant recipients.

Part IV - Facilitating School Resource Officers

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must establish and implement a grant program to fund school resource officers. Grants must be awarded to proposals submitted jointly between local law enforcement agencies and public school entities. Grant applications must be reviewed using peer review panels. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may prioritize grant applications that include local matching funds.

(2) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the program. The report must include information on grant recipients, use of grant funds, and feedback from grant recipients by December 1st of each year the program is funded.

(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs from soliciting or accepting private funds to support the purposes of the program created in this section.

Part V – Annual School Safety Summit

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.300.273 and 2016 c 240 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the school safety advisory committee shall hold annual school safety summits. Each annual summit must focus on establishing and monitoring the progress of a statewide plan for funding cost-effective methods for school safety that meet local needs and takes into account the discrete challenges of nonrural and rural schools. Other areas of focus may include planning and implementation of school safety planning efforts, training of school safety professionals, and integrating mental health and security measures. Summit participants must review Sandy Hook promise programs and make recommendations for the prevention of mass shootings in schools.

(2) Summit participants must be appointed no later than August 1, 2016.

(a) The majority and minority leaders of the senate shall appoint two members from each of the relevant caucuses of the senate.

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(c) The governor shall appoint one representative.

(3) Other summit participants may include representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the criminal justice training commission, the department of health, educational service districts, educational associations, private schools, emergency management, law enforcement, fire departments, parent organizations, and student organizations.

(4) Staff support for the annual summit shall be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the school safety advisory committee.

(5) Legislative members of the summit are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

Part VI – Semiautomatic Rifles

Sec. 14. RCW 9.41.010 and 2017 c 264 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(2) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.

(3) "Crime of violence" means:

(a) Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second degree;

(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(4) "Curio or relic" has the same meaning as provided in 27 C.F.R. Sec. 478.11.

(5) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of his or her personal collection of firearms.

(6) "Family or household member" means "family" or "household member" as used in RCW 10.99.020.

(7) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this state.

(8) "Felony firearm offender" means a person who has previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state of any felony firearm offense. A person is not a felony firearm offender under this chapter if any and all qualifying offenses have been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate, or rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence.

(9) "Felony firearm offense" means:

(a) Any felony offense that is a violation of this chapter;

(b) A violation of RCW 9A.36.045;

(c) A violation of RCW 9A.56.300;

(d) A violation of RCW 9A.56.310;

(e) Any felony offense if the offender was armed with a firearm in the commission of the offense.

(10) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder. "Firearm" does not include a flare gun or other pyrotechnic visual distress signaling device, or a powder-actuated tool or other device designed solely to be used for construction purposes.

(11) "Gun" has the same meaning as firearm.

(12) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol.

(13) "Lawful permanent resident" has the same meaning afforded a person "lawfully admitted for permanent residence" in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20).

(14) "Licensed collector" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(b).

(15) "Licensed dealer" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a).

(16) "Loaded" means:

(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;

(b) Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the firearm;

(c) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;

(d) There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or

(e) There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle loader.

(17) "Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt, or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.

(18) "Nonimmigrant alien" means a person defined as such in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15).

(19) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, club, organization, society, joint stock company, or other legal entity.

(20) "Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.

(21) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.

(22) "Sale" and "sell" mean the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment.

(23) "Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:

(a) Any crime of violence;

(b) Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at least ten years;

(c) Child molestation in the second degree;

(d) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(e) Indecent liberties;

(f) Leading organized crime;

(g) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(h) Rape in the third degree;

(i) Drive-by shooting;

(j) Sexual exploitation;

(k) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(l) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(m) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(n) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;

(o) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense; or

(p) Any felony conviction under RCW 9.41.115.

(24) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less than sixteen inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than twenty-six inches.

(25) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than twenty-six inches.

(26) "Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

(27) "Transfer" means the intended delivery of a firearm to another person without consideration of payment or promise of payment including, but not limited to, gifts and loans. "Transfer" does not include the delivery of a firearm owned or leased by an entity licensed or qualified to do business in the state of Washington to, or return of such a firearm by, any of that entity's employees or agents, defined to include volunteers participating in an honor guard, for lawful purposes in the ordinary course of business.

(28) "Unlicensed person" means any person who is not a licensed dealer under this chapter.

(29) "Semiautomatic rifle" means a rifle which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.

Sec. 15. RCW 9.41.090 and 2015 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, no dealer may deliver a pistol or semiautomatic rifle to the purchaser thereof until:

(a) The purchaser produces a valid concealed pistol license and the dealer has recorded the purchaser's name, license number, and issuing agency, such record to be made in triplicate and processed as provided in subsection (5) of this section. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), a "valid concealed pistol license" does not include a temporary emergency license, and does not include any license issued before July 1, 1996, unless the issuing agency conducted a records search for disqualifying crimes under RCW 9.41.070 at the time of issuance;

(b) The dealer is notified in writing by the chief of police or the sheriff of the jurisdiction in which the purchaser resides that the purchaser is eligible to possess a pistol or semiautomatic rifle under RCW 9.41.040 and that the application to purchase is approved by the chief of police or sheriff; or

(c) The requirements or time periods in RCW 9.41.092 have been satisfied.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in determining whether the purchaser meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.040, the chief of police or sheriff, or the designee of either, shall check with the national crime information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the department of social and health services electronic database, and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(b) Once the system is established, a dealer shall use the state system and national instant criminal background check system, provided for by the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.), to make criminal background checks of applicants to purchase firearms. However, a chief of police or sheriff, or a designee of either, shall continue to check the department of social and health services' electronic database and with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether applicants are ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(3) In any case under this section where the applicant has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor, the dealer shall hold the delivery of the pistol or semiautomatic rifle until the warrant for arrest is served and satisfied by appropriate court appearance. The local jurisdiction for purposes of the sale shall confirm the existence of outstanding warrants within seventy-two hours after notification of the application to purchase a pistol or semiautomatic rifle is received. The local jurisdiction shall also immediately confirm the satisfaction of the warrant on request of the dealer so that the hold may be released if the warrant was for an offense other than an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a ((pistol)) firearm.

(4) In any case where the chief or sheriff of the local jurisdiction has reasonable grounds based on the following circumstances: (a) Open criminal charges, (b) pending criminal proceedings, (c) pending commitment proceedings, (d) an outstanding warrant for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a ((pistol)) firearm, or (e) an arrest for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a ((pistol)) firearm, if the records of disposition have not yet been reported or entered sufficiently to determine eligibility to purchase a ((pistol)) firearm, the local jurisdiction may hold the sale and delivery of the pistol or semiautomatic rifle up to thirty days in order to confirm existing records in this state or elsewhere. After thirty days, the hold will be lifted unless an extension of the thirty days is approved by a local district court or municipal court for good cause shown. A dealer shall be notified of each hold placed on the sale by local law enforcement and of any application to the court for additional hold period to confirm records or confirm the identity of the applicant.

(5)(a) At the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol or semiautomatic rifle, the purchaser shall sign in triplicate and deliver to the dealer an application containing:

(i) His or her full name, residential address, date and place of birth, race, and gender;

(ii) The date and hour of the application;

(iii) The applicant's driver's license number or state identification card number;

(iv) If purchasing a pistol or semiautomatic rifle, a description of the pistol or semiautomatic rifle including the make, model, caliber and manufacturer's number if available at the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol or semiautomatic rifle. If the manufacturer's number is not available at the time of purchase of the pistol or semiautomatic rifle, the application may be processed, but delivery of the pistol or semiautomatic rifle to the purchaser may not occur unless the manufacturer's number is recorded on the application by the dealer and transmitted to the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county in which the purchaser resides; and a statement that the purchaser is eligible to possess a pistol or semiautomatic rifle under ((RCW 9.41.040)) state and federal law.

(b) The application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. State permission to purchase a firearm is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The purchaser shall be given a copy of the department of fish and wildlife pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.

(c) The dealer shall, by the end of the business day, sign and attach his or her address and deliver a copy of the application and such other documentation as required under subsection (1) of this section to the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of which the purchaser is a resident. The triplicate shall be retained by the dealer for six years. The dealer shall deliver the pistol or semiautomatic rifle to the purchaser following the period of time specified in this chapter unless the dealer is notified of an investigative hold under subsection (4) of this section in writing by the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county, whichever is applicable, denying the purchaser's application to purchase and the grounds thereof. The application shall not be denied unless the purchaser is not eligible to possess a pistol or semiautomatic rifle under ((RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or)) state or federal law.

(d) The chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county shall retain or destroy applications to purchase a pistol or semiautomatic rifle in accordance with the requirements of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.

(6) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding identity or eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a ((pistol)) firearm is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(7) This section does not apply to sales to licensed dealers for resale or to the sale of antique firearms.

Sec. 16. RCW 9.41.094 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

A signed application to purchase a pistol or semiautomatic rifle shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the department of social and health services, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release, to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency, information relevant to the applicant's eligibility to purchase a pistol or semiautomatic rifle to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

Sec. 17. RCW 9.41.097 and 2009 c 216 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of social and health services, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities shall, upon request of a court or law enforcement agency, supply such relevant information as is necessary to determine the eligibility of a person to possess a pistol or semiautomatic rifle or to be issued a concealed pistol license under RCW 9.41.070 or to purchase a pistol or semiautomatic rifle under RCW 9.41.090.

(2) Mental health information received by: (a) The department of licensing pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or 9.41.173; (b) an issuing authority pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or 9.41.070; (c) a chief of police or sheriff pursuant to RCW 9.41.090 or 9.41.173; (d) a court or law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

Sec. 18. RCW 9.41.0975 and 2009 c 216 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state, local governmental entities, any public or private agency, and the employees of any state or local governmental entity or public or private agency, acting in good faith, are immune from liability:

(a) For failure to prevent the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person whose receipt or possession of the firearm is unlawful;

(b) For preventing the sale or transfer of a firearm to a person who may lawfully receive or possess a firearm;

(c) For issuing a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license to a person ineligible for such a license;

(d) For failing to issue a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license to a person eligible for such a license;

(e) For revoking or failing to revoke an issued concealed pistol license or alien firearm license;

(f) For errors in preparing or transmitting information as part of determining a person's eligibility to receive or possess a firearm, or eligibility for a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license;

(g) For issuing a dealer's license to a person ineligible for such a license; or

(h) For failing to issue a dealer's license to a person eligible for such a license.

(2) An application may be made to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of mandamus:

(a) Directing an issuing agency to issue a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license wrongfully refused;

(b) Directing a law enforcement agency to approve an application to purchase a pistol or semiautomatic rifle wrongfully denied;

(c) Directing that erroneous information resulting either in the wrongful refusal to issue a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license or in the wrongful denial of a purchase application for a pistol or semiautomatic rifle be corrected; or

(d) Directing a law enforcement agency to approve a dealer's license wrongfully denied.

The application for the writ may be made in the county in which the application for a concealed pistol license or alien firearm license or to purchase a pistol or semiautomatic rifle was made, or in Thurston county, at the discretion of the petitioner. A court shall provide an expedited hearing for an application brought under this subsection (2) for a writ of mandamus. A person granted a writ of mandamus under this subsection (2) shall be awarded reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

Sec. 19. RCW 9.41.110 and 2009 c 479 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or transfer, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or otherwise transfer, any pistol or semiautomatic rifle without being licensed as provided in this section.

(2) No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or transfer, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or otherwise transfer, any firearm other than a pistol or semiautomatic rifle without being licensed as provided in this section.

(3) No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or transfer, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or otherwise transfer, any ammunition without being licensed as provided in this section.

(4) The duly constituted licensing authorities of any city, town, or political subdivision of this state shall grant licenses in forms prescribed by the director of licensing effective for not more than one year from the date of issue permitting the licensee to sell firearms within this state subject to the following conditions, for breach of any of which the license shall be forfeited and the licensee subject to punishment as provided in RCW 9.41.010 through 9.41.810. A licensing authority shall forward a copy of each license granted to the department of licensing. The department of licensing shall notify the department of revenue of the name and address of each dealer licensed under this section.

(5)(a) A licensing authority shall, within thirty days after the filing of an application of any person for a dealer's license, determine whether to grant the license. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card, or has not been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the licensing authority shall have up to sixty days to determine whether to issue a license. No person shall qualify for a license under this section without first receiving a federal firearms license and undergoing fingerprinting and a background check. In addition, no person ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040 or ineligible for a concealed pistol license under RCW 9.41.070 shall qualify for a dealer's license.

(b) A dealer shall require every employee who may sell a firearm in the course of his or her employment to undergo fingerprinting and a background check. An employee must be eligible to possess a firearm, and must not have been convicted of a crime that would make the person ineligible for a concealed pistol license, before being permitted to sell a firearm. Every employee shall comply with requirements concerning purchase applications and restrictions on delivery of pistols or semiautomatic rifles that are applicable to dealers.

(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, the business shall be carried on only in the building designated in the license. For the purpose of this section, advertising firearms for sale shall not be considered the carrying on of business.

(b) A dealer may conduct business temporarily at a location other than the building designated in the license, if the temporary location is within Washington state and is the location of a gun show sponsored by a national, state, or local organization, or an affiliate of any such organization, devoted to the collection, competitive use, or other sporting use of firearms in the community. Nothing in this subsection (6)(b) authorizes a dealer to conduct business in or from a motorized or towed vehicle.

In conducting business temporarily at a location other than the building designated in the license, the dealer shall comply with all other requirements imposed on dealers by RCW 9.41.090((,)) and 9.41.100, and ((9.41.110)) this section. The license of a dealer who fails to comply with the requirements of RCW 9.41.080 and 9.41.090 and subsection (8) of this section while conducting business at a temporary location shall be revoked, and the dealer shall be permanently ineligible for a dealer's license.

(7) The license or a copy thereof, certified by the issuing authority, shall be displayed on the premises in the area where firearms are sold, or at the temporary location, where it can easily be read.

(8)(a) No pistol or semiautomatic rifle may be sold: (i) In violation of any provisions of RCW 9.41.010 through 9.41.810; nor (ii) may a pistol or semiautomatic rifle be sold under any circumstances unless the purchaser is personally known to the dealer or shall present clear evidence of his or her identity.

(b) A dealer who sells or delivers any firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.080 is guilty of a class C felony. In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the dealer is subject to mandatory permanent revocation of his or her dealer's license and permanent ineligibility for a dealer's license.

(c) The license fee for pistols or semiautomatic rifles shall be one hundred ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars. The license fee for firearms other than pistols or semiautomatic rifles shall be one hundred ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars. The license fee for ammunition shall be one hundred ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars. Any dealer who obtains any license under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section may also obtain the remaining licenses without payment of any fee. The fees received under this section shall be deposited in the state general fund.

(9)(a) A true record ((in triplicate)) shall be made of every pistol or semiautomatic rifle sold with sufficient true copies as required by this subsection, in a book kept for the purpose, the form of which may be prescribed by the director of licensing and shall be personally signed by the purchaser and by the person effecting the sale, each in the presence of the other, and shall contain the date of sale, the caliber, make, model and manufacturer's number of the weapon, the name, address, occupation, and place of birth of the purchaser, and a statement signed by the purchaser, that he or she is not ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(b) For the sale of a pistol, the dealer shall: Send one copy ((shall)) within six hours ((be sent)) by certified mail to the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of which the purchaser is a resident; ((the duplicate the dealer shall)) send a duplicate copy within seven days ((send)) to the director of licensing; ((the)) and retain a triplicate ((the dealer shall retain for)) copy in the dealer's records for a period of six years.

(c) For the sale of a semiautomatic rifle, the dealer shall: Send one copy within six hours by certified mail to the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of which the purchaser is a resident; and retain a duplicate copy in the dealer's records for a period of six years.

(10) Subsections (2) through (9) of this section shall not apply to sales at wholesale.

(11) The dealer's licenses authorized to be issued by this section are general licenses covering all sales by the licensee within the effective period of the licenses. The department shall provide a single application form for dealer's licenses and a single license form which shall indicate the type or types of licenses granted.

(12) Except as provided in RCW 9.41.090, every city, town, and political subdivision of this state is prohibited from requiring the purchaser to secure a permit to purchase or from requiring the dealer to secure an individual permit for each sale.

Sec. 20. RCW 9.41.113 and 2017 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All firearm sales or transfers, in whole or part in this state including without limitation a sale or transfer where either the purchaser or seller or transferee or transferor is in Washington, shall be subject to background checks unless specifically exempted by state or federal law. The background check requirement applies to all sales or transfers including, but not limited to, sales and transfers through a licensed dealer, at gun shows, online, and between unlicensed persons.

(2) No person shall sell or transfer a firearm unless:

(a) The person is a licensed dealer;

(b) The purchaser or transferee is a licensed dealer; or

(c) The requirements of subsection (3) of this section are met.

(3) Where neither party to a prospective firearms transaction is a licensed dealer, the parties to the transaction shall complete the sale or transfer through a licensed dealer as follows:

(a) The seller or transferor shall deliver the firearm to a licensed dealer to process the sale or transfer as if it is selling or transferring the firearm from its inventory to the purchaser or transferee, except that the unlicensed seller or transferor may remove the firearm from the business premises of the licensed dealer while the background check is being conducted. If the seller or transferor removes the firearm from the business premises of the licensed dealer while the background check is being conducted, the purchaser or transferee and the seller or transferor shall return to the business premises of the licensed dealer and the seller or transferor shall again deliver the firearm to the licensed dealer prior to completing the sale or transfer.

(b) Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, the licensed dealer shall comply with all requirements of federal and state law that would apply if the licensed dealer were selling or transferring the firearm from its inventory to the purchaser or transferee, including but not limited to conducting a background check on the prospective purchaser or transferee in accordance with federal and state law requirements and fulfilling all federal and state recordkeeping requirements.

(c) The purchaser or transferee must complete, sign, and submit all federal, state, and local forms necessary to process the required background check to the licensed dealer conducting the background check.

(d) If the results of the background check indicate that the purchaser or transferee is ineligible to possess a firearm, then the licensed dealer shall return the firearm to the seller or transferor.

(e) The licensed dealer may charge a fee that reflects the fair market value of the administrative costs and efforts incurred by the licensed dealer for facilitating the sale or transfer of the firearm.

(4) No person may sell or transfer a semiautomatic rifle to a person under twenty-one years of age.

(5) This section does not apply to:

(a) A transfer between immediate family members, which for this subsection shall be limited to spouses, domestic partners, parents, parents-in-law, children, siblings, siblings-in-law, grandparents, grandchildren, nieces, nephews, first cousins, aunts, and uncles, that is a bona fide gift or loan;

(b) The sale or transfer of an antique firearm;

(c) A temporary transfer of possession of a firearm if such transfer is necessary to prevent imminent death or great bodily harm to the person to whom the firearm is transferred if:

(i) The temporary transfer only lasts as long as immediately necessary to prevent such imminent death or great bodily harm; and

(ii) The person to whom the firearm is transferred is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law;

(d) A temporary transfer of possession of a firearm if: (i) The transfer is intended to prevent suicide or self-inflicted great bodily harm; (ii) the transfer lasts only as long as reasonably necessary to prevent death or great bodily harm; and (iii) the firearm is not utilized by the transferee for any purpose for the duration of the temporary transfer;

(e) Any law enforcement or corrections agency and, to the extent the person is acting within the course and scope of his or her employment or official duties, any law enforcement or corrections officer, United States marshal, member of the armed forces of the United States or the national guard, or federal official;

(f) A federally licensed gunsmith who receives a firearm solely for the purposes of service or repair, or the return of the firearm to its owner by the federally licensed gunsmith;

(g) The temporary transfer of a firearm (i) between spouses or domestic partners; (ii) if the temporary transfer occurs, and the firearm is kept at all times, at an established shooting range authorized by the governing body of the jurisdiction in which such range is located; (iii) if the temporary transfer occurs and the transferee's possession of the firearm is exclusively at a lawful organized competition involving the use of a firearm, or while participating in or practicing for a performance by an organized group that uses firearms as a part of the performance; (iv) to a person who is under eighteen years of age for lawful hunting, sporting, or educational purposes while under the direct supervision and control of a responsible adult who is not prohibited from possessing firearms; (v) under circumstances in which the transferee and the firearm remain in the presence of the transferor; or (vi) while hunting if the hunting is legal in all places where the person to whom the firearm is transferred possesses the firearm and the person to whom the firearm is transferred has completed all training and holds all licenses or permits required for such hunting, provided that any temporary transfer allowed by this subsection is permitted only if the person to whom the firearm is transferred is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law;

(h) A person who (i) acquired a firearm other than a pistol by operation of law upon the death of the former owner of the firearm or (ii) acquired a pistol by operation of law upon the death of the former owner of the pistol within the preceding sixty days. At the end of the sixty-day period, the person must either have lawfully transferred the pistol or must have contacted the department of licensing to notify the department that he or she has possession of the pistol and intends to retain possession of the pistol, in compliance with all federal and state laws; or

(i) A sale or transfer when the purchaser or transferee is a licensed collector and the firearm being sold or transferred is a curio or relic.

Sec. 21. RCW 9.41.124 and 2015 c 1 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Residents of a state other than Washington may purchase rifles and shotguns, except those firearms defined as semiautomatic rifles, in Washington: PROVIDED, That such residents conform to the applicable provisions of the federal Gun Control Act of 1968, Title IV, Pub. L. 90-351 as administered by the United States secretary of the treasury: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That such residents are eligible to purchase or possess such weapons in Washington and in the state in which such persons reside: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That such residents are subject to the procedures and background checks required by this chapter.

Sec. 22. RCW 9.41.240 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 423 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person under twenty-one years of age may not purchase a pistol pursuant to Title 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922(b)(1) or a semiautomatic rifle pursuant to RCW 9.41.113.

(2) Unless an exception under RCW 9.41.042, 9.41.050, or 9.41.060 applies, a person at least eighteen years of age, but less than twenty-one years of age, may possess a pistol only:

(((1))) (a) In the person's place of abode;

(((2))) (b) At the person's fixed place of business; or

(((3))) (c) On real property under his or her control.

(3) Nothing in this section or RCW 9.41.113(4) prohibits a person at least eighteen years of age, but less than twenty-one years of age, from possessing a semiautomatic rifle as otherwise authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall establish a grant program to provide financial assistance to local law enforcement agencies conducting background checks for the purchase and sale of pistols and semiautomatic rifles as required by chapter 9.41 RCW.

(2) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up to one hundred thousand dollars per year, or three percent of the amounts provided pursuant to this section, whichever is greater, for the cost of administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. Sections 5, 6, 7, and 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---