BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that schools across the country have experienced tragic active shooter events. The legislature further finds that there is a need to prepare for these events and address school safety. The legislature therefore intends to provide a voluntary active shooter response training program for school employees and volunteers that includes conflict de-escalation and firearms training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, 2018, the criminal justice training commission, established under chapter 43.101 RCW, must create an active shooter response training program for public schools that includes but is not limited to firearms and conflict de-escalation training.

(2) The active shooter response training program is voluntary for each school district. Local school boards must approve the program before it may be offered to school employees and volunteers in that school district.

(3) The active shooter response training program is voluntary for all school employees and volunteers in school districts where the program is offered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, from the general fund to the criminal justice training commission for purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019, from the general fund to the criminal justice training commission for purposes of this act.

--- END ---