BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A pet store operator must not sell a live dog or cat in a pet store unless:

(a) The dog or cat was obtained from a public animal control agency or shelter, humane society shelter, or a nonprofit animal rescue or adoption organization or group having a cooperative agreement with at least one private or public animal shelter; and

(b) The dog or cat has been spayed or neutered.

(2) Each pet store must maintain records sufficient to document the source of each dog and cat the pet store sells or provides space for and must keep the records for at least one year. Public animal care and control agencies may periodically require the pet stores selling dogs and cats to provide access to the records.

(3) The pet store must post in a conspicuous location on each animal's cage or enclosure a sign listing the name of the public animal control agency or shelter, humane society shelter, or nonprofit shelter or group where the dog or cat was obtained.

(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a local governmental entity from imposing requirements that are more protective of animal welfare than those set forth in this section.

(5) A pet store operator who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars. Each animal offered for sale in violation of this section constitutes a separate violation.

(6) For the purposes of this section "rescue or adoption organization or group" means:

(a) An entity that is exempt from taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of the effective date of this section;

(b) At least one of its purposes being the placement of dogs that have been removed from a public animal control agency or shelter, humane shelter, or have been previously owned by a person other than the dog or cat's original breeder; and

(c) Does not obtain animals from breeders or brokers for compensation.

--- END ---