BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A higher education research facility that receives public money, including tax exempt status, or a facility that provides research in collaboration with a higher education facility that confines dogs or cats for science or research purposes and plans on destroying a dog or cat used for science or research purposes, must first offer the dog or cat to an animal rescue organization. A facility that is required to offer dogs or cats to an animal rescue organization under this section may enter into an agreement with the animal rescue organization to facilitate adoptions.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "animal rescue organization" means any nonprofit organization incorporated for the purpose of rescuing animals in need and finding permanent adoptive homes for the animals.

--- END ---