BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the capitol dome is an architectural wonder, inspiring legislators, staff, and visitors alike. Comprised of sandstone cleft from quarries near majestic Mount Rainier, the height of this fifth largest dome in the world, and tallest in North America, is, unfortunately, made slightly higher by a thin yet distinctly noticeable layer of fungi enveloping its entire surface. The legislature wishes to advance a modest proposal to study the adverse effects of the capitol dome's grey toupee on the psyche, health, and well-being of those who work within and visit the state's capitol, and formulate a sustainable plan for the control of fungus, lichen, and mold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The department of enterprise services shall offer to every legislator a guided inspection of the top of the dome, from the vantage point of the cupola, so they can witness the damage being done to the "pate of state" by the encroaching fungi.

(2) The department of enterprise services shall study the effect of fungus, lichen, and mold on the capitol dome and develop a plan to eradicate it consistent with other regulations and approaches for fungus, lichen, and mold eradication in business structures. The department of enterprise services must report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018. The study must include:

(a) A survey of visitors that shall be titled "You likin' the lichen?" and measure the alienation that viewing a capitol dome covered in fungus, lichen, and mold generates in the citizenry. The survey shall measure the responses on a range from "Inspires total confidence in the competency of the government to address problems large and small as well as in democratic ideals" to "Makes me physically ill." The survey should also measure whether the public perceives that the presence of fungus, lichen, and mold on the capitol sends a message that the "fungus lobby" has undue influence over their state government;

(b) An identification of the types of health risks that may be suffered due to the presence of fungus, lichen, and mold in the work environment under the capitol dome, and whether those have manifested in recent legislative sessions, including: Confusion, physical aliments, mental paralysis, an agitated mental state causing arguments over meaningless matters, declining mental acuity, and loss of a sense of humor;

(c) Identification of whether the presence of fungus, lichen, and mold on the capitol dome contributes to climate change, a required item in all legislative studies during the current legislative session;

(d) Identification of the individuals including, but not limited to, legislators, visitors, and staff who may have had health effects correlated with the cleanliness of the capitol dome and providing a summary analysis of the general malaise and causing factors;

(e) A physical inspection, by a trained medical specialist, of legislators, staff, and lobbyists who have served over fifteen years under the dome to see if they have signs of deterioration due to exposure to fungus, lichen, or mold, given their propensity to spread to artifices located in a structure that have been dormant;

(f) The development of a protocol to remove fungus, lichen, and mold consistent with the environmental protection agency guidelines for fungus, lichen, and mold remediation in schools and commercial buildings, including, but not limited to, wrapping the entire dome in polyurethane sheeting, with a slit entry and covering flap, maintained under negative pressure with HEPA-filtered fan exhausted outside of the building, and supply-and-return vent blocked within the containment area; and

(g) Whether upon total fungus, lichen, and mold removal from the dome, the following Latin phrase should be inscribed in a prominent place on or near the dome or capitol campus: "Fungus nobis non sit" which translated is "Let there be no fungus among us."

(3) This section expires July 1, 2019.

--- END ---