BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the Washington state resident medical education access act of 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The legislature finds that there is an increasing shortage of doctors and health care professionals in the state of Washington. In particular, Washington state has a growing shortage of family medicine primary care physicians, especially in rural and underserved areas. Workforce projections show that Washington state needs eight hundred seventy-six more primary care physicians in the state by as early as 2020 in order to meet the needs of patients in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) At least ninety percent of the students admitted into the University of Washington medical education programs as authorized in RCW 28B.20.060 must be resident students under RCW 28B.15.012. For the purposes of calculating the percent of students admitted into the University of Washington medical education programs, the total pool of admitted students shall be calculated as the nonresident and resident students net the number of nonresident Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, and Idaho (WWAMI) students.

(2) At least ninety percent of the students admitted into the Washington State University medical education programs as authorized in RCW 28B.30.058 must be resident students under RCW 28B.15.012.

--- END ---