BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.108.020 and 1990 c 287 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The American Indian endowed scholarship program is created. The
program shall be administered by the higher education coordinating
board. In administering the program, the board's powers and duties
shall include but not be limited to:
(1) Selecting students to receive scholarships, with the assistance
of a screening committee composed of persons involved in helping
American Indian students to obtain a higher education. The membership
of the committee may include, but is not limited to representatives of:
Indian tribes, urban Indians, the governor's office of Indian affairs,
the Washington state Indian education association, and institutions of
higher education;
(2) Adopting necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicizing the program;
(4) Accepting and depositing donations into the endowment fund
created in RCW 28B.108.060;
(5) Requesting from the state investment board and accepting from
the state treasurer moneys earned from ((the trust fund and)) the
endowment fund created in RCW ((28B.108.050 and)) 28B.108.060;
(6) Soliciting and accepting grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program; and
(7) Naming scholarships in honor of those American Indians from
Washington who have acted as role models.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.108.060 and 2007 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The American Indian scholarship endowment fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The investment of the endowment fund
shall be managed by the state investment board. Funds appropriated by
the legislature for the endowment fund must be deposited into the fund.
(1) Moneys received from the higher education coordinating board,
private donations, state ((matching)) moneys, and funds received from
any other source may be deposited into the endowment fund. Private
moneys received as a gift subject to conditions may be deposited into
the fund.
(2) At the request of the higher education coordinating board, the
state investment board shall release earnings from the endowment fund
to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall then release those
funds at the request of the higher education coordinating board for
scholarships. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the
endowment fund.
(3) When notified by the higher education coordinating board that
a condition attached to a gift of private moneys in the fund has
failed, the state investment board shall release those moneys to the
higher education coordinating board. The higher education coordinating
board shall then release the moneys to the donors according to the
terms of the conditional gift.
(4) The principal of the endowment fund shall not be invaded. The
release of moneys under subsection (3) of this section shall not
constitute an invasion of corpus.
(5) The earnings on the fund shall be used solely for the purposes
set forth in RCW 28B.108.040, except when the terms of a conditional
gift of private moneys in the fund require that a portion of earnings
on such moneys be reinvested in the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.108.050 (Scholarship trust fund established) and 1991
sp.s. c 13 s 107 & 1990 c 287 s 6; and
(2) RCW 28B.108.070 (State matching funds) and 1993 c 372 s 2, 1991
c 228 s 12, & 1990 c 287 s 8.

--- END ---