BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of alcohol
detection breathalyzers or other devices, which are used to measure an
individual's blood alcohol content in an establishment that provides
alcohol for consumption on-site, or for labor or services rendered in
respect to the installation of such devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of alcohol detection breathalyzers or other devices, in an
establishment that provides alcohol for consumption on-site, for
purposes of measuring an individual's blood alcohol content.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---