BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture
or the director's designee.
(3) "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, exchange,
association, trustee, receiver, corporation, and any member, officer,
or employee thereof or assignee for the benefit of creditors.
(4) "Represent" means to hold out as or to advertise.
(5) "Sell" means selling, offering for sale, holding for sale,
preparing for sale, trading, bartering, offering a gift as an
inducement for sale of, and advertising for sale in any media.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department shall administer a
program to certify and market beef cattle from Washington as either
Washington-certified natural beef cattle or Washington-certified
natural grass-fed beef cattle.
(2) To qualify as Washington-certified natural beef cattle, cattle
must be born and raised in Washington and raised and finished in
compliance with "United States standards for livestock and meat
marketing claims, naturally raised claim for livestock and the meat and
meat products derived from such livestock," 74 Fed. Reg. 3541 (2009).
(3) To qualify as Washington-certified natural grass-fed beef
cattle, cattle must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section and must also be raised and finished in compliance with "United
States standards for livestock and meat marketing claims, grass
(forage) fed claim for ruminant livestock and the meat products derived
from such livestock," 72 Fed. Reg. 58631 (2007).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department shall include promotion of
beef from Washington-certified natural beef cattle and Washington-certified natural grass-fed beef cattle in its agricultural product
marketing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall adopt rules that:
(1) Specify certification standards, including recordkeeping and
verification protocols that require:
(a) Maintaining cattle birth and health records, including vaccine
lot numbers, vaccine manufacturers, and vaccination dates; and
(b) At least one inspection of the farm or ranch of origin; and
(2) Establish necessary fees to recover costs of providing
certification and inspection or other services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To be labeled, sold, or represented as beef
from either Washington-certified natural beef cattle or Washington-certified natural grass-fed beef cattle, the beef must have been
harvested from cattle certified under standards established under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 All moneys collected under this chapter must
be paid to the director, deposited in an account within the
agricultural local fund, and used solely for carrying out the purposes
of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The director may enter at reasonable times
as determined by the director and inspect any facility and any records
required under this chapter. The director may take for inspection
those representative samples necessary to determine whether this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter have been violated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The director may bring an action to enjoin
any violation of this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter in the
superior court of Thurston county or of any county in which a violation
occurs, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Any person who violates the provisions of
this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter may be subject to:
(1) A civil penalty in an amount of not more than five hundred
dollars for each violation; and
(2) Denial, revocation, or suspension of any certification issued
under this chapter. Upon notice by the director to deny, revoke, or
suspend a certification, a person may request a hearing under chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---