BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department.
(3) "Farmer" means the person responsible for planting a crop,
managing the crop, and harvesting the crop from land on which a breach
of contract or patent infringement is alleged to have occurred.
(4) "Genetically engineered plant" means a plant or any plant part
or material, including, but not limited to, seeds and pollen, in which
the genetic material has been changed through modern biotechnology in
a way that does not occur naturally by multiplication or natural
recombination.
(5) "Modern biotechnology" means the application of either of the
following:
(a) In vitro nucleic acid techniques, including recombinant
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) and direct injection of nucleic acid into
cells or organelles; or
(b) Fusion of cells beyond the taxonomic family that overcome
natural physiological reproductive or recombinant barriers and that are
not techniques used in traditional breeding and selection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Before a person holding a patent on a
genetically engineered plant, or his or her agent, may enter upon any
land farmed by another for the purpose of obtaining crop samples to
determine whether breach of contract or patent infringement has
occurred, the person holding the patent or his or her agent must:
(a) Notify the farmer in writing of the allegation that breach of
contract or patent infringement has occurred and request permission to
enter upon the farmer's land;
(b) Provide a copy of that notification to the director;
(c) Obtain the written permission of the farmer; and
(d) Provide notice to the farmer of the following procedures, which
shall be applicable as provided:
(i) If the farmer withholds permission, the person holding a patent
may petition the superior court in the county in which the alleged
breach of contract or patent infringement has occurred for an order
granting permission to enter upon the farmer's land;
(ii) If the person holding a patent believes that the crop from
which samples are to be taken may be subject to intentional damage or
destruction, the person may seek a protective order from the superior
court. The protective order shall be crafted to minimize interruption
or interference with normal farming practices, including harvest and
tillage; and
(iii) The procedures described in section 3 of this act.
(2) The farmer shall grant or deny access in writing within ten
days of receipt of a request to enter the land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If requested by either party, the director
or his or her designee shall be present for the sampling, provide for
the collection of samples, or conduct any other aspect of the sampling
or analysis process as requested. The director shall designate an
employee or enter into an agreement with an employee or agent of the
state of Washington or a third party unaffiliated with either party to
carry out the specified sampling activity as provided in rules adopted
under section 7 of this act. The patent holder shall pay the fee
charged by the department under rules adopted under section 7 of this
act. The farmer or the agent of the farmer and the person holding the
patent may be present at any collection of samples conducted under this
chapter, and each shall be notified of the time and location of the
sample taking at least twenty-four hours in advance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Samples for analysis may be taken from a
standing crop, from representative standing plants in the field, or
from crop residue remaining in the field after harvest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The results of any testing conducted under
this chapter shall be sent by registered letter by the testing party to
all parties involved in the investigation within thirty days after the
results are reported from the testing laboratory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A farmer shall not be liable based on the
presence or possession of a patented genetically engineered plant on
real property owned or occupied by the farmer if the farmer did not
knowingly buy or otherwise knowingly acquire the genetically engineered
plant, the farmer acted in good faith and without knowledge of the
genetically engineered nature of the plant, and if the genetically
engineered plant is detected at a de minimis level. The authority of
a court to determine the presence of de minimis levels of a genetically
engineered plant is intended solely for the purpose of assisting in
adjudicating claims relating to the possession or use of a patented
genetically engineered plant in which the seed labeler, patent holder,
or licensee, has rights. This section is not intended to:
(1) Establish, or be used as the basis for establishing, an
acceptable level at which a patented genetically engineered plant may
be present;
(2) Be used to alter or limit liabilities or remedies for personal
injury or wrongful death; or
(3) Be used outside or beyond the scope or context of a legal
dispute regarding genetically engineered plants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---