BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the threat of
an incident caused by a chemical, biological, radioactive, nuclear, or
explosive agent occurring in the state poses a severe threat to the
health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the state of Washington.
In order to mitigate any damage that may be caused by CBRNE incidents,
it is necessary that the state have a coordinated and comprehensive
plan to respond to these dangerous and deadly incidents.
(2) The legislature further finds that the current system of
relying almost exclusively on local jurisdictions to respond to CBRNE
incidents is inadequate because it stretches the capabilities of local
jurisdictions, it lacks uniformity in training, equipment, and response
standards, and it hinders the ability of jurisdictions to cooperate in
the event of a catastrophic incident. Major portions of the state lack
protection from CBRNE incidents because many local jurisdictions simply
do not have the capabilities to respond to these incidents.
(3) The purpose of this act is to establish a statewide CBRNE
response program that relies on a network of regional response teams
that operate with standardized training and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "CBRNE agent" means a chemical, biological, radioactive,
nuclear, or explosive agent.
(2) "CBRNE incident" means an incident creating a danger or the
possibility of a danger to persons, property, or the environment as a
result of spillage, seepage, fire, explosion, or release of a CBRNE
agent.
(3) "Director" means the director of fire protection in the
Washington state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director shall establish and
maintain a statewide CBRNE response program. This program must
include:
(a) The division of the state into five CBRNE response regions;
(b) A network of two regional CBRNE teams, one hazmat and one bomb,
to respond to CBRNE incidents within their respective regions and to
operate outside their respective regions to assist other regional teams
when needed;
(c) Standards for training, equipment, and operational procedures
for regional teams and other responders concerning responses to CBRNE
incidents;
(d) Procedures for reimbursing regional teams for costs as a result
of approved responses; and
(e) Procedures for recovering response costs from parties
responsible for causing a CBRNE incident.
(2) The director shall adopt any rules necessary to implement and
administer the provisions of this chapter.
(3) The requirement of the program under this chapter is subject to
appropriation by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director shall divide the state into
five CBRNE response regions. In making this division, the director
must consider: (a) The history of any CBRNE or hazardous materials
incident locations throughout the state and the factors that contribute
to those incidents; (b) the current geographical distribution of CBRNE
or hazardous materials responders; and (c) any existing regional
divisions in the state.
(2) After consultation with the policy and operations advisory
groups established under section 6 of this act, the director may, with
good cause, modify boundaries of the established regions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) After consultation with the policy and
operations advisory groups established under section 6 of this act, the
director shall determine the number of technicians and the level of
training required of the response teams for that region. These
determinations must be made based upon the risk that each region faces
from a CBRNE incident.
(2) The director shall contract with two regional response teams
from each of the five regions. The director may contract only with a
unit of local government with respect to a regional response team.
Units of local government that are located in the same region may enter
into intergovernmental agreements for the formation of a regional
response team.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Two advisory groups are created to
assist the director in implementing and managing the program. The
policy advisory group will advise the director on budget, staffing,
policy, and other management-related issues. The operations advisory
group will advise the director on technical and operational issues,
including training, equipment, response, and performance standards.
Both advisory groups serve a strictly advisory role to the director in
all matters.
(2) The policy advisory group shall consist of six members
appointed by the director and shall include: (a) Two members nominated
by and representing the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs; (b) two members nominated by and representing the Washington
state fire chiefs association; (c) one member nominated by and
representing the Washington state emergency management council; and (d)
one member representing the director's office.
(3) The operations advisory group shall consist of voting and
nonvoting members. Voting members shall include two members from each
CBRNE response region appointed by and representing the contracting
units of local government under section 5(2) of this act. Nonvoting
members shall include one appointed representative from each of the
following state agencies: Ecology, health, transportation, Washington
state patrol office of the state fire marshal, military, and the
emergency management division of the military department. In addition,
the director shall seek appointment of one tribal nation representative
and two private sector representatives.
(4) All members serve at the discretion of the appointing
authority.
(5) Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The primary duty of a regional response
team is to stabilize a CBRNE incident. Regional response teams are
limited to emergency responses and the evaluation and documentation
functions arising from CBRNE incidents that threaten life, property, or
the environment. A regional response team must respond to the best of
its ability, subject to the limitations of available equipment and
personnel. Regional response teams must work with known local hazard
industries, emergency response and management agencies, and local
emergency planning committees to ensure an appropriate integration of
plans, training, and operational response.
(2) A regional response team may sample, test, analyze, treat,
remove, recover, package, monitor, or track the involvement of a CBRNE
agent only if it is incidentally necessary to identify a CBRNE agent,
prevent the release or threat of a release of a CBRNE agent, or
stabilize a CBRNE incident.
(3) The activities of a regional response team are limited to those
that can be accomplished safely to stabilize a CBRNE incident and,
except as may be incidentally necessary, do not include the transport,
storage, disposal, or remedial cleanup of CBRNE agents.
(4) A regional response team is not required to maintain general
security or safety perimeters, locate underground utilities, ensure
appropriate traffic control services, conduct hydrological
investigations and analysis, or provide testing, removal, or disposal
of underground storage tank contamination at or near the CBRNE incident
to which the team is dispatched.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The director must establish procedures for
the dispatch of a regional response team to a CBRNE incident. These
procedures must include standards for the evaluation of a CBRNE
incident by a state or local agency and, if the incident cannot be
controlled with local resources, a process for the state or local
agency to request the assistance of a regional response team.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) If a unit of local government requests
the assistance of a regional response team under the dispatch
procedures set forth under section 8 of this act, then, upon the team's
arrival, the unit of local government must provide the team with site-specific and geographical and topological information sufficient to
support the tactical decisions required by the situation.
(2) A unit of local government, upon request by the appropriate
regional response team, must provide any preplanning information that
the team reasonably requests. This information may include, without
limitation:
(a) Facility site-specific floor plans and occupancy information;
(b) Local maps; and
(c) An inventory of the types and levels of emergency operational
support and resources available locally.
(3) A unit of local government, upon request by the appropriate
regional response team, must provide any site security that the team
reasonably requests. This may include, without limitation: (a) Site
perimeter control; (b) force protection; and (c) site safety searches
or sweeps.
(4) A unit of local government, upon request by the appropriate
regional response team, must provide any logistical support that the
team reasonably requests. This support may include, without
limitation: (a) Food and water; (b) a source of water for fire
suppression and decontamination; (c) fuel and other supplies; (d)
shelter; and (e) interoperable communications.
(5) A unit of local government, upon request by the appropriate
regional response team, must provide a national incident management
system compliant incident command and control structure to ensure all
tactical decisions and operations are carried out in a safe and uniform
manner by all participating responders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The statewide CBRNE response account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The account shall contain all of the following:
(a) All moneys recovered from cost reimbursements under section 11
of this act;
(b) All grant proceeds not otherwise required to be maintained in
a separate account;
(c) All moneys transferred under sections 13 and 14 of this act;
and
(d) Any other moneys appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used only as provided in
this act. Only the director or his or her designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) If a specific person or entity is
responsible for the necessary expenses incurred by the director or a
CBRNE regional response team pertaining to its response to a CBRNE
incident, then the director shall notify the responsible party by
appropriate order. The director may not issue an order pertaining to
a project or activity that was completed more than five years prior to
the date of the proposed issuance of the order. The order must state
the findings of the director concerning liability, the amount of
necessary expenses incurred in conducting the response, and a notice
that the amount is due and payable immediately upon receipt of the
order.
(2) The director may, upon application from the recipient of an
order received within thirty days after the receipt of the order,
reduce or set aside, in its entirety, the amount due and payable if it
appears from the application, and from any further investigation the
director may desire to undertake, that a reduction or setting aside is
just and fair under all the circumstances.
(3) If the responsible party fails to pay the amount specified in
the order issued by the director or if an application has been made
within thirty days as provided in this section and the amount provided
in the order issued by the department subsequent to such application is
not paid within fifteen days after receipt thereof, the attorney
general, upon request of the director, shall bring an action on behalf
of the state in the superior court of Thurston county or any county in
which the person to which the order is directed does business, or in
any other court of competent jurisdiction, to recover the amount
specified in the final order of the director.
(4) No order issued under this section may be construed as an order
within the meaning of RCW 43.21B.310 and is not appealable to the
hearings board.
(5) All moneys recovered under this section must be deposited into
the statewide CBRNE response account established under section 10 of
this act.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "necessary expenses" means
the expenses incurred by the director and assisting state or local
agencies for (a) investigating the source of the incident; (b)
conducting actions to stabilize the CBRNE incident; and (c) enforcing
the provisions of this chapter and collecting for damages caused by a
CBRNE incident.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The director shall establish procedures
to actively seek grants from public or private sources for the
operation and administration of the statewide CBRNE response program.
The director shall work in cooperation with the state military
department and local jurisdictions to obtain grant funding for the
program.
(2) Grant proceeds must be deposited into the statewide CBRNE
response account, or if required as a condition of the grant into a
dedicated grant fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) On July 1, 2010, and on each July 1st
thereafter, the director shall notify the state treasurer if the
combined total amount in the statewide CBRNE response account and any
dedicated grant accounts is less than four million two hundred thousand
dollars.
(2) Within thirty days after receiving this notification, the state
treasurer shall transfer, into the statewide CBRNE response account,
the amount needed to bring the moneys for the program to 4.2 million
dollars. The state treasurer shall transfer this amount from the local
toxics control account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) On July 1, 2010, and on each July 1st
thereafter, the director shall notify the state treasurer if the
combined total amount in the statewide CBRNE response account and any
dedicated grant accounts exceeds six million dollars.
(2) Within thirty calendar days after receiving this notification,
the state treasurer shall transfer the amount exceeding six million
dollars from the statewide CBRNE response account to the local toxics
control account or to any other fund from which moneys were transferred
into the statewide CBRNE response account.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.43.938 and 1995 c 369 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wherever the term state fire marshal appears in the Revised
Code of Washington or the Washington Administrative Code it shall mean
the director of fire protection.
(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall appoint an
officer who shall be known as the director of fire protection. The
board, after consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol,
shall prescribe qualifications for the position of director of fire
protection. The board shall submit to the chief of the Washington
state patrol a list containing the names of three persons whom the
board believes meet its qualifications. If requested by the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the board shall submit one additional list
of three persons whom the board believes meet its qualifications. The
appointment shall be from one of the lists of persons submitted by the
board.
(3) The director of fire protection may designate one or more
deputies and may delegate to those deputies his or her duties and
authorities as deemed appropriate.
(4) The director of fire protection, in accordance with the
policies, objectives, and priorities of the fire protection policy
board, shall prepare a biennial budget pertaining to fire protection
services. Such biennial budget shall be submitted as part of the
Washington state patrol's budget request.
(5) The director of fire protection, shall implement and
administer, within constraints established by budgeted resources, the
policies, objectives, and priorities of the board and all duties of the
chief of the Washington state patrol that are to be carried out through
the director of fire protection. Such administration shall include
negotiation of agreements with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state colleges and universities as provided in RCW ((43.63A.320))
43.43.934. Programs covered by such agreements shall include, but not
be limited to, planning curricula, developing and delivering
instructional programs and materials, and using existing instructional
personnel and facilities. Where appropriate, such contracts shall also
include planning and conducting instructional programs at the state
fire service training center.
(6) The director of fire protection shall establish and maintain
the statewide CBRNE response program required under this act.
(7) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, shall seek the advice of the board in carrying out
his or her duties under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by July 1, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---