BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of fire protection appointed
under RCW 43.43.938.
(2) "Distribute" means to do any of the following:
(a) Sell novelty lighters or deliver novelty lighters for sale by
another person to consumers;
(b) Sell or accept orders for novelty lighters that are to be
transported from a point outside this state to a consumer within this
state;
(c) Buy novelty lighters directly from a manufacturer or wholesale
dealer for resale in this state;
(d) Give novelty lighters as a sample, prize, gift, or other
promotion.
(3) "Manufacturer" means:
(a) An entity that produces, or causes the production of, novelty
lighters for sale in this state;
(b) An importer or first purchaser of novelty lighters that intends
to resell within this state novelty lighters that were produced for
sale outside this state; or
(c) A successor to an entity, importer, or first purchaser
described in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(4)(a) "Novelty lighter" means a lighter that can operate on any
fuel, including butane or liquid fuel. Novelty lighters have features
that are attractive to children, including but not limited to visual
effects, flashing lights, musical sounds, and toylike designs. The
term considers the shape of the lighter to be the most important
characteristic when determining whether a lighter can be considered a
novelty lighter.
(b) "Novelty lighter" does not include disposable cigarette
lighters or lighters that are printed or decorated with logos, decals,
artwork, or heat shrinkable sleeves.
(5) "Retail dealer" means an entity, other than a manufacturer or
wholesale dealer, that engages in distributing novelty lighters.
(6) "Sell" means to transfer, or agree to transfer, title or
possession for a monetary or nonmonetary consideration.
(7) "Wholesale dealer" means an entity that distributes novelty
lighters to a retail dealer or other person for resale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person may not distribute or offer to
sell a novelty lighter within this state if the director determines the
novelty lighter is prohibited for sale or distribution under this
chapter.
(2) This section does not apply if the novelty lighters are in
interstate commerce and not intended for distribution in this state.
(3) The director may enter into a cooperative agreement with any
state or local agency that allows the agency to act as an authorized
representative of the director for enforcement purposes under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director may adopt rules to carry out
the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director may impose a civil penalty
for a violation of this chapter. The civil penalty may not exceed:
(a) For a wholesale dealer that distributes or offers to sell
novelty lighters to retail dealers or consumers, a written warning for
the first violation and a monetary penalty of five hundred dollars for
each subsequent violation.
(b) For a retail dealer that distributes or offers to sell novelty
lighters to consumers, a written warning for the first violation and a
monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for each subsequent
violation.
(2) At the request of the director, the attorney general may bring
an action in the name of the state seeking:
(a) Injunctive relief to prevent or end a violation of this
chapter;
(b) To recover civil penalties imposed under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(c) To recover attorneys' fees and other enforcement costs and
disbursements.
(3) Penalties under this section must be deposited in either the
novelty lighter fire safety account created in section 6 of this act or
an account designated by the local agency with jurisdiction as
authorized under section 2(3) of this act.
(4) A district court has jurisdiction over all proceedings brought
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) On the effective date of this section,
manufacturers must immediately cease the sale or distribution of
novelty lighters in this state.
(2) On the effective date of this section, wholesalers and retail
dealers have a maximum of ninety days to reduce their current inventory
of novelty lighters. In no instance may wholesalers and retail dealers
sell or distribute a novelty lighter in this state after ninety days
from the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The novelty lighter fire safety account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
moneys directed to the account must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for fire safety,
enforcement, and fire prevention programs. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---