BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.60.010 and 1985 c 443 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state patrol shall establish a missing children
clearinghouse which shall include the maintenance and operation of a
toll-free, twenty-four-hour telephone hotline. The clearinghouse shall
distribute information to local law enforcement agencies, school
districts, the department of social and health services, and the
general public regarding missing children. The information shall
include pictures, bulletins, training sessions, reports, and
biographical materials that will assist in local law enforcement
efforts to locate missing children. The state patrol shall also
maintain a regularly updated computerized link with national and other
statewide missing person systems or clearinghouses, and within existing
resources, shall develop and implement a plan, commonly known as an
"amber alert plan," for voluntary cooperation between local, state,
tribal, and other law enforcement agencies, state government agencies,
radio and television stations, and cable and satellite systems to
enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering abducted children.
"Child" or "children," as used in this chapter, means an individual
under eighteen years of age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol shall
develop and implement a plan, commonly known as an "endangered missing
person advisory plan," for voluntary cooperation between local, state,
tribal, and other law enforcement agencies, state government agencies,
radio and television stations, and cable and satellite systems to
enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering endangered missing
persons who do not qualify for inclusion in an amber alert.

--- END ---