BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.334 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The historic preservation grant program is established in the
department of archaeology and historic preservation.
(2) Historic preservation grants may be made by the director from
the historic preservation account for the purposes of maintaining,
preserving, stabilizing, and restoring properties and structures of
historic interest, subject to the conditions and limitations of this
section.
(3)(a) The historic preservation grant advisory board must
establish eligibility, application, and selection criteria and
procedures in consultation with the director.
(b) Eligible structures include historic courthouses, theaters,
schools, and other buildings of historic interest. Eligible projects
do not include those provided for through other grant programs with the
department of archaeology and historic preservation.
(c) The director, in consultation with the historic preservation
grant advisory board, must establish funding categories for the
allocation of available funds. Buildings used as private residences
are not eligible to receive grants under this section, and a county
courthouse is eligible to receive a grant only if the building
continues to be used for county purposes.
(4) In awarding grants priority must be given as follows: First to
stabilization of historic projects; and second to preservation of
historic character, features, and materials. Other factors to be
considered in the grant award process must include:
(a) The historic and cultural significance of the project;
(b) The urgency of the need for repair;
(c) The extent the project preserves historical character and
extends the useful life of the structure;
(d) Plans for long-term preservation and maintenance of the
structure;
(e) The equitable geographic distribution of historic structures
across the state; and
(f) Whether the structure is listed, or is eligible to be listed,
on the national register of historic places, the Washington heritage
register, or a local historic register, or is an outstanding example of
a type of structure.
(5) Recipients of grants under this section must demonstrate a
public benefit from the grant award, including public access to the
historic structure. If the structure is privately owned, the grant
recipient must demonstrate that the state has received sufficient
consideration for the grant. If the recipient of a grant does not
maintain the historic nature of the structure for at least ten years,
repayment of the grant must be required. Unless otherwise determined
by the director, all work performed on the structure must comply with
the federal department of interior standards for the treatment of
historic properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.334 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The historic preservation grant advisory board is established
to advise the director in the administration of the historic
preservation grant program under section 1 of this act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the members of
the historic preservation grant advisory board must be appointed by the
director and shall serve terms of two years. The board must consist of
the following members:
(a) A representative of the national trust for historic
preservation;
(b) Two additional persons representing nonprofit historic
preservation organizations or public development authorities targeted
to historic preservation;
(c) One member of the advisory council on historic preservation
under RCW 27.34.250;
(d) Two persons representing private industry;
(e) Two persons representing state agencies;
(f) Two persons representing local governments;
(g) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
to be appointed by the president of the senate; and
(h) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(3) The board may establish bylaws governing the conduct of its
business and must select a chair from among its members. Legislative
members of the board must be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of the board
must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.334 RCW
to read as follows:
The historic preservation grant account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from legislative appropriations
and public and private contributions to the historic preservation grant
program must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes of section 1 of this act.
Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c 128 s 20, and
2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the historic preservation grant account, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account,
the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional
transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, and the
reading achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed
shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c
128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the historic preservation grant account, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account,
the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool account, the regional
transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2010, from the general fund to the historic preservation grant
account for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The office of the code reviser may
alphabetize the names of the accounts in RCW 43.79A.040 during
codification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 4 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 4 of this act expires August 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 5 of this act takes effect August
1, 2009.

--- END ---