BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that other states have
successfully implemented resident curator programs that preserve,
maintain, and restore historic and other significant state-owned
properties by allowing private parties to occupy or use the properties
for residential purposes, at no cost or reduced rent, in exchange for
the tenant's maintenance, rehabilitation, or restoration of the
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
A state agency with statutory authority to lease state-owned
residential properties to private parties may negotiate a lease at a
rate that is less than fair market value in consideration of the
lessee's occupancy of the property for noncommercial residential
purposes and agreement to restore, maintain, rehabilitate, or otherwise
improve the leased property. Such an agreement must be in writing and
must clearly specify the terms of the agreement and the improvements to
be made to the property. No improvements to the property may be made
without the approval of the leasing agency. If the property is listed,
or is eligible to be listed, on the national register of historic
places, the Washington heritage register, or a local historic register,
the agency must consult with the department of archaeology and historic
preservation and all work performed on the property must comply with
the federal department of interior standards for rehabilitation of
historic properties.

--- END ---