BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that electricity
generated from renewable energy sources promotes sustainable energy
alternatives and can help to replace the need for oil and natural gas.
The legislature also recognizes that to ensure the development and
implementation of these types of electricity generating projects,
regulatory barriers should be removed or minimized where appropriate
and possible.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.010 and 2001 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All wires and equipment, and installations thereof, that convey
electric current and installations of equipment to be operated by
electric current, in, on, or about buildings or structures, except for
telephone, telegraph, radio, and television wires and equipment, and
television antenna installations, signal strength amplifiers, and
coaxial installations pertaining thereto shall be in strict conformity
with this chapter, the statutes of the state of Washington, and the
rules issued by the department, and shall be in conformity with
approved methods of construction for safety to life and property. All
wires and equipment that fall within section 90.2(b)(5) of the National
Electrical Code, 1981 edition, are exempt from the requirements of this
chapter. The regulations and articles in the National Electrical Code,
the national electrical safety code, and other installation and safety
regulations approved by the national fire protection association, as
modified or supplemented by rules issued by the department in
furtherance of safety to life and property under authority hereby
granted, shall be prima facie evidence of the approved methods of
construction. All materials, devices, appliances, and equipment used
in such installations shall be of a type that conforms to applicable
standards or be indicated as acceptable by the established standards of
any electrical product testing laboratory which is accredited by the
department. Industrial control panels, utilization equipment, and
their components do not need to be listed, labeled, or otherwise
indicated as acceptable by an accredited electrical product testing
laboratory unless specifically required by the National Electrical
Code, 1993 edition.
(2) Residential buildings or structures moved into or within a
county, city, or town are not required to comply with all of the
requirements of this chapter, if the original occupancy classification
of the building or structure is not changed as a result of the move.
This subsection shall not apply to residential buildings or structures
that are substantially remodeled or rehabilitated.
(3) An alternative energy source that generates electricity from
renewable resources, as the term "renewable resources" is defined in
RCW 19.29A.010, and that meets the installation requirements of the
receiving utility is not required to comply with the requirements of
this chapter.
(4) This chapter shall not limit the authority or power of any city
or town to enact and enforce under authority given by law, any
ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring an equal, higher, or better
standard of construction and an equal, higher, or better standard of
materials, devices, appliances, and equipment than that required by
this chapter. A city or town shall require that its electrical
inspectors meet the qualifications provided for state electrical
inspectors in accordance with RCW 19.28.321. In a city or town having
an equal, higher, or better standard the installations, materials,
devices, appliances, and equipment shall be in accordance with the
ordinance, rule, or regulation of the city or town. Electrical
equipment associated with spas, hot tubs, swimming pools, and
hydromassage bathtubs shall not be offered for sale or exchange unless
the electrical equipment is certified as being in compliance with the
applicable product safety standard by bearing the certification mark of
an approved electrical products testing laboratory.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this chapter may be construed as permitting
the connection of any conductor of any electric circuit with a pipe
that is connected with or designed to be connected with a waterworks
piping system, without the consent of the person or persons legally
responsible for the operation and maintenance of the waterworks piping
system.

--- END ---