BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall establish regulations to minimize the risk
of fire resulting from railroad operations or maintenance.
(2) No person may operate railroad equipment or perform rail
maintenance, including rail grinding, welding, or vegetation clearing,
without complying with requirements adopted by the commission to
minimize risk of fire.
(3) Each violation of this section is punishable by a monetary
penalty of one thousand dollars.

--- END ---