BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.26.167 and 2005 c 319 s 130 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature recognizes the need for a multijurisdictional body
to review future requests for jurisdictional transfers. The ((board is
hereby directed, beginning September 1, 1991, to)) commission shall
receive petitions from cities, counties, or the state requesting any
addition or deletion from the state highway system. The ((board is
required to)) commission must utilize the criteria established in RCW
47.17.001 in evaluating petitions and to adopt rules for implementation
of this process. The ((board)) commission shall forward to the senate
and house transportation committees by November 15th each year any
recommended jurisdictional transfers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 47.26.167 is recodified as a new section
in chapter 47.01 RCW.

--- END ---