BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.20.010 and 2005 c 252 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in this section, state-owned armories shall be
used strictly for military purposes.
(1) One room, together with the necessary furniture, heat, light,
and janitor service, may be set aside for the exclusive use of bona
fide veterans' organizations subject to the direction of the officer in
charge. Members of these veterans' organizations and their auxiliaries
shall have access to the room and its use at all times.
(2) A bona fide veterans' organization may use any state armory for
athletic and social events without payment of rent whenever the armory
is not being used by the organized militia. The adjutant general may
require the veterans' organization to pay the cost of heating,
lighting, or other miscellaneous expenses incidental to this use.
(3) The adjutant general may, during an emergency, permit transient
lodging of service personnel in armories.
(4) The adjutant general may, upon the recommendation of the
executive head or governing body of a county, city or town, permit
transient lodging of anyone in armories. The adjutant general may
require the county, city or town to pay no more than the actual cost of
staffing, heating, lighting and other miscellaneous expenses incidental
to this use.
(5) Civilian rifle clubs affiliated with the National Rifle
Association of America are permitted to use small arms ranges in the
armories at least one night each week under regulations prescribed by
the adjutant general.
(6) State-owned armories shall be available, at the discretion of
the adjutant general, for public and private use ((for casual civic
purposes, and amateur and professional sports and theatricals)) upon
payment of ((fixed)) rental charges and compliance with regulations of
the state military department. Children attending primary and high
schools have a preferential right to use these armories.
The adjutant general shall prepare a schedule of rental charges,
including a cleaning deposit, and utility costs for each state-owned
armory which may not be waived except for activities sponsored by the
organized militia or activities provided for in subsection (4) of this
section. The rental charges derived from armory rentals less the
cleaning deposit shall be paid into the military department rental and
lease account under RCW 38.40.210.

--- END ---