BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of veterans affairs shall
study efficient ways to increase the department's access to veterans,
and to increase veterans' access to the state and federal assistance
programs for which they may be eligible. By January 1, 2010, the
department shall submit a report to the legislature with
recommendations. The report shall address:
(1) How the department can achieve a goal of identifying all
veterans in the state within five years;
(2) How the department can efficiently identify veterans as their
population in the state continues to grow;
(3) How the department can identify veterans through referrals from
other state agencies that currently provide services to veterans;
(4) How the department can effectively inform veterans of the state
and federal programs for which they may be eligible;
(5) The potential costs and savings to the state that would result
if the department's recommendations were undertaken; and
(6) What legislation would be needed, if any, to undertake the
department's recommendations.

--- END ---