BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.270 and 2005 c 314 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The total replacement plate fee shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.))
(1) Upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of one or both of the
vehicle license number plates issued for any vehicle where more than
one plate was originally issued or where one or both have become so
illegible or in such a condition as to be difficult to distinguish, or
upon the owner's option, the owner of the vehicle shall make
application for new vehicle license number plates upon a form furnished
by the director. The application shall be filed with the director or
the director's authorized agent, accompanied by the certificate of
license registration of the vehicle and a fee in the amount of ten
dollars per plate, whereupon the director, or the director's authorized
agent, shall issue new vehicle license number plates to the applicant.
It shall be accompanied by a fee of two dollars for a new motorcycle
license number plate. In the event the director has issued license
period tabs or a windshield emblem instead of vehicle license number
plates, and upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of the tabs or
windshield emblem, application shall be made on a form provided by the
director and in the same manner as above described, and shall be
accompanied by a fee of one dollar for each pair of tabs or for each
windshield emblem, whereupon the director shall issue to the applicant
a duplicate pair of tabs, year tabs, and when necessary month tabs or
a windshield emblem to replace those lost, defaced, or destroyed. For
vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington or by any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision of
the state of Washington or United States government, or owned or leased
by the governing body of an Indian tribe as defined in RCW 46.16.020,
a fee shall be charged for replacement of a vehicle license number
plate only to the extent required by the provisions of RCW 46.16.020,
46.16.237, and 46.01.140. For vehicles owned, rented, or leased by
foreign countries or international bodies to which the United States
government is a signatory by treaty, the payment of any fee for the
replacement of a vehicle license number plate shall not be required.
(2) The ten-dollar vehicle license number plate replacement fee
must be deposited as follows:
(a) Seven dollars per vehicle license number plate in the motor
vehicle fund; and
(b) Three dollars per vehicle license number plate in the state
route number 2 safety corridor account created in section 4 of this
act.
(3) The remaining fees described under this section must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.68.041 and 2004 c 95 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
the department shall forward all funds accruing under the provisions of
chapter 46.20 RCW together with a proper identifying, detailed report
to the state treasurer who shall deposit such moneys to the credit of
the highway safety fund.
(2) Sixty-three percent of each fee collected by the department
under RCW 46.20.311 (1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), and (3)(b) shall be
deposited in the impaired driving safety account.
(3) Ten percent of the fee collected by the department under RCW
46.20.161 must be deposited in the state route number 2 safety corridor
account created in section 4 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited as follows:
(a) Seventy percent in the multimodal transportation account
created in RCW 47.66.070; and
(b) Thirty percent in the state route number 2 safety corridor
account created in section 4 of this act.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection shall be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive
retail sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The state route number 2 safety corridor account is created in the
motor vehicle fund. All receipts from the fee imposed under RCW
46.16.270(1) for replacement vehicle license number plates, as
distributed under RCW 46.16.270(2)(b), ten percent of the fees
collected under RCW 46.20.161, and thirty percent of receipts from
taxes collected under RCW 82.08.020(2)(b) must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used for the following:
(1) Expanding state route number 2 beginning near the junction with
state route number 9 at milepost 5 to the King county line at Stevens
pass near milepost 64 to four lanes;
(2) Purchasing the remaining right-of-way for the Monroe bypass;
and
(3) Constructing a two-lane Monroe bypass using the existing right-of-way.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---