BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the unique
sacrifices made by veterans and the substantial challenges that
returning veterans face after a period of military duty away from home.
The legislature further recognizes that veterans who own private
businesses may face particular hardships as a direct result of their
military service. The purpose of this act is to mitigate economic
damage to veteran-owned businesses as a result of military service, and
to provide opportunities to them in recognition of the outstanding
service they have given to their country.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.60A.010 and 2006 c 343 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have
the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the department of veterans affairs.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of veterans
affairs.
(3) "Committee" means the veterans affairs advisory committee.
(4) "Board" means the veterans innovations program board.
(5) "Goods and services" includes professional services and all
other goods and services.
(6) "Procurement" means the purchase, lease, or rental of any goods
or services.
(7) "State agency" includes the state of Washington and all
agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and
correctional and other types of institutions.
(8) "Veteran-owned business" means a business that is certified by
the department to be at least fifty-one percent owned and controlled
by:
(a) A veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or
(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces
of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and
armed forces reserves.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall report to the legislature by December 2012
and December of each even-numbered year thereafter outlining the
progress made in implementing this act.
(2) The department shall develop a procedure for certifying
veteran-owned businesses and maintain a list of veteran-owned
businesses on the department's public web site.
(3) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
act. The department shall consult agencies to determine what specific
information they must report to the department.
(4) The department shall collaborate with and may assist agencies
in implementing outreach to veteran-owned businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State agencies are encouraged to award three percent of all
procurement contracts that are exempt from competitive bidding
requirements under RCW 43.19.1906(2) to veteran-owned businesses
certified by the department under section 3 of this act.
(2) State agencies shall:
(a) Perform outreach to veteran-owned businesses in collaboration
with the department to increase opportunities for veteran-owned
businesses to sell goods and services to the state;
(b) Work to match agency procurement records with the department's
database of certified veteran-owned businesses to establish how many
procurement contracts are being awarded to those businesses; and
(c) Report by October 2012 and October of each even-numbered year
thereafter to the department on the progress made in implementing this
section as directed by the department. Agencies shall report their
progress in implementing subsections (1) and (2)(a) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of general administration shall identify in the
department's vendor registry all vendors that are veteran-owned
businesses as certified by the department of veterans affairs under
section 3 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.536 and 1983 c 120 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All contracts entered into and purchases made, including
leasing or renting, under this chapter on or after September 1, 1983,
are subject to the requirements established under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(2) All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or
after the effective date of this act are subject to the requirements
established under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or
after the effective date of this act are subject to the requirements
established under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or
after the effective date of this act are subject to the requirements
established under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or
after the effective date of this act are subject to the requirements
established under section 4 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.80.040 and 1981 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the
agency shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their
profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and
performance data. The agency shall evaluate current statements of
qualifications and performance data on file with the agency, together
with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding the proposed
project, and shall conduct discussions with one or more firms regarding
anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods of
approach for furnishing the required services and then shall select
therefrom, based upon criteria established by the agency, the firm
deemed to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required
for the proposed project. Such agency procedures and guidelines shall
include a plan to insure that minority and women-owned firms and
veteran-owned firms are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity to
compete for and obtain public contracts for services. The level of
participation by minority and women-owned firms and veteran-owned firms
shall be consistent with their general availability within the
professional communities involved.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.28.030 and 2007 c 218 s 90 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or
improved, and improvements located on property acquired for
right-of-way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of
such right-of-way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces.
The work or portions thereof may be done by state forces when the
estimated costs thereof are less than fifty thousand dollars and
effective July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That when
delay of performance of such work would jeopardize a state highway or
constitute a danger to the traveling public, the work may be done by
state forces when the estimated cost thereof is less than eighty
thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand
dollars. When the department of transportation determines to do the
work by state forces, it shall enter a statement upon its records to
that effect, stating the reasons therefor. To enable a larger number
of small businesses((,)) and veteran, minority, and women contractors
to effectively compete for department of transportation contracts, the
department may adopt rules providing for bids and award of contracts
for the performance of work, or furnishing equipment, materials,
supplies, or operating services whenever any work is to be performed
and the engineer's estimate indicates the cost of the work would not
exceed eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred
thousand dollars. The rules adopted under this section:
(1) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that
competitive sources are available except when delay of performance
would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling
public; and
(2) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a
performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then
progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on
submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements
have been made to laborers, material suppliers, mechanics, and
subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and
(3) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an
alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the
prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall
always be sufficient.
The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and
rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts
entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules
as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of
minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is not intended to create a cause
of action or entitlement in an individual or class of individuals.

--- END ---