BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, agencies
shall waive any fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions for
first-time paperwork violations by a small business.
(2) When an agency waives a fine, penalty, or sanction under this
section, when possible it shall require the small business to correct
the violation within a reasonable period of time, in a manner specified
by the agency. If correction is impossible, no correction may be
required and failure to correct is not grounds for reinstatement of
fines, penalties, or sanctions under subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(3) Exceptions to the waiver requirement of this section may be
made for any of the following reasons:
(a) The agency head determines that the effect of the violation
presents a direct danger to the public health, results in a loss of
income or benefits to an employee, poses a potentially significant
threat to human health or the environment, or causes serious harm to
the public interest;
(b) The violation involves a small business knowingly or willfully
engaging in conduct that may result in a felony conviction;
(c) The violation is of a requirement concerning the assessment,
collection, or administration of any tax, tax program, debt, revenue,
or receipt;
(d) The waiver is in conflict with federal law or program
requirements, federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, or the requirements for
eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, as determined by the agency head;
(e) The small business committing the violation previously violated
a substantially similar paperwork requirement; or
(f) The owner or operator of the small business committing the
violation owns or operates, or owned or operated a different small
business which previously violated a substantially similar paperwork
requirement.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from waiving
fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions incurred by a small
business for a paperwork violation that is not a first-time offense.
(b) Any fine, civil penalty, or administrative sanction that is
waived under this section may be reinstated and imposed in addition to
any additional fines, penalties, or administrative sanctions associated
with a subsequent violation for noncompliance with a substantially
similar paperwork requirement, or failure to correct the previous
violation as required by the agency under subsection (2) of this
section.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to diminish the
responsibility for any citizen or business to apply for and obtain a
permit, license, or authorizing document that is required to engage in
a regulated activity, or otherwise comply with state or federal law.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business" means a business with two hundred fifty or
fewer employees.
(b) "Paperwork violation" means the violation of any statutory or
regulatory requirement that mandates the collection of information by
an agency, or the collection, posting, or retention of information by
a small business. This includes but is not limited to requirements in
the Revised Code of Washington, the Washington Administrative Code, the
Washington State Register, or any other agency directive.
(c) "First-time paperwork violation" means the first instance of a
particular or substantially similar paperwork violation.

--- END ---