BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Within existing funds, the higher
education coordinating board shall convene a work group to develop a
plan to create a single, coordinated, collaboratively supported,
one-stop college information web-based portal for students and families
planning, preparing, and applying for, as well as those attending,
postsecondary education. The purpose of the portal is to provide
comprehensive information and applications regarding financial,
academic, and career planning, admissions, scholarships, financial aid,
as well as any other information and services identified by the work
group that would encourage or aid students contemplating their
postsecondary education goals.
(2) The work group shall consist of representatives from the higher
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the council of presidents, the workforce training
and education coordinating board, the independent colleges of
Washington, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
representatives of the public, private, and private vocational colleges
in Washington, and others as may be needed.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) Investigate similar ongoing efforts in other states including
what information and services are typically offered, what agency takes
the lead in creating and maintaining the portal, what planning stages
and budgets are associated with portals, how portals are marketed to
maximize usefulness, and whether the states' efforts are increasing
postsecondary participation;
(b) Focus on a portal that is student-centered and does not
presuppose a sophisticated understanding of postsecondary education;
(c) Identify the resources necessary to build and maintain the
portal;
(d) Develop a plan that builds upon existing infrastructure
whenever possible; and
(e) Identify the metrics that can be used to gauge success.
(4) The final report of the work group shall:
(a) Recommend a process and timeline for the creation of the
portal;
(b) Identify costs and savings to students, families, and the
state;
(c) Identify potential issues and roadblocks anticipated in the
creation and maintenance of the portal; and
(d) Propose enabling legislative and administrative solutions.
(5) The board shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---