BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.12.060 and 2005 c 93 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be
necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter,
and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the state higher education
administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include provisions
designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible needy
students in eligible postsecondary institutions ((in need thereof)).
The rules shall include:
(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not
result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services;
(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:
(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of
maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under
the program covered by the agreement; and
(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time
student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student
already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good
standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an
undergraduate, graduate or professional student; and
(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology;
(3) Placing priority on providing:
(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state
of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, particularly
former foster youth as defined in RCW 28B.92.060((, except resident
students defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(g)));
(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or
vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements
whenever appropriate; and
(c) Off-campus community service placements;
(4) To the extent practicable, limiting the proportion of state
subsidy expended upon nonresident students to fifteen percent, or such
less amount as specified in the biennial appropriations act;
(5) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher
education, utilization of this work-study program:
(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions
under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be
identified to a job classification under the director of personnel's
classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;
(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace
classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and
(d) That work study positions shall only be established at entry
level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and
responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; and
(((5))) (6) Provisions to encourage job placements in high employer
demand occupations that meet Washington's economic development goals,
((especially)) including those in international trade and international
relations. The board shall permit appropriate job placements in other
states and other countries.

--- END ---