BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
LOCAL REVITALIZATION FINANCING--GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature recognizes that the state
as a whole benefits from investment in public infrastructure because it
promotes community and economic development. Public investment
stimulates business activity and helps create jobs, stimulates the
redevelopment of brownfields and blighted areas in the inner city,
lowers the cost of housing, and promotes efficient land use. The
legislature finds that these activities generate revenue for the state
and that it is in the public interest to invest in these projects
through a credit against the state sales and use tax to those local
governments that can demonstrate the expected returns to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means two million five
hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(5) "Local government" means any city, town, county, and port
district.
(6) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
revitalization financing.
(7) "Local revitalization financing" means the use of revenues from
local public sources, and revenues received from the local option sales
and use tax authorized in section 601 of this act, dedicated to pay the
principal and interest on bonds authorized under section 701 of this
act.
(8) "Local sales and use tax increment" means the estimated annual
increase in local sales and use taxes as determined and anticipated by
the local government in the calendar years following the approval of
the revitalization area by the department from taxable activity within
the revitalization area.
(9) "Local sales and use taxes" means local revenues derived from
the imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(10) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(11) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revitalization area within its geographic boundaries that has
taken action as provided in section 107(1) of this act to allow the use
of all or some of its local sales and use tax increment or other
revenues from local public sources dedicated for local revitalization
financing.
(12) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revitalization area within its geographic boundaries that has
not taken action as provided in section 106(2) of this act.
(13) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revitalization area,
less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(14)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property in
a revitalization area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revitalization area is approved by
the department;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revitalization area
is approved by the department;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revitalization area is approved by the department.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a
revitalization area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revitalization area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the
cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW,
the year when such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of
levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(15) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of:
(a) Design, planning, acquisition, including land acquisition, site
preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) Demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property
pending construction of public improvements;
(c) Relocating utilities as a result of public improvements;
(d) Financing public improvements, including interest during
construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance,
principal and interest costs on general indebtedness issued to finance
public improvements, and any necessary reserves for general
indebtedness; and
(e) Administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably
necessary and related to these costs, including related costs that may
have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the
public improvements and the use of local revitalization financing to
fund the costs of the public improvements.
(16) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revitalization area that
include:
(i) Street, road, bridge, and rail construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks, streetlights, landscaping, and streetscaping;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities, recreational areas, and environmental
remediation;
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(viii) Electric, gas, fiber, and other utility infrastructures; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within the revitalization area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the
revitalization area;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the revitalization area; or
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(17) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(18) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(19)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) The local sales and use tax amounts received as a result of
interlocal agreement, local sales and use tax amounts from sponsoring
local governments based on its local sales and use tax increment, and
local property tax allocation revenues, which are dedicated by a
sponsoring local government, participating local governments, and
participating taxing districts, for payment of bonds under section 701
of this act; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources, which are dedicated for the payment of bonds under section 701
of this act.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(20) "Revitalization area" means the geographic area adopted by a
sponsoring local government and approved by the department, from which
local sales and use tax increments are estimated and property tax
allocation revenues are derived for local revitalization financing.
(21) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, county, or
any combination thereof, that adopts a revitalization area and applies
to the department to use local revitalization financing.
(22) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) Five hundred thousand dollars;
(b) The project award amount approved by the department as provided
in section 401 of this act; or
(c) The total amount of revenues from local public sources
dedicated in the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal
and interest on bonds issued under section 701 of this act.
(23) "State property tax increment" means the estimated amount of
annual tax revenues estimated to be received by the state from the
imposition of property taxes levied by the state for the support of
common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the property tax allocation
revenue value, as determined by the sponsoring local government in an
application under section 401 of this act.
(24) "State sales and use tax increment" means the estimated amount
of annual increase in state sales and use taxes to be received by the
state from taxable activity within the revitalization area in the years
following the approval of the revitalization area by the department as
determined by the sponsoring local government in an application under
section 401 of this act.
(25) "State sales and use taxes" means state retail sales and use
taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1), less the amount of tax distributions from all local
retail sales and use taxes, other than the local sales and use taxes
authorized by section 601 of this act for the applicable revitalization
area, imposed on the same taxable events that are credited against the
state retail sales and use taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020.
(26) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revitalization area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 CONDITIONS. A local government may
finance public improvements using local revitalization financing
subject to the following conditions:
(1) The local government has adopted an ordinance designating a
revitalization area within its boundaries and specified the public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use
of local revitalization financing;
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local revitalization financing are expected to encourage
private development within the revitalization area and to increase the
fair market value of real property within the revitalization area;
(3) The local government has entered into a contract with a private
developer relating to the development of private improvements within
the revitalization area or has received a letter of intent from a
private developer relating to the developer's plans for the development
of private improvements within the revitalization area;
(4) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
revitalization area, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(5) The local government may not use local revitalization financing
to finance the costs associated with the financing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining,
remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of public facilities funded with
taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048 or 82.14.390;
(6) The governing body of the local government must make a finding
that local revitalization financing:
(a) Will not be used for the purpose of relocating a business from
outside the revitalization area, but within this state, into the
revitalization area unless convincing evidence is provided that the
firm being relocated would otherwise leave the state;
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the revitalization area; and
(c) Will be used exclusively in areas within the jurisdiction of
the local government deemed in need of either economic development or
redevelopment, or both, and absent the financing available under this
chapter and sections 601 and 602 of this act the proposed economic
development or redevelopment would more than likely not occur; and
(7) The governing body of the local government finds that the
public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using
local revitalization financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private investment within the revitalization area;
(b) Increase employment within the revitalization area; and
(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use
tax will be imposed under section 601 of this act, increases in state
and local property, sales, and use tax revenues that are equal to or
greater than the respective state and local contributions made under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 CREATING A REVITALIZATION AREA. (1)
Before adopting an ordinance creating the revitalization area, a
sponsoring local government must:
(a) Provide notice to all taxing districts and local governments
with geographic boundaries within the proposed revitalization area of
the sponsoring local government's intent to create a revitalization
area. Notice must be provided in writing to the governing body of the
taxing districts and local governments at least thirty days in advance
of the public hearing as required by (b) of this subsection. The
notice must include at least the following information:
(i) The name of the proposed revitalization area;
(ii) The date for the public hearing as required by (b) of this
subsection;
(iii) The earliest anticipated date when the sponsoring local
government will take action to adopt the proposed revitalization area;
and
(iv) The name of a contact person with phone number of the
sponsoring local government and mailing address where a copy of an
ordinance adopted under sections 105 and 106 of this act may be sent;
and
(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public
improvements in whole or in part with local revitalization financing.
Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal newspaper of
general circulation within the proposed revitalization area at least
ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed revitalization area.
Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements, estimate
the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of the costs
of the public improvements to be borne by local revitalization
financing, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the public
improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed revitalization
area, and estimate the period during which local revitalization
financing is contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held
by either the governing body of the sponsoring local government, or a
committee of the governing body that includes at least a majority of
the whole governing body.
(2) To create a revitalization area, a sponsoring local government
must adopt an ordinance establishing the revitalization area that:
(a) Describes the public improvements proposed to be made in the
revitalization area;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the revitalization area, subject to
the limitations in section 105 of this act;
(c) Estimates the cost of the proposed public improvements and the
portion of these costs to be financed by local revitalization
financing;
(d) Estimates the time during which local property tax allocation
revenues, and other revenues from local public sources, such as amounts
of local sales and use taxes from participating local governments, are
to be used for local revitalization financing;
(e) Provides the date when the use of local property tax allocation
revenues will commence and a list of the taxing districts that have not
adopted an ordinance as described in section 106 of this act to be
removed as a participating taxing district;
(f) Finds that all of the requirements in section 103 of this act
are met;
(g) Provides the anticipated rate of sales and use tax under
section 601 of this act that the local government will impose if
awarded a state contribution under section 401 of this act;
(h) Provides the anticipated date when the criteria for the sales
and use tax in section 601 of this act will be met and the anticipated
date when the sales and use tax in section 601 of this act will be
imposed.
(3) The sponsoring local government must deliver a certified copy
of the adopted ordinance to the county treasurer, the governing body of
each participating taxing authority and participating taxing district
within which the revitalization area is located, and the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 LIMITATIONS ON REVITALIZATION AREAS. The
designation of a revitalization area is subject to the following
limitations:
(1) No revitalization area may have within its geographic
boundaries any part of a hospital benefit zone under chapter 39.100
RCW, any part of a revenue development area created under chapter
39.102 RCW, any part of an increment area under chapter 39.89 RCW, or
any part of another revitalization area under this chapter;
(2) A revitalization area is limited to contiguous tracts, lots,
pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of islands of property
not included in the revitalization area;
(3) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels
where economic growth is unlikely to occur;
(4) The public improvements financed through bonds issued under
section 701 of this act must be located in the revitalization area;
(5) A revitalization area cannot comprise an area containing more
than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of the taxable
real property within the boundaries of the sponsoring local government
at the time the revitalization area is created;
(6) The boundaries of the revitalization area may not be changed
for the time period that local property tax allocation revenues, local
sales and use taxes of participating local governments, and the local
sales and use tax under section 601 of this act are used to pay bonds
issued under section 701 of this act; and
(7) A revitalization area must be geographically restricted to the
location of the public improvement and adjacent locations that the
sponsoring local government finds to have a high likelihood of
receiving direct positive business and economic impacts due to the
public improvement, such as a neighborhood or a block.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 OPTING OUT AS A PARTICIPATING TAXING
DISTRICT. (1) Participating taxing districts must allow the use of all
of their local property tax allocation revenues for local
revitalization financing.
(2)(a) If a taxing district does not want to allow the use of its
property tax revenues for the local revitalization financing of public
improvements in a revitalization area, its governing body must adopt an
ordinance to remove itself as a participating taxing district and must
notify the sponsoring local government.
(b) The taxing district must provide a copy of the adopted
ordinance and notice to the sponsoring local government creating the
revitalization area before the anticipated date that the sponsoring
local government proposes to adopt the ordinance creating the
revitalization area as provided in the notice required by section
104(1)(a) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 OPTING IN OR OUT AS A PARTICIPATING LOCAL
GOVERNMENT. (1) A participating local government must enter into an
interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW to participate in
local revitalization financing with the sponsoring local government.
(2)(a) If a local government that imposes a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.030 does not want to participate in the local revitalization
financing of public improvements in a revitalization area, its
governing body must adopt an ordinance and notify the sponsoring local
government that the taxing authority will not be a participating local
government.
(b) The local government must provide a copy of the adopted
ordinance and the notice to the sponsoring local government creating
the revitalization area before the anticipated date that the sponsoring
local government proposes to adopt an ordinance creating the
revitalization area as provided in the notice required by section
104(1)(a) of this act.

PART II
LOCAL REVITALIZATION FINANCING
USE OF LOCAL PROPERTY TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES TO PAY FOR
THE COST OF PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 LOCAL PROPERTY TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES.
(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following the creation of a
revitalization area by a sponsoring local government, the county
treasurer shall distribute receipts from regular taxes imposed on real
property located in the revitalization area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring local
government must receive that portion of its regular property taxes
produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the
property tax allocation revenue base value for that local
revitalization financing project in the taxing district; and
(b) The sponsoring local government must receive an additional
portion of the regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each
participating taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue
value within the revitalization area. However, if there is no property
tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring local government may not
receive any additional regular property taxes under this subsection
(1)(b). The sponsoring local government may agree to receive less than
the full amount of the additional portion of regular property taxes
under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt service, reserve, and
other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the
balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to the participating
taxing districts that levied regular property taxes, or have regular
property taxes levied for them, in the revitalization area for
collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for
collection that year. The sponsoring local government may request that
the treasurer transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to
its designated agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to
the sponsoring local government or its agent under this subsection
(1)(b) may only be expended to finance public improvement costs
associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by
local revitalization financing.
(2) The county assessor shall determine the property tax allocation
revenue value and property tax allocation revenue base value. This
section does not authorize revaluations of real property by the
assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the
assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other
authorized revaluation procedures.
(3) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenue to
the sponsoring local government must cease when local property tax
allocation revenues are no longer obligated to pay the costs of the
public improvements. Any excess local property tax allocation
revenues, and earnings on the revenues, remaining at the time the
distribution of local property tax allocation revenue terminates, must
be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the
participating taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or
had regular property taxes imposed for it, in the revitalization area
for collection that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular
property tax levies for collection that year.
(4) The allocation to the revitalization area of that portion of
the sponsoring local government's and each participating taxing
district's regular property taxes levied upon the property tax
allocation revenue value within that revitalization area is declared to
be a public purpose of and benefit to the sponsoring local government
and each participating taxing district.
(5) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenues
under this section may not affect or be deemed to affect the rate of
taxes levied by or within any sponsoring local government and
participating taxing district or the consistency of any such levies
with the uniformity requirement of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution.

PART III
LOCAL REVITALIZATION FINANCING
USE OF LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX INCREMENTS TO PAY FOR
THE COST OF PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX INCREMENTS. (1)
A sponsoring local government may use annually local sales and use tax
amounts equal to some or all of its local sales and use tax increments
to finance public improvements in the revitalization area. The amounts
of local sales and use tax dedicated by a participating local
government must begin and cease on the dates specified in an interlocal
agreement authorized in chapter 39.34 RCW. Sponsoring local
governments and participating local governments are authorized to
allocate some or all of their local sales and use tax increment to the
sponsoring local government as provided by section 107(1) of this act.
(2) The department must assist sponsoring local governments in
estimating sales and use tax revenues from estimated taxable activity
in the proposed or adopted revitalization area. The sponsoring local
government must provide the department with accurate information
describing the geographical boundaries of the revitalization area in an
electronic format or in a manner as otherwise prescribed by the
department.

PART IV
LOCAL REVITALIZATION FINANCING--STATE CONTRIBUTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 APPLICATION PROCESS--DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
APPROVAL. (1) Prior to applying to the department to receive a state
contribution, a sponsoring local government shall adopt a
revitalization area within the limitations in section 105 of this act
and in accordance with section 104 of this act.
(2) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under section
601 of this act, a sponsoring local government must apply to the
department and be approved for a project award amount. The application
must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department and include,
but not be limited to:
(a) Information establishing that over the period of time that the
local sales and use tax will be imposed under section 601 of this act,
increases in state and local property, sales, and use tax revenues as
a result of public improvements in the revitalization area will be
equal to or greater than the respective state and local contributions
made under this chapter;
(b) Information demonstrating that the sponsoring local government
will meet the requirements necessary to receive the full amount of
state contribution it is requesting on an annual basis;
(c) The amount of state contribution it is requesting;
(d) The anticipated effective date for imposing the tax under
section 601 of this act;
(e) The estimated number of years that the tax will be imposed;
(f) The anticipated rate of tax to be imposed under section 601 of
this act, subject to the rate-setting conditions in section 601(3) of
this act, should the sponsoring local government be approved for a
project award; and
(g) The anticipated date when bonds under section 701 of this act
will be issued.
The department shall make available electronic forms to be used for
this purpose. As part of the application, each applicant must provide
to the department a copy of the adopted ordinance creating the
revitalization area as required in section 104 of this act, copies of
any adopted interlocal agreements from participating local governments,
and any notices from taxing districts that elect not to be a
participating taxing district.
(3)(a) Project awards must be determined on:
(i) A first-come basis for applications completed in their entirety
and submitted electronically;
(ii) The availability of a state contribution;
(iii) Whether the sponsoring local government would be able to
generate enough tax revenue under section 601 of this act to generate
the amount of project award requested.
(b) The total of all project awards may not exceed the annual state
contribution limit.
(c) If the level of available state contribution is less than the
amount requested by the next available applicant, the applicant must be
given the first opportunity to accept the lesser amount of state
contribution but only if the applicant produces a new application
within sixty days of being notified by the department and the
application describes the impact on the proposed project as a result of
the lesser award in addition to new application information outlined in
subsection (2) of this section.
(d) Applications that are not approved for a project award due to
lack of available state contribution will be returned to the applicant.
(e) Once total project awards reach the amount of annual state
contribution limit, no more applications will be accepted.
(f) If the annual contribution limit is increased, applications
will be accepted again beginning sixty days after the effective date of
the increase.
(4) The department shall notify the sponsoring local government of
approval or denial of a project award within sixty days of the
department's receipt of the sponsoring local government's application.
Determination of a project award by the department is final.
Notification must include the earliest date when the tax authorized
under section 601 of this act may be imposed, subject to conditions in
chapter 82.14 RCW. The project award notification must specify the
rate requested in the application and any adjustments to the rate that
would need to be made based on the project award and rate restrictions
in section 601 of this act.
(5) The department must begin accepting applications on September
1, 2009.

PART V
ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) A sponsoring local government
receiving a project award under section 401 of this act must provide a
report to the department by March 1st of each year beginning March 1st
after the project award has been approved. The report must contain the
following information:
(a) The amounts of local property tax allocation revenues received
in the preceding calendar year broken down by sponsoring local
government and participating taxing district;
(b) The amount of state property tax allocation revenues estimated
to have been received by the state in the preceding calendar year;
(c) The amount of local sales and use tax or other revenue from
local public sources dedicated by any participating local government
used for the payment of bonds under section 701 of this act in the
preceding calendar year;
(d) The amount of local sales and use tax dedicated by the
sponsoring local government, as it relates to the sponsoring local
government's local sales and use tax increment, used for the payment of
bonds under section 701 of this act;
(e) The amounts, other than those listed in (a) through (d) of this
subsection, from local public sources, broken down by type or source,
used for payment of bonds under section 701 of this act in the
preceding calendar year;
(f) The anticipated date when bonds under section 701 of this act
are expected to be retired;
(g) The names of any businesses locating within the revitalization
area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the
sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with local
revitalization financing;
(h) An estimate of the cumulative number of permanent jobs created
in the revitalization area as a result of the public improvements
undertaken by the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or
in part with local revitalization financing;
(i) An estimate of the average wages and benefits received by all
employees of businesses locating within the revitalization area as a
result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local
government and financed in whole or in part with local revitalization
financing;
(j) A list of public improvements financed by bonds issued under
section 701 of this act and the date on which the bonds are anticipated
to be retired;
(k) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with
section 103 of this act and the date on which the bonds are anticipated
to be retired;
(l) At least once every three years, updated estimates of the
amounts of state and local sales and use tax increments estimated to
have been received since the approval by the department of the project
award under section 401 of this act; and
(m) Any other information required by the department to enable the
department to fulfill its duties under this chapter and section 601 of
this act.
(2) The department shall make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a
summary of the information provided to the department by sponsoring
local governments under subsection (1) of this section.

PART VI
LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX CREDITED AGAINST THE
STATE SALES AND USE TAXES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX. (1) Any city or
county that has been approved for a project award under section 401 of
this act may impose a sales and use tax under the authority of this
section in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Except as
provided in this section, the tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the
city or county.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section is
credited against the state taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1) and
82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1). The department
must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the city or
county at no cost to the city or county. The taxes must be distributed
to cities and counties as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The rate of tax imposed by a city or county may not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and
82.14.475 and this section that are authorized but have not yet been
imposed on the same taxable events by a city or county that has been
approved to receive a state contribution by the department or the
community economic revitalization board under chapter 39.-- RCW (the
new chapter created in section 805 of this act) or chapter 39.100 or
39.102 RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the city or county in consultation
with the department, reasonably necessary to receive the project award
under section 401 of this act over ten months.
(4) The department, upon request, must assist a city or county in
establishing its tax rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section. Once the rate of tax is selected through the application
process and approved under section 401 of this act, it may not be
increased.
(5)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section
before:
(i) July 1, 2011;
(ii) July 1st of the second calendar year following the year in
which the department approved the application made under section 401 of
this act;
(iii) The state sales and use tax increment for the preceding
calendar year equals or exceeds the amount of the project award
approved by the department under section 401 of this act; and
(iv) Bonds have been issued according to section 701 of this act.
(b) The tax imposed under this section expires the earlier of the
date that the bonds issued under the authority of section 701 of this
act are retired or twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(6) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the legislative authority
of the city or county imposing a tax under this section must provide
that:
(a) The tax will first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the city or county, in
any fiscal year, may not exceed the amount approved by the department
under subsection (10) of this section;
(c) The department must cease distributing the tax for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the city or county equals the
amount of distributions approved by the department for the fiscal year
under subsection (10) of this section; or
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all cities and counties equals the annual state contribution limit;
(d) The tax will be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(e) The state is entitled to any revenue generated by the tax in
excess of the amounts specified in (c) of this subsection.
(7) If a city or county receives approval for more than one
revitalization area within its jurisdiction, the city or county may
impose a sales and use tax under this section for each revitalization
area.
(8) The department must determine the amount of tax receipts
distributed to each city and county imposing a sales and use tax under
the authority of this section and must advise a city or county when tax
distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount determined by the
department in subsection (10) of this section. Determinations by the
department of the amount of tax distributions attributable to a city or
county are not appealable. The department must remit any tax receipts
in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (6)(c) of this section
to the state treasurer who must deposit the money in the general fund.
(9) If a city or county fails to comply with section 501 of this
act, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent fiscal year until such
time as the city or county complies and the department calculates the
state contribution amount according to subsection (10) of this section
for the fiscal year.
(10)(a) For each fiscal year that a city or county imposes the tax
under the authority of this section, the department must approve the
amount of taxes that may be distributed to the city or county. The
amount approved by the department under this subsection is the lesser
of:
(i) The state contribution;
(ii) The amount of project award granted by the department as
provided in section 401 of this act; or
(iii) The total amount of revenues from local public sources
dedicated in the preceding calendar year, as reported in the required
annual report under section 501 of this act.
(b) A city or county may not receive, in any fiscal year, more
revenues from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than
the amount approved annually by the department.
(11) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all cities and counties is
limited annually to not more than the amount of annual state
contribution limit.
(12) The definitions in section 102 of this act apply to this
section subject to subsection (13) of this section and unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(13) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 or 67.40
RCW, or any other chapter, and that are credited against the state
sales and use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the taxes imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020(1).
(c) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 USE OF SALES AND USE TAX FUNDS. Money
collected from the taxes imposed under section 601 of this act may be
used only for the purpose of paying debt service on bonds issued under
the authority in section 701 of this act.

PART VII
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 ISSUANCE OF GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. (1)
A sponsoring local government creating a revitalization area and
authorizing the use of local revitalization financing may incur general
indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance the public
improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from local
revitalization financing it receives, subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government
creating the revitalization area and authorizing the use of local
revitalization financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness
and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The sponsoring local government includes this statement of the
intent in all notices required by RCW 39.89.050.
(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this
section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and
credit of the sponsoring local government, and nontax income, revenues,
fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions,
grants, and nontax money available to the local government for payment
of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on the
general indebtedness.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a sponsoring local government creating a revitalization area
and authorizing the use of local revitalization financing may require
any nonpublic participants to provide adequate security to protect the
public investment in the public improvement within the revitalization
area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section must be authorized by ordinance
of the sponsoring local government and may be issued in one or more
series and must bear a date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature
at a time or times, bear interest at a rate or rates, be in a
denomination or denominations, be in a form either coupon or registered
as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry conversion or registration
privileges, have a rank or priority, be executed in a manner, be
payable in a medium of payment, at a place or places, and be subject to
terms of redemption with or without premium, be secured in a manner,
and have other characteristics, as may be provided by an ordinance or
trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The sponsoring local government may annually pay into a fund to
be established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a
fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any local property tax allocation
revenues derived from property or business activity within the
revitalization area containing the public improvements funded by the
bonds, the payment to continue until all bonds payable from the fund
are paid in full. The local government may also annually pay into the
fund established in this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount
of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 601 of this
act, such payment to continue until all bonds payable from the fund are
paid in full. Revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 601 of
this act are subject to the use restriction in section 602 of this act.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the sponsoring local
government whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued
under this chapter cease to be the officials before the delivery of the
bonds, the signatures must, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for
all purposes, the same as if the officials had remained in office until
the delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 USE OF TAX REVENUE FOR BOND REPAYMENT. A
sponsoring local government that issues bonds under section 701 of this
act to finance public improvements may pledge for the payment of such
bonds all or part of any local property tax allocation revenues derived
from the public improvements. The sponsoring local government may also
pledge all or part of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under
section 601 of this act and held in connection with the public
improvements. All of such tax revenues are subject to the use
restriction in section 602 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 LIMITATION ON BONDS ISSUED. The bonds
issued by a local government under section 701 of this act to finance
public improvements do not constitute an obligation of the state of
Washington, either general or special.

PART VIII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 CAPTIONS AND PART HEADINGS NOT LAW.
Captions and part headings used in this act do not constitute any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 AUTHORITY. Nothing in this act may be
construed to give port districts the authority to impose a sales or use
tax under chapter 82.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 ADMINISTRATION BY THE DEPARTMENT. The
department of revenue may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW it
considers necessary for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 Sections 101 through 401 and 701 through
804 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 Sections 601 and 602 of this act are each
added to chapter 82.14 RCW.

--- END ---