BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.06.050 and 2004 c 268 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The proposal for abandonment of a plan of government as authorized
in RCW 35A.06.030 and for adoption of the plan named in the resolution
or petition shall be voted upon at the next general election in
accordance with RCW 29A.04.330, or at a special election held prior to
the next general election in accordance with the resolution of the
legislative body. The ballot title and statement of the proposition
shall be prepared by the city attorney as provided in RCW ((29.27.060
and)) 35A.29.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---