BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except when treatment is provided in a hospital licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW, a physician's trained emergency medical service
intermediate life support technician and paramedic, emergency medical
technician, or first responder who renders treatment to a patient for
(a) a bullet wound, gunshot wound, powder burn, or other injury arising
from or caused by the discharge of a firearm; (b) an injury caused by
a knife, an ice pick, or any other sharp or pointed instrument which
federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe
to have been intentionally inflicted upon a person; (c) a blunt force
injury that federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities
reasonably believe resulted from a criminal act; or (d) injuries
sustained in an automobile collision, shall disclose, upon a request
from a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority as defined in
RCW 70.02.010(3), the following health care information, if known,
without the patient's authorization:
(i) The name of the patient;
(ii) The patient's residence;
(iii) The patient's sex;
(iv) The patient's age;
(v) The patient's condition or extent and location of injuries as
determined by the emergency medical technician or first responder;
(vi) Whether the patient was conscious when contacted;
(vii) Whether the patient appears to have consumed alcohol or
appears to be under the influence of alcohol or drugs;
(viii) The name of the emergency medical technicians or first
responders who provided care to the patient; and
(ix) The name of the facility to which the patient is being
transported for additional treatment.
(2) An emergency medical technician or first responder or other
individual who discloses information pursuant to this section is immune
from liability for the disclosure, provided that the emergency medical
technician or first responder or other individual acted in good faith
and without gross or wanton negligence.
(3) The obligation to provide information pursuant to this section
shall be subordinate to patient care. Information shall be provided as
soon as reasonably possible taking into consideration emergent patient
care needs.
(4) For purposes of this section, "a physician's trained emergency
medical service intermediate life support technician and paramedic" has
the same meaning as in RCW 18.71.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A hospital shall cause a report to be made to a local law
enforcement agency as soon as reasonably possible taking into
consideration a patient's emergency care needs when a hospital provides
treatment for a bullet wound, gunshot wound, or stab wound to a patient
who is unconscious.
(2) The report shall include the following information, if known:
(a) The name, address, sex, and age of the patient;
(b) Whether the patient has received a bullet wound, gunshot wound,
or stab wound; and
(c) The name of the health care provider providing treatment for
the bullet wound, gunshot wound, or stab wound.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit a person's duty to report
under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035.
(4) Any bullets, clothing, or other foreign objects that are
removed from a patient for whom a hospital is required to make a report
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be preserved and kept
in custody in such a way that the identity and integrity thereof are
reasonably maintained until the bullets, clothing, or other foreign
objects taken into possession by a law enforcement agency or the
hospital's normal period for retention of such items expires, whichever
occurs first.
(5) Any person, entity, or hospital who in good faith, and absent
gross or wanton negligence, makes a report required by this section,
cooperates in an investigation or criminal or judicial proceeding
related to such report, or who maintains bullets, clothing, or other
foreign objects or provides such items to law enforcement as described
in subsection (4) of this section, is immune from civil or criminal
liability or professional licensure action arising out of or related to
the report and its contents or the absence of information in the
report, cooperation in an investigation or criminal or judicial
proceeding, and the maintenance or provision to a law enforcement
agency of bullets, clothing, or other foreign objects under subsection
(4) of this section.
(6) The physician-patient privilege described in RCW 5.60.060(4),
the registered nurse-patient privilege described in RCW 5.62.020 and
any other health care provider-patient privilege created or recognized
by law shall not be a basis for excluding as evidence in any criminal
proceeding any report, or information contained in a report made under
this section.
(7) All reporting, preservation, or other requirements of this
section shall be secondary to patient care needs and may be delayed or
compromised without penalty to the person, hospital, or entity required
to fulfill the requirements of this section.

--- END ---