BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to provide
property tax relief by limiting valuation increases until ownership of
the property changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Appraised value of property" means the aggregate true and fair
value of the property as determined by the county assessor according to
the revaluation program approved under chapter 84.41 RCW, and including
revaluations based on statistical data between physical inspections.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.04.030 and 2001 c 187 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Assessed value of property" shall be held and construed to mean
the aggregate valuation of the property subject to taxation by any
taxing district ((as)) under section 6 of this act, reduced by the
value of any applicable exemptions under RCW 84.36.381 or any other
law, and placed on the last completed and balanced tax rolls of the
county preceding the date of any tax levy.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.40.020 and 2005 c 274 s 364 are each amended to
read as follows:
All real property in this state subject to taxation shall be listed
and assessed every year, with reference to its appraised and assessed
value on the first day of January of the year in which it is assessed.
Such listing and all supporting documents and records shall be open to
public inspection during the regular office hours of the assessor's
office((: PROVIDED, That)). However, confidential income data is
hereby exempted from public inspection as noted in RCW 42.56.070 and
((42.56.210)) 42.56.230. All personal property in this state subject
to taxation shall be listed and assessed every year, with reference to
its value and ownership on the first day of January of the year in
which it is assessed((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if the stock of
goods, wares, merchandise or material, whether in a raw or finished
state or in process of manufacture, owned or held by any taxpayer on
January 1 of any year does not fairly represent the average stock
carried by such taxpayer, such stock shall be listed and assessed upon
the basis of the monthly average of stock owned or held by such
taxpayer during the preceding calendar year or during such portion
thereof as the taxpayer was engaged in business.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.40.030 and 2007 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
All personal property shall be valued at one hundred percent of its
true and fair value in money and assessed on the same basis unless
specifically provided otherwise by law.
All real property shall be appraised at one hundred percent of its
true and fair value in money and assessed as provided in section 6 of
this act unless specifically provided otherwise by law.
Taxable leasehold estates shall be valued at such price as they
would bring at a fair, voluntary sale for cash without any deductions
for any indebtedness owed including rentals to be paid.
The true and fair value of real property for taxation purposes
(including property upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone
or other quarry) shall be based upon the following criteria:
(1) Any sales of the property being appraised or similar properties
with respect to sales made within the past five years. The appraisal
shall be consistent with the comprehensive land use plan, development
regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, zoning, and any other
governmental policies or practices in effect at the time of appraisal
that affect the use of property, as well as physical and environmental
influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that
assumes a land usage or highest and best use not permitted, for that
property being appraised, under existing zoning or land use planning
ordinances or statutes or other government restrictions. The appraisal
shall also take into account: (a) In the use of sales by real estate
contract as similar sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated
selling price has been increased by reason of the down payment,
interest rate, or other financing terms; and (b) the extent to which
the sale of a similar property actually represents the general
effective market demand for property of such type, in the geographical
area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed releases
or similar seller-developer financing arrangements shall not be used as
sales of similar property.
(2) In addition to sales as defined in subsection (1) of this
section, consideration may be given to cost, cost less depreciation,
reconstruction cost less depreciation, or capitalization of income that
would be derived from prudent use of the property, as limited by law or
ordinance. Consideration should be given to any agreement, between an
owner of rental housing and any government agency, that restricts
rental income, appreciation, and liquidity; and to the impact of
government restrictions on operating expenses and on ownership rights
in general of such housing. In the case of property of a complex
nature, or being used under terms of a franchise from a public agency,
or operating as a public utility, or property not having a record of
sale within five years and not having a significant number of sales of
similar property in the general area, the provisions of this subsection
shall be the dominant factors in valuation. When provisions of this
subsection are relied upon for establishing values the property owner
shall be advised upon request of the factors used in arriving at such
value.
(3) In valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the true and
fair value of the land, exclusive of structures thereon shall be
determined; also the true and fair value of structures thereon, but the
appraised valuation shall not exceed the true and fair value of the
total property as it exists. In valuing agricultural land, growing
crops shall be excluded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 84.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Previous assessed value" means the assessed value for the year
immediately preceding the year for which a calculation is being made
under this section.
(b) "Current appraised value" means the appraised value for the
year for which a calculation is being made under this section.
(c) "Improvement increase" means the portion of the total value
increase attributable to any physical improvements made to the property
since the previous assessment, other than improvements exempt under RCW
84.36.400 for the year for which a calculation is being made under this
section. Improvement increase can never be less than zero.
(d) "Change of ownership" and "transfer of ownership" are
equivalent, and mean a transfer of a present interest in real property,
including a transfer of the beneficial use of real property.
(i) "Change of ownership" and "transfer of ownership" include,
except as provided in (d)(ii) of this subsection:
(A) Contracting to convey the title to or ownership of real
property upon the fulfillment of one or more stated conditions if the
right to possession of the property is transferred currently;
(B) The creation, transfer, or termination of a joint tenancy
interest;
(C) The creation, transfer, or termination of a tenancy-in-common
interest;
(D) The vesting of a right of possession or enjoyment of a
remainder or reversionary interest that occurs upon the termination of
a life estate or other similar precedent property interest;
(E) An interest that vests in persons other than the trustor if a
revocable trust becomes irrevocable; and
(F) The transfer of stock of a cooperative housing corporation,
vested with legal title to real property that conveys to the transferee
the exclusive right to occupancy and possession of the property or a
portion of the property.
(ii) "Change of ownership" does not include:
(A) A transfer between co-owners that results in a change in the
method of holding title to the real property transferred without
changing the proportional interests of the co-owners in the real
property, such as a partition of a tenancy in common;
(B) A transfer for the purpose of merely perfecting title to the
real property;
(C) The creation, assignment, termination, or reconveyance of a
security interest in real property, or the substitution of a trustee
under a security instrument;
(D) A transfer of real property by the trustor, or by the trustor's
spouse, or by both, into a trust for so long as the transferor is the
sole present beneficiary of the trust, or the trust is revocable, or
any transfer of real property by a trustee of such trust back to the
trustor;
(E) A transfer of real property by an instrument whose terms
reserve to the transferor an estate for years or an estate for life.
However, the termination of such an estate for years or life estate
shall constitute a change of ownership;
(F) A transfer of real property between or among the same parties
for the purpose of correcting or reforming a deed to express the true
intention of the parties, if the original relationship between the
grantor and grantee is not changed; or
(G) An interspousal transfer of real property, including, but not
limited to:
(I) Transfers to a trustee for the beneficial use of a spouse, or
the surviving spouse of a deceased transferor, or by a trustee of the
trust to the spouse of the trustor;
(II) Transfers that take effect upon the death of a spouse;
(III) Transfers to a spouse or former spouse in connection with a
property settlement agreement or decree of dissolution of marriage or
legal separation; and
(IV) The creation, transfer, or termination, solely between
spouses, of any co-owner's interest.
(2) The assessed value of property, other than property that has
changed or transferred ownership since the last assessment, is equal to
the lesser of the current appraised value or the previous assessed
value plus ten percent, plus any improvement increase.
(3) Upon the loss of preferential tax treatment for property that
qualifies for preferential tax treatment under chapter 84.14, 84.26,
84.33, 84.34, 84.36, or 84.37 RCW, the previous assessed value is the
assessed value the property would have had without the preferential tax
treatment.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.40.040 and 2003 c 302 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessor shall begin the preliminary work for each assessment
not later than the first day of December of each year in all counties
in the state. The assessor shall also complete the duties of listing
and placing valuations on all property by May 31st of each year, except
that the listing and valuation of construction and mobile homes under
RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090 shall be completed by August 31st of each
year, and in the following manner, to wit:
The assessor shall actually determine as nearly as practicable the
true and fair value of each tract or lot of land listed for taxation
and of each improvement located thereon and shall enter as the
appraised value one hundred percent of the true and fair value of such
land and ((value of such)) improvements, together with the total of
such one hundred percent valuations, opposite each description of
property on the assessment list and tax roll. The assessor shall
determine the assessed value, under section 6 of this act, for each
tract or lot of land listed for taxation, including improvements
located thereon, and shall also enter this value opposite each
description of property on the assessment list and tax roll.
The assessor shall make an alphabetical list of the names of all
persons in the county liable to assessment of personal property, and
require each person to make a correct list and statement of such
property according to the standard form prescribed by the department of
revenue, which statement and list shall include, if required by the
form, the year of acquisition and total original cost of personal
property in each category of the prescribed form. However, the
assessor may list and value improvements on publicly owned land in the
same manner as real property is listed and valued, including
conformance with the revaluation program required under chapter 84.41
RCW. Such list and statement shall be filed on or before the last day
of April. The assessor shall on or before the 1st day of January of
each year mail, or electronically transmit, a notice to all such
persons at their last known address that such statement and list is
required. This notice must be accompanied by the form on which the
statement or list is to be made. The notice mailed, or electronically
transmitted, by the assessor to each taxpayer each year shall, if
practicable, include the statement and list of personal property of the
taxpayer for the preceding year. Upon receipt of such statement and
list the assessor shall thereupon determine the true and fair value of
the property included in such statement and enter one hundred percent
of the same on the assessment roll opposite the name of the party
assessed; and in making such entry in the assessment list, the assessor
shall give the name and post office address of the party listing the
property, and if the party resides in a city the assessor shall give
the street and number or other brief description of the party's
residence or place of business. The assessor may, after giving written
notice of the action to the person to be assessed, add to the
assessment list any taxable property which should be included in such
list.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.40.045 and 2001 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessor shall give notice of any change in the ((true and
fair)) assessed value of real property for the tract or lot of land and
any improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, no such notice shall be mailed during the
period from January 15 to February 15 of each year((: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)) and no notice need be sent with respect to changes in
valuation of forest land made pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
The notice shall contain a statement of both the prior and the new
((true and fair)) appraised and assessed values, stating separately
land and improvement appraised values, and a brief statement of the
procedure for appeal to the board of equalization and the time, date,
and place of the meetings of the board.
The notice shall be mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.
If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a security
interest in the real property which is the subject of the notice,
pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, such
taxpayer shall, upon written request of the assessor, supply, within
thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor the name and
address of the person making payments pursuant to the mortgage,
contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such person shall
also receive a copy of the notice provided for in this section.
Willful failure to comply with such request within the time limitation
provided for herein shall make such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil
penalty of five thousand dollars. The penalties provided for herein
shall be recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and when
recovered shall be deposited in the county current expense fund. The
assessor shall make the request provided for by this section during the
month of January.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.41.041 and 2001 c 187 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county assessor shall cause taxable real property to be
physically inspected and valued at least once every six years in
accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance with a plan filed with
and approved by the department of revenue. Such revaluation plan shall
provide that a reasonable portion of all taxable real property within
a county shall be revalued and these newly-determined values placed on
the assessment rolls each year. The department may approve a plan that
provides that all property in the county be revalued every two years.
If the revaluation plan provides for physical inspection at least once
each four years, during the intervals between each physical inspection
of real property, the appraised valuation of such property may be
adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be
based upon appropriate statistical data. If the revaluation plan
provides for physical inspection less frequently than once each four
years, during the intervals between each physical inspection of real
property, the appraised valuation of such property shall be adjusted to
its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be made once each
year and to be based upon appropriate statistical data. If the
appraised valuation is changed, the assessed value shall be
recalculated under section 6 of this act.
The assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent data
respecting taxable property in their control including data respecting
any sale or purchase of said property within the past five years, the
cost and characteristics of any improvement on the property and other
facts necessary for appraisal of the property.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.48.010 and 2001 c 187 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
Prior to July 15th, the county legislative authority shall form a
board for the equalization of the assessment of the property of the
county. The members of said board shall receive a per diem amount as
set by the county legislative authority for each day of actual
attendance of the meeting of the board of equalization to be paid out
of the current expense fund of the county((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, when the county legislative authority constitute the board
they shall only receive their compensation as members of the county
legislative authority. The board of equalization shall meet in open
session for this purpose annually on the 15th day of July and, having
each taken an oath fairly and impartially to perform their duties as
members of such board, they shall examine and compare the returns of
the assessment of the property of the county and proceed to equalize
the same, so that the appraised value of each tract or lot of real
property and each article or class of personal property shall be
entered on the assessment list at its true and fair value, according to
the measure of value used by the county assessor in such assessment
year, ((which is presumed to be correct under RCW 84.40.0301)) and so
that the assessed value of each tract or lot of real property is
entered on the assessment list and its correct amount, and subject to
the following rules:
First. They shall raise the appraised valuation of each tract or
lot or item of real property which is returned below its true and fair
value to such price or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof and
raise the assessed valuation of each tract or lot or item of real
property which is returned below its correct amount to the correct
amount, after at least five days' notice shall have been given in
writing to the owner or agent.
Second. They shall reduce the appraised valuation of each tract or
lot or item which is returned above its true and fair value to such
price or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof and reduce the
assessed valuation of each tract or lot or item of real property which
is returned above its correct amount to the correct amount.
Third. They shall raise the valuation of each class of personal
property which is returned below its true and fair value to such price
or sum as to be the true and fair value thereof, and they shall raise
the aggregate value of the personal property of each individual
whenever the aggregate value is less than the true valuation of the
taxable personal property possessed by such individual, to such sum or
amount as to be the true value thereof, after at least five days'
notice shall have been given in writing to the owner or agent thereof.
Fourth. They shall reduce the valuation of each class of personal
property enumerated on the detail and assessment list of the current
year, which is returned above its true and fair value, to such price or
sum as to be the true and fair value thereof; and they shall reduce the
aggregate valuation of the personal property of such individual who has
been assessed at too large a sum to such sum or amount as was the true
and fair value of the personal property.
Fifth. The board may review all claims for either real or personal
property tax exemption as determined by the county assessor, and shall
consider any taxpayer appeals from the decision of the assessor thereon
to determine (1) if the taxpayer is entitled to an exemption, and (2)
if so, the amount thereof.
The clerk of the board shall keep an accurate journal or record of
the proceedings and orders of said board showing the facts and evidence
upon which their action is based, and the said record shall be
published the same as other proceedings of county legislative
authority, and shall make a true record of the changes of the
descriptions and ((assessed)) appraised values ordered by the county
board of equalization. The assessor shall recalculate assessed values
and correct the real and personal assessment rolls in accordance with
the changes made by the said county board of equalization, and the
assessor shall make duplicate abstracts of such corrected values, one
copy of which shall be retained in the office, and one copy forwarded
to the department of revenue on or before the eighteenth day of August
next following the meeting of the county board of equalization.
The county board of equalization shall meet on the 15th day of July
and may continue in session and adjourn from time to time during a
period not to exceed four weeks, but shall remain in session not less
than three days((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the county board of
equalization with the approval of the county legislative authority may
convene at any time when petitions filed exceed twenty-five, or ten
percent of the number of appeals filed in the preceding year, whichever
is greater.
No taxes, except special taxes, shall be extended upon the tax
rolls until the property valuations are equalized by the department of
revenue for the purpose of raising the state revenue.
County legislative authorities as such shall at no time have any
authority to change the valuation of the property of any person or to
release or commute in whole or in part the taxes due on the property of
any person.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.48.065 and 2001 c 187 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county assessor or treasurer may cancel or correct
assessments on the assessment or tax rolls which are erroneous due to
manifest errors in description, double assessments, clerical errors in
extending the rolls, clerical errors in calculating the assessed value
under section 6 of this act, and such manifest errors in the listing of
the property which do not involve a revaluation of property, except in
the case that a taxpayer produces proof that an authorized land use
authority has made a definitive change in the property's land use
designation. In such a case, correction of the assessment or tax rolls
may be made notwithstanding the fact that the action involves a
revaluation of property. Manifest errors that do not involve a
revaluation of property include the assessment of property exempted by
law from taxation or the failure to deduct the exemption allowed by law
to the head of a family. When the county assessor cancels or corrects
an assessment, the assessor shall send a notice to the taxpayer in
accordance with RCW 84.40.045, advising the taxpayer that the action
has been taken and notifying the taxpayer of the right to appeal the
cancellation or correction to the county board of equalization, in
accordance with RCW 84.40.038. When the county assessor or treasurer
cancels or corrects an assessment, a record of such action shall be
prepared, setting forth therein the facts relating to the error. The
record shall also set forth by legal description all property belonging
exclusively to the state, any county, or any municipal corporation
whose property is exempt from taxation, upon which there remains,
according to the tax roll, any unpaid taxes. No manifest error
cancellation or correction, including a cancellation or correction made
due to a definitive change of land use designation, shall be made for
any period more than three years preceding the year in which the error
is discovered.
(2)(a) In the case of a definitive change of land use designation,
an assessor shall make corrections that involve a revaluation of
property to the assessment roll when:
(i) The assessor and taxpayer have signed an agreement as to the
true and fair value of the taxpayer's property setting forth in the
agreement the valuation information upon which the agreement is based;
and
(ii) The assessment roll has previously been certified in
accordance with RCW 84.40.320.
(b) In all other cases, an assessor shall make corrections that
involve a revaluation of property to the assessment roll when:
(i) The assessor and taxpayer have signed an agreement as to the
true and fair value of the taxpayer's property setting forth in the
agreement the valuation information upon which the agreement is based;
and
(ii) The following conditions are met:
(A) The assessment roll has previously been certified in accordance
with RCW 84.40.320;
(B) The taxpayer has timely filed a petition with the county board
of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.40.038 for the current assessment
year;
(C) The county board of equalization has not yet held a hearing on
the merits of the taxpayer's petition.
(3) The assessor shall issue a supplementary roll or rolls
including such cancellations and corrections, and the assessment and
levy shall have the same force and effect as if made in the first
instance, and the county treasurer shall proceed to collect the taxes
due on the rolls as modified.

Sec. 12 RCW 84.48.075 and 2001 c 187 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall annually, prior to the first
Monday in September, determine and submit to each assessor a
preliminary indicated ratio for each county((: PROVIDED, That)). The
department shall establish rules and regulations pertinent to the
determination of the indicated ratio, the indicated real property
ratio, and the indicated personal property ratio((: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)). These rules and regulations may provide that data, as is
necessary for said determination, which is available from the county
assessor of any county and which has been audited as to its validity by
the department, shall be utilized by the department in determining the
indicated ratio.
(2) To such extent as is reasonable, the department may define use
classes of property for the purposes of determination of the indicated
ratio. Such use classes may be defined with respect to property use
and may include agricultural, open space, timber and forest lands.
(3) The department shall review each county's preliminary ratio
with the assessor, a landowner, or an owner of an intercounty public
utility or private car company of that county, if requested by the
assessor, a landowner, or an owner of an intercounty public utility or
private car company of that county, respectively, between the first and
third Mondays of September. Prior to equalization of assessments
pursuant to RCW 84.48.080 and after the third Monday of September, the
department shall certify to each county assessor the real and personal
property ratio for that county.
(4) The department of revenue shall also examine procedures used by
the assessor to assess real and personal property in the county,
including calculations, use of prescribed value schedules, and efforts
to locate all taxable property in the county. If any examination by
the department discloses other than market value is being listed as
appraised value on the county assessment rolls of the county by the
assessor and, after due notification by the department, is not
corrected, the department of revenue shall, in accordance with rules
adopted by the department, adjust the ratio of that type of property,
which adjustment shall be used for determining the county's indicated
ratio.

Sec. 13 RCW 84.48.080 and 2008 c 86 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Annually during the months of September and October, the
department of revenue shall examine and compare the returns of the
assessment of the property in the several counties of the state, and
the assessment of the property of railroad and other companies assessed
by the department, and proceed to equalize the same, so that each
county in the state shall pay its due and just proportion of the taxes
for state purposes for such assessment year, according to the ratio the
assessed valuation of the property in each county bears to the correct
total assessed valuation of all property in the state.
(a) The department shall classify all property, real and personal,
and shall raise and lower the assessed valuation of any class of
property in any county to a value that shall be equal, so far as
possible, to the ((true and fair)) correct assessed value of such class
as of January 1st of the current year, after determining the correct
appraised value, and any adjustment applicable under section 6 of this
act for the property for the purpose of ascertaining the just amount of
tax due from each county for state purposes. In equalizing personal
property as of January 1st of the current year, the department shall
use valuation data with respect to personal property from the three
years immediately preceding the current assessment year in a manner it
deems appropriate. Such classification may be on the basis of types of
property, geographical areas, or both. For purposes of this section,
for each county that has not provided the department with an assessment
return by December 1st, the department shall proceed, using facts and
information and in a manner it deems appropriate, to estimate the value
of each class of property in the county.
(b) The department shall keep a full record of its proceedings and
the same shall be published annually by the department.
(2) The department shall levy the state taxes authorized by law.
The amount levied in any one year for general state purposes shall not
exceed the lawful dollar rate on the dollar of the assessed value of
the property of the entire state, ((which assessed value shall be one
hundred percent of the true and fair value of the property in money))
as equalized under this section. The department shall apportion the
amount of tax for state purposes levied by the department, among the
several counties, in proportion to the valuation of the taxable
property of the county for the year as equalized by the department((:
PROVIDED, That)). For purposes of this apportionment, the department
shall recompute the previous year's levy and the apportionment thereof
to correct for changes and errors in taxable values reported to the
department after October 1 of the preceding year and shall adjust the
apportioned amount of the current year's state levy for each county by
the difference between the apportioned amounts established by the
original and revised levy computations for the previous year. For
purposes of this section, changes in taxable values mean a final
adjustment made by a county board of equalization, the state board of
tax appeals, or a court of competent jurisdiction and shall include
additions of omitted property, other additions or deletions from the
assessment or tax rolls, any assessment return provided by a county to
the department subsequent to December 1st, or a change in the indicated
ratio of a county. Errors in taxable values mean errors corrected by
a final reviewing body.
(3) The department shall have authority to adopt rules and
regulations to enforce obedience to its orders in all matters in
relation to the returns of county assessments, the equalization of
values, and the apportionment of the state levy by the department.
(4) After the completion of the duties prescribed in this section,
the director of the department shall certify the record of the
proceedings of the department under this section, the tax levies made
for state purposes and the apportionment thereof among the counties,
and the certification shall be available for public inspection.

Sec. 14 RCW 84.12.280 and 2001 c 187 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making the assessment of the operating property of any
railroad or logging railroad company and in the apportionment of the
values and the taxation thereof, all land occupied and claimed
exclusively as the right-of-way for railroads, with all the tracks and
substructures and superstructures which support the same, together with
all side tracks, second tracks, turn-outs, station houses, depots,
round houses, machine shops, or other buildings belonging to the
company, used in the operation thereof, without separating the same
into land and improvements, shall be assessed as real property.
((And)) The rolling stock and other movable property belonging to any
railroad or logging railroad company shall be considered as personal
property and taxed as such((: PROVIDED, That)). However, all of the
operating property of street railway companies shall be assessed and
taxed as personal property.
(2) All of the operating property of airplane companies, telegraph
companies, pipe line companies, and all of the operating property other
than lands and buildings of electric light and power companies,
telephone companies, and gas companies shall be assessed and taxed as
personal property.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
limit provided under section 6 of this act shall be applied in the
assessment of property under this section to the same extent as that
limit is generally applied to property not assessed under this chapter.

Sec. 15 RCW 84.12.310 and 2001 c 187 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of determining the system value of the operating
property of any such company, the department of revenue shall deduct
from the ((true and fair)) assessed value of the total assets of such
company, the ((actual cash)) assessed value of all nonoperating
property owned by such company. For such purpose the department of
revenue may require of the assessors of the various counties within
this state a detailed list of such company's properties assessed by
them, together with the assessable or assessed value thereof((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, such assessed or assessable value shall be
advisory only and not conclusive on the department of revenue as to the
value thereof.

Sec. 16 RCW 84.12.330 and 2001 c 187 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the assessment roll shall be placed after the name of each
company a general description of the operating property of the company,
which shall be considered sufficient if described in the language of
RCW 84.12.200(12), as applied to the company, following which shall be
entered the ((true and fair)) assessed value of the operating property
as determined by the department of revenue. No assessment shall be
invalidated by reason of a mistake in the name of the company assessed,
or the omission of the name of the owner or by the entry as owner of a
name other than that of the true owner. When the department of revenue
shall have prepared the assessment roll and entered thereon the ((true
and fair)) assessed value of the operating property of the company, as
herein required, it shall notify the company by mail of the valuation
determined by it and entered upon the roll.

Sec. 17 RCW 84.12.350 and 2001 c 187 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon determination by the department of revenue of the ((true and
fair)) assessed value of the property appearing on such rolls it shall
apportion such value to the respective counties entitled thereto, as
hereinafter provided, and shall determine the equalized assessed
valuation of such property in each such county and in the several
taxing districts therein, by applying to such actual apportioned value
the same ratio as the ratio of assessed to ((actual)) the corrected
assessed value of the general property in such county((: PROVIDED,
That,)). However, whenever the amount of the ((true and fair))
assessed value of the operating property of any company otherwise
apportionable to any county or other taxing district shall be less than
two hundred fifty dollars, such amount need not be apportioned to such
county or taxing district but may be added to the amount apportioned to
an adjacent county or taxing district.

Sec. 18 RCW 84.12.360 and 2001 c 187 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((true and fair)) assessed value of the operating property
assessed to a company, as fixed and determined by the department of
revenue, shall be apportioned by the department of revenue to the
respective counties and to the taxing districts thereof wherein such
property is located in the following manner:
(1) Property of all railroad companies other than street railroad
companies, telegraph companies and pipe line companies -- upon the basis
of that proportion of the value of the total operating property within
the state which the mileage of track, as classified by the department
of revenue (in case of railroads), mileage of wire (in the case of
telegraph companies), and mileage of pipe line (in the case of pipe
line companies) within each county or taxing district bears to the
total mileage thereof within the state, at the end of the calendar year
last past. For the purpose of such apportionment the department may
classify railroad track.
(2) Property of street railroad companies, telephone companies,
electric light and power companies, and gas companies -- upon the basis
of relative value of the operating property within each county and
taxing district to the value of the total operating property within the
state to be determined by such factors as the department of revenue
shall deem proper.
(3) Planes or other aircraft of airplane companies -- upon the basis
of such factor or factors of allocation, to be determined by the
department of revenue, as will secure a substantially fair and
equitable division between counties and other taxing districts.
All other property of airplane companies -- upon the basis set forth
in subsection (2) of this section.
The basis of apportionment with reference to all public utility
companies above prescribed shall not be deemed exclusive and the
department of revenue in apportioning values of such companies may also
take into consideration such other information, facts, circumstances,
or allocation factors as will enable it to make a substantially just
and correct valuation of the operating property of such companies
within the state and within each county thereof.

Sec. 19 RCW 84.16.040 and 2001 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of revenue shall annually make an assessment of the
operating property of each private car company; and between the first
day of May and the first day of July of each year shall prepare an
assessment roll upon which it shall enter ((and assess)) the ((true and
fair)) assessed value of all the operating property of each of such
companies as of the first day of January of the year in which the
assessment is made. For the purpose of determining the ((true and
fair)) assessed value of such property the department of revenue may
take into consideration any information or knowledge obtained by it
from an examination and inspection of such property, or of the books,
records, and accounts of such companies, the statements filed as
required by this chapter, the reports, statements, or returns of such
companies filed in the office of any board, office, or commission of
this state or any county thereof, the earnings and earning power of
such companies, the franchises owned or used by such companies, the
true and fair valuation of any and all property of such companies,
whether operating property or nonoperating property, and whether
situated within or without the state, and any other facts, evidences,
or information that may be obtainable bearing upon the value of the
operating property((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in no event shall
any statement or report required from any company by this chapter be
conclusive upon the department of revenue in determining the amount,
character, and true and fair value of the operating property of such
company.

Sec. 20 RCW 84.16.050 and 2001 c 187 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of revenue may, in determining the ((true and fair))
assessed value of the operating property to be placed on the assessment
roll value the entire property as a unit. If the company owns, leases,
operates or uses property partly within and partly without the state,
the department of revenue may determine the value of the operating
property within this state by the proportion that the value of such
property bears to the value of the entire operating property of the
company, both within and without this state. In determining the
operating property which is located within this state the department of
revenue may consider and base such determination on the proportion
which the number of car miles of the various classes of cars made in
this state bears to the total number of car miles made by the same cars
within and without this state, or to the total number of car miles made
by all cars of the various classes within and without this state. If
the value of the operating property of the company cannot be fairly
determined in such manner the department of revenue may use any other
reasonable and fair method to determine the value of the operating
property of the company within this state.

Sec. 21 RCW 84.16.090 and 2001 c 187 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the assessment roll shall be placed after the name of each
company a general description of the operating property of the company,
which shall be considered sufficient if described in the language of
RCW 84.16.010(3) or otherwise, following which shall be entered the
((true and fair)) assessed value of the operating property as
determined by the department of revenue. No assessment shall be
invalid by a mistake in the name of the company assessed, by omission
of the name of the owner or by the entry of a name other than that of
the true owner. When the department of revenue shall have prepared the
assessment roll and entered thereon the ((true and fair)) assessed
value of the operating property of the company, as required, it shall
notify the company by mail of the valuation determined by it and
entered upon the roll; and thereupon such valuation shall become the
((true and fair)) assessed value of the operating property of the
company, subject to revision or correction by the department of revenue
as hereinafter provided; and shall be the valuation upon which, after
equalization by the department of revenue as hereinafter provided, the
taxes of such company shall be based and computed.

Sec. 22 RCW 84.16.110 and 2001 c 187 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon determination by the department of revenue of the true and
((fair)) correct assessed value of the property appearing on such rolls
the department shall apportion such value to the respective counties
entitled thereto as hereinafter provided, and shall determine the
equalized or assessed valuation of such property in such counties by
applying to such actual apportioned value the same ratio as the ratio
of assessed to ((actual)) corrected assessed value of the general
property of the respective counties((: PROVIDED, That,)). However,
whenever the amount of the true and ((fair)) correct assessed value of
the operating property of any company otherwise apportionable to any
county shall be less than two hundred fifty dollars, such amount need
not be apportioned to such county but may be added to the amount
apportioned to an adjacent county.

Sec. 23 RCW 84.16.120 and 2001 c 187 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((true and fair)) assessed value of the property of each
company as fixed and determined by the department of revenue as herein
provided shall be apportioned to the respective counties in the
following manner:
(1) If all the operating property of the company is situated
entirely within a county and none of such property is located within,
extends into, or through or is operated into or through any other
county, the entire value thereof shall be apportioned to the county
within which such property is situated, located, and operated.
(2) If the operating property of any company is situated or located
within, extends into or is operated into or through more than one
county, the value thereof shall be apportioned to the respective
counties into or through which its cars are operated in the proportion
that the length of main line track of the respective railroads moving
such cars in such counties bears to the total length of main line track
of such respective railroads in this state.
(3) If the property of any company is of such character that it
will not be reasonable, feasible or fair to apportion the value as
hereinabove provided, the value thereof shall be apportioned between
the respective counties into or through which such property extends or
is operated or in which the same is located in such manner as may be
reasonable, feasible and fair.

Sec. 24 RCW 84.36.041 and 2008 c 6 s 707 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All real and personal property used by a nonprofit home for the
aging that is reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home is
exempt from taxation if the benefit of the exemption inures to the home
and:
(a) At least fifty percent of the occupied dwelling units in the
home are occupied by eligible residents; or
(b) The home is subsidized under a federal department of housing
and urban development program. The department of revenue shall provide
by rule a definition of homes eligible for exemption under this
subsection (1)(b), consistent with the purposes of this section.
(2) All real and personal property used by a nonprofit home for the
aging that is reasonably necessary for the purposes of the home is
exempt from taxation if the benefit of the exemption inures to the home
and the construction, rehabilitation, acquisition, or refinancing of
the home is financed under a program using bonds exempt from federal
income tax if at least seventy-five percent of the total amount
financed uses the tax exempt bonds and the financing program requires
the home to reserve a percentage of all dwelling units so financed for
low-income residents. The initial term of the exemption under this
subsection shall equal the term of the tax exempt bond used in
connection with the financing program, or the term of the requirement
to reserve dwelling units for low-income residents, whichever is
shorter. If the financing program involves less than the entire home,
only those dwelling units included in the financing program are
eligible for total exemption. The department of revenue shall provide
by rule the requirements for monitoring compliance with the provisions
of this subsection and the requirements for exemption including:
(a) The number or percentage of dwelling units required to be
occupied by low-income residents, and a definition of low income;
(b) The type and character of the dwelling units, whether
independent units or otherwise; and
(c) Any particular requirements for continuing care retirement
communities.
(3) A home for the aging is eligible for a partial exemption on the
real property and a total exemption for the home's personal property if
the home does not meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section because fewer than fifty percent of the occupied dwelling units
are occupied by eligible residents, as follows:
(a) A partial exemption shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in
a home occupied by a resident requiring assistance with activities of
daily living.
(b) A partial exemption shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in
a home occupied by an eligible resident.
(c) A partial exemption shall be allowed for an area jointly used
by a home for the aging and by a nonprofit organization, association,
or corporation currently exempt from property taxation under one of the
other provisions of this chapter. The shared area must be reasonably
necessary for the purposes of the nonprofit organization, association,
or corporation exempt from property taxation under one of the other
provisions of this chapter, such as kitchen, dining, and laundry areas.
(d) The amount of exemption shall be calculated by multiplying the
assessed value of the property reasonably necessary for the purposes of
the home, less the assessed value of any area exempt under (c) of this
subsection, by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number
of dwelling units occupied by eligible residents and by residents
requiring assistance with activities of daily living. The denominator
of the fraction is the total number of occupied dwelling units as of
December 31st of the first assessment year the home becomes operational
for which exemption is claimed and January 1st of each subsequent
assessment year for which exemption is claimed.
(4) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which the exemption is granted, except
as provided in RCW 84.36.805.
(5) A home for the aging is exempt from taxation only if the
organization operating the home is exempt from income tax under section
501(c) of the federal internal revenue code as existing on January 1,
1989, or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule
consistent with the purposes of this section.
(6) In order for the home to be eligible for exemption under
subsections (1)(a) and (3)(b) of this section, each eligible resident
of a home for the aging shall submit an income verification form to the
county assessor by July 1st of the assessment year for which exemption
is claimed. However, during the first year a home becomes operational,
the county assessor shall accept income verification forms from
eligible residents up to December 31st of the assessment year. The
income verification form shall be prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue. An eligible resident who has filed a form for
a previous year need not file a new form until there is a change in
status affecting the person's eligibility.
(7) In determining the ((true and fair)) assessed value of a home
for the aging for purposes of the partial exemption provided by
subsection (3) of this section, the assessor shall apply the
computation method provided by RCW 84.34.060 and shall consider only
the use to which such property is applied during the years for which
such partial exemptions are available and shall not consider potential
uses of such property.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible resident" means a person who:
(i) Occupied the dwelling unit as a principal place of residence as
of December 31st of the first assessment year the home becomes
operational. In each subsequent year, the eligible resident must
occupy the dwelling unit as a principal place of residence as of
January 1st of the assessment year for which the exemption is claimed.
Confinement of the person to a hospital or nursing home does not
disqualify the claim of exemption if the dwelling unit is temporarily
unoccupied or if the dwelling unit is occupied by a spouse or a
domestic partner, a person financially dependent on the claimant for
support, or both; and
(ii) Is sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the
year in which the exemption claim is filed, or is, at the time of
filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of physical
disability. Any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a
person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death
shall qualify if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is
fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements
of this subsection; and
(iii) Has a combined disposable income of no more than the greater
of twenty-two thousand dollars or eighty percent of the median income
adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the federal
department of housing and urban development for the county in which the
person resides. For the purposes of determining eligibility under this
section, a "cotenant" means a person who resides with an eligible
resident and who shares personal financial resources with the eligible
resident.
(b) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person submitting the income verification form, plus the disposable
income of his or her spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable
income of each cotenant occupying the dwelling unit for the preceding
calendar year, less amounts paid by the person submitting the income
verification form or his or her spouse or domestic partner or cotenant
during the previous year for the treatment or care of either person
received in the dwelling unit or in a nursing home. If the person
submitting the income verification form was retired for two months or
more of the preceding year, the combined disposable income of such
person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable income of such person during the months such person was
retired by twelve. If the income of the person submitting the income
verification form is reduced for two or more months of the preceding
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse or domestic partner,
the combined disposable income of such person shall be calculated by
multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such
person after the death of the spouse or domestic partner by twelve.
(c) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(i) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(ii) Amounts deducted for loss;
(iii) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(iv) Pension and annuity receipts;
(v) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(vi) Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid
payments;
(vii) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(viii) Dividend receipts; and
(ix) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.
(d) "Resident requiring assistance with activities of daily living"
means a person who requires significant assistance with the activities
of daily living and who would be at risk of nursing home placement
without this assistance.
(e) "Home for the aging" means a residential housing facility that
(i) provides a housing arrangement chosen voluntarily by the resident,
the resident's guardian or conservator, or another responsible person;
(ii) has only residents who are at least sixty-one years of age or who
have needs for care generally compatible with persons who are at least
sixty-one years of age; and (iii) provides varying levels of care and
supervision, as agreed to at the time of admission or as determined
necessary at subsequent times of reappraisal.
(9) A for-profit home for the aging that converts to nonprofit
status after June 11, 1992, and would otherwise be eligible for tax
exemption under this section may not receive the tax exemption until
five years have elapsed since the conversion. The exemption shall then
be ratably granted over the next five years.

Sec. 25 RCW 84.52.063 and 2001 c 187 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
A rural library district may impose a regular property tax levy in
an amount equal to that which would be produced by a levy of fifty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value multiplied by an equalized
assessed valuation ((equal to one hundred percent of the true and fair
value of the taxable property in the rural library district)), as
determined by the department of revenue's indicated county ratio((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, when any county assessor shall find that
the aggregate rate of levy on any property will exceed the limitation
set forth in RCW 84.52.043 and 84.52.050, as now or hereafter amended,
before recomputing and establishing a consolidated levy in the manner
set forth in RCW 84.52.010, the assessor shall first reduce the levy of
any rural library district, by such amount as may be necessary, but the
levy of any rural library district shall not be reduced to less than
fifty cents per thousand dollars against the value of the taxable
property, as determined by the county, prior to any further adjustments
pursuant to RCW 84.52.010. For purposes of this section "regular
property tax levy" shall mean a levy subject to the limitations
provided for in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and/or
by statute.

Sec. 26 RCW 84.70.010 and 2005 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, on or before December 31 in any calendar year, any real or
personal property placed upon the assessment roll of that year is
destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that has been declared
a disaster area by the governor or the county legislative authority and
has been reduced in value by more than twenty percent as a result of a
natural disaster, the ((true and fair)) assessed value of such property
shall be reduced for that assessment year by an amount determined by
taking the ((true and fair)) assessed value of such taxable property
before destruction or reduction in value and deduct therefrom the true
and fair value of the remaining property after destruction or reduction
in value.
(2) Taxes levied for collection in the year in which the ((true and
fair)) assessed value has been reduced under subsection (1) of this
section shall be abated in whole or in part as provided in this
subsection. The amount of taxes to be abated shall be determined by
first multiplying the amount deducted from the ((true and fair))
assessed value under subsection (1) of this section by the rate of levy
applicable to the property in the tax year. Then divide the product by
the number of days in the year and multiply the quotient by the number
of days remaining in the calendar year after the date of the
destruction or reduction in value of the property. If taxes abated
under this section have been paid, the amount paid shall be refunded
under RCW 84.69.020. The tax relief provided for in this section for
the tax year in which the damage or destruction occurred does not apply
to property damaged or destroyed voluntarily.
(3) No reduction in the ((true and fair)) assessed value or
abatements shall be made more than three years after the date of
destruction or reduction in value.
(4) The assessor shall make such reduction on his or her own
motion; however, the taxpayer may make application for reduction on
forms prepared by the department and provided by the assessor. The
assessor shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of reduction.
(5) If destroyed property is replaced prior to the valuation dates
contained in RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090, the total taxable value for
that assessment year shall not exceed the value as of the appropriate
valuation date in RCW 36.21.080 or 36.21.090, whichever is appropriate.
(6) The taxpayer may appeal the amount of reduction to the county
board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038. The board shall reconvene, if necessary, to hear the
appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 This act takes effect January 1, 2011, if
the proposed amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution
authorizing the legislature to limit the rate of property valuation
increases (SJR .... (S-0465/09)) is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---