BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the derelict
vessel removal program has proven highly successful. A vessel
generally becomes abandoned or derelict after a long chain of legal
ownership transactions in which successive owners either lack the
inclination or financial resources to properly maintain the vessel and
pass it along in progressive stages of decline. The result is a
decrepit vessel selling for nominal cost to someone who cannot bring it
back to a safe working condition, or properly dispose of it. The
vessel often becomes abandoned or derelict, resulting in cost to the
state for removal and disposal. It is more expensive to solve the
problem at this point. Therefore, the legislature authorizes the
department of natural resources to create a pilot vessel amnesty
disposal program to prevent vessels from becoming abandoned or derelict
and to address this issue when it is less expensive and poses fewer
threats.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of natural resources,
through its derelict vessel removal program, shall develop and
administer a pilot vessel amnesty disposal program.
(2) The purpose of the pilot vessel amnesty disposal program is to
allow the department to dismantle and dispose of vessels that pose a
high risk of becoming a derelict vessel or abandoned vessel, but that
do not yet meet the definition of "derelict vessel" or "abandoned
vessel" as those terms are defined under RCW 79.100.010. The
department of natural resources shall seek to dismantle and dispose of
as many vessels as possible, particularly those posing the greatest
risk of becoming abandoned or derelict in the future.
(3) In determining the geographic scope of the pilot vessel amnesty
disposal program, the department of natural resources shall consider
the purpose of the pilot program set forth in subsection (2) of this
section. In particular, the department shall give consideration to
counties that have experienced the highest number of vessels on the
department's inventory of abandoned and derelict vessels, regardless of
whether or not the vessels have been removed.
(4) The department of natural resources shall disseminate
information about the pilot vessel amnesty disposal program, including
information about the application process, on its internet site and
through appropriate agency publications and information sources as
determined by the department. The department shall disseminate such
information during and for a reasonable time prior to accepting
applications, as determined by the department.
(5) The department of natural resources shall accept and review
pilot vessel amnesty disposal program applications from eligible vessel
owners during the period or periods identified by the department. To
be eligible for the pilot vessel amnesty disposal program, an applicant
must demonstrate to the department's satisfaction that the applicant:
(a) Is a Washington state resident;
(b) Owns a vessel that is in an advanced state of disrepair, has no
material value, and has a high likelihood of becoming an abandoned or
derelict vessel as those terms are defined under RCW 79.100.010; and
(c) Has insufficient resources to properly dispose of the vessel
outside of the pilot vessel amnesty disposal program.
(6) The department of natural resources may take other actions not
inconsistent with this section in order to develop and administer the
pilot vessel amnesty disposal program.
(7) The department of natural resources must provide a brief
summary of the pilot vessel amnesty disposal program to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by September 1,
2011, to include information about applications for the pilot vessel
amnesty disposal program, the vessels disposed of, and a recommendation
whether the pilot vessel amnesty disposal program should be made
permanent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of natural resources may
expend two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, from any moneys appropriated to the department from the
derelict vessel removal account in the omnibus appropriations act for
the biennium ending June 30, 2011, for the purposes of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.100.100 and 2007 c 342 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The derelict vessel removal account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 79.100.050 and 79.100.060 and those
moneys specified in RCW 88.02.030 and 88.02.050 must be deposited into
the account. The account is authorized to receive fund transfers and
appropriations from the general fund, deposits from the derelict vessel
removal surcharge under RCW 88.02.270, as well as gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of
this chapter and expend the same or any income according to the terms
of the gifts, grants, or endowments provided those terms do not
conflict with any provisions of this section or any guidelines
developed to prioritize reimbursement of removal projects associated
with this chapter. Moneys in the account may only be spent after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account shall be used by the
department: (a) To reimburse authorized public entities for up to
ninety percent of the total reasonable and auditable administrative,
removal, disposal, and environmental damage costs of abandoned or
derelict vessels when the previous owner is either unknown after a
reasonable search effort or insolvent; and (b) until June 30, 2011, for
the purposes of the pilot vessel amnesty disposal program authorized
under this act. Reimbursement shall not be made unless the department
determines that the public entity has made reasonable efforts to
identify and locate the party responsible for the vessel, regardless of
the title of owner of the vessel. Funds in the account resulting from
transfers from the general fund or from the deposit of funds from the
watercraft excise tax as provided for under RCW 82.49.030 shall be used
to reimburse one hundred percent of these costs and should be
prioritized for the removal of large vessels. Costs associated with
removal and disposal of an abandoned or derelict vessel under the
authority granted in RCW 53.08.320 also qualify for reimbursement from
the derelict vessel removal account. In each biennium, up to twenty
percent of the expenditures from the account may be used for
administrative expenses of the department of licensing and department
of natural resources in implementing this chapter.
(2) If the balance of the account reaches one million dollars as of
March 1st of any year, exclusive of any transfer or appropriation of
funds into the account or funds deposited into the account collected
under RCW 88.02.270, the department must notify the department of
licensing and the collection of any fees associated with this account
must be suspended for the following fiscal year.
(3) Priority for use of this account is for the removal of derelict
and abandoned vessels that are in danger of sinking, breaking up, or
blocking navigation channels, or that present environmental risks such
as leaking fuel or other hazardous substances. The department must
develop criteria, in the form of informal guidelines, to prioritize
removal projects associated with this chapter, but may not consider
whether the applicant is a state or local entity when prioritizing.
The guidelines must also include guidance to the authorized public
entities as to what removal activities and associated costs are
reasonable and eligible for reimbursement.
(4) The department must keep all authorized public entities
apprized of the balance of the derelict vessel removal account and the
funds available for reimbursement. The guidelines developed by the
department must also be made available to the other authorized public
entities. This subsection (4) must be satisfied by utilizing the least
costly method, including maintaining the information on the
department's internet web site, or any other cost-effective method.
(5) An authorized public entity may contribute its ten percent of
costs that are not eligible for reimbursement by using in-kind
services, including the use of existing staff, equipment, and
volunteers.
(6) This chapter does not guarantee reimbursement for an authorized
public entity. Authorized public entities seeking certainty in
reimbursement prior to taking action under this chapter may first
notify the department of their proposed action and the estimated total
costs. Upon notification by an authorized public entity, the
department must make the authorized public entity aware of the status
of the fund and the likelihood of reimbursement being available. The
department may offer technical assistance and assure reimbursement for
up to two years following the removal action if an assurance is
appropriate given the balance of the fund and the details of the
proposed action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act expire June
30, 2011.

--- END ---