BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.12.010 and 1981 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this title, other than RCW 66.28.140, applies to wine or
beer manufactured in any home for private consumption ((therein)), and
not for sale.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.28.140 and 1994 c 201 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An adult member of a household may remove family beer or wine
from the home ((for exhibition or use at organized beer or wine
tastings or competitions,)) subject to the following conditions:
(a) The quantity removed by a producer ((for these purposes)) is
limited to a quantity not exceeding ((one)) twenty gallons;
(b) Family beer or wine is not removed for sale ((or for the use of
any person other than the producer. This subparagraph does not
preclude any necessary tasting of the beer or wine when the exhibition
or beer or wine tasting includes judging the merits of the wine by
judges who have been selected by the organization sponsoring the
affair; and
(c) When the display contest or judging purpose has been served,
any remaining portion of the sample is returned to the family premises
from which removed)).
(2) As used in this section, "family beer or wine" means beer or
wine manufactured in the home for private consumption ((therein)) or
for exhibition or use at organized beer or wine tastings, competitions,
meetings, or conferences, or use by internal revenue code section
501(c)(3) nonprofit organizations, and not for sale.

--- END ---