BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
park arboretum is the official arboretum of the state of Washington.
The University of Washington and the city of Seattle cooperatively
established the arboretum in 1934, with Seattle holding title to most
of the property and the University of Washington owning, designing,
developing, and managing the collections at the arboretum and botanic
garden. The arboretum is a central component of the University of
Washington botanic gardens, along with collections around the center
for urban horticulture, in the Union Bay natural area, and in the Otis
Douglas Hyde herbarium.
The legislature finds that the Washington park arboretum contains
a dynamic collection of trees and other woody plants that are hardy in
the maritime Pacific Northwest. Collections are selected and arranged
to display their beauty and function in urban landscapes, to
demonstrate their natural ecology and diversity, and to conserve
important species and cultivated varieties for the future. There is no
fee for admission to the arboretum, allowing everyone to enjoy and
learn from its collections.
The legislature also finds that the Washington park arboretum holds
one of the most prestigious plant collections in the world. The
arboretum consists of approximately twenty thousand trees, shrubs, and
vines, of which over ten thousand are catalogued. The collection
includes approximately four thousand six hundred different species and
one hundred thirty-nine endangered species. Collections include
rhododendron, azalea, mountain ash, pine, spruce, cedar, fir,
crabapple, holly, magnolia, camellia, and Japanese maple. The
arboretum's collection of oaks and maples is the richest in the nation,
and the conifers, hollies, and magnolias also rank among the nation's
finest collections. The arboretum displays ninety-five percent of its
holdings, whose estimated value is almost eighty-two million dollars.
The legislature further finds that the Washington park arboretum's
mission is to serve the public, students at all levels, naturalists,
gardeners, and nursery and landscape professionals with its
collections, educational programs, interpretation, and recreational
opportunities. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide
additional tools and resources to the University of Washington botanic
gardens as it preserves and provides public access to the important
educational, recreational, social, and cultural state resources that
the arboretum and other botanic garden collections have to offer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the goal of the legislature that the Washington park
arboretum's collections, exhibits, and facilities be preserved,
maintained, and presented in a manner befitting one of the world's most
prestigious plant collections. Therefore, the Washington park
arboretum must strive to:
(1) Enhance public appreciation for the aesthetic diversity of
temperate wood plants;
(2) Educate the public and regional school population about urban
landscape use and the natural biology of temperate wood plants;
(3) Conserve and keep healthy native, exotic, and cultivated woody
plants to preserve diversity for future appreciation;
(4) Maintain and enhance collections, exhibits, and facilities to
create the best possible ambiance and visitor experience; and
(5) Cooperate with local, regional, national, and international
entities that have a similar mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The University of Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship is
established within the University of Washington to support a staff
position within the botanic gardens, which currently falls under the
college of forest resources. The purpose of the endowed curatorship is
to ensure that perpetual funding exists for a botanic gardens curator
who shall focus on: (1) The preservation, maintenance, and
presentation of the botanic garden's collections; and (2) the goals
established for the Washington park arboretum in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The University of Washington botanic gardens endowed
curatorship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All moneys appropriated by the legislature for the University of
Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship or to the account must
be placed in the account. Money in the account may only be released
according to the procedures set forth in subsection (2) of this
section. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The state treasurer must release money in the University of
Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship account to the
University of Washington board of regents for inclusion in the
University of Washington consolidated endowment fund when the
University of Washington board of regents determines that it can match
the state funds requested with an equal amount of funds contributed by
nonstate sources for the University of Washington botanic gardens
endowed curatorship and requests that the funds be released. The state
and nonstate moneys must each be placed in the University of Washington
consolidated endowment fund. The University of Washington may not
invade the principal invested for the botanic gardens endowed
curatorship. Distributions from the consolidated endowment fund
resulting from this investment must be used solely for purposes of the
University of Washington botanic gardens endowed curatorship.

--- END ---