BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that nature-based
tourism is the fastest growing outdoor activity and the fastest growing
segment of the tourism industry. Tourism activities relating to
watchable wildlife contribute almost one and one-half billion dollars
to Washington state's economy per year, and it is primarily the rural
areas of the state in which these activities occur.
The legislature finds that there is general agreement that owners
of working farms and forest lands provide a significant portion of the
key areas for the wildlife which in turn attract the nature-based
tourists. While tourism promotion interests seek to provide incentives
to these landowners to maintain these key areas in a manner that
benefits wildlife, and to assist them in managing the tourists that
seek to appreciate this wildlife, there is also a need to create
options for local governments seeking to provide monetary incentives to
these landowners.
The legislature further finds that the purchase of a watchable
wildlife decal currently offers a valuable opportunity for individuals
to voluntarily contribute to the enhancement of the habitat,
infrastructure, trails, corridors, and communities that provide
wildlife viewing opportunities in this state. However, the legislature
finds that additional investments in the department of fish and
wildlife's watchable wildlife program are needed, and that such
investments will increase wildlife viewing and other recreational
opportunities in the state and benefit Washington's wildlife and rural
communities.
Therefore, the legislature intends to enhance wildlife viewing
opportunities in Washington by providing additional tools and resources
to the state's watchable wildlife program and landowners who provide
the wildlife habitat that supports nature-based tourism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise
tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not
exceed one-half of one percent.
(2) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
must contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.
(3) All revenue from taxes imposed under this section shall be
credited to a special fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing
such tax and used solely for the purposes of funding all or any part of
agreements with the owners of forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW or
open space land, farm and agricultural land, or timber land under
chapter 84.34 RCW, to provide public access to private lands and to
manage wildlife habitat for the promotion of tourism.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.28.1815 and 2008 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 67.28.180 and section 2 of this act, all
revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter shall be credited to a
special fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing such tax and
used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of
tourism promotion, acquisition of tourism-related facilities, or
operation of tourism-related facilities. Municipalities may, under
chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to the utilization of revenue from taxes
imposed under this chapter for the purposes of funding a
multijurisdictional tourism-related facility.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.28.181 and 2004 c 79 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise
tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not
exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate that, when combined with all
other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging within the municipality under
this chapter except taxes imposed under section 2 of this act, and
under chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals twelve
percent. A tax under this chapter shall not be imposed in increments
smaller than tenths of a percent.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four
percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization shall continue
through January 31, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may impose a
tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually
imposed by the municipality on January 31, 1999.
(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax
under (a) of this subsection, is located in a county that imposed taxes
under this chapter with a total rate of four percent or more on January
1, 1997, the city or town may not impose a tax under this section.
(c) If a city has a population of four hundred thousand or more and
is located in a county with a population of one million or more, the
rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city shall not exceed the
lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with all other
taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under this
chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
fifteen and two-tenths percent.
(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent
before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this
section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the
municipality on January 1, 1998.
(3) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.32.560 and 2003 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may sell watchable wildlife decals. Proceeds
from the sale of the decal must be deposited into the state wildlife
((fund)) account created in RCW 77.12.170 and must be dedicated to the
support of the department's watchable wildlife activities. The
department may also use proceeds from the sale of the decal for
marketing the decal and for marketing watchable wildlife activities in
the state.
(2) The term "watchable wildlife activities" includes but is not
limited to: Initiating partnerships with communities to jointly
develop watchable wildlife projects, building infrastructure to serve
wildlife viewers, assisting and training communities in conducting
wildlife watching events, developing destination wildlife viewing
corridors and trails, tours, maps, brochures, and travel aides, and
offering grants to assist rural communities in identifying key wildlife
attractions and ways to protect and promote them.
(3) The commission must adopt by rule the cost of the watchable
wildlife decal. A person may, at their discretion, contribute more
than the cost as set by the commission by rule for the watchable
wildlife decal in order to support watchable wildlife activities. A
person who purchases a watchable wildlife decal must be issued one
vehicle use permit free of charge.
(4)(a) Until December 1, 2011, the department, under the authority
of the director, shall carry out a watchable wildlife raffle pilot
project.
(b) The pilot project must consist of no fewer than three separate
watchable wildlife raffles and associated tours. The department shall
select raffle winners from the pool of watchable wildlife decal
holders. The department shall provide raffle winners with a wildlife
viewing tour on department owned or managed lands, and in doing so may
work cooperatively with nongovernmental entities and individuals. The
tour should provide participants with a desirable, high quality, and
rare wildlife viewing experience. The department shall seek to
publicize the raffles and tours, including the tour destinations, to
increase public awareness of the department's watchable wildlife
program, watchable wildlife decals, and the pilot project.
(c) During the pilot project, the department is encouraged to use
other creative measures in an effort to increase the number of
individuals who voluntarily purchase watchable wildlife decals.
(d) The department shall provide the appropriate committees of the
legislature with a brief summary of the pilot project and relevant
policy recommendations, if any, by December 1, 2011.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.46.010 and 1996 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public policy of the state of Washington on gambling is to keep
the criminal element out of gambling and to promote the social welfare
of the people by limiting the nature and scope of gambling activities
and by strict regulation and control.
It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature,
recognizing the close relationship between professional gambling and
organized crime, to restrain all persons from seeking profit from
professional gambling activities in this state; to restrain all persons
from patronizing such professional gambling activities; to safeguard
the public against the evils induced by common gamblers and common
gambling houses engaged in professional gambling; and at the same time,
both to preserve the freedom of the press and to avoid restricting
participation by individuals in activities and social pastimes, which
activities and social pastimes are more for amusement rather than for
profit, do not maliciously affect the public, and do not breach the
peace.
The legislature further declares that the raising of funds for the
promotion of bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is in the
public interest as is participation in such activities and social
pastimes as are hereinafter in this chapter authorized.
The legislature further declares that the conducting of bingo,
raffles, and amusement games and the operation of punchboards, pull-tabs, card games and other social pastimes, when conducted pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, are hereby authorized, as are only such lotteries for
which no valuable consideration has been paid or agreed to be paid as
hereinafter in this chapter provided.
The legislature further declares that fishing derbies shall not
constitute any form of gambling and shall not be considered as a
lottery, a raffle, or an amusement game and shall not be subject to the
provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted
hereunder.
The legislature further declares that raffles authorized by the
fish and wildlife commission involving hunting big game animals or wild
turkeys or as authorized under RCW 77.32.560 shall not be subject to
the provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted
hereunder, with the exception of this section and RCW 9.46.400.
All factors incident to the activities authorized in this chapter
shall be closely controlled, and the provisions of this chapter shall
be liberally construed to achieve such end.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.46.400 and 1996 c 101 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any raffle authorized by the fish and wildlife commission involving
hunting big game animals or wild turkeys or under RCW 77.32.560 shall
not be subject to any provisions of this chapter other than RCW
9.46.010 and this section or to any rules or regulations of the
gambling commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 5 through 7 of this act expire
January 1, 2012.

--- END ---