BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A cemetery authority may allow the burial of pet remains in the
same cemetery in which the pet's owner is buried in either: (a) An
established and operating area of the cemetery; or (b) a section of the
cemetery designated solely for the commingling and burial of pet
remains and human remains.
(2) Pet remains, regardless of their location in a cemetery, must
be contained within the same plot that an individual purchases or has
purchased for their own burial.
(3) The burial of pet remains will be authorized only when a
cemetery authority has received written authorization from the pet
owner expressing his or her intentions to be buried with his or her pet
remains. An individual may provide written authorization under this
subsection to the cemetery authority either at the time of purchasing
a burial plot or after purchasing a burial plot, but in no case may the
authorization be provided after the person is deceased.
(4) Pet remains may be buried in the same plot of an individual's
human remains prior to the burial of the person, at the same time as
the burial of the person, or after the burial of the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Pet remains" means the body of a deceased cat or dog in cremated
disposition.

--- END ---