BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.110 and 2005 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Partisan office" means a public office for which a candidate may
indicate a political party preference on his or her declaration of
candidacy and have that preference appear on the primary and general
election ballot in conjunction with his or her name. The following are
partisan offices:
(1) United States senator and United States representative;
(2) All state offices, including legislative, except (a) judicial
offices; and (b) the office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices ((and)); (b) the
prosecuting attorney; and (c) those offices for which a county home
rule charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.52.111 and 2004 c 271 s 173 are each amended to
read as follows:
Candidates for the following offices shall be nominated at partisan
primaries held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter:
(1) Congressional offices;
(2) All state offices except (a) judicial offices; and (b) the
office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices ((and)); (b) the
prosecuting attorney; and (c) those offices where a county home rule
charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.52.231 and 2004 c 271 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
The offices of superintendent of public instruction, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the superior
court, ((and)) judge of the district court, and prosecuting attorney
shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.
All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.

--- END ---