BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.210 and 2006 c 212 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) ((or (4))) of
this section, any public or private landowners or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether designated resource, rural,
or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas
or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation((, which term includes, but is not
limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private
persons for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking,
bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding of horses or other
animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles,
snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water
sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor)), shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users where:
(a) No fee of any kind is charged for such use;
(b) An administrative fee of up to twenty-five dollars is charged
for the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood from the land;
(c) A charge is imposed for a license or permit issued for
statewide use under authority of chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW;
(d) A daily charge not to exceed fifty dollars per person, per day,
is imposed for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined
in RCW 46.09.020, or other public facility accessed by a highway,
street, or nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road vehicle use; or
(e) Moneys are received and such use is allowed pursuant to the
terms of a written agreement with a federal, state, or local
government.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) ((or (4))) of
this section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water
areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who
offer or allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) ((Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful
possession and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of
up to twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4))) (a) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by someone other
than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial latent condition
and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the condition or use
of such an anchor.
(b) Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and this section limits or expands in
any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance.
(c) Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or other
users is permissive and does not support any claim of adverse
possession.
(((5) For purposes of this section, the following are not fees:
(a) A license or permit issued for statewide use under authority of
chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW; and
(b) A daily charge not to exceed twenty dollars per person, per
day, for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined in RCW
46.09.020, or other public facility accessed by a highway, street, or
nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road vehicle use.))
(4) For purposes of this section, the term outdoor recreation
includes, but is not limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing
of firewood by private persons for their personal use without
purchasing the firewood from the landowner, hunting, fishing, camping,
picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling, skateboarding or other
nonmotorized wheel-based activities, hanggliding, paragliding, rock
climbing, the riding of horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure
driving of off-road vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating,
nature study, winter or water sports, and viewing or enjoying
historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites.

--- END ---