BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that invasive species,
which are nonnative organisms that cause economic or environmental harm
and are capable of spreading to new areas of the state, pose a great
threat to the citizens, natural resources, and economy of Washington
state. The state spends millions of dollars each year on a variety of
efforts to prevent, control, and eradicate invasive species. In its
2008 strategic plan entitled "Invaders at the Gate," the Washington
invasive species council provided several recommendations to help
maximize the effectiveness of these ongoing invasive species efforts by
enhancing program coordination and the flow of information among
invasive species-related programs and the public. The legislature
intends to facilitate the implementation of these recommendations, and
to create an invasive species grant program to fund other efforts vital
to the prevention, control, and eradication of invasive species in
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council shall:
(a) Develop a statewide baseline assessment of invasive species in
Washington state. The assessment must consist of existing available
information about invasive species and programs related to prevention,
control, and eradication of invasive species. The council shall
develop the assessment to allow analysis of invasive species issues,
prevention, control, or eradication efforts in place, and the progress
of these efforts;
(b) Provide public access to invasive species information through
an internet-based information clearinghouse. The clearinghouse must
allow members of the public and other invasive species-related programs
to access information and analysis from invasive species efforts
statewide. The clearinghouse must also include a mechanism allowing
users to provide additional invasive species information to other users
and to the council for inclusion in the statewide baseline assessment;
and
(c) Conduct a targeted outreach campaign to provide information to
Washington's citizens about the dangers posed by invasive species and
steps that citizens can take to prevent, control, or eradicate invasive
species. In conducting the outreach campaign, the council shall seek
to coordinate with and complement other more specific outreach efforts
already underway.
(2) The council shall include a brief evaluation of progress made
in the preceding year to carry out subsection (1) of this section in
the annual report required each year under RCW 79A.25.350.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council is responsible for making grants to state and local
agencies for the prevention, control, or eradication of invasive
species from amounts appropriated by the legislature for these
purposes. The council shall distribute these amounts to the projects
and activities that it finds are the most effective investment towards
addressing the invasive species issues facing the state. Projects and
activities funded may include those that: Prevent the introduction of
invasive species into Washington; control or eradicate invasive species
already in Washington; foster cooperation, coordination, and
communication regarding invasive species prevention, control, or
eradication; refine and coordinate statewide capacity to identify,
report, and respond to invasive species; and restore ecosystems
adversely affected by invasive species. The council may use the
strategic goals, recommendations, and actions included in its 2008
strategic plan entitled "Invaders at the Gate" as the basis for funding
categories or project evaluation criteria or the council may choose to
develop other funding categories or evaluation criteria under
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) In order to carry out subsection (1) of this section, the
council may:
(a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the procedures
and project evaluation criteria for grant and loan awards;
(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with
grant recipients and with other public and private parties as the
council deems necessary, consistent with the purposes of this section;
(c) Adopt additional or alternative funding categories, project
evaluation criteria, or other procedures as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section, which may include guidelines for the amount
of nonstate resources that must be committed for grants and guidelines
that limit the amount of a grant that may be allocated for
administrative expenses; and
(d) Do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this section.
(3) The recreation and conservation office shall provide staff
support for the grant making activities conducted by the council under
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.25.370 and 2007 c 241 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
The invasive species council account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations, gifts, grants,
and donations must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only to carry out the purposes of the council
and section 3 of this act. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and the approval of the director of
the recreation and conservation office is required for expenditures.
All expenditures must be directed by the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act expires December 31,
2011.

--- END ---