BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Olympic
marmot, the only endemic mammal in Washington state, should be
designated as the state endemic mammal. The Olympic marmot inhabits
the Olympic Peninsula in the western section of the state of
Washington. Olympic marmots hibernate from September to May. During
the morning and afternoon on summer days they feed and spend time
sunbathing on rocks. In the evening, they return to their burrow.
Olympic marmots are relatively easy to see during the summer months
along Hurricane Ridge in the Olympic National Park. Olympic marmots
eat herbs, grasses, and flowers. They prefer plants that are soft and
easy to digest. They may also eat fruits, legumes, and insects.
Olympic marmots are highly social and may live in groups of over
a dozen animals. Gregarious bonds are made between individuals in a
family. Olympic marmots identify each other by touching noses and
smelling cheeks.
The legislature intends to promote awareness of the Olympic marmot
by designating the Olympic marmot as the official endemic mammal of the
state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The Olympic marmot, Marmota olympus, is hereby designated as the
official endemic mammal of the state of Washington.

--- END ---