BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The combined value of all cash and noncash benefits provided to any
executive officer, employee, or director of a public service company
that exceeds the annual salary of the governor of the state of
Washington shall not be recovered by the company in its rates or
charges.

--- END ---