BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.210.180 (Screening program for scoliosis -- Purpose) and
1991 c 86 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 201, 1985 c 216 s 1, & 1979 c 47 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.210.190 (Screening program for scoliosis -- Definitions)
and 1991 c 86 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 202, 1985 c 216 s 2, & 1979 c 47 s 2;
(3) RCW 28A.210.200 (Screening program for scoliosis -- Examination
of children -- Personnel making examinations, training for) and 1991 c 86
s 3, 1990 c 33 s 203, 1985 c 216 s 3, & 1979 c 47 s 3;
(4) RCW 28A.210.210 (Screening program for scoliosis -- Records--Parents or guardians notification, contents) and 1990 c 33 s 204, 1985
c 216 s 4, & 1979 c 47 s 4;
(5) RCW 28A.210.220 (Screening program for scoliosis -- Distribution
of rules, records and forms) and 1990 c 33 s 205 & 1979 c 47 s 5;
(6) RCW 28A.210.240 (Screening program for scoliosis -- Pupils
exempt, when) and 1985 c 216 s 5 & 1979 c 47 s 6; and
(7) RCW 28A.210.250 (Screening program for scoliosis -- Sanctions
against school officials failing to comply) and 1990 c 33 s 207 & 1979
c 47 s 7.

--- END ---