BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, shall determine a salary standard for adjunct faculty
members employed in each academic, technical, basic studies, or other
department that, subject to collective bargaining with the exclusive
representatives of faculty where they exist, constitutes a pro rata
salary compared to the salaries of full-time tenured faculty members of
comparable qualifications doing comparable work.
(2) By December 2009, each institution of higher education shall
determine the method by which prorated salaries for adjunct faculty
will be determined and create a plan for equitably increasing
individual salaries, taking into account experience within the
institution as well as qualifications.

--- END ---