BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct an ethical audit of the personnel management
systems of the community and technical colleges. The audit shall be
completed by November 15, 2009. Results of the audit shall be reported
to the legislature by December 1, 2009. In conducting the audit, the
joint legislative audit and review committee shall review the following
issues including but not limited to:
(a) Practices for employing part-time rather than full-time
faculty;
(b) Practices for recruiting, hiring, terminating, and promoting
part-time faculty;
(c) Salary disparities for full-time and part-time faculty;
(d) Benefits for part-time and full-time faculty;
(e) Policies on sick leave and vacation time;
(f) Access to facilities and support services for part-time
faculty; and
(g) Teaching assignments for part-time faculty.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2009.

--- END ---