BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
An environmental impact statement required under RCW 43.21C.031
that is prepared on a proposed transportation project must include an
analysis of how the proposed alternatives identified in the statement
may be affected by teleworking as applied to any traffic modeling
performed as part of the environmental impact statement process. For
purposes of this section, "teleworking" means a program where work
functions that are normally performed at a traditional workplace are
instead performed by an employee at his or her home at least one day a
week for the purpose of reducing the number of trips to the employee's
workplace.

--- END ---