BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Lead toxicity has been identified as the
leading cause of death in California condors. Although there may be
many potential sources of lead, studies have determined that lead from
spent ammunition is a major source of lead in exposed condors and that
lead from the local environment does not appear to be a factor.
California condors inadvertently ingest lead from spent ammunition
found in animal carcasses and gut piles. Lead bullets can fragment
into hundreds of pieces before they exit a target such as a deer or
coyote. Since California condors are group feeders, and only one or
two lead fragments or pellets can cause lead toxicity, one animal
carcass or gut pile containing lead fragments or lead shot has the
potential to poison several condors. It is the intent of the
legislature to protect vulnerable wildlife, including the California
condor, a federally listed endangered species, from the ongoing threat
of lead poisoning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting in the second degree if
the person possesses shot, either in shotgun shells or as loose shot
for muzzle-loading, other than nontoxic shot when hunting game animals,
game birds, or waterfowl in those areas as determined by rule of the
commission in which waterfowl, California condors, or other endangered,
threatened, or sensitive species could be harmed by lead shot.
(2) The commission shall by rule determine the areas in which a
person may not possess shot, either in shotgun shells or as loose shot
for muzzle-loading, other than nontoxic shot when hunting game animals,
game birds, or waterfowl.
(3) The commission shall by rule determine the types of nontoxic
shot consistent with federal regulations that may be used in the areas
in which a person may not possess shot, either in shotgun shells or as
loose shot for muzzle-loading, other than nontoxic shot when hunting
game animals, game birds, or waterfowl.
(4) Unlawful hunting in the second degree is a misdemeanor.
(5) In addition to the penalties set forth in this section, upon
conviction:
(a) The court shall require a payment of one thousand dollars as a
criminal wildlife penalty assessment that must be paid to the clerk of
the court and distributed to the state treasurer for deposit in the
fish and wildlife enforcement reward account created in RCW 77.15.425.
The criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be imposed regardless of
and in addition to any sentence, fine, or costs imposed for violating
this section. The criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be
included by the court in any pronouncement of sentence and may not be
suspended, waived, modified, or deferred in any respect; and
(b) The department shall revoke the hunting license of the person
and order a suspension of hunting privileges for two years.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.400 and 2006 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses a wild bird and the person does
not have and possess all licenses, tags, stamps, and permits required
under this title;
(b) Maliciously destroys, takes, or harms the eggs or nests of a
wild bird except when authorized by permit;
(c) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the bag or
possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or other rule addressing
the manner or method of hunting or possession of wild birds; or
(d) Possesses a wild bird taken during a closed season for that
wild bird or taken from a closed area for that wild bird.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
first degree if the person takes or possesses two times or more than
the possession or bag limit for wild birds allowed by rule of the
commission or director.
(3)(a) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(((4) In addition to the penalties set forth in this section, if a
person, other than a youth as defined in RCW 77.08.010 for hunting
purposes, violates a rule adopted by the commission under the authority
of this title that requires the use of nontoxic shot, upon conviction:
(a) The court shall require a payment of one thousand dollars as a
criminal wildlife penalty assessment that must be paid to the clerk of
the court and distributed to the state treasurer for deposit in the
fish and wildlife enforcement reward account created in RCW 77.15.425.
The criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be imposed regardless of
and in addition to any sentence, fine, or costs imposed for violating
this section. The criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be
included by the court in any pronouncement of sentence and may not be
suspended, waived, modified, or deferred in any respect; and
(b) The department shall revoke the hunting license of the person
and order a suspension of small game hunting privileges for two
years.))

--- END ---