BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are many
issues facing the forest sector, such as climate change, forest health
and fire, carbon accounting, habitat and diversity, timber and water
supplies, and the economic health of forest dependent communities.
These forest issues, and the approaches taken to address them,
transcend the expertise and missions of the current University of
Washington centers and cooperatives. While each center and cooperative
contributes important expertise and resources, the structure and
continuity for the integrated, interdisciplinary approach to address
these complex issues is lacking. The institute of forest resources
would provide this structure and continuity by drawing contributions
from the centers and cooperatives into a more consolidated,
collaborative, interdisciplinary, and integrated process that is
responsive to the critical issues confronting the forest sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The head of the college of forest resources
of the University of Washington must coordinate the existing college of
forest resource's cooperatives and centers to promote a more holistic,
efficient, and integrated approach to broaden its research program to
address the issues facing the forest section.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.44.030 and 1979 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The institute of forest resources ((shall)) must pursue
coordinated research and education related to the forest ((resource))
sector and its multiple uses including: Its conservation, sustainable
management, and utilization; its economic, ecological, and societal
value; evaluation of forest land ((use and the maintenance of its rural
environment)); the manufacture and marketing of forest products,
including timber, nontimber, and environmental services; and the
provision of recreation and aesthetic values.
(2) The institute of forest resources must also seek to provide a
framework to identify, prioritize, fund, and conduct interdisciplinary
research critical to the forest sector and to develop integrated,
synthesized information and decision support tools to improve
understanding of these complex issues for policymakers and others.
(3) In pursuit of these objectives, the institute of forest
resources is authorized to cooperate with other entities, including,
but not limited to, universities, state and federal agencies,
industrial institutions, domestic or foreign, where such cooperation
advances these objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 76.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The head of the college of forest resources of the University of
Washington must appoint a policy advisory board consisting of eleven
members to advise the head of the college of forest resources of the
University of Washington on policies for the institute of forest
resources that are consistent with the purposes of the institute.
Membership on the policy advisory board must broadly represent the
various interests concerned with the purposes of the institute of
forest resources, including the state and federal governments,
environmental organizations, local communities, the timber industry,
and tribes.
Members of the policy advisory committee must be compensated as
provided in RCW 43.03.220 and must be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The institute of forest resources shall
provide progress reports to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by July 1, 2010, and July 1, 2011, on the coordination
required by section 2 of this act and the implementation of this act.

--- END ---