BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2006 c 311 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of three
elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body and
a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question. If the referendum or question relates to
a property tax levy, the ballot title must include a comparison of the
aggregate financial impact between the taxing district's levy, if any,
in the immediately preceding year and the current ballot, in both
dollar and percentage change terms. Ballot questions under RCW
84.55.050 must include an estimate of the financial impact in the first
year of the levy increase as compared to the taxing district's last
levy, in both dollar and percentage terms. For all ballot titles
relating to a property tax levy, with the exception of specific levy
rate questions posed under RCW 84.55.050, any indicated levy rate must
be described as advisory only. The ballot title must conform with the
requirements and be displayed substantially as provided under RCW
29A.72.050, except that the concise description must not exceed
((seventy-five)) one hundred words; however, a concise description
submitted on behalf of a proposed or existing regional transportation
investment district may exceed ((seventy-five)) one hundred words. If
the local governmental unit is a city or a town, the concise statement
shall be prepared by the city or town attorney. If the local
governmental unit is a county, the concise statement shall be prepared
by the prosecuting attorney of the county. If the unit is a unit of
local government other than a city, town, or county, the concise
statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county
within which the majority area of the unit is located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2004 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130,
84.52.069, or 84.52.135 shall contain in substance the following:

"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter shall indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.

(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 shall contain the
following:

"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

(3) In addition to the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the ballot proposition must include a comparison of the
aggregate financial impact between the taxing district's levy, if any,
in the immediately preceding year and the current ballot, in both
dollar and percentage change terms.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.054 and 2007 c 54 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
The additional tax provided for in Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, and specifically authorized by RCW 84.52.052,
84.52.053, 84.52.0531, and 84.52.130, shall be set forth in terms of
dollars on the ballot of the proposition to be submitted to the voters,
together with an estimate of the dollar rate of tax levy that will be
required to produce the dollar amount((; and)). The ballot proposition
must include a comparison of the aggregate financial impact between the
levy, if any, in the immediately preceding year and the current ballot,
in both dollar and percentage change terms. The estimated levy rate
must be described as advisory only. The county assessor, in spreading
this tax upon the rolls, shall determine the eventual dollar rate
required to produce the amount of dollars so voted upon, regardless of
the estimate of dollar rate of tax levy carried in said proposition.
In the case of a school district or fire protection district
proposition for a particular period, the dollar amount and the
corresponding estimate of the dollar rate of tax levy shall be set
forth for each of the years in that period. The dollar amount for each
annual levy in the particular period may be equal or in different
amounts.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.55.050 and 2008 c 319 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state the conditions,
if any, which are applicable under subsection (4) of this section and
must conform with the requirements of RCW 29A.36.071.
(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed
before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in
levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years,
during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be
used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding
year is computed, but the ballot proposition must conform with the
requirements of RCW 29A.36.071 and must state the dollar rate proposed
only for the first year of the consecutive years and must state the
limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining a limit
factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the same
for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may be
increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections for
this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The title
of each ballot measure must state the limited purposes for which the
proposed annual increases during the specified period of up to six
consecutive years shall be used, and funds raised under the levy shall
not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. For purposes of
this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating expenditures
for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is approved by
voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost federal funds,
lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary events not likely
to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the control of the
taxing district receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital
expenditures.
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under
this section will be used for this purpose.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this
section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of
this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;
(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased
levies are made shall not exceed nine years;
(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(e) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot
measure under this section, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the proposition.

--- END ---