BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.59 RCW
to read as follows:
An occupational therapist licensed under this chapter may purchase,
store, and administer medications such as hydrocortisone, fluocinonide,
topical anesthetics, silver sulfadiazine, lidocaine, magnesium sulfate,
zinc oxide, and other similar medications, and may administer such
other drugs or medications as prescribed by an authorized health care
practitioner for the practice of occupational therapy. A pharmacist
who dispenses such drugs to a licensed occupational therapist is not
liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the
occupational therapist.

--- END ---