BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.010 and 2008 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The number of district judges to be elected in each county shall
be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton, ((three)) five; Chelan, two;
Clallam, two; Clark, six; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, three; Douglas, one;
Ferry, one; Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, two; Grays Harbor,
two; Island, one; Jefferson, one; King, twenty-one; Kitsap, four;
Kittitas, two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one;
Okanogan, two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San
Juan, one; Skagit, two; Skamania, one; Snohomish, eight; Spokane, ten;
Stevens, one; Thurston, three; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two;
Whatcom, two; Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be increased
only as provided in RCW 3.34.020.

--- END ---