BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.84.020 and 1997 c 271 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, the term "dog guide" means a dog
that is trained, or in training, for the purpose of guiding blind
persons or ((a dog trained for the purpose of)) assisting hearing
impaired persons.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.84.021 and 1997 c 271 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, "service animal" means an animal
that is trained, or in training, for the purposes of assisting or
accommodating a ((disabled)) person's sensory, mental, or physical
disability.

--- END ---