BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax as a tribal
member in accordance with federal law and rules prescribed by the
department must display documentation of current enrollment in the
federally recognized Indian tribe within whose jurisdiction the person
makes a purchase or receives delivery in one of the following forms:
(a) A tribal membership card;
(b) A letter from a tribal official;
(c) A list of tribal members issued by the tribe; or
(d) A treaty fishery identification card.
(2) To make a sale without collecting the sales tax, the vendor
must request documentation as provided under subsection (1) of this
section and maintain a record of the tax exempt sale showing the form
of documentation accepted and including identification number and
expiration date, if any.
(3)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements or offering either
fraudulent or fraudulently obtained documentation to a vendor, in order
to claim exemption from retail sales tax as a tribal member, is guilty
of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying documentation not his or her own, or counterfeit
documentation, with intent to violate the provisions of this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the amount of
tax due and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred
dollars or the amount of tax due.
(4)(a) Any vendor who makes tax exempt sales to a person who does
not display documentation as provided in subsection (1) of this section
or fails to maintain records as provided in subsection (2) of this
section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes tax exempt sales and has actual knowledge
that the purchaser's documentation under subsection (1) of this section
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is
personally liable for the amount of tax due and subject to a penalty
equal to the greater of one thousand dollars or the amount of tax due.
In addition, both the purchaser and the vendor are liable for any
penalties and interest assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.

--- END ---