BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this title applies to or prevents a wedding boutique
or art gallery from offering or supplying without charge wine or beer
by the individual glass to a customer for consumption on the premises.
However, the customer must be at least twenty-one years of age and may
only be offered one glass of wine or beer, and wine or beer served or
consumed shall be purchased from a Washington state licensed retailer
or a Washington state liquor store or agency at full retail price. A
wedding boutique or art gallery offering wine without charge may not
advertise the service of complimentary wine or beer and may not sell
wine or beer in any manner. Any employee involved in the service of
wine or beer must complete a board-approved limited alcohol server
training program.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Art gallery" means a room or building devoted to the
exhibition and/or sale of the works of art.
(b) "Wedding boutique" means a business primarily engaged in the
sale of wedding merchandise.

--- END ---