BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.550 and 1997 c 321 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license to be designated
as a beer and wine boutique and gift delivery license to solicit, take
orders for, sell for off-premises consumption, and deliver beer and/or
wine in bottles and original packages. If the retailer offers delivery
services, delivery must be made to persons other than the person
placing the order. A beer and wine boutique and gift delivery license
may be issued only to a business ((solely)) primarily engaged in the
sale or sale and delivery of gifts or wedding merchandise at retail
which holds no other class of license under this title or to a person
in the business of selling flowers or floral arrangements at retail.
No minimum beer and/or wine inventory requirement shall apply to
holders of beer and wine boutique and gift delivery licenses. The fee
for this license is seventy-five dollars per year. Delivery of beer
and/or wine under a beer and wine boutique and gift delivery license
shall be made in accordance with all applicable provisions of this
title and the rules of the board, and no beer and/or wine so delivered
shall be opened on any premises licensed under this title. A beer and
wine boutique and gift delivery license does not authorize door-to-door
solicitation of gift wine delivery orders. Deliveries of beer and/or
wine under a beer and wine boutique and gift delivery license shall be
made only in conjunction with gifts or flowers.

--- END ---