BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The rising cost of fuel, utilities, and
other rapidly increasing expenses make it difficult for small school
districts to keep up with these basic needs while maintaining sound
educational programs for their students. In years to come, districts
may face the prospect of deep cuts to current educational offerings,
and with the cuts subsequent losses of students to nearby districts
that have the financial resources to offer more diverse educational
programs. Time must become an adjustable and flexible resource.
Today's school schedule must be modified to respond to the great
changes that reshaped life outside of school. The legislature finds
that while continuing to provide at least a minimum of one thousand
hours of student instruction by permitting districts to lengthen the
school day but allowing the flexibility to eliminate the requirement
for a specific minimum number of school days, schools can continue to
meet all of the other basic education program requirements while
allowing the district to maintain consistent educational programs and
staffing for students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be considered to be implemented by
the following program:
(a) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in kindergarten at least a total instructional offering of four hundred
fifty hours. The program shall include instruction in the essential
academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.630.885 and such other
subjects and such activities as the school district shall determine to
be appropriate for the education of the school district's students
enrolled in such program;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours. The state
board of education may define alternatives to classroom instructional
time for students in grades nine through twelve enrolled in alternative
learning experiences. The state board of education shall establish
rules to determine annual average instructional hours for districts
including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall include the
essential academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.630.885 and such
other subjects and such activities as the school district shall
determine to be appropriate for the education of the school district's
students enrolled in such group;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age ((and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten)): PROVIDED, That effective May 1, 1979,
a school district may schedule the last five school days of the ((one
hundred and eighty day)) school year for noninstructional purposes in
the case of students who are graduating from high school, including,
but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from
school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full time equivalent student to the extent they could
otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
From those funds made available by the legislature for the current
use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction
shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school
district of the state operating a program approved by the state board
of education an amount which, when combined with an appropriate portion
of such locally available revenues, other than receipts from federal
forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of ((one hundred eighty days)) a total instructional
offering of one thousand hours, except that for kindergartens one full
school year shall be ((one hundred eighty half days of instruction)) a
total instructional offering of four hundred fifty hours, or the
equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.
Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula and ratios
provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated
by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100
and 28A.150.410.
Operation of a program approved by the state board of education,
for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding that the
ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten through
three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom teacher
in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as an
instructional employee possessing at least a provisional certificate,
but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose primary
duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and
regulations to insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio
provisions of this section, and such rules and regulations shall allow
for exemptions for those special programs and/or school districts which
may be deemed unable to practicably meet the student/teacher ratio
requirements of this section by virtue of a small number of students.
If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the
basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of education shall
require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold state
funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack
of classroom space.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.290 and 1992 c 141 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power
and duty to make such rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary for
the proper administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through
((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010
not inconsistent with the provisions thereof, and in addition to
require such reports as may be necessary to carry out his or her duties
under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220))
28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the
authority to make rules ((and regulations)) which establish the terms
and conditions for allowing school districts to receive state basic
education moneys as provided in RCW 28A.150.250 when said districts are
unable to fulfill for one or more schools as officially scheduled the
requirement of ((a full school year of one hundred eighty days or)) the
annual average total instructional hour offering imposed by RCW
28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 due to one or more of the following
conditions:
(a) An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily
limited to, a fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or
volcanic eruption that has the direct or indirect effect of rendering
one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible,
or inoperable; and
(b) An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or
inaction by one or more persons, including negligence and threats, that
(i) is beyond the control of both a school district board of directors
and its employees and (ii) has the direct or indirect effect of
rendering one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy,
inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or mechanical
failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson,
vandalism, riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the
scheduled completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance
or disruption of utilities such as heating, lighting and water:
PROVIDED, That an unforeseen action or inaction shall not include any
labor dispute between a school district board of directors and any
employee of the school district.
A condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to
the extent a reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to
August first of the preceding school year that the condition probably
would occur during the ensuing school year because of the occurrence of
an event or a circumstance which existed during such preceding school
year or a prior school year. A board of directors of a school district
is deemed for the purposes of this subsection to have knowledge of
events and circumstances which are a matter of common knowledge within
the school district and of those events and circumstances which can be
discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall make every
effort to reduce the amount of paperwork required in administration of
this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210,
28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010; to simplify the application,
monitoring and evaluation processes used; to eliminate all duplicative
requests for information from local school districts; and to make every
effort to integrate and standardize information requests for other
state education acts and federal aid to education acts administered by
the superintendent of public instruction so as to reduce paperwork
requirements and duplicative information requests.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.330.100 and 2006 c 263 s 417 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors of a school district of the first class,
in addition to the general powers for directors enumerated in this
title, shall have the power:
(1) To employ for a term of not exceeding three years a
superintendent of schools of the district, and for cause to dismiss him
or her, and to fix his or her duties and compensation;
(2) To employ, and for cause dismiss one or more assistant
superintendents and to define their duties and fix their compensation;
(3) To employ a business manager, attorneys, architects, inspectors
of construction, superintendents of buildings and a superintendent of
supplies, all of whom shall serve at the board's pleasure, and to
prescribe their duties and fix their compensation;
(4) To employ, and for cause dismiss, supervisors of instruction
and to define their duties and fix their compensation;
(5) To prescribe a course of study and a program of exercises which
shall be consistent with the course of study prepared by the
superintendent of public instruction for the use of the common schools
of this state;
(6) To, in addition to the minimum requirements imposed by this
title establish and maintain such grades and departments, including
night, high, kindergarten, vocational training and, except as otherwise
provided by law, industrial schools, and schools and departments for
the education and training of any class or classes of youth with
disabilities, as in the judgment of the board, best shall promote the
interests of education in the district;
(7) To ((determine the length of time over and above one hundred
eighty days that school shall be maintained: PROVIDED, That for
purposes of apportionment no district shall be credited with more than
one hundred and eighty-three days' attendance in any school year; and
to)) fix the time for annual opening and closing of schools and for the
daily dismissal of pupils before the regular time for closing schools;
(8) To maintain a shop and repair department, and to employ, and
for cause dismiss, a foreman and the necessary help for the maintenance
and conduct thereof;
(9) To provide free textbooks and supplies for all children
attending school;
(10) To require of the officers or employees of the district to
give a bond for the honest performance of their duties in such penal
sum as may be fixed by the board with good and sufficient surety, and
to cause the premium for all bonds required of all such officers or
employees to be paid by the district: PROVIDED, That the board may, by
written policy, allow that such bonds may include a deductible proviso
not to exceed two percent of the officer's or employee's annual salary;
(11) To prohibit all secret fraternities and sororities among the
students in any of the schools of the said districts; and
(12) To appoint a practicing physician, resident of the school
district, who shall be known as the school district medical inspector,
and whose duty it shall be to decide for the board of directors all
questions of sanitation and health affecting the safety and welfare of
the public schools of the district who shall serve at the board's
pleasure: PROVIDED, That children shall not be required to submit to
vaccination against the will of their parents or guardian.

--- END ---