BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.64.020 and 2005 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The commission shall consist of ((eleven)) fourteen members.
One member shall be a judge selected by and from the court of appeals
judges; ((one)) two members shall be ((a)) judges selected by and from
the superior court judges; one member shall be a judge selected by and
from the limited jurisdiction court judges; ((two)) three members shall
be selected by the state bar association and be admitted to the
practice of law in this state; and ((six)) seven members shall be
nonlawyers appointed by the governor. The term of each member of the
commission shall be four years.
(2) No commission member or alternate who participates in an
investigation or initial proceeding leading to a finding of probable
cause may participate in any further proceedings on that cause,
including a public hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect December 3, 2009, if
the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 31 of the state
Constitution adding members to the judicial conduct commission is
validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the
next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---