BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.112.010 and 2007 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alcohol fuel" means any alcohol made from a product other than
petroleum or natural gas that is used alone or in combination with
gasoline or other petroleum products for use as a fuel in self-propelled motor vehicles.
(2) "Alternative fuel" means all products or energy sources used to
propel motor vehicles, other than conventional gasoline, diesel, or
reformulated gasoline. Alternative fuel includes, but is not limited
to, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas, compressed natural
gas, biodiesel fuel, E85 motor fuel, fuels containing seventy percent
or more by volume of alcohol fuel, fuels that are derived from biomass,
hydrogen fuel, anhydrous ammonia fuel, nonhazardous motor fuel, or
electricity, excluding onboard electric generation.
(3) "Biodiesel fuel" means either of the following: (a) The
monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from plant or animal
matter that meet the registration requirements for fuels and fuel
additives established by the federal environmental protection agency
and standards established by the American society of testing and
materials; or (b) a diesel fuel substitute, produced from nonfossil
renewable resources, that meets the registration requirements for fuels
and fuel additives established by the federal environmental protection
agency and standards established by the American society of testing and
materials.
(4) "Diesel" means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and
diesel fuel dyed in accordance with the regulations in 26 C.F.R. Sec.
48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.
(5) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(6) "E85 motor fuel" means an alternative fuel that is a blend of
ethanol and hydrocarbon of which the ethanol portion is nominally
seventy-five to eighty-five percent denatured fuel ethanol by volume
that complies with the most recent version of American society of
testing and materials specification D 5798.
(7) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the generation
of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state, and any biodiesel fuel.
Motor fuels containing ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base
motor fuel meets the applicable standards before the addition of the
ethanol or (b) the resultant blend meets the applicable standards after
the addition of the ethanol.
(8) "Nonhazardous motor fuel" means any fuel of a type distributed
for use in self-propelled motor vehicles that does not contain a
hazardous liquid as defined in RCW 19.122.020.

--- END ---