BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The public records exemptions accountability
committee, created in 2007, is charged with providing the legislature
annual reports containing recommendations as to whether an existing
exemption should be: Continued; modified; scheduled for a sunset
review at a future date; or terminated. Currently, more than three
hundred exemptions exist in Washington state. While the legislature
fully supports the intent of this committee and no one questions the
importance of promoting a more open and transparent governmental
process, it is also a fundamental component of government to actively
monitor governmental entities and assure efficient use of state
resources and taxpayer dollars.
In 2007, the public records exemptions accountability committee
reviewed only four exemptions and made no recommendations. Instead,
the annual report submitted by the committee was a mere eight pages and
yet specifically noted that "the Committee has requested more staff
time than was originally anticipated" and requested funding from the
2008 legislature to support the committee's work.
In 2008, the committee reviewed forty-three exemptions, four of
which were the same exemptions reviewed in 2007. The committee spent
at least five months reviewing the same thirteen statutes addressing
agricultural exemptions but made only one recommendation on one of the
thirteen statutes. It took the committee six months to review the
exemptions for records relevant to a controversy and attorney-client
privileged records. Ultimately, after holding ten meetings, the
committee made only twelve recommendations, four of which addressed a
single statute and its subsections, and the annual report contained
three separate minority reports. Furthermore, the recommendations
contained within the report can be viewed as, at the very least,
deficient. The single recommendation regarding the agricultural
exemption fails to actually address the exemption itself but rather
makes a recommendation as to the need for a brief description when
other statutes are referenced. Other recommendations are vague and
that, combined with multiple minority reports, provides little to no
guidance to the legislature.
The attorney general has stated that the office has spent over
seven hundred hours of attorney staff time working for the committee,
which translates into a cost of approximately eighty-four thousand
dollars. In 2008, the legislature appropriated eleven thousand dollars
to the office of the attorney general to support the committee's work
in response to its supplemental budget request. Additionally, hundreds
of hours of legislative staff time has been used monitoring and
tracking the work of the committee in order to assist the four
legislative members that serve on the committee.
Based on this information, the legislature finds the committee's
review of exemptions has proven to be unproductive and, given the
economic climate we are currently experiencing, it is an unnecessary
and wasteful expenditure of time and resources. Additionally, the
legislature finds that the committee has not acted efficiently or
effectively in carrying out its mandated charge and has provided, at
most, limited guidance to the legislature. Therefore the legislature
concludes that the continuation of the public records exemptions
accountability committee does not serve the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.140 (Public records exemptions
accountability committee) and 2007 c 198 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---