BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.015 and 1996 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Agricultural structure" means a structure designed and
constructed to house farm implements, hay, grain, poultry, livestock,
or other horticultural products. This structure may not be a place of
human habitation or a place of employment where agricultural products
are processed, treated, or packaged, nor may it be a place used by the
public;
(2) "City" means a city or town;
(((2))) (3) "Multifamily residential building" means common wall
residential buildings that consist of four or fewer units, that do not
exceed two stories in height, that are less than five thousand square
feet in area, and that have a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy
separation between units; and
(((3))) (4) "Temporary growing structure" means a structure that
has the sides and roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar
flexible synthetic material and is used to provide plants with either
frost protection or increased heat retention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
Any permitting fee imposed under this chapter on agricultural
structures may not exceed the lower of the actual cost of
administration or seventy-five dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except for permitting fees for agricultural structures under
section 2 of this act, nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a city,
town, or county of the state from imposing fees different from those
set forth in the state building code.

--- END ---