BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0277 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
"Raffle," as used in this chapter, means a game in which tickets
bearing an individual number are sold for not more than ((twenty-five))
one hundred dollars each or a greater amount as determined by the
commission by rule and in which a prize or prizes are awarded on the
basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons conducting
the game, when the game is conducted by a bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organization, no person other than a bona fide member of the
organization takes any part in the management or operation of the game,
and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person
other than the organization conducting the game.

--- END ---