BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.102 and 2004 c 246 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 67.16 RCW to the
contrary, the licensee shall withhold and shall pay daily to the
commission, in addition to the percentages authorized by RCW 67.16.105,
one percent of the gross receipts of all parimutuel machines at each
race meet which sums shall, at the end of each meet, be paid by the
commission to the licensed owners of those Washington bred only horses
finishing first, second, third, and fourth ((Washington bred only)) at
each meet from which the additional one percent is derived in
accordance with an equitable distribution formula to be promulgated by
the commission prior to the commencement of each race meet: PROVIDED,
That nothing in this section shall apply to race meets which are
nonprofit in nature, are of ten days or less, and have an average daily
handle of less than one hundred twenty thousand dollars.
(2) The additional one percent specified in subsection (1) of this
section shall be deposited by the commission in the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards
account created in RCW 67.16.275. The interest derived from this
account shall be distributed annually on an equal basis to those race
courses at which independent race meets are held which are nonprofit in
nature and are of ten days or less. Prior to receiving a payment under
this subsection, any new race course shall meet the qualifications set
forth in this section for a period of two years. All funds distributed
under this subsection shall be used for the purpose of maintaining and
upgrading the respective racing courses and equine quartering areas of
said nonprofit meets.
(3) The commission shall not permit the licensees to take into
consideration the benefits derived from this section in establishing
purses.
(4) The commission is authorized to pay at the end of the calendar
year one-half of the one percent collected from a new licensee under
subsection (1) of this section for reimbursement of capital
construction of that new licensee's new race track for a period of
fifteen years. This reimbursement does not include interest earned on
that one-half of one percent and such interest shall continue to be
collected and disbursed as provided in RCW 67.16.101 and subsection (1)
of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.16.175 and 2001 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the amounts authorized to be retained in RCW
67.16.170, race meets may retain daily for each authorized day of
racing an additional six percent of the daily gross receipts of all
parimutuel machines from exotic wagers at each race meet.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, of the
amounts retained in subsection (1) of this section, one-sixth shall be
((used)) paid to the commission at the end of the race meet for deposit
in the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus
fund and breeder awards account created in RCW 67.16.275. Such amounts
shall be used by the commission for Washington bred breeder awards, in
accordance with the rules and qualifications adopted by the commission.
(3) Of the amounts retained for breeder awards under subsection (2)
of this section, twenty-five percent shall be retained by a new
licensee for reimbursement of capital construction of the new
licensee's new race track for a period of fifteen years.
(4) As used in this section, "exotic wagers" means any multiple
wager. Exotic wagers are subject to approval of the commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.16.275 and 2004 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners'
bonus fund and breeder awards account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts collected by the commission under RCW
67.16.102(1) and 67.16.175(2) must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only as authorized in RCW
67.16.102 and 67.16.175. Only the secretary of the commission or the
secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c
128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act takes effect August 1,
2009.

--- END ---