BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the vast majority
of off-road vehicle or ORV users in Washington state are law abiding
and conscientious. However, as the population of Washington and the
popularity of recreational ORV use have increased, unauthorized ORV use
on public and private natural resource lands has resulted in
significant natural resource damage.
ORV damage typically involves soil disturbance, erosion, or
rutting, but may also include damage to vegetation or other property.
Stream banks and lakeshores are especially sensitive areas and easily
susceptible to damage. In turn, these riparian areas provide water,
food, and shelter to wildlife.
Therefore, the legislature intends to take steps to minimize
further damage to public and private natural resource lands caused by
unauthorized ORV use while also continuing to maximize outdoor
recreation opportunities.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.117 and 2005 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (2) of this section, no
person under ((thirteen)) eighteen years of age may operate an off-road
vehicle on or across a highway or nonhighway road in this state without
a valid license to operate a motor vehicle issued under chapter 46.20
RCW.
(2) Persons ((under thirteen years of age)) may operate an off-road
vehicle on a nonhighway road designated for off-road vehicle use under
the direct supervision of a person eighteen years of age or older
possessing a valid license to operate a motor vehicle under chapter
46.20 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.210 and 2006 c 212 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowners or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether designated resource, rural,
or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas
or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not limited
to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons
for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking,
bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding of horses or other
animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles,
snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water
sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession
and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or
channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or
allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
(i) A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by
someone other than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial
latent condition and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section
shall not be liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the
condition or use of such an anchor.
(ii) A public or private landowner under subsection (1) of this
section shall not be liable for unintentional injuries resulting from
the condition or use of the land where a person is injured while
operating an off-road vehicle without landowner authorization or
outside of authorized off-road vehicle use areas.
(b) Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and this section limits or expands in
any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance.
(c) Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or other
users is permissive and does not support any claim of adverse
possession.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following are not fees:
(a) A license or permit issued for statewide use under authority of
chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW; and
(b) A daily charge not to exceed twenty dollars per person, per
day, for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined in RCW
46.09.020, or other public facility accessed by a highway, street, or
nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road vehicle use.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.09.170 and 2007 c 522 s 953 and 2007 c 241 s 16 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board
receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities. Prior to expending funds for ORV recreation facilities,
the board must accept applications and fund appropriate projects
submitted by the department of natural resources, the department of
fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation commission to repair or
mitigate for soil erosion or damage to trees, crops, riparian areas, or
other vegetation resulting from off-road vehicle use on lands managed
by these agencies;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii)
of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects
that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining
after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the department of natural resources for planning and
designing consistent off-road vehicle signage at department-managed
recreation sites, and for planning recreation opportunities on
department-managed lands in the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest.
This appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.09.120 and 2006 c 212 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction for any person to operate any nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of one hundred and five decibels on the "A" scale at a distance
of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an acceptable
substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers test
procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) ((On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h))) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel;
(((i))) (h) On any public lands in violation of rules and
regulations of the agency administering such lands; and
(((j))) (i) On a private nonhighway road in violation of RCW
46.09.115(3).
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to:
(a) Operate any nonhighway vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance; or
(b) Operate any nonhighway vehicle on lands not owned by the
operator or owner of the nonhighway vehicle in any area that has not
been authorized for nonhighway vehicle use in such a manner so as to
unreasonably expose the underlying soil; create an erosion condition;
or injure, damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other
vegetation.
(3)(a) Except for an off-road vehicle equipped with seat belts and
roll bars or an enclosed passenger compartment, it is a traffic
infraction for any person to operate or ride an off-road vehicle on a
nonhighway road without wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet fastened securely while in motion. For purposes of this
section, "motorcycle helmet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.37.530.
(b) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on his or her own land.
(c) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on agricultural lands owned or leased by the
off-road vehicle operator or the operator's employer.
(4) It is not a traffic infraction to operate an off-road vehicle
on a street, road, or highway as authorized under RCW 46.09.180.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.09.200 and 2001 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall be enforced by all persons
having the authority to enforce any of the laws of this state,
including, without limitation, officers of the state patrol, county
sheriffs and their deputies, all municipal law enforcement officers
within their respective jurisdictions, fish and wildlife officers,
state park rangers, and those employees of the department of natural
resources designated by the commissioner of public lands under RCW
((43.30.310)) 43.12.065, 76.04.035, and 76.04.045.
(2)(a) A nonhighway vehicle under operation during a violation of
RCW 46.09.120(2)(b) is subject to seizure and forfeiture and no
property right exists in it.
(b) A nonhighway vehicle may be seized by any law enforcement
officer of this state upon process issued by any court having
jurisdiction over the property. Whenever any law enforcement officer
authorized to enforce this chapter has probable cause to believe that
a person is operating any nonhighway vehicle in violation of RCW
46.09.120(1)(g), the officer may seize the nonhighway vehicle without
process.
(c) Proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the
seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure
was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following
the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in
charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest
therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and
intended forfeiture of the seized property. The notice of seizure may
be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including but
not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt requested.
Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the
fifteen-day period following the seizure.
(d) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items specified in (a) of this subsection within forty-five days of the
seizure, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited.
(e) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the seized property within forty-five days of the seizure, the law
enforcement agency shall give the person or persons a reasonable
opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be
before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the
chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing
agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing
shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency
or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW,
except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter
to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal may only be accomplished
according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal
of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political
subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any
other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020,
within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified
the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership
or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed
shall be the district court when the aggregate value of the property is
within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing
before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title
34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
property involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment
for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. The burden of producing
evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or
the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the
property. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
property to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law
judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is
lawfully entitled to possession of the property.
(f) When property is forfeited under this chapter, the seizing law
enforcement agency may:
(i) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release such property to such agency
for the exclusive use for law enforcement purposes; or
(ii) Sell the property and use moneys received exclusively for the
expansion and improvement of law enforcement activity. Money retained
under this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding
sources.

--- END ---