BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.070 and 2004 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for annual or temporary ORV use permits shall be
made to the department or its authorized agent in such manner and upon
such forms as the department shall prescribe and shall state the name
and address of each owner of the off-road vehicle.
(2) An application for an annual permit shall be signed by at least
one owner, and shall be accompanied by a fee of eighteen dollars. Upon
receipt of the annual permit application and the application fee, the
off-road vehicle shall be assigned a use permit number ((tag or)) decal
and tab, which shall be affixed to the off-road vehicle in a manner
prescribed by the department. The annual permit is valid for a period
of one year and is renewable each year in such manner as the department
may prescribe for an additional period of one year upon payment of a
renewal fee of eighteen dollars.
Any person acquiring an off-road vehicle for which an annual permit
has been issued who desires to continue to use the permit must, within
fifteen days of the acquisition of the off-road vehicle, make
application to the department or its authorized agent for transfer of
the permit, and the application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee
of five dollars.
(3) A temporary use permit is valid for sixty days. Application
for a temporary permit shall be accompanied by a fee of seven dollars.
The permit shall be carried on the vehicle at all times during its
operation in the state.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 46.09.050, any out-of-state operator
of an off-road vehicle shall, when operating in this state, comply with
this chapter, and if an ORV use permit is required under this chapter,
the operator shall obtain an annual or temporary permit ((and tag)).
(5) The use permit decal required by this section must be
approximately four inches by seven inches in size and display the decal
number in as large of font as may be accommodated on the decal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---