BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The inspection or copying of any nonexempt public record by
persons serving criminal sentences in state, local, or privately
operated correctional facilities may be enjoined if, upon motion by an
agency or its representative or a person named in the record or to whom
the request specifically pertains, or his or her representative, the
superior court for the county in which the movant resides or in which
the record is maintained, finds that the request was made to harass or
intimidate the agency, its employees, or any person, or that disclosure
of the record would likely threaten the security of correctional
facilities, the safety or security of staff, inmates, or others, or the
deterrence of criminal activity.
(2) In deciding whether to enjoin a request under subsection (1) of
this section, the court may consider all relevant factors, including,
but not limited to: Other requests by the requestor; the type of
record or records sought; statements offered by the requestor
concerning the purpose for the request; whether disclosure of the
requested records would likely harm any person or vital government
interest; whether the request seeks a significant and burdensome number
of documents; and the impact of disclosure on correctional facility
security and order, the safety or security of correctional facility
staff, inmates, or others, and the deterrence of criminal activity.
(3) The motion proceeding described in this section shall be a
summary proceeding based on affidavits or declarations, unless the
court orders otherwise. Upon a showing by a preponderance of the
evidence, the court may enjoin all or any part of the request or
requests, and may enjoin future requests by the same requestor, or by
an entity owned or controlled in whole or in part by the same
requestor, for such period as the court deems reasonable. An agency
shall not be liable for penalties under RCW 42.56.550(4) for any period
during which an order under this section is in effect, including during
an appeal of an order under this section, regardless of the outcome of
the appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---