BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.010 and 2008 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The number of district judges to be elected in each county shall
be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton, three; Chelan, two; Clallam, two;
Clark, six; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, three; Douglas, one; Ferry, one;
Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, two; Grays Harbor, two; Island,
one; Jefferson, one; King, ((twenty-one)) twenty-three in 2009, twenty-five in 2010, and twenty-six in 2011; Kitsap, four; Kittitas, two;
Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one; Okanogan, two;
Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San Juan, one; Skagit,
two; Skamania, one; Snohomish, eight; Spokane, ((ten)) eight; Stevens,
one; Thurston, three; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two; Whatcom, two;
Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be increased only as
provided in RCW 3.34.020.

--- END ---