BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing documents may not prohibit the installation of a
solar energy panel by an owner or resident on the owner's or resident's
property as long as the solar energy panel:
(a) Meets applicable health and safety standards and requirements
imposed by state and local permitting authorities;
(b) If used to heat water, is certified by the solar rating
certification corporation or another nationally recognized
certification agency. Certification must be for the solar energy panel
and for installation; and
(c) If used to produce electricity, meets all applicable safety and
performance standards established by the national electric code, the
institute of electrical and electronics engineers, accredited testing
laboratories, such as underwriters laboratories, and, where applicable,
rules of the utilities and transportation commission regarding safety
and reliability.
(2) The governing documents may:
(a) Prohibit the visibility of any part of a roof-mounted solar
energy panel above the roof line;
(b) Permit the attachment of a solar energy panel to the slope of
a roof facing a street only if:
(i) The solar energy panel conforms to the slope of the roof; and
(ii) The top edge of the solar energy panel is parallel to the roof
ridge; or
(c) Require:
(i) A solar energy panel frame, a support bracket, or any visible
piping or wiring to be painted to coordinate with the roofing material;
(ii) An owner or resident to shield a ground-mounted solar energy
panel if shielding the panel does not prohibit economic installation of
the solar energy panel or degrade the operational performance quality
of the solar energy panel by more than ten percent; or
(iii) Owners or residents who install solar energy panels to
indemnify or reimburse the association or its members for loss or
damage caused by the installation, maintenance, or use of a solar
energy panel.
(3) The governing documents may include other reasonable rules
regarding the placement and manner of a solar energy panel.
(4) For purposes of this section, "solar energy panel" means a
panel device or system or combination of panel devices or systems that
relies on direct sunlight as an energy source, including a panel device
or system or combination of panel devices or systems that collects
sunlight for use in:
(a) The heating or cooling of a structure or building;
(b) The heating or pumping of water;
(c) Industrial, commercial, or agricultural processes; or
(d) The generation of electricity.
(5) This section does not apply to common areas as defined in RCW
64.38.010.
(6) This section applies retroactively to a governing document in
effect on the effective date of this section. A provision in a
governing document in effect on the effective date of this section that
is inconsistent with this section is void and unenforceable.

--- END ---