BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.030 and 2007 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Biomass energy" includes (a) organic byproducts of the pulping
process; (b) animal waste; (c) solid organic fuels from wood; (d)
forest or field residues; (e) wooden demolition or construction debris;
(f) food waste that is decomposed in an anaerobic digester; (g) black
liquors derived from algae; or (h) dedicated energy crops. "Biomass"
does not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth forests; or municipal solid waste.
(4) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(((4))) (5) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(((5))) (6) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(((6))) (7) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(((7))) (8) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases
electricity for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(((8))) (9) "Department" means the department of community, trade,
and economic development or its successor.
(((9))) (10) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable
resource where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of
such facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five
megawatts.
(((10))) (11) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, ((1999)) 1995, ((where: (i) The)) when the facility is located
((in the Pacific Northwest; or (ii) the electricity from the facility
is delivered into Washington state on a real-time basis without
shaping, storage, or integration services)) within the geographic
jurisdiction of the western electricity coordinating council or its
successor; ((or))
(b) ((Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments)) Electricity from a hydroelectric generation facility
powered by fresh water where: (i) The facility is located in the
Pacific Northwest; and (ii) electricity from the facility, including
electricity from projects or utilities of any size, meets the
definition of "renewable resources" under RCW 19.29A.010; or
(c) Electricity from a generation facility located in the Pacific
Northwest that commenced operation before March 31, 1999, and is
powered by biomass energy.
(((11))) (12) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 19.29A.010.
(((12))) (13) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of
electricity delivered in the most recently completed year by a
qualifying utility to its Washington retail customers.
(((13))) (14) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally
related characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and
other electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(((14))) (15) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined
for the Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific
Northwest electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698;
16 U.S.C. Sec. 839a).
(((15))) (16) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 39.35C.010.
(((16))) (17) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as
the term "electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves
more than twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington.
The number of customers served may be based on data reported by a
utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the
energy information administration, United States department of energy.
(((17))) (18) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable
certificate of proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible
renewable resource where the generation facility is ((not powered by
fresh water,)) a renewable resource, regardless of its geographic
location, and the certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes
associated with that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the
certificate is verified by a renewable energy credit tracking system
selected by the department.
(((18))) (19) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c)
solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean,
or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; and (i) biomass energy
((based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black
liquor byproduct from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iv) municipal solid waste)).
(((19))) (20) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other
entity of Washington state government to carry out the intent and
purposes of this chapter.
(((20))) (21) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing
January 1st and ending December 31st.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall (i) use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits((,)); (ii)
make alternative compliance payments; or ((a)) (iii) use any
combination of ((both,)) the options listed in (a)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection to meet the following annual targets:
(((i))) (A) At least three percent of its load ((by)) as measured
on January 1, 2012, by December 31, 2012, and each year thereafter
through December 31, 2015;
(((ii))) (B) At least nine percent of its load ((by)) as measured
on January 1, 2016, by December 31, 2016, and each year thereafter
through December 31, 2019; and
(((iii))) (C) At least fifteen percent of its load ((by)) as
measured on January 1, 2020, by December 31, 2020, and each year
thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years. A qualifying utility
shall deduct from its annual load the amount of electricity or
renewable energy credits it has obtained for and used in an optional
pricing program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section. Renewable energy
credits may be traded, sold, or otherwise transferred. Renewable
energy credits that are not used by a qualifying utility to comply with
the requirements of (a) of this subsection in any given year may be
banked and carried forward indefinitely. Banked renewable energy
credits with the oldest issuance date must be used to comply with the
annual target before banked renewable energy credits with more recent
issuance dates are used. A qualifying utility must demonstrate that a
renewable energy credit used to comply with the requirements of (a) of
this subsection is derived from an eligible renewable resource and that
the qualifying utility has not used, traded, sold, or otherwise
transferred the credit. A qualifying utility that uses a renewable
energy credit to comply with a renewable energy standard imposed by any
other state may not use the same credit to comply with the requirements
of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count((:
(i))) eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate
entity((; or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090)).
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located ((in the Pacific Northwest where)) within
the geographic jurisdiction of the western electricity coordinating
council or its successor and the cofiring commenced after March 31,
((1999)) 1995, the unit shall be considered to produce eligible
renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of the total
heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(j) A qualifying utility is not required to comply with the targets
established in (a) of this subsection to the extent that compliance
would require the utility to substitute eligible renewable resources
for electricity derived from any renewable resource owned by or
contracted to the utility as of the effective date of this section.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall establish an alternative compliance rate
for each compliance year for each electrical company subject to the
requirements of RCW 19.285.040(2). The rate shall be expressed in
dollars per megawatt-hour.
(2) The commission shall establish an alternative compliance rate
based on the cost of qualifying electricity, contracts that the
electrical company has acquired for future delivery of qualifying
electricity, and the number of renewable energy credits that the
company anticipates using in the compliance year to meet the annual
target under RCW 19.285.040(2)(a). The commission shall also consider
any determinations made under RCW 19.285.070 in reviewing the reports
made by the electrical company for the previous compliance year. In
establishing an alternative compliance rate, the commission shall set
the rate to provide adequate incentive for the electrical company to
purchase or generate qualifying electricity in lieu of using
alternative compliance payments to meet the requirements of RCW
19.285.040(2).
(3) An electrical company may elect to use, or may be required by
the commission to use, alternative compliance payments to comply with
the requirements of RCW 19.285.040. Any election by an electrical
company to use alternative compliance payments is subject to review by
the commission. An electrical company may not be required to make
alternative compliance payments that would result in the company
exceeding the cost cap established in RCW 19.285.050.
(4) The commission shall determine for each electrical company the
extent to which alternative compliance payments may be recovered in the
rates of the company. Each electrical company shall deposit any
amounts recovered in the rates of the company for alternative
compliance payments in a holding account established by the company.
Amounts in the holding account accrue interest at the rate authorized
by the commission for the electrical company.
(5) Amounts in holding accounts established under subsection (4) of
this section may be expended by an electrical company only for the
costs of acquiring new generating capacity from eligible renewable
resources, investments in efficiency upgrades to electricity generating
facilities owned by the company, and energy conservation programs
within the company's service area. The commission must approve
expenditures by an electrical company from a holding account
established under subsection (4) of this section. Amounts that are
collected from customers and spent by an electrical company under this
subsection may not be included in the company's rate base.
(6) The commission shall establish initial alternative compliance
rates as required under this section by July 1, 2010.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Eligible renewable resource" has the same meaning as defined
in RCW 19.285.030.
(b) "Qualifying electricity" means electricity produced from an
eligible renewable resource.

--- END ---