BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that climate
change poses a significant threat to Washington's economy, the health
and welfare of its population, and its natural resources. Washington's
water supply and natural resources are particularly vulnerable to
temperature changes and shifts in precipitation patterns and could
suffer devastating consequences if adaptive measures are not taken.
Even with effective mitigation of climate changing activities, the
region will experience inevitable impacts from climate change.
(2) The science and information on the effects and impacts of
climate change is continually improving and this scientific information
provides the basis for planning and developing preparation and
adaptation actions for climate change to ensure the economic, health,
safety, and environmental well-being of the state and its citizens. It
is in the public interest for the state to address the effects of
climate change and to be able to plan for future climate change
impacts. These impacts will affect individuals, public and private
businesses, state and local agencies, as well as natural resources and
the environment.
(3) It is the purpose of this chapter to create an integrated
climate change response strategy with prioritized and coordinated
climate change preparation and adaptation actions that state and local
agencies, public and private businesses, tribes, and individuals can
use to plan and prepare for the impacts of climate change through a
collaborative process of on-going research, analysis, collection, and
distribution of data and information.
(4) The legislature recognizes that the effort required to assess,
gather, and compile information and data to develop adaptation and
preparation activities for an integrated climate change response
strategy will take significant resources and time. The legislature
also recognizes that the departments of ecology, fish and wildlife,
natural resources, and transportation are uniquely positioned to
address many of these issues given the mission of their respective
agencies. Therefore, in an effort to reduce costs and streamline the
process while achieving the goals of this chapter, the legislature
designates the departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, natural
resources, and transportation as leaders in assessing and gathering the
necessary information and data to develop a comprehensive, integrated,
and coordinated climate change adaptation strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The departments of ecology, fish and
wildlife, natural resources, and transportation shall develop an
integrated climate change response strategy to better enable state and
local agencies, public and private businesses, nongovernmental
organizations, and individuals to prepare for, address, and adapt to
the impacts of climate change.
(2) The department of ecology shall serve as a central
clearinghouse for relevant scientific and technical information about
the impacts of climate change on Washington state's ecology, economy,
and society, as well as serve as a central convener for the development
of vital programs and necessary policies to help the state adapt to a
rapidly changing climate.
(3) The department of ecology shall consult and collaborate with
the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and
transportation in developing an integrated climate change response
strategy and plans of actions to prepare for and adapt to climate
change impacts.
(4) The department of fish and wildlife shall focus on issues
relating to biodiversity, resiliency, and vulnerability of the natural
environment, and other areas as requested by the department of ecology.
(5) The department of natural resources shall focus on the
vulnerability and resiliency of forests, forest fires, and forest
health.
(6) The department of transportation shall focus on gathering and
assessing information relating to infrastructure projects,
vulnerability of the built environment, and other concerns, as
requested by the department of ecology.
However, the department of transportation's obligations under this
section are subject to availability of amounts appropriated for the
specific purpose identified in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The departments of ecology, fish and
wildlife, natural resources, and transportation may seek assistance
from a science advisory group.
(2) The departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, natural
resources, and transportation may consult with other state, federal,
and local agencies that have expertise in matters relating to climate
change, or information and data regarding impacts from climate change,
as necessary to develop an integrated climate change response strategy.
(3) The departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, natural
resources, and transportation shall, to the extent possible, use
teleconferencing for meetings and electronic messaging for gathering
data and information to reduce meeting and travel expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The integrated climate change response
strategy shall include recommendations conveyed and communicated so
that policymakers, public and private businesses, and individuals can
easily understand and recognize the implications of the climate change
response strategy. The integrated climate change response strategy
should address the impact of and adaptation to climate change, as well
as the regional capacity to undertake actions, existing ecosystem and
resource management concerns, and health and economic risks. In
addition, the departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, natural
resources, and transportation should include a range of scenarios for
the purposes of planning in order to assess project vulnerability and,
to the extent feasible, reduce expected risks and increase resiliency
to the impacts of climate change.
(2) The integrated climate change response strategy must include
climate change preparation and adaptation actions that ensure
collaborative and cooperative activities.
(a) By December 1, 2011, the department of ecology shall compile an
initial climate change response strategy, including information and
data from the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and
transportation that: Summarizes the best known science on climate
change impacts to Washington; assesses Washington's vulnerability to
the identified climate change impacts; prioritizes solutions that can
be implemented within and across state agencies; and identifies
recommended funding mechanisms and technical and other essential
resources for implementing solutions.
(b) The initial strategy must include:
(i) Efforts to identify priority planning areas for action, based
on vulnerability and risk assessments;
(ii) Barriers challenging state and local governments to take
action, such as laws, policies, regulations, rules, and procedures that
require revision to adequately address adaptation to climate change;
(iii) Opportunities to integrate climate science and projected
impacts into planning and decision making; and
(iv) Methods to increase public awareness of climate change, its
projected impacts on the community, and to build support for meaningful
adaptation policies and strategies.
(c) The department of ecology shall, in collaboration with the
departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and
transportation, complete an initial climate impacts assessment report
that includes the status of the integrated climate change response
strategy and provide it to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2012.
(3) By December 1, 2013, the department of ecology, in
collaboration with the departments of fish and wildlife, natural
resources, and transportation, must complete an integrated climate
change response strategy, which must include:
(a) Adaptation plans of action to address:
(i) Water resources;
(ii) Ocean and coastal resources;
(iii) Infrastructure requirements;
(iv) Biodiversity;
(v) Public health risks and consequences; and
(vi) Working landscapes, such as forest and agricultural lands.
(b) Information about the latest research and projects, such as:
(i) Risk assessment models and data, including evaluations of the
consequences, magnitude, and probability of climate change impacts;
(ii) Comprehensive impact assessments that examine how climate
change is likely to affect the natural environment and physical
infrastructure, as well as the economic impacts on municipal and rural
operations; and
(iii) Methods to strengthen community partnerships that reduce
vulnerabilities and risks to climate change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The science advisory group shall provide
independent, nonrepresentational scientific advice to the department of
ecology. The science advisory group members shall assist the
department of ecology in: (a) Identifying the timing and extent of
impacts from climate change; (b) assessing the effects of climate
variability and change in the context of multiple interacting stressors
or impacts; (c) developing forecasting models; (d) determining the
resilience of the environment, natural systems, communities, and
organizations to deal with potential or actual impacts of climate
change and the vulnerability to which a natural or social system is
susceptible to sustaining damage from climate change impacts; and (e)
identifying other issues, as determined by the department of ecology,
necessary to develop policies and actions for the integrated climate
change response strategy.
(2) The chair of the science advisory group must be a scientist
with recognized expertise in a field or fields of science essential to
preparing for and adapting to climate change. The chair serves for a
term of three years. The chair shall: (a) Select experts from
scientific disciplines as needed to assist the department of ecology
with developing an integrated climate change response strategy; and (b)
coordinate the science advisory group activities to ensure the
priorities and goals of the department of ecology are met.
(3) The governor or the governor's designee shall appoint the chair
of the science advisory group or appoint a successor to assume the
duties of the chair after the initial term.
(4) In establishing the science advisory group, the department of
ecology shall request that the Washington academy of sciences provide
a list of candidates to the chair of the science advisory group. The
list of candidates should reflect the full range of scientific
disciplines involved in climate change, including scientists associated
with federal, state, and local agencies, tribes, business and
environmental communities, colleges, and university communities. The
chair of the science advisory group may also seek advice from the
scientific community to develop membership for the science advisory
group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 State agencies shall strive to incorporate
adaptation plans of action as priority activities when planning or
designing agency policies and programs. Agencies shall consider: The
integrated climate change response strategy when designing, planning,
and funding infrastructure projects; and incorporating natural resource
adaptation actions and alternative energy sources when designing and
planning infrastructure projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---