BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state employees
travel on airlines as part of their employment and that extended
exposure to nonergonomic airline seats presents a health and safety
risk to state employees. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide
for employees who are engaged in job-related travel the same healthy
and safe environment that exists in the workplace.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
When soliciting bids for discount air travel pursuant to this
chapter, the department of general administration shall include in the
solicitation a provision requiring airlines to provide seats for
employees that meet current health and safety standards as established
by the department of labor and industries on all flights reasonably
expected to be longer than two hours. The solicitation shall also
include a provision requiring a discounted ticket price when the
airline is unable to provide a seat for the employee that meets current
health and safety standards.

--- END ---