BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Hundreds of thousands of patients in Washington need
interpretation and translation services to understand medical
instructions and diagnoses and to communicate clearly with their health
care providers. For them, interpretation and translation are essential
to assuring that they receive the high quality health care called for
by the state's blue ribbon commission. The health care system in the
state is not currently meeting the needs of these patients, largely
because of unanswered questions about how to fund needed language
services. Studies document that limited English speakers are less
likely to have a regular primary care provider or receive preventative
care, and more likely to experience medical errors, all of which lead
to negative health outcomes and higher long-term costs to the health
care system. Furthermore, language barriers impede informed consent
for treatment and surgical procedures, leaving health care
organizations and providers vulnerable to potentially costly lawsuits.
(2) According to the 2005 American community survey, four hundred
fifty-four thousand Washington residents speak English less than very
well. Title VI of the civil rights act of 1964 and executive orders
issued by President Clinton and President Bush establish the
requirement that health care providers who serve patients in federally
funded programs must provide language access services to all patients
with limited English proficiency. Nevertheless, most health care
providers lack systems and financial resources to provide these
services. In a 2006 national survey of hospitals, forty-eight percent
cited cost and reimbursement concerns as a primary barrier to providing
language access services. In Washington state, medicaid and the state
children's health insurance program provide interpretation and
translation services. Many private insurers and the Washington basic
health plan do not. Quality language services lead to better health
outcomes and long-term cost savings to the health care system, and the
private and public sectors should share the responsibility of covering
the cost of these vital services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Dual-role interpreter" means a bilingual staff person who is
used to interpret but whose primary work is not interpreting.
(2) "Interpretation" is the process of, or activity involved in,
transferring a message orally from one language to another in real time
and in a culturally appropriate manner. For the purposes of this act,
interpretation includes the process of, or activity involved in,
transferring a message to and from the visually impaired or hearing
impaired.
(3) "Interpretation services" means the interpretation provided for
patients, enrollees, enrolled participants, insured individuals, and
their guardians or caregivers, with limited English proficiency, to
enable them to have accurate and adequate communications with clinical
health care providers and with contract representatives or
administrators responsible for billing and claims services.
Interpretation services must be provided by interpreters who are
certified or authorized in accordance with the standards established in
section 7 of this act. Certified or authorized interpreters may
include staff interpreters, contracted in-person interpreters,
contracted phone or video-conference interpreters, and dual-role
interpreters.
(4) "Limited English proficient" patients, enrollees, enrolled
participants, insured individuals, and their guardians or caregivers
are those who identify themselves, or who are identified by clinical
providers, contract representatives, or administrators, as having an
inability or a limited ability to speak, read, write, or understand the
English language at a level that permits them to interact effectively
with health care providers. For the purposes of this act, limited
English proficient includes the visually impaired and the hearing
impaired.
(5) "Translation" is the process of or activity involved in
transferring a written message from one language to another.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.060 and 2007 c 259 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-
child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
subsidized enrollees under RCW 70.47.020(6)(b). Premiums due for
foster parents with gross family income up to two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall be set at the minimum premium amount
charged to enrollees with income below sixty-five percent of the
federal poverty level. Premiums due for foster parents with gross
family income between two hundred percent and three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall not exceed one hundred dollars per
month.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(d) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(e) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(f) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(6) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program.
(7) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(8) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(9) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees,
deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records
of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the respective managed health care systems.
(11) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, to give priority to members of the Washington national guard
and reserves who served in Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Iraqi
Freedom, or Operation Noble Eagle, and their spouses and dependents,
for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan, to establish
appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be
necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale
premiums. Funds received by a family as part of participation in the
adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100
through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward a family's current gross
family income for the purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails
to report income or income changes accurately, the administrator shall
have the authority either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid
by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent
of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly
reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define the
appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to
implement the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available
resources. No subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose
current gross family income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or,
subject to RCW 70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or
medical care services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of
enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good cause, the
administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that are
applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll
in the plan.
(12) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(13) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(14) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.
(15) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent
with state and federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of
such coverage in the state.
(16) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and
to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(17) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(18) In consultation with appropriate state and local government
agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for persons
confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(19) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington
state health insurance pool.
(20) To give priority in enrollment to persons who disenrolled from
the program in order to enroll in medicaid, and subsequently became
ineligible for medicaid coverage.
The Washington basic health plan shall provide interpretation
services, as defined in section 2 of this act, to limited English
proficient enrollees. Enrollees are not subject to additional premium
charges, copayments, deductibles, or other cost sharing associated with
the interpretation services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
All health care service contractors that provide coverage for
health care services shall provide interpretation services or shall
reimburse clinical health care providers, contract representatives, or
administrators that are responsible for billing and claims services for
providing interpretation services, as defined in section 2 of this act,
to limited English proficient enrolled participants. Enrolled
participants are not subject to additional premium charges, copayments,
deductibles, or other cost sharing associated with the interpretation
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
All health maintenance organizations that provide coverage for
health care services shall provide interpretation services or shall
reimburse clinical health care providers, contract representatives, or
administrators that are responsible for billing and claims services for
providing interpretation services, as defined in section 2 of this act,
to limited English proficient enrolled participants. Enrolled
participants are not subject to additional premium charges, copayments,
deductibles, or other cost sharing associated with the interpretation
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
For all disability insurance contracts that provide hospital and
medical expenses and health care services, insurers shall provide
interpretation services or shall reimburse clinical health care
providers, contract representatives, or administrators that are
responsible for billing and claims services for providing
interpretation services, as defined in section 2 of this act, to
limited English proficient insured individuals. Insured individuals
are not subject to additional premiums, copayments, deductibles, or
other cost sharing associated with the interpretation services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A working group on language access in health
care is hereby established in the department of health with the
following members: A representative of the department of social and
health services, a representative of the office of the insurance
commissioner, a representative of the health care authority, and a
representative of the department of labor and industries. In addition,
the governor shall appoint two health care interpreters, a hospital
representative, a representative of community clinics, a representative
of community health centers, a physician, a pharmacist, two consumers
of interpretation services, and two consumer advocates to serve in the
working group. The secretary of the department of health, or the
secretary's designee, shall chair the working group. The working group
shall review and make recommendations regarding standards for
interpreter certification and authorization to be used in this act.
The working group must include in its analysis the potential impact of
new standards on ensuring an adequate supply of interpreters,
particularly in rural areas of the state. The working group must also
devise a plan for increasing the number of interpreters who meet the
new standards, and make a recommendation as to whether the state should
provide or subsidize training for interpreters to help them meet the
new standards. The working group report shall be issued no later than
January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Based on the recommendations of the working group established in
section 7 of this act, on or before July 31, 2010, the health care
authority must adopt rules governing the certification and
authorization of health care interpreters to be used in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The insurance commissioner shall conduct a
study of language issues that affect consumers who purchase health
insurance contracts in the state of Washington. Such study shall
include an analysis and recommendations regarding:
(1) Barriers that language access problems pose for understanding
insurance contracts and costs, and resolving disputes between consumers
and health insurers;
(2) Whether insurers are in compliance with RCW 48.43.510 and
whether more detailed requirements should be added to the
administrative rules to assure such compliance; and
(3) The necessity for, and feasibility of, the office of the
insurance commissioner providing interpretation and translation
services regarding health insurance, consumer advice, and dispute
resolution assistance in languages that they speak and understand. The
results of this analysis and associated recommendations shall be
reported to the governor and the legislature no later than January 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The insurance commissioner shall adopt rules for the implementation
of sections 4, 5, and 6 of this act and rules governing the
authorization of health care interpreters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Sections 4 through 6 of this act take
effect January 1, 2011.
(2) Section 3 of this act takes effect when funds are appropriated
for its implementation.

--- END ---