BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state has invested significantly in
juvenile offender programs identified by the Washington state institute
for public policy as having a positive cost-benefit ratio for taxpayers
as the result of reductions in recidivism. Some of these programs
demonstrate increased rates of success for juvenile offenders when his
or her family appropriately participates in the needed programming.
Parents may be more likely to participate if participation does not
result in a financial burden. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to increase incentives for appropriate and successful
participation in evidence-based juvenile offender programs in order to
further reduce juvenile offender recidivism, reduce crime, and increase
fiscal benefits to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this
purpose, the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation services administration shall establish a pilot program
to promote increased participation and success in juvenile offender
evidence-based programs for juveniles under the jurisdiction of a
county or the department, and their families.
(2) The pilot program shall provide that a person who is a parent
of a juvenile, legal guardian, or other person acting in that role for
the purposes of the treatment program shall receive an incentive for
consenting to and participating in good faith in a program recommended
by the department as appropriate for participation by the child and the
person, such as transportation support, child care costs, or a small
monetary incentive in order to defray costs of participation in
treatment. The incentive is intended to motivate program participation
and performance, reinforce successful program completion, and mitigate
the costs of participation. The structure, amount, and disbursement of
incentives shall be determined by the department in consultation with
the University of Washington school of medicine's department of
psychiatry and behavioral sciences division of public behavioral health
and justice and the evidence-based program model developers.
(3) The department, after consulting with the University of
Washington, shall select and contract with one or more counties to
serve as pilot sites. To be eligible, a county must have imposed the
sales and use tax authorized by RCW 82.14.460. In selecting the two
pilot sites, the department shall endeavor to site one in an urban and
one in a rural county. The participating juvenile offenders may
include juvenile offenders residing in a county that has a pilot site,
who are under the jurisdiction of either the county or state.
(4) The department shall determine financial guidelines for
participation in the pilot program and guidelines for administration of
the pilot program in consultation with the University of Washington
school of medicine's department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences
division of public behavioral health and justice in development of the
guidelines and policies.
(5) The pilot program shall be limited to evidence-based programs
identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its
October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce
Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates"
which have been identified as having a positive benefit-cost ratio,
such as functional family therapy, multisystemic therapy, family
integrated transitions, and trauma-focused cognitive behavior therapy.
(6) The pilot program shall be operational by March 1, 2010.
(7) The department shall contract with the University of Washington
to provide support and assistance in all phases of the pilot program,
including initiating, implementing, training providers, providing
quality assurance, and monitoring implementation.
(8) The department, in cooperation with the University of
Washington, shall evaluate the results of the pilot program, including
whether there is any increase in juvenile or family participation in
the programs identified in subsection (5) of this section, any increase
in successful completion of services by the juvenile and his or her
family or legal guardian or custodian, and any reduction in recidivism
for a juvenile participating in the pilot program. The department and
the University of Washington shall provide a preliminary report to the
governor and the legislature on the results of the pilot program by
December 1, 2011, and a final report by December 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires June 30, 2014.

--- END ---