BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the policy of the state of Washington
to encourage and contribute to the rehabilitation of felons and to
assist them in the assumption of the responsibilities of citizenship.
The legislature recognizes that realistic opportunities for meaningful
and profitable employment are an essential ingredient to this goal.
Occupations that require a license, permit, certificate, or
registration to engage in an occupation should not be foreclosed from
individuals with a criminal conviction solely on the basis of the
conviction. Rather, limitations should be narrowly tailored to meet
the requirements of public safety while providing the individual with
every opportunity for sustainable employment.
Further, individuals with criminal convictions should be able to
pursue training or educational opportunities with some certainty that
they will be able to realize the end goal of obtaining employment in a
chosen field. Whenever possible, licensing entities should provide
guidance to those individuals as to those crimes or categories of
crimes that may prevent the person from attaining a license, and
positive steps that may assist the person in obtaining a license
despite a criminal conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In determining whether a criminal conviction
relates to the practice of a person's profession or operation of the
person's business, the disciplinary authority shall consider:
(1) The nature and seriousness of the crime;
(2) The relationship of the crime to the purposes for requiring a
license to engage in the occupation;
(3) The extent to which a license might offer an opportunity to
engage in further criminal activity of the same type as that in which
the person previously had been involved; and
(4) The relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, or
fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the
responsibilities of the licensed profession or business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director of the department of
licensing or the director's designee, shall, within existing resources,
review and recommend changes to the law and policies relating to
licenses regulated by the uniform regulation of business and
professions act to encourage the employment of individuals with
criminal convictions while ensuring the safety of the public.
(2) In conducting the review, the director shall:
(a) Consult with the employment security department, the department
of corrections, victim service agencies, the state board for community
and technical colleges, and nonprofit organizations providing workforce
training to released offenders;
(b) Require each disciplinary authority to specifically identify:
(i) Those crimes or categories of crimes that relate to the
practice of a profession or business for which the license is required,
utilizing the criteria set forth in section 2 of this act;
(ii) The reasons a particular crime or category of crimes is
considered to relate to a particular license; and
(iii) Any mitigating activities or circumstances that may assist a
convicted person in obtaining a license notwithstanding a related
criminal conviction;
(c) Review the information provided by the disciplinary authorities
to ensure that the identified crimes are narrowly tailored to meet the
purposes of this act and provide the greatest possible opportunity for
convicted persons to obtain employment.
(3) The director shall present a report of its findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature, including any proposed legislation, by December 1, 2009.
(4) This section expires on January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By December 1, 2009, the director shall
compile and thereafter maintain a guide to assist individuals with
criminal convictions in identifying potential avenues of employment.
The guide must include:
(1) The crimes or categories of crimes that relate to the practice
of a profession or business for each license type;
(2) Any known federal rules that may prevent a convicted person
from obtaining employment in that area;
(3) An indication, if known, of whether local ordinances may
prevent a convicted person from obtaining employment in that area; and
(4) Mitigating activities or circumstances that may assist a
convicted person in obtaining a license notwithstanding a related
criminal conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 4 of this act are each added
to chapter 18.235 RCW.

--- END ---