BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.82.090 and 2004 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
financial obligations imposed in a judgment shall bear interest as
follows:
(i) If the sentence of the offender does not include a period of
total confinement, financial obligations imposed in a judgment shall
bear interest from the date of the judgment until payment, at the rate
applicable to civil judgments.
(ii) If the sentence of the offender includes a period of total
confinement:
(A) Financial obligations imposed in a judgment related to
restitution shall bear interest from the date of the judgment until
payment, at the rate applicable to civil judgments; and
(B) Financial obligations related to costs, fines, and other
assessments, other than restitution, shall bear interest from the date
of the offender's release from total confinement until payment, at the
rate applicable to civil judgments. For the purposes of calculating
interest on these financial obligations, upon release from total
confinement on the conviction giving rise to the financial obligations,
the department of corrections or the county jail shall notify the clerk
of the county in which the conviction occurred.
(b) All nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be
split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the
public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five
percent to the county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to
the county current expense fund to fund local courts.
(2) The court may, on motion by the offender, following the
offender's release from total confinement, reduce or waive the interest
on legal financial obligations levied as a result of a criminal
conviction. The court may reduce or waive the interest only as an
incentive for the offender to meet his or her legal financial
obligations. The court may not waive the interest on the restitution
portion of the legal financial obligation and may only reduce the
interest on the restitution portion of the legal financial obligation
if the principal of the restitution has been paid in full. The
offender must show that he or she has personally made a good faith
effort to pay, that the interest accrual is causing a significant
hardship, and that he or she will be unable to pay the principal and
interest in full and that reduction or waiver of the interest will
likely enable the offender to pay the full principal and any remaining
interest thereon. For purposes of this section, "good faith effort"
means that the offender has either (a) paid the principal amount in
full; or (b) made twenty-four consecutive monthly payments, excluding
any payments mandatorily deducted by the department of corrections, on
his or her legal financial obligations under his or her payment
agreement with the court. The court may grant the motion, establish a
payment schedule, and retain jurisdiction over the offender for
purposes of reviewing and revising the reduction or waiver of interest.
This section applies to persons convicted as adults or in juvenile
court.

--- END ---