BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The Pacific Northwest has unique geologic features that include
significant geothermal resources;
(b) Other states and provinces in the region are actively exploring
and developing geothermal resources to produce electric power and
concentrated heating with varied applications;
(c) Existing information and analysis concerning geothermal
resources is insufficient; and
(d) Advances in technology, higher energy prices, and concerns
regarding use of high-carbon energy sources have raised public and
private sector interest in developing the state's geothermal resources.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to authorize the department
of natural resources to conduct an initial assessment of the state's
geothermal resources and to make recommendations regarding development
of these resources, in an environmentally responsible manner, for
electric generation and concentrated heating purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of natural resources
shall conduct an initial assessment of geothermal resources in the
state.
(2) The initial assessment must include:
(a) A summary of existing information regarding the state's
geothermal resources;
(b) An estimate of the number of geothermal resources to be
sampled, measured, and analyzed for geothermal temperature gradient;
(c) A description of the regulatory framework for exploring and
developing geothermal resources;
(d) Analysis of the potential for developing geothermal resources
for electric generation and concentrated heating based upon current and
projected technologies;
(e) Analysis, conducted in cooperation with the Washington State
University extension energy program and the department of community,
trade, and economic development, regarding the economic implications of
developing geothermal resources, including community economic
development, job creation, and state and local revenue benefits, with
an assessment for each county in the state;
(f) Recommendations regarding legislative and administrative
actions deemed necessary to encourage development of geothermal
resources in an environmentally responsible manner; and
(g) Recommendations regarding a more comprehensive assessment of
the state's geothermal resources that may:
(i) Consider new measurements of equilibrium geothermal temperature
gradients in existing thermal water wells, particularly in the Columbia
river basin and the southern portion of the Cascade mountain range in
the state;
(ii) Develop predictive geologic models to guide exploration of
geothermal resources;
(iii) Conduct new sampling and analysis of hot and warm springs;
(iv) Make recommendations regarding the regulatory framework for
exploring and developing geothermal resources; and
(v) Describe the logistics of developing geothermal resources.
(3) The department of natural resources shall provide the initial
assessment to the energy and fiscal committees of the senate and house
of representatives by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of natural resources must
secure federal funding, contributions from geothermal energy interests,
or other nonstate sources to meet at least two-thirds of the costs
necessary to implement section 2 of this act. If the department is
unable to secure sufficient nonstate funding by August 1, 2009, the
department shall not implement section 2 of this act.

--- END ---