BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.24.010 and 1990 c 191 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There may be appointed in each county or judicial district, by
the judges of the superior court having jurisdiction therein, one or
more court commissioners for said county or judicial district. Each
such commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and shall
hold the office during the pleasure of the judges making the
appointment.
(2)(a) There may be appointed in counties with a population of more
than four hundred thousand, by the presiding judge of the superior
court having jurisdiction therein, one or more attorneys to act as
criminal commissioners to assist the superior court in disposing of
adult criminal cases. Such criminal commissioners shall have power,
authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the superior court and the
judges thereof, in adult criminal cases, to preside over arraignments,
preliminary appearances, initial extradition hearings, and
noncompliance proceedings pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6333; accept pleas if
authorized by local court rules; appoint counsel; make determinations
of probable cause; set, amend, and review conditions of pretrial
release; set bail; set trial and hearing dates; authorize continuances;
and accept waivers of the right to speedy trial.
(b) The county legislative authority must approve the creation of
criminal commissioner positions.

--- END ---