BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature believes the role of
policymaking requires clarity, consistency, and precision in the
preparation and interpretation of legislation. The legislature finds
that over the past decades, there have been instances in which statutes
have been judicially construed differently than may have been intended
and that it will be helpful to the judicial and legislative branches if
the rules by which statutes are judicially construed are reviewed and
better understood by both branches. The legislature also finds that
rules of construction should be codified to the extent possible such
that both branches will have enhanced opportunities to: (1) Achieve
mutually consistent understandings of legislative intent regarding
matters of public policy; (2) reduce the necessity of ongoing
revisions; and (3) provide parties to litigation increased
predictability of outcome of contested matters.
The legislature, therefore, intends to create a broadly
representative task force to review the existing rules of statutory
construction, identify those rules that are appropriate for
codification, and identify those rules that may, if revised, lead to
improved comity between the legislative and judicial branches in
determining public policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A legislative task force on statutory
construction is established, with membership as provided in this
subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives;
(iii) The chief justice of the Washington state supreme court or
the chief justice's designee is invited to be a member;
(iv) A superior court judge appointed by the superior court judges
association is invited to be a member;
(v) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(vi) Two prosecutors appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys or designees of the prosecutors;
(vii) Two attorneys, one appointed by the Washington defender
association and one appointed by the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers;
(viii) Two attorneys appointed by the Washington state bar
association. One shall be an attorney whose primary practice is
representing individuals in litigation involving tortious conduct. One
shall be an attorney whose primary practice is representing commercial
entities in litigation involving tortious conduct. The state bar
association shall seek advice from groups representing such attorneys
in making its selections;
(ix) A law professor knowledgeable in statutory construction,
appointed by the governor;
(x) An administrative law judge;
(xi) A representative of the association of Washington cities; and
(xii) A representative of the Washington state association of
counties.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative membership. The joint call of the chairs of both the
senate and house judiciary committees shall convene the initial meeting
of the task force.
(2) The task force shall review, at a minimum, the following
issues:
(a) Which, if any, of the rules of statutory construction should be
codified;
(b) The methods by which the rules should be codified including,
but not limited to, codifying the rules on a per act basis or codifying
the rules as a whole;
(c) The benefits and drawbacks of codification including, but not
limited to, constitutional implications; and
(d) What, if any, additional measures can the legislature and the
judiciary take to improve the collective understanding of what statutes
mean.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the
legislature.
(4) Travel and other membership expenses for legislative members
must not be reimbursed. Nonlegislative members must seek reimbursement
for travel and other membership expenses through their respective
agencies.
(5) The task force shall hold meetings in places throughout the
state in an effort to accommodate the varied places of residence among
task force members.
(6) The task force may organize itself in a manner, and adopt
rules of procedure, that it determines most conducive to the timely
completion of its charge.
(7) The task force is subject to chapter 42.30 RCW.
(8) The task force shall submit an interim report to the Washington
state supreme court and appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2010, and its final findings and recommendations to the
Washington state supreme court and appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 1, 2011.
(9) This section expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---