BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
uniform foreign-country money judgments recognition act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Foreign country" means a government other than:
(a) The United States;
(b) A state, district, commonwealth, territory, or insular
possession of the United States; or
(c) Any other government with regard to which the decision in this
state as to whether to recognize a judgment of that government's courts
is initially subject to determination under the full faith and credit
clause of the United States Constitution.
(2) "Foreign-country judgment" means a judgment of a court of a
foreign country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section, this chapter applies to a foreign-country judgment to the extent that the judgment:
(a) Grants or denies recovery of a sum of money; and
(b) Under the law of the foreign country where rendered, is final,
conclusive, and enforceable.
(2) This chapter does not apply to a foreign-country judgment, even
if the judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, to the
extent that the judgment is:
(a) A judgment for taxes;
(b) A fine or other penalty; or
(c) A judgment for divorce, support, or maintenance, or other
judgment rendered in connection with domestic relations.
(3) A party seeking recognition of a foreign-country judgment has
the burden of establishing that this chapter applies to the foreign-country judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a court of this state shall
recognize a foreign-country judgment to which this chapter applies.
(2) A court of this state may not recognize a foreign-country
judgment if:
(a) The judgment was rendered under a judicial system that does not
provide impartial tribunals or procedures compatible with the
requirements of due process of law;
(b) The foreign court did not have personal jurisdiction over the
defendant; or
(c) The foreign court did not have jurisdiction over the subject
matter.
(3) A court of this state need not recognize a foreign-country
judgment if:
(a) The defendant in the proceeding in the foreign court did not
receive notice of the proceeding in sufficient time to enable the
defendant to defend;
(b) The judgment was obtained by fraud that deprived the losing
party of an adequate opportunity to present its case;
(c) The judgment or the cause of action on which the judgment is
based is repugnant to the public policy of this state or of the United
States;
(d) The judgment conflicts with another final and conclusive
judgment;
(e) The proceeding in the foreign court was contrary to an
agreement between the parties under which the dispute in question was
to be determined otherwise than by proceedings in that foreign court;
(f) In the case of jurisdiction based only on personal service, the
foreign court was a seriously inconvenient forum for the trial of the
action;
(g) The judgment was rendered in circumstances that raise
substantial doubt about the integrity of the rendering court with
respect to the judgment; or
(h) The specific proceeding in the foreign court leading to the
judgment was not compatible with the requirements of due process of
law.
(4) A party resisting recognition of a foreign-country judgment has
the burden of establishing that a ground for nonrecognition stated in
subsection (2) or (3) of this section exists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A foreign-country judgment may not be
refused recognition for lack of personal jurisdiction if:
(a) The defendant was served with process personally in the foreign
country;
(b) The defendant voluntarily appeared in the proceeding, other
than for the purpose of protecting property seized or threatened with
seizure in the proceeding or of contesting the jurisdiction of the
court over the defendant;
(c) The defendant, before the commencement of the proceeding, had
agreed to submit to the jurisdiction of the foreign court with respect
to the subject matter involved;
(d) The defendant was domiciled in the foreign country when the
proceeding was instituted or was a corporation or other form of
business organization that had its principal place of business in, or
was organized under the laws of, the foreign country;
(e) The defendant had a business office in the foreign country and
the proceeding in the foreign court involved a [cause of action] [claim
for relief] arising out of business done by the defendant through that
office in the foreign country; or
(f) The defendant operated a motor vehicle or airplane in the
foreign country and the proceeding involved a [cause of action] [claim
for relief] arising out of that operation.
(2) The list of bases for personal jurisdiction in subsection (1)
of this section is not exclusive. The courts of this state may
recognize bases of personal jurisdiction other than those listed in
subsection (1) of this section as sufficient to support a foreign-country judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) If recognition of a foreign-country
judgment is sought as an original matter, the issue of recognition
shall be raised by filing an action seeking recognition of the foreign-country judgment.
(2) If recognition of a foreign-country judgment is sought in a
pending action, the issue of recognition may be raised by counterclaim,
cross-claim, or affirmative defense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If the court in a proceeding under section
6 of this act finds that the foreign-country judgment is entitled to
recognition under this chapter then, to the extent that the foreign-country judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, the
foreign-country judgment is:
(1) Conclusive between the parties to the same extent as the
judgment of a sister state entitled to full faith and credit in this
state would be conclusive; and
(2) Enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as a
judgment rendered in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If a party establishes that an appeal from
a foreign-country judgment is pending or will be taken, the court may
stay any proceedings with regard to the foreign-country judgment until
the appeal is concluded, the time for appeal expires, or the appellant
has had sufficient time to prosecute the appeal and has failed to do
so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 An action to recognize a foreign-country
judgment must be commenced within the earlier of the time during which
the foreign-country judgment is effective in the foreign country or
fifteen years from the date that the foreign-country judgment became
effective in the foreign country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 In applying and construing this uniform
act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This chapter applies to all actions
commenced on or after the effective date of this section in which the
issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This chapter does not prevent the
recognition under principles of comity or otherwise of a foreign-country judgment not within the scope of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 6 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 6.40.010 (Definitions) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240 s 1;
(2) RCW 6.40.020 (Applicability) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240 s 2;
(3) RCW 6.40.030 (Recognition and enforcement) and 1975 1st ex.s.
c 240 s 3;
(4) RCW 6.40.040 (Grounds for nonrecognition) and 1975 1st ex.s. c
240 s 4;
(5) RCW 6.40.050 (Personal jurisdiction) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240
s 5;
(6) RCW 6.40.060 (Stay in case of appeal) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240
s 6;
(7) RCW 6.40.070 (Saving clause) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240 s 7;
(8) RCW 6.40.900 (Uniformity of interpretation) and 1975 1st ex.s.
c 240 s 8;
(9) RCW 6.40.905 (Short title) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240 s 9;
(10) RCW 6.40.910 (Application to judgments in effect on effective
date) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240 s 10; and
(11) RCW 6.40.915 (Section headings) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 240 s 12.

--- END ---